BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.47.010 and 1993 c 492 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The legislature finds that limitations on access to health care services for
enrollees in the state, such as in rural and underserved areas, are
particularly challenging for the basic health plan. Statutory restrictions
have reduced the options available to the administrator to address the access
needs of basic health plan enrollees. It is the intent of the legislature to
authorize the administrator to develop alternative purchasing strategies to
ensure access to basic health plan enrollees in all areas of the state.

(b)
In developing alternative purchasing strategies to address health care access
needs, the administrator shall consult with interested persons including health
carriers, health care providers, and health facilities, and with other
appropriate state agencies including the office of the insurance commissioner
and the department of health's office of community and rural health.

(2)
The legislature further finds that:

(a)
A significant percentage of the population of this state does not have
reasonably available insurance or other coverage of the costs of necessary
basic health care services;

(b)
This lack of basic health care coverage is detrimental to the health of the
individuals lacking coverage and to the public welfare, and results in
substantial expenditures for emergency and remedial health care, often at the
expense of health care providers, health care facilities, and all purchasers of
health care, including the state; and

(c)
The use of managed health care systems has significant potential to reduce the
growth of health care costs incurred by the people of this state generally, and
by low-income pregnant women, and at-risk children and adolescents who need
greater access to managed health care.

(((2)))
(3) The purpose of this chapter is to provide or make more readily
available necessary basic health care services in an appropriate setting to
working persons and others who lack coverage, at a cost to these persons that
does not create barriers to the utilization of necessary health care services.
To that end, this chapter establishes a program to be made available to those
residents not eligible for medicare who share in a portion of the cost or who
pay the full cost of receiving basic health care services from a managed health
care system.

(((3)))
(4) It is not the intent of this chapter to provide health care services
for those persons who are presently covered through private employer-based
health plans, nor to replace employer-based health plans. However, the
legislature recognizes that cost-effective and affordable health plans may not
always be available to small business employers. Further, it is the intent of
the legislature to expand, wherever possible, the availability of private
health care coverage and to discourage the decline of employer-based coverage.

(((4)))
(5)(a) It is the purpose of this chapter to acknowledge the initial
success of this program that has (i) assisted thousands of families in their
search for affordable health care; (ii) demonstrated that low-income, uninsured
families are willing to pay for their own health care coverage to the extent of
their ability to pay; and (iii) proved that local health care providers are
willing to enter into a public-private partnership as a managed care system.

(b)
As a consequence, the legislature intends to extend an option to enroll to
certain citizens above two hundred percent of the federal poverty guidelines
within the state who reside in communities where the plan is operational and
who collectively or individually wish to exercise the opportunity to purchase
health care coverage through the basic health plan if the purchase is done at
no cost to the state. It is also the intent of the legislature to allow
employers and other financial sponsors to financially assist such individuals to
purchase health care through the program so long as such purchase does not
result in a lower standard of coverage for employees.

(c)
The legislature intends that, to the extent of available funds, the program be
available throughout Washington state to subsidized and nonsubsidized
enrollees. It is also the intent of the legislature to enroll subsidized
enrollees first, to the maximum extent feasible.

(d)
The legislature directs that the basic health plan administrator identify
enrollees who are likely to be eligible for medical assistance and assist these
individuals in applying for and receiving medical assistance. The
administrator and the department of social and health services shall implement
a seamless system to coordinate eligibility determinations and benefit coverage
for enrollees of the basic health plan and medical assistance recipients.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.47.020 and 1997 c 335 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system
of enrollment and payment ((on a prepaid capitated basis)) for basic
health care services, administered by the plan administrator through
participating managed health care systems, created by this chapter.

(2)
"Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan administrator,
who also holds the position of administrator of the Washington state health
care authority.

(3)
"Managed health care system" means any health care organization,
including health care providers, insurers, health care service contractors,
health maintenance organizations, insurance coverage provided under RCW
41.05.140, or any combination thereof, that provides directly or by
contract basic health care services, as defined by the administrator and
rendered by duly licensed providers, ((on a prepaid capitated basis)) to
a defined patient population enrolled in the plan and in the managed health
care system.

(4)
"Subsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual plus the
individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not eligible for
medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a government-operated
institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the
administrator; (c) who resides in an area of the state served by a managed
health care system participating in the plan; (d) whose gross family income at
the time of enrollment does not exceed twice the federal poverty level as
adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal department of
health and human services; and (e) who chooses to obtain basic health care
coverage from a particular managed health care system in return for periodic
payments to the plan.

(5)
"Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual plus
the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not eligible for
medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a government-operated
institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the
administrator; (c) who resides in an area of the state served by a managed
health care system participating in the plan; (d) who chooses to obtain basic
health care coverage from a particular managed health care system; and (e) who
pays or on whose behalf is paid the full costs for participation in the plan,
without any subsidy from the plan.

(6)
"Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of periodic payment
the administrator makes to a managed health care system on behalf of a
subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost to the plan of providing the
plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount determined to be the
subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW 70.47.060(2).

(7)
"Premium" means a periodic payment, based upon gross family income
which an individual, their employer or another financial sponsor makes to the
plan as consideration for enrollment in the plan as a subsidized enrollee or a
nonsubsidized enrollee.

(8)
"Rate" means the ((per capita)) amount, negotiated by the
administrator with and paid to a participating managed health care system, that
is based upon the enrollment of subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in the
plan and in that system.

Sec.
3. RCW
41.05.140 and 1994 c 153 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except for property and casualty insurance, the authority may self-fund,
self-insure, or enter into other methods of providing insurance coverage for
insurance programs under its jurisdiction ((except property and casualty
insurance)), including the basic health plan as provided in chapter
70.47 RCW. The authority shall contract for payment of claims or other
administrative services for programs under its jurisdiction. If a program does
not require the prepayment of reserves, the authority shall establish such
reserves within a reasonable period of time for the payment of claims as are
normally required for that type of insurance under an insured program.

(2)
Reserves established by the authority for employee and retiree benefit programs
shall be held in a separate trust fund by the state treasurer and shall be
known as the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund. The state
investment board shall act as the investor for the funds and, except as
provided in RCW 43.33A.160, one hundred percent of all earnings from these
investments shall accrue directly to the public employees' and retirees'
insurance reserve fund.

(3)
Any savings realized as a result of a program created for employees and
retirees under this section shall not be used to increase benefits unless such
use is authorized by statute.

(4)
Reserves established by the authority to provide insurance coverage for the
basic health plan under chapter 70.47 RCW shall be held in a separate trust
account by the state treasurer and shall be known as the basic health plan
self-insurance reserve account. The state investment board shall act as the
investor for the funds and, except as provided in RCW 43.33A.160, one hundred
percent of all earnings from these investments shall accrue directly to the
basic health plan self-insurance reserve account.

(5)
Any program created under this section shall be subject to the examination
requirements of chapter 48.03 RCW as if the program were a domestic insurer.
In conducting an examination, the commissioner shall determine the adequacy of
the reserves established for the program.

(((5)))
(6) The authority shall keep full and adequate accounts and records of
the assets, obligations, transactions, and affairs of any program created under
this section.

(((6)))
(7) The authority shall file a quarterly statement of the financial
condition, transactions, and affairs of any program created under this section
in a form and manner prescribed by the insurance commissioner. The statement
shall contain information as required by the commissioner for the type of
insurance being offered under the program. A copy of the annual statement
shall be filed with the speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.79A.040 and 1999 c 384 s 8 and 1999 c 182 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested
by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and
to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2)
All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set
aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment
income account.

(3)
The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased
banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not
limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state
treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject
in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution
of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
investment income account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of
this subsection.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the
basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the game
farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium
and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility grant account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the
children's trust fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(c)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the
advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics
asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail
service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs
account.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without
the specific affirmative directive of this section.

---
END ---