BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
2.70.020 and 1996 c 221 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director, under the supervision and direction of the advisory committee, shall:

(1)
Administer all criminal appellate indigent defense services;

(2)
Submit a biennial budget for all costs related to state appellate indigent
defense;

(3)
Establish administrative procedures, standards, and guidelines for the program
including a cost-efficient system that provides for recovery of costs;

(4)
Recommend criteria and standards for determining and verifying indigency. In
recommending criteria for determining indigency, the director shall compile and
review the indigency standards used by other state agencies and shall
periodically submit the compilation and report to the legislature on the
appropriateness and consistency of such standards;

(5)
Collect information regarding indigency cases funded by the state and report
annually to the legislature and the supreme court;

(6)
Coordinate with the supreme court and the judges of each division of the court
of appeals to determine how attorney services should be provided;

(7)
Administer and distribute funds appropriated for representation of indigent
parents and children in dependency and termination cases brought under chapter
13.34 RCW. The funding shall be targeted to the following tasks:

(a)
Working with counsel and courts to reduce delays and continuances in dependency
and termination cases;

(b)
Making reasonable funds available for necessary professional services,
including but not limited to expert and investigative services;

(c)
Developing standards of practice for counsel representing children and indigent
parents, guardians, and legal custodians in dependency and termination cases;

(d)
Ensuring parents, guardians, and legal custodians are screened for indigency
pursuant to chapter 10.101 RCW;

(e)
Working with courts, defense counsel, and prosecuting counsel to develop
methods for establishing paternity among possible fathers at the earliest
possible date when paternity is at issue;

(f)
Setting compensation levels for counsel representing parents, guardians, legal
custodians, and children in dependency and termination caseloads that attract
competent, skilled counsel, and provide for reasonable caseloads;

(g)
Developing training for dependency and termination defense counsel.

The office of public defense shall not provide direct
representation of clients.

---
END ---