BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
82.08.812 (Exemptions--Coal used at coal-fired thermal electric
generation facility--Forfeiture upon use of nonlocal coal
sources--Reinstatement) and 1997 c 368 s 5; and

(2) RCW
82.12.812 (Exemptions--Coal used at coal-fired thermal electric
generation facility--Forfeiture upon use of nonlocal coal
sources--Reinstatement) and 1997 c 368 s 7.

---
END ---