BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Child safety seat" means any device, except safety belts, designed
for use in a motor vehicle to restrain, seat, or position a child who weighs
fifty pounds or less.

(2)
"Second-hand child safety seat" means any child safety seat that is
being sold or distributed after its purchase by its original owner.

(3)
"Distributing organization" means a charitable nonprofit organization
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code, or a public
health agency acting on behalf of or in conjunction with a charitable nonprofit
organization, which distributes children's items to needy persons free of
charge and includes any nonprofit organization that distributes children's
items free of charge to other nonprofit organizations or the public. A public
health agency shall not otherwise be considered a distributing organization for
purposes of this chapter when it is carrying out other functions and
responsibilities under Title 70 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
Any corporation, partnership, association, or distributing organization that
sells or distributes second-hand child safety seats shall post and maintain at
or near the point of sale, point of distribution, or display location, durable
and legible signs informing the public of the dangers of using a second-hand
child safety seat.

(2)
The content of the sign shall conform with standards adopted by the Washington
state patrol pursuant to section 3 of this act.

(3)
A corporation, partnership, association, or distributing organization that
violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject
to a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars.

(4)
Violation of this section or section 1 of this act is a matter affecting the
public interest for the purpose of applying chapter 19.86 RCW. Failure to
comply with this chapter is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business. A violation of this chapter constitutes an unfair or
deceptive act or practice in trade or commerce for the purposes of applying
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
Washington state patrol shall adopt standards regarding the minimum content and
size of signs posted by corporations, partnerships, associations, or distributing
organizations to warn consumers of the dangers of using a second-hand child
safety seat. The content of the signs shall include text regarding the risks
associated with unobservable damage to child safety seats, the risks related to
the deterioration of the child safety seat components over time, inspection
recommendations for the consumer when purchasing a second-hand child safety
seat, phone numbers for the consumer to use to determine if a second-hand child
safety seat has been recalled, and the risks that a child safety seat may not
be subject to federal safety standards.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---