BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.58.190 and 1995 c 347 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The appeal of the department’s decision to adopt a master program or amendment
pursuant to RCW 90.58.070(2) or 90.58.090(4) is governed by RCW 34.05.510
through 34.05.598.

(2)(a)
The department's decision to approve, reject, or modify a proposed master
program or amendment adopted by a local government planning under RCW
36.70A.040 shall be appealed to the growth management hearings board with
jurisdiction over the local government. The appeal shall be initiated by
filing a petition as provided in RCW 36.70A.250 through 36.70A.320.

(b)
If the appeal to the growth management hearings board concerns shorelines, the
growth management hearings board shall review the proposed master program or
amendment for compliance with the requirements of this chapter and chapter
36.70A RCW, the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines, and
chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to the adoption of master programs and
amendments under chapter 90.58 RCW.

(c)
If the appeal to the growth management hearings board concerns a shoreline of
state-wide significance, the board shall uphold the decision by the department
unless the board, by clear and convincing evidence, determines that the
decision of the department is inconsistent with the requirements of this
chapter or chapter 36.70A RCW, the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the
applicable guidelines, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to the adoption
of master programs and amendments under chapter 90.58 RCW.

(d)
The appellant has the burden of proof in all appeals to the growth management
hearings board under this subsection.

(e)
Any party aggrieved by a final decision of a growth management hearings board
under this subsection may appeal the decision to superior court as provided in
RCW 36.70A.300.

(3)(a)
The department's decision to approve, reject, or modify a proposed master
program or master program amendment by a local government not planning under
RCW 36.70A.040 shall be appealed to the shorelines hearings board by filing a
petition within thirty days of the date of the department’s written notice to
the local government of the department’s decision to approve, reject, or modify
a proposed master program or master program amendment as provided in RCW
90.58.090(2).

(b)
In an appeal relating to shorelines, the shorelines hearings board shall review
the proposed master program or master program amendment ((and, after full
consideration of the presentations of the local government and the department,
shall determine the validity of the local government's master program or
amendment in light of)) for compliance with the requirements of this
chapter, the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines, and
chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to the adoption of master programs and
amendments under chapter 90.58 RCW.

(c)
In an appeal relating to shorelines of state-wide significance, the shorelines
hearings board shall uphold the decision by the department unless the board
determines, by clear and convincing evidence that the decision of the
department is inconsistent with the requirements of this chapter, the
policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines, or chapter 43.21C RCW
as it relates to the adoption of master programs and amendments under chapter
90.58 RCW.

(d)
Review by the shorelines hearings board shall be considered an adjudicative
proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act. The ((aggrieved
local government)) appellant shall have the burden of proof in all
such reviews. The board shall fully consider the presentations of the local
government and the department in making its determinations.

(e)
Whenever possible, the review by the shorelines hearings board shall be heard
within the county where the land subject to the proposed master program or
master program amendment is primarily located. ((The department and any
local government)) Any party aggrieved by a final decision of the
hearings board may appeal the decision to superior court as provided in chapter
34.05 RCW.

(4) A master program amendment shall become effective after the
approval of the department or after the decision of the shorelines hearings
board to uphold the master program or master program amendment, provided that
the board may remand the master program or master program adjustment to the
local government or the department for modification prior to the final adoption
of the master program or master program amendment.

---
END ---