BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature enacted chapter 263, Laws of 1999 to help address problems with
failing septic systems. As part of chapter 263, Laws of 1999, a work group was
created to develop recommendations regarding financial assurances of on-site
sewage disposal system practitioners, including bonding, insurance, risk pools,
and similar methods. This work group submitted its recommendations to the legislature
on December 1, 1999. Recommendations developed by the work group include the
development of a data collection system that documents the number and types of
systems, locations within the state by region, the frequency of repair, and the
diagnosed factors leading to repair, as well as the development of a model
program that identifies the authorities, roles, and responsibilities of the
designer, installer, and homeowner.

The
legislature recognizes that a major source of nonpoint pollution is failing
on-site sewage disposal systems. The 1999-2001 Puget Sound water quality work
plan, developed by the Puget Sound water quality action team, indicates that
local governments have reported failure rates for on-site sewage disposal
systems of up to twenty-five percent along the shoreline of Puget Sound.
Pollution from these failing systems poses a risk to public health and water
quality, and significantly impacts the shellfish industry. The general public
is also exposed to significant health risks when sewage is discharged upon the
ground or into surface or ground waters. The legislature finds that the public
health and water quality can be better protected by: The development of better
data; the development of clear lines of responsibility between the designer,
installers, and homeowners; and clarifications to the existing law regarding
on-site sewage disposal systems.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW to read as follows:

If
a local health officer requires the drainfield, sand filter, or mound portion
of an on-site sewage disposal system to be dug open to determine the condition
of the drainfield, sand filter, or mound, the local health officer shall
require the installation of an inspection portal or portals in order to monitor
the drainfield, sand filter, or mound in an easy and cost-effective manner.
Any on-site sewage disposal system installed or repaired after the effective
date of this section must: (1) Contain an inspection portal or portals in any
drainfield, sand filter, or mound; and (2) be equipped with appropriately
sealed risers in any septic tank openings requiring maintenance.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.118.020 and 1994 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(1)
"Nonwater-carried sewage disposal devices" means any device that
stores and treats nonwater-carried human urine and feces.

(2)
"Alternative methods of effluent disposal" means systems approved by
the department of health, including at least, mound systems, alternating
drainfields, anaerobic filters, evapotranspiration systems, and aerobic
systems.

(3)
"Failure" means: (a) Effluent has been discharged on the surface of
the ground prior to approved treatment; or (b) effluent has percolated to the
surface of the ground; or (c) effluent has contaminated or threatens to
contaminate a ground water supply; or (d) a drainfield, sand filter, or
mound that has become saturated. For purposes of this subsection,
"saturated" means an inability to fully absorb wastewater, which may
be exhibited by a pumped tank filling from the backflow from the drainfield,
sand filter, or mound. A failing system does not include those systems that
are temporarily saturated due to the occurrence of a flooded stream or river.

(4)
"Additive" means any commercial product intended to affect the
performance or aesthetics of an on-site sewage disposal system.

(5)
"Department" means the department of health.

(6)
"On-site sewage disposal system" means any system of piping,
treatment devices, or other facilities that convey, store, treat, or dispose of
sewage on the property where it originates or on nearby property under the
control of the user where the system is not connected to a public sewer
system. For purposes of this chapter, an on-site sewage disposal system does
not include indoor plumbing and associated fixtures.

(7)
"Chemical additive" means those additives containing acids, bases, or
other chemicals deemed unsafe by the department for use in an on-site sewage
disposal system.

(8)
"Additive manufacturer" means any person who manufactures,
formulates, blends, packages, or repackages an additive product for sale, use,
or distribution within the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
department of health shall develop a model program pertaining to on-site sewage
disposal systems that describes the authorities, roles, and responsibilities of
designers, installers, and homeowners. In developing the model program, the
department shall involve local health jurisdictions, owners of on-site sewage
disposal systems, designers and installers of on-site sewage disposal systems,
and builders. The meetings to develop the model program shall be open to the
public, and time shall be allocated at each meeting to receive public comment.
The model program has no binding effect on the liability of any party, but
shall be used in the future development of a cost-effective performance-based
recovery system for consumers of on-site sewage disposal systems. The model
shall give consideration to long-term performance warranties provided to the
owners of these on-site systems. Design criteria in this model should address
peak flow limitations. The department of health shall report its recommendations
and model to the office of financial management and the appropriate legislative
committees by July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department of health shall develop recommendations for establishing a
state-wide system of risk assessment data for on-site sewage disposal systems.
The department shall consult with local health jurisdictions in developing the
recommendations. The recommendations shall address how local governments will
maintain and transmit information to the department pertaining to on-site
sewage disposal systems, and how this information will be used by local health
jurisdictions to determine appropriate siting, design, and inspection
protocols. Information that shall be considered when developing the
recommendations for the system of risk assessment data include the number and
types of on-site sewage disposal systems, the frequency of repair by geographic
regions, factors leading to repair by general category, and funding for the
state and local governments to develop and maintain the system of data.
Nothing in this section requires a local board of health to collect information
concerning why an on-site sewage disposal system failed prior to the
development of the system. The department of health shall submit its
recommendations to the office of financial management and the appropriate
legislative committees by January 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW to read as follows:

Whenever
a local health officer determines that a person has intentionally discharged
effluent onto the surface of the ground, or into surface or ground water, or
has installed a bypass to an on-site sewage disposal system that results in
such a discharge, and the person causing the discharge is an installer, pumper,
or other on-site sewage disposal system professional subject to department of
health guidelines for on-site sewage disposal system work, the local board of
health must suspend the license, certification, permit, or other authority of
the on-site sewage disposal system professional for a minimum of thirty days.
The suspension under this section is in addition to any civil or criminal
penalty that may be imposed by the local board of health or the department of
health. This section does not apply when the discharge is authorized by a
local health officer as the only realistic method of final disposal of treated
effluent. This section does not apply to designers of on-site sewage disposal
systems, who are subject to section 7 of this act for intentional discharges of
effluent.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 18.210 RCW to read as follows:

When
a local health officer determines that a designer has intentionally discharged
effluent onto the surface of the ground, or into surface or ground water, or
has installed a bypass to an on-site sewage disposal system that results in
such a discharge, the local health officer shall report the incident to the board.
The board, acting pursuant to RCW 18.210.030, shall suspend the license or
practice permit of the designer for a minimum of thirty days. The suspension
shall be in addition to any civil or criminal penalty that may be imposed. An
intentional discharge of effluent in violation of this section constitutes
malpractice under RCW 18.210.020. This section does not apply when the
discharge is authorized by a local health officer as the only realistic method
of final disposal of treated effluent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---