BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
75.20.103 and 1998 c 190 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

In
the event that any person or government agency desires to construct any form of
hydraulic project or other work that diverts water for agricultural irrigation
or stock watering purposes, or when such hydraulic project or other work is
associated with streambank stabilization to protect farm and agricultural land
as defined in RCW 84.34.020, and when such diversion or streambank
stabilization will use, divert, obstruct, or change the natural flow or bed of
any river or stream or will utilize any waters of the state or materials from
the stream beds, the person or government agency shall, before commencing
construction or work thereon and to ensure the proper protection of fish life,
secure a written approval from the department as to the adequacy of the means
proposed for the protection of fish life. This approval shall not be
unreasonably withheld. Except as provided in RCW 75.20.1001, the department
shall grant or deny the approval within forty-five calendar days of the receipt
of a complete application and notice of compliance with any applicable
requirements of the state environmental policy act, made in the manner
prescribed in this section. The applicant may document receipt of application
by filing in person or by registered mail. A complete application for an
approval shall contain general plans for the overall project, complete plans
and specifications of the proposed construction or work within ordinary high
water line, and complete plans and specifications for the proper protection of
fish life. The forty-five day requirement shall be suspended if (1) after ten
working days of receipt of the application, the applicant remains unavailable
or unable to arrange for a timely field evaluation of the proposed project; (2)
the site is physically inaccessible for inspection; or (3) the applicant
requests delay.

Immediately
upon determination that the forty-five day period is suspended, the department
shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the delay.

An
approval shall remain in effect without need for periodic renewal for projects
that divert water for agricultural irrigation or stock watering purposes and
that involve seasonal construction or other work. Approval for streambank
stabilization projects shall remain in effect without need for periodic renewal
if the problem causing the need for the streambank stabilization occurs on an
annual or more frequent basis. The permittee must notify the appropriate
agency before commencing the construction or other work within the area covered
by the approval.

The
permittee must demonstrate substantial progress on construction of that portion
of the project relating to the approval within two years of the date of
issuance. If the department denies approval, the department shall provide the
applicant, in writing, a statement of the specific reasons why and how the
proposed project would adversely affect fish life. Protection of fish life
shall be the only ground upon which approval may be denied or conditioned.
Issuance, denial, conditioning, or modification shall be appealable to the
hydraulic appeals board established in RCW 43.21B.005 within thirty days of the
notice of decision. The burden shall be upon the department to show that the
denial or conditioning of an approval is solely aimed at the protection of fish
life.

The
department may, after consultation with the permittee, modify an approval due
to changed conditions. The modifications shall become effective unless
appealed to the hydraulic appeals board within thirty days from the notice of
the proposed modification. The burden is on the department to show that
changed conditions warrant the modification in order to protect fish life.

A
permittee may request modification of an approval due to changed conditions.
The request shall be processed within forty-five calendar days of receipt of
the written request. A decision by the department may be appealed to the
hydraulic appeals board within thirty days of the notice of the decision. The
burden is on the permittee to show that changed conditions warrant the
requested modification and that such modification will not impair fish life.

In
the event that any person or government agency desires to construct a hydraulic
project or other work associated with streambank stabilization to protect farm
and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020, the department shall issue
immediately upon receipt of a complete application written approval for the
project if the project has been approved by the conservation district from the
county where the project resides.

In
case of an emergency arising from weather or stream flow conditions or other
natural conditions, the department, through its authorized representatives,
shall issue immediately upon request oral approval for removing any
obstructions, repairing existing structures, restoring stream banks, or to protect
property threatened by the stream or a change in the stream flow without the
necessity of obtaining a written approval prior to commencing work. Conditions
of an oral approval shall be reduced to writing within thirty days and complied
with as provided for in this section.

For
purposes of this chapter, "streambank stabilization" shall include
but not be limited to log and debris removal, bank protection (including
riprap, jetties, and groins), gravel removal and erosion control.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---