BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.04.080 and 1998 c 221 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Prosecutions for criminal offenses shall not be commenced after the periods
prescribed in this section.

(a)
The following offenses may be prosecuted at any time after their commission:

(i)
Murder;

(ii)
Homicide by abuse;

(iii)
Arson if a death results;

(iv)
Vehicular homicide;

(v)
Vehicular assault if a death results;

(vi)
Hit-and-run injury-accident if a death results (RCW 46.52.020(4)).

(b)
The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than ten years after their
commission:

(i)
Any felony committed by a public officer if the commission is in connection
with the duties of his or her office or constitutes a breach of his or her
public duty or a violation of the oath of office;

(ii)
Arson if no death results; or

(iii)
Violations of RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 if the rape is reported to a law
enforcement agency within one year of its commission; except that if the victim
is under fourteen years of age when the rape is committed and the rape is
reported to a law enforcement agency within one year of its commission, the
violation may be prosecuted up to three years after the victim's eighteenth
birthday or up to ten years after the rape's commission, whichever is later.
If a violation of RCW 9A.44.040 or 9A.44.050 is not reported within one year,
the rape may not be prosecuted: (A) More than three years after its commission
if the violation was committed against a victim fourteen years of age or older;
or (B) more than three years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or more
than seven years after the rape's commission, whichever is later, if the
violation was committed against a victim under fourteen years of age.

(c)
Violations of the following statutes shall not be prosecuted more than three
years after the victim's eighteenth birthday or more than seven years after
their commission, whichever is later: RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.083,
9A.44.086, 9A.44.070, 9A.44.080, 9A.44.100(1)(b), or 9A.64.020.

(d)
The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than six years after their
commission: Violations of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080.

(e)
The following offenses shall not be prosecuted more than five years after their
commission: Any class C felony under chapter 74.09, 82.36, or 82.38 RCW.

(f)
Bigamy shall not be prosecuted more than three years after the time specified
in RCW 9A.64.010.

(g)
A violation of RCW 9A.56.030 must not be prosecuted more than three years after
the discovery of the offense when the victim is a tax exempt corporation under
26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3).

(h)
No other felony may be prosecuted more than three years after its commission;
except that in a prosecution under RCW 9A.44.115, if the person who was viewed,
photographed, or filmed did not realize at the time that he or she was being
viewed, photographed, or filmed, the prosecution must be commenced within two
years of the time the person who was viewed or in the photograph or film first
learns that he or she was viewed, photographed, or filmed.

(i)
No gross misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than two years after its
commission.

(j)
No misdemeanor may be prosecuted more than one year after its commission.

(2)
The periods of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of this section do not
run during any time when the person charged is not usually and publicly
resident within this state.

(3)
If, before the end of a period of limitation prescribed in subsection (1) of
this section, an indictment has been found or a complaint or an information has
been filed, and the indictment, complaint, or information is set aside, then
the period of limitation is extended by a period equal to the length of time from
the finding or filing to the setting aside.

(4)
Notwithstanding that the time limitations in this section have expired, if the
state has evidence consisting of fingerprints or a deoxyribonucleic acid
profile of a person who committed a crime against persons as defined in RCW
9.94A.440 but comparisons of the evidence to fingerprints or deoxyribonucleic
acid profiles of known persons that were made before the time limitations in
this section expired did not result in a probable identification of the person,
a prosecution for the violation may be commenced within one year after a
comparison of the fingerprints or deoxyribonucleic acid profile evidence
relating to the violation results in a probable identification of the person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act first applies to offenses not barred from prosecution on the effective date
of this act.

---
END ---