BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.160.080 and 1985 c 236 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Local fire departments or fire districts and local health departments may adopt
regulations as required to implement this chapter.

(2) Nothing in this chapter may be construed as to prevent local
governments from adopting regulations restricting or prohibiting smoking in
public places, including but not limited to restaurants, skating rinks, and
bowling alleys, situated within their jurisdictions.

---
END ---