BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Economic development is affected by transportation systems and the imposition
of taxes. To ensure appropriate economic development and that the message of
Initiative Measure No. 695 be implemented, this act requires that voters of a
regional transportation authority who, prior to January 1, 2000, voted to
approve taxes to finance a regional transit system and facilities under chapter
81.112 RCW, be afforded an additional opportunity to reaffirm or reject their
prior approval of these taxes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
auditor of every county in which a regional transportation authority is
located, where prior to January 1, 2000, voters had authorized the regional
transportation authority to impose taxes to finance a regional transit system
and facilities under chapter 81.112 RCW, shall submit to the voters of the
regional transportation authority a ballot proposition inquiring whether they
want to reaffirm their prior approval of these taxes. If a regional
transportation authority is located in more than one county, the prosecuting
attorneys of these counties shall prepare a common ballot proposition to be
submitted to voters of the counties.

If the ballot proposition to reaffirm the taxes is approved by a
simple majority vote of the voters of the regional transportation authority who
vote on the ballot proposition, the regional transportation authority may
continue imposing the taxes it had been authorized to impose. However, if the
ballot proposition to reaffirm the taxes is not approved by the voters of the
regional transportation authority, the regional transportation authority shall
discontinue imposing the taxes it had been authorized to impose.

---
END ---