BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
81.84.005 and 1995 c 361 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Excursion service" means the carriage or conveyance of persons for
compensation over the waters of this state from a point of origin and returning
to the point of origin with an intermediate stop or stops at which passengers
leave the vessel and reboard before the vessel returns to its point of origin.

(2)
"Charter service" means the hiring of a vessel, with captain and
crew, by a person or group for carriage or conveyance of persons or property.

(3)
"Public subsidy" means the provision of money, equipment, or
materials, or the provision of equipment, materials, services, or facilities at
below-market value by a public entity to an applicant for a certificate or
certificate holder that is included in the applicant's or certificate holder's
revenue projections or that materially support or affect the fares charged by
the applicant or certificate holder.

Sec.
2. RCW
81.84.010 and 1993 c 427 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No commercial ferry may hereafter operate any vessel or ferry for the public
use for hire between fixed termini or over a regular route upon the waters
within this state, including the rivers and lakes and Puget Sound, without
first applying for and obtaining from the commission a certificate declaring
that public convenience and necessity require such operation. Service
authorized by certificates issued before or after July 25, 1993, to a
commercial ferry operator shall be exercised by the operator in a manner
consistent with the conditions established in the certificate or tariffs:
PROVIDED, That no certificate shall be required for a vessel primarily engaged
in transporting freight other than vehicles, whose gross earnings from the
transportation of passengers and/or vehicles, are not more than ten percent of
the total gross annual earnings of such vessel: PROVIDED, That nothing herein
shall be construed to affect the right of any county public transportation
benefit area or other public agency within this state to construct, condemn,
purchase, operate, or maintain, itself or by contract, agreement, or lease,
with any person, firm, or corporation, ferries or boats across or wharfs at or
upon the waters within this state, including rivers and lakes and Puget Sound,
provided such operation is not over the same route or between the same
districts, being served by a certificate holder without first acquiring the
rights granted to the certificate holder under the certificate, nor shall this
chapter be construed to affect, amend, or invalidate any contract entered into
prior to January 15, 1927, for the operation of ferries or boats upon the
waters within this state, which was entered into in good faith by any county
with any person, firm, or corporation, except that in case of the operation or
maintenance by any county, city, town, port district, or other political
subdivision by contract, agreement, or lease with any person, firm, or
corporation, of ferries or boats across or wharfs at or upon the waters within
this state, including rivers and lakes and Puget Sound, the commission shall
have power and authority to regulate rates and services of such operation or
maintenance of ferries, boats, or wharfs, to make, fix, alter, or amend said
rates, and to regulate service and safety of operations thereof, in the manner
and to the same extent as it is empowered to regulate a commercial ferry,
notwithstanding the provisions of any act or parts of acts inconsistent
herewith.

(2)
The holder of a certificate of public convenience and necessity granted under
this chapter must initiate service within five years of obtaining the
certificate. The certificate holder shall report to the commission every six
months after the certificate is granted on the progress of the certificated
route. The reports shall include, but not be limited to, the progress of
environmental impact, parking, local government land use, docking, and
financing considerations. However, if service has not been initiated within
five years of obtaining the certificate, the commission may extend the
certificate on a twelve-month basis for up to three years if the six-month
progress reports indicate there is significant advancement toward initiating
service.

(3)
The commission shall review certificates in existence as of July 25, 1993,
where service is not being provided on all or any portion of the route or
routes certificated. Based on progress reports required under subsection (2)
of this section, the commission may grant an extension beyond that provided in
subsection (2) of this section. Such additional extension may not exceed a
total of two years.

(4)
Certificates issued to holders whose rates include or otherwise rely upon
public subsidies must be conditioned upon the continuation of the subsidies.
If the public entity subsidizing the certificate holder, in its sole
legislative discretion or by exercise of contractual right, eliminates the
subsidy, the certificate will lapse upon notification of the commission by the
public entity. If the subsidy is reduced the commission shall review the
certificate.

Sec.
3. RCW 81.84.020
and 1993 c 427 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon the filing of an application the commission shall give reasonable notice
to the department, affected cities and counties, and any common carrier which
might be adversely affected, of the time and place for hearing on such
application. The commission shall have power after hearing, to issue the
certificate as prayed for, or to refuse to issue it, or to issue it for the
partial exercise only of the privilege sought, and may attach to the exercise
of the rights granted by said certificate such terms and conditions as in its
judgment the public convenience and necessity may require; but the commission
shall not have power to grant a certificate to operate between districts and/or
into any territory prohibited by RCW 47.60.120 or already served by an existing
certificate holder, unless such existing certificate holder has failed or
refused to furnish reasonable and adequate service or has failed to provide the
service described in its certificate or tariffs after the time period allowed
to initiate service has elapsed: PROVIDED, A certificate shall be granted when
it shall appear to the satisfaction of the commission that the commercial ferry
was actually operating in good faith over the route for which such certificate
shall be sought, on January 15, 1927: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That in case two or
more commercial ferries shall upon said date have been operating vessels upon
the same route, or between the same districts the commission shall determine
after public hearing whether one or more certificates shall issue, and in
determining to whom a certificate or certificates shall be issued, the
commission shall consider all material facts and circumstances including the
prior operation, schedules, and services rendered by either of the ferries, and
in case more than one certificate shall issue, the commission shall fix and
determine the schedules and services of the ferries to which the certificates
are issued to the end that duplication of service be eliminated and public
convenience be furthered.

(2)
Before issuing a certificate, the commission shall determine that the applicant
has the financial resources to operate the proposed service for at least twelve
months, based upon the submission by the applicant of a pro forma financial
statement of operations. Issuance of a certificate shall be determined upon,
but not limited to, the following factors: Ridership and revenue forecasts;
the cost of service for the proposed operation; an estimate of the cost of the
assets to be used in providing the service; public subsidies; a
statement of the total assets on hand of the applicant that will be expended on
the proposed operation; and a statement of prior experience, if any, in such
field by the applicant. The documentation required of the applicant under this
section shall comply with the provisions of RCW 9A.72.085.

(3)
((Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to an application for a
certificate that is pending as of July 25, 1993.)) Any subsidizing
public entity must be named as a party in interest to a certificate whose
issuance is based in whole or in part upon revenue forecasts that include such
public subsidies. As a party in interest, the subsidizing public entity is a
necessary party to a proceeding regarding the certificate holder, its rates, or
the certificate.

Sec.
4. RCW
81.84.030 and 1993 c 427 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

No
certificate or any right or privilege thereunder held, owned, or obtained under
the provisions of this chapter shall be sold, assigned, leased, mortgaged, or
in any manner transferred, either by the act of the parties or by operation of
law, except upon authorization by the commission first obtained. A
certificate in which a subsidizing public entity is a party in interest or
holds, owns, or maintains a right or privilege under it may not be transferred
in any manner, and the commission may not authorize the transfer without the
express written consent of the party in interest.

Sec.
5. RCW
81.84.060 and 1993 c 427 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission, upon complaint by an interested party, or upon its own motion after
notice and opportunity for hearing, may cancel, revoke, suspend, alter, or
amend a certificate issued under this chapter on any of the following grounds:

(1)
Failure of the certificate holder to initiate service by the conclusion of the
fifth year after the certificate has been granted or by the conclusion of an
extension granted under RCW 81.84.010 (2) or (3), if the commission has
considered the progress report information required under RCW 81.84.010 (2) or
(3);

(2)
Failure of the certificate holder to file an annual report;

(3)
The filing by a certificate holder of an annual report that shows no revenue in
the previous twelve-month period after service has been initiated;

(4)
The violation of any provision of this chapter;

(5)
The violation of or failure to observe the provisions or conditions of the
certificate or tariffs;

(6)
The violation of an order, decision, rule, regulation, or requirement
established by the commission under this chapter;

(7)
Failure of a certificate holder to maintain the required insurance coverage in
full force and effect; ((or))

(8)
Failure or refusal to furnish reasonable and adequate service after initiating
service; or

(9)
Cessation or reduction of a public subsidy.

The
commission shall take appropriate action within thirty days upon a complaint by
an interested party or of its own finding that a provision of this section has
been violated.

Sec.
6. RCW
81.104.050 and 1992 c 101 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

Regional
high-capacity transportation service may be expanded beyond the
established district boundaries through interlocal agreements among the transit
agencies and any regional transit authorities in existence.

The
interlocal agreements may authorize participation in acquisition of equipment
or facilities through the federally approved alternative purchasing procedures,
and methods authorized by RCW 81.104.070.

Sec.
7. RCW
81.104.070 and 1990 c 43 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state shall not become an operating agent for regional high capacity
transportation systems.

(2)
Agencies providing high capacity transportation service are responsible for
planning, construction, operations, and funding including station area design
and development, and parking facilities. Agencies may implement necessary
contracts, joint development agreements, and interlocal government agreements.
Contracts and agreements may include public/private partnerships,
design-build, turnkey, and super-turnkey purchasing methods authorized under
federal law applicable to joint development projects, such as Public Law
105-178 and 62 Fed. Reg. 12266. Agencies providing service shall consult
with affected local jurisdictions and cooperate with comprehensive planning
processes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 81.104 RCW to read as follows:

RCW
81.104.100 and 81.104.110 do not apply to an assumption of a high-capacity
responsibility, route, or plan element by one agency from another, such as the
assumption by a local transit agency of the responsibility, route, or plan
element of a state transportation agency if the assuming agency undertakes all
the obligations of the planning process and the assumption is approved by the
appropriate regional planning agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. 1995
c 361 s 4 (uncodified) is repealed.

---
END ---