BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A credit is allowed against the tax imposed under this chapter, equal to 0.138
percent of the difference between a taxpayer's food processing wages and the
taxpayer's adjusted food processing wages. Credits under this section are
limited to the amount of tax imposed by this chapter. Any unused excess credit
in a reporting period may be carried forward to future reporting periods for a
maximum of one year.

(2)
The definitions in this subsection apply for the purposes of this section.

(a)
"Adjusted food processing wages" means the amount of wages a taxpayer
would have paid to employees engaged in activities subject to tax under RCW
82.04.260 (1), (2), and (4) if such employees had been paid an average annual
wage computed under this section. This average annual wage shall be computed
in the same manner and at the same time as the average annual wage defined in
RCW 50.04.355, using information from taxpayers in eastern Washington reporting
taxes under RCW 82.04.260 (1), (2), and (4).

(b)
"Food processing wages" means wages actually paid for activities
subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260 (1), (2), and (4).

(3)
The department shall inform taxpayers paying taxes under 82.04.260 (1), (2),
and (4) of the average annual wage computed under subsection (2)(a) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---