BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 81.77 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall allow solid waste collection companies collecting recyclable
materials to retain thirty percent of the revenue paid to the companies for the
material if the companies submit a plan to the commission that is consistent
with the local government solid waste plan in the jurisdiction served by the
company and that demonstrates how recycling will be increased. The remaining
seventy percent of the revenue shall be passed to residential customers served
by the collection company.

(2)
By December 1, 2003, the commission shall provide a report to the legislature
that evaluates:

(a)
The effectiveness of revenue sharing as an incentive to increase recycling in
the state; and

(b)
The effect of revenue sharing on costs to customers.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.95.010 and 1989 c 431 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds:

(1)
Continuing technological changes in methods of manufacture, packaging, and
marketing of consumer products, together with the economic and population
growth of this state, the rising affluence of its citizens, and its expanding
industrial activity have created new and ever-mounting problems involving
disposal of garbage, refuse, and solid waste materials resulting from domestic,
agricultural, and industrial activities.

(2)
Traditional methods of disposing of solid wastes in this state are no longer
adequate to meet the ever-increasing problem. Improper methods and practices
of handling and disposal of solid wastes pollute our land, air and water
resources, blight our countryside, adversely affect land values, and damage the
overall quality of our environment.

(3)
Considerations of natural resource limitations, energy shortages, economics and
the environment make necessary the development and implementation of solid
waste recovery and/or recycling plans and programs.

(4)
Waste reduction must become a fundamental strategy of solid waste management.
It is therefore necessary to change manufacturing and purchasing practices and
waste generation behaviors to reduce the amount of waste that becomes a
governmental responsibility.

(5)
Source separation of waste must become a fundamental strategy of solid waste
management. Collection and handling strategies should have, as an ultimate
goal, the source separation of all materials with resource value or
environmental hazard.

(6)(a)
It is the responsibility of every person to minimize his or her production of
wastes and to separate recyclable or hazardous materials from mixed waste.

(b)
It is the responsibility of state, county, and city governments to provide for
a waste management infrastructure to fully implement waste reduction and source
separation strategies and to process and dispose of remaining wastes in a
manner that is environmentally safe and economically sound. It is further the
responsibility of state, county, and city governments to monitor the
cost-effectiveness and environmental safety of combusting separated waste,
processing mixed waste, and recycling programs.

(c)
It is the responsibility of county and city governments to assume primary
responsibility for solid waste management and to develop and implement
aggressive and effective waste reduction and source separation strategies.

(d)
It is the responsibility of state government to ensure that local governments
are providing adequate source reduction and separation opportunities and
incentives to all, including persons in both rural and urban areas, and
nonresidential waste generators such as commercial, industrial, and
institutional entities, recognizing the need to provide flexibility to accommodate
differing population densities, distances to and availability of recycling
markets, and collection and disposal costs in each community; and to provide
county and city governments with adequate technical resources to accomplish
this responsibility.

(7)
Environmental and economic considerations in solving the state's solid waste
management problems requires strong consideration by local governments of
regional solutions and intergovernmental cooperation.

(8)
The following priorities for the collection, handling, and management of solid
waste are necessary and should be followed in descending order as applicable:

(a)
Waste reduction;

(b)
Recycling, with source separation of recyclable materials as the preferred
method;

(c)
Energy recovery, incineration, or landfill of separated waste;

(d)
Energy recovery, incineration, or landfilling of mixed wastes.

(9)
It is the state's goal to achieve a fifty percent recycling rate by ((1995))
2005.

(10)
Steps should be taken to make recycling at least as affordable and convenient
to the ratepayer as mixed waste disposal.

(11)
It is necessary to compile and maintain adequate data on the types and
quantities of solid waste that are being generated and to monitor how the
various types of solid waste are being managed.

(12)
Vehicle batteries should be recycled and the disposal of vehicle batteries into
landfills or incinerators should be discontinued.

(13)
Excessive and nonrecyclable packaging of products should be avoided.

(14)
Comprehensive education should be conducted throughout the state so that people
are informed of the need to reduce, source separate, and recycle solid waste.

(15)
All governmental entities in the state should set an example by implementing
aggressive waste reduction and recycling programs at their workplaces and by
purchasing products that are made from recycled materials and are recyclable.

(16)
To ensure the safe and efficient operations of solid waste disposal facilities,
it is necessary for operators and regulators of landfills and incinerators to
receive training and certification.

(17)
It is necessary to provide adequate funding to all levels of government so that
successful waste reduction and recycling programs can be implemented.

(18)
The development of stable and expanding markets for recyclable materials is
critical to the long-term success of the state's recycling goals. Market
development must be encouraged on a state, regional, and national basis to
maximize its effectiveness. The state shall assume primary responsibility for
the development of a multifaceted market development program to carry out the
purposes of this act.

(19)
There is an imperative need to anticipate, plan for, and accomplish effective
storage, control, recovery, and recycling of discarded tires and other problem
wastes with the subsequent conservation of resources and energy.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.95.090 and 1991 c 298 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
county and city comprehensive solid waste management plan shall include the
following:

(1)
A detailed inventory and description of all existing solid waste handling
facilities including an inventory of any deficiencies in meeting current solid
waste handling needs.

(2)
The estimated long-range needs for solid waste handling facilities projected
twenty years into the future.

(3)
A program for the orderly development of solid waste handling facilities in a
manner consistent with the plans for the entire county which shall:

(a)
Meet the minimum functional standards for solid waste handling adopted by the
department and all laws and regulations relating to air and water pollution,
fire prevention, flood control, and protection of public health;

(b)
Take into account the comprehensive land use plan of each jurisdiction;

(c)
Contain a six year construction and capital acquisition program for solid waste
handling facilities; and

(d)
Contain a plan for financing both capital costs and operational expenditures of
the proposed solid waste management system.

(4)
A program for surveillance and control.

(5)
A current inventory and description of solid waste collection needs and
operations within each respective jurisdiction which shall include:

(a)
Any franchise for solid waste collection granted by the utilities and transportation
commission in the respective jurisdictions including the name of the holder of
the franchise and the address of his or her place of business and the area
covered by the franchise;

(b)
Any city solid waste operation within the county and the boundaries of such
operation;

(c)
The population density of each area serviced by a city operation or by a
franchised operation within the respective jurisdictions;

(d)
The projected solid waste collection needs for the respective jurisdictions for
the next six years.

(6)
A comprehensive waste reduction and recycling element that, in accordance with
the priorities established in RCW 70.95.010, provides programs that (a) reduce
the amount of waste generated, (b) provide incentives and mechanisms for source
separation, and (c) establish recycling opportunities for the source separated
waste.

(7)
The waste reduction and recycling element shall include the following:

(a)
Waste reduction strategies;

(b)
Source separation strategies, including:

(i)
Programs for the collection of source separated materials from residences in
urban and rural areas. In urban areas, these programs shall include collection
of source separated recyclable materials from single and multiple family
residences, unless the department approves an alternative program, according to
the criteria in the planning guidelines. Such criteria shall include:
Anticipated recovery rates and levels of public participation, availability of
environmentally sound disposal capacity, access to markets for recyclable
materials, unreasonable cost impacts on the ratepayer over the six-year
planning period, utilization of environmentally sound waste reduction and
recycling technologies, and other factors as appropriate. In rural areas,
these programs shall include but not be limited to drop-off boxes, buy-back
centers, or a combination of both, at each solid waste transfer, processing, or
disposal site, or at locations convenient to the residents of the county. The
drop-off boxes and buy-back centers may be owned or operated by public,
nonprofit, or private persons;

(ii)
Programs to monitor the collection of source separated waste at nonresidential
sites where there is sufficient density to sustain a program;

(iii)
Programs to collect yard waste, if the county or city submitting the plan finds
that there are adequate markets or capacity for composted yard waste within or
near the service area to consume the majority of the material collected; and

(iv)
Programs to educate and promote the concepts of waste reduction and recycling;

(c)
Recycling strategies, including a description of markets for recyclables, a
review of waste generation trends, a description of waste composition, a
discussion and description of existing programs and any additional programs
needed to assist public and private sector recycling, and an implementation
schedule for the designation of specific materials to be collected for
recycling, and for the provision of recycling collection services;

(d)
Consideration of residential collection rate structures that provide
economic incentives for customers to reduce their level of solid waste
collection service and encourage participation in waste reduction, recycling,
and yard waste collection programs. If such rate structures are adopted by a
jurisdiction, that jurisdiction shall adopt ordinances to implement rate
structures that are consistent with the guidelines in the comprehensive plans;
and

(e)
Other information the county or city submitting the plan determines is
necessary.

(8)
An assessment of the plan's impact on the costs of solid waste collection. The
assessment shall be prepared in conformance with guidelines established by the
utilities and transportation commission. The commission shall cooperate with
the Washington state association of counties and the association of Washington
cities in establishing such guidelines.

(9)
A review of potential areas that meet the criteria as outlined in RCW
70.95.165.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.95.290 and 1988 c 184 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The evaluation of the solid waste stream required in RCW 70.95.280 shall
include the following elements:

(a)
The department shall determine which management method for each category of
solid waste will have the least environmental impact; and

(b)
The department shall evaluate the costs of various management options for each
category of solid waste, including a review of market availability, and shall
take into consideration the economic impact on affected parties;

(c)
Based on the results of (a) and (b) of this subsection, the department shall
determine the best management for each category of solid waste. Different
management methods for the same categories of waste may be developed for
different parts of the state.

(2)
The department shall give priority to evaluating categories of solid waste
that, in relation to other categories of solid waste, comprise a large volume
of the solid waste stream or present a high potential of harm to human health.
At a minimum the following categories of waste shall be evaluated:

(a)
By January 1, 1989, yard waste and other biodegradable materials, paper
products, disposable diapers, and batteries; ((and))

(b)
By January 1, 1990, metals, glass, plastics, styrofoam or rigid lightweight
cellular polystyrene, and tires; and

(c)
By January 1, 2002, construction, demolition, and land-clearing debris, manure,
and major food-processing wastes.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.19.1905 and 1995 c 269 s 1402 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director of general administration shall establish overall state policy for
compliance by all state agencies, including educational institutions, regarding
the following purchasing and material control functions:

(1)
Development of a state commodity coding system, including common stock numbers
for items maintained in stores for reissue;

(2)
Determination where consolidations, closures, or additions of stores operated
by state agencies and educational institutions should be initiated;

(3)
Institution of standard criteria for determination of when and where an item in
the state supply system should be stocked;

(4)
Establishment of stock levels to be maintained in state stores, and formulation
of standards for replenishment of stock;

(5)
Formulation of an overall distribution and redistribution system for stock
items which establishes sources of supply support for all agencies, including
interagency supply support;

(6)
Determination of what function data processing equipment, including remote
terminals, shall perform in state-wide purchasing and material control for
improvement of service and promotion of economy;

(7)
Standardization of records and forms used state-wide for supply system
activities involving purchasing, receiving, inspecting, storing,
requisitioning, and issuing functions, including a standard notification form
for state agencies to report cost-effective direct purchases, which shall at
least identify the price of the goods as available through the division of
purchasing, the price of the goods as available from the alternative source,
the total savings, and the signature of the notifying agency's director or the
director's designee;

(8)
Screening of supplies, material, and equipment excess to the requirements of
one agency for overall state need before sale as surplus;

(9)
Establishment of warehouse operation and storage standards to achieve uniform,
effective, and economical stores operations;

(10)
Establishment of time limit standards for the issuing of material in store and
for processing requisitions requiring purchase;

(11)
Formulation of criteria for determining when centralized rather than
decentralized purchasing shall be used to obtain maximum benefit of volume
buying of identical or similar items, including procurement from federal supply
sources;

(12)
Development of criteria for use of leased, rather than state owned, warehouse
space based on relative cost and accessibility;

(13)
Institution of standard criteria for purchase and placement of state furnished
materials, carpeting, furniture, fixtures, and nonfixed equipment, in newly
constructed or renovated state buildings;

(14)
Determination of how transportation costs incurred by the state for materials,
supplies, services, and equipment can be reduced by improved freight and
traffic coordination and control;

(15)
Establishment of a formal certification program for state employees who are
authorized to perform purchasing functions as agents for the state under the
provisions of chapter 43.19 RCW;

(16)
Development of performance measures for the reduction of total overall expense
for material, supplies, equipment, and services used each biennium by the
state;

(17)
Establishment of a standard system for all state organizations to record and
report dollar savings and cost avoidance which are attributable to the
establishment and implementation of improved purchasing and material control
procedures;

(18)
Development of procedures for mutual and voluntary cooperation between state
agencies, including educational institutions, and political subdivisions for
exchange of purchasing and material control services;

(19)
Resolution of all other purchasing and material matters which require the
establishment of overall state-wide policy for effective and economical supply
management;

(20)
Development of guidelines and criteria for the purchase of vehicles, alternate
vehicle fuels and systems, equipment, and materials that reduce overall
energy-related costs and energy use by the state, including the requirement
that new passenger vehicles purchased by the state meet the minimum standards
for passenger automobile fuel economy established by the United States
secretary of transportation pursuant to the energy policy and conservation act
(15 U.S.C. Sec. 2002);

(21)
Development of goals for state use of recycled and environmentally preferable
products through specifications for products and services, processes for
requests for proposals and requests for qualifications, contractor selection,
and contract negotiations.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.19A.020 and 1996 c 198 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The USEPA product standards, as now or hereafter amended, are adopted as the
minimum standards for the state of Washington. These standards shall be
implemented for at least the products listed in (a) and (b) of this subsection
by the dates indicated, unless the director finds that a different standard
would significantly increase recycled product availability or competition.

(a)
By July 1, 1997:

(i)
Paper and paper products;

(ii)
Organic recovered materials; and

(iii)
Latex paint products;

(b)
By July 1, 1997:

(i)
Products for lower value uses containing recycled plastics;

(ii)
Retread and remanufactured tires;

(iii)
Lubricating oils;

(iv)
Automotive batteries;

(v)
Building insulation;

(vi)
Panelboard; and

(vii)
Compost products.

(2)
By July 1, 2001, the director shall adopt product standards for strawboard
manufactured using as an ingredient straw that is produced as a by-product in
the production of cereal grains or turf or grass seed.

(3) The standards required by this section shall be applied
to recycled product purchasing by the department and other state agencies. The
standards may be adopted or applied by any other local government in product
procurement. The standards shall provide for exceptions under appropriate
circumstances to allow purchases of recycled products that do not meet the
minimum content requirements of the standards.

---
END ---