BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

A labor union or professional association making or having the
expectation of making expenditures of one thousand dollars or more in a
calendar year in support of, or in opposition to, any candidate or any ballot
proposition shall be subject to the same requirements as a continuing political
committee under RCW 42.17.065.

---
END ---