BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
80.36.520 and 1988 c 91 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
utilities and transportation commission shall by rule require, at a minimum,
that any telecommunications company, operating as or contracting with an
alternate operator services company, assure appropriate disclosure to consumers
of the provision and the rate, charge or fee of services provided by an
alternate operator services company without requiring additional dialing by
the consumer beyond that necessary to complete a call.

For the purposes of this chapter, "alternate operator services
company" means a person providing a connection to intrastate or interstate
long-distance services from places including, but not limited to, hotels,
motels, hospitals, and customer-owned pay telephones.

---
END ---