BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.26.430 and 1993 c 517 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years of
service who has attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire
and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of
RCW 41.26.420.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least ((twenty)) fifteen
service credit years of service and has attained age fifty shall be eligible to
retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the
provisions of RCW 41.26.420, except that a member retiring pursuant to this
subsection shall have the retirement allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by
two percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years
between age at retirement and the attainment of age fifty-five.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.26.470 and 1999 c 135 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for
continued employment by an employer as determined by the director shall be eligible
to receive an allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.26.410 through
41.26.550. Such member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed
as provided for in RCW 41.26.420 and shall have such allowance ((actuarially))
reduced by two percent per year to reflect the difference in the number
of years between age at disability and the attainment of age fifty-five.

(2)
Any member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall
be subject to such comprehensive medical examinations as required by the
department. If such medical examinations reveal that such a member has
recovered from the incapacitating disability and the member is no longer
entitled to benefits under Title 51 RCW, the retirement allowance shall be
canceled and the member shall be restored to duty in the same civil service
rank, if any, held by the member at the time of retirement or, if unable to
perform the duties of the rank, then, at the member's request, in such other
like or lesser rank as may be or become open and available, the duties of which
the member is then able to perform. In no event shall a member previously
drawing a disability allowance be returned or be restored to duty at a salary
or rate of pay less than the current salary attached to the rank or position
held by the member at the date of the retirement for disability. If the
department determines that the member is able to return to service, the member
is entitled to notice and a hearing. Both the notice and the hearing shall
comply with the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure
Act.

(3)
Those members subject to this chapter who became disabled in the line of duty
on or after July 23, 1989, and who receive benefits under RCW 41.04.500 through
41.04.530 or similar benefits under RCW 41.04.535 shall receive or continue to
receive service credit subject to the following:

(a)
No member may receive more than one month's service credit in a calendar month.

(b)
No service credit under this section may be allowed after a member separates or
is separated without leave of absence.

(c)
Employer contributions shall be paid by the employer at the rate in effect for
the period of the service credited.

(d)
Employee contributions shall be collected by the employer and paid to the
department at the rate in effect for the period of service credited.

(e)
State contributions shall be as provided in RCW 41.26.450.

(f)
Contributions shall be based on the regular compensation which the member would
have received had the disability not occurred.

(g)
The service and compensation credit under this section shall be granted for a
period not to exceed six consecutive months.

(h)
Should the legislature revoke the service credit authorized under this section
or repeal this section, no affected employee is entitled to receive the credit
as a matter of contractual right.

(4)(a)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the
amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no such designated person
or persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the
surviving spouse, or, if there is neither such designated person or persons
still living at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse, then to
his or her legal representative.

(b)
If a recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section died before
April 27, 1989, and before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the
recipient equaled the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the
date of retirement, then the department shall pay the balance of the
accumulated contributions to the member's surviving spouse or, if there is no
surviving spouse, then in equal shares to the member's children. If there is no
surviving spouse or children, the department shall retain the contributions.

(5)
Should the disability retirement allowance of any disability beneficiary be
canceled for any cause other than reentrance into service or retirement for
service, he or she shall be paid the excess, if any, of the accumulated
contributions at the time of retirement over all payments made on his or her
behalf under this chapter.

Sec.
3. RCW
41.35.680 and 1998 c 341 s 209 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(a)
Completed ten service credit years; or

(b)
Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months
after attaining age fifty-four; or

(c)
Completed five service credit years by September 1, 2000, under the public
employees' retirement system plan II and who transferred to plan III under RCW
41.35.510;

shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according
to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Subject to (a) and (b) of this subsection, any member
who has attained at least age fifty-five and has completed at least ten years
of service shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620((, except that)).

(a)
Unless a member meets the conditions of (b) of this subsection, a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance
actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between
age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b)
Any member of the retirement system who has completed at least thirty service
credit years of service and has attained age sixty shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
4. RCW
41.35.420 and 1998 c 341 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years who has
attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Subject to (a) and (b) of this subsection, any member
who has completed at least twenty service credit years and has attained age
fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400((, except that)).

(a)
Unless a member meets the conditions of (b) of this subsection, a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance
actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between
age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b)
Any member of the retirement system who has completed at least thirty service
credit years of service and has attained age sixty shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
5. RCW
41.40.630 and 1991 c 343 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years who has
attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Subject to (a) and (b) of this subsection, any member
who has completed at least twenty service credit years and has attained age
fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance
computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620((, except that)).

(a)
Unless a member meets the conditions of (b) of this subsection, a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance
actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between
age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b)
Any member of the retirement system who has completed at least thirty service
credit years of service and has attained age sixty shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
6. RCW
41.32.765 and 1991 c 343 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years of
service who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire
and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of
RCW 41.32.760.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Subject to (a) and (b) of this subsection, any member
who has completed at least twenty service credit years of service who has
attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.760((,
except that)).

(a)
Unless a member meets the conditions of (b) of this subsection, a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance
actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between
age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b)
Any member of the retirement system who has completed at least thirty service
credit years of service and has attained age sixty shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
7. RCW
41.32.875 and 1996 c 39 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(a)
Completed ten service credit years; or

(b)
Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months
after attaining age fifty-four; or

(c)
Completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan II and who
transferred to plan III under RCW 41.32.817;

shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according
to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has
completed at least ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.32.840((, except that)).

(a)
Unless a member meets the conditions of (b) of this subsection, a member
retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance
actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between
age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b)
Any member of the retirement system who has completed at least thirty service
credit years of service and has attained age sixty shall have the retirement
allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. Sections
3 and 4 of this act take effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---