BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as limiting the
authority of any city, town, city-county, or county to exercise its land use
and zoning powers granted or recognized under the law with respect to the
location of any gambling activities authorized under this chapter.

---
END ---