BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.40.030 and 1998 c 320 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

All
personal property shall be valued at one hundred percent of its true and fair
value in money and assessed on the same basis unless specifically provided
otherwise by law.

All
real property shall be appraised at one hundred percent of its true and fair
value in money and assessed as provided in RCW 84.40.0305 unless specifically
provided otherwise by law.

Taxable
leasehold estates shall be valued at such price as they would bring at a fair,
voluntary sale for cash without any deductions for any indebtedness owed
including rentals to be paid.

For
taxes levied for collection in 2001, the assessed value of real property shall
not exceed the assessed value as of January 1, 1999, unless there has been a
change of ownership of the property since January 1, 1999. For taxes levied
for collection in 2002 and thereafter, the assessed value of the real property
shall not be increased unless there has been a change of ownership since the
previous valuation of the property. If a property owner improves any structure
on the property, the assessment shall be increased by the amount of the cost of
the improvement even if there is not a change of ownership. It is the
responsibility of the homeowner to provide to the appropriate county assessor
documentation indicating the cost of the improvement.

The
true and fair value of real property for taxation purposes (including property
upon which there is a coal or other mine, or stone or other quarry) shall be
based upon the following criteria:

(1)
Any sales of the property being appraised or similar properties with respect to
sales made within the past five years. The appraisal shall be consistent with
the comprehensive land use plan, development regulations under chapter 36.70A
RCW, zoning, and any other governmental policies or practices in effect at the
time of appraisal that affect the use of property, as well as physical and
environmental influences. An assessment may not be determined by a method that
assumes a land usage not permitted, for that property being appraised, under
existing zoning or land use planning ordinances or statutes. The appraisal
shall also take into account: (a) In the use of sales by real estate contract
as similar sales, the extent, if any, to which the stated selling price has
been increased by reason of the down payment, interest rate, or other financing
terms; and (b) the extent to which the sale of a similar property actually
represents the general effective market demand for property of such type, in
the geographical area in which such property is located. Sales involving deed
releases or similar seller-developer financing arrangements shall not be used
as sales of similar property.

(2)
In addition to sales as defined in subsection (1) of this section,
consideration may be given to cost, cost less depreciation, reconstruction cost
less depreciation, or capitalization of income that would be derived from
prudent use of the property. In the case of property of a complex nature, or
being used under terms of a franchise from a public agency, or operating as a
public utility, or property not having a record of sale within five years and
not having a significant number of sales of similar property in the general
area, the provisions of this subsection shall be the dominant factors in
valuation. When provisions of this subsection are relied upon for establishing
values the property owner shall be advised upon request of the factors used in
arriving at such value.

(3) In valuing any tract or parcel of real property, the true and
fair value of the land, exclusive of structures thereon shall be determined;
also the true and fair value of structures thereon, but the appraised valuation
shall not exceed the true and fair value of the total property as it exists.
In valuing agricultural land, growing crops shall be excluded.

---
END ---