BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.52.043 and 1995 c 99 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular
ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts
hereafter named shall be as follows:

(1)
Levies of the senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a) The levy by the
state shall not exceed three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the
indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue ((to be used
exclusively for the support of the common schools)); (b) the levy by any
county shall not exceed one dollar and eighty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value; (c) the levy by any road district shall not exceed two dollars
and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; and (d) the levy
by any city or town shall not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and
one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value. However any county is
hereby authorized to increase its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a
rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value for general county purposes if the total levies for
both the county and any road district within the county do not exceed four
dollars and five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, and no other
taxing district has its levy reduced as a result of the increased county levy.

(2)
The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts,
other than the state, shall not exceed five dollars and ninety cents per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing
districts" includes all taxing districts other than the state, counties,
road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and public utility districts.
The limitations provided in this subsection shall not apply to: (a) Levies at
the rates provided by existing law by or for any port or public utility
district; (b) excess property tax levies authorized in Article VII, section 2
of the state Constitution; (c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as
authorized under RCW 84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or
emergency medical services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance
affordable housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; and
(f) the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are protected
under RCW 84.52.120.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.52.065 and 1991 sp.s. c 31 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limitations in RCW 84.55.010, in each year the state shall levy
for collection in the following year ((for the support of common schools of
the state)) a tax of three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the
state adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated
ratio fixed by the state department of revenue.

(2)
During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, revenue from the levy under this
section shall be deposited as provided in this subsection.

(a)
$13,400,000 to the county sales and use tax equalization account created in RCW
82.14.200;

(b)
$44,200,000 to the municipal sales and use tax equalization account created in
RCW 82.14.210;

(c)
$48,200,000 to the city police and fire protection assistance account created
under section 3 of this act;

(d)
$30,600,000 to the county criminal justice assistance account created in RCW
82.14.310;

(e)
$6,200,000 to the municipal criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under RCW 82.14.320;

(f)
$6,200,000 to the municipal criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under RCW 82.14.330;

(g)
$20,100,000 to the county public health account created in RCW 70.05.125;

(h)
$8,700,000 to the distressed county assistance account created in RCW
82.14.380.

(3)
During fiscal years ending after June 30, 2001, revenue from the levy under
this section shall be deposited in the accounts specified in subsection (2) of
this section. The amount deposited in each account each year shall equal the
amount deposited during the previous year increased by the fiscal growth factor
as defined in RCW 43.135.025.

(4)
Revenue from the levy under this section in excess of amounts deposited under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be deposited in the state general
fund for the support of the common schools.

(5)
As used in this section, "the support of common schools" includes the
payment of the principal and interest on bonds issued for capital construction
projects for the common schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

The
city police and fire protection assistance account is created in the state
treasury. On the first day of the months of January, April, July, and October
of each year, the treasurer shall distribute moneys in the account to the
cities and towns ratably on the basis of population as last determined by the
office of financial management. When so apportioned, the amount payable to
each city shall be used by the city or town for the purposes of police and fire
protection in the city or town, and not otherwise.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.05.125 and 1998 c 266 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The county public health account is created in the state treasury. Funds
deposited in the county public health account shall be distributed by the state
treasurer to each local public health jurisdiction based upon amounts certified
to it by the department of community, trade, and economic development in
consultation with the Washington state association of counties. ((The
account shall include funds distributed under RCW 82.44.110 and 82.14.200(8)
and such funds as are appropriated to the account from the health services
account under RCW 43.72.900, the public health services account under RCW
43.72.902, and such other funds as the legislature may appropriate to it.))

(2)(a)
The director of the department of community, trade, and economic development
shall certify the amounts to be distributed to each local public health
jurisdiction using 1995 as the base year of actual city contributions to local
public health.

(b)
Only if funds are available and in an amount no greater than available funds
under RCW 82.14.200(8), the department of community, trade, and economic
development shall adjust the amount certified under (a) of this subsection to
compensate for any annexation of an area with fifty thousand residents or more
to any city as a result of a petition during calendar year 1996 or 1997, or for
any city that became newly incorporated as a result of an election during
calendar year 1994 or 1995. The amount to be adjusted shall be equal to the
amount which otherwise would have been lost to the health jurisdiction due to
the annexation or incorporation as calculated using the jurisdiction's 1995
funding formula.

(c)
The county treasurer shall certify the actual 1995 city contribution to the
department. Funds in excess of the base shall be distributed proportionately
among the health jurisdictions based on incorporated population figures as last
determined by the office of financial management.

(3)
Moneys distributed under this section shall be expended exclusively for local
public health purposes.

Sec.
5. RCW
82.14.200 and 1998 c 321 s 8 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

There
is created in the state treasury a special account to be known as the
"county sales and use tax equalization account." ((Into this
account shall be placed a portion of all motor vehicle excise tax receipts as
provided in RCW 82.44.110.)) Funds in this account shall be allocated by
the state treasurer according to the following procedure:

(1)
Prior to April 1st of each year the director of revenue shall inform the state
treasurer of the total and the per capita levels of revenues for the
unincorporated area of each county and the state-wide weighted average per
capita level of revenues for the unincorporated areas of all counties imposing
the sales and use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous
calendar year.

(2)
At such times as distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) section
3 of this act, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing
the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and receiving
less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars from the tax for the previous
calendar year, an amount from the county sales and use tax equalization account
sufficient, when added to the amount of revenues received the previous calendar
year by the county, to equal one hundred fifty thousand dollars.

The
department of revenue shall establish a governmental price index as provided in
this subsection. The base year for the index shall be the end of the third
quarter of 1982. Prior to November 1, 1983, and prior to each November 1st
thereafter, the department of revenue shall establish another index figure for
the third quarter of that year. The department of revenue may use the implicit
price deflators for state and local government purchases of goods and services
calculated by the United States department of commerce to establish the
governmental price index. Beginning on January 1, 1984, and each January 1st
thereafter, the one hundred fifty thousand dollar base figure in this
subsection shall be adjusted in direct proportion to the percentage change in
the governmental price index from 1982 until the year before the adjustment.
Distributions made under this subsection for 1984 and thereafter shall use this
adjusted base amount figure.

(3)
Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (2) of this section and at
such times as distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) subsection
(2) of this section, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and
receiving less than seventy percent of the state-wide weighted average per
capita level of revenues for the unincorporated areas of all counties as
determined by the department of revenue under subsection (1) of this section,
an amount from the county sales and use tax equalization account sufficient,
when added to the per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated area
received the previous calendar year by the county, to equal seventy percent of
the state-wide weighted average per capita level of revenues for the
unincorporated areas of all counties determined under subsection (1) of this
section, subject to reduction under subsections (6) and (7) of this section.
When computing distributions under this section, any distribution under
subsection (2) of this section shall be considered revenues received from the
tax imposed under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.

(4)
Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (3) of this section and at
such times as distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) subsection
(2) of this section, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution under subsection (2) of this section, a third
distribution from the county sales and use tax equalization account. The
distribution to each qualifying county shall be equal to the distribution to
the county under subsection (2) of this section, subject to the reduction under
subsections (6) and (7) of this section. To qualify for the total distribution
under this subsection, the county must impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2)
for the entire calendar year. Counties imposing the tax for less than the full
year shall qualify for prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate
to the number of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.

(5)
Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (4) of this section and at
such times as distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) subsection
(2) of this section, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution under subsection (3) of this section, a fourth
distribution from the county sales and use tax equalization account. The
distribution to each qualifying county shall be equal to the distribution to
the county under subsection (3) of this section, subject to the reduction under
subsections (6) and (7) of this section. To qualify for the distributions
under this subsection, the county must impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2)
for the entire calendar year. Counties imposing the tax for less than the full
year shall qualify for prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate
to the number of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.

(6)
Revenues distributed under subsections (2) through (5) of this section in any
calendar year shall not exceed an amount equal to seventy percent of the
state-wide weighted average per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated
areas of all counties during the previous calendar year. If distributions
under subsections (3) through (5) of this section cannot be made because of
this limitation, then distributions under subsections (3) through (5) of this
section shall be reduced ratably among the qualifying counties.

(7)
If inadequate revenues exist in the county sales and use tax equalization
account to make the distributions under subsections (3) through (5) of this
section, then the distributions under subsections (3) through (5) of this
section shall be reduced ratably among the qualifying counties. At such time
during the year as additional funds accrue to the county sales and use tax
equalization account, additional distributions shall be made under subsections
(3) through (5) of this section to the counties.

(8)
If the level of revenues in the county sales and use tax equalization account
exceeds the amount necessary to make the distributions under subsections (2)
through (5) of this section, at such times as distributions are made under ((RCW
82.44.150)) subsection (2) of this section, the state treasurer
shall apportion an amount to the county public health account created in RCW
70.05.125 equal to the adjustment under RCW 70.05.125(2)(b).

(9)
If the level of revenues in the county sales and use tax equalization account
exceeds the amount necessary to make the distributions under subsections (2)
through (5) and (8) of this section, then the additional revenues shall be
credited and transferred as follows:

(a)
Fifty percent to the public facilities construction loan revolving account
under RCW 43.160.080; and

(b)
Fifty percent to the distressed county public facilities construction loan
account under RCW 43.160.220, or so much thereof as will not cause the balance
in the account to exceed twenty-five million dollars. Any remaining funds
shall be deposited into the public facilities construction loan revolving
account.

Sec.
6. RCW
82.14.210 and 1996 c 64 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is created in the state treasury a special account to be known as the
"municipal sales and use tax equalization account." ((Into this
account shall be placed such revenues as are provided under RCW
82.44.110(1)(e).)) Funds in this account shall be allocated by the state
treasurer according to the following procedure:

(1)
Prior to January 1st of each year the department of revenue shall determine the
total and the per capita levels of revenues for each city and the state-wide
weighted average per capita level of revenues for all cities imposing the sales
and use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.

(2)
At such times as distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) section
3 of this act, the state treasurer shall apportion to each city not
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) an amount from the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account equal to the amount
distributed to the city under ((RCW 82.44.155)) section 3 of this act,
multiplied by forty‑five fifty‑fifths.

(3)
Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (2) of this section, and at
such times as distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) subsection
(2) of this section, the state treasurer shall apportion to each city
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and
receiving less than seventy percent of the state-wide weighted average per
capita level of revenues for all cities as determined by the department of
revenue under subsection (1) of this section, an amount from the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account sufficient, when added to the per capita level
of revenues received the previous calendar year by the city, to equal seventy
percent of the state-wide weighted average per capita level of revenues for all
cities determined under subsection (1) of this section, subject to reduction
under subsection (6) of this section.

(4)
Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (3) of this section, and at
such times as distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) subsection
(2) of this section, the state treasurer shall apportion to each city
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution under subsection (3) of this section, a third
distribution from the municipal sales and use tax equalization account. The
distribution to each qualifying city shall be equal to the distribution to the
city under subsection (3) of this section, subject to the reduction under
subsection (6) of this section. To qualify for the distributions under this
subsection, the city must impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the entire
calendar year. Cities imposing the tax for less than the full year shall
qualify for prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate to the
number of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.

(5)
For a city with an official incorporation date after January 1, 1990, municipal
sales and use tax equalization distributions shall be made according to the
procedures in this subsection. Municipal sales and use tax equalization
distributions to eligible new cities shall be made at the same time as
distributions are made under subsections (3) and (4) of this section. The
department of revenue shall follow the estimating procedures outlined in this
subsection until the new city has received a full year's worth of revenues
under RCW 82.14.030(1) as of the January municipal sales and use tax
equalization distribution.

(a)
Whether a newly incorporated city determined to receive funds under this
subsection receives its first equalization payment at the January, April, July,
or October municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution shall depend
on the date the city first imposes the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1).

(i)
A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1)
effective as of January 1st shall be eligible to receive funds under this
subsection beginning with the April municipal sales and use tax equalization
distribution of that year.

(ii)
A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1)
effective as of February 1st, March 1st, or April 1st shall be eligible to
receive funds under this subsection beginning with the July municipal sales and
use tax equalization distribution of that year.

(iii)
A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1)
effective as of May 1st, June 1st, or July 1st shall be eligible to receive
funds under this subsection beginning with the October municipal sales and use
tax equalization distribution of that year.

(iv)
A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1)
effective as of August 1st, September 1st, or October 1st shall be eligible to
receive funds under this subsection beginning with the January municipal sales
and use tax equalization distribution of the next year.

(v)
A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1)
effective as of November 1st or December 1st shall be eligible to receive funds
under this subsection beginning with the April municipal sales and use tax
equalization distribution of the next year.

(b)
For purposes of calculating the amount of funds the new city should receive
under this subsection, the department of revenue shall:

(i)
Estimate the per capita amount of revenues from the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(1) that the new city would have received had the city received
revenues from the tax the entire calendar year;

(ii)
Calculate the amount provided under subsection (3) of this section based on the
per capita revenues determined under (b)(i) of this subsection;

(iii)
Prorate the amount determined under (b)(ii) of this subsection by the number of
months the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) is imposed.

(c)
A new city imposing the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution calculated under (b) of this subsection shall receive
another distribution from the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account. This distribution shall be equal to the calculation made under
(b)(ii) of this subsection, prorated by the number of months the city imposes
the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the full rate.

(d)
The department of revenue shall advise the state treasurer of the amounts
calculated under (b) and (c) of this subsection and the state treasurer shall
distribute these amounts to the new city from the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account subject to the limitations imposed in subsection (6) of
this section.

(e)
Revenues estimated under this subsection shall not affect the calculation of
the state-wide weighted average per capita level of revenues for all cities
made under subsection (1) of this section.

(6)
If inadequate revenues exist in the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account to make the distributions under subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this
section, then the distributions under subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this
section shall be reduced ratably among the qualifying cities. At such time during
the year as additional funds accrue to the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, additional distributions shall be made under subsections
(3), (4), and (5) of this section to the cities.

(7)
If the level of revenues in the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account exceeds the amount necessary to make the distributions under
subsections (2) through (5) of this section, then the additional revenues shall
be apportioned among the several cities within the state ratably on the basis of
population as last determined by the office of financial management: PROVIDED,
That no such distribution shall be made to those cities receiving a
distribution under subsection (2) of this section.

Sec.
7. RCW
82.14.310 and 1999 c 309 s 920 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The county criminal justice assistance account is created in the state
treasury. Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall transfer
into the county criminal justice assistance account from the general fund the
sum of twenty-three million two hundred thousand dollars divided into four
equal deposits occurring on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For
each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase the total
transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast
for that fiscal year by the office of financial management in November of the
preceding year.

(2)
The moneys deposited in the county criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes
under subsection (4) of this section, shall be distributed at such times as
distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) section 3 of this act
and on the relative basis of each county's funding factor as determined under
this subsection.

(a)
A county's funding factor is the sum of:

(i)
The population of the county, divided by one thousand, and multiplied by
two-tenths;

(ii)
The crime rate of the county, multiplied by three-tenths; and

(iii)
The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county superior court, for
each one thousand in population, multiplied by five-tenths.

(b)
Under this section and RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330:

(i)
The population of the county or city shall be as last determined by the office
of financial management;

(ii)
The crime rate of the county or city is the annual occurrence of specified
criminal offenses, as calculated in the most recent annual report on crime in
Washington state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs, for each one thousand in population;

(iii)
The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county superior court shall be
determined by the most recent annual report of the courts of Washington, as
published by the office of the administrator for the courts;

(iv)
Distributions and eligibility for distributions in the 1989‑91 biennium
shall be based on 1988 figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii)
of this subsection and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as
described under (iii) of this subsection. Future distributions shall be based
on the most recent figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of
this subsection and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as
described under (iii) of this subsection.

(3)
Moneys distributed under this section shall be expended exclusively for
criminal justice purposes and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing
funding. Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that
substantially assist the criminal justice system, which may include
circumstances where ancillary benefit to the civil or juvenile justice system
occurs, and which includes (a) domestic violence services such as those provided
by domestic violence programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as
defined in RCW 70.123.020, and (b) during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium,
juvenile dispositional hearings relating to petitions for at-risk youth,
truancy, and children in need of services. Existing funding for purposes of
this subsection is defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures
for criminal justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating
expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude the following: Expenditures
for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions
for criminal justice services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction
receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(4)
Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the county criminal
justice assistance account shall be available for appropriations for
enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing
costs related to these enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for
such enhancements shall not supplant existing funds from the state general
fund.

Sec.
8. RCW
82.14.320 and 1998 c 321 s 12 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
The municipal criminal justice assistance account is created in the state
treasury. Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall transfer
into the municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under
this section from the general fund the sum of four million six hundred thousand
dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring on July 1, October 1,
January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer
shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in
RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial
management in November of the preceding year.

(2)
No city may receive a distribution under this section from the municipal
criminal justice assistance account unless:

(a)
The city has a crime rate in excess of one hundred twenty-five percent of the
state-wide average as calculated in the most recent annual report on crime in
Washington state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs;

(b)
The city has levied the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate
or the tax authorized in RCW 82.46.010(3) at the maximum rate; and

(c)
The city has a per capita yield from the tax imposed under RCW 82.14.030(1) at
the maximum rate of less than one hundred fifty percent of the state-wide
average per capita yield for all cities from such local sales and use tax.

(3)
The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes
under subsection (7) of this section, shall be distributed at such times as
distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) section 3 of this act.
The distributions shall be made as follows:

(a)
Unless reduced by this subsection, thirty percent of the moneys shall be
distributed ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management to those cities eligible under subsection (2) of this
section that have a crime rate determined under subsection (2)(a) of this
section which is greater than one hundred seventy-five percent of the
state-wide average crime rate. No city may receive more than fifty percent of
any moneys distributed under this subsection (a) but, if a city distribution is
reduced as a result of exceeding the fifty percent limitation, the amount not
distributed shall be distributed under (b) of this subsection.

(b)
The remainder of the moneys, including any moneys not distributed in subsection
(2)(a) of this section, shall be distributed to all cities eligible under
subsection (2) of this section ratably based on population as last determined
by the office of financial management.

(4)
No city may receive more than thirty percent of all moneys distributed under
subsection (3) of this section.

(5)
Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the distributions to any city
that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1,
1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which
the city is located.

(6)
Moneys distributed under this section shall be expended exclusively for
criminal justice purposes and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing
funding. Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that
substantially assist the criminal justice system, which may include circumstances
where ancillary benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and which includes
domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic violence
programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW
70.123.020, and publications and public educational efforts designed to provide
information and assistance to parents in dealing with runaway or at-risk
youth. Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar
year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes.
Calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes
exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to
reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the
control of the local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(7)
Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the municipal criminal
justice assistance account shall be available for appropriations for
enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing
costs related to these enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for
such enhancements shall not supplant existing funds from the state general
fund.

Sec.
9. RCW
82.14.330 and 1998 c 321 s 13 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall transfer into the
municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this
section from the general fund the sum of four million six hundred thousand
dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring on July 1, October 1,
January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer
shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in
RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial
management in November of the preceding year. The moneys deposited in the
municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this
section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection (4) of this
section, shall be distributed to the cities of the state as follows:

(a)
Twenty percent appropriated for distribution shall be distributed to cities with
a three-year average violent crime rate for each one thousand in population in
excess of one hundred fifty percent of the state-wide three-year average
violent crime rate for each one thousand in population. The three-year average
violent crime rate shall be calculated using the violent crime rates for each
of the preceding three years from the annual reports on crime in Washington
state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs. Moneys shall be distributed under this subsection (1)(a) ratably based
on population as last determined by the office of financial management, but no
city may receive more than one dollar per capita. Moneys remaining
undistributed under this subsection at the end of each calendar year shall be distributed
to the criminal justice training commission to reimburse participating city law
enforcement agencies with ten or fewer full-time commissioned patrol officers
the cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic law
enforcement training, as provided in RCW 43.101.200.

(b)
Sixteen percent shall be distributed to cities ratably based on population as
last determined by the office of financial management, but no city may receive
less than one thousand dollars.

The
moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this subsection shall be distributed at such times as
distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) section 3 of this act.

Moneys
distributed under this subsection shall be expended exclusively for criminal
justice purposes and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing
funding. Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that
substantially assist the criminal justice system, which may include
circumstances where ancillary benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and
which includes domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic
violence programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW
70.123.020. Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as
calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice
purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal
justice purposes exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events
not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal justice
services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction receiving the services,
and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(2)
In addition to the distributions under subsection (1) of this section:

(a)
Fourteen percent shall be distributed to cities that have initiated innovative
law enforcement strategies, including alternative sentencing and crime
prevention programs. No city may receive more than one dollar per capita under
this subsection (2)(a).

(b)
Twenty percent shall be distributed to cities that have initiated programs to
help at-risk children or child abuse victim response programs. No city may
receive more than fifty cents per capita under this subsection (2)(b).

(c)
Twenty percent shall be distributed to cities that have initiated programs
designed to reduce the level of domestic violence within their jurisdictions or
to provide counseling for domestic violence victims. No city may receive more
than fifty cents per capita under this subsection (2)(c).

(d)
Ten percent shall be distributed to cities that contract with another
governmental agency for a majority of the city's law enforcement services.

Moneys
distributed under this subsection shall be distributed to those cities that
submit funding requests under this subsection to the department of community,
trade, and economic development based on criteria developed under RCW
82.14.335. Allocation of funds shall be in proportion to the population of
qualified jurisdictions, but the distribution to a city shall not exceed the
amount of funds requested. Cities shall submit requests for program funding to
the department of community, trade, and economic development by November 1 of
each year for funding the following year. The department shall certify to the
state treasurer the cities eligible for funding under this subsection and the
amount of each allocation.

The
moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this subsection, less any moneys appropriated for purposes
under subsection (4) of this section, shall be distributed at the times as
distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) section 3 of this act.
Moneys remaining undistributed under this subsection at the end of each
calendar year shall be distributed to the criminal justice training commission
to reimburse participating city law enforcement agencies with ten or fewer
full-time commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement of
each officer who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training, as provided in
RCW 43.101.200.

If
a city is found by the state auditor to have expended funds received under this
subsection in a manner that does not comply with the criteria under which the
moneys were received, the city shall be ineligible to receive future
distributions under this subsection until the use of the moneys are justified
to the satisfaction of the director or are repaid to the state general fund.
The director may allow noncomplying use of moneys received under this
subsection upon a showing of hardship or other emergent need.

(3)
Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the distributions to any city
that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1,
1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which
the city is located.

(4)
Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the municipal criminal justice
assistance account shall be available for appropriations for enhancements to
the state patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing costs related to
these enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for such enhancements
shall not supplant existing funds from the state general fund.

Sec.
10. RCW
82.14.380 and 1999 c 311 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The distressed county assistance account is created in the state treasury. ((Into
this account shall be placed a portion of all motor vehicle excise tax receipts
as provided in RCW 82.44.110.)) At such times as distributions are made
under ((RCW 82.44.150)) section 3 of this act, the state
treasurer shall distribute the funds in the distressed county assistance
account to each county imposing the sales and use tax authorized under RCW
82.14.370 as of January 1, 1999, in the same proportions as distributions of
the tax imposed under RCW 82.14.370 for these counties for the previous quarter.

(2)
Funds distributed from the distressed county assistance account shall be
expended by the counties for criminal justice and other purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. RCW
84.52.067 (State levy for support of common schools--Disposition
of funds) and 1967 ex.s. c 133 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---