BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
Many counties in the state of Washington have limited growth potential due to
the large percentage of public lands within their county boundaries;

(2)
Many of these counties are also economically distressed, and due to the high
percentage of public lands in their county, there is little potential for
future growth due to the unavailability of land; and

(3)
A review of those counties where public lands make up more than fifty percent
of a county's total land acreage is needed in order to best determine if
additional land can be made available for economic development.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
There is established the public lands task force to consist of thirteen members
selected as follows:

(a)
Two members from each caucus of the house of representatives, appointed by the
co-speakers of the house of representatives;

(b)
Two members from each caucus of the senate, appointed by the president of the
senate;

(c)
One member representing eastern Washington counties with public lands making up
more than fifty percent of a county's total land acreage, appointed by the
association of Washington counties;

(d)
One member representing western Washington counties with public lands making up
more than fifty percent of a county's total land acreage, appointed by the
association of Washington counties;

(e)
One member representing the department of natural resources, appointed by the
commissioner of public lands;

(f)
One member representing the department of community, trade, and economic
development, appointed by the director of the department of community, trade,
and economic development; and

(g)
One member representing federal agencies that administer federal lands in the
state, appointed by the United States secretary of the interior.

(2)
The interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall provide staffing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
task force shall:

(1)
Identify each county with more than fifty percent of the lands within its
boundaries owned by the state or federal government;

(2)
Conduct a survey of all public lands in those counties identified in subsection
(1) of this section;

(3)
Identify specific public lands in each of the counties identified in subsection
(1) of this section that provide the greatest opportunity for future economic
development. For each parcel identified under this subsection, provide the
location of said property and its relative proximity to existing roads, rail
lines, ports, and population bases; and

(4)
Provide a written report to the legislature presenting its findings and
recommendations by December 31, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act expires July 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---