BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature intends to authorize local governments to operate ferries on the
navigable waters of Washington state. While the state and federal governments
will continue to regulate ferry traffic for purposes of assuring the health and
safety of riders and the general public, the operation of ferries should be the
responsibility of the communities that primarily benefit from the service. To
implement this purpose, the legislature is requiring the phase-out of the state
operation of ferries on Puget Sound. The phase-out does not require divestment
of capital assets. The phase-out will commence with the effective date of this
act and be completed no later than July 1, 2006. After that date, the state
will no longer operate ferries on Puget Sound. The legislature is further
authorizing public transportation benefit areas formed under chapter 36.57A RCW
to provide ferry service on the navigable waters of Washington state when it is
in the best interests of the citizens served by the public transportation
benefit area.

PART
I: GOVERNANCE

Sec.
2. RCW
47.06.050 and 1993 c 446 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state-owned facilities component of the state-wide transportation plan shall
consist of:

(1)
The state highway system plan, which identifies program and financing needs and
recommends specific and financially realistic improvements to preserve the
structural integrity of the state highway system, ensure acceptable operating
conditions, and provide for enhanced access to scenic, recreational, and
cultural resources. The state highway system plan shall contain the following
elements:

(a)
A system preservation element, which shall establish structural preservation
objectives for the state highway system including bridges, identify current and
future structural deficiencies based upon analysis of current conditions and
projected future deterioration, and recommend program funding levels and
specific actions necessary to preserve the structural integrity of the state
highway system consistent with adopted objectives. This element shall serve as
the basis for the preservation component of the six-year highway program and
the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;

(b)
A capacity and operational improvement element, which shall establish
operational objectives, including safety considerations, for moving people and
goods on the state highway system, identify current and future capacity,
operational, and safety deficiencies, and recommend program funding levels and
specific improvements and strategies necessary to achieve the operational
objectives. In developing capacity and operational improvement plans the
department shall first assess strategies to enhance the operational efficiency
of the existing system before recommending system expansion. Strategies to
enhance the operational efficiencies include but are not limited to access
management, transportation system management, demand management, and
high-occupancy vehicle facilities. The capacity and operational improvement
element must conform to the state implementation plan for air quality and be
consistent with regional transportation plans adopted under chapter 47.80 RCW,
and shall serve as the basis for the capacity and operational improvement
portions of the six-year highway program and the two-year biennial budget
request to the legislature;

(c)
A scenic and recreational highways element, which shall identify and recommend
designation of scenic and recreational highways, provide for enhanced access to
scenic, recreational, and cultural resources associated with designated routes,
and recommend a variety of management strategies to protect, preserve, and
enhance these resources. The department, affected counties, cities, and towns,
regional transportation planning organizations, and other state or federal
agencies shall jointly develop this element;

(d)
A paths and trails element, which shall identify the needs of nonmotorized
transportation modes on the state transportation systems and provide the basis
for the investment of state transportation funds in paths and trails, including
funding provided under chapter 47.30 RCW.

(2)
The state ferry system plan, which shall guide capital and operating
investments in the state ferry system. The plan shall include a schedule
for the termination of state operation of the Washington state ferry system no
later than July 1, 2006. The plan shall ((establish service objectives
for state ferry routes,)) forecast travel demand for the various markets
served in the system((,)) and develop strategies for ferry system
investment that consider regional and state-wide vehicle and passenger needs((,
support local land use plans, and assure that ferry services are fully
integrated with other transportation services)). The plan shall ((assess
the role of private ferries operating under the authority of the utilities and
transportation commission and shall)) coordinate ferry system capital and
operational plans consistent with ((these private operations)) use
of ferry system assets and operation of selected ferry routes by public
transportation benefit areas. The ferry system plan must ((be
consistent with the regional transportation plans for areas served by the state
ferry system, and shall be developed in conjunction with the ferry advisory
committees)) provide for public comment and involvement prior to
adoption of the final plan.

Sec.
3. RCW
36.57A.010 and 1983 c 65 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Public transportation benefit area" means a municipal corporation of
the state of Washington created pursuant to this chapter.

(2)
"Public transportation benefit area authority" or
"authority" means the legislative body of a public transportation
benefit area.

(3)
"City" means an incorporated city or town.

(4)
"Component city" means an incorporated city or town within a public
transportation benefit area.

(5)
"City council" means the legislative body of any city or town.

(6)
"County legislative authority" means the board of county
commissioners or the county council.

(7)
"Population" means the number of residents as shown by the figures
released for the most recent official state, federal, or county census, or
population determination made by the office of financial management.

(8)
"Public transportation service" means the transportation of packages,
passengers, and their incidental baggage by means other than by chartered bus,
sight-seeing bus, together with the necessary passenger terminals and parking
facilities or other properties necessary for passenger and vehicular access to
and from such people moving systems: PROVIDED, That nothing shall prohibit an
authority from leasing its buses to private certified carriers or prohibit the
authority from providing school bus service.

"Public
transportation service" also means the transportation of packages,
vehicles, and passengers and their incidental baggage by a system of ferries.

(9)
"Public transportation improvement conference" or
"conference" means the body established pursuant to RCW 36.57A.020
which shall be authorized to establish, subject to the provisions of RCW
36.57A.030, a public transportation benefit area pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter.

Sec.
4. RCW
36.57A.060 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 270 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The
public transportation benefit area authority authorized pursuant to RCW
36.57A.050 shall develop a comprehensive transit plan for the area. Such plan
shall include, but not be limited to the following elements:

(1)
The levels of transit service and ferry service that can be reasonably
provided for various portions of the benefit area.

(2)
The funding requirements, including local tax sources, state and federal funds,
necessary to provide various levels of service within the area.

(3)
The impact of such a transportation program on other transit systems operating
within that county or adjacent counties.

(4)
The future enlargement of the benefit area or the consolidation of such benefit
area with other transit systems.

Sec.
5. RCW
36.57A.090 and 1981 c 25 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A
public transportation benefit area authority shall have the following powers in
addition to the general powers granted by this chapter:

(1)
To prepare, adopt, and carry out a general comprehensive plan for public
transportation service which will best serve the residents of the public
transportation benefit area and to amend said plan from time to time to meet
changed conditions and requirements.

(2)
To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to lease, construct,
add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate, and regulate the use of
transportation facilities and properties within or without the public
transportation benefit area or the state, including systems of surface,
underground, or overhead railways, tramways, buses, or any other means of local
transportation except taxis, and including escalators, moving sidewalks, or
other people-moving systems, passenger terminal and parking facilities and
properties, and such other facilities and properties as may be necessary for
passenger and vehicular access to and from such people-moving systems, terminal
and parking facilities and properties, together with all lands, rights of way,
property, equipment, and accessories necessary for such systems and
facilities. Public transportation facilities and properties which are owned by
any city may be acquired or used by the public transportation benefit area
authority only with the consent of the city council of the city owning such
facilities. Cities are hereby authorized to convey or lease such facilities to
a public transportation benefit area authority or to contract for their joint
use on such terms as may be fixed by agreement between the city council of such
city and the public transportation benefit area authority, without submitting
the matter to the voters of such city.

The
facilities and properties of a public transportation benefit area system whose
vehicles will operate primarily within the rights of way of public streets,
roads, or highways, may be acquired, developed, and operated without the
corridor and design hearings which are required by RCW 35.58.273, as now or
hereafter amended, for mass transit facilities operating on a separate right of
way.

(3)
To fix rates, tolls, fares, and charges for the use of such facilities and to
establish various routes and classes of service. Fares or charges may be
adjusted or eliminated for any distinguishable class of users including, but
not limited to, senior citizens, handicapped persons, and students.

In
the event any person holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity
from the Washington utilities and transportation commission under RCW 81.68.040
has operated under such certificate for a continuous period of one year prior
to the date of certification and is offering service within the public
transportation benefit area on the date of the certification by the county
canvassing board that a majority of votes cast authorize a tax to be levied and
collected by the public transportation benefit area authority, such authority
may by purchase or condemnation acquire at the fair market value, from the
person holding the existing certificate for providing the services, that
portion of the operating authority and equipment representing the services
within the area of public operation. The person holding such existing
certificate may require the public transportation benefit area authority to
initiate such purchase of those assets of such person, existing as of the date
of the county canvassing board certification, within sixty days after the date
of such certification.

(4)
To authorize acquisition by lease, charter, contract, purchase, condemnation,
or construction, and partly by any or all of such means, and to thereafter
operate, improve, and extend, a system of ferries at any unfordable stream,
lake, estuary, or bay, and connecting with the public streets and highways
within the boundaries of the public transportation benefit area. The system of
ferries shall include any boats, vessels, wharves, docks, approaches, landings,
franchises, licenses, and appurtenances as determined by the public
transportation benefit area to be necessary or desirable for efficient operation
of a ferry run or runs and best serve the public. The public transportation
benefit area may in like manner acquire by purchase, condemnation, or
construction and include in the ferry system any toll bridges, approaches, and
connecting roadways as may be deemed by the public transportation benefit area
advantageous in channeling traffic to points served by the ferry system. In
addition to the powers of acquisition granted by this section, the public
transportation benefit area is empowered to enter into any contracts,
agreements, or leases with any person, firm, or corporation and to provide
terms and conditions as it shall determine, for the operation of any ferry or
ferries or system, whether acquired by the public transportation benefit area
or not.

Sec.
6. RCW
81.104.015 and 1999 c 202 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"High-capacity transportation system" means a system of public
transportation services within an urbanized region operating principally on
exclusive rights of way, and the supporting services and facilities necessary
to implement such a system, including interim express services, ferries,
and high occupancy vehicle lanes, which taken as a whole, provides a
substantially higher level of passenger capacity, speed, and service frequency
than traditional public transportation systems operating principally in general
purpose roadways.

(2)
"Rail fixed guideway system" means a light, heavy, or rapid rail
system, monorail, inclined plane, funicular, trolley, or other fixed rail
guideway component of a high-capacity transportation system that is not
regulated by the Federal Railroad Administration, or its successor. "Rail
fixed guideway system" does not mean elevators, moving sidewalks or
stairs, and vehicles suspended from aerial cables, unless they are an integral
component of a station served by a rail fixed guideway system.

(3)
"Regional transit system" means a high-capacity transportation system
under the jurisdiction of one or more transit agencies except where a regional
transit authority created under chapter 81.112 RCW exists, in which case
"regional transit system" means the high-capacity transportation
system under the jurisdiction of a regional transit authority.

(4) "Transit agency" means city-owned transit systems,
county transportation authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, and
public transportation benefit areas.

Sec.
7. RCW
47.56.030 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section:

(a)
The department of transportation shall have full charge of the construction of
all toll bridges and other toll facilities including the Washington state
ferries, and the operation and maintenance thereof.

(b)
The transportation commission shall determine and establish the tolls and
charges thereon, and shall perform all duties and exercise all powers relating
to the financing, refinancing, and fiscal management of all toll bridges and
other toll facilities including the Washington state ferries, and bonded
indebtedness in the manner provided by law.

(c)
The department shall have full charge of design of all toll facilities. The
department shall proceed with the construction of such toll bridges and other
facilities and the approaches thereto by contract in the manner of state
highway construction immediately upon there being made available funds for such
work and shall prosecute such work to completion as rapidly as practicable.

(d)
The department is authorized to negotiate contracts for any amount without bid
in order to make repairs to ferries or ferry terminal facilities or removal of
such facilities whenever continued use of ferries or ferry terminal facilities
constitutes a real or immediate danger to the traveling public or precludes
prudent use of such ferries or facilities.

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the department shall
proceed with the procurement of materials, supplies, services, and equipment
needed for the support, maintenance, and use of a ferry, ferry terminal, or
other facility operated by Washington state ferries, in accordance with chapter
43.19 RCW except as follows:

(((1)))
(a) When the secretary of the department of transportation determines in
writing that the use of invitation for bid is either not practicable or not
advantageous to the state and it may be necessary to make competitive
evaluations, including technical or performance evaluations among acceptable
proposals to complete the contract award, a contract may be entered into by use
of a competitive sealed proposals method, and a formal request for proposals
solicitation. Such formal request for proposals solicitation shall include a
functional description of the needs and requirements of the state and the
significant factors.

(((2)))
(b) When purchases are made through a formal request for proposals
solicitation the contract shall be awarded to the responsible proposer whose
competitive sealed proposal is determined in writing to be the most
advantageous to the state taking into consideration price and other evaluation
factors set forth in the request for proposals. No significant factors may be
used in evaluating a proposal that are not specified in the request for
proposals. Factors that may be considered in evaluating proposals include but
are not limited to: Price maintainability; reliability; commonality;
performance levels; life cycle cost if applicable under this section; cost of
transportation or delivery; delivery schedule offered; installation cost; cost
of spare parts; availability of parts and service offered; and the following:

(((a)))
(i) The ability, capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the
contract or provide the service required;

(((b)))
(ii) The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience, and
efficiency of the proposer;

(((c)))
(iii) Whether the proposer can perform the contract within the time
specified;

(((d)))
(iv) The quality of performance of previous contracts or services;

(((e)))
(v) The previous and existing compliance by the proposer with laws
relating to the contract or services;

(((f)))
(vi) Objective, measurable criteria defined in the request for
proposal. These criteria may include but are not limited to items such as
discounts, delivery costs, maintenance services costs, installation costs, and
transportation costs; and

(((g)))
(vii) Such other information as may be secured having a bearing on the
decision to award the contract.

When
purchases are made through a request for proposal process, proposals received
shall be evaluated based on the evaluation factors set forth in the request for
proposal. When a life cycle cost analysis is used, the life cycle cost of a
proposal shall be given at least the same relative importance as the initial
price element specified in the request of proposal documents. The department
may reject any and all proposals received. If the proposals are not rejected,
the award shall be made to the proposer whose proposal is most advantageous to
the department, considering price and the other evaluation factors set forth in
the request for proposal.

(3)
((The legislative transportation committee shall review the secretary's use
of the request for proposals solicitation for Washington state ferries projects
to determine if the process established under chapter 4, Laws of 1995 1st sp.
sess. is appropriate. The results of the review, including recommendations for
modification of the request for proposal process, shall be reported to the
house of representatives and senate transportation committees by January 1, 1997))
All powers vested in the department or commission over the operation of
ferries shall terminate on a route-by-route basis as authority to operate
ferries on existing and new routes is transferred to public transportation
benefit areas under chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (this act).

Sec.
8. RCW
47.56.032 and 1984 c 7 s 247 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all powers vested in
the toll bridge authority as of September 21, 1977, relating to the acquiring,
operating, extending, designing, constructing, repairing, and maintenance of
the Washington state ferries or any part thereof and the collecting of tolls
and charges for use of its facilities, shall be performed by the department. Except
as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the commission shall
determine all fares, tolls, and other charges for its facilities and shall
directly perform all duties and exercise all powers relating to financing,
refinancing, and fiscal management of the system's bonded indebtedness in the
manner provided by law.

(2)
All powers vested in the department or commission over the operation of ferries
shall terminate on a route-by-route basis as authority to operate ferries on
existing and new routes is transferred to public transportation benefit areas
under chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (this act).

Sec.
9. RCW
47.60.013 and 1981 c 341 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((The
governor is authorized to take such actions as may be necessary to insure the
continued operation of the Puget Sound ferry and toll bridge system under any
emergency circumstances which threaten the continued operation of the system.
In the event of such an emergency, the governor may assume all the powers
granted by law to the transportation commission and department of
transportation with respect to the ferry system. In addition,)) Notwithstanding
the provisions of chapters 47.60 and 47.64 RCW, the governor may contract with
any qualified persons for the operation of ((the Washington state ferry
system, or any part thereof, or for)) ferry service to be provided by
privately owned vessels or vessels owned or leased by public transportation
benefit areas. Administrative costs to the office of the governor incurred
in the exercise of this authority shall be reimbursed by the department.

Sec.
10. RCW
47.60.015 and 1984 c 7 s 297 are each amended to read as follows:

Until July 1, 2006, the department is authorized to operate
its ferry system under the name: "Washington State Ferries."

Sec.
11. RCW
47.60.040 and 1984 c 7 s 300 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purpose of obtaining information for the consideration of the department
upon the ((acquisition of any ferries or ferry facilities or the))
construction of any toll bridge under this chapter, the department shall make
any examination, investigation, survey, or reconnaissance for the determination
of material facts pertaining thereto.

The
cost of any such examination, investigation, survey, or reconnaissance, and all
preliminary expenses leading up to and resulting in the issuance of any revenue
bonds including, but not being limited to expenses in making surveys and
appraisals and the drafting, printing, issuance, and sale of bonds under this
chapter shall be borne by the department out of the motor vehicle fund. All
such costs and expenses as well as any thereof heretofore incurred shall be reimbursed
to the motor vehicle fund out of any proceeds derived from the sale of bonds or
out of tolls and revenues to be derived by the department through its
operations hereunder.

Sec.
12. RCW
47.60.280 and 1984 c 7 s 322 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department is
authorized and directed to establish and operate a ferry service from a
suitable point on Lummi Island in Whatcom county to a suitable point on Orcas
Island in San Juan county by the most feasible route if and when Whatcom county
constructs a bridge from Gooseberry Point on the mainland to Lummi Island. The
actual operation of the ferry service shall not begin until Whatcom county has
completed the construction of such bridge.

(2)
The department's authority to provide the ferry service authorized under this
section shall terminate upon the transfer of the route as authorized under
chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (this act) or in any case no later than
July 1, 2006.

Sec.
13. RCW
47.60.282 and 1984 c 7 s 323 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limitations of subsection (2) of this section, the
department is authorized to operate a ferry service between Port Townsend and
Keystone on Admiralty Inlet if the certificate of convenience and necessity for
the ferry operation is theretofore surrendered, rights thereunder are
abandoned, and the ferry service is discontinued. In no event may the
department undertake such a ferry service preceding events as set forth herein
or before April 1, 1973.

(2)
The department's authority to provide the ferry service authorized under this
section shall terminate upon the transfer of the route as authorized under
chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (this act) or in any case no later than
July 1, 2006.

Sec.
14. RCW
47.60.290 and 1983 c 3 s 136 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject
to the provisions of RCW 47.60.326, the department is hereby authorized and
directed to review tariffs and charges as applicable to the operation of the
Washington state ferries for the purpose of:

(1)
Establishing a more fair and equitable tariff to be charged passengers,
vehicles, and commodities on the routes of the Washington state ferries; and

(2)
Facilitating the transfer of the operation of all or part of the state ferry
system to public transportation benefit areas as directed by chapter
. . ., Laws of 2000 (this act).

Sec.
15. RCW
47.60.300 and 1984 c 7 s 325 are each amended to read as follows:

The
review required under RCW 47.60.290 shall:

(1)
Include, but not be limited to, tariffs for automobiles,
passengers, trucks, commutation rates, and volume discounts((. The review
shall));

(2)
Give proper consideration to time of travel, distance of travel, operating
costs, maintenance and repair expenses, and the resultant effect any change in
tariff might have on the debt service requirements of the department as
specifically provided in existing financing programs((. The review shall
also));

(3)
Plan for and facilitate the transfer of the operation of the ferry system
consistent with the provisions of chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (this
act);

(4) Include the allocation of vessels to particular runs,
the scheduling of particular runs, the adequacy and arrangements of docks and
dock facilities, and any other subject deemed by the department to be properly
within the scope of the review. The department is further authorized and
directed to make a like review ((within every three-year period)) by
July 1, 2004.

Sec.
16. RCW
47.60.310 and 1988 c 100 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department is further directed to conduct such review by soliciting and
obtaining expressions from local community groups in order to be properly
informed as to problems being experienced within the area served by the
Washington state ferries. In order that local representation may be
established, the department shall give prior notice of the review to the ferry
advisory committees.

(2)
The legislative authorities of San Juan, Skagit, Clallam, and Jefferson
counties shall each appoint a committee to consist of five members to serve as
an advisory committee to the department or its designated representative in
such review. The legislative authorities of other counties that contain ferry
terminals shall appoint ferry advisory committees consisting of three members
for each terminal area in each county, except for Vashon Island, which shall
have one committee, and its members shall be appointed by the Vashon/Maury
Island community council. At least one person appointed to each ferry advisory
committee shall be representative of an established ferry user group or of
frequent users of the ferry system. Each member shall reside in the vicinity
of the terminal that the advisory committee represents.

(3)
The members of the San Juan, Clallam, and Jefferson county ferry advisory
committees shall be appointed for four-year terms. The initial terms shall
commence on July 1, 1982, and end on June 30, 1986. Any vacancy shall be
filled for the remainder of the unexpired term by the appointing authority. At
least one person appointed to the advisory committee shall be representative of
an established ferry-user group or of frequent users of the ferry system, at
least one shall be representative of persons or firms using or depending upon
the ferry system for commerce, and one member shall be representative of a
local government planning body or its staff. Every member shall be a resident
of the county upon whose advisory committee he or she sits, and not more than three
members shall at the time of their appointment be members of the same major
political party.

(4)
The members of each terminal area committee shall be appointed for four-year
terms. The initial terms of the members of each terminal area committee shall
be staggered as follows: All terms shall commence September 1, 1988, with one
member's term expiring August 31, 1990, one member's term expiring August 31,
1991, and the remaining member's term expiring August 31, 1992. Any vacancy
shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term by the appointing
authority. Not more than two members of any terminal-area committee may be
from the same political party at the time of their appointment, and in a county
having more than one committee, the overall party representation shall be as
nearly equal as possible.

(5)
The chairmen of the several committees constitute an executive committee of the
Washington state ferry users. The executive committee shall meet twice each
year with representatives of the marine division of the department to review
ferry system issues.

(6)
The committees to be appointed by the county legislative authorities shall
serve without fee or compensation.

(7)
The advisory committee requirements of this section only apply with respect to
ferry terminals which are operated solely by the department. When the
department transfers operation under chapter . . ., Laws of 2000
(this act) of the terminal that an advisory committee represents, that advisory
committee shall no longer be authorized under this section.

Sec.
17. RCW
47.60.326 and 1999 c 94 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In order to maintain an adequate, fair, and economically sound schedule of
charges for the transportation of passengers, vehicles, and commodities on the
Washington state ferries operated by the state, and to facilitate the
transfer of ferry operations to public transportation benefit areas, the department
of transportation each year shall conduct a full review of such charges.

(2)(a)
Prior to February 1st of each odd-numbered year through July 1, 2006,
the department shall transmit to the transportation commission a report of its
review together with its recommendations for the revision of a schedule of
charges for ferry runs operated by the state for the ensuing biennium.

(i)
The department's recommendation for revision of the schedule of charges must
meet the following funding goals: (A) By July 1, 2002, revenue from fares must
be sufficient to pay at least seventy percent of the cost of operating the
ferry system; (B) by July 1, 2004, revenue from fares must be sufficient to pay
at least eighty percent of the cost of operating the ferry system; (C) by July
1, 2006, revenue from fares must be sufficient to pay at least one hundred
percent of the cost of operating the ferry system. As used in this section,
"cost of operating" does not include capital costs.

(ii)
Any changes to the schedule of charges must facilitate the transfer of ferry
operations to public transportation benefit areas under chapter
. . ., Laws of 2000 (this act).

(b)
The commission on or before July 1st of that year shall adopt as a rule, in the
manner provided by the Washington administrative procedure act, a schedule of
charges for the Washington state ferries for the ensuing biennium commencing
July 1st. The schedule may initially be adopted as an emergency rule if
necessary to take effect on, or as near as possible to, July 1st.

(3)
The department in making its review and formulating recommendations and the
commission in adopting a schedule of charges may consider any of the following
factors:

(a)
The amount of subsidy available to the ferry system for maintenance and operation;

(b)
The time and distance of ferry runs;

(c)
The maintenance and operation costs for ferry runs with a proper adjustment for
higher costs of operating outmoded or less efficient equipment;

(d)
The efficient distribution of traffic between cross-sound routes;

(e)
((The desirability of reasonable commutation rates for persons using the
ferry system to commute daily to work;

(f)
The effect of proposed fares in increasing walk-on and vehicular passenger use;

(g)
The effect of proposed fares in promoting all types of ferry use during nonpeak
periods;

(h)
Such)) Any other factors as prudent managers of a
major ferry system would consider.

(4)
If at any time during the biennium it appears that projected revenues from the
Puget Sound ferry operations account and any other operating subsidy available
to the Washington state ferries will be less than the projected total cost of
maintenance and operation of the Washington state ferries for the biennium, the
department shall forthwith undertake a review of its schedule of charges to
ascertain whether or not the schedule of charges should be revised. The
department shall, upon completion of its review report, submit its
recommendation to the transportation commission which may in its sound
discretion revise the schedule of charges as required to meet necessary
maintenance and operation expenditures of the ferry system for the biennium or
may defer action until the regular annual review and revision of ferry charges
as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(5)
The provisions of RCW 47.60.330 relating to public participation shall apply to
the process of revising ferry tolls under this section.

(6)
The commission is authorized to increase Washington state ferry tariffs in
excess of the fiscal growth factor established under chapter 43.135 RCW.

Sec.
18. RCW
47.60.330 and 1983 c 15 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Before a substantial expansion or curtailment in the level of service provided
to ferry users, or a revision in the schedule of ferry tolls or charges, the
department of transportation shall consult with affected ferry users. The
consultation shall be: (a) By public hearing in affected local communities;
(b) by review with the affected ferry advisory committees pursuant to RCW
47.60.310; (c) by conducting a survey of affected ferry users; or (d) by any
combination of (a) through (c) of this subsection.

(2)
There is created a ferry system productivity council consisting of a
representative of each ferry advisory committee empanelled under RCW 47.60.310,
elected by the members thereof, and two representatives of employees of the
ferry system appointed by mutual agreement of all of the unions representing
ferry employees, which shall meet from time to time with ferry system
management to discuss means of improving ferry system productivity.

(3)
Before increasing ferry tolls the department of transportation shall consider
all possible cost reductions with full public participation as provided in
subsection (1) of this section and, consistent with public policy, shall
consider adapting service levels equitably on a route-by-route basis to reflect
trends in and forecasts of traffic usage. Forecasts of traffic levels shall be
developed by the bond covenant traffic engineering firm appointed under the
provisions of RCW 47.60.450. Provisions of this section shall not alter
obligations under RCW 47.60.450. Before including any toll increase in a
budget proposal by the commission, the department of transportation shall
consult with affected ferry users in the manner prescribed in subsection
(1)(b) of this section plus the procedure of either subsection (1)(a) or
(c) of this section.

(4)
The public participation requirements of this section do not apply to the
transfer of ferry runs or assets to public transportation benefit authorities,
nor to the subsequent operation of ferry traffic by a successor entity.

Sec.
19. RCW
47.60.140 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 4 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department is
empowered to operate such ferry system, including all operations, whether
intrastate or international, upon any route or routes, and toll bridges as a
revenue-producing and self-liquidating undertaking. The department has full
charge of the ((construction,)) rehabilitation, rebuilding, ((enlarging,
improving,)) operation, and maintenance of the ferry system, including toll
bridges, approaches, and roadways incidental thereto that may be authorized by
the department, including the collection of tolls and other charges for the
services and facilities of the undertaking. The department ((has the
exclusive right to)) may enter into leases and contracts for use and
occupancy by other parties of the concessions and space located on the ferries,
wharves, docks, approaches, and landings((, but, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, no such)) that it owns. All leases
or contracts ((may be entered into for more than ten years, nor without))
must expire no later than July 1, 2006, and must be negotiated using a
competitive contract process, except as otherwise provided in this section.
The competitive process shall be either an invitation for bids in accordance
with the process established by chapter 43.19 RCW, or a request for proposals
in accordance with the process established by RCW 47.56.030.

(2)
((As part of a joint development agreement under which a public or private
developer constructs or installs improvements on ferry system property, the
department may lease all or part of such property and improvements to such
developers for that period of time, not to exceed fifty-five years, or not to
exceed thirty years for those areas located within harbor areas, which the
department determines is necessary to allow the developer to make reasonable
recovery on its initial investment. Any lease entered into as provided for in
this subsection that involves state aquatic lands shall conform with the
Washington state Constitution and applicable statutory requirements as
determined by the department of natural resources. That portion of the lease
rate attributable to the state aquatic lands shall be distributed in the same
manner as other lease revenues derived from state aquatic lands as provided in
RCW 79.24.580)) All powers vested in the department or commission over
the operation of ferries shall terminate on a route-by-route basis as the
operation of ferries on existing and new routes is transferred under chapter
. . ., Laws of 2000 (this act).

Sec.
20. RCW
47.06.140 and 1998 c 171 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature declares the following transportation facilities and services to be
of state-wide significance: The interstate highway system, interregional state
principal arterials ((including ferry connections)) that serve
state-wide travel, intercity passenger rail services, intercity high-speed
ground transportation, major passenger intermodal terminals excluding all
airport facilities and services, the freight railroad system, the
Columbia/Snake navigable river system, marine port facilities and services that
are related solely to marine activities affecting international and interstate
trade, and high-capacity transportation systems serving regions as defined in
RCW 81.104.015. The department, in cooperation with regional transportation
planning organizations, counties, cities, transit agencies, public ports,
private railroad operators, and private transportation providers, as
appropriate, shall plan for improvements to transportation facilities and services
of state-wide significance in the state-wide multimodal plan. Improvements to
facilities and services of state-wide significance identified in the state-wide
multimodal plan are essential state public facilities under RCW 36.70A.200.

The
department of transportation, in consultation with local governments, shall set
level of service standards for state highways ((and state ferry routes))
of state-wide significance. Although the department shall consult with local
governments when setting level of service standards, the department retains
authority to make final decisions regarding level of service standards for
state highways ((and state ferry routes)) of state-wide significance.
In establishing level of service standards for state highways ((and state
ferry routes)) of state-wide significance, the department shall consider
the necessary balance between providing for the free interjurisdictional
movement of people and goods and the needs of local communities using these
facilities.

Sec.
21. RCW
47.04.140 and 1989 c 62 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
a county that operates or proposes to operate ferries obtains federal aid for
the construction, reconstruction, or modification of any ferry boat or
approaches thereto under Title 23, United States Code, the following provisions
apply to the county's operation of its ferries:

(1)
The county shall obtain from the ((department)) utilities and
transportation commission a franchise authorizing the ferry operations.
The county's application for a franchise or amended franchise shall designate
all ferry routes it proposes to operate. The ((department)) commission
shall issue the franchise or amended franchise for the operation of each route
that it finds is not otherwise served by adequate transportation facilities. A
county may terminate any ferry route without approval of the ((department))
commission.

(2) At least ninety days before applying for federal aid for the
construction, reconstruction, or modification of any of its ferries or
approaches thereto, and thereafter whenever new tolls or charges are proposed
for use of its ferries, the county shall file with the ((department)) commission,
the current or proposed schedule of tolls and charges for use of its ferries.
Such tolls and charges shall be deemed approved by the ((department)) commission
unless it finds that the aggregate revenues to be derived from the county's
ferry operations will exceed the amount required to pay the actual and necessary
costs of operation, maintenance, administration, and repair of the county's
ferries and their appurtenances.

Sec.
22. RCW
47.60.220 and 1984 c 7 s 316 are each amended to read as follows:

Through July 1, 2006, the department has all the
obligations, duties, and rights of a common carrier of persons and property in
its operation of ferries, terminals, or other facilities used in its ferry
operations, including the right to participate in joint rates and through routes,
agreements, and divisions of through and joint rates with railroads and other
common carriers and the right to make any filings with the interstate commerce
commission, the United States maritime commission, or any other state or
federal regulatory or governmental body and to comply with the lawful rules and
regulations or requirements of any such body, and is subject to laws relating
to carrier's liability for loss or damage to property transported, and for
personal injury or death of persons transported.

Sec.
23. RCW
47.60.230 and 1984 c 7 s 317 are each amended to read as follows:

In
case of property loss or damage or personal injuries or death resulting from
the operation of any ferry or terminal by the department, any person or the
personal representative of any person, subject to and to the extent hereinafter
provided, has a right of action against the department for the damage, loss,
injury, or death. This section does not authorize an action against a
private or public successor entity that purchases, leases, or otherwise
operates vessels or equipment formerly owned or operated by the department or
operates a ferry run formerly operated by the department.

Sec.
24. RCW
47.60.260 and 1984 c 7 s 320 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department may upon such terms and conditions as it may impose and under such
rules as it may adopt, pay claims arising under its operation of ferries or
terminals or compromise or settle the claims. No claim may be paid by the
department or any settlement or compromise of it be made except from the
operating revenues of the department derived from its operation of ferries or
terminals or from the proceeds of insurance recoveries. The department is
not authorized to pay claims arising from an action against a private or public
successor entity that purchases, leases, or otherwise operates vessels or
equipment formerly owned or operated by the department or operates a ferry run
formerly operated by the department.

Sec.
25. RCW
47.60.649 and 1998 c 166 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds and declares that ((there is a compelling need for the
construction of additional state ferry)) passenger-only vessels and
corresponding terminal improvements ((in order to provide more capacity and
frequent service to meet the forecasted travel demands of citizens traveling on
Puget Sound ferry routes. The vessel technology required must provide
additional travel options for high growth ferry routes through increased
passenger-only ferry service.

The
1989 west corridor study evaluated cross-sound travel through the year 2020 and
identified the Southworth to Seattle and the Kingston to Seattle passenger-only
ferry routes as promising based on criteria evaluating cost-effectiveness, time
savings, physical constraints to operation, nonduplication of current service,
and ability to relieve congestion.

Furthermore,
as a result of legislative direction provided in the 1991-93 transportation
budget to the state transportation commission to evaluate and determine the
location of new passenger-only ferry routes, the commission reviewed several
service alternatives, determined that the Southworth to Seattle and Kingston to
Seattle routes ranked highest, and directed the Washington state ferries to
proceed with the design and permitting processes for passenger-only terminals
at both Southworth and Kingston)) should only be provided
if a private entity, local government, or public/private partnership between a
private entity and a local government determines that it can provide service
without state funding. Beginning on the effective date of this act, the
department shall no longer provide passenger-only ferry service. The department
shall cooperate with and facilitate the sale or lease of department assets and
the transfer of ferry runs previously used to provide passenger-only service.

Sec.
26. RCW
47.80.030 and 1998 c 171 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each regional transportation planning organization shall develop in cooperation
with the department of transportation, providers of public transportation and
high capacity transportation, ports, and local governments within the region,
adopt, and periodically update a regional transportation plan that:

(a)
Is based on a least cost planning methodology that identifies the most
cost-effective facilities, services, and programs;

(b)
Identifies existing or planned transportation facilities, services, and
programs, including but not limited to major roadways including state highways
and regional arterials, transit and nonmotorized services and facilities,
multimodal and intermodal facilities, marine ports and airports, railroads, and
noncapital programs including transportation demand management that should
function as an integrated regional transportation system, giving emphasis to
those facilities, services, and programs that exhibit one or more of the
following characteristics:

(i)
Crosses member county lines;

(ii)
Is or will be used by a significant number of people who live or work outside
the county in which the facility, service, or project is located;

(iii)
Significant impacts are expected to be felt in more than one county;

(iv)
Potentially adverse impacts of the facility, service, program, or project can
be better avoided or mitigated through adherence to regional policies;

(v)
Transportation needs addressed by a project have been identified by the
regional transportation planning process and the remedy is deemed to have
regional significance; and

(vi)
Provides for system continuity;

(c)
Establishes level of service standards for state highways ((and state ferry
routes)), with the exception of transportation facilities of state-wide
significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140. These regionally established level
of service standards for state highways ((and state ferries)) shall be
developed jointly with the department of transportation, to encourage
consistency across jurisdictions. In establishing level of service standards
for state highways ((and state ferries)), consideration shall be given
for the necessary balance between providing for the free interjurisdictional movement
of people and goods and the needs of local commuters using state facilities;

(d)
Includes a financial plan demonstrating how the regional transportation plan
can be implemented, indicating resources from public and private sources that
are reasonably expected to be made available to carry out the plan, and
recommending any innovative financing techniques to finance needed facilities,
services, and programs;

(e)
Assesses regional development patterns, capital investment and other measures
necessary to:

(i)
Ensure the preservation of the existing regional transportation system,
including requirements for operational improvements, resurfacing, restoration,
and rehabilitation of existing and future major roadways, as well as
operations, maintenance, modernization, and rehabilitation of existing and
future transit, railroad systems and corridors, and nonmotorized facilities;
and

(ii)
Make the most efficient use of existing transportation facilities to relieve
vehicular congestion and maximize the mobility of people and goods;

(f)
Sets forth a proposed regional transportation approach, including capital
investments, service improvements, programs, and transportation demand
management measures to guide the development of the integrated, multimodal
regional transportation system; and

(g)
Where appropriate, sets forth the relationship of high capacity transportation
providers and other public transit providers with regard to responsibility for,
and the coordination between, services and facilities.

(2)
The organization shall review the regional transportation plan biennially for
currency and forward the adopted plan along with documentation of the biennial
review to the state department of transportation.

(3)
All transportation projects, programs, and transportation demand management
measures within the region that have an impact upon regional facilities or
services must be consistent with the plan and with the adopted regional growth
and transportation strategies.

PART II:
FERRY SYSTEM ASSETS

Sec.
27. RCW
47.60.010 and 1984 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department is
authorized to acquire by lease, charter, contract, purchase, condemnation, or
construction, and partly by any or all of such means, and to thereafter
operate, improve, and extend, a system of ferries on and crossing Puget Sound
and any of its tributary waters and connections thereof, and connecting with
the public streets and highways in the state. The system of ferries shall
include such boats, vessels, wharves, docks, approaches, landings, franchises,
licenses, and appurtenances as shall be determined by the department to be
necessary or desirable for efficient operation of the ferry system and best
serve the public. The department may in like manner acquire by purchase,
condemnation, or construction and include in the ferry system such toll
bridges, approaches, and connecting roadways as may be deemed by the department
advantageous in channeling traffic to points served by the ferry system. In
addition to the powers of acquisition granted by this section, the department
is empowered to enter into any contracts, agreements, or leases with any
person, firm, or corporation and to thereby provide, on such terms and
conditions as it shall determine, for the operation of any ferry or ferries or
system thereof, whether acquired by the department or not.

The
authority of the department to sell and lease back any state ferry, for federal
tax purposes only, as authorized by 26 U.S.C., Sec. 168(f)(8) is confirmed.
Legal title and all incidents of legal title to any ferry sold and leased back
(except for the federal tax benefits attributable to the ownership thereof)
shall remain in the state of Washington.

(2)
Beginning on the effective date of this act, the department may not acquire any
additional vessels or real property to aid in the state operation of a ferry
system.

(3)
In order to facilitate the utilization of Washington state ferry system assets
by public transportation benefit authorities to provide ferry service on ferry
routes with a terminus within the geographic boundaries of the public
transportation benefit authority, the department shall sell, lease, or grant
ferry system vessels, terminals, and other real or other property necessary to
accomplish the transfer of operations of a ferry route from the department to a
public transportation benefit authority.

Sec.
28. RCW
47.60.130 and 1979 ex.s. c 189 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Such
ferry system, including any toll bridges, approaches, and roadways incidental
thereto, may be financed and operated in combination or separately as one or
more units as the department of transportation may determine, and such ferry
system together with any toll bridge hereafter constructed by the department
upon or across the waters of Puget Sound or Hood Canal, or any part of either,
replacing one or more presently operated ferry routes, is declared to be a
continuous project within the meaning of RCW 47.56.070. The department is
empowered to rent, lease, or charter any property acquired under this chapter.
If the department determines that any real property (including lands,
improvements thereon, and any interests or estates) originally acquired for the
state ferry system is no longer required for the purposes of the state
ferry system, the department shall offer it for sale or lease to a public
transportation benefit authority on the condition that the authority continue
the full or partial operation of the ferry run or runs associated with the
property. If no public transportation benefit authority entity has entered
into negotiations to purchase the property by July 1, 2006, or if such
negotiations terminate after that date without resulting in a sale of the
property, the department shall offer it for sale in the manner and with the
authority authorized to the department by RCW 47.12.063 or 47.12.283. The
secretary of transportation may adopt rules further implementing this section.
The proceeds of all such sales shall be paid into the separate trust fund of
the state treasury established pursuant to RCW 47.60.150.

Sec.
29. RCW
47.12.023 and 1984 c 7 s 115 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in RCW 47.12.026 and 47.12.029, whenever it is necessary to
secure any lands or interests in lands for any highway purpose mentioned in RCW
47.12.010, or for the construction of any toll facility ((or ferry terminal
or docking facility)), the title to which is in the state of Washington and
under the jurisdiction of the department of natural resources, the department
of transportation may acquire jurisdiction over the lands or interests in
lands, or acquire rights to remove materials from the lands in the manner set
forth in this section.

(2)
At any time after the final adoption of a right of way plan or other plan requiring
the acquisition of lands or interests in lands for any purpose as authorized in
subsection (1) of this section, the department of transportation may file with
the department of natural resources a notice setting forth its intent to
acquire jurisdiction of the lands or interests in lands under the jurisdiction
of the department of natural resources required for right of way or other
highway purposes related to the construction or improvement of such state
highway((,)) or toll facility((, or ferry terminal or docking
facility)).

(3)
The department of transportation at the time of filing its notice of intent as
provided in subsection (2) of this section shall file therewith a written
statement showing the total amount of just compensation to be paid for the
property in the event of settlement. The offer shall be based upon the
department of transportation approved appraisal of the fair market value of the
property to be acquired. In no event may the offer of settlement be referred
to or used during any arbitration proceeding or trial conducted for the purpose
of determining the amount of just compensation.

(4)
Just compensation and/or fair market value for the purposes of this section
shall be determined in accordance with applicable federal and state constitutional,
statutory, and case law relating to the condemnation of private and public
property for public purposes.

(5)
If the department of natural resources does not accept the offer of the
department of transportation, the department of transportation may nonetheless
pay to the department of natural resources the amount of its offer and obtain
immediate possession and use of the property pending the determination of just
compensation in the manner hereinafter provided.

(6)
If the amount of just compensation is not agreed to, either the department of
natural resources or the department of transportation may request in writing
the appointment of an arbitrator for the purpose of determining the amount of
compensation to be paid by the department of transportation for the acquisition
of jurisdiction over the lands or interests in lands or rights therein. In
that event the department of natural resources and the department of
transportation may jointly agree on an arbitrator to determine the compensation,
and his determination shall be final and conclusive upon both departments. The
costs of the arbitrator shall be borne equally by the parties. If the
department of natural resources and the department of transportation are unable
to agree on the selection of an arbitrator within thirty days after a request
therefor is made, either the department of transportation or the department of
natural resources may file a petition with the superior court for Thurston
county for the purpose of determining the amount of just compensation to be
paid. The matter shall be tried by the court pursuant to the procedures set
forth in RCW 8.04.080.

(7)
Whenever the department of transportation has acquired immediate possession and
use of property by payment of the amount of its offer to the department of
natural resources, and the arbitration award or judgment of the court for the
acquisition exceeds the payment for immediate possession and use, the
department of transportation shall forthwith pay the amount of such excess to
the department of natural resources with interest thereon from the date it
obtained immediate possession. If the arbitration or court award is less than
the amount previously paid by the department of transportation for immediate
possession and use, the department of natural resources shall forthwith pay the
amount of the difference to the department of transportation.

(8)
Upon the payment of just compensation, as agreed to by the department of
transportation and the department of natural resources, or as determined by
arbitration or by judgment of the court, and other costs or fees as provided by
statute, the department of natural resources shall cause to be executed and
delivered to the department of transportation an instrument transferring
jurisdiction over the lands or interests in lands, or rights to remove material
from the lands, to the department of transportation.

(9)
Except as provided in RCW 47.12.026, whenever the department of transportation
ceases to use any lands or interests in lands acquired in the manner set forth
in this section for the purposes mentioned herein, the department of natural
resources may reacquire jurisdiction over the lands or interests in land by
paying the fair market value thereof to the department of transportation. If
the two departments are unable to agree on the fair market value of the lands
or interests in lands, the market value shall be determined and the interests
therein shall be transferred in accordance with the provisions and procedures
set forth in subsections (4) through (8) of this section.

Sec.
30. RCW
47.12.026 and 1984 c 7 s 116 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of transportation may acquire an easement for highway or toll
facilities right of way ((or for ferry terminal or docking facilities)),
including the right to make necessary fills, on, over, or across the beds of
navigable waters which are under the jurisdiction of the department of natural
resources, in accordance with the provisions of RCW 47.12.023, except that no
charge may be made to the department of transportation for such an easement.

(2)
The department of transportation may obtain an easement for highway or toll
facilities purposes ((or for ferry terminal or docking facilities)) on,
over, or across harbor areas in accordance with RCW 47.12.023 but only when the
areas are approved by the harbor line commission as a public place for public
landings, wharves, or other public conveniences of commerce or navigation. No
charge may be made to the department of transportation for such an easement.

(3)
Upon the selection by the department of transportation of an easement for
highway or toll facilities right of way ((or for ferry terminal or docking
facilities)), as authorized in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
department of natural resources shall cause to be executed and delivered to the
department of transportation an instrument transferring the easement. Whenever
the state no longer requires the easement for highway or toll facilities right
of way ((or for ferry terminal or docking facilities)), the easement
shall automatically terminate and the department of transportation shall, upon
request, cause to be executed an instrument relinquishing to the department of
natural resources all of its interest in the lands.

(4)
The department of transportation, pursuant to the procedures set forth in RCW
47.12.023, may remove sand and gravel and borrow materials and stone from the
beds of navigable waters under the jurisdiction of the department of natural
resources which lie below the line of ordinary high water upon the payment of
fair market value per cubic yard for such materials to be determined in the
manner set forth in RCW 47.12.023.

(5)
The department of transportation may acquire full jurisdiction over lands under
the jurisdiction of the department of natural resources including the beds of
navigable waters that are required for the relocation of the operating tracks
of any railroad that will be displaced by the acquisition of such railroad
property for state highway purposes. The department of transportation may
exchange lands so acquired in consideration or partial consideration for the
land or property rights needed for highway purposes and may cause to be
executed a conveyance of the lands in the manner prescribed in RCW 47.12.150.
In that event the department of transportation shall pay to the department of
natural resources, as just compensation for the acquisition, the fair market
value of the property, including the beds of any navigable waters, to be
determined in accordance with procedures set forth in RCW 47.12.023.

Sec.
31. RCW
47.56.050 and 1984 c 7 s 250 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department, whenever it is considered necessary or advantageous and
practicable, is empowered to provide for the acquisition by purchase of, and to
acquire by purchase (a) any bridge or bridges ((or ferries)) which
connect with or may be connected with the public highways of this state (b)
together with approaches thereto.

(2)
In connection with the acquisition by purchase of any bridge or bridges ((or
ferries)) under subsection (1) of this section, the department, the state
treasurer, any city, county, or other political subdivision of this state, and
all of their officers:

(a)
Are empowered and required to do all acts and things provided for in this
chapter to establish and construct toll bridges and operate, finance, and
maintain such bridges insofar as the powers and requirements are applicable to
the purchase of any bridge or bridges ((or ferries)) and their
operation, financing, and maintenance; and

(b)
In purchasing, operating, financing, and maintaining any bridge or bridges ((or
ferries)) acquired or to be acquired by purchase under this section, shall
act in the same manner and under the same procedures as are provided in this
chapter to establish, construct, operate, finance, and maintain toll bridges
insofar as such manner and procedure are applicable to the purchase of any
bridge or bridges ((or ferries)) and their operation, financing, and
maintenance.

(3)
Without limiting the generality of the provisions contained in subsections (1)
and (2) of this section, the department is empowered: (a) To cause surveys to
be made for the purpose of investigating the propriety of acquiring by purchase
any such bridge or bridges ((or ferries)) and the right of way necessary
or proper for that bridge or bridges ((or ferries)), and other
facilities necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter; (b) to issue,
sell, and redeem bonds, and to deposit and pay out the proceeds of the bonds
for the financing thereof; (c) to collect, deposit, and expend tolls therefrom;
(d) to secure and remit financial and other assistance in the purchase thereof;
and (e) to carry insurance thereon.

(4)
The provisions of RCW 47.56.220 apply when any bridge or bridges ((or
ferries)) are acquired by purchase pursuant to this section.

Sec.
32. RCW
47.56.253 and 1984 c 7 s 270 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the department deems it in the public interest and not inconsistent with the
use and operation of the toll facility involved, the department may on
application therefor issue a permit, lease, or license to the state, or to any
city, county, port district, or other political subdivision or municipal
corporation of the state or private entity to use any portion of the
property of any toll bridge, toll road, toll tunnel, or ((Washington state))
ferry system upon such terms and conditions as the department may prescribe.

Sec.
33. RCW
47.60.145 and 1982 c 210 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An "historic ferry" is any vessel in the Washington state ferries
fleet which has been listed in the Washington state register of historic
places.

(2)
When the department of transportation determines that an historic ferry is
surplus to the needs of Washington state ferries, the department shall promptly
call for proposals from persons who wish to acquire the historic ferry.
Proposals for the acquisition of an historic ferry shall be accepted only from
persons or organizations that (a) are a governmental entity or a nonprofit
corporation or association dedicated to the preservation of historic
properties; (b) agree to a contract approved by the state historic preservation
officer, which requires the preservation and maintenance of the historic ferry and
provides that title to the ferry reverts to the state if the secretary of
transportation determines that the contract has been violated; and (c)
demonstrate the administrative and financial ability successfully to comply
with the contract.

(3)
The department shall evaluate the qualifying proposals and shall select the
proposal which is most advantageous to the state. Factors to be considered in
making the selection shall include but not be limited to:

(a)
Extent and quality of restoration;

(b)
Retention of original design and use;

(c)
Public access to the vessel;

(d)
Provisions for historical interpretation;

(e)
Monetary return to the state.

(4)
If there are no qualifying proposals, an historic ferry shall be disposed of in
the manner provided by state law.

Sec.
34. RCW
47.60.550 and 1986 c 66 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a county, city, or other municipal corporation acquires or constructs
a facility to be used in whole or in part for off-street parking of motor
vehicles which is in the immediate vicinity of an existing or planned ferry
terminal, the department or a successor entity operating a ferry utilizing
the terminal may enter into an agreement with the local governmental body
providing for the use in part or at specified times of the facility as a
holding area for traffic waiting to board a ferry or for parking by ferry
patrons. When the department transfers a ferry run to a public
transportation benefit authority, the department's authority to enter into or
perpetuate such agreements with respect to the terminal served by that run
terminates.

(2)
As a part of an agreement authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the
department, subject to the limitations contained in RCW 47.60.505, may pledge
any moneys in the Puget Sound capital construction account in the motor vehicle
fund, or to be deposited in the account, to guarantee the payment of principal
and interest on bonds issued by a county, city, or other municipal corporation
to finance the acquisition or construction of the parking facility. In making
the pledge, the department shall reserve the right to issue its own bonds for
the purpose of paying the costs of acquiring ferry vessels with the provision
that the bonds shall rank on parity with the bonds authorized by this section
as a lien upon moneys in or to be deposited in the Puget Sound capital
construction account.

The
department shall also reserve the right to pledge moneys in the Puget Sound
capital construction account to guarantee subsequent bonds issued by any
county, city, or other municipal corporation to finance parking facilities as
authorized in subsection (1) of this section with the provision that the
subsequent bonds shall rank on parity with prior bonds guaranteed pursuant to
this section as a lien upon moneys in or to be deposited in the Puget Sound
capital construction account. To the extent of any pledge herein authorized,
the department shall use the first moneys available in the Puget Sound capital
construction account to meet the obligations as they arise.

PART
III: MARINE EMPLOYEES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 35. A
new section is added to chapter 47.64 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter do not apply to employees working on vessels,
terminals, or ferry route runs formerly operated by the Washington state ferry
system after such vessels, terminals, or ferry routes are transferred to a
public transportation benefit authority under chapter . . ., Laws of
2000 (this act).

Sec.
36. RCW
47.64.005 and 1961 c 13 s 47.64.005 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state of Washington, as a public policy, declares that sound labor relations
are essential to the development of a state ferry and bridge system
which will best serve the interests of the people of the state.

Sec.
37. RCW
47.64.090 and 1983 c 15 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

If
any party, other than a public transportation benefit authority established
under chapter 36.57A RCW, assumes the operation and maintenance of any
ferry or ferry system by rent, lease, or charter from the department of
transportation, such party shall assume and be bound by all the provisions
herein and any agreement or contract for such operation of any ferry or ferry
system entered into by the department shall provide that the wages to be paid,
hours of employment, working conditions and seniority rights of employees will
be established by the marine employees' commission in accordance with the terms
and provisions of this chapter and it shall further provide that all labor disputes
shall be adjudicated in accordance with chapter 47.64 RCW.

Sec.
38. RCW
36.57A.120 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 270 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
for the acquisition of a ferry or ferry system, if a public transportation
benefit area ((shall)) acquires any existing transportation
system, it shall assume and observe all existing labor contracts relating to
such system and, to the extent necessary for operation of facilities, all of
the employees of such acquired transportation system whose duties are necessary
to operate efficiently the facilities acquired shall be appointed to comparable
positions to those which they held at the time of such transfer, and no
employee or retired or pensioned employee of such systems shall be placed in
any worse position with respect to pension seniority, wages, sick leave,
vacation or other benefits that he enjoyed as an employee of such system prior
to such acquisition. The public transportation benefit area authority shall engage
in collective bargaining with the duly appointed representatives of any
employee labor organization having existing contracts with the acquired
transportation system and may enter into labor contracts with such employee
labor organization.

PART
IV: FUNDING

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 39.
During the interim period between the 2000 legislative session and the 2001
legislative session, the department of transportation shall work with affected
stakeholders, including the transportation committees of the Washington state
legislature, to develop a proposal for retiring, transferring, or otherwise
disposing of any outstanding indebtedness of the state with respect to
Washington state ferry system assets that are sold under chapter . . .,
Laws of 2000 (this act). The department shall present any legislation
necessary to accomplish this goal to the transportation committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2000.

PART
V: MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 40. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
47.60.017 (State ferry system a public mass transportation
system) and 1974 ex.s. c 105 s 1;

(2) RCW
47.60.020 (Eminent domain--Condemnation proceedings) and 1984 c 7
s 298 & 1961 c 13 s 47.60.020;

(3) RCW
47.60.120 (Other crossings--Infringement of existing
franchises--Waivers) and 1993 c 427 s 1, 1984 c 7 s 307, & 1961 c 13 s
47.60.120;

(4) RCW
47.60.122 (Ferries, terminal facilities--Interim revenue warrants
authorized) and 1984 c 7 s 308 & 1961 c 13 s 47.60.122;

(5) RCW
47.60.283 (Ferry service between Port Townsend and
Keystone--Purpose) and 1984 c 7 s 324 & 1972 ex.s. c 44 s 2;

(6) RCW
47.60.652 (Passenger-only ferry service--Vessel and terminal
acquisition, procurement, and construction) and 1998 c 166 s 2;

(7) RCW
47.60.654 (Passenger-only ferry service--Contingency) and 1998 c
166 s 3;

(8) RCW
47.60.680 (Prequalification of contractors required) and 1983 c
133 s 1;

(9) RCW
47.60.690 (Qualifications of contractor--Rules to assure) and
1983 c 133 s 2;

(10) RCW
47.60.700 (Application for prequalification--Form) and 1983 c 133
s 3;

(11) RCW
47.60.710 (Department authority to obtain information) and 1983 c
133 s 4;

(12) RCW
47.60.720 (Additional investigation--Terms of
prequalification--Notice of nonqualification) and 1983 c 133 s 5;

(13) RCW
47.60.730 (Renewal of prequalification--Nonrenewal or revocation,
notice) and 1983 c 133 s 6;

(14) RCW
47.60.740 (Rejection of bid despite prequalification--Unqualified
bidder) and 1983 c 133 s 7;

(15) RCW
47.60.750 (Appeal of refusal, modification, or revocation of
prequalification) and 1983 c 133 s 8;

(16) RCW
47.60.760 (Financial information regarding qualifying not public)
and 1983 c 133 s 9;

(17) RCW
47.60.770 (Jumbo ferry construction--Notice) and 1993 c 493 s 1;

(18) RCW
47.60.772 (Jumbo ferry construction--Bidding documents) and 1993
c 493 s 2;

(19) RCW
47.60.774 (Jumbo ferry construction--Procedure on conclusion of
evaluation) and 1993 c 493 s 4;

(20) RCW
47.60.776 (Jumbo ferry construction--Contract) and 1993 c 493 s
5;

(21) RCW
47.60.778 (Jumbo ferry construction--Bid deposits--Low bidder
claiming error) and 1996 c 18 s 9 & 1993 c 493 s 6;

(22) RCW
47.60.780 (Jumbo ferry construction--Propulsion system
acquisition) and 1994 c 181 s 2; and

(23) RCW
47.64.006 (Public policy) and 1989 c 327 s 1 & 1983 c 15 s 1.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 41. The
secretary of state shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and
ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this
state, in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and
the laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---