BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.74.005 and 1983 c 116 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((In
order to safeguard the public safety and welfare, to protect the public from
being misled by incompetent, unethical, and unauthorized persons, and to assure
the highest degree of professional conduct and competency, it is the purpose of
this chapter to strengthen existing regulation of persons offering physical
therapy services to the public.)) The purpose of this chapter is to
protect the public health, safety, and welfare, and to provide for state
administrative control, supervision, licensure, and regulation of the practice
of physical therapy. It is the intent of the legislature that only individuals
who meet and maintain prescribed standards of competence and conduct be allowed
to engage in the practice of physical therapy as defined and authorized by this
chapter. This chapter shall be liberally construed to promote the public
interest and to accomplish its purpose.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.74.010 and 1997 c 275 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Board" means the board of physical therapy created by RCW 18.74.020.

(2)
"Department" means the department of health.

(3)
"Physical therapy" means the ((treatment of any bodily or mental
condition of any person by the use of the physical, chemical, and other
properties of heat, cold, air, light, water, electricity, sound, massage, and
therapeutic exercise, which includes posture and rehabilitation procedures; the
performance of tests and measurements of neuromuscular function as an aid to
the diagnosis or treatment of any human condition; performance of treatments on
the basis of test findings after consultation with and periodic review by an
authorized health care practitioner except as provided in RCW 18.74.012;
supervision of selective forms of treatment by trained supportive personnel;
and provision of consultative services for health, education, and community
agencies. The use of Roentgen rays and radium for diagnostic and therapeutic
purposes, the use of electricity for surgical purposes, including
cauterization, and the use of spinal manipulation or manipulative mobilization
of the spine and its immediate articulations, are not included under the term
"physical therapy" as used in this chapter)) care and services
provided by or under the direction and supervision of a physical therapist
licensed by the state.

(4)
"Physical therapist" means a person who ((practices physical
therapy as defined in this chapter but does not include massage operators as
defined in RCW 18.108.010)) meets all the requirements of this chapter
and is licensed in this state to practice physical therapy.

(5)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(6)
Words importing the masculine gender may be applied to females.

(7)
"Authorized health care practitioner" means and includes licensed
physicians, osteopathic physicians, chiropractors, naturopaths, podiatric
physicians and surgeons, dentists, and advanced registered nurse
practitioners: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall be construed as
altering the scope of practice of such practitioners as defined in their
respective licensure laws.

(8)
"Practice of physical therapy" is based on movement science and
means:

(a)
Examining, evaluating, and testing individuals with mechanical, physiological,
and developmental impairments, functional limitations in movement, and
disability or other health and movement-related conditions in order to
determine a diagnosis, prognosis, plan of therapeutic intervention, and to
assess and document the ongoing effects of intervention;

(b)
Alleviating impairments and functional limitations in movement by designing,
implementing, and modifying therapeutic interventions that include, but are not
limited to, therapeutic exercise; movement-related functional training in
self-care, in-home, community, or work reintegration; manual therapy including
soft tissue and joint mobilization and manipulation; therapeutic massage;
assistive, adaptive, protective, and supportive devices and equipment, although
these procedures are not within the exclusive practice scope of physical
therapists; airway clearance techniques; debridement and wound care; physical
agents or modalities; mechanical and electrotherapeutic modalities; and
patient-related instruction;

(c)
Reducing the risk of injury, impairment, functional limitation, and disability
related to movement, including the promotion and maintenance of fitness,
health, and quality of life in all age populations; and

(d)
Engaging in administration, consultation, education, and research.

(9)(a)
"Physical therapist assistant" means a person who performs physical
therapy procedures and related tasks that have been selected and delegated only
by the supervising physical therapist.

(b)
"Physical therapy aide" means a person trained under the direction of
a physical therapist who performs designated and supervised routine physical
therapy tasks.

(c)
"Other assistive personnel" means other trained or educated health
care personnel, not defined in (a) or (b) of this subsection, who perform
specific designated tasks related to physical therapy under the supervision of
a physical therapist. At the direction of the supervising physical therapist,
and if properly credentialed and not prohibited by any other law, other
assistive personnel may be identified by the title specific to their training
or education.

(10)
"Restricted physical therapy license" means a license to which
restrictions or conditions, or both, as to scope of practice, place of
practice, supervision of practice, duration of licensed status, or type or
condition of patient or client served are imposed by the board.

(11)
"On-site supervision" means the supervising physical therapist must
(a) be continuously on-site and present in the department or facility where
assistive personnel or holders of interim permits are performing services; (b)
be immediately available to assist the person being supervised in the services
being performed; and (c) maintain continued involvement in appropriate aspects
of each treatment session in which a component of treatment is delegated to
assistive personnel.

(12)
Assistive, adaptive, protective, and supportive devices and equipment means
commercially available knee orthoses used following injury or surgery; spastic
muscle tone-inhibiting orthoses; upper extremity adaptive equipment; finger
splints; hand splints; custom-made, leather wrist gauntlets; face masks used
following burns; wheelchair seating that is an integral part of the wheelchair
and not worn by the patient independent of the wheelchair; fabric or elastic
supports; corsets; arch supports also known as foot orthotics; low-temperature
direct-formed plastic splints; trusses; elastic hose; canes; crutches; cervical
collars; prefabricated orthoses; direct-formed orthoses; and other similar
devices as determined by the secretary, such as those commonly carried in stock
by a pharmacy, department store, corset shop, or surgical supply facility.
Prefabricated orthoses, also known as custom-fitted or off-the-shelf, are
devices that are manufactured as commercially available stock items for no
specific patient. Direct-formed orthoses are devices formed or shaped during
the molding process directly on the patient's body or body segment.

Sec.
3. RCW
18.74.012 and 1991 c 12 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
the provisions of RCW 18.74.010(((4))) (3), a consultation and
periodic review by an authorized health care practitioner is not required for
treatment of neuromuscular or musculoskeletal conditions((: PROVIDED, That
a physical therapist may only provide treatment utilizing orthoses that
support, align, prevent, or correct any structural problems intrinsic to the
foot or ankle by referral or consultation from an authorized health care
practitioner)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
It is unlawful for any person to practice or in any manner hold himself or
herself out to practice physical therapy or designate himself or herself as a
physical therapist, unless he or she is licensed in accordance with this
chapter.

(2)
This chapter does not restrict persons licensed under any other law of this
state from engaging in the profession or practice for which they are licensed,
if they are not representing themselves to be physical therapists or providers
of physical therapy.

(3)
The following persons are exempt from licensure as physical therapists under
this chapter when engaged in the following activities:

(a)
A person who is pursuing a course of study leading to a degree as a physical
therapist in an approved professional education program and is satisfying
supervised clinical education requirements related to his or her physical
therapy education while under on-site supervision of a licensed physical
therapist;

(b)
A physical therapist while practicing in the United States armed services,
United States public health service, or veterans administration as based on
requirements under federal regulations for state licensure of health care
providers; and

(c)
A physical therapist licensed in another United States jurisdiction, or a
foreign-educated physical therapist credentialed in another country, performing
physical therapy as part of teaching or participating in an educational seminar
of no more than sixty days in a calendar year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
No person may practice or in any manner hold himself or herself out to be
engaging in the practice of physical therapy or designate himself or herself as
a physical therapist unless licensed as a physical therapist in accordance with
this chapter.

(2)
A physical therapist licensed under this chapter is fully authorized to
practice physical therapy as defined in this chapter.

(3)
A physical therapist shall refer persons under his or her care to appropriate
health care practitioners if the physical therapist has reasonable cause to
believe symptoms or conditions are present that require services beyond the
scope of practice or when physical therapy is contraindicated.

(4)
Physical therapists shall adhere to the recognized standards of ethics of the
physical therapy profession and as further established by rule.

(5)
A physical therapist who meets further qualifications as established by rule
may penetrate tissue for the purpose of testing neuromuscular performance.

(6)
A physical therapist may perform wound debridement and wound management that
includes, but is not limited to, sharp debridement, debridement with other
agents, dry dressings, wet dressings, topical agents including enzymes, and
hydrotherapy.

(7)(a)
A physical therapist licensed under this chapter may purchase, store, and
administer medications such as hydrocortisone, fluocinonide, fluorimethane,
silvadine, lidocaine magnesium sulfate, zinc oxide, and other similar
medications, and may administer such other drugs or medications as prescribed
by a physician. A pharmacist who dispenses such drugs to a licensed physical
therapist is not liable for any adverse reactions caused by any method of use
by the physical therapist.

(b)
The secretary, after consultation with representatives of the physical therapy
licensing board, the board of pharmacy, and the medical quality assurance
commission, may adopt rules that authorize licensed physical therapists to
purchase and use legend drugs and devices in addition to the drugs authorized
in this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
Physical therapists are responsible for patient care given by assistive
personnel under their supervision. A physical therapist may delegate to
assistive personnel and supervise selected acts, tasks, or procedures that fall
within the scope of physical therapy practice but do not exceed the education
or training of the assistive personnel.

(2)
Physical therapist assistants shall at all times be under the supervision of a
licensed physical therapist as further set forth in rule.

(3)
Physical therapy aides and other assistive personnel shall perform patient care
activities under on-site supervision of a licensed physical therapist.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
The public has access to the following information:

(a)
A listing of physical therapists licensed in the state, including place of
practice, license number, date of expiration, and status of license. This
listing shall also include interim permit holders;

(b)
A listing of physical therapist assistants licensed in the state, including
place of employment, license number, and date of expiration; and

(c)
A listing of official actions taken by the board.

(2)
Home addresses and telephone numbers of physical therapists and physical
therapist assistants are not public records and shall be kept confidential by
the board.

(3)
Physical therapists shall disclose in writing to patients if a referring
practitioner is deriving direct or indirect compensation from the referral to
physical therapy.

(4)
Physical therapists shall disclose in writing any financial interest in
products they endorse and recommend to their patients.

(5)
Physical therapists have the responsibility to ensure that the patient has
knowledge of freedom of choice in services and products.

(6)
Information relating to the physical therapist/patient relationship is
confidential and may not be communicated to a third party not involved in that
patient's care without the prior written consent of the patient. The physical
therapist/patient privilege does not extend to cases in which the physical
therapist has a duty to report information as required by law.

(7)
Any person may submit a complaint regarding any licensee or any other person
potentially in violation of this chapter. Confidentiality shall be maintained
subject to law.

(8)
The board shall keep all information relating to the receiving and
investigation of complaints filed against licensees confidential until the
information becomes public record or as required by law.

(9)
Each licensee shall display a copy of his or her license or current renewal
verification in a location accessible to public view at his or her place of
practice.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. In
order to use spinal manipulation as a treatment technique, a physical therapist
must meet further qualifications as established by rule. This section expires
January 1, 2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. RCW
18.74.085 (Advertising of spinal manipulation or mobilization
prohibited) and 1988 c 185 s 4 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10.
Sections 4 through 8 of this act are each added to chapter 18.74 RCW.

---
END ---