BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the higher education environment in Washington is
rapidly changing. The state is expected to experience a significant increase
in the demand for higher education opportunities over the next decade. In
addition, distance education opportunities continue to evolve with rapidly
changing technology. The purpose of this act is to provide information to the
legislature that would allow for more informed decision making about the role
that distance education will play in serving the people of Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
higher education coordinating board, in conjunction with the state board for
community and technical colleges, the office of financial management, and the
state institutions of higher education, shall study distance education in
Washington state and shall produce and deliver to the legislature no later than
January 2001, a study that:

(1)
Defines the different modes of distance education;

(2)
Analyzes the impact of distance education on capital needs and facility
utilization;

(3)
Evaluates the impact of distance delivery on instruction and faculty, as well
as student support, technological support, and administrative support services;

(4)
Identifies obstacles in providing distance education instruction;

(5)
Analyzes the cost factors associated with the various distance delivery modes;

(6)
Assesses the role of the K-20 network in distance delivery;

(7)
Identifies strategies to create efficiencies in distance delivery through
interinstitutional partnerships and collaborations; and

(8) Evaluates the implications of distance delivery on access to
higher education.

---
END ---