BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.15.130 and 1990 c 59 s 79 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Not less than thirty days before the first day for filing declarations of
candidacy under RCW 29.15.020 for legislative, judicial, county, city, town, or
district office, where more than one position with the same name, district
number, or title will be voted upon at the succeeding election, the filing
officer shall designate the positions to be filled by number.

The
positions so designated shall be dealt with as separate offices for all
election purposes. With the exception of the office of justice of the supreme
court, the position numbers shall be assigned, whenever possible, to reflect
the position numbers that were used to designate the same positions at the last
full-term election for those offices.

(2)
The election of members of a board of freeholders or other type of citizen
review commission, members of a city governing body under a city charter, or
members of a county legislative authority under a county charter may be
conducted without conforming to subsection (1) of this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
29.30.095 and 1990 c 59 s 96 are each amended to read as follows:

The name of a candidate for a partisan office for which a primary
was conducted shall not be printed on the ballot for that office at the
subsequent general election unless the candidate receives a number of votes
equal to at least one-half of one percent of the total number cast for
all candidates for that position sought and a plurality of the votes cast for
the candidates of his or her party for that office at the preceding primary.

---
END ---