BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

A county, city, or transportation authority imposing a tax under
RCW 82.14.045 to fund public transportation services shall provide
transportation services such as paratransit or dial-a-ride throughout its
entire service area to all persons over seventy years of age, to all disabled
persons as defined in RCW 46.16.381, and to all developmentally disabled
persons as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.

---
END ---