BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.94.141 and 1991 c 199 s 706 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board of any activated authority in addition to any other powers vested in them
by law, shall have power to:

(1)
Adopt, amend and repeal its own rules ((and regulations)), implementing
this chapter and consistent with it, after consideration at a public hearing
held in accordance with chapter 42.30 RCW and after approval by resolution
of the county legislative authority in each county within the jurisdiction of
an authority. Rules ((and regulations)) shall also be adopted in
accordance with the notice and adoption procedures set forth in RCW 34.05.320,
those provisions of RCW 34.05.325 that are not in conflict with chapter 42.30
RCW, and with the procedures of RCW 34.05.340, ((34.05.355)) 34.05.360
through 34.05.380, and with chapter 34.08 RCW, except that rules shall not be
published in the Washington Administrative Code. Judicial review of rules
adopted by an authority shall be in accordance with Part V of chapter 34.05
RCW. An air pollution control authority shall not be deemed to be a state
agency.

(2)
Hold hearings relating to any aspect of or matter in the administration of this
chapter not prohibited by the provisions of chapter 62, Laws of 1970 ex. sess.
and in connection therewith issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of
witnesses and the production of evidence, administer oaths and take the
testimony of any person under oath.

(3)
Issue such orders as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this
chapter and enforce the same by all appropriate administrative and judicial
proceedings subject to the rights of appeal as provided in chapter 62, Laws of
1970 ex. sess.

(4)
Require access to records, books, files and other information specific to the
control, recovery or release of air contaminants into the atmosphere.

(5)
Secure necessary scientific, technical, administrative and operational
services, including laboratory facilities, by contract or otherwise.

(6)
Prepare and develop a comprehensive plan or plans for the prevention, abatement
and control of air pollution within its jurisdiction.

(7)
Encourage voluntary cooperation by persons or affected groups to achieve the
purposes of this chapter.

(8)
Encourage and conduct studies, investigation and research relating to air
pollution and its causes, effects, prevention, abatement and control.

(9)
Collect and disseminate information and conduct educational and training
programs relating to air pollution.

(10)
Advise, consult, cooperate and contract with agencies and departments and the
educational institutions of the state, other political subdivisions,
industries, other states, interstate or interlocal agencies, and the United
States government, and with interested persons or groups.

(11)
Consult, upon request, with any person proposing to construct, install, or
otherwise acquire an air contaminant source or device or system for the control
thereof, concerning the efficacy of such device or system, or the air pollution
problems which may be related to the source, device or system. Nothing in any
such consultation shall be construed to relieve any person from compliance with
this chapter, ordinances, resolutions, and rules ((and regulations))
in force pursuant thereto, or any other provision of law.

(12) Accept, receive, disburse and administer grants or other funds
or gifts from any source, including public and private agencies and the United
States government for the purpose of carrying out any of the functions of this
chapter.

---
END ---