BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the demand for skilled workers with postsecondary
vocational-technical certificates or degrees exceeds the state's supply from
community and technical colleges, private career schools, and apprenticeships
by a ratio of two to one. The legislature further finds that costs incurred by
community and technical colleges in offering programs to meet this demand are
higher than the costs for basic skills and academic classes. The legislature
further finds that a lack of timely labor market information impedes the
ability of educational institutions to be responsive to shifting training
needs, thus decreasing the availability of skilled workers and reducing the
productivity and competitiveness of Washington businesses. The legislature
intends to increase the capacity of the state's community and technical
colleges to develop timely labor market information and provide an increased
number of postsecondary vocational-technical certificates or degrees in high-demand
fields.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
state board for community and technical colleges shall conduct regular,
systematic analyses of projected training needs of the largest industrial
sectors within the state as well as the industrial sectors within the state
that have the highest annual rate of increase in employment. The board shall
make this information available to all community and technical colleges and
private career schools in the state as well as to the supervisor of the state
apprenticeship council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
state board for community and technical colleges shall provide grants to
community and technical colleges that make use of the information provided them
under section 2 of this act and offer new or expanded training programs to
meet newly identified training needs. The grants shall be used exclusively to
pay for the costs of vocational-technical training equipment, supplies, and
instructors.

---
END ---