BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that high quality leadership by a well-trained principal is
critical to the success of the teachers and students in the schools. School
districts are having increasing difficulty in finding and keeping quality
principals. The legislature recognizes it has been estimated that up to half
of the principals working in Washington's public schools today may retire
within five years. Accordingly, the legislature declares the need is urgent to
recruit and retain highly capable principals to lead our public schools through
the tremendous challenges of the future.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with a qualified
independent organization to implement the principal competency assessment and
support program. The purposes of the program are to assist new public school
principals and principal candidates in developing individualized professional
growth plans and to support new principals and principal candidates through
implementation of the plan and achievement of professional certification.

(2)
The principal competency assessment and support program shall consist of
elements including, but not limited to, the following:

(a)
A competency-based assessment measuring a new principal's or principal
candidate's leadership and managerial skills;

(b)
Development of an individualized professional growth plan for a new principal
or principal candidate; and

(c)
Participation of a mentor principal who works over a period of between one and
three years with the new principal or principal candidate to help him or her
build the skills identified as critical to the success of the professional
growth plan.

(3)
The competencies assessed pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section shall
be those which have been determined by current research to be essential in
school leadership that promotes student success.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the superintendent of
public instruction for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, to carry out the
purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act expires July 1, 2006.

---
END ---