BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
1

LEGISLATIVE APPROVAL OF AGENCY
RULES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature shall review all proposed rules in accordance with the
procedures of section 2 of this act. This subsection does not apply to
emergency rules adopted in accordance with RCW 34.05.350.

(2)
The legislature shall review an existing rule in accordance with section 2 of
this act if a member of the house of representatives or a member of the senate
petitions the speaker of the house of representatives or the president of the
senate, respectively, for review of the existing rule. This subsection applies
to all existing rules, including emergency rules adopted in accordance with RCW
34.05.350.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Legislative review of an existing or proposed rule is limited to the issue of
the rule's validity or invalidity.

(2)
The legislature shall review existing or proposed rules subject to the
following procedures:

(a)
Upon receipt of a proposed rule or a written request to review an existing
rule, the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the
senate shall refer the rule under review to the appropriate standing committees
in the house of representatives and the senate, respectively.

(b)
A standing committee may conduct a public hearing on the rule, but must conduct
a public hearing on the rule before the committee may vote on the validity or
invalidity of the rule.

(i)
By majority vote, the committee may recommend to the legislative body as a
whole that the rule be declared invalid. If the committee recommends that the
rule be declared invalid, the committee must state the reasons for its
recommendation and may make recommendations to the agency regarding how to make
the rule valid;

(ii)
By majority vote, the committee may recommend to the legislative body as a
whole that the rule be declared valid;

(iii)
The committee may make recommendations to the agency on how to make the rule
valid and give the agency the opportunity to propose any rule changes the
agency will agree to make. If the agency proposes changes to the rule, the
committee may conduct a public hearing on the validity or invalidity of the
proposed changes subject to the procedures of this subsection; or

(iv)
The committee may take no action.

(c)
The legislative body may, at any time, vote by a constitutional majority to
consider the rule under review.

(i)
A motion made by the legislative body as a whole to consider the rule may be
made on any order of business and is a privileged motion.

(ii)
The legislative body may vote by a constitutional majority that the rule is
valid or invalid. If the legislative body votes that the rule is invalid, it
must state the reasons for its vote and may include recommendations to the
agency regarding how to make the rule valid.

(iii)
The legislative body may delay consideration on the validity of the rule until
the next regular or special legislative session in order to give the agency
time to change the rule.

(d)
The legislature may vote, by a constitutional majority in both houses, that the
rule is valid or invalid. If the legislature votes that the rule is invalid,
it must state the reasons for its vote and may include recommendations to the
agency regarding how to make the rule valid.

(i)
The legislature may delay consideration on the validity of the rule until the
next regular or special legislative session in order to give the agency time to
change the rule.

(ii)
A resolution approved by the legislature under this subsection will not be
submitted to the governor for approval or disapproval.

(iii)
A finding by the legislature under (d) of this subsection is considered
conclusive of legislative intent in any future court proceedings.

(3)
The standing committees of the legislature may meet during the interim at the
discretion of the speaker of the house of representatives or president of the
senate, respectively, for purposes of carrying out this chapter.

(4)
For purposes of this section, "legislative body" means the Washington
state house of representatives or the Washington state senate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the house of representatives or the senate may file a resolution of
noncompliance against an agency if the member believes:

(a)
The agency has not adopted rules or updated existing rules as required by law;
or

(b)
The agency is not complying with or is misapplying a statute or rule.

(2)
The legislature shall review a resolution of noncompliance filed under this
section subject to the following procedures:

(a)
Upon receipt of the resolution of noncompliance, the speaker of the house of
representatives and the president of the senate shall refer the resolution to
the appropriate standing committees of the house of representatives and senate,
respectively.

(b)
A standing committee may conduct a public hearing on the resolution, but must
conduct a public hearing on the resolution before the committee may vote on the
resolution.

(i)
By majority vote, the committee may recommend to the legislative body as a
whole that the resolution be adopted. If the committee recommends that the
resolution be adopted, the committee must state the reasons for its
recommendation and may make recommendations to the agency regarding how the
agency can come into compliance;

(ii)
By majority vote, the committee may amend the resolution and recommend to the
legislative body as a whole that the rule is in compliance;

(iii)
The committee may make recommendations to the agency on how the agency can come
into compliance and give the agency the opportunity to propose any changes the
agency will agree to make. If the agency proposes any changes regarding
compliance, the committee may conduct a public hearing to determine if the
proposed changes bring the agency into compliance subject to the procedures of
this subsection; or

(iv)
The committee may take no action.

(c)
The legislative body may, at any time, vote by a constitutional majority to
consider the resolution.

(i)
A motion made by the legislative body as a whole to consider the resolution may
be made on any order of business and is a privileged motion.

(ii)
The legislative body may vote by a constitutional majority that the agency is
in compliance or is not in compliance. If the legislative body votes that the
agency is not in compliance, it must state the reasons for its recommendation
and may make recommendations to the agency regarding how to bring the agency
into compliance.

(iii)
The legislative body may delay consideration on the resolution until the next
regular or special legislative session in order to give the agency time to come
into compliance.

(d)
The legislature may vote, by a constitutional majority in both houses, that the
agency is in compliance or is not in compliance. If the legislature votes that
the agency is not in compliance, it must state the reasons for its
recommendation and may make recommendations to the agency regarding how the
agency can come into compliance.

(i)
The legislature may delay consideration on the resolution until the next
regular or special legislative session in order to give the agency time to come
into compliance.

(ii)
A resolution approved by the legislature under this subsection will not be submitted
to the governor for approval or disapproval.

(3)
The standing committees of the legislature may meet during the interim at the
discretion of the speaker of the house of representatives or president of the
senate, respectively, for purposes of carrying out this chapter.

(4)
For purposes of this section, "legislative body" means the Washington
state house of representatives or the Washington state senate.

(5)
Failure to comply with a resolution of noncompliance passed by the legislature
under this section is grounds for impeachment or removal of the head of the
agency under Article V of the state Constitution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature, by one-third vote of the house of representatives and the senate,
may petition the attorney general to challenge the validity of a rule. Once
the legislature has so petitioned, the attorney general must bring an action to
determine the validity of the rule on behalf of the legislature.

PART
2

ELIMINATING THE JOINT
ADMINISTRATIVE RULES REVIEW COMMITTEE

Sec.
5. RCW
19.85.030 and 1995 c 403 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the adoption of a rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, an agency shall prepare a
small business economic impact statement: (a) If the proposed rule will impose
more than minor costs on businesses in an industry; or (b) if requested to do
so by a constitutional majority ((vote of the joint administrative
rules review committee)) of the legislature within forty-five days
of receiving the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320. However,
if the agency has completed the pilot rule process as defined by RCW 34.05.313
before filing the notice of a proposed rule, the agency is not required to
prepare a small business economic impact statement.

An
agency shall prepare the small business economic impact statement in accordance
with RCW 19.85.040, and file it with the code reviser along with the notice
required under RCW 34.05.320. An agency shall file a statement prepared at the
request of the ((joint administrative rules review committee)) legislature
with the code reviser upon its completion before the adoption of the rule. An
agency shall provide a copy of the small business economic impact statement to
any person requesting it.

An
agency may request assistance from the ((business assistance center)) department
of community, trade, and economic development in the preparation of the small
business economic impact statement.

(2)
The ((business assistance center)) department of community, trade,
and economic development shall develop guidelines to assist agencies in
determining whether a proposed rule will impose more than minor costs on businesses
in an industry and therefore require preparation of a small business economic
impact statement. The ((business assistance center)) department of
community, trade, and economic development may review an agency
determination that a proposed rule will not impose such costs, and shall advise
the ((joint administrative rules review committee)) legislature
on disputes involving agency determinations under this section.

(3)
Based upon the extent of disproportionate impact on small business identified in
the statement prepared under RCW 19.85.040, the agency shall, where legal and
feasible in meeting the stated objectives of the statutes upon which the rule
is based, reduce the costs imposed by the rule on small businesses. Methods to
reduce the costs on small businesses may include:

(a)
Reducing, modifying, or eliminating substantive regulatory requirements;

(b)
Simplifying, reducing, or eliminating recordkeeping and reporting requirements;

(c)
Reducing the frequency of inspections;

(d)
Delaying compliance timetables;

(e)
Reducing or modifying fine schedules for noncompliance; or

(f)
Any other mitigation techniques.

Sec.
6. RCW
19.85.061 and 1995 c 403 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
so requested by a constitutional majority ((vote of the joint
administrative rules review committee)) of the legislature under RCW
19.85.030, an agency is not required to comply with this chapter when adopting
any rule solely for the purpose of conformity or compliance, or both, with
federal statute or regulations. In lieu of the statement required under RCW
19.85.030, the agency shall file a statement citing, with specificity, the
federal statute or regulation with which the rule is being adopted to conform
or comply, and describing the consequences to the state if the rule is not
adopted.

Sec.
7. RCW
34.05.010 and 1997 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions set forth in this section shall apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Adjudicative proceeding" means a proceeding before an agency in
which an opportunity for hearing before that agency is required by statute or
constitutional right before or after the entry of an order by the agency.
Adjudicative proceedings also include all cases of licensing and rate making in
which an application for a license or rate change is denied except as limited
by RCW 66.08.150, or a license is revoked, suspended, or modified, or in which
the granting of an application is contested by a person having standing to
contest under the law.

(2)
"Agency" means any state board, commission, department, institution
of higher education, or officer, authorized by law to make rules or to conduct
adjudicative proceedings, except those in the legislative or judicial branches,
the governor, or the attorney general except to the extent otherwise required
by law and any local governmental entity that may request the appointment of an
administrative law judge under chapter 42.41 RCW.

(3)
"Agency action" means licensing, the implementation or enforcement of
a statute, the adoption or application of an agency rule or order, the
imposition of sanctions, or the granting or withholding of benefits.

Agency
action does not include an agency decision regarding (a) contracting or
procurement of goods, services, public works, and the purchase, lease, or
acquisition by any other means, including eminent domain, of real estate, as
well as all activities necessarily related to those functions, or (b)
determinations as to the sufficiency of a showing of interest filed in support
of a representation petition, or mediation or conciliation of labor disputes or
arbitration of labor disputes under a collective bargaining law or similar
statute, or (c) any sale, lease, contract, or other proprietary decision in the
management of public lands or real property interests, or (d) the granting of a
license, franchise, or permission for the use of trademarks, symbols, and similar
property owned or controlled by the agency.

(4)
"Agency head" means the individual or body of individuals in whom the
ultimate legal authority of the agency is vested by any provision of law. If
the agency head is a body of individuals, a majority of those individuals
constitutes the agency head.

(5)
"Entry" of an order means the signing of the order by all persons who
are to sign the order, as an official act indicating that the order is to be
effective.

(6)
"Filing" of a document that is required to be filed with an agency
means delivery of the document to a place designated by the agency by rule for
receipt of official documents, or in the absence of such designation, at the
office of the agency head.

(7)
"Institutions of higher education" are the University of Washington,
Washington State University, Central Washington University, Eastern Washington
University, Western Washington University, The Evergreen State College, the
various community colleges, and the governing boards of each of the above, and
the various colleges, divisions, departments, or offices authorized by the
governing board of the institution involved to act for the institution, all of
which are sometimes referred to in this chapter as "institutions."

(8)
"Interpretive statement" means a written expression of the opinion of
an agency, entitled an interpretive statement by the agency head or its
designee, as to the meaning of a statute or other provision of law, of a court
decision, or of an agency order.

(9)(a)
"License" means a franchise, permit, certification, approval,
registration, charter, or similar form of authorization required by law, but
does not include (i) a license required solely for revenue purposes, or (ii) a
certification of an exclusive bargaining representative, or similar status,
under a collective bargaining law or similar statute, or (iii) a license,
franchise, or permission for use of trademarks, symbols, and similar property
owned or controlled by the agency.

(b)
"Licensing" includes the agency process respecting the issuance,
denial, revocation, suspension, or modification of a license.

(10)
"Mail" or "send," for purposes of any notice relating to
rule making or policy or interpretive statements, means regular mail or
electronic distribution, as provided in RCW 34.05.260. "Electronic
distribution" or "electronically" means distribution by
electronic mail or facsimile mail.

(11)(a)
"Order," without further qualification, means a written statement of
particular applicability that finally determines the legal rights, duties,
privileges, immunities, or other legal interests of a specific person or
persons.

(b)
"Order of adoption" means the official written statement by which an
agency adopts, amends, or repeals a rule.

(12)
"Party to agency proceedings," or "party" in a context so
indicating, means:

(a)
A person to whom the agency action is specifically directed; or

(b)
A person named as a party to the agency proceeding or allowed to intervene or
participate as a party in the agency proceeding.

(13)
"Party to judicial review or civil enforcement proceedings," or
"party" in a context so indicating, means:

(a)
A person who files a petition for a judicial review or civil enforcement
proceeding; or

(b)
A person named as a party in a judicial review or civil enforcement proceeding,
or allowed to participate as a party in a judicial review or civil enforcement
proceeding.

(14)
"Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, association,
governmental subdivision or unit thereof, or public or private organization or
entity of any character, and includes another agency.

(15)
"Policy statement" means a written description of the current
approach of an agency, entitled a policy statement by the agency head or its
designee, to implementation of a statute or other provision of law, of a court
decision, or of an agency order, including where appropriate the agency's
current practice, procedure, or method of action based upon that approach.

(16)
"Rule" means any agency order, directive, or regulation of general
applicability (a) the violation of which subjects a person to a penalty or
administrative sanction; (b) which establishes, alters, or revokes any
procedure, practice, or requirement relating to agency hearings; (c) which
establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification or requirement relating to
the enjoyment of benefits or privileges conferred by law; (d) which
establishes, alters, or revokes any qualifications or standards for the
issuance, suspension, or revocation of licenses to pursue any commercial
activity, trade, or profession; or (e) which establishes, alters, or revokes
any mandatory standards for any product or material which must be met before
distribution or sale. The term includes the amendment or repeal of a prior
rule, but does not include (i) statements concerning only the internal
management of an agency and not affecting private rights or procedures
available to the public, (ii) declaratory rulings issued pursuant to RCW
34.05.240, (iii) traffic restrictions for motor vehicles, bicyclists, and
pedestrians established by the secretary of transportation or his designee
where notice of such restrictions is given by official traffic control devices,
or (iv) rules of institutions of higher education involving standards of
admission, academic advancement, academic credit, graduation and the granting
of degrees, employment relationships, or fiscal processes.

(17)
(("Rules review committee" or "committee" means the
joint administrative rules review committee created pursuant to RCW 34.05.610
for the purpose of selectively reviewing existing and proposed rules of state
agencies.

(18)))
"Rule making" means the process for formulation and adoption of a
rule.

(((19)))
(18) "Service," except as otherwise provided in this chapter,
means posting in the United States mail, properly addressed, postage prepaid,
or personal service. Service by mail is complete upon deposit in the United
States mail. Agencies may, by rule, authorize service by electronic
telefacsimile transmission, where copies are mailed simultaneously, or by
commercial parcel delivery company.

Sec.
8. RCW
34.05.230 and 1997 c 409 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((An agency may file notice for the expedited adoption of rules in
accordance with the procedures set forth in this section for rules meeting any
one of the following criteria:

(a)
The proposed rules relate only to internal governmental operations that are not
subject to violation by a person;

(b)
The proposed rules adopt or incorporate by reference without material change
federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other
Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs other than those programs
governing shorelines of state-wide significance, or, as referenced by
Washington state law, national consensus codes that generally establish
industry standards, if the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same
subject matter and conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;

(c)
The proposed rules only correct typographical errors, make address or name
changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its effect;

(d)
The content of the proposed rules is explicitly and specifically dictated by
statute;

(e)
The proposed rules have been the subject of negotiated rule making, pilot rule
making, or some other process that involved substantial participation by
interested parties before the development of the proposed rule; or

(f)
The proposed rule is being amended after a review under RCW 34.05.328 or
section 210 of this act.

(2)
The expedited rule-making process must follow the requirements for rule making
set forth in RCW 34.05.320, except that the agency is not required to prepare a
small business economic impact statement under RCW 19.85.025, a statement
indicating whether the rule constitutes a significant legislative rule under
RCW 34.05.328(5)(c)(iii), or a significant legislative rule analysis under RCW
34.05.328. An agency is not required to prepare statements of inquiry under
RCW 34.05.310 or conduct a hearing for the expedited adoption of rules. The
notice for the expedited adoption of rules must contain a statement in at least
ten-point type, that is substantially in the following form:

NOTICE

THIS RULE IS BEING PROPOSED TO BE ADOPTED USING AN
EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING PROCESS THAT WILL ELIMINATE THE NEED FOR THE AGENCY TO
HOLD PUBLIC HEARINGS, PREPARE A SMALL BUSINESS ECONOMIC IMPACT STATEMENT, OR
PROVIDE RESPONSES TO THE CRITERIA FOR A SIGNIFICANT LEGISLATIVE RULE. IF YOU
OBJECT TO THIS RULE BEING ADOPTED USING THE EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING PROCESS, YOU
MUST EXPRESS YOUR OBJECTIONS IN WRITING AND THEY MUST BE SENT TO (INSERT NAME
AND ADDRESS) AND RECEIVED BY (INSERT DATE).

(3)
The agency shall send a copy of the notice of the proposed expedited rule
making to any person who has requested notification of proposals for the
expedited adoption of rules or of agency rule making, as well as the joint
administrative rules review committee, within three days after its publication
in the Washington State Register. An agency may charge for the actual cost of
providing a requesting party mailed copies of these notices. The notice of the
proposed expedited rule making must be preceded by a statement substantially in
the form provided in subsection (2) of this section. The notice must also
include an explanation of the reasons the agency believes the expedited
adoption of the rule is appropriate.

(4)
The code reviser shall publish the text of all rules proposed for expedited
adoption along with the notice required in this section in a separate section
of the Washington State Register. Once the text of the proposed rules has been
published in the Washington State Register, the only changes that an agency may
make in the text of these proposed rules before their final adoption are to
correct typographical errors.

(5)
Any person may file a written objection to the expedited adoption of a rule.
The objection must be filed with the agency rules coordinator within forty-five
days after the notice of the proposed expedited rule making has been published
in the Washington State Register. A person who has filed a written objection
to the expedited adoption of a rule may withdraw the objection.

(6)
If no written objections to the expedited adoption of a rule are filed with the
agency within forty-five days after the notice of proposed expedited rule
making is published, or if all objections that have been filed are withdrawn by
the persons filing the objections, the agency may enter an order adopting the
rule without further notice or a public hearing. The order must be published
in the manner required by this chapter for any other agency order adopting,
amending, or repealing a rule.

(7)
If a written notice of objection to the expedited adoption of the rule is
timely filed with the agency and is not withdrawn, the notice of proposed
expedited rule making published under this section is considered a statement of
inquiry for the purposes of RCW 34.05.310, and the agency may initiate further
rule adoption proceedings in accordance with this chapter.

(8)
Subsections (1) through (8) of this section expire on December 31, 2000.

an
[An])) An agency is encouraged to advise the public
of its current opinions, approaches, and likely courses of action by means of
interpretive or policy statements. Current interpretive and policy statements
are advisory only. To better inform and involve the public, an agency is
encouraged to convert long-standing interpretive and policy statements into
rules.

(2)
A person may petition an agency requesting the conversion of interpretive and
policy statements into rules. Upon submission, the agency shall notify the ((joint
administrative rules review committee)) legislature of the
petition. Within sixty days after submission of a petition, the agency shall
either deny the petition in writing, stating its reasons for the denial, or
initiate rule-making proceedings in accordance with this chapter.

(((11)))
(3) Each agency shall maintain a roster of interested persons,
consisting of persons who have requested in writing to be notified of all
interpretive and policy statements issued by that agency. Each agency shall
update the roster once each year and eliminate persons who do not indicate a
desire to continue on the roster. Whenever an agency issues an interpretive or
policy statement, it shall send a copy of the statement to each person listed
on the roster. The agency may charge a nominal fee to the interested person
for this service.

(((12)))
(4) Whenever an agency issues an interpretive or policy statement, it
shall submit to the code reviser for publication in the Washington State
Register a statement describing the subject matter of the interpretive or
policy statement, and listing the person at the agency from whom a copy of the
interpretive or policy statement may be obtained.

Sec.
9. RCW
34.05.314 and 1997 c 409 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
state agency shall prepare a semiannual agenda for rules under development.
The agency shall file the agenda with the code reviser for publication in the
state register not later than January 31st and July 31st of each year. Not
later than three days after its publication in the state register, the agency
shall send a copy of the agenda to each person who has requested receipt of a
copy of the agenda. The agency shall also submit the agenda to the director of
financial management, the ((rules review committee)) legislature,
and any other state agency that may reasonably be expected to have an interest
in the subject of rules that will be developed.

Sec.
10. RCW
34.05.320 and 1995 c 403 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
At least twenty days before the rule-making hearing at which the agency
receives public comment regarding adoption of a rule, the agency shall cause
notice of the hearing to be published in the state register. The publication
constitutes the proposal of a rule. The notice shall include all of the
following:

(a)
A title, a description of the rule's purpose, and any other information which
may be of assistance in identifying the rule or its purpose;

(b)
Citations of the statutory authority for adopting the rule and the specific
statute the rule is intended to implement;

(c)
A summary of the rule and a statement of the reasons supporting the proposed
action;

(d)
The agency personnel, with their office location and telephone number, who are
responsible for the drafting, implementation, and enforcement of the rule;

(e)
The name of the person or organization, whether private, public, or
governmental, proposing the rule;

(f)
Agency comments or recommendations, if any, regarding statutory language,
implementation, enforcement, and fiscal matters pertaining to the rule;

(g)
Whether the rule is necessary as the result of federal law or federal or state
court action, and if so, a copy of such law or court decision shall be attached
to the purpose statement;

(h)
When, where, and how persons may present their views on the proposed rule;

(i)
The date on which the agency intends to adopt the rule;

(j)
A short explanation of the rule, its purpose, and anticipated effects,
including in the case of a proposal that would modify existing rules, a short
description of the changes the proposal would make;

(k)
A copy of the small business economic impact statement prepared under chapter
19.85 RCW, or an explanation for why the agency did not prepare the statement;
and

(l)
A statement indicating whether RCW 34.05.328 applies to the rule adoption.

(2)
Upon filing notice of the proposed rule with the code reviser, the adopting
agency shall have copies of the notice on file and available for public
inspection and shall forward three copies of the notice to the ((rules
review committee)) legislature.

(3)
No later than three days after its publication in the state register, the
agency shall cause a copy of the notice of proposed rule adoption to be mailed
to each person, city, and county that has made a request to the agency for a
mailed copy of such notices. An agency may charge for the actual cost of
providing a requesting party mailed copies of these notices.

(4)
In addition to the notice required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
an institution of higher education shall cause the notice to be published in
the campus or standard newspaper of the institution at least seven days before
the rule-making hearing.

Sec.
11. RCW
34.05.328 and 1997 c 430 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Before adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this section, an agency
shall:

(a)
Clearly state in detail the general goals and specific objectives of the
statute that the rule implements;

(b)
Determine that the rule is needed to achieve the general goals and specific
objectives stated under (a) of this subsection, and analyze alternatives to
rule making and the consequences of not adopting the rule;

(c)
Determine that the probable benefits of the rule are greater than its probable
costs, taking into account both the qualitative and quantitative benefits and
costs and the specific directives of the statute being implemented;

(d)
Determine, after considering alternative versions of the rule and the analysis
required under (b) and (c) of this subsection, that the rule being adopted is
the least burdensome alternative for those required to comply with it that will
achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of this
subsection;

(e)
Determine that the rule does not require those to whom it applies to take an
action that violates requirements of another federal or state law;

(f)
Determine that the rule does not impose more stringent performance requirements
on private entities than on public entities unless required to do so by federal
or state law;

(g)
Determine if the rule differs from any federal regulation or statute applicable
to the same activity or subject matter and, if so, determine that the
difference is justified by the following:

(i)
A state statute that explicitly allows the agency to differ from federal
standards; or

(ii)
Substantial evidence that the difference is necessary to achieve the general
goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection; and

(h)
Coordinate the rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with other federal,
state, and local laws applicable to the same activity or subject matter.

(2)
In making its determinations pursuant to subsection (1)(b) through (g) of this
section, the agency shall place in the rule-making file documentation of
sufficient quantity and quality so as to persuade a reasonable person that the
determinations are justified.

(3)
Before adopting rules described in subsection (5) of this section, an agency
shall place in the rule-making file a rule implementation plan for rules filed
under each adopting order. The plan shall describe how the agency intends to:

(a)
Implement and enforce the rule, including a description of the resources the
agency intends to use;

(b)
Inform and educate affected persons about the rule;

(c)
Promote and assist voluntary compliance; and

(d)
Evaluate whether the rule achieves the purpose for which it was adopted,
including, to the maximum extent practicable, the use of interim milestones to
assess progress and the use of objectively measurable outcomes.

(4)
After adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this section regulating
the same activity or subject matter as another provision of federal or state
law, an agency shall do all of the following:

(a)
Provide to the ((business assistance center)) department of
community, trade, and economic development a list citing by reference the
other federal and state laws that regulate the same activity or subject matter;

(b)
Coordinate implementation and enforcement of the rule with the other federal
and state entities regulating the same activity or subject matter by making
every effort to do one or more of the following:

(i)
Deferring to the other entity;

(ii)
Designating a lead agency; or

(iii)
Entering into an agreement with the other entities specifying how the agency
and entities will coordinate implementation and enforcement.

If
the agency is unable to comply with this subsection (4)(b), the agency shall
report to the legislature pursuant to (c) of this subsection;

(c)
Report to the ((joint administrative rules review committee)) legislature:

(i)
The existence of any overlap or duplication of other federal or state laws, any
differences from federal law, and any known overlap, duplication, or conflict
with local laws; and

(ii)
Make recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary to eliminate or
mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap, duplication, or difference.

(5)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this section applies to:

(i)
Significant legislative rules of the departments of ecology, labor and
industries, health, revenue, social and health services, and natural resources,
the employment security department, the forest practices board, the office of
the insurance commissioner, and to the legislative rules of the department of
fish and wildlife implementing chapter 75.20 RCW; and

(ii)
Any rule of any agency, if this section is voluntarily made applicable to the
rule by the agency, or is made applicable to the rule by a constitutional
majority ((vote of the joint administrative rules review committee)) of
the legislature within forty-five days of receiving the notice of proposed
rule making under RCW 34.05.320.

(b)
This section does not apply to:

(i)
Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;

(ii)
Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that are not subject to
violation by a nongovernment party;

(iii)
Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material change federal
statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other Washington
state agencies, shoreline master programs other than those programs governing
shorelines of state-wide significance, or, as referenced by Washington state
law, national consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if
the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;

(iv)
Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or
clarify language of a rule without changing its effect;

(v)
Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute;

(vi)
Rules that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative standards; or

(vii)
Rules of the department of social and health services relating only to client
medical or financial eligibility and rules concerning liability for care of
dependents.

(c)
For purposes of this subsection:

(i)
A "procedural rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals (A) any
procedure, practice, or requirement relating to any agency hearings; (B) any
filing or related process requirement for making application to an agency for a
license or permit; or (C) any policy statement pertaining to the consistent
internal operations of an agency.

(ii)
An "interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does not
subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the agency’s
interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.

(iii)
A "significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a procedural or
interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions of law pursuant to
delegated legislative authority, the violation of which subjects a violator of
such rule to a penalty or sanction; (B) establishes, alters, or revokes any
qualification or standard for the issuance, suspension, or revocation of a
license or permit; or (C) adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a
policy or regulatory program.

(d)
In the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an agency shall
state whether this section applies to the proposed rule pursuant to (a)(i) of
this subsection, or if the agency will apply this section voluntarily.

(6)
By January 31, 1996, and by January 31st of each even-numbered year thereafter,
the office of financial management, after consulting with state agencies,
counties, and cities, and business, labor, and environmental organizations,
shall report to the governor and the legislature regarding the effects of this
section on the regulatory system in this state. The report shall document:

(a)
The rules proposed to which this section applied and to the extent possible,
how compliance with this section affected the substance of the rule, if any,
that the agency ultimately adopted;

(b)
The costs incurred by state agencies in complying with this section;

(c)
Any legal action maintained based upon the alleged failure of any agency to
comply with this section, the costs to the state of such action, and the
result;

(d)
The extent to which this section has adversely affected the capacity of
agencies to fulfill their legislatively prescribed mission;

(e)
The extent to which this section has improved the acceptability of state rules
to those regulated; and

(f)
Any other information considered by the office of financial management to be
useful in evaluating the effect of this section.

Sec.
12. RCW
34.05.330 and 1998 c 280 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person may petition an agency requesting the adoption, amendment, or repeal
of any rule. The office of financial management shall prescribe by rule the
format for such petitions and the procedure for their submission,
consideration, and disposition and provide a standard form that may be used to
petition any agency. Within sixty days after submission of a petition, the
agency shall either (a) deny the petition in writing, stating (i) its reasons
for the denial, specifically addressing the concerns raised by the petitioner,
and, where appropriate, (ii) the alternative means by which it will address the
concerns raised by the petitioner, or (b) initiate rule-making proceedings in
accordance with RCW 34.05.320.

(2)
((If an agency denies a petition to repeal or amend a rule submitted under
subsection (1) of this section, and the petition alleges that the rule is not
within the intent of the legislature or was not adopted in accordance with all
applicable provisions of law, the person may petition for review of the rule by
the joint administrative rules review committee under RCW 34.05.655.

(3))) If
an agency denies a petition to repeal or amend a rule submitted under
subsection (1) of this section, the petitioner, within thirty days of the
denial, may appeal the denial to the governor. The governor shall immediately
file notice of the appeal with the code reviser for publication in the
Washington state register. Within forty-five days after receiving the appeal,
the governor shall either (a) deny the petition in writing, stating (i) his or
her reasons for the denial, specifically addressing the concerns raised by the
petitioner, and, (ii) where appropriate, the alternative means by which he or
she will address the concerns raised by the petitioner; (b) for agencies listed
in RCW 43.17.010, direct the agency to initiate rule-making proceedings in
accordance with this chapter; or (c) for agencies not listed in RCW 43.17.010,
recommend that the agency initiate rule-making proceedings in accordance with
this chapter. The governor's response to the appeal shall be published in the
Washington state register and copies shall be submitted to the chief clerk of
the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate.

(((4)))
(3) In petitioning for repeal or amendment of a rule under this section,
a person is encouraged to address, among other concerns:

(a)
Whether the rule is authorized;

(b)
Whether the rule is needed;

(c)
Whether the rule conflicts with or duplicates other federal, state, or local
laws;

(d)
Whether alternatives to the rule exist that will serve the same purpose at less
cost;

(e)
Whether the rule applies differently to public and private entities;

(f)
Whether the rule serves the purposes for which it was adopted;

(g)
Whether the costs imposed by the rule are unreasonable;

(h)
Whether the rule is clearly and simply stated;

(i)
Whether the rule is different than a federal law applicable to the same
activity or subject matter without adequate justification; and

(j)
Whether the rule was adopted according to all applicable provisions of law.

(((5)))
(4) The department of community, trade, and economic development and the
office of financial management shall coordinate efforts among agencies to
inform the public about the existence of this rules review process.

(((6)))
(5) The office of financial management shall initiate the rule making
required by subsection (1) of this section by September 1, 1995.

Sec.
13. RCW
34.05.350 and 1994 c 249 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If an agency for good cause finds:

(a)
That immediate adoption, amendment, or repeal of a rule is necessary for the
preservation of the public health, safety, or general welfare, and that
observing the time requirements of notice and opportunity to comment upon
adoption of a permanent rule would be contrary to the public interest; or

(b)
That state or federal law or federal rule or a federal deadline for state
receipt of federal funds requires immediate adoption of a rule,

the
agency may dispense with those requirements and adopt, amend, or repeal the
rule on an emergency basis. The agency's finding and a concise statement of
the reasons for its finding shall be incorporated in the order for adoption of
the emergency rule or amendment filed with the office of the code reviser under
RCW 34.05.380 and with the ((rules review committee)) legislature.

(2)
An emergency rule adopted under this section takes effect upon filing with the
code reviser, unless a later date is specified in the order of adoption, and
may not remain in effect for longer than one hundred twenty days after filing.
Identical or substantially similar emergency rules may not be adopted in
sequence unless conditions have changed or the agency has filed notice of its
intent to adopt the rule as a permanent rule, and is actively undertaking the
appropriate procedures to adopt the rule as a permanent rule. This section
does not relieve any agency from compliance with any law requiring that its
permanent rules be approved by designated persons or bodies before they become
effective.

(3)
Within seven days after the rule is adopted, any person may petition the
governor requesting the immediate repeal of a rule adopted on an emergency
basis by any department listed in RCW 43.17.010. Within seven days after
submission of the petition, the governor shall either deny the petition in
writing, stating his or her reasons for the denial, or order the immediate
repeal of the rule. In ruling on the petition, the governor shall consider
only whether the conditions in subsection (1) of this section were met such
that adoption of the rule on an emergency basis was necessary. If the governor
orders the repeal of the emergency rule, any sanction imposed based on that
rule is void. This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit adoption of
any rule as a permanent rule.

(((4)
In adopting an emergency rule, the agency shall comply with section 4 of this
act or provide a written explanation for its failure to do so.))

Sec.
14. RCW
34.05.356 and 1998 c 280 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An agency may file notice for the expedited adoption of rules in accordance
with the procedures set forth in this section for rules meeting any one of the
following criteria:

(a)
The proposed rules relate only to internal governmental operations that are not
subject to violation by a person;

(b)
The proposed rules adopt or incorporate by reference without material change
federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other
Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs other than those programs
governing shorelines of state-wide significance, or, as referenced by
Washington state law, national consensus codes that generally establish
industry standards, if the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same
subject matter and conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;

(c)
The proposed rules only correct typographical errors, make address or name
changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its effect;

(d)
The content of the proposed rules is explicitly and specifically dictated by
statute;

(e)
The proposed rules have been the subject of negotiated rule making, pilot rule
making, or some other process that involved substantial participation by
interested parties before the development of the proposed rule; or

(f)
The proposed rule is being amended after a review under RCW 34.05.328.

(2)
The expedited rule-making process must follow the requirements for rule making
set forth in RCW 34.05.320, except that the agency is not required to prepare a
small business economic impact statement under RCW 19.85.025, a statement
indicating whether the rule constitutes a significant legislative rule under
RCW 34.05.328(((6))) (5)(c)(iii), or a significant legislative
rule analysis under RCW 34.05.328. An agency is not required to prepare
statements of inquiry under RCW 34.05.310 or conduct a hearing for the
expedited adoption of rules. The notice for the expedited adoption of rules
must contain a statement in at least ten-point type, that is substantially in
the following form:

NOTICE

THIS RULE IS BEING PROPOSED TO BE ADOPTED USING AN
EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING PROCESS THAT WILL ELIMINATE THE NEED FOR THE AGENCY TO
HOLD PUBLIC HEARINGS, PREPARE A SMALL BUSINESS ECONOMIC IMPACT STATEMENT, OR
PROVIDE RESPONSES TO THE CRITERIA FOR A SIGNIFICANT LEGISLATIVE RULE. IF YOU
OBJECT TO THIS RULE BEING ADOPTED USING THE EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING PROCESS, YOU
MUST EXPRESS YOUR OBJECTIONS IN WRITING AND THEY MUST BE SENT TO (INSERT NAME
AND ADDRESS) AND RECEIVED BY (INSERT DATE).

(3)
The agency shall send a copy of the notice of the proposed expedited rule
making to any person who has requested notification of proposals for the
expedited adoption of rules or of agency rule making, as well as the ((joint
administrative rules review committee)) legislature, within three
days after its publication in the Washington State Register. An agency may
charge for the actual cost of providing a requesting party mailed copies of
these notices. The notice of the proposed expedited rule making must be
preceded by a statement substantially in the form provided in subsection (2) of
this section. The notice must also include an explanation of the reasons the
agency believes the expedited adoption of the rule is appropriate.

(4)
The code reviser shall publish the text of all rules proposed for expedited
adoption along with the notice required in this section in a separate section
of the Washington State Register. Once the text of the proposed rules has been
published in the Washington State Register, the only changes that an agency may
make in the text of these proposed rules before their final adoption are to
correct typographical errors.

(5)
Any person may file a written objection to the expedited adoption of a rule.
The objection must be filed with the agency rules coordinator within forty-five
days after the notice of the proposed expedited rule making has been published
in the Washington State Register. A person who has filed a written objection
to the expedited adoption of a rule may withdraw the objection.

(6)
If no written objections to the expedited adoption of a rule are filed with the
agency within forty-five days after the notice of proposed expedited rule
making is published, or if all objections that have been filed are withdrawn by
the persons filing the objections, the agency may enter an order adopting the
rule without further notice or a public hearing. The order must be published
in the manner required by this chapter for any other agency order adopting,
amending, or repealing a rule.

(7)
If a written notice of objection to the expedited adoption of the rule is
timely filed with the agency and is not withdrawn, the notice of proposed
expedited rule making published under this section is considered a statement of
inquiry for the purposes of RCW 34.05.310, and the agency may initiate further
rule adoption proceedings in accordance with this chapter.

(8)
This section expires December 31, 2000.

Sec.
15. RCW
34.05.534 and 1997 c 409 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person may file a petition for judicial review under this chapter only after
exhausting all administrative remedies available within the agency whose action
is being challenged, or available within any other agency authorized to
exercise administrative review, except:

(1)
A petitioner for judicial review of a rule need not have participated in the
rule-making proceeding upon which that rule is based, have petitioned for its
amendment or repeal, ((have petitioned the joint administrative rules review
committee for its review,)) or have appealed a petition for amendment or
repeal to the governor;

(2)
A petitioner for judicial review need not exhaust administrative remedies to
the extent that this chapter or any other statute states that exhaustion is not
required; or

(3)
The court may relieve a petitioner of the requirement to exhaust any or all
administrative remedies upon a showing that:

(a)
The remedies would be patently inadequate;

(b)
The exhaustion of remedies would be futile; or

(c)
The grave irreparable harm that would result from having to exhaust
administrative remedies would clearly outweigh the public policy requiring
exhaustion of administrative remedies.

Sec.
16. RCW
42.40.010 and 1995 c 403 s 508 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the policy of the legislature that employees should be encouraged to
disclose, to the extent not expressly prohibited by law, improper governmental
actions, and it is the intent of the legislature to protect the rights of state
employees making these disclosures. It is also the policy of the legislature
that employees should be encouraged to identify rules warranting review ((or
provide information to the rules review committee)), and it is the intent
of the legislature to protect the rights of these employees.

Sec.
17. RCW
42.40.020 and 1999 c 361 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Auditor" means the office of the state auditor.

(2)
"Employee" means any individual employed or holding office in any
department or agency of state government.

(3)
"Good faith" means a reasonable basis in fact for the communication.
"Good faith" is lacking when the employee knows or reasonably ought
to know that the report is malicious, false, or frivolous.

(4)
"Gross waste of funds" means to spend or use funds or to allow funds
to be used without valuable result in a manner grossly deviating from the
standard of care or competence that a reasonable person would observe in the
same situation.

(5)(a)
"Improper governmental action" means any action by an employee
undertaken in the performance of the employee's official duties:

(i)
Which is (([a])) a gross waste of public funds or resources as
defined in this section;

(ii)
Which is in violation of federal or state law or rule, if the violation is not
merely technical or of a minimum nature; or

(iii)
Which is of substantial and specific danger to the public health or safety.

(b)
"Improper governmental action" does not include personnel actions,
for which other remedies exist, including but not limited to employee
grievances, complaints, appointments, promotions, transfers, assignments,
reassignments, reinstatements, restorations, reemployments, performance
evaluations, reductions in pay, dismissals, suspensions, demotions, violations
of the state civil service law, alleged labor agreement violations, reprimands,
claims of discriminatory treatment, or any action which may be taken under
chapter 41.06 RCW, or other disciplinary action except as provided in RCW
42.40.030.

(6)
"Substantial and specific danger" means a risk of serious injury,
illness, peril, or loss, to which the exposure of the public is a gross
deviation from the standard of care or competence which a reasonable person
would observe in the same situation.

(7)
"Use of official authority or influence" includes taking, directing
others to take, recommending, processing, or approving any personnel action
such as an appointment, promotion, transfer, assignment, reassignment,
reinstatement, restoration, reemployment, performance evaluation, or any
adverse action under chapter 41.06 RCW, or other disciplinary action.

(8)
"Whistleblower" means an employee who in good faith reports alleged
improper governmental action to the auditor, initiating an investigation under
RCW 42.40.040. For purposes of the provisions of this chapter and chapter
49.60 RCW relating to reprisals and retaliatory action, the term
"whistleblower" also means: (a) An employee who in good faith
provides information to the auditor in connection with an investigation under
RCW 42.40.040 and an employee who is believed to have reported asserted
improper governmental action to the auditor or to have provided information to
the auditor in connection with an investigation under RCW 42.40.040 but who, in
fact, has not reported such action or provided such information; or (b) an
employee who in good faith identifies rules warranting review ((or provides
information to the rules review committee)), and an employee who is
believed to have identified rules warranting review ((or provided
information to the rules review committee)) but who, in fact, has not done
so.

Sec.
18. RCW
42.40.030 and 1995 c 403 s 510 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An employee shall not directly or indirectly use or attempt to use the
employee's official authority or influence for the purpose of intimidating,
threatening, coercing, commanding, influencing, or attempting to intimidate,
threaten, coerce, command, or influence any individual for the purpose of
interfering with the right of the individual to: (a) Disclose to the auditor
(or representative thereof) information concerning improper governmental
action; or (b) identify rules warranting review ((or provide information to
the rules review committee)).

(2)
Nothing in this section authorizes an individual to disclose information
otherwise prohibited by law.

Sec.
19. RCW
43.31.086 and 1994 c 249 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

To
assist state agencies in reducing regulatory costs to small business and to
promote greater public participation in the rule-making process, the ((business
assistance center)) department of community, trade, and economic
development shall:

(1)
Develop agency guidelines for the preparation of a small business economic
impact statement and compliance with chapter 19.85 RCW;

(2)
Review and provide comments to agencies on draft or final small business
economic impact statements;

(3)
((Advise the joint administrative rules review committee on whether an
agency reasonably assessed the costs of a proposed rule and reduced the costs
for small business as required by chapter 19.85 RCW; and

(4)))
Organize and chair a state rules coordinating committee, consisting of agency
rules coordinators and interested members of the public, to develop an
education and training program that includes, among other components, a
component that addresses voluntary compliance, for agency personnel responsible
for rule development and implementation. The ((business assistance center))
department of community, trade, and economic development shall submit
recommendations to the department of personnel for an administrative procedures
training program that is based on the sharing of interagency resources.

Sec.
20. RCW
43.180.110 and 1983 c 161 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall submit the initial policies adopted under RCW 43.180.090 and
43.180.100 to the chief clerk of the house and the secretary of the senate for
transmittal to and review by the appropriate standing committees ((and the
joint administrative rules review committee)). By January 1, 1984,
the commission shall have adopted policies in the form of rules ((and
regulations)) under chapter 34.05 RCW. Such rules ((and regulations))
may only be changed or revised in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
34.05.610 (Joint administrative rules review
committee--Members--Appointment--Terms--Vacancies) and 1998 c 280 s 9, 1996 c
318 s 2, 1988 c 288 s 601, 1983 c 53 s 1, & 1981 c 324 s 5;

(2) RCW 34.05.620
(Review of proposed rules--Notice) and 1996 c 318 s 3, 1994 c 249 s 17, 1988 c
288 s 602, 1987 c 451 s 1, & 1981 c 324 s 6;

(3) RCW
34.05.630 (Review of existing rules--Policy and interpretive
statements, etc.--Notice--Hearing) and 1998 c 21 s 1, 1996 c 318 s 4, 1994 c
249 s 18, 1993 c 277 s 1, 1988 c 288 s 603, 1987 c 451 s 2, & 1981 c 324 s
7;

(4) RCW
34.05.640 (Committee objections to agency intended
action--Statement in register and WAC--Suspension of rule) and 1998 c 21 s 2,
1996 c 318 s 5, 1994 c 249 s 19, 1993 c 277 s 2, 1988 c 288 s 604, 1987 c 451 s
3, & 1981 c 324 s 8;

(5) RCW
34.05.650 (Recommendations by committee to legislature) and 1988
c 288 s 605, 1987 c 451 s 4, & 1981 c 324 s 9;

(6) RCW
34.05.655 (Petition for review) and 1998 c 21 s 3, 1996 c 318 s
7, & 1995 c 403 s 502;

(7) RCW
34.05.660 (Review and objection procedures--No presumption
established) and 1988 c 288 s 606 & 1981 c 324 s 10;

(8) RCW
34.05.665 (Submission of rule for review--State employees
protected) and 1995 c 403 s 503;

(9) RCW
34.05.671 (Reports--Advisory boards--Staff) and 1995 c 403 s 505;

(10) RCW
34.05.675 (Inspection of properties--Oaths, subpoenas, witnesses,
depositions) and 1995 c 403 s 506; and

(11) RCW 34.05.681
(Enforcement--Committee subpoena--Refusal to testify) and 1995 c 403 s 507.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22. Part
headings used in this act are not part of the law.

---
END ---