BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
All public schools must install and maintain on any computer, that permits
access to the internet or the world-wide web and that is available for use by a
student, a technology that filters or blocks access to matter that is harmful
to minors.

(2)
The school shall make available to all parents information about the filtering or
blocking technology that is installed on computers that permit access to the
internet or the world-wide web and the types of sites the technology filters or
blocks.

(3)
A public school that complies with this section is not liable for damages that
may arise from a student gaining access to matter that is harmful to minors
through the use of a school computer that permits access to the internet or the
world-wide web.

(4)
As used in this section, "harmful to minors" means any matter or live
performance that:

(a)
The average adult person, applying contemporary community standards, would
find, when considered as a whole, appeals to the prurient interest of minors;

(b)
Explicitly depicts or describes, by prevailing standards in the adult community
with respect to what is suitable for minors, patently offensive representations
or descriptions of:

(i)
Ultimate sexual acts, normal or perverted, actual or simulated;

(ii)
Masturbation, fellatio, cunnilingus, bestiality, excretory functions, lewd
exhibition of the genitals or genital area, sexually explicit conduct, sexual
excitement, or sexually explicit nudity; or

(iii)
Sexual acts that are violent or destructive, including but not limited to human
or animal mutilation, dismemberment, rape, or torture; and

(c)
When considered as a whole, and in the context in which it is used, lacks
serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value for minors.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 27.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
All public libraries must install and maintain on any computer, that permits
access to the internet or the world-wide web and is available for use by the
public, a technology that filters or blocks access to matter that is harmful to
minors. Upon request of an adult library patron, the library shall temporarily
disable the filtering or blocking technology to enable the adult patron to gain
unfiltered access to the internet or the world-wide web.

(2)
The library shall make available to any library patron information on the
filtering or blocking technology that is installed on any computer that permits
access to the internet or the world-wide web and the types of sites the
technology filters or blocks.

(3)
A library that complies with this section is not liable for damages that may
arise from a minor gaining access to matter that is harmful to minors through
the use of a library computer that permits access to the internet or the
world-wide web.

(4)
As used in this section, "harmful to minors" means any matter or live
performance that:

(a)
The average adult person, applying contemporary community standards, would
find, when considered as a whole, appeals to the prurient interest of minors;

(b)
Explicitly depicts or describes, by prevailing standards in the adult community
with respect to what is suitable for minors, patently offensive representations
or descriptions of:

(i)
Ultimate sexual acts, normal or perverted, actual or simulated;

(ii)
Masturbation, fellatio, cunnilingus, bestiality, excretory functions, lewd
exhibition of the genitals or genital area, sexually explicit conduct, sexual
excitement, or sexually explicit nudity; or

(iii)
Sexual acts that are violent or destructive, including but not limited to human
or animal mutilation, dismemberment, rape, or torture; and

(c) When considered as a whole, and in the context in which it is
used, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value for
minors.

---
END ---