BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.68.130 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 156 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful display of sexually explicit material if he
knowingly exhibits such material on a viewing screen so that the sexually
explicit material is easily visible from a public thoroughfare, park, or
playground or from one or more family dwelling units.

(2)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Public thoroughfare" includes, but is not limited to, exterior and
interior walkways, aisles, or other routes of ingress and egress used by the
public;

(b)
"Sexually explicit material" ((as that term is used in this
section)) means any pictorial material displaying direct physical
stimulation of unclothed genitals, masturbation, sodomy (i.e. bestiality or
oral or anal intercourse), flagellation or torture in the context of a sexual
relationship, or emphasizing the depiction of adult human genitals: PROVIDED
HOWEVER, That works of art or of anthropological significance shall not be
deemed to be within the foregoing definition.

(3) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor.

---
END ---