BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
provisions of this chapter establish a minimum set of standards applicable to
all superior court cases where the court appoints a guardian ad litem or any
person to represent the best interest of a child, an alleged incapacitated
person, or an adjudicated incapacitated person pursuant to Title 11, 13, or 26
RCW. In addition to the rights, responsibilities, and duties of a guardian ad
litem under this chapter, a guardian ad litem shall comply with the applicable
provisions of Titles 11, 13, and 26 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Court" means any superior court in the state of Washington and all
divisions thereof.

(2)
"Guardian ad litem" means any person or program appointed in an
action under Title 11, 13, or 26 RCW to represent or assist the court in
determining the best interest of a child, an alleged incapacitated person, or
an adjudicated incapacitated person. "Guardian ad litem" shall not
include an attorney appointed to represent a party.

(3)
"Judge" means a judicial officer of the superior court, including
commissioners and judges pro tempore.

(4)
"Registry" means the list of people authorized by the court to serve
as guardians ad litem or court-appointed special advocate programs authorized
by RCW 26.12.175.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Consistent with the responsibilities set forth in Titles 11, 13, and 26 RCW and
other applicable statutes and rules of court, in every case in which a guardian
ad litem is appointed, the guardian ad litem shall perform the responsibilities
set forth in this section.

(1)
A guardian ad litem shall represent the best interests of the person for whom
he or she is appointed. Representation of best interests may be inconsistent
with the wishes of the person whose interest the guardian ad litem represents.
The guardian ad litem shall not advocate on behalf of or advise any party so as
to create in the mind of a reasonable person the appearance of representing
that party.

(2)
A guardian ad litem shall maintain independence, objectivity, and the
appearance of fairness in dealings with parties and professionals, both in and
out of the courtroom.

(3)
A guardian ad litem shall maintain the ethical principles of the rules of
conduct set forth in these rules and is subject to discipline under local rules
established pursuant to section 7 of this act for any violation.

(4)
Unless excepted by statute or court rule, a guardian ad litem shall satisfy all
training requirements and continuing education requirements set by the
administrator for the courts under RCW 2.56.030 and maintain qualifications to
serve as guardian ad litem in every county where the guardian ad litem is
listed on the registry for that county and in which the guardian ad litem
serves and shall promptly advise each such court of any grounds for
disqualification or unavailability to serve.

(5)
A guardian ad litem shall avoid any actual or apparent conflict of interest or
impropriety in the performance of guardian ad litem responsibilities. A
guardian ad litem shall avoid self-dealing or association from which a guardian
ad litem might directly or indirectly benefit, other than for compensation as guardian
ad litem. A guardian ad litem shall take action immediately to resolve any
potential conflict or impropriety. A guardian ad litem shall advise the court
and the parties of action taken, resign from the matter, or seek court
direction as may be necessary to resolve the conflict or impropriety. A
guardian ad litem shall not accept or maintain appointment if the performance
of the duties of guardian ad litem may be materially limited by the guardian ad
litem's responsibilities to another client or a third person, or by the
guardian ad litem's own interests.

(6)
A guardian ad litem is an officer of the court and as such shall at all times
treat the parties with respect, courtesy, fairness, and good faith.

(7)
A guardian ad litem shall make reasonable efforts to become informed about the
facts of the case and to contact all parties. A guardian ad litem shall
examine material information and sources of information, taking into account
the positions of the parties.

(8)
A guardian ad litem shall not require any evaluations or tests of the parties
except as authorized by statute or court order issued following notice and
opportunity to be heard.

(9)
A guardian ad litem shall file a written report with the court and the parties
as required by law or court order or in any event not later than ten days prior
to a hearing for which a report is required. The report shall be accompanied
by a written list of persons interviewed and documents considered or called to
the attention of the guardian ad litem during the course of the investigation.

(10)
A guardian ad litem shall comply with the court's instructions as set out in
the order appointing a guardian ad litem, and shall not provide or require
services beyond the scope of the court's instruction unless by motion and on
adequate notice to the parties, a guardian ad litem obtains additional
instruction, clarification, or expansion of the scope of such appointment.

(11)
A guardian ad litem shall identify himself or herself as a guardian ad litem
when contacting individuals in the course of a particular case and inform
individuals contacted in a particular case about the role of a guardian ad
litem in the case at the earliest practicable time. A guardian ad litem shall
advise information sources that the documents and information obtained may
become part of court proceedings.

(12)
The guardian ad litem shall be given notice of all hearings and proceedings. A
guardian ad litem shall appear in person or by videoconferencing at any hearing
for which the duties of a guardian ad litem or any issues substantially within
a guardian ad litem's duties and scope of appointment are to be addressed.

(13)
A guardian ad litem shall not have ex parte communications concerning the case
with the judge or judges involved in the matter except as permitted by statute
or by court rule.

(14)
A guardian ad litem shall make no disclosures about the case or the
investigation except in reports to the court or as necessary to perform the
duties of a guardian ad litem. A guardian ad litem shall maintain the
confidential nature of identifiers or addresses where there are allegations of
domestic violence or risk to a party's or child's safety. The guardian ad
litem may recommend that the court seal the report or a portion of the report
of the guardian ad litem to preserve the privacy, confidentiality, or safety of
the parties or the person for whom the guardian ad litem was appointed.

(15)
A guardian ad litem shall perform responsibilities in a prompt and timely
manner, and, if necessary, request timely court reviews and judicial
intervention in writing with notice to parties or affected agencies.

(16)
A guardian ad litem shall throughout the case maintain documentation to
substantiate recommendations and conclusions and shall keep records of actions
taken by the guardian ad litem. Except as prohibited or protected by law, and
consistent with subsection (14) of this section, this information shall be made
available for review on written request of a party or request of the court.

(17)
A guardian ad litem shall keep accurate records of the time spent, services
rendered, and expenses incurred in each case and file an itemized statement and
accounting with the court and provide a copy to each party or other entity
responsible for payment. The court may make any provision for fees and
expenses in the order appointing guardian ad litem or in any subsequent order.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. As an
officer of the court, a guardian ad litem has only such authority conferred by
the order of appointment. Consistent with the roles and responsibilities set
forth in section 3 of this act, a guardian ad litem has the following
authority:

(1)
Unless circumstances warrant otherwise, a guardian ad litem shall have access
to the persons for whom a guardian ad litem is appointed and to all information
relevant to the issues for which a guardian ad litem was appointed. The access
of a guardian ad litem to the child or alleged incapacitated person and all
relevant information shall not be unduly restricted by any person or agency.

(2)
A guardian ad litem shall be timely furnished copies of all pleadings,
documents, and reports by the party that served or submitted them.

(3)
A guardian ad litem shall be timely notified of all court hearings,
administrative reviews, staffings, investigations, dispositions, and other
proceedings concerning the case by the person or agency scheduling the
proceeding.

(4)
A guardian ad litem shall be given notice of, and an opportunity to review,
approve, or make recommendations regarding any proposed agreed order of the
parties governing issues substantially related to the duties of a guardian ad
litem.

(5)
Consistent with section 3(12) of this act, a guardian ad litem shall
participate in court hearings through submission of written and supplemental
oral reports and as otherwise authorized by statute and court rule.

(6)
Except as limited by law or unless good cause is shown to the court, upon
receiving a copy of the order appointing a guardian ad litem, any person or
agency, including but not limited to any hospital, school, child care provider,
organization, department of social and health services, doctor, health care
provider, mental health provider, chemical health program, psychologist,
psychiatrist, or law enforcement agency, shall permit a guardian ad litem to
inspect and copy any and all records and interview personnel relating to the
proceeding for which a guardian ad litem is appointed.

(7)
Within the scope of appointment, a guardian ad litem shall have access to all
superior court and all juvenile court files. Access to sealed or confidential
files shall be by separate order. A guardian ad litem's report shall inform
the court and parties if the report contains information from sealed or
confidential files. The clerk of the court shall provide certified copies of
the order of appointment to a guardian ad litem upon request and without
charge.

(8)
In every case in which a guardian ad litem is a party to the case pursuant to
chapter 13.34 or 26.26 RCW, a guardian ad litem has the rights and powers set
forth below. These rights and powers are subject to all applicable statutes
and court rules.

(a)
A guardian ad litem has the right to file pleadings, motions, notices,
memoranda, briefs, and other documents, and conduct and respond to discovery,
on behalf of the person for whom the guardian ad litem was appointed. A
guardian ad litem may exercise these rights on his or her own or may seek the
appointment of an attorney to act on his or her behalf.

(b)
A guardian ad litem has the right to note motions and request hearings before
the court as appropriate to the best interests of the person for whom the
guardian ad litem was appointed.

(c)
A guardian ad litem has the right to introduce exhibits, subpoena witnesses,
conduct direct and cross-examination of witnesses, and appeal the decision of
the court.

(d)
A guardian ad litem has the right to fully participate in the proceedings
through oral arguments and submission of written reports.

(9)
For good cause shown, a guardian ad litem may petition the court for additional
authority as specified in section 3(10) of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Each
court shall develop a system of appointing and reasonably compensating
guardians ad litem which ensures an equitable distribution of the work load
among the guardians ad litem on the registry. The rules shall provide a
procedure to timely address complaints made by any guardian ad litem regarding
registry or appointment matters.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This
section applies to situations where the court wishes to appoint a person in
addition to, or instead of, a guardian ad litem to fulfill very limited roles.
A person appointed pursuant to this section is strictly limited to the duties
of the specified role for which he or she is appointed. If the order of appointment
does not specifically designate a limited appointment as listed below, the
person appointed is presumed to be a guardian ad litem, subject to the
provisions of this chapter. The court may make the following limited
appointments:

(1)
Mediator. The court may either appoint or refer to a person or agency whose
role is to assist the parties in reaching an agreement about any or all
contested issues in the case.

(2)
Evaluator. The court may appoint or refer to a person or agency for evaluation
and findings regarding a specific issue or issues including but not limited to
mental health, substance abuse, issues of abuse or neglect, cultural factors,
and sexual deviancy.

(3)
Visitation supervisor. The court may appoint or refer to a person or agency to
supervise visits and report findings to the court.

(4)
Parent appointed for minor parent. The court may appoint a parent to serve as
a guardian ad litem for a minor parent in a parentage action.

(5)
Settlement of minors' claims. The court may appoint a person for the limited
purpose of evaluating a proposed settlement of a minor's or incapacitated
person's claim as provided in court rule.

(6)
Other. Under exceptional circumstances, upon good cause shown, the court may
make other limited appointments as it deems necessary.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Each
court shall adopt rules establishing and governing procedures for filing,
investigating, and adjudicating grievances made by or against guardians ad
litem under Titles 11, 13, and 26 RCW. The rules shall, at a minimum, comply
with and address the following:

(1)
The rules shall be clear, concise, and easily understood by both attorneys and
nonattorneys.

(2)
The rules shall establish separate procedures addressing grievances or
complaints filed during the pendency of a case, and grievances or complaints
filed subsequent to the conclusion of a case.

(3)
The rules shall establish procedures providing for fair treatment of grievances
including appearance-of-fairness and conflict issues.

(4)
Where applicable, local rules shall accommodate the grievance procedures of
court-appointed special advocate or other volunteer programs.

(5)
The rules shall provide for confidentiality of complaints until merit has been
found.

(6)
The rules shall provide a procedure for any guardian ad litem who is the
subject of a complaint to respond to the complaint.

(7)
The rules shall include a time limit during which a complaint must be
resolved. The limit shall not be longer than twenty-five days for complaints
filed while a case is pending or sixty days for complaints filed subsequent to
the conclusion of a case.

(8)
For its own reference purposes, the court shall maintain a record of grievances
filed and of any sanctions issued pursuant to local court grievance procedure.

(9)
When a guardian ad litem is removed from a county's registry pursuant to the
disposition of a grievance, the court of that county shall send notice of such
removal to the office of the administrator for the courts, who shall on a
regular basis, but not less than biannually, forward the information to the
superior courts of each county in the state of Washington.

Sec.
8. RCW
2.56.030 and 1997 c 41 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
administrator for the courts shall, under the supervision and direction of the
chief justice:

(1)
Examine the administrative methods and systems employed in the offices of the
judges, clerks, stenographers, and employees of the courts and make
recommendations, through the chief justice, for the improvement of the same;

(2)
Examine the state of the dockets of the courts and determine the need for
assistance by any court;

(3)
Make recommendations to the chief justice relating to the assignment of judges
where courts are in need of assistance and carry out the direction of the chief
justice as to the assignments of judges to counties and districts where the
courts are in need of assistance;

(4)
Collect and compile statistical and other data and make reports of the business
transacted by the courts and transmit the same to the chief justice to the end
that proper action may be taken in respect thereto;

(5)
Prepare and submit budget estimates of state appropriations necessary for the
maintenance and operation of the judicial system and make recommendations in
respect thereto;

(6)
Collect statistical and other data and make reports relating to the expenditure
of public moneys, state and local, for the maintenance and operation of the
judicial system and the offices connected therewith;

(7)
Obtain reports from clerks of courts in accordance with law or rules adopted by
the supreme court of this state on cases and other judicial business in which
action has been delayed beyond periods of time specified by law or rules of
court and make report thereof to supreme court of this state;

(8)
Act as secretary of the judicial conference referred to in RCW 2.56.060;

(9)
Submit annually, as of February 1st, to the chief justice, a report of the
activities of the administrator's office for the preceding calendar year
including activities related to courthouse security;

(10)
Administer programs and standards for the training and education of judicial
personnel;

(11)
Examine the need for new superior court and district judge positions under a
weighted caseload analysis that takes into account the time required to hear
all the cases in a particular court and the amount of time existing judges have
available to hear cases in that court. The results of the weighted caseload
analysis shall be reviewed by the board for judicial administration which shall
make recommendations to the legislature. It is the intent of the legislature
that weighted caseload analysis become the basis for creating additional
district court positions, and recommendations should address that objective;

(12)
Provide staff to the judicial retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW;

(13)
Attend to such other matters as may be assigned by the supreme court of this
state;

(14)
Within available funds, develop a curriculum for a general understanding of
child development, placement, and treatment resources, as well as specific
legal skills and knowledge of relevant statutes including chapters 13.32A,
13.34, and 13.40 RCW, cases, court rules, interviewing skills, and special
needs of the abused or neglected child. This curriculum shall be completed and
made available to all juvenile court judges, court personnel, and service
providers and be updated yearly to reflect changes in statutes, court rules, or
case law;

(15)
Develop, in consultation with the entities set forth in RCW 2.56.150(3), a
comprehensive state-wide curriculum for persons who act as guardians ad litem
under Title 13 or 26 RCW. The curriculum shall be made available July 1, 1997,
and include specialty sections on child development, child sexual abuse, child
physical abuse, child neglect, clinical and forensic investigative and interviewing
techniques, family reconciliation and mediation services, and relevant
statutory and legal requirements. The curriculum shall be made available to
all superior court judges, court personnel, and all persons who act as
guardians ad litem;

(16)
Develop a curriculum for a general understanding of crimes of malicious
harassment, as well as specific legal skills and knowledge of RCW 9A.36.080,
relevant cases, court rules, and the special needs of malicious harassment
victims. This curriculum shall be made available to all superior court and
court of appeals judges and to all justices of the supreme court;

(17)
Develop, in consultation with the criminal justice training commission and the
commissions established under chapters 43.113, 43.115, and 43.117 RCW, a
curriculum for a general understanding of ethnic and cultural diversity and its
implications for working with youth of color and their families. The
curriculum shall be available to all superior court judges and court
commissioners assigned to juvenile court, and other court personnel. Ethnic
and cultural diversity training shall be provided annually so as to incorporate
cultural sensitivity and awareness into the daily operation of juvenile courts
state-wide;

(18)
Authorize the use of closed circuit television and other electronic equipment
in judicial proceedings. The administrator shall promulgate necessary
standards and procedures and shall provide technical assistance to courts as
required;

(19)(a)
Maintain a list of guardians ad litem, and investigators under RCW 26.09.220,
appointed pursuant to Titles 11, 13, and 26 RCW who have been removed from a
case for failure to perform his or her duties. The list shall include the
county and cause number of the case from which the guardian ad litem or investigator
was removed. Superior courts shall report to the administrator for the courts
any order removing a guardian ad litem from a case;

(b)
Maintain a list of guardians ad litem, and investigators under RCW 26.09.220,
appointed pursuant to Title 11, 13, or 26 RCW who have been ordered removed
from a guardian ad litem registry. Superior courts shall report to the
administrator for the courts any order removing a guardian ad litem or
investigator from a registry.

Sec.
9. RCW
11.88.090 and 1999 c 360 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Nothing contained in RCW 11.88.080 through 11.88.120, 11.92.010 through
11.92.040, 11.92.060 through 11.92.120, 11.92.170, and 11.92.180 shall affect
or impair the power of any court to appoint a guardian ad litem to defend the
interests of any incapacitated person interested in any suit or matter pending
therein, or to commence and prosecute any suit in his or her behalf. Unless
inconsistent with a provision of this section, a guardian ad litem appointed
under this section is subject to the standards applicable to guardians ad litem
in general under sections 1 through 7 of this act.

(2)
Prior to the appointment of a guardian or a limited guardian, whenever it
appears that the incapacitated person or incapacitated person's estate could
benefit from mediation and such mediation would likely result in overall
reduced costs to the estate, upon the motion of the alleged incapacitated
person or the guardian ad litem, or subsequent to such appointment, whenever it
appears that the incapacitated person or incapacitated person's estate could
benefit from mediation and such mediation would likely result in overall
reduced costs to the estate, upon the motion of any interested person, the court
may:

(a)
Require any party or other person subject to the jurisdiction of the court to
participate in mediation;

(b)
Establish the terms of the mediation; and

(c)
Allocate the cost of the mediation pursuant to RCW 11.96.140.

(3)
Upon receipt of a petition for appointment of guardian or limited guardian,
except as provided herein, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to
represent the best interests of the alleged incapacitated person, who shall be
a person found or known by the court to:

(a)
Be free of influence from anyone interested in the result of the proceeding;
and

(b)
Have the requisite knowledge, training, or expertise to perform the duties
required by this section.

The
guardian ad litem shall within five days of receipt of notice of appointment
file with the court and serve, either personally or by certified mail with
return receipt, each party with a statement including: His or her training
relating to the duties as a guardian ad litem; his or her criminal history as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030 for the period covering ten years prior to the
appointment; his or her hourly rate, if compensated; whether the guardian ad
litem has had any contact with a party to the proceeding prior to his or her
appointment; and whether he or she has an apparent conflict of interest.
Within three days of the later of the actual service or filing of the guardian
ad litem's statement, any party may set a hearing and file and serve a motion
for an order to show cause why the guardian ad litem should not be removed for
one of the following three reasons: (i) Lack of expertise necessary for the
proceeding; (ii) an hourly rate higher than what is reasonable for the
particular proceeding; or (iii) a conflict of interest. Notice of the hearing
shall be provided to the guardian ad litem and all parties. If, after a
hearing, the court enters an order replacing the guardian ad litem, findings
shall be included, expressly stating the reasons for the removal. If the
guardian ad litem is not removed, the court has the authority to assess to the
moving party, attorneys' fees and costs related to the motion. The court shall
assess attorneys' fees and costs for frivolous motions.

No
guardian ad litem need be appointed when a parent is petitioning for a guardian
or a limited guardian to be appointed for his or her minor child and the
minority of the child, as defined by RCW 11.92.010, is the sole basis of the
petition. The order appointing the guardian ad litem shall recite the duties
set forth in subsection (5) of this section. The appointment of a guardian ad
litem shall have no effect on the legal competency of the alleged incapacitated
person and shall not overcome the presumption of competency or full legal and
civil rights of the alleged incapacitated person.

(4)(a)
The superior court of each county shall develop and maintain a registry of
persons who are willing and qualified to serve as guardians ad litem in
guardianship matters. The court shall choose as guardian ad litem a person
whose name appears on the registry in a system of consistent rotation, except
in extraordinary circumstances such as the need for particular expertise. The
court shall develop procedures for periodic review of the persons on the
registry and for probation, suspension, or removal of persons on the registry
for failure to perform properly their duties as guardian ad litem. In the
event the court does not select the person next on the list, it shall include
in the order of appointment a written reason for its decision.

(b)
To be eligible for the registry a person shall:

(i)
Present a written statement outlining his or her background and
qualifications. The background statement shall include, but is not limited to,
the following information:

(A)
Level of formal education;

(B)
Training related to the guardian ad litem's duties;

(C)
Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;

(D)
Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the county or counties of
appointment;

(E)
Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; ((and))

(F)
Evidence of the person's knowledge, training, and experience in each of the
following: Needs of impaired elderly people, physical disabilities, mental
illness, developmental disabilities, and other areas relevant to the needs of
incapacitated persons, legal procedure, and the requirements of chapters 11.88
and 11.92 RCW((.

The
written statement of qualifications shall include a statement of the));
and

(G)
Number of times and counties where the guardian ad litem has been
removed from a case for failure to perform his or her duties as guardian
ad litem and the number of times and counties where the guardian ad litem
has been ordered removed from a guardian ad litem registry; and

(ii)
Complete the model training program as described in (d) of this subsection.

(c)
The background and qualification information shall be updated annually.

(d)
The department of social and health services shall convene an advisory group to
develop a model guardian ad litem training program and shall update the program
biennially. The advisory group shall consist of representatives from consumer,
advocacy, and professional groups knowledgeable in developmental disabilities,
neurological impairment, physical disabilities, mental illness, aging, legal,
court administration, the Washington state bar association, and other
interested parties.

(e)
The superior court shall require utilization of the model program developed by
the advisory group as described in (d) of this subsection, to assure that
candidates applying for registration as a qualified guardian ad litem shall
have satisfactorily completed training to attain these essential minimum
qualifications to act as guardian ad litem.

(5)
The guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to this section shall have the
following duties:

(a)
To meet and consult with the alleged incapacitated person as soon as
practicable following appointment and explain, in language which such person
can reasonably be expected to understand, the substance of the petition, the
nature of the resultant proceedings, the person's right to contest the
petition, the identification of the proposed guardian or limited guardian, the
right to a jury trial on the issue of his or her alleged incapacity, the right
to independent legal counsel as provided by RCW 11.88.045, and the right to be
present in court at the hearing on the petition;

(b)
To obtain a written report according to RCW 11.88.045; and such other written
or oral reports from other qualified professionals as are necessary to permit
the guardian ad litem to complete the report required by this section;

(c)
To meet with the person whose appointment is sought as guardian or limited
guardian and ascertain:

(i)
The proposed guardian's knowledge of the duties, requirements, and limitations
of a guardian; and

(ii)
The steps the proposed guardian intends to take or has taken to identify and
meet the needs of the alleged incapacitated person;

(d)
To consult as necessary to complete the investigation and report required by
this section with those known relatives, friends, or other persons the guardian
ad litem determines have had a significant, continuing interest in the welfare
of the alleged incapacitated person;

(e)
To investigate alternate arrangements made, or which might be created, by or on
behalf of the alleged incapacitated person, such as revocable or irrevocable
trusts, or durable powers of attorney; whether good cause exists for any such
arrangements to be discontinued; and why such arrangements should not be
continued or created in lieu of a guardianship;

(f)
To provide the court with a written report which shall include the following:

(i)
A description of the nature, cause, and degree of incapacity, and the basis
upon which this judgment was made;

(ii)
A description of the needs of the incapacitated person for care and treatment,
the probable residential requirements of the alleged incapacitated person and
the basis upon which these findings were made;

(iii)
An evaluation of the appropriateness of the guardian or limited guardian whose
appointment is sought and a description of the steps the proposed guardian has
taken or intends to take to identify and meet current and emerging needs of the
incapacitated person;

(iv)
A description of any alternative arrangements previously made by the alleged
incapacitated person or which could be made, and whether and to what extent
such alternatives should be used in lieu of a guardianship, and if the guardian
ad litem is recommending discontinuation of any such arrangements, specific
findings as to why such arrangements are contrary to the best interest of the
alleged incapacitated person;

(v)
A description of the abilities of the alleged incapacitated person and a
recommendation as to whether a guardian or limited guardian should be
appointed. If appointment of a limited guardian is recommended, the guardian
ad litem shall recommend the specific areas of authority the limited guardian
should have and the limitations and disabilities to be placed on the incapacitated
person;

(vi)
An evaluation of the person's mental ability to rationally exercise the right
to vote and the basis upon which the evaluation is made;

(vii)
Any expression of approval or disapproval made by the alleged incapacitated
person concerning the proposed guardian or limited guardian or guardianship or
limited guardianship;

(viii)
Identification of persons with significant interest in the welfare of the
alleged incapacitated person who should be advised of their right to request
special notice of proceedings pursuant to RCW 11.92.150; and

(ix)
Unless independent counsel has appeared for the alleged incapacitated person,
an explanation of how the alleged incapacitated person responded to the advice
of the right to jury trial, to independent counsel and to be present at the
hearing on the petition.

Within
forty-five days after notice of commencement of the guardianship proceeding has
been served upon the guardian ad litem, and at least fifteen days before the
hearing on the petition, unless an extension or reduction of time has been
granted by the court for good cause, the guardian ad litem shall file its
report and send a copy to the alleged incapacitated person and his or her
counsel, spouse, all children not residing with a notified person, those
persons described in (f)(viii) of this subsection, and persons who have filed a
request for special notice pursuant to RCW 11.92.150. The report shall
include a written list of all persons interviewed and all reports or
documentation considered. If the guardian ad litem needs additional time
to finalize his or her report, then the guardian ad litem shall petition the
court for a postponement of the hearing or, with the consent of all other
parties, an extension or reduction of time for filing the report. If the
hearing does not occur within sixty days of filing the petition, then upon the
two-month anniversary of filing the petition and on or before the same day of
each following month until the hearing, the guardian ad litem shall file
interim reports summarizing his or her activities on the proceeding during that
time period as well as fees and costs incurred;

(g)
To advise the court of the need for appointment of counsel for the alleged
incapacitated person within five court days after the meeting described in (a)
of this subsection unless (i) counsel has appeared, (ii) the alleged
incapacitated person affirmatively communicated a wish not to be represented by
counsel after being advised of the right to representation and of the
conditions under which court-provided counsel may be available, or (iii) the
alleged incapacitated person was unable to communicate at all on the subject,
and the guardian ad litem is satisfied that the alleged incapacitated person
does not affirmatively desire to be represented by counsel.

(6)
If the petition is brought by an interested person or entity requesting the
appointment of some other qualified person or entity and a prospective guardian
or limited guardian cannot be found, the court shall order the guardian ad litem
to investigate the availability of a possible guardian or limited guardian and
to include the findings in a report to the court pursuant to subsection (5)(f)
of this section.

(7)
The parties to the proceeding may file responses to the guardian ad litem report
with the court and deliver such responses to the other parties and the guardian
ad litem at any time up to the second day prior to the hearing. If a guardian
ad litem fails to file his or her report in a timely manner, the hearing shall
be continued to give the court and the parties at least fifteen days before the
hearing to review the report. At any time during the proceeding upon motion of
any party or on the court's own motion, the court may remove the guardian ad
litem for failure to perform his or her duties as specified in this chapter,
provided that the guardian ad litem shall have five days' notice of any motion
to remove before the court enters such order. If a guardian ad litem is
removed from a case for failure to perform his or her duties, and the guardian
ad litem has been removed from a previous case for failure to perform his or
her duties, the court shall order the guardian ad litem to be removed from the
guardian ad litem registry until the guardian ad litem has completed the training
program as described in subsection (4)(d) of this section. The court shall
report to the administrator for the courts any order removing a guardian ad
litem from a case or from a registry. In addition, the court in its
discretion may reduce a guardian ad litem's fee for failure to carry out his or
her duties.

(8)
The court appointed guardian ad litem shall have the authority, in the event
that the alleged incapacitated person is in need of emergency life-saving
medical services, and is unable to consent to such medical services due to
incapacity pending the hearing on the petition to give consent for such
emergency life-saving medical services on behalf of the alleged incapacitated
person.

(9)
The court-appointed guardian ad litem shall have the authority to move for
temporary relief under chapter 7.40 RCW to protect the alleged incapacitated
person from abuse, neglect, abandonment, or exploitation, as those terms are
defined in RCW 74.34.020, or to address any other emergency needs of the
alleged incapacitated person. Any alternative arrangement executed before
filing the petition for guardianship shall remain effective unless the court
grants the relief requested under chapter 7.40 RCW, or unless, following notice
and a hearing at which all parties directly affected by the arrangement are
present, the court finds that the alternative arrangement should not remain
effective.

(10)
The guardian ad litem shall receive a fee determined by the court. The fee
shall be charged to the alleged incapacitated person unless the court finds
that such payment would result in substantial hardship upon such person, in
which case the county shall be responsible for such costs: PROVIDED, That if
no guardian or limited guardian is appointed the court may charge such fee to
the petitioner or the alleged incapacitated person, or divide the fee, as it
deems just; and if the petition is found to be frivolous or not brought in good
faith, the guardian ad litem fee shall be charged to the petitioner. The court
shall not be required to provide for the payment of a fee to any salaried
employee of a public agency.

(11)
Upon the presentation of the guardian ad litem report and the entry of an order
either dismissing the petition for appointment of guardian or limited guardian
or appointing a guardian or limited guardian, the guardian ad litem shall be
dismissed and shall have no further duties or obligations unless otherwise
ordered by the court. If the court orders the guardian ad litem to perform
further duties or obligations, they shall not be performed at county expense.

(12)
The guardian ad litem shall appear in person or by videoconferencing at
all hearings on the petition unless all parties provide a written waiver of the
requirement to appear.

(13)
At any hearing the court may consider whether any person who makes decisions
regarding the alleged incapacitated person or estate has breached a statutory
or fiduciary duty.

Sec.
10. RCW
13.34.100 and 1996 c 249 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is the subject of
an action under this chapter, unless a court for good cause finds the
appointment unnecessary. The requirement of a guardian ad litem may be deemed
satisfied if the child is represented by independent counsel in the
proceedings. Unless inconsistent with an applicable provision of this
chapter, a guardian ad litem appointed under this chapter is subject to the
standards applicable to guardians ad litem in general under sections 1 through
7 of this act.

(2)
If the court does not have available to it a guardian ad litem program with a
sufficient number of volunteers, the court may appoint a suitable person to act
as guardian ad litem for the child under this chapter. Another party to the
proceeding or the party's employee or representative shall not be so appointed.

(3)
Each guardian ad litem program shall maintain a background information record
for each guardian ad litem in the program. The background file shall include,
but is not limited to, the following information:

(a)
Level of formal education;

(b)
Training related to the guardian's duties;

(c)
Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;

(d)
Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the county or counties of
appointment; ((and))

(e)
Number of times and counties where the guardian ad litem has been removed
from a case for failure to perform his or her duties and the number of times
and counties where the guardian ad litem has been ordered removed from a
guardian ad litem registry; and

(f)
Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

The
background information report shall be updated annually. As a condition of
appointment, the guardian ad litem's background information record shall be
made available to the court. If the appointed guardian ad litem is not a
member of a guardian ad litem program the person shall provide the background
information to the court.

Upon
appointment, the guardian ad litem, or guardian ad litem program, shall provide
the parties or their attorneys with a statement containing his or her training
relating to the duties as a guardian ad litem and criminal history as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030 for the period covering ten years prior to the appointment.
The background statement shall not include identifying information that may be
used to harm a guardian ad litem, such as home addresses and home telephone
numbers, and for volunteer guardians ad litem the court may allow the use of
maiden names or pseudonyms as necessary for their safety.

(4)
The appointment of the guardian ad litem shall remain in effect until the court
discharges the appointment or no longer has jurisdiction, whichever comes
first. The guardian ad litem may also be discharged upon entry of an order of
guardianship.

(5)
A guardian ad litem through counsel, or as otherwise authorized by the court,
shall have the right to present evidence, examine and cross-examine witnesses,
and to be present at all hearings. A guardian ad litem shall receive copies of
all pleadings and other documents filed or submitted to the court, and notice
of all hearings according to court rules. The guardian ad litem shall receive
all notice contemplated for a parent or other party in all proceedings under
this chapter.

A
guardian ad litem shall be present in person or by videoconferencing at all
hearings at which the duties or responsibilities of the guardian ad litem are
to be addressed or at which any issues within the scope of the guardian ad
litem's duties are to be addressed.

(6)
If the child requests legal counsel and is age twelve or older, or if the
guardian ad litem or the court determines that the child needs to be
independently represented by counsel, the court may appoint an attorney to
represent the child's position.

(7)
For the purposes of child abuse prevention and treatment act (42 U.S.C. Secs.
5101 et seq.) grants to this state under P.L. 93-247, or any related state or
federal legislation, a person appointed pursuant to RCW 13.34.100 shall be
deemed a guardian ad litem to represent the best interests of the minor in
proceedings before the court.

(8) When a court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian
ad litem is requested on a case, the program shall give the court the name of
the person it recommends and the appointment shall be effective immediately.
The court shall appoint the person recommended by the program. If a party in a
case reasonably believes the court-appointed special advocate or volunteer is
inappropriate or unqualified, the party may request a review of the appointment
by the program. The program must complete the review within five judicial days
and remove any appointee for good cause. If the party seeking the review is
not satisfied with the outcome of the review, the party may file a motion with
the court for the removal of the court-appointed special advocate on the
grounds the advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or unqualified.

Sec.
11. RCW
13.34.105 and 1999 c 390 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Unless otherwise directed by the court, the duties of the guardian ad litem
include but are not limited to the following:

(a)
To represent and be an advocate for the best interests of the child;

(b)
To collect relevant information about the child's situation;

(c)
To monitor all court orders for compliance and to bring to the court's
attention any change in circumstances that may require a modification of the
court's order; and

(d)
To report to the court information on the legal status of a child's membership
in any Indian tribe or band.

(2)
The guardian ad litem shall be deemed an officer of the court for the purpose
of immunity from civil liability.

(3)(a)
At any time during a proceeding upon motion of any party or on the court's own
motion, the court may remove a guardian ad litem or court-appointed special
advocate for failure to perform his or her duties, provided that the guardian
ad litem or court-appointed special advocate shall have five days' notice of
any motion to remove before entering such an order.

(b)
If a guardian ad litem is removed from a case for failure to perform his or her
duties, and the guardian ad litem has been removed from a previous case for
failure to perform his or her duties, the court shall order the guardian ad
litem to be removed from the guardian ad litem registry until the guardian ad
litem has completed the training program as provided in RCW 13.34.102. If a
court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem is removed from
a case for failure to perform his or her duties, and the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem has been removed from a
previous case for failure to perform his or her duties, the court-appointed
special advocate program or volunteer guardian ad litem program shall not
recommend the person for appointment to a new case until he or she has
completed the training program approved by the administrator for the courts for
court-appointed special advocates or volunteer guardians ad litem.

(c)
The court shall report to the administrator for the courts any order removing a
guardian ad litem, court-appointed special advocate, or volunteer guardian ad
litem from a case or any order removing a guardian ad litem from a registry.

(4)
Except for information or records specified in RCW 13.50.100(5), the guardian
ad litem shall have access to all information available to the state or agency
on the case. Upon presentation of the order of appointment by the guardian ad
litem, any agency, hospital, school organization, division or department of the
state, doctor, nurse, or other health care provider, psychologist,
psychiatrist, police department, or mental health clinic shall permit the
guardian ad litem to inspect and copy any records relating to the child or
children involved in the case, without the consent of the parent or guardian of
the child, or of the child if the child is under the age of thirteen years,
unless such access is otherwise specifically prohibited by law.

(((4)))
(5) A guardian ad litem may release confidential information, records,
and reports to the office of the family and children's ombudsman for the
purposes of carrying out its duties under chapter 43.06A RCW.

(((5)))
(6) The guardian ad litem shall release case information in accordance
with the provisions of RCW 13.50.100.

Sec.
12. RCW
13.34.120 and 1998 c 328 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
To aid the court in its decision on disposition, a social study, consisting of
a written evaluation of matters relevant to the disposition of the case, shall
be made by the person or agency filing the petition. A parent may submit a
counselor's or health care provider's evaluation of the parent, which shall
either be included in the social study or considered in conjunction with the
social study. The study shall include all social records and may also include
facts relating to the child's cultural heritage, and shall be made available to
the court. The court shall consider the social file, social study, guardian ad
litem report, the court-appointed special advocate's report, if any, and any
reports filed by a party at the disposition hearing in addition to evidence
produced at the fact-finding hearing. At least ten working days before the
disposition hearing, the department shall mail to the parent and his or her
attorney a copy of the agency's social study and proposed service plan, which
shall be in writing or in a form understandable to the parents or custodians.
In addition, the department shall provide an opportunity for parents to review
and comment on the plan at the community service office. If the parents
disagree with the agency's plan or any part thereof, the parents shall submit
to the court at least twenty-four hours before the hearing, in writing, or
signed oral statement, an alternative plan to correct the problems which led to
the finding of dependency. This section shall not interfere with the right of
the parents or custodians to submit oral arguments regarding the disposition
plan at the hearing.

(2)
In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section, a
predisposition study to the court in cases of dependency alleged pursuant to
RCW 13.34.030(4) (b) or (c) shall contain the following information:

(a)
A statement of the specific harm or harms to the child that intervention is
designed to alleviate;

(b)
A description of the specific programs, for both the parents and child, that
are needed in order to prevent serious harm to the child; the reasons why such
programs are likely to be useful; the availability of any proposed services;
and the agency's overall plan for ensuring that the services will be
delivered. The description shall identify services chosen and approved by the
parent;

(c)
If removal is recommended, a full description of the reasons why the child
cannot be protected adequately in the home, including a description of any
previous efforts to work with the parents and the child in the home; the
in-home treatment programs which have been considered and rejected; the
preventive services that have been offered or provided and have failed to
prevent the need for out-of-home placement, unless the health, safety, and
welfare of the child cannot be protected adequately in the home; and the
parents' attitude toward placement of the child;

(d)
A statement of the likely harms the child will suffer as a result of removal.
This section should include an exploration of the nature of the parent-child
attachment and the meaning of separation and loss to both the parents and the
child;

(e)
A description of the steps that will be taken to minimize harm to the child
that may result if separation occurs; and

(f)
Behavior that will be expected before determination that supervision of the
family or placement is no longer necessary.

(3)(a)
The guardian ad litem or court-appointed special advocate shall file his or her
report with the court and with the parties in the case at least fifteen days
before the disposition hearing, unless the court for good cause grants an
extension or reduction. The report shall include a written list of persons
interviewed and reports or documentation considered. If the report makes
particular recommendations, the report shall include specific information on
which the guardian ad litem or court-appointed special advocate relied in
making each particular recommendation.

(b)
The parties to the proceeding may file written responses to the guardian ad
litem's or court-appointed special advocate's report with the court and deliver
such responses to the other parties at any time before the disposition hearing.

Sec.
13. RCW
26.09.220 and 1993 c 289 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The court may order an investigation and report concerning parenting
arrangements for the child, or may appoint a guardian ad litem pursuant to RCW
26.12.175, or both. The investigation and report may be made by the guardian
ad litem, the staff of the juvenile court, or other professional social service
organization experienced in counseling children and families.

(2)
In preparing the report concerning a child, the investigator may consult any
person who may have information about the child and the potential parenting or
custodian arrangements. Upon order of the court, the investigator may refer
the child to professional personnel for diagnosis. The investigator may
consult with and obtain information from medical, psychiatric, or other expert
persons who have served the child in the past without obtaining the consent of
the parent or the child's custodian; but the child's consent must be obtained
if the child has reached the age of twelve, unless the court finds that the
child lacks mental capacity to consent. If the requirements of subsection (3)
of this section are fulfilled, the investigator's report may be received in
evidence at the hearing.

(3)
The investigator shall mail the investigator's report to counsel and to any
party not represented by counsel at least ten days prior to the hearing unless
a shorter time is ordered by the court for good cause shown. The investigator
shall make available to counsel and to any party not represented by counsel the
investigator's file of underlying data and reports, complete texts of
diagnostic reports made to the investigator pursuant to the provisions of
subsection (2) of this section, and the names and addresses of all persons whom
the investigator has consulted. Any party to the proceeding may file
written responses to the investigator's report with the court and deliver such
responses to the other parties at any time prior to the hearing. Any party
to the proceeding may call the investigator and any person whom the
investigator has consulted for cross-examination. A party may not waive the
right of cross-examination prior to the hearing.

Sec.
14. RCW
26.10.130 and 1993 c 289 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In contested custody proceedings, and in other custody proceedings if a parent
or the child's custodian so requests, the court may order an investigation and
report concerning custodian arrangements for the child, or may appoint a
guardian ad litem pursuant to RCW 26.12.175, or both. The investigation and
report may be made by the guardian ad litem, the staff of the juvenile court,
or other professional social service organization experienced in counseling
children and families.

(2)
In preparing the report concerning a child, the investigator may consult any
person who may have information about the child and potential custodian
arrangements. Upon order of the court, the investigator may refer the child to
professional personnel for diagnosis. The investigator may consult with and
obtain information from medical, psychiatric, or other expert persons who have
served the child in the past without obtaining the consent of the parent or the
child's custodian; but the child's consent must be obtained if the child has
reached the age of twelve, unless the court finds that the child lacks mental
capacity to consent. If the requirements of subsection (3) of this section are
fulfilled, the investigator's report may be received in evidence at the
hearing.

(3)
The investigator shall mail the investigator's report to counsel and to any
party not represented by counsel at least ten days prior to the hearing unless
a shorter time is ordered by the court for good cause shown. The investigator
shall make available to counsel and to any party not represented by counsel the
investigator's file of underlying data and reports, complete texts of
diagnostic reports made to the investigator pursuant to the provisions of subsection
(2) of this section, and the names and addresses of all persons whom the
investigator has consulted. Any party to the proceeding may file written
responses to the investigator's report with the court and deliver such
responses to the other parties at any time prior to the hearing. Any party
to the proceeding may call the investigator and any person whom the
investigator has consulted for cross-examination. A party may not waive the
right of cross-examination prior to the hearing.

Sec.
15. RCW
26.12.175 and 1996 c 249 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the interests of a minor
or dependent child when the court believes the appointment of a guardian ad
litem is necessary to protect the best interests of the child in any proceeding
under this chapter. The family court services professionals may also make a
recommendation to the court regarding whether a guardian ad litem should be
appointed for the child. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem from the
court-appointed special advocate program, if that program exists in the
county. Unless inconsistent with an applicable provision of this title, a
guardian ad litem appointed under this section is subject to the standards
applicable to guardians ad litem in general under sections 1 through 7 of this
act.

(b)
Unless otherwise ordered, the guardian ad litem's role is to investigate and
report to the court concerning parenting arrangements for the child, and to
represent the child's best interests. The court may require the guardian ad
litem to provide periodic reports to the parties regarding the status of his or
her investigation. The guardian ad litem shall file his or her report at least
sixty days prior to trial. Any party to the proceeding may file written
responses to the guardian ad litem's report with the court and deliver such
responses to the other parties at any time prior to trial.

(c)
The court shall enter an order for costs, fees, and disbursements to cover the
costs of the guardian ad litem. The court may order either or both parents to
pay for the costs of the guardian ad litem, according to their ability to pay.
If both parents are indigent, the county shall bear the cost of the guardian,
subject to appropriation for guardians' ad litem services by the county
legislative authority. Guardians ad litem who are not volunteers shall provide
the parties with an itemized accounting of their time and billing for services
each month.

(2)(a)
If the guardian ad litem appointed is from the county court-appointed special
advocate program, the program shall supervise any guardian ad litem assigned to
the case. The court-appointed special advocate program shall be entitled to
notice of all proceedings in the case.

(b)
The legislative authority of each county may authorize creation of a
court-appointed special advocate program. The county legislative authority may
adopt rules of eligibility for court-appointed special advocate program
services.

(3)
Each guardian ad litem program shall maintain a background information record
for each guardian ad litem in the program. The background file shall include,
but is not limited to, the following information:

(a)
Level of formal education;

(b)
Training related to the guardian's duties;

(c)
Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;

(d)
Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and county or counties of
appointment; ((and))

(e)
Number of times and counties where the guardian ad litem has been removed
from a case for failure to perform his or her duties and the number of times
and counties where the guardian ad litem has been ordered removed from a
guardian ad litem registry; and

(f)
Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

The
background information report shall be updated annually. As a condition of
appointment, the guardian ad litem's background information record shall be
made available to the court. If the appointed guardian ad litem is not a
member of a guardian ad litem program the person shall provide the background
information to the court.

Upon
appointment, the guardian ad litem, or guardian ad litem program, shall provide
the parties or their attorneys with a statement containing his or her training
relating to the duties as a guardian ad litem and criminal history as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030 for the period covering ten years prior to the appointment.
The background statement shall not include identifying information that may be
used to harm a guardian ad litem, such as home addresses and home telephone
numbers, and for volunteer guardians ad litem the court may allow the use of
maiden names or pseudonyms as necessary for their safety.

(4)
When a court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem is requested
on a case, the program shall give the court the name of the person it
recommends and the appointment shall be effective immediately. The court shall
appoint the person recommended by the program. If a party in a case reasonably
believes the court-appointed special advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or
unqualified, the party may request a review of the appointment by the program.
The program must complete the review within five judicial days and remove any
appointee for good cause. If the party seeking the review is not satisfied
with the outcome of the review, the party may file a motion with the court for
the removal of the court-appointed special advocate on the grounds the advocate
or volunteer is inappropriate or unqualified.

(5)(a)
At any time during a proceeding upon motion of any party or on the court's own
motion, the court may remove a guardian ad litem or court-appointed special
advocate for failure to perform his or her duties, provided that the guardian
ad litem or court-appointed special advocate shall have five days' notice of
any motion to remove before entering such an order.

(b)
If a guardian ad litem is removed from a case for failure to perform his or her
duties, and the guardian ad litem has been removed from a previous case for
failure to perform his or her duties, the court shall order the guardian ad
litem to be removed from the guardian ad litem registry until the guardian ad
litem has completed the training program as provided in RCW 26.12.177. If a
court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem is removed from
a case for failure to perform his or her duties, and the court-appointed
special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem has been removed from a
previous case for failure to perform his or her duties, the court-appointed
special advocate program or volunteer guardian ad litem program shall not recommend
the person for appointment to a new case until he or she has completed the
training program approved by the administrator for the courts for
court-appointed special advocates or volunteer guardians ad litem.

(c)
The court shall report to the administrator for the courts any order removing a
guardian ad litem, court-appointed special advocate, or volunteer guardian ad
litem from a case or any order removing a guardian ad litem from a registry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 26 RCW.

---
END ---