BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.03.015 and 1987 c 109 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1)
"Application for change" means an application filed under RCW
90.03.380, 90.03.390, 90.44.100, or 90.44.105.

(2)
"Department" means the department of ecology((;)).

(((2)))
(3) "Director" means the director of ecology((; and)).

(((3)))
(4) "Person" means any firm, association, water users'
association, corporation, irrigation district, or municipal corporation, as
well as an individual.

(5)
"Same water source" means a ground water body or surface water body,
including a stream, stream system, lake, or reservoir and any spring water or
underground water that is part of or tributary to the surface water body or
aquifer, that the department determines to be an independent water body for the
purposes of water rights administration.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The department may process and render decisions on an application for change
before processing and making decisions on pending applications for new water
rights from the same water source regardless of the date on which the
applications were filed with the department.

(b)
Neither the department nor any other state agency may require the applicant to
give up a legal right or claim to any part of the applicant's water right under
this subsection (1), except as authorized in RCW 90.14.140 through 90.14.190.

(2) Pending applications for new water rights are not entitled to
protection from impairment or given priority for any available water if the
department processes and renders a decision on an application for change from
the same water source. New water rights issued after an application for change
is approved from the same water source are not entitled to protection from
impairment or priority for any available water in relation to the changed water
right regardless of the dates on which the applications were filed with the
department.

---
END ---