BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There is created in the department an office of economic analysis. The office
shall provide information on economic trends and indicators to businesses and
industries to assist them in their marketing efforts on a national and
international basis and to communities to assist them in their efforts to
market their communities to businesses.

(2)
The office shall:

(a)
Collect, analyze, and make available economic trend and indicator information
on international, national, and local markets to interested industry groups,
businesses, and communities;

(b)
Provide technical assistance to industry clusters, industry associations, and
individual businesses that want to export their goods and services, emphasizing
small and medium-sized businesses;

(c)
Provide technical assistance to local governments and local economic
development organizations to assist them in their business recruitment efforts;

(d)
Work with the office of the Washington state trade representative, created
under chapter 43.332 RCW, to identify markets for goods and services provided
by Washington businesses, in particular emerging and strategic markets;

(e)
Collect and analyze information on the effects of state economic development
incentives and programs on economic growth in the state, emphasizing areas
within rural counties and inner cities;

(f)
Work with state agencies on the coordination and dissemination of information
on economic trends and indicators;

(g)
Advise the governor and director on policy matters that impact trade and
economic development efforts at the state and local level; and

(h)
Conduct other activities that the director deems necessary to carry out the
purposes of this section.

(3) As used in this section, "industry cluster" has the
same meaning as in RCW 43.330.090.

---
END ---