BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that Washington's quality of life, standard of living,
and social and economic opportunity all depend on the vitality of the state's
economy. The legislature further finds that economic development tries to
reinforce the natural way by which strong foundations in the areas of human
resources, capital resources, technology, tax and regulatory, advanced physical
infrastructure, information and communication infrastructure, and quality of
life strengthen the economy. The legislature further finds that the strength
and vitality of the state's economy depends on the competitiveness of the
state's industry clusters. The legislature further finds industry clusters can
become a powerful magnet for businesses to locate in an area and create a
spawning ground for start-up companies. The legislature further finds that
industry clusters create large, diverse pools of experienced workers; attract
suppliers who tend to congregate in their vicinity for increased efficiency;
and foster a competitive spirit that stimulates growth and innovative strategic
alliances. The legislature further finds that the state must first identify
and understand the industry clusters before strategies can be developed to
enhance their competitive position in the world.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature to establish an industry cluster-based
approach to economic development as a component of a state-wide strategy to
address economic growth and quality of life issues.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department of community, trade, and economic development, or its successor
agency, shall work with industry associations and organizations to identify
industry clusters on a regional and state-wide basis. The industry clusters
may include, but not be limited to aerospace, agriculture, food processing,
forest products, business services, financial services, health and biomedical,
software, transportation and distribution, and microelectronics.

(2)
In the identification of industry clusters, the department's activities may
include, but are not limited to:

(a)
Conducting focus group discussions, facilitating meetings, and conducting
studies to identify industry clusters, members of an industry cluster, the
current state of the industry cluster, and issues of common concern of the
industry cluster;

(b)
Supporting the formation of industry cluster associations, publication of
cluster association directories, and related efforts to encourage the entry of
new firms into the industry cluster; and

(c)
Providing methods for electronic communication and information dissemination
among firms within industry clusters.

(3)
The department shall work with identified industry clusters, private sector
organizations, local governments, local economic development organizations, and
higher education and training institutions to assist in the development of
strategies designed to strengthen the competitiveness of the state's industry
clusters. The department shall, on a continuing basis, evaluate effectiveness
of the services provided to industry clusters using information gathered at the
regional and state-wide level.

(4)
As used in this section, "industry cluster" means a geographic
concentration of interdependent competitive firms that do business with each
other. Clusters also include firms that sell inside and outside of the
geographic region as well as support firms that supply raw materials,
components, and business services.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.330.090 and 1998 c 245 s 85 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall work with private sector organizations, industry
clusters, local governments, local economic development organizations, and
higher education and training institutions to assist in the development of
strategies to diversify the economy, facilitate technology transfer and
diffusion, and increase value-added production by focusing on targeted
sectors. The targeted sectors may include, but are not limited to, software,
forest products, biotechnology, environmental industries, recycling markets and
waste reduction, aerospace, food processing, tourism, film and video,
microelectronics, new materials, robotics, and machine tools. The department
shall, on a continuing basis, evaluate the potential return to the state from
devoting additional resources to a targeted sector's approach to economic
development and including additional sectors in its efforts. The department
shall use information gathered in each service delivery region in formulating
its sectoral strategies and in designating new targeted sectors.

(2)
The department shall ensure that the state continues to pursue a coordinated
program to expand the tourism industry throughout the state in cooperation with
the public and private tourism development organizations. The department shall
work to provide a balance of tourism activities throughout the state and during
different seasons of the year. In addition, the department shall promote,
market, and encourage growth in the production of films and videos, as well as
television commercials within the state; to this end the department is directed
to assist in the location of a film and video production studio within the
state.

(3)
In assisting in the development of a targeted sector, the department's
activities may include, but are not limited to:

(a)
Conducting focus group discussions, facilitating meetings, and conducting
studies to identify members of the sector, appraise the current state of the
sector, and identify issues of common concern within the sector;

(b)
Supporting the formation of industry associations, publications of association
directories, and related efforts to create or expand the activities or industry
associations;

(c)
Assisting in the formation of flexible networks by providing (i) agency
employees or private sector consultants trained to act as flexible network
brokers and (ii) funding for potential flexible network participants for the
purpose of organizing or implementing a flexible network;

(d)
Helping establish research consortia;

(e)
Facilitating joint training and education programs;

(f)
Promoting cooperative market development activities;

(g)
Analyzing the need, feasibility, and cost of establishing product certification
and testing facilities and services; and

(h)
Providing for methods of electronic communication and information dissemination
among firms and groups of firms to facilitate network or industry cluster
activity.

(4) As used in this section, "industry cluster" has
the same meaning as in section 2 of this act.

---
END ---