BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.330.070 and 1993 c 280 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall work closely with local communities to increase their
capacity to respond to economic, environmental, and social problems and
challenges. The department shall coordinate the delivery of development
services and technical assistance to local communities or regional areas. It
shall promote partnerships between the public and private sectors and between
state and local officials to encourage appropriate economic growth and opportunity
in communities throughout the state, in particular strategies designed to
encourage economic growth and opportunities in community empowerment zones
designated under RCW 43.63A.700. The department shall promote appropriate
local development by: Supporting the ability of communities to develop and
implement strategic development plans; assisting businesses to start up,
maintain, or expand their operations; encouraging public infrastructure
investment and private and public capital investment in local communities;
supporting efforts to manage growth and provide affordable housing and housing
services; providing for the identification and preservation of the state's
historical and cultural resources; and expanding employment opportunities.

(2)
The department shall define a set of services including training and technical
assistance that it will make available to local communities, community-based
nonprofit organizations, regional areas, industry clusters, or
businesses. The department shall simplify access to these programs by
providing more centralized and user-friendly information and referral. The
department shall coordinate community and economic development efforts to
minimize program redundancy and maximize accessibility. The department shall
develop a set of criteria for targeting services to local communities.

(3)
The department shall develop a coordinated and systematic approach to providing
training to community-based nonprofit organizations, local communities, industry
clusters, and businesses. The approach shall be designed to increase the
economic and community development skills available in local communities by
providing training and funding for training for local citizens, nonprofit
organizations, industry clusters, and businesses. The department shall
emphasize providing training in those communities most in need of state
assistance.

(4) As used in this section, "industry clusters" means
a geographic concentration of interdependent competitive firms that do business
with each other. Clusters also include firms that sell inside and outside of
the geographic region as well as support firms that supply raw materials,
components, and business services.

---
END ---