BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a fiscal review
and a performance evaluation of the sales and use tax exemptions under RCW
82.08.02565 and 82.12.02565.

(2)
The fiscal review shall examine, but not be limited to: (a) Estimates of
amounts qualifying for exemption and changes in these amounts over time; (b) a
comparison of the amounts qualifying for exemption with the tax revenue
available to state and local governments; (c) estimates of the cost of
administering the exemptions; and (d) estimates of the level of tax
noncompliance associated with the exemptions.

(3)
The performance evaluation shall examine, but not be limited to: (a) The
effectiveness of the exemption in expanding the level of investment in
manufacturing machinery and equipment in Washington relative to other states;
(b) the effectiveness of the exemption in creating manufacturing jobs in
Washington relative to other states; and (c) the effectiveness of the exemption
in improving wage rates for manufacturing jobs in Washington relative to other
states. These performance criteria shall be measured in comparison to the
economic activity that would have occurred in the absence of the exemption.

(4)
The committee's report shall also include findings as to the increases in
population, economic activity, government revenue, and demand for government
services, if any, resulting from the exemptions.

(5)
The department of revenue and the employment security department shall provide
to the committee such information as the committee determines is necessary to
accomplish the requirements of this section, including but not limited to
confidential tax and employment data.

(6)
The fiscal review and performance evaluation shall be submitted by December 1,
2005, to the house of representatives committee on finance and the senate
committee on ways and means.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

At the time of filing a return under RCW 82.32.045, a taxpayer
shall report the total amount of machinery, equipment, labor, and services for
which exemption is claimed under RCW 82.08.02565 and 82.12.02565 during the
reporting period. The report shall be made on forms prescribed by the
department. The department shall disallow any exemption under RCW 82.08.02565
and 82.12.02565 for which amounts are not correctly reported under this
section. The department may permit a taxpayer to file supplemental or
corrected reports as the department deems are reasonable to permit substantial
compliance with this section.

---
END ---