BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.34.180 and 1996 c 308 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each county, city, and town is responsible for the prosecution, adjudication,
sentencing, and incarceration of misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor offenses
committed by adults in their respective jurisdictions, and referred from their
respective law enforcement agencies, whether filed under state law or city
ordinance, and must carry out these responsibilities through the use of their
own courts, staff, and facilities, or by entering into contracts or interlocal
agreements under this chapter to provide these services. The state shall
pay all costs for the prosecution, adjudication, sentencing, and incarceration
of all offenses referred to each county by any state agency, including but not
limited to the state patrol and the department of fish and wildlife.
Nothing in this section is intended to alter the statutory responsibilities of
each county for the prosecution, adjudication, sentencing, and incarceration
for not more than one year of felony offenders, nor shall this section apply to
any offense initially filed by the prosecuting attorney as a felony offense or
an attempt to commit a felony offense.

(2)
The following principles must be followed in negotiating interlocal agreements
or contracts: Cities and counties must consider (a) anticipated costs of
services; and (b) anticipated and potential revenues to fund the services,
including fines and fees, criminal justice funding, and state-authorized sales
tax funding levied for criminal justice purposes.

(3)
If an agreement as to the levels of compensation within an interlocal agreement
or contract for gross misdemeanor and misdemeanor services cannot be reached
between a city and county, then either party may invoke binding arbitration on
the compensation issued by notice to the other party. In the case of establishing
initial compensation, the notice shall request arbitration within thirty days.
In the case of nonrenewal of an existing contract or interlocal agreement, the
notice must be given one hundred twenty days prior to the expiration of the
existing contract or agreement and the existing contract or agreement remains
in effect until a new agreement is reached or until an arbitration award on the
matter of fees is made. The city and county each select one arbitrator, and
the initial two arbitrators pick a third arbitrator.

(4) For cities or towns that have not adopted, in whole or in part,
criminal code or ordinance provisions related to misdemeanor and gross
misdemeanor crimes as defined by state law, this section shall have no
application until July 1, 1998.

---
END ---