BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
2.08.092 and 1986 c 155 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
annual salary of the judges of the superior courts shall be established
by the Washington citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials. The
benefits of the judges of the superior courts shall be paid by the state.

Sec.
2. RCW
2.06.062 and 1986 c 155 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The annual salary of the judges of the courts of appeals
shall be established by the Washington citizens' commission on salaries for
elected officials. No salary warrant may be issued to any judge until the
judge files with the state treasurer an affidavit that no matter referred to
the judge for opinion or decision has been uncompleted for more than six
months. The benefits of the judges of the courts of appeals shall be paid
by the state.

---
END ---