BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.54 RCW to read as follows:

Any
county of the state may organize a passenger-only ferry operation district. A
passenger-only ferry operation district may be formed by a majority vote of the
elected county legislative authority. The members of the county legislative
authority shall serve as the governing officials of the passenger-only ferry
district. The boundaries of the passenger-only ferry district shall be the
same as the boundaries of the county whose legislative authority formed the
district. The passenger-only ferry district shall have the following powers
and duties:

(1)
The passenger-only ferry district shall operate passenger-only ferries serving
the residents of the district. The district shall contract with a nonprofit
corporation to operate the passenger-only ferry service authorized by this
section.

(2)
The passenger-only ferry district may purchase or lease passenger-only vessels
from the department of transportation or from another source.

(3)
The passenger-only ferry district may set passenger fares at the level
necessary to generate sufficient revenue to pay for the cost of operating the
vessels leased or purchased by the district. The fares assessed and collected
by the nonprofit corporation operating the passenger-only ferry service on
behalf of the passenger-only ferry district are a proprietary charge by the
corporation and are not a monetary charge by government.

(4)
When deemed necessary by the legislative authority of the county containing the
passenger-only ferry district, the authority may by resolution call a special
election. The resolution calling such election shall fix the form of the
ballot proposition to be presented to the electorate of the passenger-only
ferry district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall lease passenger-only ferries to a
passenger-only ferry district for a nominal amount. The lease shall grant the
passenger-only ferry operation district reasonable access to the department's
docks and terminal facilities as necessary to facilitate the provision of
regularly scheduled passenger-only ferry service to the residents of the
district. As a condition of the lease, the passenger-only ferry district must
agree to provide regularly scheduled passenger-only ferry service available to
residents of the passenger-only ferry district. The department shall construct
the lease so that obligations between the state and federal government relating
to passenger-only ferries are not violated.

---
END ---