BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature that all waters of the state meet water quality
standards, that the public enjoy the full range of beneficial uses of state
waters, and that water quality standards be enforced. It is the further intent
of the legislature that sacrificing areas of the state for diluting pollution
is unacceptable for long-lasting pollutants that are particularly harmful to
wildlife and people, especially children, because of the pollutants' propensity
to build up in the food chain and in breastmilk. The legislature recognizes
that the department of ecology has initiated a strategy to eliminate discharges
of these persistent bioaccumulative toxics and that phasing out mixing zones
for these toxic pollutants is an important step toward eliminating discharges.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.48.020 and 1995 c 255 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

((Whenever
the word)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Aquatic noxious weed" has the meaning prescribed under RCW
17.26.020.

(2)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(3)
"Director" means the director of ecology.

(4)
"Mixing zone" means an area in a waterbody which is around or beyond
a point source outfall in which concentrations of a particular pollutant mix
with receiving waters.

(5)
"Persistent bioaccumulative toxics" includes the following chemicals
and compounds:

(a)
Aldrin;

(b)
Anthracene;

(c)
Benzo(a)pyrene;

(d)
Benzo(ghi)perylene;

(e)
Benz(a)anthracene;

(f)
Cadmium and compounds;

(g)
Chlordane;

(h)
DDT (DDD, DDE);

(i)
1,4-dichlorobenzene;

(j)
3,3'-dichlorobenzidine;

(k)
Dieldrin;

(l)
Endosulfan, including isomers and sulphate;

(m)
Endrin;

(n)
Heptachlor;

(o)
Hexachlorobenzene;

(p)
A-1,2,3,4,5,6-hexachlorocyclohexane;

(q)
G-1,2,3,4,5,6-hexachlorocyclohexane or Lindane;

(r)
Mercury and compounds;

(s)
Mirex;

(t)
Pentachlorophenol;

(u)
Perylene;

(v)
Phenanthrene;

(w)
Polychlorinated biphenyls;

(x)
Polychlorinated dibenzo-p-dioxins and furans;

(y)
Toxaphene;

(z)
Tributyl tin;

(aa)
Trifluralin;

(bb)
Lead.

This
definition also includes other chemicals and compounds as adopted by the
department by rule.

(6)
"Person" ((is used in this chapter, it shall be construed
to include)) means any political subdivision, government agency,
municipality, industry, public or private corporation, copartnership,
association, firm, individual, or any other entity whatsoever.

((Wherever
the words)) (7) "Pollution" means such contamination, or other
alteration of the physical, chemical, or biological properties, of any waters
of the state, including change in temperature, taste, color, turbidity, or odor
of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid, gaseous, solid, radioactive, or
other substance into any waters of the state as will or is likely to create a
nuisance or render such waters harmful, detrimental, or injurious to the public
health, safety, or welfare, or to domestic, commercial, industrial,
agricultural, recreational, or other legitimate beneficial uses, or to
livestock, wild animals, birds, fish, or other aquatic life.

(8)
"Waters of the state" ((shall be used in this chapter, they
shall be construed to include)) means lakes, rivers, ponds, streams,
inland waters, underground waters, salt waters, and all other surface
waters and watercourses within the jurisdiction of the state of Washington.

((Whenever
the word "pollution" is used in this chapter, it shall be construed
to mean such contamination, or other alteration of the physical, chemical or
biological properties, of any waters of the state, including change in temperature,
taste, color, turbidity, or odor of the waters, or such discharge of any
liquid, gaseous, solid, radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the
state as will or is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters harmful,
detrimental or injurious to the public health, safety or welfare, or to
domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or other
legitimate beneficial uses, or to livestock, wild animals, birds, fish or other
aquatic life.

Wherever
the word "department" is used in this chapter it shall mean the
department of ecology.

Whenever
the word "director" is used in this chapter it shall mean the
director of ecology.

Whenever
the words "aquatic noxious weed" are used in this chapter, they have
the meaning prescribed under RCW 17.26.020.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department of ecology shall adopt by rule criteria for designating
chemicals and compounds as persistent bioaccumulative toxics.

(2) The department shall adopt by rule a plan to phase out the use
of mixing zones for persistent bioaccumulative toxics for existing sources.
The department shall finalize the rule within two years of the effective date
of this act. It shall report to the legislature on progress on the phase-out
rule during the 2001 legislative session.

---
END ---