BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that several populations of salmonids have been listed in
Washington as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act
(16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.). The legislature finds that it is vitally
important to restore these fish runs where possible. The legislature finds
that project development and other human activities, especially those that
occur within aquatic environs, must occur in a manner that will not hinder such
restoration efforts.

The
legislature further finds that individuals performing activities that have an
impact on the habitat of salmon are subject to potential liability for taking
these listed species. Similarly the department of fish and wildlife, which
issues permits to use, divert, obstruct, or change the natural flow or bed of
any of the salt or fresh waters of the state, is also potentially liable for
taking listed species.

The
legislature finds that the department of fish and wildlife has identified a
number of possible responses to this risk of liability, and has completed a
thorough process of collecting public input from across the state regarding all
of these possible responses. The legislature finds that these responses
include negotiating a habitat conservation plan that will lead to an incidental
take permit, inclusion of department activities within a federal 4(d) rule,
encouraging a consultation of federal agencies, or some combination thereof.
The legislature further finds that additional responses for the department of
fish and wildlife include studying the appropriate endangered species act
compliance approach, submitting existing hydraulics rules for review by the
appropriate federal agencies, or not taking any action at all.

Therefore,
the legislature finds that the department of fish and wildlife should meet with
the national marine fisheries service and the United States fish and wildlife
service to discuss an endangered species compliance agreement for the hydraulic
project approval program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 75.20 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall enter into negotiations with the national marine fisheries
service in order to develop an endangered species compliance agreement for the
hydraulic project approval program.

If
required by the national marine fisheries service as a condition of obtaining
such a permit, the department may enter into negotiations with other federal
agencies, including the environmental protection agency, in order to obtain assurances
relating to the clean water act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 75.20 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall ensure that the endangered species compliance agreement
negotiated under section 2 of this act includes a process for streamlining and
integrating hydraulic permits with other permitting programs, including, but
not limited to, forest practices permits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 75.20 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall update existing rules and adopt new rules as
necessary to implement the endangered species compliance agreement negotiated
under section 2 of this act. These rules shall be adopted in a manner consistent
with chapter 34.05 RCW.

---
END ---