BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that Washington's booming high technology industries are
unable to hire enough Washington residents to meet their needs for highly
skilled employees. At the same time, many Washington residents are interested
in high technology fields, but access to programs in institutions of higher
education that would prepare them to take well-paying positions in information
technology and other high technology fields is constrained by the insufficient
number of available enrollment slots at the institutions.

(2)
The legislature recognizes that students, workers, institutions of higher
education, high technology industries, and our state's economy as a whole
depend upon improving the state's capacity to prepare more Washington residents
to enter and succeed in the growing high technology sector of the economy.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The information technology enrollment grant program is created and shall be
administered by the higher education coordinating board. The purpose of this
grant program is to provide additional opportunities to enroll at public
baccalaureate institutions in programs that lead to degrees and other
recognized credentials in information technology.

(2)
The board shall award grants through a competitive selection process. In order
to be eligible for grants under this chapter, the grant application must
demonstrate that the proposed project is supported by at least a fifty-percent
matching contribution of nonstate cash or donations from nonstate sources.
State funds awarded through this program may be used to pay for faculty, staff,
or equipment for computer science, computer engineering, or related
disciplines. The maximum grant any institution may receive under this program
is one million dollars.

(3)
The board shall report to the governor and the legislature annually by December
15th on the implementation of this program and shall include any
recommendations the board may have for changes to the program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The information technology partnership grant program is created and shall be
administered by the state board for community and technical colleges. The
purpose of the program is to improve opportunities to enroll in information
technology and computer science programs at the community and technical
colleges.

(2)
The board shall award grants through a competitive selection process.
Colleges, partnerships of colleges, or partnerships of colleges and K-12 school
districts may apply for grants under this program. In order to be eligible for
a grant under this chapter, the grant application must demonstrate that the
proposed project is supported by at least a fifty-percent matching contribution
of nonstate cash or donations from nonstate sources.

(3)
Priority shall be given to proposed programs that prepare students to meet
industry standards, achieve industry skill certificates, or to continue upper
division computer science or computer engineering studies. The maximum grant
that may be awarded to any applicant under this program is three hundred
thousand dollars.

(4)
The board shall report to the governor and the legislature annually by December
15th on the implementation of this program and shall include any
recommendations the board may have for changes to the program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
sum of one million two hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the higher education coordinating board for the purposes of
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The
sum of one million two hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the state board for community and technical colleges for the
purposes of section 3 of this act.

---
END ---