BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.44.140 and 1998 c 220 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 shall end:

(a)
For a person convicted of a class A felony, or a person convicted of any sex
offense or kidnapping offense who has one or more prior ((conviction[s]))
convictions for a sex offense or kidnapping offense: Such person may
only be relieved of the duty to register under subsection (3) or (4) of this
section.

(b)
For a person convicted of a class B felony, and the person does not have one or
more prior ((conviction[s])) convictions for a sex offense or
kidnapping offense: Fifteen years after the last date of release from
confinement, if any, (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to
the conviction, or entry of the judgment and sentence, if the person has spent
fifteen consecutive years in the community without being convicted of any new
offenses.

(c)
For a person convicted of a class C felony, a violation of RCW 9.68A.090 or
9A.44.096, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a class C
felony, and the person does not have one or more prior conviction[s] for a sex
offense or kidnapping offense: Ten years after the last date of release from
confinement, if any, (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to
the conviction, or entry of the judgment and sentence, if the person has spent
ten consecutive years in the community without being convicted of any new
offenses.

(2)
The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall apply equally to a person
who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of
a sex offense or kidnapping offense.

(3)
Any person having a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 may petition the
superior court to be relieved of that duty, if the person has spent ten
consecutive years in the community without being convicted of any new
offenses. The petition shall be made to the court in which the petitioner was
convicted of the offense that subjects him or her to the duty to register, or,
in the case of convictions in other states, a foreign country, or a federal or
military court, to the court in Thurston county. The prosecuting attorney of
the county shall be named and served as the respondent in any such petition.
The court shall consider the nature of the registrable offense committed, and
the criminal and relevant noncriminal behavior of the petitioner both before
and after conviction, and may consider other factors. Except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section, the court may relieve the petitioner of the
duty to register only if the petitioner shows, with clear and convincing
evidence, that future registration of the petitioner will not serve the
purposes of RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 46.20.187, 70.48.470, and
72.09.330.

(4)
An offender having a duty to register under RCW 9A.44.130 for a sex offense or
kidnapping offense committed when the offender was a juvenile may petition the
superior court to be relieved of that duty. The court shall consider the
nature of the registrable offense committed, and the criminal and relevant
noncriminal behavior of the petitioner both before and after adjudication, and
may consider other factors.

(a)
Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the court may relieve the
petitioner of the duty to register for a sex offense or kidnapping offense that
was committed while the petitioner was ((fifteen)) thirteen years
of age or older only if the petitioner shows, with clear and convincing
evidence, that future registration of the petitioner will not serve the
purposes of RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 46.20.187, 70.48.470, and
72.09.330.

(b)
Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the court may relieve the
petitioner of the duty to register for a sex offense or kidnapping offense that
was committed while the petitioner was under the age of ((fifteen)) thirteen
if the petitioner (((a))) (i) has not been adjudicated of any
additional sex offenses or kidnapping offenses during the twenty-four months ((following
the adjudication)) after completion of the petitioner's supervision by
the department of social and health services for the offense giving rise to
the duty to register, and (((b))) (ii) the petitioner proves by a
preponderance of the evidence that future registration of the petitioner will
not serve the purposes of RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 46.20.187,
70.48.470, and 72.09.330.

(c)
The court may not relieve any petitioner who has been classified as a risk
level III by the department of social and health services, of the duty to
register for a sex offense or kidnapping offense.

This
subsection shall not apply to juveniles prosecuted as adults.

(5)
Unless relieved of the duty to register pursuant to this section, a violation
of RCW 9A.44.130 is an ongoing offense for purposes of the statute of
limitations under RCW 9A.04.080.

(6) Nothing in RCW 9.94A.220 relating to discharge of an offender
shall be construed as operating to relieve the offender of his or her duty to
register pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130.

---
END ---