BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter does not apply to cities that operate transit systems, county transportation
authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation benefit
areas, and regional transit authorities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not apply to cities that operate transit systems,
county transportation authorities, metropolitan municipal corporations, public
transportation benefit areas, and regional transit authorities.

---
END ---