BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
79.01.007 and 1991 c 204 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Where
C.E.P. & R.I. land has the potential for lease for commercial, industrial,
or residential uses or other uses with the potential for high economic return
and is within urban or suburban areas, the department of natural resources
shall make every effort consistent with trust land management principles and
all other provisions of law to lease the lands for such purposes, unless the
land is subject to a lease to a state agency operating an existing state
institution. The department of natural resources is authorized, subject to
approval by the board of natural resources and only if a higher return can be
realized, to exchange such lands for lands of at least equal value and to sell
such lands and use the proceeds to acquire replacement lands. The department
shall report to the appropriate legislative committees all C.E.P. & R.I.
land purchased, sold, or exchanged. Income from the leases shall be deposited
in the charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions account.
((The legislature shall give priority consideration to appropriating
one-half of the money derived from lease income to providing community housing
for persons who are mentally ill, developmentally disabled, or youth who are
blind, deaf, or otherwise disabled.))

Sec.
2. RCW
43.79.201 and 1995 c 399 s 77 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account is
hereby created, in the state treasury, into which account there shall be
deposited all moneys arising from the sale, lease or transfer of the land
granted by the United States government to the state for charitable,
educational, penal and reformatory institutions by section 17 of the enabling
act, or otherwise set apart for such institutions, except all moneys arising
from the sale, lease, or transfer of that certain one hundred thousand acres of
such land assigned for the support of the University of Washington by chapter
91, Laws of 1903 and section 9, chapter 122, Laws of 1893.

(2)
((If feasible,)) (a) Not less than one-half of all income to the
charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions account shall be
appropriated for the purpose of providing housing, including repair and
renovation of state institutions, for persons who are mentally ill, ((developmentally
disabled)) have developmental disabilities, or youth who are blind,
deaf, or otherwise disabled. ((If moneys are appropriated for
community-based housing, the moneys shall be appropriated to the department of
community, trade, and economic development for the housing assistance program
under chapter 43.185 RCW.))

(b) Not less than one-half of lease income to the charitable,
educational, penal, and reformatory institutions account shall be appropriated
for the purpose of providing community-based housing, or operating and
maintaining community-based housing, for persons who are mentally ill, have
developmental disabilities, or youth who are blind, deaf, or otherwise
disabled. When moneys are appropriated for community-based housing, the moneys
shall be appropriated to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for housing developed through the housing assistance program under
chapter 43.185 RCW.

---
END ---