BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.09.510 and 1997 c 59 s 14 and 1997 c 58 s 201 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Medical
assistance may be provided in accordance with eligibility requirements
established by the department, as defined in the social security Title XIX
state plan for mandatory categorically needy persons and: (1) Individuals who
would be eligible for cash assistance except for their institutional status;
(2) individuals who are under twenty-one years of age, who would be eligible
for temporary assistance for needy families, but do not qualify as dependent
children and who are in (a) foster care, (b) subsidized adoption, (c) a nursing
facility or an intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded, or (d)
inpatient psychiatric facilities; (3) the aged, blind, and disabled who: (a)
Receive only a state supplement, or (b) would not be eligible for cash
assistance if they were not institutionalized; (4) categorically eligible
individuals who meet the income and resource requirements of the cash
assistance programs; (5) individuals who are enrolled in managed health care
systems, who have otherwise lost eligibility for medical assistance, but who
have not completed a current six-month enrollment in a managed health care
system, and who are eligible for federal financial participation under Title
XIX of the social security act; (6) children and pregnant women allowed by
federal statute for whom funding is appropriated; (7) other individuals
eligible for medical services under RCW 74.09.035 and 74.09.700 for whom
federal financial participation is available under Title XIX of the social
security act; ((and)) (8) persons allowed by section 1931 of the social
security act for whom funding is appropriated; and (9) persons under the age
of twenty-one, who, on the person's eighteenth birthday, were in foster care
under the responsibility of a state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of . . . . . . dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the department of social
and health services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, to carry out the
purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---