BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
58.17.060 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative body of a city, town, or county shall adopt regulations and
procedures, and appoint administrative personnel for the summary approval of
short plats and short subdivisions or alteration or vacation thereof. When an
alteration or vacation involves a public dedication, the alteration or vacation
shall be processed as provided in RCW 58.17.212 or 58.17.215. Such regulations
shall be adopted by ordinance and shall provide that a short plat and short
subdivision may be approved only if written findings that are appropriate, as
provided in RCW 58.17.110, are made by the administrative personnel, and may
contain wholly different requirements than those governing the approval of
preliminary and final plats of subdivisions and may require surveys and
monumentations and shall require filing of a short plat, or alteration or
vacation thereof, for record in the office of the county auditor: PROVIDED,
That such regulations must contain a requirement that land in short
subdivisions may not be further divided in any manner within a period of five
years without the filing of a final plat, except that when the short plat
contains fewer than four parcels, nothing in this section shall prevent the
owner who filed the short plat from filing an alteration within the five-year
period to create up to a total of four lots within the original short plat
boundaries: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such regulations are not required to
contain a penalty clause as provided in RCW 36.32.120 and may provide for
wholly injunctive relief.

An
ordinance requiring a survey shall require that the survey be completed and
filed with the application for approval of the short subdivision.

(2)
Cities, towns, and counties shall include in their short plat regulations and
procedures pursuant to subsection (1) of this section provisions for
considering sidewalks and other planning features that assure safe walking
conditions for students who walk to and from school.

(3)
The legislative body of a city, town, or county may by ordinance exempt short
plats or short subdivisions from the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section in which the division is for the purpose of establishing a site solely
used for an uninhabited public or private utility or telecommunications
facility, provided a record survey is recorded per chapter 58.09 RCW.

Sec.
2. RCW
58.17.070 and 1981 c 293 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A
preliminary plat of proposed subdivisions and dedications of land shall be
submitted for approval to the ((legislative body of the)) city, town, or
county within which the plat is situated.

Unless an applicant for preliminary plat approval requests
otherwise, a preliminary plat shall be processed simultaneously with
applications for rezones, variances, planned unit developments, site plan
approvals, and similar quasi-judicial or administrative actions to the extent
that procedural requirements applicable to these actions permit simultaneous
processing.

Sec.
3. RCW
58.17.100 and 1995 c 347 s 428 are each amended to read as follows:

If
a city, town, or county has established a planning commission or
planning agency in accordance with state law or local charter, such commission or
agency shall review all preliminary plats and make recommendations thereon to
the city, town, or county legislative body to assure conformance of the
proposed subdivision to the general purposes of the comprehensive plan and to
planning standards and specifications as adopted by the city, town, or
county. Reports of the planning commission or agency shall be advisory only:
PROVIDED, That the legislative body of the city, town, or county may, by
ordinance, assign to such commission or agency, or any department official or
group of officials, such administrative functions, powers and duties as may be
appropriate, including the holding of hearings, and recommendations for
approval or disapproval of preliminary plats of proposed subdivisions.

Such
recommendation shall be submitted to the legislative body not later than
fourteen days following action by the hearing body. Upon receipt of the
recommendation on any preliminary plat the legislative body shall at its next
public meeting set the date for the public meeting where it shall consider the
recommendations of the hearing body and may adopt or reject the recommendations
of such hearing body based on the record established at the public hearing.
If, after considering the matter at a public meeting, the legislative body
deems a change in the planning commission's or planning agency's recommendation
approving or disapproving any preliminary plat is necessary, the legislative
body shall adopt its own recommendations and approve or disapprove the
preliminary plat.

Every
decision or recommendation made under this section shall be in writing and
shall include findings of fact and conclusions to support the decision or
recommendation.

A
record of all public meetings and public hearings shall be kept by the appropriate
city, town, or county authority and shall be open to public inspection.

((Sole
authority to approve final plats, and to adopt or amend platting ordinances
shall reside in the legislative bodies.))

Sec.
4. RCW
58.17.110 and 1995 c 32 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The city, town, or county ((legislative body)) shall inquire into the
public use and interest proposed to be served by the establishment of the
subdivision and dedication. It shall determine: (a) If appropriate provisions
are made for, but not limited to, the public health, safety, and general
welfare, for open spaces, drainage ways, streets or roads, alleys, other public
ways, transit stops, potable water supplies, sanitary wastes, parks and
recreation, playgrounds, schools and schoolgrounds, and shall consider all
other relevant facts, including sidewalks and other planning features that
assure safe walking conditions for students who only walk to and from school;
and (b) whether the public interest will be served by the subdivision and
dedication.

(2)
A proposed subdivision and dedication shall not be approved unless the city,
town, or county ((legislative body)) makes written findings that: (a)
Appropriate provisions are made for the public health, safety, and general
welfare and for such open spaces, drainage ways, streets or roads, alleys,
other public ways, transit stops, potable water supplies, sanitary wastes,
parks and recreation, playgrounds, schools and schoolgrounds and all other
relevant facts, including sidewalks and other planning features that assure
safe walking conditions for students who only walk to and from school; and (b)
the public use and interest will be served by the platting of such subdivision
and dedication. If it finds that the proposed subdivision and dedication make
such appropriate provisions and that the public use and interest will be
served, then the ((legislative body)) city, town, or county shall
approve the proposed subdivision and dedication. Dedication of land to any
public body, provision of public improvements to serve the subdivision, and/or
impact fees imposed under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 may be required as a
condition of subdivision approval. Dedications shall be clearly shown on the
final plat. No dedication, provision of public improvements, or impact fees
imposed under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 shall be allowed that constitutes
an unconstitutional taking of private property. The ((legislative body))
city, town, or county shall not as a condition to the approval of any
subdivision require a release from damages to be procured from other property
owners.

(3)
If the preliminary plat includes a dedication of a public park with an area of
less than two acres and the donor has designated that the park be named in
honor of a deceased individual of good character, the city, town, or county ((legislative
body)) must adopt the designated name.

Sec.
5. RCW
58.17.120 and 1974 ex.s. c 134 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
city, town, or county ((legislative body)) shall consider the physical
characteristics of a proposed subdivision site and may disapprove a proposed
plat because of flood, inundation, or swamp conditions. Construction of
protective improvements may be required as a condition of approval, and such
improvements shall be noted on the final plat.

No
plat shall be approved by any city, town, or county ((legislative authority))
covering any land situated in a flood control zone as provided in chapter 86.16
RCW without the prior written approval of the department of ecology of the
state of Washington.

Sec.
6. RCW
58.17.130 and 1974 ex.s. c 134 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Local
regulations shall provide that in lieu of the completion of the actual
construction of any required improvements prior to the approval of a final plat,
the city, town, or county ((legislative body)) may accept a bond, in an
amount and with surety and conditions satisfactory to it, or other secure
method, providing for and securing to the municipality the actual construction
and installation of such improvements within a period specified by the city,
town, or county ((legislative body)) and expressed in the bonds. In
addition, local regulations may provide for methods of security, including the
posting of a bond securing to the municipality the successful operation of
improvements for an appropriate period of time up to two years after final
approval. The municipality is hereby granted the power to enforce bonds
authorized under this section by all appropriate legal and equitable remedies.
Such local regulations may provide that the improvements such as structures,
sewers, and water systems shall be designed and certified by or under the
supervision of a registered civil engineer prior to the acceptance of such
improvements.

Sec.
7. RCW
58.17.140 and 1995 c 68 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Preliminary plats of any proposed subdivision and dedication shall
be approved, disapproved, or returned to the applicant for modification or
correction within ninety days from date of filing thereof unless the applicant
consents to an extension of such time period or the ninety day limitation is
extended to include up to twenty-one days as specified under RCW 58.17.095(3):
PROVIDED, That if an environmental impact statement is required as provided in
RCW 43.21C.030, the ninety day period shall not include the time spent
preparing and circulating the environmental impact statement by the local
government agency. Final plats and short plats shall be approved, disapproved,
or returned to the applicant within thirty days from the date of filing
thereof, unless the applicant consents to an extension of such time period. A
final plat meeting all requirements of this chapter shall be submitted to the
((legislative body of the)) city, town, or county for approval within
five years of the date of preliminary plat approval. Nothing contained in this
section shall act to prevent any city, town, or county from adopting by
ordinance procedures which would allow extensions of time that may or may not
contain additional or altered conditions and requirements.

Sec.
8. RCW
58.17.150 and 1983 c 121 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
preliminary plat submitted for final approval of the ((legislative body))
city, town, or county shall be accompanied by the following agencies'
recommendations for approval or disapproval:

(1)
Local health department or other agency furnishing sewage disposal and
supplying water as to the adequacy of the proposed means of sewage disposal and
water supply;

(2)
Local planning agency or commission, charged with the responsibility of
reviewing plats and subdivisions, as to compliance with all terms of the
preliminary approval of the proposed plat subdivision or dedication;

(3)
City, town, or county engineer.

Except as provided in RCW 58.17.140, an agency or person issuing a
recommendation for subsequent approval under subsections (1) and (3) of this
section shall not modify the terms of its recommendations without the consent
of the applicant.

Sec.
9. RCW
58.17.170 and 1981 c 293 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

When the ((legislative body of the)) city, town, or
county finds that the subdivision proposed for final plat approval conforms to
all terms of the preliminary plat approval, and that said subdivision meets the
requirements of this chapter, other applicable state laws, and any local
ordinances adopted under this chapter which were in effect at the time of
preliminary plat approval, it shall suitably inscribe and execute its written
approval on the face of the plat. The original of said final plat shall be
filed for record with the county auditor. One reproducible copy shall be
furnished to the city, town or county engineer. One paper copy shall be filed
with the county assessor. Paper copies shall be provided to such other
agencies as may be required by ordinance. Any lots in a final plat filed for
record shall be a valid land use notwithstanding any change in zoning laws for
a period of five years from the date of filing. A subdivision shall be
governed by the terms of approval of the final plat, and the statutes,
ordinances, and regulations in effect at the time of approval under RCW
58.17.150 (1) and (3) for a period of five years after final plat approval
unless the ((legislative body)) city, town, or county finds that
a change in conditions creates a serious threat to the public health or safety
in the subdivision.

Sec.
10. RCW
58.17.190 and 1969 ex.s. c 271 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The
county auditor shall refuse to accept any plat for filing until approval of the
plat has been given by the ((appropriate legislative body)) city,
town, or county in which the plat is situated. Should a plat or dedication
be filed without such approval, the prosecuting attorney of the county in which
the plat is filed shall apply for a writ of mandate in the name of and on
behalf of the ((legislative body)) city, town, or county required
to approve same, directing the auditor and assessor to remove from their files
or records the unapproved plat, or dedication of record.

Sec.
11. RCW
58.17.212 and 1987 c 354 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
any person is interested in the vacation of any subdivision or portion
thereof, or any area designated or dedicated for public use, that person shall
file an application for vacation with the ((legislative authority of the))
city, town, or county in which the subdivision is located. The application
shall set forth the reasons for vacation and shall contain signatures of all
parties having an ownership interest in that portion of the subdivision subject
to vacation. If the subdivision is subject to restrictive covenants which were
filed at the time of the approval of the subdivision, and the application for
vacation would result in the violation of a covenant, the application shall
contain an agreement signed by all parties subject to the covenants providing
that the parties agree to terminate or alter the relevant covenants to
accomplish the purpose of the vacation of the subdivision or portion thereof.

When
the vacation application is specifically for a county road or city or town
street, the procedures for road vacation or street vacation in chapter 36.87 or
35.79 RCW shall be utilized for the road or street vacation. When the
application is for the vacation of the plat together with the roads and/or
streets, the procedure for vacation in this section shall be used, but
vacations of streets may not be made that are prohibited under RCW 35.79.030,
and vacations of roads may not be made that are prohibited under RCW 36.87.130.

The
((legislative authority of the)) city, town, or county shall give notice
as provided in RCW 58.17.080 and 58.17.090 and shall conduct a public hearing
on the application for a vacation and may approve or deny the application for
vacation of the subdivision after determining the public use and interest to be
served by the vacation of the subdivision. If any portion of the land
contained in the subdivision was dedicated to the public for public use or
benefit, such land, if not deeded to the city, town, or county, shall be deeded
to the city, town, or county unless the ((legislative authority)) city,
town, or county shall set forth findings that the public use would not be
served in retaining title to those lands.

Title
to the vacated property shall vest with the rightful owner as shown in the
county records. If the vacated land is land that was dedicated to the public,
for public use other than a road or street, and the ((legislative authority))
city, town, or county has found that retaining title to the land is not
in the public interest, title thereto shall vest with the person or persons
owning the property on each side thereof, as determined by the ((legislative
authority)) city, town, or county. When the road or street that is
to be vacated was contained wholly within the subdivision and is part of the
boundary of the subdivision, title to the vacated road or street shall vest
with the owner or owners of property contained within the vacated subdivision.

This
section shall not be construed as applying to the vacation of any plat of
state-granted tide or shore lands.

Sec.
12. RCW
58.17.215 and 1987 c 354 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

When
any person is interested in the alteration of any subdivision or the altering of
any portion thereof, except as provided in RCW 58.17.040(6), that person shall
submit an application to request the alteration to the ((legislative
authority of the)) city, town, or county where the subdivision is located.
The application shall contain the signatures of the majority of those persons
having an ownership interest of lots, tracts, parcels, sites, or divisions in
the subject subdivision or portion to be altered. If the subdivision is
subject to restrictive covenants which were filed at the time of the approval
of the subdivision, and the application for alteration would result in the
violation of a covenant, the application shall contain an agreement signed by
all parties subject to the covenants providing that the parties agree to terminate
or alter the relevant covenants to accomplish the purpose of the alteration of
the subdivision or portion thereof.

Upon
receipt of an application for alteration, the ((legislative body)) city,
town, or county shall provide notice of the application to all owners of
property within the subdivision, and as provided for in RCW 58.17.080 and
58.17.090. The notice shall either establish a date for a public hearing or
provide that a hearing may be requested by a person receiving notice within
fourteen days of receipt of the notice.

The
((legislative body)) city, town, or county shall determine the
public use and interest in the proposed alteration and may deny or approve the
application for alteration. If any land within the alteration is part of an
assessment district, any outstanding assessments shall be equitably divided and
levied against the remaining lots, parcels, or tracts, or be levied equitably
on the lots resulting from the alteration. If any land within the alteration
contains a dedication to the general use of persons residing within the
subdivision, such land may be altered and divided equitably between the
adjacent properties.

After
approval of the alteration, the ((legislative body)) city, town, or
county shall order the applicant to produce a revised drawing of the
approved alteration of the final plat or short plat, which after signature of
the ((legislative authority)) city, town, or county, shall be
filed with the county auditor to become the lawful plat of the property.

This
section shall not be construed as applying to the alteration or replatting of
any plat of state-granted tide or shore lands.

Sec.
13. RCW
58.17.225 and 1995 c 32 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
granting of an easement for ingress and egress or utilities over public
property that is held as open space pursuant to a subdivision or plat, where
the open space is already used as a utility right of way or corridor, where
other access is not feasible, and where the granting of the easement will not
impair public access or authorize construction of physical barriers of any
type, may be authorized and exempted from the requirements of RCW 58.17.215 by
the county, city, or town ((legislative authority)) following a public
hearing with notice to the property owners in the affected plat.

Sec.
14. RCW
58.17.310 and 1990 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to any other requirements imposed by the provisions of this chapter,
((the legislative authority of any)) a city, town, or county
shall not approve a short plat or final plat, as defined in RCW 58.17.020, for
any subdivision, short subdivision, lot, tract, parcel, or site which lies in
whole or in part in an irrigation district organized pursuant to chapter 87.03
RCW unless there has been provided an irrigation water right of way for each
parcel of land in such district. In addition, if the subdivision, short
subdivision, lot, tract, parcel, or site lies within land within the district classified
as irrigable, completed irrigation water distribution facilities for such land
may be required by the irrigation district by resolution, bylaw, or rule of
general applicability as a condition for approval of the short plat or final
plat by the ((legislative authority of the)) city, town, or county.
Rights of way shall be evidenced by the respective plats submitted for final
approval to the ((appropriate legislative authority)) city, town, or
county. In addition, if the subdivision, short subdivision, lot, tract,
parcel, or site to be platted is wholly or partially within an irrigation
district of two hundred thousand acres or more and has been previously platted
by the United States bureau of reclamation as a farm unit in the district, the
((legislative authority)) city, town, or county shall not approve
for such land a short plat or final plat as defined in RCW 58.17.020 without
the approval of the irrigation district and the administrator or manager of the
project of the bureau of reclamation, or its successor agency, within which
that district lies. Compliance with the requirements of this section together
with all other applicable provisions of this chapter shall be a prerequisite,
within the expressed purpose of this chapter, to any sale, lease, or
development of land in this state.

Sec.
15. RCW
58.17.330 and 1995 c 347 s 429 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As an alternative to those provisions of this chapter requiring a planning
commission to hear and issue recommendations for plat approval, the county or
city legislative ((body)) authority may adopt a hearing examiner
system and shall specify by ordinance the legal effect of the decisions made by
the examiner. The legal effect of such decisions shall include one of the
following:

(a)
The decision may be given the effect of a recommendation to the legislative ((body))
authority;

(b)
The decision may be given the effect of an administrative decision appealable
within a specified time limit to the legislative ((body)) authority;
or

(c)
The decision may be given the effect of a final decision of the legislative ((body))
authority.

The
legislative authority shall prescribe procedures to be followed by a hearing
examiner.

(2) Each final decision of a hearing examiner shall be in writing
and shall include findings and conclusions, based on the record, to support the
decision. Each final decision of a hearing examiner, unless a longer period is
mutually agreed to by the applicant and the hearing examiner, shall be rendered
within ten working days following conclusion of all testimony and hearings.

---
END ---