BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 29.79 RCW to read as follows:

The
attorney general shall prepare a comprehensive summary of each initiative to
the people that is certified to the ballot and each initiative to the
legislature, and any alternative measure proposed by the legislature that will
appear on the ballot. The comprehensive summary must include a detailed
description of the initiative provisions, a discussion of potential
constitutional issues that may arise from the initiative if it were to be
approved by state voters, and an executive summary of the description and
potential constitutional issues. The detailed description, and in particular
the executive summary, must be written in clear and concise language and avoid
legal and technical terms when possible. The comprehensive summary must be
available online from the secretary of state's website. The executive summary
must be included in the state voters' pamphlet.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 29.79 RCW to read as follows:

The
office of financial management shall prepare a fiscal note for each initiative
to the people that is certified to the ballot and each initiative to the
legislature, and any alternative measure proposed by the legislature that will
appear on the ballot. The fiscal note must describe any projected increases or
decreases in revenues, costs, expenditures, or indebtedness that the state and
local governments will experience if the initiative measure were approved by
state voters. The fiscal note must include an executive summary of these
fiscal impacts that is written in clear and concise language and avoids legal
and technical terms when possible, and may include easy to understand
graphics. The fiscal note must be available online from the secretary of
state's website. The executive summary must be included in the state voters'
pamphlet.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 29.81 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to other information required to be included in the
voters' pamphlet on an initiative, the secretary of state shall include the
initiative's comprehensive summary prepared under section 1 of this act and the
initiative's fiscal note prepared under section 2 of this act. This additional
information must be presented highlighting the executive summaries.

---
END ---