BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.08.020 and 1998 c 321 s 36 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this
state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price.

(2)
There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail
car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal
to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected
under this subsection shall be deposited and distributed in the same manner as
motor vehicle excise tax revenue collected under RCW 82.44.020(1).

(3)
There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in
this state equal to one-tenth percent of the selling price. The tax shall be
credited against the tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section. The
revenue collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the parks renewal
and stewardship account.

(4)
The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive retail sales of
the same property.

(((4)))
(5) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter
82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

RCW
43.135.035(4) does not apply to RCW 82.08.020(3).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect January 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The
secretary of state shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and
ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this
state, in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and
the laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

---
END ---