BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that increased public demand for recreation, fish and
wildlife conservation, and protection of water quality has complicated public
lands management and created new challenges for the department of natural
resources. These pressures can conflict with the ability and demand to
generate near term revenue for the trust beneficiaries and recipients of forest
board land revenues, and can also increase management costs.

(2)
The legislature finds that roadless areas are a valuable resource in providing
important public benefits such as recreation, fish and wildlife habitat, and
protection of water quality.

(3)
The legislature further finds it to be in the public interest to protect
certain state public lands that are difficult to manage for revenue production
because these lands are extensively and intensively used for either
recreational, or important ecological purposes, or both.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout sections 3 and 4 of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"State public lands" means all granted or trust lands, and all forest
board lands, including both transfer and purchase lands.

(2)
"Roadless area" means any portion of state public land in which (a)
more than one thousand contiguous acres of the state public land contains no
roads, or (b) more than five hundred contiguous acres of the state public land
contains no roads and such acreage is adjacent to a federal wilderness area or other
federal forest land not managed for timber harvest, such as a late successional
reserve under the northwest forest plan.

(3)
"Road" means any right-of-way maintained by the state that is capable
of being traveled on by a high-clearance vehicle.

(4)
"Department" means department of natural resources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
department is directed to commence a study of state public lands to determine
the existence of, and map exact locations of, all roadless areas. The study
must also name each roadless area so identified, and describe its
characteristics. The description for each area shall include its natural
features, the value of timber or other merchantable resources, exceptional
ecological functions including habitat for rare and protected species, present
public uses, and any department plans to sell or lease rights to any of these
resources. The department must notify interested parties of this process and
solicit information and comment from the public. The department is to report
its findings to the house of representatives natural resources committee by
February 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Before July, 2001, the department may not (1) sell any rights nor issue any
permits in roadless areas with respect to resources in roadless areas; or (2)
permit the building of roads across such roadless areas in order to reach
adjacent state public lands if other reasonable access routes exist.

---
END ---