BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
52.12.150 and 1994 c 28 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Without
obtaining a permit issued under RCW 70.94.650, fire protection district fire
fighters may set fire to structures located outside of urban growth areas in
counties that plan under the requirements of RCW 36.70A.040, and outside of any
city with a population of ten thousand or more in all other counties, for
instruction in methods of fire fighting, if all of the following conditions are
met:

(1)
The training fire conforms with ((any other permits, licenses, or
approvals that are required)) WAC 296-305-05501;

(2)
The fire is not located in an area that is declared to be in an air pollution
episode or any stage of an impaired air quality as defined in RCW 70.94.715 and
70.94.473;

(3)
Nuisance laws are applicable to the fire, including nuisances related to the
unreasonable interference with the enjoyment of life and property and the
depositing of particulate matter or ash on other property;

(4)
Notice of the fire is provided to the owners of property adjoining the property
on which the fire will occur, to other persons who potentially will be impacted
by the fire, and to additional persons in a broader manner as specifically
requested by the local air pollution control agency or the department of
ecology;

(5)
Each structure that is proposed to be set on fire must be identified
specifically as a structure to be set on fire. Each other structure on the
same parcel of property that is not proposed to be set on fire must be
identified specifically as a structure not to be set on fire; and

(6) Before setting a structure on fire, a good-faith inspection is
conducted by the fire agency or fire protection district conducting the
training fire to determine if materials containing asbestos are present,
the inspection is documented in writing and forwarded to the appropriate local
air authority or the department of ecology if there is no local air authority,
and asbestos that is found is removed as required by state and federal laws.

---
END ---