BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.14.140 and 1998 c 258 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For the purposes of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, "sufficient
cause" shall be defined as the nonuse of all or a portion of the water by
the owner of a water right for a period of five or more consecutive years where
such nonuse occurs as a result of:

(a)
Drought, or other unavailability of water;

(b)
Active service in the armed forces of the United States during military crisis;

(c)
Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;

(d)
The operation of legal proceedings;

(e)
Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands or water rights
which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the owner of the water right;

(f)
Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either directly or through
the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a federal program implementing those
laws, or acreage limitations, or production quotas.

(2)
Notwithstanding any other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, there
shall be no relinquishment of any water right:

(a)
If such right is claimed for power development purposes under chapter 90.16 RCW
and annual license fees are paid in accordance with chapter 90.16 RCW;

(b)
If such right is used for a standby or reserve water supply to be used in time
of drought or other low flow period so long as withdrawal or diversion
facilities are maintained in good operating condition for the use of such
reserve or standby water supply;

(c)
If such right is claimed for a determined future development to take place
either within fifteen years of July 1, 1967, or the most recent beneficial use
of the water right, whichever date is later;

(d)
If such right is claimed for municipal water supply purposes under chapter
90.03 RCW;

(e)
If such waters are not subject to appropriation under the applicable provisions
of RCW 90.40.030; ((or))

(f)
If such right or portion of the right is leased to another person for use on
land other than the land to which the right is appurtenant as long as the
lessee makes beneficial use of the right in accordance with this chapter and a
transfer or change of the right has been approved by the department in
accordance with RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100; or

(g)
If such right is a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.38.020 and 1989 c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The department may acquire water rights, including but not limited to storage
rights, by purchase, gift, or other appropriate means other than by
condemnation, from any person or entity or combination of persons or entities.
Once acquired, such rights are trust water rights. A water right acquired
by the state that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream
purposes shall be administered as a trust water right in compliance with that
condition.

(b)
If an aquatic species is listed as threatened or endangered under the federal
endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) for a body of water,
certain instream flows are needed for the species, and the holder of a right to
water from the body of water chooses to donate all or a portion of the person's
water right to the trust water system to assist in providing those instream
flows on a temporary or permanent basis, the department shall accept the
donation on such terms as the person may prescribe as long as the donation
satisfies the requirements of subsection (4) of this section. Once accepted,
such rights are trust water rights within the conditions prescribed by the
donor.

(2)
The department may make such other arrangements, including entry into contracts
with other persons or entities as appropriate to ensure that trust water rights
acquired in accordance with this chapter can be exercised to the fullest
possible extent.

(3)
The trust water rights may be acquired on a temporary or permanent basis.

(4)
A water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall not exceed
the extent to which the water right was exercised during any of the five years
before the donation nor may the total of any portion of the water right
remaining with the donor plus the donated portion of the water right exceed the
extent to which the water right was exercised during any of the five years
before the donation. If, upon appeal from a determination by the department,
it is found that exercising the trust water right resulting from the donation
or exercising a portion of that trust water right impairs existing water rights
in violation of RCW 90.38.902, the donation shall be altered to eliminate the
impairment.

(5)
Any water right conveyed to the trust water right system that is expressly
conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall be managed by the
department for public purposes to ensure that it qualifies as a gift that is
deductible for federal income taxation purposes for the person or entity
conveying the water right.

Sec.
3. RCW
90.38.040 and 1994 c 264 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All trust water rights acquired by the department shall be placed in the Yakima
river basin trust water rights program to be managed by the department. The department
shall issue a water right certificate in the name of the state of Washington
for each trust water right it acquires.

(2)
Trust water rights shall retain the same priority date as the water right from
which they originated. Trust water rights may be modified as to purpose or
place of use or point of diversion, including modification from a diversionary
use to a nondiversionary instream use.

(3)
Trust water rights may be held by the department for instream flows and/or
irrigation use.

(4)
A schedule of the amount of net water saved as a result of water conservation
projects carried out in accordance with this chapter, shall be developed
annually to reflect the predicted hydrologic and water supply conditions, as
well as anticipated water demands, for the upcoming irrigation season. This
schedule shall serve as the basis for the distribution and management of trust
water rights each year.

(5)(a)
No exercise of a trust water right may be authorized unless the department
first determines that no existing water rights, junior or senior in priority,
will be impaired as to their exercise or injured in any manner whatever by such
authorization. Before any trust water right is exercised, the department shall
publish notice thereof in a newspaper of general circulation published in the
county or counties in which the storage, diversion, and use are to be made, and
in such other newspapers as the department determines are necessary, once a
week for two consecutive weeks. At the same time the department may also send
notice thereof containing pertinent information to the director of fish and
wildlife.

(b)
Subsection (5)(a) of this section does not apply to a trust water right
resulting from a donation for instream flows described in RCW 90.38.020(1).
However, the department shall provide the notice described in (a) of this
subsection the first time the trust water right resulting from the donation is
exercised.

(6)
RCW 90.03.380 and 90.14.140 through 90.14.910 shall have no applicability to
trust water rights held by the department under this chapter or exercised under
this section.

Sec.
4. RCW
90.42.040 and 1993 c 98 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All trust water rights acquired by the state shall be placed in the state trust
water rights program to be managed by the department. Trust water rights
acquired by the state shall be held or authorized for use by the department for
instream flows, irrigation, municipal, or other beneficial uses consistent with
applicable regional plans for pilot planning areas, or to resolve critical
water supply problems.

(2)
The department shall issue a water right certificate in the name of the state
of Washington for each permanent trust water right conveyed to the state
indicating the reach or reaches of the stream, the quantity, and the use or
uses to which it may be applied. A superseding certificate shall be issued
that specifies the amount of water the water right holder would continue to be
entitled to as a result of the water conservation project. The superseding
certificate shall retain the same priority date as the original right. For
nonpermanent conveyances, the department shall issue certificates or such other
instruments as are necessary to reflect the changes in purpose or place of use
or point of diversion or withdrawal. Water rights for which such nonpermanent
conveyances are arranged shall not be subject to relinquishment for nonuse.

(3)
A trust water right retains the same priority date as the water right from
which it originated, but as between them the trust right shall be deemed to be
inferior in priority unless otherwise specified by an agreement between the
state and the party holding the original right.

(4)
Exercise of a trust water right may be authorized only if the department first
determines that neither water rights existing at the time the trust water right
is established, nor the public interest will be impaired. If impairment
becomes apparent during the time a trust water right is being exercised, the
department shall cease or modify the use of the trust water right to eliminate
the impairment.

(5)
Before any trust water right is created or modified, the department shall, at a
minimum, require that a notice be published in a newspaper of general
circulation published in the county or counties in which the storage,
diversion, and use are to be made, and in other newspapers as the department
determines is necessary, once a week for two consecutive weeks. At the same
time the department shall send a notice containing pertinent information to all
appropriate state agencies, potentially affected local governments and
federally recognized tribal governments, and other interested parties.

(6)
RCW 90.14.140 through 90.14.230 have no applicability to trust water rights
held by the department under this chapter or exercised under this section.

(7)
RCW 90.03.380 has no applicability to trust water rights acquired by the state
through the funding of water conservation projects.

(8)
Subsections (4) and (5) of this section do not apply to a trust water right
resulting from a donation for instream flows described in RCW 90.42.080(1)(b).
However, the department shall provide the notice described in subsection (5) of
this section the first time the trust water right resulting from the donation
is exercised.

Sec.
5. RCW
90.42.080 and 1993 c 98 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The state may acquire all or portions of existing water rights, by purchase,
gift, or other appropriate means other than by condemnation, from any person or
entity or combination of persons or entities. Once acquired, such rights are
trust water rights. A water right acquired by the state that is expressly
conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall be administered as a
trust water right in compliance with that condition.

(b)
If an aquatic species is listed as threatened or endangered under the federal
endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) for a body of water,
certain instream flows are needed for the species, and the holder of a right to
water from the body of water chooses to donate all or a portion of the person's
water right to the trust water system to assist in providing those instream
flows on a temporary or permanent basis, the department shall accept the
donation on such terms as the person may prescribe as long as the donation
satisfies the requirements of subsection (4) of this section. Once accepted,
such rights are trust water rights within the conditions prescribed by the
donor.

(2)
The department may enter into leases, contracts, or such other arrangements
with other persons or entities as appropriate, to ensure that trust water
rights acquired in accordance with this chapter may be exercised to the fullest
possible extent.

(3)
Trust water rights may be acquired by the state on a temporary or permanent
basis.

(4)
A water right donated under subsection (1)(b) of this section shall not
exceed the extent to which the water right was exercised during any of the five
years before the donation nor may the total of any portion of the water right
remaining with the donor plus the donated portion of the water right exceed the
extent to which the water right was exercised during any of the five years
before the donation. If, upon appeal from a determination by the department,
it is found that exercising the trust water right resulting from the donation
or exercising a portion of that trust water right impairs existing water rights
in violation of RCW 90.42.070, the donation shall be altered to eliminate the
impairment.

(5)
The provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.03.390 do not apply to donations for
instream flows described in subsection (1)(b) of this section, but do apply
to other transfers of water rights under this section.

(((5)))
(6) No funds may be expended for the purchase of water rights by the
state pursuant to this section unless specifically appropriated for this
purpose by the legislature.

(7) Any water right conveyed to the trust water right system
that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall be
managed by the department for public purposes to ensure that it qualifies as a
gift that is deductible for federal income taxation purposes for the person or
entity conveying the water right.

---
END ---