BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
No public body may operate a free-flowing well for public use on a year-round
basis under RCW 90.36.030(2) or 90.44.110(4) without first registering its
authority to operate the well in this manner with the department of ecology.
Any public body desiring to operate a free-flow well for public use on a
year-round basis under RCW 90.36.030(2) or 90.44.110(4) shall file a statement
of claim with the department identifying how each of the requirements listed in
RCW 90.36.030(2) or 90.44.110(4) are satisfied, attesting that the well
satisfies those requirements, and identifying the water right for the well as
it is represented by a statement of claim that has been filed in the water
rights claims registry or a water right permit or certificate that has been issued
under chapter 90.44 RCW. Upon receiving such a statement of claim for the
free-flowing well, the department shall file the statement in a portion of the
water rights claims registry reserved for claims to the right to operate such
wells in the manner authorized by RCW 90.36.030(2) and 90.44.110(4).

Filing
of such a claim is required to use the well as authorized by RCW 90.36.030(2)
and 90.44.110(4), but does not in itself establish or represent a water right
to use the well. Such a statement of claim may be filed at any time under this
section. The provisions of this subsection (1) are null and void if any of the
provisions of subsection (2) of this section are vetoed by June 30, 2000.

(2)(a)
Certain persons who submitted a water right claim form with the department
between September 1, 1997, and June 30, 1998, and whose claim was rejected by
the department because the department deemed the claim to be incomplete
and thus not in compliance with RCW 90.14.051 may submit additional information
as provided in (b) of this subsection in support of the claim between July 1,
2000, and December 31, 2000. The persons eligible to submit additional
information under this section and to receive further consideration for the
registering of their claims are those who meet the following qualifications:

(i)
The person checked the box labeled "other" on the water right claim
form in part 12 where it asks the claimant to state the legal doctrine under
which the person is claiming a water right;

(ii)
The premise of the person's claim of a water right for ground water is that a
right to ground water was inherent in and appurtenant to the original land
patent issued by the federal government at the time the person's land was
severed from federal ownership. The original water right claim form submitted
to the department need not have asserted this premise for the person to be
qualified to receive further consideration under this section.

(b)
Persons meeting the qualifications in (a) of this subsection may submit to the
department a statement that their claim to a ground water right is based on the
assertion that such right accompanied the federally issued land patent for
lands they now own or occupy. The claimant must also submit with his or her
statement a bona fide copy of the original land patent document issued by the
United States. The water right claim of a person meeting the qualifications
established in this section and submitting the statement and bona fide copy of
his or her land patent as required by this subsection (2)(b) is deemed
sufficient in lieu of compliance with RCW 90.14.051 and 90.14.068 and shall be
accepted for filing in the water rights claims registry by the department.

(c)
This section does not apply to other claims the department rejected as
ineligible for filing under RCW 90.14.068 (5) or (6), for failure to submit a
substantially complete statement of claim as required in RCW 90.14.051, for
failure to remit the filing fee required by RCW 90.14.061, or for submitting a
claim for a purpose that is exempt from the requirement to submit a claim under
RCW 90.14.041. The registering of claims under this section as directed by the
legislature confers upon those claims no special status or recognition and is
subject to this chapter as is any other claim submitted in a timely manner.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.36.030 and 1929 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, it shall be
the duty of every person, firm, corporation or company having possession or
control of any artesian well, as provided in RCW 90.36.020, to securely cap the
same over on or before the fifteenth day of October in each and every year in
such manner as to prevent the flow or escape of water therefrom, and to keep
the same securely capped and prevent the flow or escape of water therefrom
until the fifteenth day of March next ensuing((; PROVIDED, HOWEVER,)).

(2)
It ((shall and may be)) is lawful for any such person, firm,
corporation or company to insert a three-quarters inch stop and waste cock in
the piping of such well, and to take and use water therefrom through such stop
and waste cock at any time for household, stock, or domestic purposes, but not
otherwise.

(3)
Any well completed into a confined aquifer shall be allowed to flow freely for
public uses if:

(a)
The public body referred to in (d) of this subsection files a statement of
claim of the free-flowing public use of the well under section 1 of this act;

(b)
The well is constructed according to state law and agency rules pertaining to
well construction;

(c)
The well has a discharge rate not to exceed twelve gallons per minute;

(d)
The well is owned, operated, and maintained by a recognized public body and the
public body files a written request with the department of ecology that the
well be allowed to flow freely for public uses;

(e)
The operator of the well ensures the unused portion of the flow is piped from
the well head and discharged directly into a surface water body within the
limits of a city; and

(f)
The discharge does not allow for any degradation of water quality.

As
used in this subsection, "public body" means the state of Washington
or any agency, political subdivision, taxing district, or municipal or public
corporation thereof.

Sec.
3. RCW
90.44.110 and 1987 c 109 s 114 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No public ground waters that have been withdrawn shall be wasted without
economical beneficial use. Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and
(4) of this section, the department shall require:

(a)
All wells producing waters which contaminate other waters to be plugged or
capped((. The department shall also require)); and

(b)
All flowing wells to be so capped or equipped with valves that the flow of
water can be completely stopped when the wells are not in use under the terms
of their respective permits or approved declarations of vested rights((. Likewise,
the department shall also require)); and

(c)
Both flowing and nonflowing wells to be so constructed and maintained as to
prevent the waste of public ground waters through leaky casings, pipes,
fittings, valves, or pumps‑-either above or below the land surface((:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)).

(2)
The withdrawal of reasonable quantities of public ground water in
connection with the construction, development, testing, or repair of a well
shall not be construed as waste((; also, that)).

(3)
The inadvertent loss of ((such)) water owing to breakage of a pump,
valve, pipe, or fitting shall not be construed as waste if reasonable diligence
is shown by the permittee in effecting the necessary repair.

(4)
Any well completed into a confined aquifer shall be allowed to flow freely for
public uses if:

(a)
The public body referred to in (d) of this subsection files a statement of
claim of the free-flowing public use of the well under section 1 of this act;

(b)
The well is constructed according to state law and agency rules pertaining to
well construction;

(c)
The well has a discharge rate not to exceed twelve gallons per minute;

(d)
The well is owned, operated, and maintained by a recognized public body and the
public body files a written request with the department of ecology that the
well be allowed to flow freely for public uses;

(e)
The operator of the well ensures the unused portion of the flow is piped from
the well head and discharged directly into a surface water body within the
limits of a city; and

(f)
The discharge does not allow for any degradation of water quality.

As
used in this subsection, "public body" means the state of Washington
or any agency, political subdivision, taxing district, or municipal or public
corporation thereof.

(5) In the issuance of an original permit, or of an
amendment to an original permit or certificate of vested right to withdraw and
appropriate public ground waters under the provisions of this chapter, the
department may, as in ((his)) its judgment is necessary, specify
for the proposed well or wells or other works a manner of construction adequate
to accomplish the provisions of this section.

---
END ---