BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this act is to ensure that certain moneys that are dedicated to
providing salmonid screening are expended to provide such screening in an area
of the state that requires the screening immediately to assist in responding to
endangered species listing under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C.
Sec. 1531 et seq.).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to 1999 sp.s. c 13 to read as follows:

This
section applies to any moneys appropriated by section 22, chapter 13, Laws of
1999 sp. sess. that are allocated and used for providing salmonid screening.
The highest priority shall be given to providing such screening in the Methow
river valley. Moneys from the appropriation may be allocated and used to
provide salmonid screening elsewhere to the extent that these moneys are in
excess of the amounts needed to provide moneys for salmonid screening in the
Methow river valley. Any such screening provided for a point of diversion for
a water right in the Methow river valley shall be sized to accommodate: Not
less than the annual amount of water diverted at that point of diversion during
any of the five years beginning with calendar year 1994 and ending with
calendar year 1998; and not less than the instantaneous amount of water
diverted at that point of diversion at the peak of diversion during any of
those five calendar years.

Sec.
3. 1999
c 309 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 42,896,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 42,443,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 42,755,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 14,416,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 490,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 6,432,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 586,000

Recreational
Fisheries Enhancement Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 3,596,000

Salmon
Recovery Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 9,316,000

Warm
Water Game Fish Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 2,419,000

Eastern
Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 551,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation............... $ 40,293,000

Wildlife
Account‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 40,040,000

Wildlife
Account‑-Private/Local Appropriation........ $........................................... 13,072,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-State Appropriation... $................................................ 1,939,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Federal

Appropriation................................... $ 9,603,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation................................... $ 350,000

Environmental
Excellence Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 15,000

Regional
Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation........................... $ 750,000

Oil
Spill Administration Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 969,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 272,931,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,252,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,244,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
agency action items DFW-01, DFW-02, DFW-03, DFW-04, and DFW-05.

(2)
$776,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation and $775,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the department's
review of forest practices applications and related hydraulic permit
applications. Up to $387,500 of the general fund‑-federal amount may be
expended in each fiscal year of the biennium only if the state receives greater
than $25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon recovery activities in
that fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be
expended in fiscal year 2001.

(3)
$1,500,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation and $1,500,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to
update the salmon and steelhead stock inventory and, in cooperation with the
department of ecology, to establish fish and habitat index monitoring sites to
measure the effectiveness of salmon recovery activities. Up to $750,000 of the
general fund‑-federal amount may be expended in each fiscal year of the
biennium only if the state receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal
government for salmon recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds
authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year
2001.

(4)
$232,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $232,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for the control of European green crab (Carcinus maenas).
The department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate
legislative committees by September 1, 2000, evaluating the effectiveness of
various control strategies and providing recommendations on long-term control
strategies. $248,000 of this amount is for implementation of Puget Sound work
plan and agency action item DFW-23.

(5)
$191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for noxious weed control and survey activities on department
lands. Of this amount, $48,000 is provided for the biological control of
yellowstar thistle.

(6)
All salmon habitat restoration and protection projects proposed for funding by
regional fisheries enhancement groups shall be submitted by January 1st or July
1st of each year for review to the salmon recovery funding board.

(7)
$2,340,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation and $7,000,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely to implement a
license buy-back program for commercial fishing licenses.

(8)
$511,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $488,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided to employ residents of the state between eighteen and
twenty-five years of age in activities to enhance Washington's natural,
historic, environmental, and recreational resources.

(9)
Any indirect cost reimbursement received by the department from federal grants
must be spent on agency administrative activities and cannot be redirected to
direct program activities.

(10)
$43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for staffing and operation of the Tennant Lake interpretive
center.

(11)
$32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$33,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to support the activities of the aquatic nuisance species
coordination committee to foster state, federal, tribal, and private
cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues. The committee shall strive to
prevent the introduction of nonnative aquatic species and to minimize the
spread of species that are introduced.

(12)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5508 (crab catch record cards).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(13)
$6,440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$5,796,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
$12,260,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation, $710,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation, and $500,000 of the public
safety and education account appropriation are provided solely for operation of
the enforcement division. Within these funds, the department shall emphasize
enforcement of laws related to protection of fish habitat and the illegal
harvest of salmon and steelhead. Within these funds, the department shall
provide support to the department of health to enforce state shellfish harvest
laws.

(14)
$500,000 of the salmon recovery account, $624,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000, and $624,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for the department to
implement a hatchery endangered species act response. The strategy shall include
emergency hatchery responses and retrofitting of hatcheries for salmon
recovery.

(15)
$45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$46,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for operation of the Rod Meseberg (ringold) warm water fish
hatchery to implement House Bill No. 1716 (warm water fish culture). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(16)
$2,500,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for
grants to lead entities established in accordance with RCW 75.46.060.

(17)
$200,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation and $600,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for predation
control, bycatch monitoring, and selective harvest strategies. $300,000 of the
general fund‑-federal amount may be expended in each fiscal year of the
biennium only if the state receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal
government for salmon recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds
authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year
2001.

(18)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for additional field surveys of the Olympic Peninsula, North
Rainier, and Packwood/South Rainier elk herds.

(19)
$425,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely to purchase and implement the automated recreational
license data base system.

(20)
$1,400,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,400,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for fish passage barrier and screening technical
assistance, engineering services, and construction assistance for local
governments, state agencies, volunteer groups, and regional fisheries
enhancement groups.

(21)
$1,500,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation and $500,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for local salmon
recovery technical assistance. Technical assistance shall be coordinated among
all state agencies including the conservation commission, department of fish
and wildlife, department of ecology, department of health, department of
agriculture, department of transportation, state parks and recreation,
interagency committee for outdoor recreation, governor's salmon recovery
office, Puget Sound water quality action team, department of community, trade,
and economic development, and department of natural resources. $250,000 of the
general fund‑-federal amount may be expended in each fiscal year of the
biennium, only if the state receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal
government for salmon recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds
authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year 2001.

(22)
$400,000 of the wildlife account appropriation is provided solely to implement
House Bill No. 1681 (trout purchase by state). The fish and wildlife
commission may authorize expenditure of these funds only if the costs of the
program will be recovered by the increase in license sales directly
attributable to the planting of privately grown trout. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5508 (crab fishery catch
records). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(24)
$2,000,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided
for cooperative volunteer projects.

(25) In providing salmonid screening with any moneys
appropriated by this section, the highest priority shall be given to providing
such screening in the Methow river valley. Moneys appropriated by this section
may be allocated and used to provide salmonid screening elsewhere to the extent
that the moneys allocated and used for such a purpose are in excess of the
amounts needed to provide salmonid screening in the Methow river valley. Any
such screening provided for a point of diversion for a water right in the
Methow river valley shall be sized to accommodate: Not less than the annual
amount of water diverted at that point of diversion during any of the five
years beginning with calendar year 1994 and ending with calendar year 1998; and
not less than the instantaneous amount of water diverted at that point of
diversion at the peak of diversion during any of those five calendar years.

---
END ---