BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.44.024 and 1995 c 265 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No health care service contractor shall offer any health benefit plan to any
small employer without complying with the provisions of RCW 48.44.023(((5)))
(3).

(2)
Employers or individuals purchasing health plans provided through
associations or through member-governed groups formed specifically for the
purpose of purchasing health care shall not be considered small employers and
such plans shall not be subject to the provisions of RCW 48.44.023(((5)))
(3).

(3) For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan,"
"health plan," and "small employer" mean the same as
defined in RCW 48.43.005.

---
END ---