BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
intent of this act is to adopt interim measures concerning the siting of
pipelines and other energy facilities by the Washington state energy facility
site evaluation council. The legislature finds that these measures are
necessary to protect the public and the environment pending a complete review
of the current siting process for energy facilities.

Sec.
2. RCW
80.50.010 and 1996 c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that ((the present and predicted growth in)) energy
demands in the state of Washington require((s)) the development of a
procedure for the selection and utilization of sites for energy facilities and
the identification of a state position with respect to each proposed site. It
is the legislature's ((recognizes)) intent that ((the
selection of sites will have a significant impact upon the welfare of the
population, the location and growth of industry and the use of the natural
resources of the state)) certification of an energy facility supports
ongoing state efforts to foster wise and efficient energy use and promotes
energy self-sufficiency through the use of indigenous and renewable energy
resources consistent with the promotion of reliable energy sources, the general
welfare, and the protection of environmental quality.

((It
is)) The policy of the state of Washington ((to recognize the
pressing need for increased energy facilities, and to ensure through available
and reasonable methods, that the location and operation of such facilities will
produce minimal adverse effects on the environment, ecology of the land and its
wildlife, and the ecology of state waters and their aquatic life)) regarding
energy use is stated in RCW 43.21F.015. It is the policy of the state that the
siting and approval of energy facilities be consistent with the policy as
stated in RCW 43.21F.015 as well as with statutory environmental policies of
the state.

It
is the intent to seek courses of action that will balance the increasing
demands for energy facility location and operation in conjunction with the
broad interests of the public. Such action will be based on these premises:

(1)
To assure Washington state citizens that the need for such facilities within
the state is established prior to beginning the siting process.

(2)
To assure, where applicable, operational safeguards are at least as
stringent as the criteria established by the federal government and are
technically sufficient for their welfare and protection.

(((2)))
(3) To assure that local siting and land use standards are considered in the
siting process, and that local franchise agreements are not preempted in the
process.

(4)
To preserve and protect the quality of the environment; to enhance the public's
opportunity to enjoy the esthetic and recreational benefits of the air, water
and land resources; to promote air cleanliness; and to pursue beneficial
changes in the environment.

(((3)))
(5) To assure that applicants provide funding for the local government participation
in the siting process and the cost of the associated environmental studies.

(6)
To provide abundant energy at reasonable cost.

(((4)))
(7) To avoid costs of complete site restoration and demolition of
improvements and infrastructure at unfinished nuclear energy sites, and to use
unfinished nuclear energy facilities for public uses, including economic
development, under the regulatory and management control of local governments
and port districts.

Sec.
3. RCW
80.50.020 and 1995 c 69 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Applicant" means any person who makes application for a site
certification pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

(2)
"Application" means any request for approval of a particular site or sites
filed in accordance with the procedures established pursuant to this chapter,
unless the context otherwise requires;

(3)
"Person" means an individual, partnership, joint venture, private or
public corporation, association, firm, public service company, political
subdivision, municipal corporation, government agency, public utility district,
or any other entity, public or private, however organized;

(4)
"Site" means any proposed or approved location of an energy facility;

(5)
"Certification" means a binding agreement between an applicant and
the state which shall embody compliance to the siting guidelines, in effect as
of the date of certification, which have been adopted pursuant to RCW 80.50.040
as now or hereafter amended as conditions to be met prior to or concurrent with
the construction or operation of any energy facility;

(6)
"Associated facilities" means storage, transmission, handling, or
other related and supporting facilities connecting an energy plant with the
existing energy supply, processing, or distribution system, including, but not
limited to, communications, controls, mobilizing or maintenance equipment,
instrumentation, and other types of ancillary transmission equipment, off-line
storage or venting required for efficient operation or safety of the
transmission system and overhead, and surface or subsurface lines of physical
access for the inspection, maintenance, and safe operations of the transmission
facility and new transmission lines constructed to operate at nominal voltages
in excess of 200,000 volts to connect a thermal power plant to the northwest
power grid: PROVIDED, That common carrier railroads or motor vehicles shall
not be included;

(7)
"Transmission facility" means any of the following together with
their associated facilities:

(a)
Crude or refined petroleum or liquid petroleum product transmission pipeline of
the following dimensions: A pipeline larger than six inches minimum inside
diameter between valves for the transmission of these products with a total
length of at least fifteen miles;

(b)
Natural gas, synthetic fuel gas, or liquified petroleum gas transmission
pipeline of the following dimensions: A pipeline larger than fourteen inches
minimum inside diameter between valves, for the transmission of these products,
with a total length of at least fifteen miles for the purpose of delivering gas
to a distribution facility, except an interstate natural gas pipeline regulated
by the United States federal power commission;

(8)
"Independent consultants" means those persons who have no financial
interest in the applicant's proposals and who are retained by the council to
evaluate the applicant's proposals, supporting studies, or to conduct
additional studies;

(9)
"Thermal power plant" means, for the purpose of certification, any
electrical generating facility using any fuel, including nuclear materials, for
distribution of electricity by electric utilities;

(10)
"Energy facility" means an energy plant or transmission facilities:
PROVIDED, That the following are excluded from the provisions of this chapter:

(a)
Facilities for the extraction, conversion, transmission or storage of water,
other than water specifically consumed or discharged by energy production or
conversion for energy purposes; and

(b)
Facilities operated by and for the armed services for military purposes or by
other federal authority for the national defense;

(11)
"Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council created
by RCW 80.50.030;

(12)
"Counsel for the environment" means an assistant attorney general or
a special assistant attorney general who shall represent the public in
accordance with RCW 80.50.080;

(13)
"Construction" means on-site improvements, excluding exploratory
work, which cost in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars;

(14)
"Energy plant" means the following facilities together with their
associated facilities:

(a)
Any stationary thermal power plant with generating capacity of two hundred
fifty thousand kilowatts or more, measured using maximum continuous electric
generating capacity, less minimum auxiliary load, at average ambient
temperature and pressure, and floating thermal power plants of fifty thousand
kilowatts or more, including associated facilities;

(b)
Facilities which will have the capacity to receive liquified natural gas in the
equivalent of more than one hundred million standard cubic feet of natural gas
per day, which has been transported over marine waters;

(c)
Facilities which will have the capacity to receive more than an average of
fifty thousand barrels per day of crude or refined petroleum or liquified
petroleum gas which has been or will be transported over marine waters, except
that the provisions of this chapter shall not apply to storage facilities
unless occasioned by such new facility construction;

(d)
Any underground reservoir for receipt and storage of natural gas as defined in
RCW 80.40.010 capable of delivering an average of more than one hundred million
standard cubic feet of natural gas per day; and

(e)
Facilities capable of processing more than twenty-five thousand barrels per day
of petroleum into refined products;

(15)
"Land use plan" means a comprehensive plan or land use element
thereof adopted by a unit of local government pursuant to chapters 35.63,
35A.63, ((or)) 36.70, or 36.70A RCW;

(16)
"Zoning ordinance" means ((an ordinance of a unit of local
government regulating the use of land)) any controls placed on
development or land use activities by a local government and adopted
pursuant to chapters 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW or Article XI of the state
Constitution or a development regulation under chapter 36.70A RCW.

Sec.
4. RCW
80.50.040 and 1990 c 12 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
council shall have the following powers:

(1)
To adopt, promulgate, amend, or rescind suitable rules and regulations,
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, to carry out the provisions of this chapter, and
the policies and practices of the council in connection therewith;

(2)
To develop and apply environmental and ecological guidelines in relation to the
type, design, location, construction, and operational conditions of
certification of energy facilities subject to this chapter;

(3)
To establish rules of practice for the conduct of public hearings pursuant to
the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, as found in chapter 34.05
RCW;

(4)
To prescribe the form, content, and necessary supporting documentation for site
certification;

(5)
To receive applications for energy facility locations and to investigate the
sufficiency thereof;

(6)
To make and contract, when applicable, for independent studies of sites
proposed by the applicant;

(7)
To conduct hearings on the proposed location of the energy facilities;

(8)
To prepare written reports to the governor which shall include: (a) A
statement indicating whether the application is in compliance with the
council's guidelines, (b) criteria specific to the site and transmission line
routing, (c) a council recommendation as to the disposition of the application,
and (d) a draft certification agreement when the council recommends approval of
the application;

(9)
To prescribe the means for monitoring of the effects arising from the
construction and the operation of energy facilities to assure continued
compliance with terms of certification and/or permits issued by the council
pursuant to chapter 90.48 RCW or subsection (12) of this section: PROVIDED,
That any on-site inspection required by the council shall be performed by other
state agencies pursuant to interagency agreement: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
council shall retain authority for determining compliance relative to
monitoring;

(10)
To integrate its site evaluation activity with activities of federal agencies
having jurisdiction in such matters to avoid unnecessary duplication;

(11)
To present state concerns and interests to other states, regional organizations,
and the federal government on the location, construction, and operation of any
energy facility which may affect the environment, health, or safety of the
citizens of the state of Washington;

(12)
To issue permits in compliance with applicable provisions of the federally
approved state implementation plan adopted in accordance with the Federal Clean
Air Act, as ((now existing or hereafter amended)) it exists on
January 1, 2000, for the new construction, reconstruction, or enlargement
or operation of energy facilities: PROVIDED, That such permits shall become
effective only if the governor approves an application for certification and
executes a certification agreement pursuant to this chapter: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That all such permits be conditioned upon compliance with all
provisions of the federally approved state implementation plan which apply to
energy facilities covered within the provisions of this chapter; and

(13)
To serve as an interagency coordinating body for energy-related issues.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 80.50 RCW to read as follows:

The
council shall adopt rules which describe the process for determining whether
the energy facility is needed within the state. The process must include an
opportunity for public participation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 80.50 RCW to read as follows:

Once
the council determines that the applicant has demonstrated the facility is
needed within the state, the council may begin an informal proceeding to
determine whether the project is consistent with the state environmental policy
act under chapter 43.21C RCW.

Sec.
7. RCW
80.50.060 and 1977 ex.s. c 371 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of this chapter shall apply to the construction of energy facilities
which includes the new construction of energy facilities and the reconstruction
or enlargement of existing energy facilities where the net increase in physical
capacity or dimensions resulting from such reconstruction or enlargement meets
or exceeds those capacities or dimensions set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (7) and (((17),
as now or hereafter amended)) (14). No construction of such energy
facilities may be undertaken, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, ((after
July 15, 1977,)) without first obtaining certification in the manner
provided in this chapter.

(2)
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to normal maintenance and
repairs which do not increase the capacity or dimensions beyond those set forth
in RCW 80.50.020 (7) and (((17), as now or hereafter amended)) (14).

(3)
The council shall only consider completed applications for certification
of energy facilities ((made prior to July 15, 1977 shall continue to be
governed by the applicable provisions of law in effect on the day immediately
preceding July 15, 1977 with the exceptions of RCW 80.50.190 and 80.50.071
which shall apply to such prior applications and to site certifications
prospectively from July 15, 1977)). The requirements for a fully
completed application shall be defined by administrative rule adopted by the
council. The rules adopted in section 5 of this act shall govern applications
made between January 1, 2000, and the date of the final adoption of such rules
adopted under section 5 of this act.

(4)
Applications for certification shall be upon forms prescribed by the council
and shall be supported by such information and technical studies as the council
may require.

Sec.
8. RCW
80.50.071 and 1977 ex.s. c 371 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The council shall receive all applications for energy facility site
certification. The following fees or charges for application processing or
certification monitoring shall be paid by the applicant or certificate holder:

(a)
A fee of twenty-five thousand dollars for each proposed site, to be applied
toward the cost of the independent consultant study authorized in this
subsection, shall accompany the application and shall be a condition precedent
to any further consideration or action on the application by the council. The
council shall commission its own independent consultant study to measure the
consequences of the proposed energy facility on the environment for each site
application. The council shall direct the consultant to study any matter which
it deems essential to an adequate appraisal of the site. The full cost of the
study shall be paid by the applicant: PROVIDED, That said costs exceeding a
total of the twenty-five thousand dollars paid pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of
this section shall be payable ((subject to)) by the applicant ((giving
prior approval to such excess amount)) as provided in this section.

(b)(i)
Each applicant shall, in addition to the costs of the independent consultant
provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section, pay such reasonable costs as are
actually and necessarily incurred by the council in processing the
application. Such costs shall include, but are not limited to, costs of a
hearing examiner, a court reporter, additional staff salaries, wages and
employee benefits, goods and services, travel expenses within the state and
miscellaneous expenses, as arise directly from processing such application.

(ii)
Each applicant shall, at the time of application submission, deposit twenty
thousand dollars, or such lesser amount as may be specified by council rule, to
cover costs provided for by subsection (1)(b)(i) of this section.
Reasonable and necessary costs of the council directly attributable to
application processing shall be charged against such deposit.

(iii)
The council shall submit to each applicant a statement of such expenditures
actually made during the preceding calendar quarter which shall be in
sufficient detail to explain such expenditures. The applicant shall pay the
state treasurer the amount of such statement to restore the total amount on
deposit to the originally established level: PROVIDED, That such applicant
may, at the request of the council, increase the amount of funds on deposit to
cover anticipated expenses during peak periods of application processing. Any
funds remaining unexpended at the conclusion of application processing shall be
refunded to the applicant, or at the applicant's option, credited against
required deposits of certificate holders.

(c)(i)
Each certificate holder shall pay such reasonable costs as are actually and
necessarily incurred by the council for inspection and determination of
compliance by the certificate holder with the terms of the certification
relative to monitoring the effects of construction and operation of the
facility.

(ii)
Each certificate holder, within thirty days of execution of the site
certification agreement, shall deposit twenty thousand dollars, or such other
amount as may be specified by council rule, to cover costs provided for by
subsection (1)(c)(i) of this section. Reasonable and necessary costs of
the council directly attributable to inspection and determination of compliance
by the certificate holder with the terms of the certification relative to
monitoring the effects of construction and operation of the facility shall be
charged against such deposit.

(iii)
The council shall submit to each certificate holder a statement of such
expenditures actually made during the preceding calendar quarter which shall be
in sufficient detail to explain such expenditures. The certificate holder
shall pay the state treasurer the amount of such statement to restore the total
amount on deposit to the originally established level: PROVIDED, That if the
actual, reasonable, and necessary expenditures for inspection and determination
of compliance in the preceding calendar quarter have exceeded the amount of
funds on deposit, such excess costs shall be paid by the certificate holder.

(d)
A fee of twenty-five thousand dollars, or such greater amount that may be
specified by council rule, for each county in which the facility will be
sited. The fee shall accompany the application and shall be a condition
precedent to any further consideration or action on the application by the council.
The fee shall be applied toward the cost of the county's independent
environmental studies and the county's actual cost of participating in the
council's proceedings. The fee shall be deposited with the state treasurer and
dispersed upon the request of the council after its approval of the county's
billings.

(2)
If an applicant or certificate holder fails to provide the initial deposit, or
if subsequently required payments are not received within thirty days following
receipt of the statement from the council, the council may (a) in the case of
the applicant, suspend processing of the application until payment is received;
or (b) in the case of a certificate holder, suspend the certification.

(3)
All payments required of the applicant or certificate holder under this section
are to be made to the state treasurer who shall make payments as instructed by
the council from the funds submitted. All such funds shall be subject to state
auditing procedures. Any unexpended portions thereof shall be returned to the
applicant or certificate holder.

Sec.
9. RCW
80.50.090 and 1989 c 175 s 173 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The council shall conduct a public hearing in the county of the proposed site
within sixty days of receipt of an application for site certification:
PROVIDED, That the place of such public hearing shall be as close as practical
to the proposed site.

(2)
The council must determine at the initial public hearing whether ((or not)):
(a) The facility is needed within the state and county; and (b) the
proposed site is consistent and in compliance with county or regional land use
plans or zoning ordinances. If it is determined that the proposed site does
conform with existing land use plans or zoning ordinances in effect as of the
date of the application, the county or regional planning authority shall not
thereafter change such land use plans or zoning ordinances so as to affect the
proposed site.

(3)
Prior to the issuance of a council recommendation to the governor under RCW
80.50.100 a public hearing, conducted as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act, shall be held. At such
public hearing any person shall be entitled to be heard in support of or in
opposition to the application for certification.

(4) Additional public hearings shall be held as deemed appropriate
by the council in the exercise of its functions under this chapter.

Sec.
10. RCW
80.50.105 and 1991 c 200 s 1112 are each amended to read as follows:

In
making its recommendations to the governor under this chapter regarding an
application that includes transmission facilities for petroleum products, the
council shall give ((appropriate)) great weight to city or county
facility siting and land use standards ((adopted for the protection
of sole source aquifers)).

Sec.
11. RCW
80.50.110 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 108 s 37 are each amended to read as
follows:

(1)
If any provision of this chapter is in conflict with any other provision,
limitation, or restriction which is now in effect under any other law of this
state, or any rule or regulation promulgated thereunder, this chapter shall
govern and control and such other law or rule or regulation promulgated
thereunder shall be deemed superseded for the purposes of this chapter.

(2)
The state hereby preempts, with the exception of local franchise agreements,
the regulation and certification of the location, construction, and operational
conditions of certification of the energy facilities included under RCW
80.50.060 ((as now or hereafter amended)).

Sec.
12. RCW
80.50.150 and 1979 ex.s. c 254 s 2 and 1979 c 41 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
The courts are authorized to grant such restraining orders, and such temporary
and permanent injunctive relief as is necessary to secure compliance with this
chapter and/or with a site certification agreement issued pursuant to this
chapter or a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System (hereafter in this
section, NPDES) permit issued by the council pursuant to chapter 90.48 RCW or
any permit issued pursuant to RCW 80.50.040(14). The court may assess civil
penalties in an amount not less than one thousand dollars per day nor more than
twenty-five thousand dollars per day for each day of construction or operation
in material violation of this chapter, or in material violation of any site
certification agreement issued pursuant to this chapter, or in violation of any
NPDES permit issued by the council pursuant to chapter 90.48 RCW, or in
violation of any permit issued pursuant to RCW 80.50.040(14). The court may
charge the expenses of an enforcement action relating to a site certification
agreement under this section, including, but not limited to, expenses incurred
for legal services and expert testimony, against any person found to be in
material violation of the provisions of such certification: PROVIDED, That the
expenses of a person found not to be in material violation of the provisions of
such certification, including, but not limited to, expenses incurred for legal
services and expert testimony, may be charged against the person or persons
bringing an enforcement action or other action under this section.

(2)
Wilful violation of any provision of this chapter shall be a gross misdemeanor.

(3)
Wilful or criminally negligent, as defined in RCW ((9A.08.010[(1)](d))) 9A.08.010(1)(d),
violation of any provision of an NPDES permit issued by the council pursuant to
chapter 90.48 RCW or any permit issued by the council pursuant to RCW
80.50.040(14) or any emission standards promulgated by the council in order to
implement the Federal Clean Air Act and the state implementation plan with
respect to energy facilities under the jurisdiction provisions of this chapter
shall be deemed a crime, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a
fine of up to twenty-five thousand dollars per day and costs of prosecution.
Any violation of this subsection shall be a gross misdemeanor.

(4)
Any person knowingly making any false statement, representation, or
certification in any document in any NPDES form, notice, or report required by
an NPDES permit or in any form, notice, or report required for or by any permit
issued pursuant to RCW ((80.50.090(14))) 80.50.040(14) shall be
deemed guilty of a crime, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a
fine of up to ten thousand dollars and costs of prosecution.

(5)
Every person who violates the provisions of certificates and permits issued or
administered by the council shall incur, in addition to any other penalty as
provided by law, a penalty in an amount of up to five thousand dollars a day
for every such violation. Each and every such violation shall be a separate
and distinct offense, and in case of a continuing violation, every day's
continuance shall be and be deemed to be a separate and distinct violation. Every
act of commission or omission which procures, aids, or abets in the violation
shall be considered a violation under the provisions of this section and
subject to the penalty provided in this section. The penalty provided in this
section shall be imposed by a notice in writing, either by certified mail with
return receipt requested or by personal service, to the person incurring the
same from the council describing such violation with reasonable particularity.
The council may, upon written application therefor received within fifteen days
after notice imposing any penalty is received by the person incurring the
penalty, and when deemed in the best interest to carry out the purposes of this
chapter, remit or mitigate any penalty provided in this section upon such terms
as the council shall deem proper, and shall have authority to ascertain the
facts upon all such applications in such manner and under such regulations as
it may deem proper. Any person incurring any penalty under this section may
appeal the same to the council. Such appeals shall be filed within thirty days
of receipt of notice imposing any penalty unless an application for remission
or mitigation is made to the council. When an application for remission or
mitigation is made, such appeals shall be filed within thirty days of receipt
of notice from the council setting forth the disposition of the application.
Any penalty imposed under this section shall become due and payable thirty days
after receipt of a notice imposing the same unless application for remission or
mitigation is made or an appeal is filed. When an application for remission or
mitigation is made, any penalty incurred hereunder shall become due and payable
thirty days after receipt of notice setting forth the disposition of the
application unless an appeal is filed from such disposition. Whenever an
appeal of any penalty incurred hereunder is filed, the penalty shall become due
and payable only upon completion of all review proceedings and the issuance of
a final order confirming the penalty in whole or in part. If the amount of any
penalty is not paid to the council within thirty days after it becomes due and
payable, the attorney general, upon the request of the council, shall bring an
action in the name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston
county or of any county in which such violator may do business, to recover such
penalty. In all such actions the procedure and rules of evidence shall be the
same as an ordinary civil action except as otherwise provided in this chapter.
All penalties recovered under this section shall be paid into the state
treasury and credited to the general fund.

(6)
Civil proceedings to enforce this chapter may be brought by the attorney
general or the prosecuting attorney of any county affected by the violation on
his own motion or at the request of the council. Criminal proceedings to
enforce this chapter may be brought by the prosecuting attorney of any county
affected by the violation on his own motion or at the request of the council.

(7)
The remedies and penalties in this section, both civil and criminal, shall be
cumulative and shall be in addition to any other penalties and remedies
available at law, or in equity, to any person.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
Sections 1 through 6 and 8 through 12 of this act take effect July 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14.
Section 7 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---