BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
The state of Washington and its political subdivisions own a substantial amount
of public land from which timber is sold. Revenues from those timber sales
provide financial support for public schools, other state institutions, and
other state and local government programs that otherwise would be more
dependent on tax revenues or might have to curtail their public services.

(b)
The state and its political subdivisions hold public lands in trust for public
institutions and programs, with fiduciary duties to manage those lands for the
exclusive benefit of the designated beneficiaries subject to compliance with
applicable law. To help fulfill those fiduciary duties, state and local
agencies rely on competitive bidding to ensure that full market value is paid
when public timber is sold.

(c)
The federal government has prohibited export from the United States of
unprocessed timber from lands owned by the state and its political
subdivisions, and has given the state the option of either adopting its own
program to enforce that prohibition or allowing the federal government to
enforce it. If the federal government enforces the export prohibition, it may
also restrict eligibility to purchase unprocessed timber from such lands in
ways that further reduce competition for public timber and thus reduce timber
sale revenues received by the beneficiaries for which public lands are being
managed.

(d)
Therefore, it is in the best interest of the trust beneficiaries and the public
for the state to adopt its own program to enforce the federal prohibition on
export of unprocessed timber from state and local government lands while
maintaining, to the maximum extent allowed by federal law, competitive markets
for timber sold by state and local agencies.

(2)
It is the policy of the state that:

(a)
Export of unprocessed timber from lands owned by the state and its political
subdivisions be prohibited to the extent required by federal law.

(b)
The state enforce that prohibition while maintaining, to the extent allowed by
federal law, competitive markets for timber sold by the state and local
governments, rather than allow competition for that timber to be unnecessarily
restricted in ways that prevent state and local agencies from obtaining full
market value for the timber they sell.

(c)
This chapter and any implementing rules adopted by the department of revenue
shall be submitted to the secretary of commerce for approval under 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 620c(d)(2).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, association,
or other legal entity, and includes any subsidiary, subcontractor, or parent
company, and business affiliates where one affiliate controls or has the power
to control the other or when both are controlled directly or indirectly by a
third person.

(2)
"Public lands" means lands that are held or owned by the state of
Washington or any political subdivision thereof, or by any public agency of the
state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof.

(3)
"Secretary of commerce" means the secretary of commerce of the United
States or the federal official authorized to approve state programs under 16
U.S.C. Sec. 620c(d)(2) to serve in lieu of federal rules that otherwise would
apply under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 620c(d)(1).

(4)
"Unprocessed timber" means trees or portions of trees or other
roundwood that is defined by the federal government as "unprocessed"
for purposes of 16 U.S.C. Sec. 620c. It does not include timber processed into
any one of the following:

(a)
Lumber or construction timbers, except western red cedar, meeting current
American lumber standards grades or pacific lumber inspection bureau export R
or N list grades, sawn on four sides, not intended for remanufacture;

(b)
Lumber, construction timbers, or cants for remanufacture, except western red
cedar, meeting current American lumber standards grades or pacific lumber
inspection bureau export R or N list clear grades, sawn on four sides, not to
exceed twelve inches in thickness;

(c)
Lumber, construction timbers, or cants for remanufacture, except western red
cedar, that do not meet the grades referred to in (b) of this subsection and
are sawn on four sides, with wane less than one-quarter of any face, not
exceeding eight and three-fourths inches in thickness;

(d)
Chips, pulp, or pulp products;

(e)
Veneer or plywood;

(f)
Poles, posts, or piling cut or treated with preservatives for use as such;

(g)
Shakes or shingles;

(h)
Aspen or other pulpwood bolts, not exceeding one hundred inches in length,
exported for processing into pulp; or

(i)
Pulp logs, cull logs, and incidental volumes of grade three and four sawlogs
processed at domestic pulp mills, domestic chip plants, or other domestic
operations for the primary purpose of conversion of the logs into chips, or to
the extent that a small quantity of such logs are processed, into other
products at domestic processing facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The export of unprocessed timber from public lands by any person is
prohibited. This prohibition is intended to implement, with respect to
unprocessed timber originating from public lands in this state, the prohibition
on exports set forth in any applicable order of the secretary of commerce
issued under subsection (a) of 16 U.S.C. Sec. 620c, as that provision may be
amended from time to time.

(2)
The species, grades, and geographic origin of unprocessed timber prohibited
from export shall be representative of the species, grades, and geographic
origin of timber comprising the total public land timber sales program in this
state. The department of revenue may adopt rules, if necessary, to ensure that
result.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The department of revenue shall administer and enforce this chapter and any
implementing rules adopted under this chapter. State and local timber sale
contracts subject to this chapter may include provisions to facilitate the
enforcement of this chapter, and the provisions may be enforced by either the
selling agency or the department of revenue. The department of revenue may
recommend such contract provisions and assist state and local agencies in
enforcing them.

(2)
The department of revenue may assess and collect civil penalties for violation
of section 3 of this act in amounts up to ten thousand dollars, or three times
the value of unprocessed timber from public lands that was unlawfully exported,
whichever is greater.

(3)
Any person who knowingly violates section 3 of this act is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor, punishable under RCW 9A.20.021(2), or if previously convicted of
the same offense within the prior five years, a class C felony, punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021(1)(c).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The governor shall submit this chapter, and any implementing rules adopted by
the department of revenue, to the secretary of commerce for approval under 16
U.S.C. Sec. 620c(d)(2), and provide any information reasonably requested by the
secretary of commerce for the purpose of determining whether this program:

(a)
Implements, with respect to unprocessed timber originating from public lands in
this state, the prohibition on exports set forth in the secretary of commerce's
order under subsection (a) of 16 U.S.C. Sec. 620c; and

(b)
Ensures that the species, grades, and geographic origin of unprocessed timber
prohibited from export within this state is representative of the species,
grades, and geographic origin of timber comprising the total timber sales
program in this state.

(2)
If the secretary of commerce will not approve the state program as submitted,
the department of revenue may adopt rules to correct those deficiencies the
secretary of commerce found to preclude approval under 16 U.S.C. Sec.
620c(d)(2), while maintaining domestic competition for timber from public lands
to the maximum extent allowed by federal law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. On
request of the holder of any contract for the sale of unprocessed timber that
contains provisions implementing department of revenue rules in existence on
the effective date of this section, the selling agency may amend the contract
to conform to this chapter and to rules adopted under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Section 5 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 1 through 4 and 6 of this act take effect upon the approval of this
act and related regulations by the secretary of commerce under 16 U.S.C. Sec.
620c(d)(2).

---
END ---