BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.36.120 and 1994 c 269 s 1 and 1994 c 57 s 48 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
At any primary or election, general or special, the county auditor may, in any
precinct having fewer than two hundred active registered voters at the time of
closing of voter registration as provided in RCW 29.07.160, conduct the voting
in that precinct by mail ballot. For any precinct having fewer than two
hundred active registered voters where voting at a primary or a general
election is conducted by mail ballot, the county auditor shall, not less than
fifteen days prior to the date of that primary or general election, mail or
deliver to each active and inactive registered voter within that precinct a
notice that the voting in that precinct will be by mail ballot, an application
form for a mail ballot, and a postage prepaid envelope, preaddressed to the
issuing officer. A mail ballot shall be issued to each voter who returns a
properly executed application to the county auditor no later than the day of
that primary or general election. For all subsequent mail ballot elections in
that precinct the application is valid so long as the voter remains active and
qualified to vote. ((In determining the number of registered voters in a
precinct for the purposes of this section, persons who are ongoing absentee
voters under RCW 29.36.013 shall not be counted.)) Nothing in this section
may be construed as altering the vote tallying requirements of RCW 29.62.090.

At
any nonpartisan special election not being held in conjunction with a state
primary or general election, the county, city, town, or district requesting the
election pursuant to RCW 29.13.010 or 29.13.020 may also request that the
election be conducted by mail ballot. The county auditor may honor the request
or may determine that the election is not to be conducted by mail ballot. The
decision of the county auditor in this regard is final.

In
no instance shall any special election be conducted by mail ballot in any
precinct with two hundred or more active registered voters if candidates for
partisan office are to be voted upon.

For
all special elections not being held in conjunction with a state primary or
state general election where voting is conducted by mail ballot, the county
auditor shall, not less than fifteen days prior to the date of such election,
mail or deliver to each active registered voter a mail ballot and an envelope,
preaddressed to the issuing officer. The auditor shall send each inactive
voter either a ballot or an application to receive a ballot. The auditor shall
determine which of the two is to be sent. If the inactive voter returns a
voted ballot, the ballot shall be counted and the voter's status restored to
active. If the inactive voter completes and returns an application, a ballot
shall be sent and the voter's status restored to active.

(2) For a two-year period beginning on June 9, 1994, and ending two
years after June 9, 1994, the county auditor may conduct the voting in any
precinct by mail for any primary or election, partisan or nonpartisan, using
the procedures set forth in RCW 29.36.120 through 29.36.139.

---
END ---