BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a review of
state employee collective bargaining, comparing the collective bargaining
system in this state with systems in other states. The committee's review
shall include, but is not limited to:

(a)
The history and development of collective bargaining systems for state
employees, including:

(i)
The relationship of collective bargaining systems to civil service protections
for state employees and the impacts of the systems on classified state
employees not represented by labor organizations;

(ii)
The impacts of collective bargaining systems on state employee labor relations
and resolution of labor disputes; and

(iii)
The role of the legislative and executive branches in overseeing state employee
collective bargaining;

(b)
The economic consequences for states that have collective bargaining over
compensation issues for state employees, including the impact on salary
increases and fringe benefit packages; and

(c)
The projected budgetary implications for this state, including the impact on
the legislature's appropriation authority and the budget cycles, if wage
bargaining for state employees were to be permitted, based on information from
states with wage bargaining for state employees.

(2)
The joint legislative audit and review committee may contract for services to
conduct the review required by this section.

(3) The joint legislative audit and review committee shall report
its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2000.

---
END ---