BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that cardiovascular disease is the leading cause of death in
Washington state, accounting for approximately forty-two percent of all
deaths. The legislature also finds that many of these deaths can be prevented
or delayed by reducing risk factors and improving access to services. Some
rural areas, such as Walla Walla county, have a disproportionately high average
annual rate for heart disease while lacking access to available life-saving
medical resources. The legislature further finds that access to quality
coronary tertiary health care services must be assured, especially for rural
communities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The department of health shall revise the methodology applied to certificate of
need applications for the tertiary health services of open heart surgery,
therapeutic cardiac catheterization, and percutaneous translumenal coronary
angioplasty.

(2)
The revision shall be a detailed and complete new methodology, which the
department shall promptly adopt into rule, replacing the existing methodology.

(3)
The process used to develop the new methodology shall involve a cross-section
of Washington's cardiac surgery programs, cardiac surgeons not directly
affiliated with existing hospital programs, and representatives of medical
education. The department shall assure administrative and technical
requirements of the certificate of need program are met.

(4)
The department shall provide a report to the health committees of the
legislature on the development of a new methodology by July 1, 2000, and
provide to the health committees of the legislature a copy of the new rules
upon adoption.

(5)
This section expires December 31, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---