BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that a safe and civil environment in schools is an
essential prerequisite for students to learn and to achieve high academic
standards.

(2)
The legislature further finds that a safe and civil environment in schools is
necessary for students to have the kind of academic success that will encourage
them to become lifelong learners and to lead productive and satisfying lives.

(3)
The legislature declares that bullying, taunting, harassment, intimidation, and
other threatening, disruptive, or violent behaviors are unacceptable in the
classrooms, hallways, playgrounds, and other facilities of the public schools
of Washington.

(4)
The intent of this act is to assist local schools in creating a culture or
climate in every public school that makes all students feel welcomed,
respected, and valued. The school district policies changed or adopted
pursuant to this act should, in turn, be intended to create in every school a
culture of recognizing the human dignity of each and every student. Therefore,
the legislature intends to provide support to school districts for training
school staff in strategies that have been proven effective in creating a
school-wide climate that respects and nurtures all students and that creates
safe and civil environments conducive to learning.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.600.460 and 1997 c 266 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
School district boards of directors shall adopt policies that restore
discipline to the classroom. Such policies must provide for at least the
following: Allowing each teacher to take disciplinary action to correct a
student who disrupts normal classroom activities, abuses or insults a teacher
as prohibited by RCW 28A.635.010, willfully disobeys a teacher, uses abusive or
foul language directed at a school district employee, school volunteer, or
another student, violates school rules, or who interferes with an orderly
education process. Disciplinary action may include but is not limited to:
Oral or written reprimands; written notification to parents of disruptive
behavior, a copy of which must be provided to the principal. By July 1,
2001, each school district shall amend these policies or adopt additional
policies to provide for safe and civil environments free from bullying,
taunting, harassment, intimidation, and other disruptive or threatening
behavior, including the behaviors in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
which undermines the climate for learning in the school for all students. The
superintendent of public instruction may, at the request of a school district,
provide guidelines or other technical assistance to help school districts
develop effective policies. In developing any such guidelines, the
superintendent of public instruction shall:

(a)
Consider available, relevant data, reports, and other information on the school
safety concerns of students, parents, and school employees. "Relevant
data" includes, but is not limited to, the Washington state survey of
adolescent health behaviors and complaints reported to the office of civil
rights in the United States department of education;

(b)
Provide a list of programs that have been shown to be effective in preventing
and combating bullying, taunting, harassment, intimidation, and other
disruptive or threatening behavior in schools. The list may include programs
such as bullyproofing your school, and any program that has received a national
schools of character award; and

(c)
Advise all school districts of the availability of such guidelines, technical
assistance, and lists of effective programs for preventing and combating
bullying, taunting, harassment, intimidation, and other disruptive or
threatening behavior, including the behaviors in subsections (2) and (3) of
this section.

(2)
A student committing an offense under chapter 9A.36, 9A.40, 9A.46, or 9A.48 RCW
when the activity is directed toward the teacher, shall not be assigned to that
teacher's classroom for the duration of the student's attendance at that school
or any other school where the teacher is assigned.

(3)
A student who commits an offense under chapter 9A.36, 9A.40, 9A.46, or 9A.48
RCW, when directed toward another student, may be removed from the classroom of
the victim for the duration of the student's attendance at that school or any
other school where the victim is enrolled. A student who commits an offense
under one of the chapters enumerated in this section against a student or
another school employee, may be expelled or suspended.

(4)
Nothing in this section is intended to limit the authority of a school under
existing law and rules to expel or suspend a student for misconduct or criminal
behavior.

(5)
All school districts must collect data on disciplinary actions taken in each
school. The information shall be made available to the public upon request.
This collection of data shall not include personally identifiable information
including, but not limited to, a student's social security number, name, or
address.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.150.240 and 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is the intended purpose of this section to guarantee that the certificated
teaching and administrative staff in each common school district be held
accountable for the proper and efficient conduct of classroom teaching in their
school which will provide students with the opportunity to achieve those skills
which are generally recognized as requisite to learning.

(2)
In conformance with the other provisions of Title 28A RCW, it shall be the
responsibility of the certificated teaching and administrative staff in each
common school to:

(a)
Implement the district's prescribed curriculum and enforce, within their area
of responsibility, the rules and regulations of the school district, the state
superintendent of public instruction, and the state board of education, taking
into due consideration individual differences among students, and maintain and
render appropriate records and reports pertaining thereto.

(b)
Maintain good order and discipline in their classrooms at all times.

(c)
Hold students to a strict accountability while in school for any disorderly
conduct while under their supervision.

(d)
Require excuses from the parents, guardians, or custodians of minor students in
all cases of absence, late arrival to school, or early dismissal.

(e)
Give careful attention to the maintenance of a healthful atmosphere in the
classroom.

(f)
Give careful attention to the safety of the student in the classroom and report
any doubtful or unsafe conditions to the building administrator.

(g)
Evaluate each student's educational growth and development and make periodic
reports thereon to parents, guardians, or custodians and to school
administrators.

Failure
to carry out such requirements as set forth in subsection (2)(a) through (g)
above shall constitute sufficient cause for discharge of any member of such
teaching or administrative staff.

(3)
In order to help certificated instructional and administrative staff fulfill
their responsibilities for meeting the requirements of this chapter, and in
order to implement policies required under RCW 28A.600.460, school districts
shall provide such employees with training in the most effective strategies for
implementing district policies concerning safe and civil environments free from
bullying, taunting, harassment, intimidation, and other threatening behavior
that detracts from a classroom and school-wide climate conducive to learning
for all students.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.415 RCW to read as follows:

Funds
allocated to school districts for implementation of learning improvement days
as provided in the 1999-2001 biennial operating budget, and learning
improvement day rules, or as may be provided in future budgets or other acts of
the legislature, may be used to conduct training for certificated instructional
staff under RCW 28A.150.240 and 28A.600.460 up to a maximum amount equivalent
to the allocation for one-half day of learning improvement day funds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
higher education coordinating board shall review the curricular and
instructional practices of teacher and administrator preparation programs
approved by the state board of education and report to the legislature on how
the teacher and administrator preparation programs are training teachers and
administrators to effectively deal with bullying, taunting, harassment,
intimidation, and other disruptive or threatening behavior by students in
schools and training teachers and administrators to create school-wide safe and
civil environments for all students. The higher education coordinating board
shall submit its report to the education and higher education committees of the
house of representatives and the senate by September 5, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---