BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.24.070 and 1987 c 496 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Wholesalers and retailers subject to the provisions of this chapter
shall be allowed compensation for their services in affixing the stamps herein
required a sum computed at the rate of ((four)) six dollars per
one thousand stamps purchased or affixed by them.

---
END ---