BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this act is to enhance the performance audit and review authority of
the legislature by: (1) Restructuring the joint legislative audit and review
committee, and the office of legislative auditor, to more closely resemble the
federal general accounting office and comptroller general; (2) providing
greater autonomy for the legislative auditor; and (3) renaming the legislative
agency that performs the legislature's performance auditing and review
authority as the performance audit office, which is headed by the legislative
auditor.

PART I -
LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR

Sec.
101. RCW
44.28.005 and 1996 c 288 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Legislative auditor" means the executive officer of the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) performance audit office.

(2)
(("Economy and efficiency audits" means performance audits that
establish: (a) Whether a state agency or unit of local government receiving
state funds is acquiring, protecting, and using its resources such as
personnel, property, and space economically and efficiently; (b) the causes of
inefficiencies or uneconomical practices; and (c) whether the state agency or
local government has complied with significant laws and rules in acquiring,
protecting, and using its resources.

(3)))
"Final compliance report" means a written document((, as approved
by the joint committee,)) prepared by the legislative auditor that
states the specific actions a state agency or unit of local government
receiving state funds has taken to implement recommendations contained in the
final performance audit report and the preliminary compliance report. Any
recommendations, including proposed legislation and changes in the agency's
rules and practices or the local government's practices, based on testimony
received, must be included in the final compliance report.

(((4)))
(3) "Final performance audit report" means a written document
((adopted by the joint legislative audit and review committee)) that
contains ((the)) findings and ((proposed recommendations made in the
preliminary performance audit report, the)) final recommendations ((adopted
by the joint committee,)) of the legislative auditor, after considering
any comments to the preliminary performance audit report that are made by
((the joint committee, and any comments to the preliminary performance audit
report by)) members of the performance audit office and the state
agency or local government that was audited.

(((5)
"Joint committee" means the joint legislative audit and review
committee.

(6))) (4)
"Local government" means a city, town, county, special purpose
district, political subdivision, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal
corporation, including a public corporation created by such an entity.

(((7)))
(5) "Performance audit" means an objective and systematic
assessment of a state agency or any of its programs, functions, or activities,
or a ((unit of)) local government receiving state funds, by an
independent evaluator in order to help public officials improve efficiency,
effectiveness, and accountability. Performance audits include economy and
efficiency ((audits and program audits)) elements establishing: (a)
Whether a state agency or unit of local government receiving state funds is
acquiring, protecting, and using its resources such as personnel, property, and
space economically and efficiently; (b) the causes of inefficiencies or
uneconomical practices; and (c) whether the state agency or local government
has complied with significant laws and rules in acquiring, protecting, and
using its resources. Performance audits also include program elements
determining the extent to which desired outcomes or results are being achieved,
the causes for not achieving intended outcomes or results, and compliance with
significant laws and rules applicable to the program. A performance audit
of a local government may only be made to determine whether the local
government is using state funds for their intended purpose in an efficient and
effective manner.

(((8)))
(6) "Performance audit office" or "office" means the
office created by this chapter to provide performance audits and other reviews
for the legislature.

(7)
"Performance measures" are a composite of key indicators of a
program's or activity's inputs, outputs, outcomes, productivity, timeliness,
and/or quality. They are means of evaluating policies and programs by
measuring results against agreed upon program goals or standards.

(((9)))
(8) "Preliminary compliance report" means a written document
that states the specific actions a state agency or unit of local government
receiving state funds has taken to implement any recommendations contained in
the final performance audit report.

(((10)))
(9) "Preliminary performance audit report" means a written
document prepared for review and comment by the ((joint legislative audit
and review committee)) legislative auditor after the completion of a
performance audit. The preliminary performance audit report must contain the
audit findings and any proposed recommendations to improve the efficiency,
effectiveness, or accountability of the state agency or local government
audited.

(((11)
"Program audits" means performance audits that determine: (a) The
extent to which desired outcomes or results are being achieved; (b) the causes
for not achieving intended outcomes or results; and (c) compliance with
significant laws and rules applicable to the program.

(12))) (10)
"State agency" or "agency" means a state agency,
department, office, officer, board, commission, bureau, division, institution,
or institution of higher education. "State agency" includes all
elective offices in the executive branch of state government.

Sec.
102. RCW
44.28.010 and 1996 c 288 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((joint legislative audit and review committee)) performance audit
office is created, ((which)) consisting of members, the
legislative auditor, and employees. Members of the office shall consist of
eight senators and eight representatives from the legislature and the state
auditor serving, ex officio, as a nonvoting member. The senate members of
the ((committee)) office shall be appointed by the president of
the senate, and the house members of the ((committee)) office
shall be appointed by the speaker of the house. Not more than four members
from each house shall be from the same political party. Members shall be
appointed before the close of each regular session of the legislature during an
odd-numbered year. If before the close of a regular session during an
odd-numbered year, the governor issues a proclamation convening the legislature
into special session, or the legislature by resolution convenes the legislature
into special session, following such regular session, then ((such)) the
appointments shall be made as a matter of closing business of ((such)) the
special session. Members shall be subject to confirmation, as to the senate
members by the senate, and as to the house members by the house. In the event
of a failure to appoint or confirm ((joint committee)) members, the
members of the ((joint committee)) office from either house in
which there is a failure to appoint or confirm shall be elected by the members
of such house.

Sec.
103. RCW
44.28.020 and 1996 c 288 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
term of office of the appointed members of the ((joint committee))
performance audit office who continue to be members of the senate and
house shall be from the close of the session in which they were appointed or
elected as provided in RCW 44.28.010 until the close of the next regular
session during an odd-numbered year or special session following such regular
session, or, in the event that such appointments or elections are not made,
until the close of the next regular session during an odd-numbered year during
which successors are appointed or elected. The term of office of ((joint
committee)) appointed members who do not continue to be members of
the senate and house ceases upon the convening of the next regular session of
the legislature during an odd-numbered year after their confirmation, election
or appointment. Vacancies on the ((joint committee)) performance
audit office shall be filled by appointment by the remaining members. All
such vacancies shall be filled from the same political party and from the same
house as the member whose seat was vacated.

Sec.
104. RCW
44.28.030 and 1996 c 288 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

On and
after the commencement of a succeeding general session of the legislature,
those appointed members of the ((joint committee)) performance
audit office who continue to be members of the senate and house,
respectively, shall continue as members of the ((joint committee)) office
as indicated in RCW 44.28.020 and the ((joint committee)) office
shall continue with all its powers, duties, authorities, records, papers,
personnel and staff, and all funds made available for its use.

Sec.
105. RCW
44.28.050 and 1989 c 137 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

All
expenses incurred by the ((committee)) performance audit office,
including salaries and expenses of employees and the legislative auditor,
shall be paid upon voucher forms as provided and signed by the legislative
auditor, except that vouchers for the salary and expenses of the legislative
auditor shall be signed by the chair or vice-chair. ((The legislative
auditor may be authorized by the legislative budget committee's executive
committee to sign vouchers. Such authorization shall specify a dollar
limitation and be set out in writing.)) A monthly report of ((such))
the vouchers shall be submitted to the executive committee. ((If
authorization is not given to the legislative auditor then the chair, or the
vice-chair in the chair's absence, is authorized to sign vouchers. This
authority shall continue until the chair's or vice-chair's successors are
selected after each ensuing session of the legislature.)) Vouchers may be
drawn on funds appropriated generally by the legislature for legislative
expenses or upon any special appropriation which may be provided by the
legislature for the expenses of the ((committee)) performance audit
office or both.

Sec.
106. RCW
44.28.060 and 1996 c 288 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
members of the ((joint committee)) performance audit office shall
form an executive committee consisting of the state auditor and one
member from each of the four major political caucuses((, which shall include)).
The executive committee shall select a chair and a vice-chair from among
its legislative members. The chair and vice-chair shall serve for a period
not to exceed two years. The chair and the vice-chair may not be members of
the same political party. The chair shall alternate between the members of the
majority parties in the senate and the house of representatives.

The
executive committee is responsible for performing all ((general
administrative and personnel duties assigned to it in the rules and procedures
adopted by the joint committee, as well as other duties)) responsibilities
delegated to it by the ((joint committee)) majority of all members of
the office. ((The executive committee shall recommend applicants for
the position of the legislative auditor to the membership of the joint
committee. The legislative auditor shall be hired with the approval of a
majority of the membership of the joint committee. The executive committee
shall set the salary of the legislative auditor.))

The
((joint committee)) members of the performance audit office shall
adopt rules and procedures for its orderly operation. The ((joint committee))
members of the performance audit office may create subcommittees to
perform duties under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 107. A
new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW to read as follows:

The
members of the performance audit office shall appoint the legislative auditor
for a ten-year term of office and set the salary of the legislative auditor.
The legislative auditor may only be removed from office by concurrent
resolution of both houses of the legislature, but only for permanent
disability, inefficiency, neglect of duty, malfeasance, or conviction of a
felony or conduct involving moral turpitude.

Sec.
108. RCW
44.28.065 and 1996 c 288 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislative auditor shall:

(1)
Establish, hire employees for, and manage the performance audit
office ((of the joint legislative audit and review committee to carry out
the functions of this chapter));

(2)
Direct the audit and review functions described in this chapter and ensure that
performance audits are performed in accordance with the "Government
Auditing Standards" published by the comptroller general of the United
States as applicable to the scope of the audit;

(3)
Investigate all matters related to the receipt, disbursement, and use of public
money by state agencies and local governments;

(4)
Estimate the cost to the state of a specific appropriation and report each
estimate to the legislature with recommendations that the legislative auditor
considers desirable;

(5)
Analyze the expenditures of any state agency and expenditures of state funds
distributed or provided to local governments, that the legislative auditor
believes will help the legislature decide whether public money has been used
and expended economically and efficiently;

(6)
Make performance audits, together with findings and recommendations,
to the ((joint committee and under its direction to the)) state
legislature and committees of the state legislature concerning the
organization and operation of state agencies and ((the expenditure of)) local
government operations that are in whole or in part funded by state funds ((by
units of local government)), that are included in the performance audit
work plan;

(((4)
In consultation with and with the approval of the executive committee,)) (7)
Hire staff necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Employee
salaries, other than the legislative auditor, shall be set by the legislative
auditor ((with the approval of the executive committee));

(((5)))
(8) Assist the several standing committees of the house and senate in
consideration of legislation affecting state departments and their efficiency;
appear before other legislative committees; and assist any ((other))
legislative committee upon instruction by the ((joint legislative audit and
review committee)) members of the performance audit office;

(((6)))
(9) Provide the legislature with information obtained under the
direction of the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) members
of the performance audit office; and

(((7)))
(10) Maintain a record of all work performed by the legislative auditor
((under the direction of the joint legislative audit and review committee))
and keep and make available all documents, data, and reports submitted to the
legislative auditor by any legislative committee.

Sec.
109. RCW
44.28.071 and 1996 c 288 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In conducting performance audits and other reviews, the legislative auditor
shall work closely with the chairs and staff of standing committees of the
senate and house of representatives, and may work in consultation with the ((state
auditor and the)) director of financial management.

(2)
The legislative auditor may contract with and consult with public and private
independent professional and technical experts as necessary in conducting the
performance audits. The legislative auditor should also involve front-line
employees and internal auditors in the performance audit process to the highest
possible degree.

(3)
The legislative auditor shall work with the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee and the office of financial management to
develop information system capabilities necessary for the performance audit
requirements of this chapter.

(4)
The legislative auditor shall work with the legislative office of performance
review and the office of financial management to facilitate the implementation
of effective performance measures throughout state government. In agencies and
programs where effective systems for performance measurement exist, the
measurements incorporated into those systems should be a basis for performance
audits conducted under this chapter.

Sec.
110. RCW
44.28.075 and 1996 c 288 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the requirements of the performance audit work plan approved by ((the
joint committee)) members of the performance audit office under RCW
44.28.083, performance audits may, in addition to the ((determinations))
factors and matters that may be made in such an audit as specified in
RCW 44.28.005, include the following:

(a)
An examination of the costs and benefits of agency programs, functions, and
activities;

(b)
Identification of viable alternatives for reducing costs or improving service
delivery;

(c)
Identification of gaps and overlaps in service delivery, along with corrective
action; and

(d)
Comparison with other states whose agencies perform similar functions, as well
as their relative funding levels and performance.

(2)
As part of a performance audit, the legislative auditor may review the costs of
programs recently implemented by the legislature to compare actual agency costs
with the appropriations provided and the cost estimates that were included in
the fiscal note for the program at the time the program was enacted.

Sec.
111. RCW
44.28.080 and 1996 c 288 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((joint committee has the following powers)) legislative auditor
shall:

(1)
((To)) Make examinations and reports concerning whether or not
appropriations are being expended for the purposes and within the statutory
restrictions provided by the legislature; and concerning the organization and
operation of procedures necessary or desirable to promote economy, efficiency,
and effectiveness in state government, its officers, boards, committees,
commissions, institutions, and other state agencies, and ((to)) make
recommendations and reports to the legislature.

(2)
((To)) Make such other studies and examinations of economy,
efficiency, and effectiveness of state government and its state agencies as ((it))
the legislative auditor may find advisable, and ((to)) hear
complaints, hold hearings, gather information, and make findings of fact with
respect thereto.

(3)
((To)) Conduct program and fiscal reviews of any state agency or
program scheduled for termination under the process provided under chapter
43.131 RCW.

(4)
((To)) Perform other legislative staff studies of state
government or the use of state funds.

(5)
((To)) Conduct performance audits in accordance with the work
plan adopted by ((the joint committee)) members of the performance
audit office under RCW ((44.28.180)) 44.28.083.

(6)
((To)) Receive a copy of each report of examination or audit
issued by the state auditor for examinations or audits that were conducted at
the request of the ((joint committee)) members of the performance
audit office and ((to)) make recommendations as ((it)) the
legislative auditor deems appropriate as a separate addendum to the report
or audit.

(7)
((To)) Develop internal tracking procedures that will allow the
legislature to measure the effectiveness of performance audits conducted by the
((joint committee)) legislative auditor including, where
appropriate, measurements of cost-savings and increases in efficiency and
effectiveness in how state agencies deliver their services.

(8)
((To)) Receive messages and reports in person or in writing from
the governor or any other state officials and ((to)) study generally any
and all business relating to economy, efficiency, and effectiveness in state
government and state agencies.

Sec.
112. RCW
44.28.083 and 1996 c 288 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
During the regular legislative session of each odd-numbered year, beginning
with 1997, the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) members
of the performance audit office shall develop and approve a performance
audit work plan for the legislative auditor to follow over the
subsequent sixteen to twenty‑four‑month period and an overall work
plan that identifies state agency programs, state agencies, and local
government programs that are in whole or in part funded by state moneys,
for which formal evaluation appears necessary. Consideration shall be given
to recommendations presented by legislative standing committees. Among the
factors to be considered in preparing the work plans are:

(a)
Whether a program newly created or significantly altered by the legislature
warrants continued oversight because (i) the fiscal impact of the program is
significant, or (ii) the program represents a relatively high degree of risk in
terms of reaching the stated goals and objectives for that program;

(b)
Whether implementation of an existing program has failed to meet its goals and
objectives by any significant degree; and

(c)
Whether a follow-up audit would help ensure that previously identified
recommendations for improvements were being implemented.

(2)
The project description for each performance audit must include start and
completion dates, the proposed approach, and cost estimates.

(3)
The legislative auditor may consult with the chairs and staff of appropriate
legislative committees, the state auditor, and the director of financial
management in developing the performance audit work plan.

(4) The performance audit work plan and the overall work plan may
include proposals to employ contract resources. As conditions warrant, the
performance audit work plan and the overall work plan may be amended from time
to time. All performance audit work plans shall be transmitted to the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the senate and the house of
representatives no later than the sixtieth day of the regular legislative
session of each odd-numbered year((, beginning with 1997)). All overall
work plans shall be transmitted to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees
of the senate and the house of representatives.

Sec.
113. RCW
44.28.088 and 1996 c 288 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When the legislative auditor has completed a performance audit authorized in
the performance audit work plan, the legislative auditor shall transmit the
preliminary performance audit report to the affected state agency or local
government and the office of financial management for response or
comment. The state agency or local government and the office of
financial management shall provide any response or comment to the
legislative auditor within thirty days after receipt of the preliminary
performance audit report unless a different time period is approved by the ((joint
committee)) legislative auditor. The legislative auditor shall
incorporate or respond to the responses and comments of the state
agency or local government and the office of financial management ((into))
in the final performance audit report.

(2)
Before releasing the results of a performance audit to the legislature or the
public, the legislative auditor shall submit the preliminary performance audit
report to the ((joint committee for its)) members of the performance
audit office for review, comments, and ((final)) recommendations.
Any comments by the ((joint committee)) members of the performance
audit office must be included as a separate addendum to the final
performance audit report. Upon consideration and incorporation of the review,
comments, and recommendations of the ((joint committee)) members of
the performance audit office, the legislative auditor shall transmit the
final performance audit report to the affected agency or local government, the
director of financial management, the leadership of the senate and the house of
representatives, and the appropriate standing committees of the house of
representatives and the senate and shall publish the results and make the
report available to the public. For purposes of this section, "leadership
of the senate and the house of representatives" means the speaker of the
house, the majority leaders of the senate and the house of representatives, the
minority leaders of the senate and the house of representatives, the caucus
chairs of both major political parties of the senate and the house of
representatives, and the floor leaders of both major political parties of the
senate and the house of representatives.

Sec.
114. RCW
44.28.094 and 1996 c 288 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject
to ((the joint committee's)) approval by the members of the
performance audit office, the ((office of the joint committee)) legislative
auditor and the performance audit office shall undergo an external quality
control review within three years of June 6, 1996, and at regular intervals
thereafter. The review must be conducted by an independent organization that
has experience in conducting performance audits. The quality control review
must include, at a minimum, an evaluation of the quality of the audits
conducted by the ((joint committee)) legislative auditor, an
assessment of the audit procedures used by the ((joint committee)) legislative
auditor, and an assessment of the qualifications of the ((joint
committee)) legislative auditor and staff of the performance
audit office to conduct performance audits.

Sec.
115. RCW
44.28.097 and 1996 c 288 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

All
agency reports concerning program performance, including administrative review,
quality control, and other internal audit or performance reports, as requested
by the ((joint committee)) legislative auditor, shall be
furnished by the agency requested to provide such report.

Sec.
116. RCW
44.28.100 and 1996 c 288 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((joint committee)) legislative auditor may make reports from
time to time to the members of the legislature and to the public with respect
to any of ((its)) the legislative auditor's findings or
recommendations.

(2)
The ((joint committee shall keep)) legislative auditor shall ensure
that complete minutes of ((its)) the meetings of the
members of the performance audit office are kept.

Sec.
117. RCW
44.28.110 and 1955 c 206 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

In the discharge of any duty herein imposed, the ((committee or
any personnel under its authority and its subcommittees shall have)) legislative
auditor has the authority to examine and inspect all properties, equipment,
facilities, files, records and accounts of any state ((office, department,
institution, board, committee, commission or)) agency((,)) or
local government and to administer oaths((,)). If authorized by
majority vote of the members of the performance audit office, the legislative
auditor may issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses and the
production of any papers, books, accounts, documents and testimony, and to
cause the deposition of witnesses, either residing within or without the state,
to be taken in the manner prescribed by laws for taking depositions in civil
actions in the superior courts.

Sec.
118. RCW
44.28.120 and 1996 c 288 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

In
case of the failure on the part of any person to comply with any subpoena
issued in behalf of the ((joint committee)) legislative auditor,
or on the refusal of any witness to testify to any matters regarding which he
or she may be lawfully interrogated, it shall be the duty of the superior court
of any county, or of the judge thereof, on application of the ((joint
committee)) legislative auditor, to compel obedience by proceedings
for contempt, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena
issued from such court or a refusal to testify therein.

Sec.
119. RCW
44.28.130 and 1996 c 288 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

Each witness who appears before the ((joint committee)) legislative
auditor by ((its)) order of the legislative auditor, other
than a state official or employee, shall receive for his or her attendance the
fees and mileage provided for witnesses in civil cases in courts of record,
which shall be audited and paid upon the presentation of proper vouchers signed
by such witness((, verified)) and approved by the legislative
auditor((, and approved by the chair and the vice-chair of the joint
committee)).

Sec.
120. RCW
44.28.150 and 1996 c 288 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((joint committee)) legislative auditor shall cooperate, act, and
function with legislative committees and with the councils or committees of
other states similar to ((this joint committee)) the legislative
auditor and with other interstate research organizations.

Sec.
121. RCW
44.28.155 and 1997 c 58 s 705 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor shall conduct an evaluation of the effectiveness of the WorkFirst program
described in chapter 58, Laws of 1997, including the job opportunities and
basic skills training program and any approved private, county, or local
government WorkFirst program. The evaluation shall assess the success of the
program in assisting clients to become employed and to reduce their use of
temporary assistance for needy families. The study shall include but not be
limited to the following:

(a)
An assessment of employment outcomes, including hourly wages, hours worked, and
total earnings, for clients;

(b)
A comparison of temporary assistance for needy families outcomes, including
grant amounts and program exits, for clients; and

(c)
An audit of the performance-based contract for each private nonprofit
contractor for job opportunities and basic skills training program services.
The ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor may contract with the Washington institute for public policy for
appropriate portions of the evaluation required by this section.

(2)
Administrative data shall be provided by the department of social and health
services, the employment security department, the state board for community and
technical colleges, local governments, and private contractors. The department
of social and health services shall require contractors to provide
administrative and outcome data needed for this study as a condition of
contract compliance.

Sec.
122. RCW
44.28.800 and 1998 c 297 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor
shall conduct an evaluation of the efficiency and effectiveness of chapter 297,
Laws of 1998 in meeting its stated goals. Such an evaluation shall include the
operation of the state mental hospitals and the regional support networks, as
well as any other appropriate entity. The ((joint legislative audit and
review committee)) legislative auditor shall prepare an interim
report of ((its)) the legislative auditor's findings which shall
be delivered to the appropriate legislative committees of the house of
representatives and the senate no later than September 1, 2000. In addition,
the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor shall prepare a final report of ((its)) the legislative
auditor's findings which shall be delivered to the appropriate legislative
committees of the house of representatives and the senate no later than January
1, 2001.

PART
II - REFERENCES

Sec.
201. RCW
28A.630.830 and 1996 c 288 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The selection advisory committee is created. The committee shall be composed
of up to three members from the house of representatives, up to three members
from the senate, up to two members from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, and one member from each of the following: The office of
financial management, Washington state special education coalition,
transitional bilingual instruction educators, and Washington education
association.

(2)
The ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor and the superintendent of public instruction shall provide staff
for the selection advisory committee.

(3)
The selection advisory committee shall:

(a)
Develop appropriate criteria for selecting demonstration projects;

(b)
Issue requests for proposals in accordance with RCW 28A.630.820 through
28A.630.845 for demonstration projects;

(c)
Review proposals and recommend demonstration projects for approval by the superintendent
of public instruction; and

(d)
Advise the superintendent of public instruction on the evaluation design.

Sec.
202. RCW
28B.20.382 and 1999 c 346 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Until authorized by statute of the legislature, the board of regents of the
university, with respect to the university tract, shall not sell the land or
any part thereof or any improvement thereon, or lease the land or any part
thereof or any improvement thereon or renew or extend any lease thereof for a
term of more than eighty years. Any sale of the land or any part thereof or
any improvement thereon, or any lease or renewal or extension of any lease of
the land or any part thereof or any improvement thereon for a term of more than
eighty years made or attempted to be made by the board of regents shall be null
and void until the same has been approved or ratified and confirmed by
legislative act.

(2)
The board of regents shall have power from time to time to lease the land, or
any part thereof or any improvement thereon for a term of not more than eighty
years. Any and all records, books, accounts, and agreements of any lessee or
sublessee under this section, pertaining to compliance with the terms and
conditions of such lease or sublease, shall be open to inspection by the board
of regents, the legislative auditor, and the ways and means committee of
the senate((,)) and the appropriations committee of the house of
representatives, ((and the joint legislative audit and review committee))
or any successor committees. It is not intended that unrelated records, books,
accounts, and agreements of lessees, sublessees, or related companies be open
to such inspection. The board of regents shall make a full, detailed report of
all leases and transactions pertaining to the land or any part thereof or any
improvement thereon to the ((joint legislative audit and review committee))
legislative auditor, including one copy to the staff of the committee,
during odd-numbered years.

(3)
The net proceeds from the sale or lease of land in the university tract, or any
part thereof or any improvement thereon, shall be deposited into the University
of Washington facilities bond retirement account hereby established outside the
state treasury as a nonappropriated local fund to be used exclusively for the
purpose of erecting, altering, maintaining, equipping, or furnishing buildings
at the University of Washington. The board of regents shall transfer from the
University of Washington facilities bond retirement account to the University
of Washington building account under RCW 43.79.080 any funds in excess of
amounts reasonably necessary for payment of debt service in combination with
other nonappropriated local funds related to capital projects for which debt
service is required under section 4, chapter 380, Laws of 1999.

Sec.
203. RCW
39.29.080 and 1997 c 373 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
state agency may not enter into a personal services contract with a consultant
under which the consultant could charge additional costs to the agency, the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor, or the
state auditor for access to data generated under the contract. A consultant
under such contract shall provide access to data generated under the contract
to the contracting agency, the ((joint legislative audit and review
committee)) legislative auditor, and the state auditor. For purposes
of this section, "data" includes all information that supports the
findings, conclusions, and recommendations of the consultant's reports,
including computer models and the methodology for those models.

Sec.
204. RCW
41.06.070 and 1998 c 245 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

(a)
The members of the legislature or to any employee of, or position in, the
legislative branch of the state government including the legislative
auditor, state actuary, and members, officers, and employees of the ((legislative
council, joint legislative audit and review committee)) performance
audit office, statute law committee, and any ((interim)) other
office, authority, agency, or committee of the legislature;

(b)
The justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of
the superior courts or of the inferior courts, or to any employee of, or
position in the judicial branch of state government;

(c)
Officers, academic personnel, and employees of technical colleges;

(d)
The officers of the Washington state patrol;

(e)
Elective officers of the state;

(f)
The chief executive officer of each agency;

(g)
In the departments of employment security and social and health services, the
director and the director's confidential secretary; in all other departments,
the executive head of which is an individual appointed by the governor, the
director, his or her confidential secretary, and his or her statutory assistant
directors;

(h)
In the case of a multimember board, commission, or committee, whether the
members thereof are elected, appointed by the governor or other authority,
serve ex officio, or are otherwise chosen:

(i)
All members of such boards, commissions, or committees;

(ii)
If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on a part-time
basis and there is a statutory executive officer: The secretary of the board,
commission, or committee; the chief executive officer of the board, commission,
or committee; and the confidential secretary of the chief executive officer of
the board, commission, or committee;

(iii)
If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on a full-time
basis: The chief executive officer or administrative officer as designated by
the board, commission, or committee; and a confidential secretary to the chair
of the board, commission, or committee;

(iv)
If all members of the board, commission, or committee serve ex officio: The
chief executive officer; and the confidential secretary of such chief executive
officer;

(i)
The confidential secretaries and administrative assistants in the immediate
offices of the elective officers of the state;

(j)
Assistant attorneys general;

(k)
Commissioned and enlisted personnel in the military service of the state;

(l)
Inmate, student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional
consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel resources board;

(m)
The public printer or to any employees of or positions in the state printing
plant;

(n)
Officers and employees of the Washington state fruit commission;

(o)
Officers and employees of the Washington state apple advertising commission;

(p)
Officers and employees of the Washington state dairy products commission;

(q)
Officers and employees of the Washington tree fruit research commission;

(r)
Officers and employees of the Washington state beef commission;

(s)
Officers and employees of any commission formed under chapter 15.66 RCW;

(t)
((Officers and employees of the state wheat commission formed under chapter
15.63 RCW;

(u)))
Officers and employees of agricultural commissions formed under chapter 15.65
RCW;

(((v)))
(u) Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed under
chapter 67.40 RCW;

(((w)))
(v) Executive assistants for personnel administration and labor
relations in all state agencies employing such executive assistants including
but not limited to all departments, offices, commissions, committees, boards,
or other bodies subject to the provisions of this chapter and this subsection
shall prevail over any provision of law inconsistent herewith unless specific
exception is made in such law;

(((x)))
(w) In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy agency heads,
assistant directors or division directors, and not more than three principal
policy assistants who report directly to the agency head or deputy agency
heads;

(((y)))
(x) All employees of the marine employees' commission;

(((z)
Up to a total of five senior staff positions of the western library network
under chapter 27.26 RCW responsible for formulating policy or for directing
program management of a major administrative unit. This subsection (1)(z)
shall expire on June 30, 1997;

(aa))) (y)
Staff employed by the department of community, trade, and economic development
to administer energy policy functions and manage energy site evaluation council
activities under RCW 43.21F.045(2)(m);

(((bb)))
(z) Staff employed by Washington State University to administer energy
education, applied research, and technology transfer programs under RCW
43.21F.045 as provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5).

(2)
The following classifications, positions, and employees of institutions of
higher education and related boards are hereby exempted from coverage of this
chapter:

(a)
Members of the governing board of each institution of higher education and
related boards, all presidents, vice-presidents, and their confidential
secretaries, administrative, and personal assistants; deans, directors, and
chairs; academic personnel; and executive heads of major administrative or
academic divisions employed by institutions of higher education; principal
assistants to executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions;
other managerial or professional employees in an institution or related board
having substantial responsibility for directing or controlling program
operations and accountable for allocation of resources and program results, or
for the formulation of institutional policy, or for carrying out personnel
administration or labor relations functions, legislative relations, public
information, development, senior computer systems and network programming, or
internal audits and investigations; and any employee of a community college
district whose place of work is one which is physically located outside the
state of Washington and who is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned
to an educational program operating outside of the state of Washington;

(b)
Student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional
consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel resources board, employed
by institutions of higher education and related boards;

(c)
The governing board of each institution, and related boards, may also exempt
from this chapter classifications involving research activities, counseling of
students, extension or continuing education activities, graphic arts or
publications activities requiring prescribed academic preparation or special
training as determined by the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee
engaged in office, clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be
exempted by the board under this provision;

(d)
Printing craft employees in the department of printing at the University of
Washington.

(3)
In addition to the exemptions specifically provided by this chapter, the
Washington personnel resources board may provide for further exemptions
pursuant to the following procedures. The governor or other appropriate
elected official may submit requests for exemption to the Washington personnel
resources board stating the reasons for requesting such exemptions. The
Washington personnel resources board shall hold a public hearing, after proper
notice, on requests submitted pursuant to this subsection. If the board
determines that the position for which exemption is requested is one involving
substantial responsibility for the formulation of basic agency or executive
policy or one involving directing and controlling program operations of an
agency or a major administrative division thereof, the Washington personnel
resources board shall grant the request and such determination shall be final
as to any decision made before July 1, 1993. The total number of additional
exemptions permitted under this subsection shall not exceed one percent of the
number of employees in the classified service not including employees of
institutions of higher education and related boards for those agencies not
directly under the authority of any elected public official other than the
governor, and shall not exceed a total of twenty-five for all agencies under
the authority of elected public officials other than the governor.

The
salary and fringe benefits of all positions presently or hereafter exempted
except for the chief executive officer of each agency, full-time members of
boards and commissions, administrative assistants and confidential secretaries
in the immediate office of an elected state official, and the personnel listed
in subsections (1)(j) through (((v), (y), (z))) (u), (x), and (2)
of this section, shall be determined by the Washington personnel resources
board. However, beginning with changes proposed for the 1997-99 fiscal
biennium, changes to the classification plan affecting exempt salaries must
meet the same provisions for classified salary increases resulting from
adjustments to the classification plan as outlined in RCW 41.06.152.

Any
person holding a classified position subject to the provisions of this chapter
shall, when and if such position is subsequently exempted from the application
of this chapter, be afforded the following rights: If such person previously
held permanent status in another classified position, such person shall have a
right of reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a
position of similar nature and salary.

Any
classified employee having civil service status in a classified position who
accepts an appointment in an exempt position shall have the right of reversion
to the highest class of position previously held, or to a position of similar
nature and salary.

A
person occupying an exempt position who is terminated from the position for
gross misconduct or malfeasance does not have the right of reversion to a
classified position as provided for in this section.

Sec.
205. RCW
42.48.060 and 1996 c 288 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter is applicable to, or in any way affects, the powers and duties
of the state auditor or the ((joint legislative audit and review committee))
legislative auditor.

Sec.
206. RCW
43.09.310 and 1996 c 288 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state auditor shall annually audit the state-wide combined financial statements
prepared by the office of financial management and make post-audits of state
agencies. Post-audits of state agencies shall be made at such periodic
intervals as is determined by the state auditor. Audits of combined financial
statements shall include determinations as to the validity and accuracy of
accounting methods, procedures and standards utilized in their preparation, as
well as the accuracy of the financial statements themselves. A report shall be
made of each such audit and post-audit upon completion thereof, and one copy
shall be transmitted to the governor, one to the director of financial
management, one to the state agency audited, one to the ((joint legislative
audit and review committee)) legislative auditor, one each to the
standing committees on ways and means of the house and senate, one to the chief
clerk of the house, one to the secretary of the senate, and at least one shall
be kept on file in the office of the state auditor. A copy of any report
containing findings of noncompliance with state law shall be transmitted to the
attorney general.

Sec.
207. RCW
43.79.270 and 1998 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever any money, from the federal government, or from other sources, which
was not anticipated in the budget approved by the legislature has actually been
received and is designated to be spent for a specific purpose, the head of any
department, agency, board, or commission through which such expenditure shall
be made is to submit to the governor a statement which may be in the form of a
request for an allotment amendment setting forth the facts constituting the
need for such expenditure and the estimated amount to be expended: PROVIDED,
That no expenditure shall be made in excess of the actual amount received, and
no money shall be expended for any purpose except the specific purpose for
which it was received. A copy of any proposal submitted to the governor to
expend money from an appropriated fund or account in excess of appropriations
provided by law which is based on the receipt of unanticipated revenues shall
be submitted to the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor and also to the standing committees on ways and means of the house
and senate if the legislature is in session at the same time as it is
transmitted to the governor.

(2)
Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, whenever money from any source
that was not anticipated in the transportation budget approved by the
legislature has actually been received and is designated to be spent for a
specific purpose, the head of a department, agency, board, or commission
through which the expenditure must be made shall submit to the governor a
statement, which may be in the form of a request for an allotment amendment,
setting forth the facts constituting the need for the expenditure and the
estimated amount to be expended. However, no expenditure may be made in excess
of the actual amount received, and no money may be expended for any purpose
except the specific purpose for which it was received. A copy of any proposal
submitted to the governor to expend money from an appropriated transportation
fund or account in excess of appropriations provided by law that is based on
the receipt of unanticipated revenues must be submitted, at a minimum, to the
standing committees on transportation of the house and senate, if the
legislature is in session, at the same time as it is transmitted to the
governor. During the legislative interim, any such proposal must be submitted
to the legislative transportation committee.

Sec.
208. RCW
43.79.280 and 1998 c 177 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If the governor approves such estimate in whole or part, he shall endorse on
each copy of the statement his approval, together with a statement of the
amount approved in the form of an allotment amendment, and transmit one copy to
the head of the department, agency, board, or commission authorizing the
expenditure. An identical copy of the governor's statement of approval and a
statement of the amount approved for expenditure shall be transmitted
simultaneously to the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor and also to the standing committee on ways and means of the house
and senate of all executive approvals of proposals to expend money in excess of
appropriations provided by law.

(2)
If the governor approves an estimate with transportation funding implications,
in whole or part, he shall endorse on each copy of the statement his approval,
together with a statement of the amount approved in the form of an allotment
amendment, and transmit one copy to the head of the department, agency, board,
or commission authorizing the expenditure. An identical copy of the governor's
statement of approval of a proposal to expend transportation money in excess of
appropriations provided by law and a statement of the amount approved for
expenditure must be transmitted simultaneously to the standing committees on
transportation of the house and senate. During the legislative interim, all
estimate approvals endorsed by the governor along with a statement of the
amount approved in the form of an allotment amendment must be transmitted
simultaneously to the legislative transportation committee.

Sec.
209. RCW
43.88.020 and 1996 c 288 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Budget" means a proposed plan of expenditures for a given period or
purpose and the proposed means for financing these expenditures.

(2)
"Budget document" means a formal statement, either written or
provided on any electronic media or both, offered by the governor to the
legislature, as provided in RCW 43.88.030.

(3)
"Director of financial management" means the official appointed by
the governor to serve at the governor's pleasure and to whom the governor may
delegate necessary authority to carry out the governor's duties as provided in
this chapter. The director of financial management shall be head of the office
of financial management which shall be in the office of the governor.

(4)
"Agency" means and includes every state office, officer, each
institution, whether educational, correctional, or other, and every department,
division, board, and commission, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(5)
"Public funds", for purposes of this chapter, means all moneys,
including cash, checks, bills, notes, drafts, stocks, and bonds, whether held
in trust, for operating purposes, or for capital purposes, and collected or
disbursed under law, whether or not such funds are otherwise subject to
legislative appropriation, including funds maintained outside the state
treasury.

(6)
"Regulations" means the policies, standards, and requirements, stated
in writing, designed to carry out the purposes of this chapter, as issued by
the governor or the governor's designated agent, and which shall have the force
and effect of law.

(7)
"Ensuing biennium" means the fiscal biennium beginning on July 1st of
the same year in which a regular session of the legislature is held during an
odd-numbered year pursuant to Article II, section 12 of the Constitution and
which biennium next succeeds the current biennium.

(8)
"Dedicated fund" means a fund in the state treasury, or a separate
account or fund in the general fund in the state treasury, that by law is
dedicated, appropriated, or set aside for a limited object or purpose; but
"dedicated fund" does not include a revolving fund or a trust fund.

(9)
"Revolving fund" means a fund in the state treasury, established by
law, from which is paid the cost of goods or services furnished to or by a
state agency, and which is replenished through charges made for such goods or
services or through transfers from other accounts or funds.

(10)
"Trust fund" means a fund in the state treasury in which designated
persons or classes of persons have a vested beneficial interest or equitable
ownership, or which was created or established by a gift, grant, contribution,
devise, or bequest that limits the use of the fund to designated objects or
purposes.

(11)
"Administrative expenses" means expenditures for: (a) Salaries,
wages, and related costs of personnel and (b) operations and maintenance
including but not limited to costs of supplies, materials, services, and
equipment.

(12)
"Fiscal year" means the year beginning July 1st and ending the
following June 30th.

(13)
"Lapse" means the termination of authority to expend an appropriation.

(14)
"Legislative fiscal committees" means the ((joint legislative
audit and review committee)) legislative auditor, the legislative
evaluation and accountability program committee, the ways and means committees
of the senate and house of representatives, and, where appropriate, the
legislative transportation committee.

(15)
"Fiscal period" means the period for which an appropriation is made
as specified within the act making the appropriation.

(16)
"Primary budget driver" means the primary determinant of a budget
level, other than a price variable, which causes or is associated with the
major expenditure of an agency or budget unit within an agency, such as a
caseload, enrollment, workload, or population statistic.

(17)
"State tax revenue limit" means the limitation created by chapter
43.135 RCW.

(18)
"General state revenues" means the revenues defined by Article VIII,
section 1(c) of the state Constitution.

(19)
"Annual growth rate in real personal income" means the estimated
percentage growth in personal income for the state during the current fiscal
year, expressed in constant value dollars, as published by the office of
financial management or its successor agency.

(20)
"Estimated revenues" means estimates of revenue in the most recent
official economic and revenue forecast prepared under RCW 82.33.020, and
prepared by the office of financial management for those funds, accounts, and
sources for which the office of the economic and revenue forecast council does
not prepare an official forecast including estimates of revenues to support
financial plans under RCW 44.40.070, that are prepared by the office of
financial management in consultation with the interagency task force.

(21)
"Estimated receipts" means the estimated receipt of cash in the most
recent official economic and revenue forecast prepared under RCW 82.33.020, and
prepared by the office of financial management for those funds, accounts, and
sources for which the office of the economic and revenue forecast council does
not prepare an official forecast.

(22)
"State budgeting, accounting, and reporting system" means a system
that gathers, maintains, and communicates fiscal information. The system links
fiscal information beginning with development of agency budget requests through
adoption of legislative appropriations to tracking actual receipts and
expenditures against approved plans.

(23)
"Allotment of appropriation" means the agency's statement of proposed
expenditures, the director of financial management's review of that statement,
and the placement of the approved statement into the state budgeting,
accounting, and reporting system.

(24)
"Statement of proposed expenditures" means a plan prepared by each
agency that breaks each appropriation out into monthly detail representing the
best estimate of how the appropriation will be expended.

(25)
"Undesignated fund balance (or deficit)" means unreserved and
undesignated current assets or other resources available for expenditure over
and above any current liabilities which are expected to be incurred by the
close of the fiscal period.

(26)
"Internal audit" means an independent appraisal activity within an
agency for the review of operations as a service to management, including a
systematic examination of accounting and fiscal controls to assure that human
and material resources are guarded against waste, loss, or misuse; and that
reliable data are gathered, maintained, and fairly disclosed in a written
report of the audit findings.

(27)
"Performance verification" means an analysis that (a) verifies the
accuracy of data used by state agencies in quantifying intended results and
measuring performance toward those results, and (b) verifies whether or not the
reported results were achieved.

(28)
"Performance audit" has the same meaning as it is defined in RCW
44.28.005.

Sec.
210. RCW
43.88.090 and 1997 c 372 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For purposes of developing budget proposals to the legislature, the governor
shall have the power, and it shall be the governor's duty, to require from
proper agency officials such detailed estimates and other information in such
form and at such times as the governor shall direct. The estimates for the
legislature and the judiciary shall be transmitted to the governor and shall be
included in the budget without revision. The estimates for state pension
contributions shall be based on the rates provided in chapter 41.45 RCW.
Copies of all such estimates shall be transmitted to the standing committees on
ways and means of the house and senate at the same time as they are filed with
the governor and the office of financial management.

The
estimates shall include statements or tables which indicate, by agency, the
state funds which are required for the receipt of federal matching revenues.
The estimates shall be revised as necessary to reflect legislative enactments
and adopted appropriations and shall be included with the initial biennial
allotment submitted under RCW 43.88.110. The estimates must reflect that the
agency considered any alternatives to reduce costs or improve service delivery
identified in the findings of a performance audit of the agency by the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor.
Nothing in this subsection requires performance audit findings to be published
as part of the budget.

(2)
Each state agency shall define its mission and establish measurable goals for
achieving desirable results for those who receive its services and the
taxpayers who pay for those services. Each agency shall also develop clear
strategies and timelines to achieve its goals. This section does not require
an agency to develop a new mission or goals in place of identifiable missions
or goals that meet the intent of this section. The mission and goals of each
agency must conform to statutory direction and limitations.

(3)
For the purpose of assessing program performance, each state agency shall
establish program objectives for each major program in its budget. The
objectives must be consistent with the missions and goals developed under this
section. The objectives must be expressed to the extent practicable in
outcome-based, objective, and measurable form unless an exception to adopt a
different standard is granted by the office of financial management and
approved by the legislative committee on performance review. The office of
financial management shall provide necessary professional and technical
assistance to assist state agencies in the development of strategic plans that
include the mission of the agency and its programs, measurable goals,
strategies, and performance measurement systems.

(4)
Each state agency shall adopt procedures for continuous self-assessment of each
program and activity, using the mission, goals, objectives, and measurements
required under subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(5)
It is the policy of the legislature that each agency's budget proposals must be
directly linked to the agency's stated mission and program goals and
objectives. Consistent with this policy, agency budget proposals must include
integration of performance measures that allow objective determination of a
program's success in achieving its goals. The office of financial management
shall develop a plan to merge the budget development process with agency
performance assessment procedures. The plan must include a schedule to
integrate agency strategic plans and performance measures into agency budget
requests and the governor's budget proposal over three fiscal biennia. The
plan must identify those agencies that will implement the revised budget
process in the 1997-1999 biennium, the 1999-2001 biennium, and the 2001-2003
biennium. In consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, the office
of financial management shall recommend statutory and procedural modifications
to the state's budget, accounting, and reporting systems to facilitate the
performance assessment procedures and the merger of those procedures with the
state budget process. The plan and recommended statutory and procedural
modifications must be submitted to the legislative fiscal committees by
September 30, 1996.

(6)
In the year of the gubernatorial election, the governor shall invite the
governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee to attend all hearings provided
in RCW 43.88.100; and the governor shall furnish the governor-elect or the
governor-elect's designee with such information as will enable the
governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee to gain an understanding of the
state's budget requirements. The governor-elect or the governor-elect's
designee may ask such questions during the hearings and require such
information as the governor-elect or the governor-elect's designee deems
necessary and may make recommendations in connection with any item of the
budget which, with the governor-elect's reasons therefor, shall be presented to
the legislature in writing with the budget document. Copies of all such
estimates and other required information shall also be submitted to the
standing committees on ways and means of the house and senate.

Sec.
211. RCW
43.88.160 and 1998 c 135 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This
section sets forth the major fiscal duties and responsibilities of officers and
agencies of the executive branch. The regulations issued by the governor
pursuant to this chapter shall provide for a comprehensive, orderly basis for
fiscal management and control, including efficient accounting and reporting
therefor, for the executive branch of the state government and may include, in
addition, such requirements as will generally promote more efficient public
management in the state.

(1)
Governor; director of financial management. The governor, through the director
of financial management, shall devise and supervise a modern and complete
accounting system for each agency to the end that all revenues, expenditures,
receipts, disbursements, resources, and obligations of the state shall be
properly and systematically accounted for. The accounting system shall include
the development of accurate, timely records and reports of all financial
affairs of the state. The system shall also provide for central accounts in
the office of financial management at the level of detail deemed necessary by
the director to perform central financial management. The director of
financial management shall adopt and periodically update an accounting
procedures manual. Any agency maintaining its own accounting and reporting
system shall comply with the updated accounting procedures manual and the rules
of the director adopted under this chapter. An agency may receive a waiver
from complying with this requirement if the waiver is approved by the
director. Waivers expire at the end of the fiscal biennium for which they are
granted. The director shall forward notice of waivers granted to the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees. The director of financial
management may require such financial, statistical, and other reports as the
director deems necessary from all agencies covering any period.

(2)
Except as provided in chapter 43.88C RCW, the director of financial management
is responsible for quarterly reporting of primary operating budget drivers such
as applicable workloads, caseload estimates, and appropriate unit cost data.
These reports shall be transmitted to the legislative fiscal committees or by
electronic means to the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee. Quarterly reports shall include actual monthly data and the
variance between actual and estimated data to date. The reports shall also
include estimates of these items for the remainder of the budget period.

(3)
The director of financial management shall report at least annually to the
appropriate legislative committees regarding the status of all appropriated
capital projects, including transportation projects, showing significant cost
overruns or underruns. If funds are shifted from one project to another, the
office of financial management shall also reflect this in the annual variance
report. Once a project is complete, the report shall provide a final summary
showing estimated start and completion dates of each project phase compared to
actual dates, estimated costs of each project phase compared to actual costs,
and whether or not there are any outstanding liabilities or unsettled claims at
the time of completion.

(4)
In addition, the director of financial management, as agent of the governor,
shall:

(a)
Develop and maintain a system of internal controls and internal audits
comprising methods and procedures to be adopted by each agency that will
safeguard its assets, check the accuracy and reliability of its accounting
data, promote operational efficiency, and encourage adherence to prescribed
managerial policies for accounting and financial controls. The system
developed by the director shall include criteria for determining the scope and
comprehensiveness of internal controls required by classes of agencies,
depending on the level of resources at risk.

Each
agency head or authorized designee shall be assigned the responsibility and
authority for establishing and maintaining internal audits following the
standards of internal auditing of the institute of internal auditors;

(b)
Make surveys and analyses of agencies with the object of determining better
methods and increased effectiveness in the use of manpower and materials; and
the director shall authorize expenditures for employee training to the end that
the state may benefit from training facilities made available to state
employees;

(c)
Establish policies for allowing the contracting of child care services;

(d)
Report to the governor with regard to duplication of effort or lack of
coordination among agencies;

(e)
Review any pay and classification plans, and changes thereunder, developed by
any agency for their fiscal impact: PROVIDED, That none of the provisions of
this subsection shall affect merit systems of personnel management now existing
or hereafter established by statute relating to the fixing of qualifications
requirements for recruitment, appointment, or promotion of employees of any
agency. The director shall advise and confer with agencies including
appropriate standing committees of the legislature as may be designated by the
speaker of the house and the president of the senate regarding the fiscal
impact of such plans and may amend or alter said plans, except that for the
following agencies no amendment or alteration of said plans may be made without
the approval of the agency concerned: Agencies headed by elective officials;

(f)
Fix the number and classes of positions or authorized man years of employment
for each agency and during the fiscal period amend the determinations
previously fixed by the director except that the director shall not be
empowered to fix said number or said classes for the following: Agencies
headed by elective officials;

(g)
Adopt rules to effectuate provisions contained in (a) through (f) of this
subsection.

(5)
The treasurer shall:

(a)
Receive, keep, and disburse all public funds of the state not expressly
required by law to be received, kept, and disbursed by some other persons:
PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not apply to those public funds of the
institutions of higher learning which are not subject to appropriation;

(b)
Receive, disburse, or transfer public funds under the treasurer's supervision
or custody;

(c)
Keep a correct and current account of all moneys received and disbursed by the
treasurer, classified by fund or account;

(d)
Coordinate agencies' acceptance and use of credit cards and other payment
methods, if the agencies have received authorization under RCW 43.41.180;

(e)
Perform such other duties as may be required by law or by regulations issued
pursuant to this law.

It
shall be unlawful for the treasurer to disburse public funds in the treasury
except upon forms or by alternative means duly prescribed by the director of
financial management. These forms or alternative means shall provide for
authentication and certification by the agency head or the agency head's
designee that the services have been rendered or the materials have been
furnished; or, in the case of loans or grants, that the loans or grants are
authorized by law; or, in the case of payments for periodic maintenance
services to be performed on state owned equipment, that a written contract for
such periodic maintenance services is currently in effect and copies thereof
are on file with the office of financial management; and the treasurer shall
not be liable under the treasurer's surety bond for erroneous or improper
payments so made. When services are lawfully paid for in advance of full
performance by any private individual or business entity other than as provided
for by RCW 42.24.035, such individual or entity other than central stores
rendering such services shall make a cash deposit or furnish surety bond
coverage to the state as shall be fixed in an amount by law, or if not fixed by
law, then in such amounts as shall be fixed by the director of the department
of general administration but in no case shall such required cash deposit or
surety bond be less than an amount which will fully indemnify the state against
any and all losses on account of breach of promise to fully perform such
services. No payments shall be made in advance for any equipment maintenance
services to be performed more than three months after such payment. Any such
bond so furnished shall be conditioned that the person, firm or corporation
receiving the advance payment will apply it toward performance of the
contract. The responsibility for recovery of erroneous or improper payments
made under this section shall lie with the agency head or the agency head's
designee in accordance with regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit a public body to advance
funds to a private service provider pursuant to a grant or loan before services
have been rendered or material furnished.

(6)
The state auditor shall:

(a)
Report to the legislature the results of current post audits that have been
made of the financial transactions of each agency; to this end the state
auditor may, in the state auditor's discretion, examine the books and
accounts of any agency, official, or employee charged with the receipt,
custody, or safekeeping of public funds. Where feasible in conducting
examinations, the state auditor shall utilize data and findings from the
internal control system prescribed by the office of financial management. The
current post audit of each agency may include a section on recommendations to
the legislature as provided in (c) of this subsection.

(b)
Give information to the legislature, whenever required, upon any subject
relating to the financial affairs of the state.

(c)
Make the state auditor's official report on or before the thirty-first
of December which precedes the meeting of the legislature. The report shall be
for the last complete fiscal period and shall include determinations as to
whether agencies, in making expenditures, complied with the laws of this
state. The state auditor is authorized to perform or participate in
performance verifications and performance audits as expressly authorized by the
legislature in the omnibus biennial appropriations acts or in the performance
audit work plan approved by the ((joint legislative audit and review
committee)) members of the performance audit office. The state
auditor, upon completing an audit for legal and financial compliance under
chapter 43.09 RCW or a performance verification, may report to the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor or ((other))
appropriate committees of the legislature, in a manner prescribed by the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor, on
facts relating to the management or performance of governmental programs where
such facts are discovered incidental to the legal and financial audit or
performance verification. The state auditor may make such a report to the
legislative auditor or a legislative committee only if the state
auditor has determined that the agency has been given an opportunity and has
failed to resolve the management or performance issues raised by the state
auditor. If the state auditor makes a report to the legislative
auditor or a legislative committee, the agency may submit to the legislative
auditor or committee a response to the report. This subsection (6) shall
not be construed to authorize the state auditor to allocate other than
de minimis resources to performance audits except as expressly authorized in
the appropriations acts or in the performance audit work plan. The results of
a performance audit conducted by the state auditor that has been requested by
the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor must only be transmitted to the ((joint legislative audit and
review committee)) legislative auditor.

(d)
Be empowered to take exception to specific expenditures that have been incurred
by any agency or to take exception to other practices related in any way to the
agency's financial transactions and to cause such exceptions to be made a
matter of public record, including disclosure to the agency concerned and to
the director of financial management. It shall be the duty of the director of
financial management to cause corrective action to be taken within six months,
such action to include, as appropriate, the withholding of funds as provided in
RCW 43.88.110. The director of financial management shall annually report by
December 31st the status of audit resolution to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, the state auditor, and the attorney general. The director of
financial management shall include in the audit resolution report actions taken
as a result of an audit including, but not limited to, types of personnel
actions, costs and types of litigation, and value of recouped goods or
services.

(e)
Promptly report any irregularities to the attorney general.

(f)
Investigate improper governmental activity under chapter 42.40 RCW.

(7)
The ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor may:

(a)
Make post audits of the financial transactions of any agency and management
surveys and program reviews as provided for in chapter 44.28 RCW as well as
performance audits and program evaluations. To this end the ((joint
committee)) legislative auditor may in ((its)) the
legislative auditor's discretion examine the books, accounts, and other
records of any agency, official, or employee.

(b)
Give information to the legislature or any legislative committee whenever
required upon any subject relating to the performance and management of state
agencies.

(c)
Make a report to the legislature which shall include at least the following:

(i)
Determinations as to the extent to which agencies in making expenditures have
complied with the will of the legislature and in this connection, may take exception
to specific expenditures or financial practices of any agencies; and

(ii)
Such plans as ((it)) the legislative auditor deems expedient for
the support of the state's credit, for lessening expenditures, for promoting
frugality and economy in agency affairs, and generally for an improved level of
fiscal management.

Sec.
212. RCW
43.88.205 and 1996 c 288 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever an agency makes application, enters into a contract or agreement, or
submits state plans for participation in, and for grants of federal funds under
any federal law, the agency making such application shall at the time of such
action, give notice in such form and manner as the director of financial
management may prescribe, or the ((chair of the joint legislative audit and
review committee)) legislative auditor, standing committees on ways
and means of the house and senate, the chief clerk of the house, or the
secretary of the senate may request.

(2)
Whenever any such application, contract, agreement, or state plan is amended,
such agency shall notify each such officer of such action in the same manner as
prescribed or requested pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
Such agency shall promptly furnish such progress reports in relation to each
such application, contract, agreement, or state plan as may be requested
following the date of the filing of the application, contract, agreement, or
state plan; and shall also file with each such officer a final report as to the
final disposition of each such application, contract, agreement, or state plan
if such is requested.

Sec.
213. RCW
43.88.230 and 1996 c 288 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter, the statute law committee, the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor, the
legislative transportation committee, the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee, the office of state actuary, and all
legislative standing committees of both houses shall be deemed a part of the
legislative branch of state government.

Sec.
214. RCW
43.88.310 and 1996 c 288 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative auditor ((of the office of the joint legislative audit and
review committee, with the concurrence of the joint legislative audit and
review committee,)) may file with the attorney general any audit exceptions
or other findings of any performance audit, management study, or special report
prepared for the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor, any standing or special committees of the house or senate, or the
entire legislature which indicate a violation of RCW 43.88.290, or any other
act of malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance on the part of any state
officer or employee.

(2)
The attorney general shall promptly review each filing received from the
legislative auditor and may act thereon as provided in RCW 43.88.300, or any
other applicable statute authorizing enforcement proceedings by the attorney
general. The attorney general shall advise the ((joint legislative audit
and review committee)) legislative auditor of the status of
exceptions or findings referred under this section.

Sec.
215. RCW
43.88.510 and 1996 c 288 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

Not
later than ninety days after the beginning of each biennium, the director of
financial management shall submit the compiled list of boards, commissions,
councils, and committees, together with the information on each such group,
that is required by RCW 43.88.505 to:

(1)
The speaker of the house and the president of the senate for distribution to
the appropriate standing committees, including one copy to the staff of each of
the committees;

(2)
The ((chair of the joint legislative audit and review committee, including a
copy to the staff of the committee)) legislative auditor;

(3)
The chairs of the committees on ways and means of the senate and house of
representatives; and

(4)
Members of the state government committee of the house of representatives and
of the governmental operations committee of the senate, including one copy to
the staff of each of the committees.

Sec.
216. RCW
43.131.050 and 1996 c 288 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((joint legislative audit and review committee shall cause to be conducted))
legislative auditor shall conduct a program and fiscal review of any
state agency or program scheduled for termination by the processes provided in
this chapter. Such program and fiscal review shall be completed and a
preliminary report prepared on or before June 30th of the year prior to the
date established for termination. Upon completion of ((its)) the
preliminary report, the ((joint legislative audit and review committee))
legislative auditor shall transmit copies of the report to the office of
financial management. The office of financial management may then conduct its
own program and fiscal review of the agency scheduled for termination and shall
prepare a report on or before September 30th of the year prior to the date
established for termination. Upon completion of its report the office of
financial management shall transmit copies of its report to the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor. The
((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor
shall prepare a final report that includes the reports of both the office of
financial management and the ((joint legislative audit and review committee))
legislative auditor. The ((joint legislative audit and review
committee)) legislative auditor and the office of financial
management shall, upon request, make available to each other all working
papers, studies, and other documents which relate to reports required under
this section. The ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor shall transmit the final report to the legislature, to the state
agency concerned, to the governor, and to the state library.

Sec.
217. RCW
43.131.060 and 1996 c 288 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

In
conducting the review of a regulatory entity, the ((joint legislative audit
and review committee)) legislative auditor shall consider, but not
be limited to, the following factors where applicable:

(1)
The extent to which the regulatory entity has operated in the public interest
and fulfilled its statutory obligations;

(2)
The duties of the regulatory entity and the costs incurred in carrying out
those duties;

(3)
The extent to which the regulatory entity is operating in an efficient,
effective, and economical manner;

(4)
The extent to which the regulatory entity inhibits competition or otherwise
adversely affects the state's economic climate;

(5)
The extent to which the regulatory entity duplicates the activities of other
regulatory entities or of the private sector, where appropriate; and

(6)
The extent to which the absence or modification of regulation would adversely
affect, maintain, or improve the public health, safety, or welfare.

Sec.
218. RCW
43.131.070 and 1996 c 288 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

In
conducting the review of a state agency other than a regulatory entity, the ((joint
legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor shall
consider, but not be limited to, the following factors where applicable:

(1)
The extent to which the state agency has complied with legislative intent;

(2)
The extent to which the state agency is operating in an efficient and
economical manner which results in optimum performance;

(3)
The extent to which the state agency is operating in the public interest by
effectively providing a needed service that should be continued rather than
modified, consolidated, or eliminated;

(4)
The extent to which the state agency duplicates the activities of other state
agencies or of the private sector, where appropriate; and

(5)
The extent to which the termination or modification of the state agency would
adversely affect the public health, safety, or welfare.

Sec.
219. RCW
43.131.080 and 1996 c 288 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Following receipt of the final report from the ((joint legislative audit and
review committee)) legislative auditor, the appropriate committees
of reference in the senate and the house of representatives shall each hold a
public hearing, unless a joint hearing is held, to consider the final report
and any related data. The legislative auditor and the committees shall
also receive testimony from representatives of the state agency or agencies
involved, which shall have the burden of demonstrating a public need for its
continued existence; and from the governor or the governor's designee, and
other interested parties, including the general public.

(2)
When requested by either of the presiding members of the appropriate senate and
house committees of reference, a regulatory entity under review shall mail an
announcement of any hearing to the persons it regulates who have requested
notice of agency rule-making proceedings as provided in RCW 34.05.320, or who
have requested notice of hearings held pursuant to the provisions of this
section. On request of either presiding member, such mailing shall include an
explanatory statement not exceeding one page in length prepared and supplied by
the member's committee.

(3)
The presiding members of the senate committee on ways and means and the house
committee on appropriations may designate one or more liaison members to each
committee of reference in their respective chambers for purposes of
participating in any hearing and in subsequent committee of reference
discussions and to seek a coordinated approach between the committee of
reference and the committee they represent in a liaison capacity.

(4) Following any hearing under subsection (1) of this section by
the committees of reference, such committees may hold additional meetings or
hearings to come to a final determination as to whether a state agency has demonstrated
a public need for its continued existence or whether modifications in existing
procedures are needed. In the event that a committee of reference concludes
that a state agency shall be reestablished or modified or its functions
transferred elsewhere, it shall make such determination as a bill. No more
than one state agency shall be reestablished or modified in any one bill.

Sec.
220. RCW
43.131.110 and 1996 c 288 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
reference in this chapter to a committee of the legislature ((including the
joint legislative audit and review committee)) shall also refer to the
successor of that committee.

Sec.
221. RCW
43.250.080 and 1996 c 288 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

At
the end of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall submit to the governor,
the state auditor, and the ((joint legislative audit and review committee))
legislative auditor a summary of the activity of the investment pool.
The summary shall indicate the quantity of funds deposited; the earnings of the
pool; the investments purchased, sold, or exchanged; the administrative
expenses of the investment pool; and such other information as the state
treasurer deems relevant.

Sec.
222. RCW
44.40.025 and 1996 c 288 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to the powers and duties authorized in RCW 44.40.020, the committee
and the standing committees on transportation of the house and senate shall, in
coordination with the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor, the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
and the ways and means committees of the senate and house of representatives,
ascertain, study, and/or analyze all available facts and matters relating or
pertaining to sources of revenue, appropriations, expenditures, and financial
condition of the motor vehicle fund and accounts thereof, the highway safety
fund, and all other funds or accounts related to transportation programs of the
state.

The
((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative auditor,
the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, and the ways
and means committees of the senate and house of representatives shall
coordinate their activities with the legislative transportation committee in
carrying out the committees' powers and duties under chapter 43.88 RCW in
matters relating to the transportation programs of the state.

Sec.
223. RCW
67.70.310 and 1996 c 288 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director of financial management may conduct a management review of the
commission's lottery operations to assure that:

(1)
The manner and time of payment of prizes to the holder of winning tickets or
shares is consistent with this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter;

(2)
The apportionment of total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets
or shares and from all other sources is consistent with this chapter;

(3)
The manner and type of lottery being conducted, and the expenses incidental
thereto, are the most efficient and cost‑effective; and

(4)
The commission is not unnecessarily incurring operating and administrative
costs.

In
conducting a management review, the director of financial management may
inspect the books, documents, and records of the commission. Upon completion
of a management review, all irregularities shall be reported to the attorney
general, the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor, and the state auditor. The director of financial management shall
make such recommendations as may be necessary for the most efficient and
cost-effective operation of the lottery.

Sec.
224. RCW
74.09.415 and 1998 c 245 s 144 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby established a program to be known as the children's health
program.

To
the extent of available funds:

(a)
Health care services may be provided to persons who are under eighteen years of
age with household incomes at or below the federal poverty level and not
otherwise eligible for medical assistance or the limited casualty program for
the medically needy.

(b)
The determination of eligibility of recipients for health care services shall
be the responsibility of the department. The application process shall be easy
to understand and, to the extent possible, applications shall be made available
at local schools and other appropriate locations. The department shall make
eligibility determinations within the timeframes for establishing eligibility
for children on medical assistance, as defined by RCW 74.09.510.

(c)
The amount, scope, and duration of health care services provided to eligible
children under the children's health program shall be the same as that provided
to children under medical assistance, as defined in RCW 74.09.520.

(2)
The legislature is interested in assessing the effectiveness of the prenatal
care program. However, the legislature recognizes the cost and complexity
associated with such assessment.

The
legislature accepts the effectiveness of prenatal and maternity care at
improving birth outcomes when these services are received by eligible persons.
Therefore, the legislature intends to focus scarce assessment resources to
determine the extent to which support services such as child care, psychosocial
and nutritional assessment and counseling, case management, transportation, and
other support services authorized by chapter 296, Laws of 1990, result in
receipt of prenatal and maternity care by eligible persons.

The
University of Washington shall conduct a study, based on a statistically
significant state-wide sampling of data, to evaluate the effectiveness of the
maternity care access program set forth in RCW 74.09.760 through 74.09.820
based on the principles set forth in RCW 74.09.770.

The
University of Washington shall develop a plan and budget for the study in
consultation with the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor. The ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor shall also monitor the progress of the study.

The
department of social and health services shall make data and other information
available as needed to the University of Washington as required to conduct this
study.

The
study shall determine:

(a)
The characteristics of women receiving services, including health risk factors;

(b)
The extent to which access to maternity care and support services have improved
in this state as a result of this program;

(c)
The utilization of services and birth outcomes for women and infants served by
this program by type of practitioner;

(d)
The extent to which birth outcomes for women receiving services under this
program have improved in comparison to birth outcomes of nonmedicaid mothers;

(e)
The impact of increased medicaid reimbursement to physicians on provider
participation;

(f)
The difference between costs for services provided under this program and
medicaid reimbursement for the services;

(g)
The gaps in services, if any, that may still exist for women and their infants
as defined by RCW 74.09.790 (1) and (4) served by this program, excluding
pregnant substance abusers, and women covered by private health insurance; and

(h) The number and mix of services provided to eligible women as
defined by subsection (2)(g) of this section and the effect on birth outcomes
as compared to nonmedicaid birth outcomes.

Sec.
225. RCW
79.01.006 and 1996 c 288 s 51 and 1996 c 261 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Every five years the department of social and health services and other state
agencies that operate institutions shall conduct an inventory of all real
property subject to the charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory
institution account and other real property acquired for institutional purposes
or for the benefit of the blind, deaf, mentally ill, developmentally disabled,
or otherwise disabled. The inventory shall identify which of those real
properties are not needed for state-provided residential care, custody, or
treatment. By December 1, 1992, and every five years thereafter the department
shall report the results of the inventory to the house of representatives
committee on capital facilities and financing, the senate committee on ways and
means, and the ((joint legislative audit and review committee)) legislative
auditor.

(2)
Real property identified as not needed for state-provided residential care,
custody, or treatment shall be transferred to the corpus of the charitable,
educational, penal, and reformatory institution account. This subsection shall
not apply to leases of real property to a consortium of three or more counties
in order for the counties to construct or otherwise acquire correctional
facilities for juveniles or adults or to real property subject to binding
conditions that conflict with the other provisions of this subsection.

(3)
The department of natural resources shall manage all property subject to the
charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institution account and, in
consultation with the department of social and health services and other
affected agencies, shall adopt a plan for the management of real property
subject to the account and other real property acquired for institutional
purposes or for the benefit of the blind, deaf, mentally ill, developmentally
disabled, or otherwise disabled.

(a)
The plan shall be consistent with state trust land policies and shall be
compatible with the needs of institutions adjacent to real property subject to
the plan.

(b)
The plan may be modified as necessary to ensure the quality of future
management and to address the acquisition of additional real property.

PART
III - OTHER

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. RCW
43.21J.800 (Joint legislative audit and review committee report)
and 1996 c 288 s 36 & 1993 c 516 s 11 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. Part
headings used in this act are not part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. (1)
Section 201 of this act expires September 1, 2001.

(2) Sections 216 through 220 of this act expire June 30, 2000.

---
END ---