BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-MUNICIPAL FIRE AND POLICE PROTECTION

It
is the intent of the legislature to continue to support a portion of the ongoing
costs for these cities for programs and services through future
appropriations. For the purpose of municipal fire and police protection,
subject to section 7 of this act, the following amounts are appropriated from
the general fund to the office of financial management for distribution to the
following cities in the amounts designated:

1999-2001

City FY
2000 FY 2001 Biennium

Aberdeen 56,086 211,900 267,986

Airway
Heights 15,354 58,008 73,362

Albion 2,340 8,840 11,180

Algona 7,207 27,230 34,437

Almira 1,038 3,923 4,961

Anacortes 49,084 185,445 234,529

Arlington 25,106 94,852 119,957

Asotin 3,723 14,066 17,790

Auburn 133,145 503,037 636,182

Bainbridge
Island 67,768 256,035 323,803

Battle
Ground 30,998 117,113 148,111

Beaux
Arts 987 3,730 4,717

Bellevue 362,751 1,370,510 1,733,261

Bellingham 218,846 826,823 1,045,669

Benton
City 7,429 28,068 35,498

Bingen 2,408 9,098 11,506

Black
Diamond 13,065 49,362 62,427

Blaine 12,433 46,974 59,407

Bonney
Lake 34,362 129,824 164,186

Bothell 94,992 358,888 453,879

Bremerton 123,889 468,064 591,953

Brewster 7,053 26,649 33,702

Bridgeport 7,258 27,423 34,682

Brier 21,690 81,947 103,637

Buckley 13,595 51,362 64,956

Bucoda 2,203 8,324 10,527

Burien 101,686 384,182 485,868

Burlington 19,248 72,720 91,967

Camas 37,129 140,277 177,406

Carbonado 2,217 8,375 10,592

Carnation 6,097 23,035 29,132

Cashmere 9,171 34,650 43,821

Castle
Rock 7,190 27,165 34,355

Cathlamet 1,862 7,033 8,895

Centralia 46,522 175,766 222,288

Chehalis 23,944 90,464 114,408

Chelan 11,648 44,006 55,654

Cheney 29,187 110,273 139,461

Chewelah 8,317 31,424 39,741

Clarkston 23,620 89,238 112,858

Cle
Elum 6,131 23,164 29,296

Clyde
Hill 9,848 37,205 47,053

Colfax 9,837 37,166 47,004

College
Place 25,259 95,432 120,692

Colton 1,264 4,775 6,039

Colville 16,225 61,299 77,523

Conconully 683 2,581 3,264

Concrete 2,664 10,066 12,730

Connell 9,564 36,134 45,698

Cosmopolis 5,311 20,067 25,379

Coulee
City 1,978 7,472 9,450

Coulee
Dam 3,733 14,105 17,839

Coupeville 5,602 21,164 26,766

Covington 44,439 167,894 212,333

Creston 854 3,226 4,080

Cusick 840 3,175 4,015

Darrington 4,253 16,067 20,319

Davenport 6,073 22,945 29,018

Dayton 8,727 32,972 41,699

Deer
Park 10,128 38,263 48,391

Des
Moines 92,771 350,500 443,271

Dupont 5,995 22,648 28,643

Duvall 15,149 57,234 72,382

East
Wenatchee 18,428 69,622 88,050

Eatonville 6,541 24,713 31,254

Edgewood 36,548 138,083 174,632

Edmonds 131,881 498,262 630,143

Electric
City 3,364 12,711 16,076

Ellensburg 48,606 183,638 232,244

Elma 10,401 39,296 49,697

Elmer
City 1,059 4,001 5,059

Endicott 1,199 4,530 5,729

Entiat 3,194 12,066 15,260

Enumclaw 36,685 138,600 175,285

Ephrata 20,785 78,527 99,312

Everett 296,246 1,119,250 1,415,496

Everson 6,285 23,745 30,030

Fairfield 2,067 7,808 9,874

Farmington 512 1,936 2,448

Federal
Way 262,704 992,523 1,255,227

Ferndale 27,070 102,272 129,342

Fife 17,608 66,525 84,133

Fircrest 20,272 76,591 96,863

Forks 11,818 44,651 56,470

Friday
Harbor 6,490 24,519 31,009

Garfield 2,022 7,640 9,662

George 1,633 6,169 7,801

Gig
Harbor 21,878 82,656 104,534

Gold
Bar 6,182 23,358 29,541

Goldendale 12,194 46,071 58,265

Grand
Coulee 4,218 15,938 20,156

Grandview 27,975 105,692 133,667

Granger 7,702 29,101 36,803

Granite
Falls 6,866 25,939 32,805

Hamilton 1,025 3,871 4,896

Harrah 1,862 7,033 8,895

Harrington 1,646 6,220 7,867

Hartline 615 2,323 2,938

Hatton 410 1,549 1,958

Hoquiam 30,725 116,080 146,805

Hunts
Point 1,612 6,091 7,703

Ilwaco 2,938 11,098 14,036

Index 478 1,807 2,285

Ione 1,544 5,833 7,377

Issaquah 34,601 130,728 165,329

Kahlotus 837 3,162 3,999

Kalama 5,568 21,035 26,603

Kelso 40,852 154,344 195,196

Kenmore 58,641 221,553 280,194

Kennewick 174,032 657,509 831,541

Kent 249,553 942,839 1,192,392

Kettle
Falls 5,243 19,809 25,052

Kirkland 153,230 578,918 732,148

Kittitas 3,877 14,647 18,524

Krupp 191 723 914

La
Center 5,277 19,938 25,216

La
Conner 2,733 10,324 13,057

La
Crosse 1,298 4,904 6,202

Lacey 99,125 374,503 473,627

Lake
Forest Park 44,541 168,281 212,822

Lake
Stevens 20,836 78,720 99,556

Lakewood 217,992 823,596 1,041,589

Lamont 290 1,097 1,387

Langley 3,740 14,131 17,871

Latah 724 2,736 3,460

Leavenworth 7,737 29,230 36,966

Lind 1,640 6,194 7,834

Long
Beach 4,919 18,583 23,502

Longview 116,784 441,222 558,006

Lyman 1,093 4,130 5,223

Lynden 30,434 114,983 145,418

Lynnwood 113,197 427,671 540,869

Mabton 5,653 21,358 27,011

Malden 905 3,420 4,325

Mansfield 1,247 4,710 5,957

Maple
Valley 42,833 161,829 204,662

Marcus 526 1,987 2,513

Marysville 70,637 266,875 337,513

Mattawa 6,387 24,132 30,520

McCleary 5,346 20,196 25,542

Medical
Lake 13,219 49,942 63,161

Medina 10,042 37,941 47,983

Mercer
Island 73,677 278,361 352,038

Mesa 1,452 5,485 6,936

Metaline 588 2,220 2,807

Metaline
Falls 786 2,968 3,754

Mill
Creek 37,949 143,374 181,323

Millwood 5,687 21,487 27,174

Milton 19,401 73,300 92,702

Monroe 39,110 147,762 186,872

Montesano 12,228 46,200 58,428

Morton 4,355 16,454 20,809

Moses
Lake 48,469 183,122 231,591

Mossyrock 1,930 7,291 9,221

Mount
Vernon 77,537 292,943 370,480

Mountlake
Terrace 69,237 261,584 330,821

Moxee 3,587 13,550 17,137

Mukilteo 58,682 221,708 280,390

Naches 2,442 9,227 11,669

Napavine 4,287 16,196 20,483

Nespelem 905 3,420 4,325

Newcastle 29,392 111,047 140,440

Newport 6,763 25,552 32,315

Nooksack 3,040 11,485 14,525

Normandy
Park 24,030 90,787 114,816

North
Bend 13,031 49,233 62,264

North
Bonneville 2,036 7,691 9,727

Northport 1,066 4,026 5,092

Oak
Harbor 71,150 268,811 339,961

Oakesdale 1,520 5,743 7,263

Oakville 2,289 8,646 10,935

Ocean
Shores 11,169 42,199 53,369

Odessa 3,330 12,582 15,913

Okanogan 8,147 30,778 38,925

Olympia 137,347 518,910 656,256

Omak 15,525 58,653 74,178

Oroville 5,414 20,454 25,868

Orting 13,065 49,362 62,427

Othello 18,564 70,139 88,703

Pacific 19,350 73,107 92,457

Palouse 3,364 12,711 16,076

Pasco 90,858 343,273 434,131

Pateros 2,152 8,130 10,282

Pe Ell 2,340 8,840 11,180

Pomeroy 4,936 18,648 23,583

Port
Angeles 64,728 244,550 309,278

Port
Orchard 24,781 93,626 118,407

Port
Townsend 28,692 108,402 137,094

Poulsbo 22,014 83,173 105,187

Prescott 1,144 4,323 5,467

Prosser 16,737 63,234 79,972

Pullman 87,545 330,755 418,300

Puyallup 105,000 396,699 501,699

Quincy 14,073 53,169 67,241

Rainier 5,363 20,261 25,624

Raymond 10,076 38,070 48,146

Reardan 2,084 7,872 9,956

Redmond 148,960 562,787 711,747

Renton 162,657 614,536 777,193

Republic 3,552 13,421 16,974

Richland 125,972 475,936 601,908

Ridgefield 7,224 27,294 34,518

Ritzville 5,995 22,648 28,643

Riverside 1,196 4,517 5,712

Rock
Island 2,152 8,130 10,282

Rockford 1,766 6,672 8,438

Rosalia 2,200 8,311 10,511

Roslyn 3,204 12,105 15,309

Roy 1,264 4,775 6,039

Royal
City 5,465 20,648 26,113

Ruston 2,545 9,614 12,159

Sammamish 100,423 379,407 479,829

SeaTac 80,509 304,171 384,679

Seattle 1,846,203 6,975,147 8,821,351

Sedro-Woolley 27,360 103,369 130,729

Selah 20,511 77,494 98,006

Sequim 15,183 57,363 72,546

Shelton 26,677 100,788 127,465

Shoreline 177,721 671,447 849,167

Skykomish 939 3,549 4,488

Snohomish 28,180 106,466 134,646

Snoqualmie 6,763 25,552 32,315

Soap
Lake 5,069 19,151 24,220

South
Bend 5,636 21,293 26,929

South
Cle Elum 1,742 6,582 8,324

South
Prairie 1,657 6,259 7,916

Spangle 871 3,291 4,162

Spokane 646,257 2,441,624 3,087,881

Sprague 1,554 5,872 7,426

Springdale 888 3,355 4,243

St.
John 1,896 7,162 9,058

Stanwood 11,545 43,619 55,164

Starbuck 564 2,129 2,693

Steilacoom 21,314 80,527 101,841

Stevenson 4,355 16,454 20,809

Sultan 10,093 38,134 48,228

Sumas 3,334 12,595 15,929

Sumner 29,017 109,628 138,645

Sunnyside 41,979 158,602 200,582

Tacoma 639,425 2,415,814 3,055,239

Tekoa 2,784 10,518 13,301

Tenino 5,465 20,648 26,113

Tieton 3,832 14,479 18,312

Toledo 2,357 8,904 11,261

Tonasket 3,450 13,034 16,484

Toppenish 27,121 102,466 129,587

Tukwila 50,689 191,510 242,200

Tumwater 42,799 161,700 204,499

Twisp 3,382 12,776 16,158

Union
Gap 18,274 69,042 87,316

Uniontown 1,127 4,259 5,386

University
Place 100,935 381,342 482,277

Vader 1,674 6,323 7,997

Vancouver 461,465 1,743,464 2,204,930

Waitsburg 4,099 15,486 19,585

Walla
Walla 99,739 376,826 476,565

Wapato 13,578 51,297 64,875

Warden 7,907 29,875 37,782

Washougal 27,240 102,917 130,158

Washtucna 926 3,497 4,423

Waterville 3,826 14,454 18,279

Waverly 444 1,678 2,122

Wenatchee 87,511 330,626 418,137

West
Richland 26,045 98,401 124,446

Westport 7,088 26,778 33,865

White
Salmon 6,951 26,262 33,213

Wilbur 3,057 11,550 14,607

Wilkeson 1,469 5,549 7,018

Wilson
Creek 789 2,981 3,770

Winlock 4,184 15,809 19,993

Winthrop 1,298 4,904 6,202

Woodinville 35,011 132,276 167,287

Woodland 12,689 47,942 60,631

Woodway 3,382 12,776 16,158

Yacolt 3,484 13,163 16,647

Yakima 223,730 845,277 1,069,007

Yarrow
Point 3,347 12,647 15,994

Yelm 9,393 35,489 44,882

Zillah 8,181 30,907 39,088

TOTAL
APPROPRIATIONS 11,476,011 43,357,555 54,833,566

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE

It
is the intent of the legislature to continue to support a portion of the
ongoing costs for these cities for programs and services through future
appropriations. For the purpose of municipal criminal justice, subject to
section 7 of this act, the following amounts are appropriated from the general
fund to the office of financial management for distribution to the following
cities in the amounts designated:

1999-2001

City FY
2000 FY 2001 Biennium

Aberdeen 31,999 123,836 155,835

Airway
Heights 251 990 1,241

Algona 339 1,315 1,654

Almira 166 643 810

Anacortes 3,291 12,725 16,016

Arlington 6,082 23,534 29,616

Asotin 421 1,629 2,050

Auburn 8,928 34,517 43,445

Bainbridge
Island 2,503 9,683 12,186

Battle
Ground 2,079 8,037 10,116

Beaux
Arts 112 432 544

Bellevue 24,323 94,041 118,364

Bellingham 53,018 205,146 258,164

Benton
City 966 3,756 4,722

Bingen 580 1,822 2,402

Black
Diamond 795 3,087 3,882

Blaine 2,924 11,325 14,249

Bonney
Lake 2,304 8,908 11,212

Bothell 6,369 24,626 30,995

Bremerton 38,151 125,870 164,021

Brewster 332 1,284 1,617

Bridgeport 821 3,182 4,003

Brier 1,128 4,363 5,491

Buckley 836 3,248 4,084

Bucoda 249 964 1,213

Burien 36,133 139,825 175,958

Burlington 989 3,854 4,843

Camas 2,490 9,626 12,115

Carbonado 251 970 1,221

Carnation 977 3,779 4,756

Cashmere 1,528 5,913 7,441

Castle
Rock 339 1,312 1,651

Centralia 29,598 106,376 135,973

Chehalis 1,605 6,207 7,813

Chelan 2,725 10,553 13,278

Cheney 1,957 7,568 9,525

Chewelah 417 1,638 2,056

Clarkston 13,476 52,152 65,628

Cle
Elum 289 1,117 1,405

Clyde
Hill 544 2,105 2,649

Colfax 543 2,101 2,644

College
Place 1,694 6,549 8,243

Colville 1,042 4,050 5,092

Concrete 40 155 195

Connell 378 1,461 1,838

Cosmopolis 250 967 1,218

Coulee
City 93 361 454

Coulee
Dam 63 245 308

Coupeville 95 368 463

Covington 8,005 30,970 38,974

Creston 109 423 533

Dayton 1,032 3,994 5,027

Deer
Park 1,711 6,623 8,334

Des
Moines 6,220 24,050 30,271

Duvall 958 3,723 4,681

East
Wenatchee 4,165 16,145 20,310

Edgewood 5,964 23,072 29,036

Edmonds 8,843 34,190 43,032

Electric
City 437 1,693 2,131

Ellensburg 11,775 45,563 57,338

Elma 5,824 22,543 28,367

Enumclaw 2,460 9,510 11,970

Ephrata 1,394 5,389 6,783

Everett 68,772 265,714 334,486

Everson 296 1,144 1,440

Fairfield 269 1,040 1,309

Farmington 58 224 282

Federal
Way 17,615 68,105 85,719

Ferndale 1,407 5,441 6,848

Fife 1,150 4,473 5,623

Fircrest 1,358 5,256 6,615

Forks 698 2,706 3,404

Friday
Harbor 734 2,840 3,574

George 25 95 120

Gig
Harbor 1,467 5,673 7,140

Gold
Bar 990 3,831 4,821

Goldendale 727 2,820 3,548

Grand
Coulee 72 277 348

Grandview 1,876 7,252 9,128

Granger 363 1,451 1,814

Granite
Falls 1,203 4,656 5,859

Harrah 211 815 1,025

Hartline 80 309 389

Hoquiam 2,060 7,966 10,026

Hunts
Point 182 706 888

Ilwaco 332 1,286 1,618

Index 54 209 263

Issaquah 2,320 8,970 11,290

Kalama 262 1,013 1,275

Kelso 9,897 38,295 48,192

Kenmore 10,563 40,868 51,430

Kennewick 42,161 163,137 205,298

Kent 16,733 64,695 81,428

Kirkland 10,274 39,724 49,998

Kittitas 183 706 889

La
Conner 88 338 426

Lacey 6,646 25,697 32,344

Lake
Forest Park 2,987 11,547 14,534

Lake
Stevens 1,397 5,402 6,799

Lakewood 91,778 316,887 408,665

Langley 176 682 858

Latah 82 317 399

Leavenworth 1,239 4,847 6,087

Long
Beach 2,799 9,972 12,771

Longview 66,628 257,854 324,482

Lyman 16 64 80

Lynden 1,124 4,349 5,473

Lynnwood 7,590 29,346 36,936

Mabton 266 1,030 1,296

Malden 14 53 67

Maple
Valley 7,715 30,430 38,146

Marysville 4,703 18,177 22,880

McCleary 81 312 393

Medical
Lake 807 3,133 3,940

Medina 559 2,164 2,723

Mercer
Island 4,940 19,100 24,041

Mesa 164 635 799

Mill
Creek 2,545 9,838 12,383

Milton 1,290 5,019 6,309

Monroe 2,622 10,139 12,761

Montesano 730 2,831 3,561

Moses
Lake 30,836 110,828 141,664

Mossyrock 127 152 278

Mount
Vernon 18,784 72,683 91,468

Mountlake
Terrace 4,642 17,949 22,592

Moxee 61 235 296

Mukilteo 3,935 15,213 19,148

Naches 391 1,514 1,906

Napavine 202 781 983

Nespelem 102 396 499

Newcastle 5,295 20,485 25,779

Newport 1,503 5,817 7,321

Nooksack 487 1,884 2,371

Normandy
Park 1,611 6,230 7,842

North
Bend 2,266 8,780 11,046

North
Bonneville 326 1,261 1,587

Northport 307 1,000 1,307

Oak
Harbor 4,771 18,445 23,216

Oakville 34 133 168

Ocean
Shores 479 1,859 2,338

Odessa 157 607 764

Okanogan 937 3,668 4,605

Olympia 9,209 35,606 44,816

Omak 3,707 14,365 18,073

Oroville 92 355 447

Orting 598 2,326 2,924

Othello 1,225 4,765 5,990

Pacific 1,286 5,005 6,291

Palouse 159 613 772

Pasco 6,092 23,555 29,647

Pateros 243 942 1,185

Port
Angeles 4,340 16,780 21,120

Port
Orchard 6,004 23,231 29,234

Port
Townsend 1,924 7,438 9,362

Poulsbo 1,476 5,708 7,184

Prescott 129 501 630

Prosser 1,082 4,206 5,288

Pullman 5,870 22,696 28,566

Puyallup 7,040 27,221 34,261

Quincy 874 3,394 4,267

Raymond 562 2,174 2,736

Reardan 98 379 477

Redmond 9,988 38,617 48,605

Renton 10,906 42,168 53,074

Richland 8,447 32,658 41,104

Ridgefield 340 1,320 1,660

Ritzville 282 1,092 1,374

Riverside 135 523 658

Rock
Island 243 942 1,185

Rockford 230 889 1,118

Roslyn 361 835 1,196

Royal
City 175 677 852

Sammamish 18,089 69,985 88,074

SeaTac 19,790 62,435 82,225

Seattle 568,524 1,875,737 2,444,261

Sedro-Woolley 6,628 25,647 32,276

Selah 1,376 5,318 6,694

Sequim 961 3,733 4,694

Shelton 16,972 60,998 77,970

Shoreline 32,012 123,855 155,867

Skykomish 106 411 517

Snohomish 1,889 7,305 9,195

Snoqualmie 318 1,231 1,549

South
Bend 265 1,026 1,291

South
Cle Elum 279 1,079 1,358

South
Prairie 241 931 1,171

Spokane 199,010 656,595 855,604

Sprague 176 680 856

Springdale 15 58 73

Stanwood 4,005 15,505 19,510

Steilacoom 1,429 5,526 6,955

Stevenson 698 2,699 3,397

Sultan 563 2,180 2,744

Sumas 157 607 764

Sumner 1,946 7,523 9,469

Sunnyside 10,170 39,351 49,521

Tacoma 399,991 1,435,706 1,835,697

Tekoa 131 507 639

Tenino 958 3,706 4,664

Toledo 111 429 540

Tonasket 604 2,340 2,944

Toppenish 17,254 62,013 79,268

Tukwila 6,728 17,125 23,853

Tumwater 2,870 11,095 13,965

Twisp 159 615 775

Union
Gap 2,402 6,112 8,514

Uniontown 53 205 258

University
Place 18,181 70,342 88,523

Vader 50 195 245

Vancouver 30,942 119,632 150,574

Waitsburg 463 1,794 2,257

Walla
Walla 30,714 101,335 132,049

Wapato 8,563 30,769 39,332

Warden 241 995 1,235

Washougal 1,006 3,892 4,898

Waterville 613 2,371 2,983

Wenatchee 21,200 82,033 103,233

West
Richland 1,747 6,753 8,499

Westport 1,349 5,220 6,569

White
Salmon 319 1,233 1,553

Wilbur 144 557 701

Wilson
Creek 89 345 435

Winlock 134 518 652

Woodinville 6,306 24,400 30,706

Woodland 575 2,235 2,810

Yacolt 394 1,525 1,919

Yakima 142,338 511,572 653,911

Yarrow
Point 536 2,074 2,610

Yelm 2,154 8,336 10,490

Zillah 403 1,597 2,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATIONS 2,494,474 8,928,866 11,423,340

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-CITY MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS

It
is the intent of the legislature to continue to support a portion of the
ongoing costs for these cities for programs and services through future
appropriations. Subject to section 7 of this act, the following amounts are
appropriated from the general fund to the office of financial management for
distribution to the following cities in the amounts designated:

1999-2001

City FY
2000 FY 2001 Biennium

Aberdeen 720 4,262 4,982

Airway
Heights 55,451 212,374 267,826

Albion 17,298 66,477 83,774

Algona 15,921 60,716 76,637

Almira 3,277 12,537 15,813

Anacortes 630 3,730 4,360

Arlington 322 1,908 2,230

Asotin 14,183 56,527 70,711

Auburn 1,709 10,118 11,827

Bainbridge
Island 142,965 544,920 687,885

Battle
Ground 54,635 207,769 262,404

Beaux
Arts 13 75 88

Bellevue 4,655 27,566 32,221

Bellingham 2,808 16,631 19,439

Benton
City 28,251 108,234 136,484

Bingen 2,001 7,627 9,628

Black
Diamond 67,814 260,254 328,068

Blaine 160 945 1,104

Bonney
Lake 78,762 300,482 379,244

Bothell 1,219 7,219 8,438

Bremerton 1,590 9,415 11,004

Brewster 1,175 3,874 5,049

Bridgeport 47,961 184,246 232,207

Brier 158,312 608,386 766,699

Buckley 35,489 135,570 171,059

Bucoda 14,608 56,120 70,729

Burien 74,300 277,004 351,304

Burlington 247 1,463 1,710

Camas 476 2,822 3,298

Carbonado 14,997 57,617 72,614

Carnation 78 463 542

Cashmere 33,626 128,799 162,426

Castle
Rock 9,767 36,989 46,756

Cathlamet 2,796 10,605 13,401

Centralia 597 3,535 4,132

Chehalis 307 1,820 2,127

Chelan 149 885 1,035

Cheney 108,241 414,628 522,869

Chewelah 18,690 71,288 89,978

Clarkston 19,628 71,052 90,681

Cle
Elum 79 466 545

Clyde
Hill 45,987 176,397 222,384

Colfax 20,658 78,736 99,395

College
Place 148,423 569,925 718,348

Colton 7,763 29,814 37,577

Colville 208 1,233 1,441

Conconully 3,585 13,758 17,343

Concrete 8,837 33,826 42,663

Connell 48,602 186,505 235,107

Cosmopolis 5,175 19,458 24,633

Coulee
City 25 150 176

Coulee
Dam 20,169 77,418 97,587

Coupeville 72 426 498

Covington 196,949 755,240 952,189

Creston 3,467 13,290 16,758

Cusick 2,818 10,789 13,607

Darrington 17,101 65,539 82,640

Davenport 18,225 69,707 87,932

Dayton 27,038 103,439 130,478

Deer
Park 130 770 900

Des
Moines 474,193 1,819,714 2,293,907

Dupont 77 456 532

Duvall 31,784 121,140 152,924

East
Wenatchee 236 1,400 1,637

Eatonville 84 497 581

Edgewood 246,213 945,925 1,192,138

Edmonds 198,267 752,173 950,440

Electric
City 23,067 88,626 111,692

Ellensburg 624 3,694 4,317

Elma 20,348 77,489 97,837

Elmer
City 7,823 30,066 37,890

Endicott 7,305 28,054 35,359

Entiat 16,605 63,727 80,332

Enumclaw 471 2,788 3,259

Ephrata 22,567 85,076 107,643

Everett 3,802 22,512 26,314

Everson 20,252 77,502 97,754

Fairfield 4,572 17,437 22,009

Farmington 3,119 11,977 15,095

Federal
Way 23,935 67,804 91,739

Ferndale 27,285 102,680 129,965

Fife 226 1,338 1,564

Fircrest 127,993 491,616 619,609

Forks 30,306 115,749 146,054

Friday
Harbor 83 493 576

Garfield 11,687 44,874 56,562

George 4,904 18,754 23,658

Gig
Harbor 281 1,663 1,943

Gold
Bar 35,104 134,776 169,880

Goldendale 14,122 53,314 67,436

Grand
Coulee 54 321 375

Grandview 93,706 358,697 452,403

Granger 45,450 174,523 219,973

Granite
Falls 88 522 610

Hamilton 4,717 18,093 22,810

Harrah 12,113 46,532 58,645

Harrington 5,625 21,534 27,159

Hartline 2,868 11,000 13,868

Hatton 3,212 12,348 15,560

Hoquiam 153,918 590,601 744,519

Hunts
Point 21 123 143

Ilwaco 5,627 21,422 27,049

Index 1,159 4,425 5,585

Ione 4,466 17,074 21,540

Issaquah 444 2,629 3,073

Kahlotus 5,432 20,866 26,297

Kalama 71 423 495

Kelso 524 3,104 3,629

Kenmore 310,088 1,190,150 1,500,239

Kennewick 2,233 13,225 15,458

Kent 3,202 18,964 22,167

Kettle
Falls 19,150 73,348 92,498

Kirkland 1,966 11,644 13,611

Kittitas 18,733 71,869 90,602

Krupp 1,191 4,575 5,766

La
Center 10,451 39,805 50,256

La
Conner 35 208 243

La
Crosse 4,988 21,704 26,691

Lacey 17 99 115

Lake
Forest Park 277,770 1,066,853 1,344,623

Lake
Stevens 52,892 201,995 254,886

Lakewood 796,253 3,049,818 3,846,071

Lamont 2,032 7,806 9,837

Langley 48 284 332

Latah 3,062 11,740 14,802

Leavenworth 99 588 687

Lind 21 125 146

Long
Beach 63 374 437

Longview 1,499 8,875 10,373

Lyman 3,978 15,840 19,818

Lynden 391 2,313 2,703

Lynnwood 1,453 8,602 10,055

Mabton 37,046 142,313 179,359

Malden 5,404 20,750 26,154

Mansfield 6,953 26,693 33,646

Maple
Valley 130,525 499,279 629,804

Marcus 3,725 14,312 18,037

Marysville 906 5,368 6,274

Mattawa 25,362 97,193 122,555

McCleary 30,081 115,486 145,567

Medical
Lake 40,959 156,693 197,652

Medina 129 763 892

Mercer
Island 202,576 774,212 976,788

Mesa 4,143 15,838 19,981

Metaline 3,744 14,380 18,123

Metaline
Falls 2,025 7,735 9,760

Mill
Creek 88,465 337,561 426,026

Millwood 7,181 27,159 34,340

Milton 249 1,474 1,723

Monroe 502 2,972 3,474

Montesano 24,612 93,756 118,368

Morton 56 331 387

Moses
Lake 622 3,683 4,305

Mossyrock 4,563 17,413 21,976

Mount
Vernon 995 5,892 6,887

Mountlake
Terrace 296,550 1,136,963 1,433,513

Moxee 13,219 50,634 63,852

Mukilteo 137,157 523,372 660,529

Naches 2,541 9,570 12,111

Napavine 25,171 96,652 121,823

Nespelem 3,974 15,875 19,849

Newcastle 118,782 455,252 574,034

Newport 1,710 5,962 7,672

Nooksack 15,291 58,674 73,964

Normandy
Park 145,791 559,892 705,684

North
Bend 167 990 1,157

North
Bonneville 8,545 32,759 41,305

Northport 5,996 23,018 29,014

Oak
Harbor 123,643 470,104 593,748

Oakesdale 8,260 31,707 39,967

Oakville 11,920 45,749 57,669

Ocean
Shores 36,111 138,194 174,305

Odessa 43 253 296

Okanogan 105 619 724

Olympia 1,763 10,437 12,200

Omak 199 1,180 1,379

Oroville 3,881 14,460 18,341

Orting 53,945 206,779 260,724

Othello 238 1,411 1,649

Pacific 28,540 108,238 136,777

Palouse 15,839 60,758 76,597

Pasco 1,166 6,905 8,071

Pateros 9,067 34,759 43,826

Pe Ell 14,289 54,878 69,167

Pomeroy 15,531 59,424 74,956

Port
Angeles 25,018 90,432 115,451

Port
Orchard 318 1,883 2,201

Port
Townsend 5,195 17,358 22,553

Poulsbo 283 1,673 1,955

Prescott 2,993 11,433 14,426

Prosser 215 1,272 1,487

Pullman 215,205 821,611 1,036,816

Puyallup 1,347 7,979 9,327

Quincy 181 1,069 1,250

Rainier 30,119 115,631 145,750

Raymond 27,388 104,661 132,048

Reardan 9,612 36,866 46,478

Redmond 1,912 11,320 13,231

Renton 2,087 12,361 14,448

Republic 5,967 22,677 28,644

Richland 193,634 734,859 928,492

Ridgefield 15,027 57,268 72,295

Ritzville 77 456 532

Riverside 6,999 26,876 33,875

Rock
Island 10,589 40,627 51,216

Rockford 5,031 19,235 24,267

Rosalia 10,053 38,556 48,609

Roslyn 17,386 66,737 84,123

Roy 16 96 112

Royal
City 16,895 64,633 81,528

Ruston 15,725 60,394 76,119

Sammamish 703,513 2,656,078 3,359,591

SeaTac 1,033 6,118 7,151

Seattle 23,692 140,297 163,989

Sedro-Woolley 7,390 25,944 33,334

Selah 36,046 137,074 173,120

Sequim 195 1,154 1,349

Shelton 342 2,027 2,370

Shoreline 510,085 1,950,187 2,460,272

Skykomish 12 71 83

Snohomish 362 2,141 2,503

Snoqualmie 87 514 601

Soap
Lake 28,130 107,988 136,118

South
Bend 21,838 83,675 105,513

South
Cle Elum 12,612 48,467 61,080

South
Prairie 5,119 19,582 24,700

Spangle 11 66 77

Spokane 8,293 49,111 57,404

Sprague 6,364 24,392 30,756

Springdale 2,930 11,213 14,143

St.
John 1,294 4,813 6,107

Stanwood 148 877 1,025

Starbuck 2,235 8,913 11,147

Steilacoom 117,086 449,465 566,551

Stevenson 3,619 13,793 17,412

Sultan 21,100 80,416 101,516

Sumas 2,424 9,034 11,458

Sumner 372 2,205 2,577

Sunnyside 539 3,190 3,729

Tacoma 8,205 48,591 56,797

Tekoa 13,752 52,764 66,516

Tenino 18,014 68,948 86,963

Tieton 20,014 76,812 96,826

Toledo 2,249 8,453 10,703

Tonasket 44 262 306

Toppenish 123,871 475,085 598,956

Tukwila 650 3,852 4,502

Tumwater 549 3,252 3,802

Twisp 43 257 300

Union
Gap 235 1,389 1,623

Uniontown 5,327 20,433 25,760

University
Place 563,746 2,164,242 2,727,987

Vader 10,583 40,647 51,230

Vancouver 383,484 1,461,539 1,845,023

Waitsburg 22,948 88,099 111,047

Walla
Walla 110,220 415,683 525,902

Wapato 65,471 251,173 316,644

Warden 30,917 118,472 149,389

Washougal 84,096 321,711 405,807

Washtucna 5,426 20,833 26,259

Waterville 20,530 78,802 99,332

Waverly 2,723 10,460 13,183

Wenatchee 1,123 6,650 7,773

West
Richland 154,646 593,845 748,491

Westport 91 539 630

White
Salmon 4,747 36,560 41,307

Wilbur 7,368 28,122 35,490

Wilkeson 5,202 19,922 25,124

Wilson
Creek 4,734 18,178 22,912

Winlock 9,242 35,244 44,486

Winthrop 17 99 115

Woodinville 449 2,661 3,110

Woodland 163 964 1,127

Woodway 5,901 22,438 28,339

Yacolt 7,805 31,514 39,319

Yakima 2,871 17,002 19,873

Yarrow
Point 11,627 44,518 56,145

Yelm 121 714 834

Zillah 30,126 115,397 145,523

TOTAL
APPROPRIATIONS 10,415,314 40,011,808 50,427,122

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE

It
is the intent of the legislature to continue to support a portion of the
ongoing costs for these counties for programs and services through future
appropriations. For the purpose of county criminal justice, subject to section
7 of this act, the following amounts are appropriated from the general fund to
the office of financial management for distribution to the following counties
in the amounts designated:

1999-2001

County FY
2000 FY 2001 Biennium

Adams 81,613 315,891 397,504

Asotin 82,339 318,700 401,038

Benton 164,330 636,053 800,383

Chelan 138,203 534,929 673,132

Clallam 96,572 373,789 470,361

Clark 300,436 1,162,866 1,463,302

Columbia 51,981 201,196 253,177

Cowlitz 166,776 645,522 812,298

Douglas 81,431 315,186 396,617

Ferry 37,378 144,676 182,055

Franklin 103,060 398,901 501,961

Garfield 45,186 174,896 220,081

Grant 143,598 555,808 699,406

Grays
Harbor 129,699 502,012 631,711

Island 80,433 311,324 391,757

Jefferson 66,649 257,971 324,620

King 1,319,218 5,106,150 6,425,368

Kitsap 229,535 888,437 1,117,973

Kittitas 110,701 428,478 539,180

Klickitat 62,927 243,563 306,490

Lewis 131,466 508,849 640,315

Lincoln 55,555 215,030 270,584

Mason 121,929 471,935 593,864

Okanogan 80,196 310,408 390,604

Pacific 91,874 355,605 447,479

Pend
Oreille 71,568 277,011 348,579

Pierce 604,469 2,339,649 2,944,118

San
Juan 40,949 158,495 199,444

Skagit 154,514 598,062 752,576

Skamania 64,175 248,397 312,572

Snohomish 482,565 1,867,812 2,350,377

Spokane 395,156 1,529,486 1,924,642

Stevens 77,662 300,596 378,258

Thurston 217,274 840,980 1,058,254

Wahkiakum 41,573 160,913 202,486

Walla
Walla 121,098 468,720 589,818

Whatcom 195,245 755,714 950,959

Whitman 67,422 260,962 328,384

Yakima 258,408 1,000,192 1,258,600

TOTAL
APPROPRIATIONS 6,765,165 26,185,163 32,950,328

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-COUNTY CORPORATIONS

It
is the intent of the legislature to continue to support a portion of the
ongoing costs for these counties for programs and services through future
appropriations. Subject to section 7 of this act, the following amounts are
appropriated from the general fund to the office of financial management for
distribution to the following counties in the amounts designated:

1999-2001

County FY
2000 FY 2001 Biennium

Adams 46,548 185,935 232,483

Asotin 54,642 160,334 214,976

Benton 319,529 1,246,948 1,566,477

Chelan 185,573 722,974 908,547

Clallam 128,522 503,395 631,917

Clark 9,329 55,243 64,571

Columbia 109,548 466,589 576,137

Cowlitz 230,230 853,746 1,083,976

Douglas 232,250 594,138 826,388

Ferry 80,247 340,161 420,408

Franklin 115,051 449,264 564,315

Garfield 117,953 505,176 623,129

Grant 144,054 562,703 706,757

Grays
Harbor 145,473 567,165 712,638

Island 243,789 539,758 783,547

Jefferson 52,351 205,344 257,694

King 25,885 153,286 179,171

Kitsap 7,040 41,687 48,727

Kittitas 71,335 278,144 349,479

Klickitat 40,656 137,959 178,615

Lewis 163,547 640,559 804,106

Lincoln 46,699 199,276 245,975

Mason 478,208 1,157,330 1,635,539

Okanogan 272,634 700,341 972,975

Pacific 112,417 296,123 408,540

Pend
Oreille 67,140 281,796 348,936

Pierce 17,513 103,707 121,220

San
Juan 219 1,300 1,519

Skagit 300,225 1,172,235 1,472,460

Skamania 10,343 107,125 117,468

Snohomish 17,560 103,986 121,546

Spokane 9,611 56,914 66,525

Stevens 484,293 1,133,880 1,618,173

Thurston 460,067 1,023,043 1,483,110

Wahkiakum 103,499 443,097 546,597

Walla
Walla 1,129 6,685 7,814

Whatcom 4,092 24,232 28,324

Whitman 768 4,549 5,318

Yakima 873,082 2,556,299 3,429,382

TOTAL
APPROPRIATIONS 5,783,053 18,582,425 24,365,479

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH

It
is the intent of the legislature to continue to support a portion of the
ongoing costs for these counties and health districts for programs and services
through future appropriations. For the purpose of public health, subject to
section 7 of this act, the following amounts are appropriated from the general
fund to the office of financial management for distribution to the following
counties or health districts in the amounts designated:

1999-2001

County or Health District FY 2000 FY 2001 Biennium

Adams County Health District 13,472 32,023 45,495

Asotin County Health District 26,568 63,455 90,023

Benton-Franklin Health District 488,007 1,166,105 1,654,112

Chelan-Douglas Health District 70,854 168,324 239,178

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department 60,756 144,780 205,536

Southwest Washington Health District 340,203 1,198,244 1,538,446

Columbia County Health District 17,552 42,020 59,571

Cowlitz County Health Department 115,243 274,521 389,764

Garfield County Health District 6,513 15,576 22,090

Grant County Health District 43,068 101,998 145,065

Grays Harbor Health Department 79,956 190,308 270,264

Island County Health Department 33,325 79,071 112,395

Jefferson County Health and Human Services 33,688 80,528 114,217

Seattle-King County Department of Public Health 3,623,823 8,835,544 12,459,367

Bremerton-Kitsap County Health District 239,941 573,169 813,110

Kittitas County Health Department 34,368 81,767 116,135

Klickitat County Health Department 21,250 50,756 72,005

Lewis County Health Department 44,161 104,953 149,113

Lincoln County Health Department 9,159 21,760 30,920

Mason County Department of Health Services 36,217 86,620 122,838

Okanogan County Health District 27,132 64,516 91,647

Pacific County Health Department 33,550 80,255 113,806

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department 1,043,454 3,073,075 4,116,529

San Juan County Health and Community Services 13,308 31,867 45,175

Skagit County Health Department 87,172 207,173 294,345

Snohomish Health District 965,481 2,305,859 3,271,341

Spokane County Health District 908,599 2,172,447 3,081,046

Northeast Tri-County Health District 42,502 101,483 143,985

Thurston County Health Department 254,343 607,019 861,362

Wahkiakum County Health Department 5,960 14,283 20,243

Walla Walla County-City Health Department 74,136 176,457 250,593

Whatcom County Health Department 362,419 866,404 1,228,823

Whitman County Health Department 33,991 80,222 114,213

Yakima Health District 266,361 634,681 901,042

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS 9,456,534 23,727,262 33,183,796

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

With
the appropriations in sections 1 through 6 of this act, the state is providing
a portion of the local share of the listed political subdivisions' costs for
criminal justice, public health, and police and fire services, in support of
programs and services that are the ongoing responsibility of the recipient
political subdivision. The appropriations in sections 1 through 6 of this act
are transfers of local government costs under RCW 43.135.060(2), but they do
not constitute a state obligation after June 30, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---