BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.53.010 and 1989 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The practice of optometry is defined as the examination of the human eye, the
examination and ascertaining any defects of the human vision system ((and)),
the analysis of the process of vision, and the treatment of the human eye
and the human vision system. The practice of optometry ((may))
includes, but is not ((necessarily be)) limited to, the
following:

(a)
The employment of any objective or subjective means or method, including
the use of drugs ((topically applied to the eye)), for diagnostic
and therapeutic purposes by those licensed under this chapter and who meet the
requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, and the use of any
diagnostic instruments or devices for the examination or analysis of the human
vision system, the measurement of the powers or range of human vision, or the
determination of the refractive powers of the human eye or its functions in
general; and

(b)
The prescription and fitting of lenses, prisms, therapeutic or refractive
contact lenses and the adaption or adjustment of frames and lenses used in
connection therewith; and

(c)
The prescription and provision of visual therapy, therapeutic aids, and
other optical devices((, and the treatment with topically applied drugs by
those licensed under this chapter and who meet the requirements of subsections
(2) and (3) of this section)); and

(d)
The ascertainment of the perceptive, neural, muscular, or pathological
condition of the visual system; and

(e)
The adaptation of prosthetic eyes.

(2)(a)
Those persons using drugs for diagnostic purposes in the practice of optometry
shall have a minimum of sixty hours of didactic and clinical instruction in
general and ocular pharmacology as applied to optometry((, and for
therapeutic purposes, an additional minimum of seventy-five hours of didactic
and clinical instruction)) as established by the board, and certification
from an institution of higher learning, accredited by those agencies recognized
by the United States office of education or the council on postsecondary
accreditation to qualify for certification by the optometry board of Washington
to use drugs for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes.

(b)
Those persons using or prescribing topical drugs for therapeutic purposes in
the practice of optometry shall be certified under (a) of this subsection, and
shall have an additional minimum of seventy-five hours of didactic and clinical
instruction as established by the board, and certification from an institution
of higher learning, accredited by those agencies recognized by the United
States office of education or the council on postsecondary accreditation to
qualify for certification by the optometry board of Washington to use drugs for
therapeutic purposes.

(c)
Those persons using or prescribing drugs administered orally, by injection, or
by any other method of delivery for therapeutic purposes in the practice of
optometry shall be certified under (b) of this subsection, and shall have an
additional minimum of twenty hours of didactic and clinical instruction as
established by the board, and certification from an institution of higher
learning, accredited by those agencies recognized by the United States office
of education or the council on postsecondary accreditation to qualify for
certification by the optometry board of Washington to use drugs administered
orally, by injection, or by any other recognized method of delivery for
therapeutic purposes.

(d)
Such course or courses, and any other courses required by the board for
certification to use any other means, method, or procedure, shall be the
fiscal responsibility of the participating and attending optometrist.

(3)
The board shall establish a schedule of drugs for diagnostic and treatment
purposes limited to the practice of optometry, and no person licensed pursuant
to this chapter shall prescribe, dispense, purchase, possess, or administer
drugs except as authorized and to the extent permitted by the board.

(a)
The board shall establish, by rule, specific guidelines for the prescription
and administration of drugs by optometric physicians, so that licensed
optometric physicians and persons filling their prescriptions have a clear
understanding of which drugs and which dosages or forms are included in the
authority granted by this section.

(b)
No optometrist shall prescribe, dispense, or administer a controlled substance
for more than seven days in treating a particular patient for a single trauma,
episode, or condition.

(c)
The prescription or administration of drugs as authorized in this section is
specifically limited to those drugs appropriate to treatment of diseases or
conditions of the vision system that are within the scope of practice of
optometry. The prescription or administration of drugs for any other purpose
is not authorized by this section.

(4)
The board shall develop a means of identification and verification of
optometrists certified to use therapeutic drugs for the purpose of issuing
prescriptions, and of optometrists certified to use any other objective or
subjective means, method, or procedure, as authorized by this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.53.140 and 1991 c 3 s 138 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be unlawful for any person:

(1)
To sell or barter, or offer to sell or barter any license issued by the
secretary; or

(2)
To purchase or procure by barter any license with the intent to use the same as
evidence of the holder's qualification to practice optometry; or

(3)
To alter with fraudulent intent in any material regard such license; or

(4)
To use or attempt to use any such license which has been purchased,
fraudulently issued, counterfeited or materially altered as a valid license; or

(5)
To practice optometry under a false or assumed name, or as a representative or
agent of any person, firm or corporation with which the licensee has no
connection: PROVIDED, Nothing in this chapter nor in the optometry law shall
make it unlawful for any lawfully licensed optometrist or association of
lawfully licensed optometrists to practice optometry under the name of any
lawfully licensed optometrist who may transfer by inheritance or otherwise the
right to use such name; or

(6)
To practice optometry in this state either for him or herself or any other
individual, corporation, partnership, group, public or private entity, or any
member of the licensed healing arts without having at the time of so doing a
valid license issued by the secretary of health; or

(7)
To in any manner barter or give away as premiums either on his own account or
as agent or representative for any other purpose, firm or corporation, any
eyeglasses, spectacles, lenses or frames; or

(8)
To use drugs in the practice of optometry, except ((those topically applied
for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes)) as authorized under RCW
18.53.010; or

(9)
To use advertising whether printed, radio, display, or of any other nature,
which is misleading or inaccurate in any material particular, nor shall any
such person in any way misrepresent any goods or services (including but
without limitation, its use, trademark, grade, quality, size, origin,
substance, character, nature, finish, material, content, or preparation) or
credit terms, values, policies, services, or the nature or form of the business
conducted; or

(10)
To advertise the "free examination of eyes," "free
consultation," "consultation without obligation," "free
advice," or any words or phrases of similar import which convey the
impression to the public that eyes are examined free or of a character tending
to deceive or mislead the public, or in the nature of "bait
advertising;" or

(11)
To use an advertisement of a frame or mounting which is not truthful in
describing the frame or mounting and all its component parts. Or advertise a
frame or mounting at a price, unless it shall be depicted in the advertisement
without lenses inserted, and in addition the advertisement must contain a
statement immediately following, or adjacent to the advertised price, that the
price is for frame or mounting only, and does not include lenses, eye
examination and professional services, which statement shall appear in type as
large as that used for the price, or advertise lenses or complete glasses,
viz.: frame or mounting with lenses included, at a price either alone or in
conjunction with professional services; or

(12)
To use advertising, whether printed, radio, display, or of any other nature,
which inaccurately lays claim to a policy or continuing practice of generally
underselling competitors; or

(13)
To use advertising, whether printed, radio, display or of any other nature
which refers inaccurately in any material particular to any competitors or
their goods, prices, values, credit terms, policies or services; or

(14)
To use advertising whether printed, radio, display, or of any other nature,
which states any definite amount of money as "down payment" and any
definite amount of money as a subsequent payment, be it daily, weekly, monthly,
or at the end of any period of time.

Sec.
3. RCW
69.41.030 and 1996 c 178 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be unlawful for any person to sell, deliver, or possess any legend drug
except upon the order or prescription of a physician under chapter 18.71 RCW,
an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist
licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under
RCW 18.53.010, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and
surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a
commissioned medical or dental officer in the United States armed forces or
public health service in the discharge of his or her official duties, a duly
licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans administration in the
discharge of his or her official duties, a registered nurse or advanced
registered nurse practitioner under chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the
nursing care quality assurance commission, an osteopathic physician assistant
under chapter 18.57A RCW when authorized by the board of osteopathic medicine
and surgery, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by
the medical quality assurance commission, a physician licensed to practice
medicine and surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine
and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician
and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, or a
veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine, in any province of
Canada which shares a common border with the state of Washington or in any
state of the United States: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the above provisions shall
not apply to sale, delivery, or possession by drug wholesalers or drug
manufacturers, or their agents or employees, or to any practitioner acting
within the scope of his or her license, or to a common or contract carrier or
warehouseman, or any employee thereof, whose possession of any legend drug is
in the usual course of business or employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing
in this chapter or chapter 18.64 RCW shall prevent a family planning clinic
that is under contract with the department of social and health services from
selling, delivering, possessing, and dispensing commercially prepackaged oral
contraceptives prescribed by authorized, licensed health care practitioners.

Sec.
4. RCW
69.50.101 and 1998 c 222 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, definitions of terms shall be as
indicated where used in this chapter:

(a)
"Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by
injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a
patient or research subject by:

(1)
a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the practitioner's authorized
agent); or

(2)
the patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the
practitioner.

(b)
"Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the
direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a
common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or employee of the carrier
or warehouseperson.

(c)
"Board" means the state board of pharmacy.

(d)
"Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate
precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or state
laws, or federal or board rules.

(e)(1)
"Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical
structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure of a
controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:

(i)
that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central
nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance
included in Schedule I or II; or

(ii)
with respect to a particular individual, that the individual represents or
intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance
included in Schedule I or II.

(2)
The term does not include:

(i)
a controlled substance;

(ii)
a substance for which there is an approved new drug application;

(iii)
a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect for investigational
use by a particular person under Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug and
Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, to the extent conduct with respect to the
substance is pursuant to the exemption; or

(iv)
any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before an
exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.

(f)
"Deliver" or "delivery," means the actual or constructive
transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not there is an
agency relationship.

(g)
"Department" means the department of health.

(h)
"Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a
controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper
selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare
that prescription or order for delivery.

(i)
"Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.

(j)
"Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a controlled substance.

(k)
"Distributor" means a person who distributes.

(l)
"Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in the
official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the official
homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to them; (2)
controlled substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals; (3) controlled
substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function
of the body of individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended
for use as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this
subsection. The term does not include devices or their components, parts, or
accessories.

(m)
"Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement
administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its successor
agency.

(n)
"Immediate precursor" means a substance:

(1)
that the state board of pharmacy has found to be and by rule designates as
being the principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in
the manufacture of a controlled substance;

(2)
that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the
manufacture of a controlled substance; and

(3)
the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture
of the controlled substance.

(o)
"Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in RCW 69.50.101(r)(5),
69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and 69.50.206(a)(4), the term includes any geometrical
isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c) the term includes
any positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and
69.50.208(a) the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.

(p)
"Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation,
compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either
directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of natural origin, or
independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction
and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the
substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not
include the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or
relabeling of a controlled substance:

(1)
by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's administering or
dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner's
professional practice; or

(2)
by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent under the
practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research,
teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.

(q)
"Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant
Cannabis, whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from
any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,
mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin. The term does not
include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or
cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt,
derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin
extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant
which is incapable of germination.

(r)
"Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly
or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or
independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction
and chemical synthesis:

(1)
Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium derivative,
including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of
the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation. The term does not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of
opium.

(2)
Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate, including their
isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers,
whenever the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible
within the specific chemical designation.

(3)
Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.

(4)
Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine,
ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their salts have been removed.

(5)
Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(6)
Cocaine base.

(7)
Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(8)
Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of any substance
referred to in subparagraphs (1) through (7).

(s)
"Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or
addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of
conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining
liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium (opium
derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include, unless
specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory
isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The
term includes the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.

(t)
"Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L.,
except its seeds.

(u)
"Person" means individual, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental
subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(v)
"Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy,
after mowing.

(w)
"Practitioner" means:

(1)
A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A
RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, an
optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry
board under RCW 18.53.010 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010, a
dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a registered nurse,
advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under
chapter 18.79 RCW, a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific
investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted
insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense,
conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the
course of their professional practice or research in this state.

(2)
A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise
permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to
administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or
research in this state.

(3)
A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a physician licensed to
practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice
dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric
medicine and surgery, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary
medicine in any state of the United States.

(x)
"Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued by a
practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of Washington to
prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his or her professional
practice for a legitimate medical purpose.

(y)
"Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating,
growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.

(z)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

(aa)
"State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state of the
United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United
States.

(bb)
"Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a
controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a member of
the individual's household or for administering to an animal owned by the
individual or by a member of the individual's household.

(cc)
"Electronic communication of prescription information" means the
communication of prescription information by computer, or the transmission of
an exact visual image of a prescription by facsimile, or other electronic means
for original prescription information or prescription refill information for a
Schedule III-V controlled substance between an authorized practitioner and a
pharmacy or the transfer of prescription information for a controlled substance
from one pharmacy to another pharmacy.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 18.53 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, no hospital that provides health care services to
the general public may discriminate against a qualified optometrist licensed
under this chapter who applies for hospital privileges. For purposes of this
section, discrimination includes, but is not limited to, the denial of hospital
privileges to licensed optometrists who seek such privileges to facilitate the
performance of any means, method, or procedure within their scope of practice
and who otherwise meet all credentialing requirements reasonably related to the
practice of optometry in a hospital setting.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:

A
hospital that provides health care services to the general public may not
discriminate against a qualified optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW
who has applied to practice with the hospital solely because the optometrist is
board certified or eligible under an approved optometrist certifying board
instead of board certified or eligible, respectively, under an approved medical
certifying board. For purposes of this section, discrimination includes, but
is not limited to, the denial of hospital privileges to licensed optometrists
who seek such privileges to facilitate the performance of any means, method, or
procedure within their scope of practice and who otherwise meet all
credentialing requirements reasonably related to the practice of optometry in a
hospital setting.

Sec.
7. RCW
18.34.020 and 1995 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
term "secretary" wherever used in this chapter ((shall)) means
the secretary of health of the state of Washington. The term
"apprentice" wherever used in this chapter ((shall)) means
a person who ((shall be)) is designated an apprentice in the
records of the secretary at the request of a physician, registered optometrist,
or licensee hereunder, who shall thereafter be the primary supervisor of the
apprentice. The apprentice may thereafter receive from a physician, registered
optometrist, or licensee hereunder training and direct supervision in the work
of a dispensing optician. The term "refracting" whenever used in
this chapter means the measurement of the powers or range of a person's vision
by the use of a series of lenses and their rotation to determine the degree of
correction needed to compensate for hyperopia, myopia, presbyopia, astigmatism,
prism, or any combination of these. "Prescription modification"
whenever used in this chapter, means the ability of a licensed refracting
optician to alter a prescription within a cumulative plus or minus 2.00 diopter
of change provided that there is no more than plus or minus 1.00 diopter of
change at any one time during a six-month period. A licensed refracting
optician must provide a patient with a copy of the changes to take with him or
her to a provider of choice. The original prescriber will be notified in
writing within fourteen days of any modifications made to the original
prescription and will also be provided with a copy of the patient's
questionnaire and the signed informed consent document.

Sec.
8. RCW
18.34.060 and 1957 c 43 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A
dispensing optician is a person who prepares duplications of, or prepares and
dispenses lenses, spectacles, eyeglasses and/or appurtenances thereto to the
intended wearers thereof on written prescriptions from physicians or
optometrists, and in accordance with ((such)) the prescriptions,
measures, adapts, adjusts and fabricates ((such)) the lenses,
spectacles, eyeglasses and/or appurtenances thereto to the human face for the
aid or correction of visual or ocular anomalies of the human eye((:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). However, contact lenses may be fitted
only upon a written prescription of a physician or optometrist. A
refracting optician is a licensed dispensing optician who has received an
endorsement from the secretary to practice refractometry and to modify
prescriptions.

Sec.
9. RCW
18.34.050 and 1984 c 287 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

The
dispensing optician examining committee shall meet at such times as deemed
necessary by the secretary to prepare and administer the state's licensing
examinations and to provide technical expertise, advice, and make
recommendations to the secretary on the administration of the dispensing
optician statute and disciplinary matters of licensees. The examining
committee ((shall)) consists of ((three)) five
persons. Four persons must be primarily engaged in the business of
dispensing opticians and ((who currently)) hold a ((valid)) current
license under this chapter. One of the licensed dispensing optician members
shall be a licensed refracting optician. One member must be a member of the
general public. Members of the committee shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 18.34 RCW to read as follows:

An
applicant for endorsement as a refracting optician must first be licensed as a
dispensing optician under this chapter and meet the following additional
requirements:

(1)
Completion of eighty hours of coursework from an accredited or approved
institution or association including, but not limited to, the following
topics: Theory of refraction, anatomy, pathology, and knowledge of equipment
operation;

(2)
Completion of two hundred refractive examinations. The two hundred refractive
examinations are under the direct supervision of a licensed optometrist or a
licensed ophthalmologist who shall certify the completion of the examinations
and send notification directly to the department;

(3)
Continuing education or competency requirements as determined by the secretary.

The
secretary shall adopt by rule the examination requirements to endorse
refracting opticians. An applicant for endorsement as a refracting optician
may take the examination if he or she pays an examination fee, determined by
the secretary, as provided in RCW 43.70.250.

A
refracting optician who has successfully completed the requirements of this
section will have the endorsement of "CRO" placed on his or her
dispensing optician license by the secretary.

Sec.
11. RCW
18.34.080 and 1995 c 198 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The examination to license a dispensing optician shall determine whether
the applicant has a thorough knowledge of the principles governing the practice
of a dispensing optician which is hereby declared necessary for the protection
of the public health. The examining committee may ((approve an examination
prepared or administered by a private testing agency or association of
licensing authorities)) prepare and administer, or approve the preparation
and administration of, examinations for applicants for licensure. The
secretary shall license successful examinees and the license shall be
conspicuously displayed in the place of business of the licensee.

(2)
The written and practical examination to certify a refracting optician shall
determine whether the applicant has a thorough knowledge of the principles
governing the practice of refraction. After the initial exam, the examining
committee may prepare and administer, or approve the preparation and
administration of, examinations for applicants for licensure. The secretary
shall issue an endorsement to successful examinees and the endorsement shall be
conspicuously displayed in the place of business of the licensee.

Sec.
12. RCW
18.34.120 and 1996 c 191 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
licensee ((hereunder)) or holder of an endorsement under this chapter
shall pay a renewal registration fee determined by the secretary as provided in
RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The secretary may adopt rules establishing
mandatory continuing education requirements to be met by persons applying for
license or endorsement renewal.

Sec.
13. RCW
18.34.136 and 1987 c 150 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of
licensees under this chapter. No person may practice or represent himself
or herself as a refracting optician without first having obtained an
endorsement from the secretary.

Sec.
14. RCW
18.34.010 and 1957 c 43 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter shall:

(1)
Be construed to limit or restrict a duly licensed physician or optometrist or
employees working under the personal supervision of a duly licensed physician
or optometrist from the practices enumerated in this chapter, and each such
licensed physician and optometrist shall have all the rights and privileges
which may accrue under this chapter to dispensing opticians licensed hereunder;

(2)
Be construed to prohibit an unlicensed person from performing mechanical work
upon inert matter in an optical office, laboratory, or shop;

(3)
Be construed to prohibit an unlicensed person from engaging in the sale of
spectacles, eyeglasses, magnifying glasses, goggles, sunglasses, telescopes,
binoculars, or any such articles which are completely preassembled and sold
only as merchandise;

(4)
Be construed to authorize or permit a licensee ((hereunder)) under
this chapter to hold himself or herself out as being able to, or to
offer to, or to undertake to attempt, by any manner of means, to ((examine
or)) exercise eyes, diagnose, treat, ((correct,)) relieve, operate,
or prescribe for any human ailment, ((deficiency,)) deformity, disease,
or injury.

If
a licensed refracting optician is unable to select lenses that provide at a
minimum 20/40 vision in either eye to the consumer, he or she shall refer the
consumer to a licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist. If a licensed
refracting optician is observing change of more than plus or minus 1.00 diopter
of power in either eye, he or she shall refer the consumer to a licensed
optometrist or ophthalmologist. A licensed refracting optician shall not
modify an original prescription beyond plus or minus 2 diopters of change
provided that there is no more than plus or minus 1.00 diopter of change at any
one time during a six-month period. A licensed refracting optician may only
modify a prescription for a consumer that has had an eye health exam within two
years for contact lenses and within two years for glasses. A licensed
refracting optician will not modify a prescription of a child ten years old or
younger or an adult sixty-four years or older. A licensed refracting optician
will notify in writing the original prescriber within fourteen days of any
modifications made to the original prescription, and will also provide a copy
of the patient's questionnaire and the signed informed consent document.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. RCW
18.34.110 (Existing practitioner--Fee) and 1991 c 3 s 78 &
1957 c 43 s 11 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. RCW
18.34.010, to be codified between RCW 18.34.141 and 18.34.900, and RCW
18.34.060, to be codified between RCW 18.34.020 and 18.34.030, are each
recodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---