BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that promoting a financially viable health care system in all
parts of the state is a paramount interest. The health care financing
administration has recognized the crucial role that hospitals play in providing
care in rural areas by creating the critical access hospital program to allow
small, rural hospitals that qualify to receive reasonable cost-based
reimbursement for medicare services. The legislature further finds that
creating a similar reimbursement system for the state's medical assistance
programs in small, rural hospitals that qualify will help ensure the long-term
financial viability of the rural health system in those communities. In
creating this program the legislature intends to fund it through new state
funds and not pull funds from existing programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

Payments
for recipients eligible for medical assistance programs under chapter 74.09 RCW
for services provided by hospitals, regardless of the beneficiary's managed care
enrollment status, may include, but are not limited to, consideration of
cost-based reimbursement when services are provided by a rural hospital that
either: (1) Has been certified by the health care financing administration as
a critical access hospital; or (2) meets the geographic criteria for a critical
access hospital and has no more than twenty-five available beds, with not more
than fifteen acute care beds and ten swing beds. If cost-based reimbursement
is considered, it is as defined by the hospital's cost to charge ratio. Any
additional payments made by the medical assistance administration for the
healthy options program shall be no more than the additional amounts per
service paid under this section for other medical assistance programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of social and health services shall implement the program created in
section 2 of this act within sixty days of the effective date of section 2 of
this act regardless of the beneficiary's managed care status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---