BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.525.168 and 1990 c 33 s 458 are each amended to read as follows:

After January 1, 1998, whenever the voters of a school
district authorize the issuance of bonds and/or the levying of excess taxes in
an amount sufficient to meet the requirements of RCW 28A.525.162 respecting
eligibility for state assistance in providing school facilities, the taxable
valuation of the district and the percentage of state assistance in providing
school facilities prevailing at the time of such authorization shall be the
valuation and the percentage used for the purpose of determining the
eligibility of the district for an allotment of state funds and the amount or
amounts of such allotments, respectively, for all projects for which the voters
authorize capital funds as aforesaid, unless the superintendent of public
instruction was unable to calculate and provide the district's election year
percentage of state assistance before the district's notice of election to the
county auditor or a higher percentage of state assistance prevails on the
date that state funds for assistance in financing a project are allotted by the
state board of education in which case or cases, the percentage of state
assistance for the calendar year preceding the year of voter authorization or
the percentage prevailing on the date of allotment by the state board of funds
for each project, whichever is highest, shall govern: PROVIDED, That if
the state board of education determines at any time that there has been undue
or unwarranted delay on the part of school district authorities in advancing a
project to the point of readiness for an allotment of state funds, the taxable
valuation of the school district and the percentage of state assistance
prevailing on the date that the allotment is made shall be used for the purposes
aforesaid: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the date herein specified as applicable in
determining the eligibility of an individual school district for state
assistance and in determining the amount of such assistance shall be applicable
also to cases where it is necessary in administering chapter 28A.540 RCW to
determine eligibility for and the amount of state assistance for a group of
school districts considered as a single school administrative unit.

---
END ---