BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.02.050 and 1998 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A health care provider may disclose health care information about a patient
without the patient's authorization to the extent a recipient needs to know the
information, if the disclosure is:

(a)
To a person who the provider reasonably believes is providing health care to
the patient;

(b)
To any other person who requires health care information for health care
education, or to provide planning, quality assurance, peer review, or
administrative, legal, financial, or actuarial services to the health care
provider; or for assisting the health care provider in the delivery of health
care and the health care provider reasonably believes that the person:

(i)
Will not use or disclose the health care information for any other purpose; and

(ii)
Will take appropriate steps to protect the health care information;

(c)
To any other health care provider reasonably believed to have previously
provided health care to the patient, to the extent necessary to provide health
care to the patient, unless the patient has instructed the health care provider
in writing not to make the disclosure;

(d)
To any person if the health care provider reasonably believes that disclosure
will avoid or minimize an imminent danger to the health or safety of the
patient or any other individual, however there is no obligation under this
chapter on the part of the provider to so disclose;

(e)
Oral, and made to immediate family members of the patient, or any other
individual with whom the patient is known to have a close personal relationship,
if made in accordance with good medical or other professional practice, unless
the patient has instructed the health care provider in writing not to make the
disclosure;

(f)
To a health care provider who is the successor in interest to the health care provider
maintaining the health care information;

(g)
For use in a research project that an institutional review board has
determined:

(i)
Is of sufficient importance to outweigh the intrusion into the privacy of the
patient that would result from the disclosure;

(ii)
Is impracticable without the use or disclosure of the health care information
in individually identifiable form;

(iii)
Contains reasonable safeguards to protect the information from redisclosure;

(iv)
Contains reasonable safeguards to protect against identifying, directly or
indirectly, any patient in any report of the research project; and

(v)
Contains procedures to remove or destroy at the earliest opportunity,
consistent with the purposes of the project, information that would enable the
patient to be identified, unless an institutional review board authorizes
retention of identifying information for purposes of another research project;

(h)
To a person who obtains information for purposes of an audit, if that person
agrees in writing to:

(i)
Remove or destroy, at the earliest opportunity consistent with the purpose of
the audit, information that would enable the patient to be identified; and

(ii)
Not to disclose the information further, except to accomplish the audit or
report unlawful or improper conduct involving fraud in payment for health care
by a health care provider or patient, or other unlawful conduct by the health
care provider;

(i)
To an official of a penal or other custodial institution in which the patient
is detained;

(j)
To provide directory information, unless the patient has instructed the health
care provider not to make the disclosure;

(k)
In the case of a hospital or health care provider to provide, in cases reported
by fire, police, sheriff, or other public authority, name, residence, sex, age,
occupation, condition, diagnosis, or extent and location of injuries as
determined by a physician, and whether the patient was conscious when admitted.

(2)
A health care provider shall disclose health care information about a patient
without the patient's authorization if the disclosure is:

(a)
To federal, state, or local public health authorities, to the extent the health
care provider is required by law to report health care information; when needed
to determine compliance with state or federal licensure, certification or
registration rules or laws; or when needed to protect the public health;

(b)
To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities to the extent the
health care provider is required by law;

(c)
To county coroners and medical examiners for the investigations of deaths;

(d)
Pursuant to compulsory process in accordance with RCW 70.02.060;

(e)
To the parent or guardian of a minor regarding the treatment or care of the
minor, including testing, evaluation, treatment, or counseling concerning
drugs, mental problems, sexually transmitted diseases, AIDS, pregnancy, or
psychological exams.

(3) All state or local agencies obtaining patient health care
information pursuant to this section shall adopt rules establishing their
record acquisition, retention, and security policies that are consistent with
this chapter.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.24.105 and 1997 c 345 s 2 and 1997 c 196 s 6 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
No person may disclose or be compelled to disclose the identity of any person
who has investigated, considered, or requested a test or treatment for a
sexually transmitted disease, except as authorized by this chapter.

(2)
No person may disclose or be compelled to disclose the identity of any person
upon whom an HIV antibody test is performed, or the results of such a test, nor
may the result of a test for any other sexually transmitted disease when it is
positive be disclosed. This protection against disclosure of test subject,
diagnosis, or treatment also applies to any information relating to diagnosis
of or treatment for HIV infection and for any other confirmed sexually
transmitted disease. The following persons, however, may receive such information:

(a)
The subject of the test or the subject's legal representative for health care
decisions in accordance with RCW 7.70.065((, with the exception of such a
representative of a minor child over fourteen years of age and otherwise
competent));

(b)
Any person who secures a specific release of test results or information
relating to HIV or confirmed diagnosis of or treatment for any other sexually
transmitted disease executed by the subject or the subject's legal
representative for health care decisions in accordance with RCW 7.70.065, with
the exception of such a representative of a minor child over fourteen years of
age and otherwise competent;

(c)
The state public health officer, a local public health officer, or the centers
for disease control of the United States public health service in accordance
with reporting requirements for a diagnosed case of a sexually transmitted
disease;

(d)
A health facility or health care provider that procures, processes,
distributes, or uses: (i) A human body part, tissue, or blood from a deceased
person with respect to medical information regarding that person; (ii) semen,
including that provided prior to March 23, 1988, for the purpose of artificial
insemination; or (iii) blood specimens;

(e)
Any state or local public health officer conducting an investigation pursuant
to RCW 70.24.024, provided that such record was obtained by means of court
ordered HIV testing pursuant to RCW 70.24.340 or 70.24.024;

(f)
A person allowed access to the record by a court order granted after
application showing good cause therefor. In assessing good cause, the court
shall weigh the public interest and the need for disclosure against the injury
to the patient, to the physician-patient relationship, and to the treatment
services. Upon the granting of the order, the court, in determining the extent
to which any disclosure of all or any part of the record of any such test is
necessary, shall impose appropriate safeguards against unauthorized
disclosure. An order authorizing disclosure shall: (i) Limit disclosure to
those parts of the patient's record deemed essential to fulfill the objective
for which the order was granted; (ii) limit disclosure to those persons whose
need for information is the basis for the order; and (iii) include any other
appropriate measures to keep disclosure to a minimum for the protection of the
patient, the physician-patient relationship, and the treatment services,
including but not limited to the written statement set forth in subsection (5)
of this section;

(g)
Local law enforcement agencies to the extent provided in RCW 70.24.034;

(h)
Persons who, because of their behavioral interaction with the infected
individual, have been placed at risk for acquisition of a sexually transmitted
disease, as provided in RCW 70.24.022, if the health officer or authorized
representative believes that the exposed person was unaware that a risk of
disease exposure existed and that the disclosure of the identity of the
infected person is necessary;

(i)
A law enforcement officer, fire fighter, health care provider, health care
facility staff person, department of correction's staff person, jail staff
person, or other persons as defined by the board in rule pursuant to RCW
70.24.340(4), who has requested a test of a person whose bodily fluids he or
she has been substantially exposed to, pursuant to RCW 70.24.340(4), if a state
or local public health officer performs the test;

(j)
Claims management personnel employed by or associated with an insurer, health
care service contractor, health maintenance organization, self-funded health
plan, state-administered health care claims payer, or any other payer of health
care claims where such disclosure is to be used solely for the prompt and
accurate evaluation and payment of medical or related claims. Information
released under this subsection shall be confidential and shall not be released
or available to persons who are not involved in handling or determining medical
claims payment; and

(k)
A department of social and health services worker, a child placing agency
worker, or a guardian ad litem who is responsible for making or reviewing
placement or case-planning decisions or recommendations to the court regarding
a child, who is less than fourteen years of age, has a sexually transmitted
disease, and is in the custody of the department of social and health services
or a licensed child placing agency; this information may also be received by a
person responsible for providing residential care for such a child when the
department of social and health services or a licensed child placing agency
determines that it is necessary for the provision of child care services.

(3)
No person to whom the results of a test for a sexually transmitted disease have
been disclosed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may disclose the test
results to another person except as authorized by that subsection.

(4)
The release of sexually transmitted disease information regarding an offender
or detained person, except as provided in subsection (2)(e) of this section,
shall be governed as follows:

(a)
The sexually transmitted disease status of a department of corrections offender
who has had a mandatory test conducted pursuant to RCW 70.24.340(1), 70.24.360,
or 70.24.370 shall be made available by department of corrections health care
providers and local public health officers to the department of corrections
health care administrator or infection control coordinator of the facility in
which the offender is housed. The information made available to the health
care administrator or the infection control coordinator under this subsection
(4)(a) shall be used only for disease prevention or control and for protection
of the safety and security of the staff, offenders, and the public. The
information may be submitted to transporting officers and receiving facilities,
including facilities that are not under the department of corrections'
jurisdiction according to the provisions of (d) and (e) of this subsection.

(b)
The sexually transmitted disease status of a person detained in a jail who has
had a mandatary test conducted pursuant to RCW 70.24.340(1), 70.24.360, or
70.24.370 shall be made available by the local public health officer to a jail
health care administrator or infection control coordinator. The information
made available to a health care administrator under this subsection (4)(b)
shall be used only for disease prevention or control and for protection of the
safety and security of the staff, offenders, detainees, and the public. The
information may be submitted to transporting officers and receiving facilities
according to the provisions of (d) and (e) of this subsection.

(c)
Information regarding the sexually transmitted disease status of an offender or
detained person is confidential and may be disclosed by a correctional health
care administrator or infection control coordinator or local jail health care
administrator or infection control coordinator only as necessary for disease
prevention or control and for protection of the safety and security of the
staff, offenders, and the public. Unauthorized disclosure of this information
to any person may result in disciplinary action, in addition to the penalties
prescribed in RCW 70.24.080 or any other penalties as may be prescribed by law.

(d)
Notwithstanding the limitations on disclosure contained in (a), (b), and (c) of
this subsection, whenever any member of a jail staff or department of
corrections staff has been substantially exposed to the bodily fluids of an
offender or detained person, then the results of any tests conducted pursuant
to RCW 70.24.340(1), 70.24.360, or 70.24.370, shall be immediately disclosed to
the staff person in accordance with the Washington Administrative Code rules
governing employees' occupational exposure to bloodborne pathogens. Disclosure
must be accompanied by appropriate counseling for the staff member, including
information regarding follow-up testing and treatment. Disclosure shall also
include notice that subsequent disclosure of the information in violation of this
chapter or use of the information to harass or discriminate against the
offender or detainee may result in disciplinary action, in addition to the
penalties prescribed in RCW 70.24.080, and imposition of other penalties
prescribed by law.

(e)
The staff member shall also be informed whether the offender or detained person
had any other communicable disease, as defined in RCW 72.09.251(3), when the
staff person was substantially exposed to the offender's or detainee's bodily
fluids.

(f)
The test results of voluntary and anonymous HIV testing or HIV-related
condition may not be disclosed to a staff person except as provided in
subsection (2)(i) of this section and RCW 70.24.340(4). A health care
administrator or infection control coordinator may provide the staff member
with information about how to obtain the offender's or detainee's test results
under subsection (2)(i) of this section and RCW 70.24.340(4).

(5)
Whenever disclosure is made pursuant to this section, except for subsections
(2)(a) and (6) of this section, it shall be accompanied by a statement in
writing which includes the following or substantially similar language:
"This information has been disclosed to you from records whose
confidentiality is protected by state law. State law prohibits you from making
any further disclosure of it without the specific written consent of the person
to whom it pertains, or as otherwise permitted by state law. A general
authorization for the release of medical or other information is NOT sufficient
for this purpose." An oral disclosure shall be accompanied or followed by
such a notice within ten days.

(6)
The requirements of this section shall not apply to the customary methods
utilized for the exchange of medical information among health care providers in
order to provide health care services to the patient, nor shall they apply
within health care facilities where there is a need for access to confidential medical
information to fulfill professional duties.

(7) Upon request of the victim, disclosure of test results under
this section to victims of sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW shall be
made if the result is negative or positive. The county prosecuting attorney
shall notify the victim of the right to such disclosure. Such disclosure shall
be accompanied by appropriate counseling, including information regarding
follow-up testing.

---
END ---