BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70A.010 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that uncoordinated and unplanned growth, together with a
lack of common goals expressing the public's interest in the conservation and
the wise use of our lands, pose a threat to the environment, sustainable
economic development, and the health, safety, and high quality of life enjoyed
by residents of this state. It is in the public interest that citizens,
communities, local governments, and the private sector cooperate and coordinate
with one another in comprehensive land use planning. ((Further,))

(2)
The legislature also finds that it is in the public interest that
economic development programs be shared with communities experiencing
insufficient economic growth. The legislature further finds that, while
economic development was initially included as a growth management act goal,
the policy and programs necessary to effectuate this goal were never created.
The legislature intends with this act to declare that economic development is
an integral component of growth management planning and to provide the process
necessary to effectively incorporate economic development planning into growth
management planning.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.70A.020 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following goals are adopted to guide the development and adoption of
comprehensive plans and development regulations of those counties and cities
that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040. The following goals
are not listed in order of priority and shall be used exclusively for the
purpose of guiding the development of comprehensive plans and development
regulations:

(1)
Urban growth. Encourage development in urban areas where adequate public
facilities and services exist or can be provided in an efficient manner.

(2)
Reduce sprawl. Reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into
sprawling, low-density development.

(3)
Transportation. Encourage efficient multimodal transportation systems that are
based on regional priorities and coordinated with county and city comprehensive
plans.

(4)
Housing. Encourage the availability of affordable housing to all economic
segments of the population of this state, promote a variety of residential
densities and housing types, and encourage preservation of existing housing
stock.

(5)
Economic development. Encourage economic development throughout the state that
is consistent with adopted comprehensive plans, promote economic opportunity
for all citizens of this state, especially for unemployed and for disadvantaged
persons, promote the retention and expansion of existing businesses,
recognize regional differences impacting economic development opportunities,
and encourage growth in areas experiencing insufficient economic growth, all
within the capacities of the state's natural resources, public services, and
public facilities.

(6)
Property rights. Private property shall not be taken for public use without
just compensation having been made. The property rights of landowners shall be
protected from arbitrary and discriminatory actions.

(7)
Permits. Applications for both state and local government permits should be
processed in a timely and fair manner to ensure predictability.

(8)
Natural resource industries. Maintain and enhance natural resource-based
industries, including productive timber, agricultural, and fisheries
industries. Encourage the conservation of productive forest lands and
productive agricultural lands, and discourage incompatible uses.

(9)
Open space and recreation. Encourage the retention of open space and
development of recreational opportunities, conserve fish and wildlife habitat,
increase access to natural resource lands and water, and develop parks.

(10)
Environment. Protect the environment and enhance the state's high quality of
life, including air and water quality, and the availability of water.

(11)
Citizen participation and coordination. Encourage the involvement of citizens
in the planning process and ensure coordination between communities and
jurisdictions to reconcile conflicts.

(12)
Public facilities and services. Ensure that those public facilities and
services necessary to support development shall be adequate to serve the
development at the time the development is available for occupancy and use
without decreasing current service levels below locally established minimum
standards.

(13)
Historic preservation. Identify and encourage the preservation of lands, sites,
and structures, that have historical or archaeological significance.

Sec.
3. RCW
36.70A.030 and 1997 c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new
comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use
plan.

(2)
"Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial
production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary,
vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed,
Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through
84.33.140, finfish in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term
commercial significance for agricultural production.

(3)
"City" means any city or town, including a code city.

(4)
"Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or
"plan" means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of
the governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this
chapter.

(5)
"Critical areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a)
Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for
potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas; (d) frequently
flooded areas; and (e) geologically hazardous areas.

(6)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(7)
"Development regulations" or "regulation" means the
controls placed on development or land use activities by a county or city,
including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances,
shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit development
ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together
with any amendments thereto. A development regulation does not include a
decision to approve a project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020,
even though the decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the
legislative body of the county or city.

(8)
"Forest land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for
long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically and
practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to
the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has
long-term commercial significance. In determining whether forest land is
primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production
on land that can be economically and practically managed for such production,
the following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to
urban, suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term
local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber
production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services
conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.

(9)
"Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because of their
susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are
not suited to the siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development
consistent with public health or safety concerns.

(10)
"Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing capacity,
productivity, and soil composition of the land for long-term commercial production,
in consideration with the land's proximity to population areas, and the
possibility of more intense uses of the land.

(11)
"Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.

(12)
"Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks,
street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems,
storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and
schools.

(13)
"Public services" include fire protection and suppression, law
enforcement, public health, education, recreation, environmental protection,
and other governmental services.

(14)
"Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and development
established by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:

(a)
In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the
built environment;

(b)
That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and
opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;

(c)
That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and
communities;

(d)
That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and
wildlife habitat;

(e)
That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling,
low‑density development;

(f)
That generally do not require the extension of urban governmental services; and

(g)
That are consistent with the protection of natural surface water flows and
ground water and surface water recharge and discharge areas.

(15)
"Rural counties" means counties with population densities of less
than one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the office of
financial management and published each year by the department for the period
from July 1st to June 30th.

(16)
"Rural development" refers to development outside the urban growth
area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses
and residential densities, including clustered residential development, at
levels that are consistent with the preservation of rural character and the
requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to
agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.

(((16)))
(17) "Rural governmental services" or "rural
services" include those public services and public facilities historically
and typically delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may
include domestic water systems, fire and police protection services,
transportation and public transit services, and other public utilities
associated with rural development and normally not associated with urban
areas. Rural services do not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as
otherwise authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).

(((17)))
(18) "Small-scale business" means any business entity, including a
sole proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that is
owned and operated independently from all other businesses, that has the
purpose of making a profit, and that has fifty or fewer employees.

(19)
"Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for
the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to such a
degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of
food, other agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral
resources, rural uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural development, as
provided in RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread
over wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental services.
"Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban growth
located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area with urban growth
on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.

(((18)))
(20) "Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a
county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.

(((19)))
(21) "Urban governmental services" or "urban
services" include those public services and public facilities at an
intensity historically and typically provided in cities, specifically including
storm and sanitary sewer systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning
services, fire and police protection services, public transit services, and
other public utilities associated with urban areas and normally not associated
with rural areas.

(((20)))
(22) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are
inundated or saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and
duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support,
a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar
areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage
ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment
facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created
after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the
construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those
artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

Sec.
4. RCW
36.70A.070 and 1998 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or chooses to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps, and descriptive text
covering objectives, principles, and standards used to develop the
comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an internally consistent document and
all elements shall be consistent with the future land use map. A comprehensive
plan shall be adopted and amended with public participation as provided in RCW
36.70A.140.

Each
comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for each of the
following:

(1)
A land use element designating the proposed general distribution and general
location and extent of the uses of land, where appropriate, for agriculture,
timber production, housing, commerce, industry, recreation, open spaces,
general aviation airports, public utilities, public facilities, and other land
uses. The land use element shall include population densities, building
intensities, and estimates of future population growth. The land use element
shall provide for protection of the quality and quantity of ground water used
for public water supplies. Where applicable, the land use element shall review
drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby
jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or
cleanse those discharges that pollute waters of the state, including Puget
Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.

(2)
A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of established
residential neighborhoods that: (a) Includes an inventory and analysis of
existing and projected housing needs; (b) includes a statement of goals,
policies, objectives, and mandatory provisions for the preservation,
improvement, and development of housing, including single-family residences;
(c) identifies sufficient land for housing, including, but not limited to,
government-assisted housing, housing for low-income families, manufactured housing,
multifamily housing, and group homes and foster care facilities; and (d) makes
adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all economic segments
of the community.

(3)
A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An inventory of existing
capital facilities owned by public entities, showing the locations and
capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a forecast of the future needs for
such capital facilities; (c) the proposed locations and capacities of expanded
or new capital facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such
capital facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies
sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to reassess
the land use element if probable funding falls short of meeting existing needs
and to ensure that the land use element, capital facilities plan element, and
financing plan within the capital facilities plan element are coordinated and
consistent.

(4)
A utilities element consisting of the general location, proposed location, and
capacity of all existing and proposed utilities, including, but not limited to,
electrical lines, telecommunication lines, and natural gas lines.

(5)
Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element including lands that are
not designated for urban growth, agriculture, forest, or mineral resources.
The following provisions shall apply to the rural element:

(a)
Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because circumstances
vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of rural densities and
uses, a county may consider local circumstances, but shall develop a written
record explaining how the rural element harmonizes the planning goals in RCW
36.70A.020 and meets the requirements of this chapter.

(b)
Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural development, forestry,
and agriculture in rural areas. The rural element shall provide for a variety
of rural densities, uses, essential public facilities, and rural governmental
services needed to serve the permitted densities and uses. In order to achieve
a variety of rural densities and uses, counties may provide for clustering,
density transfer, design guidelines, conservation easements, and other
innovative techniques that will accommodate appropriate rural densities and
uses that are not characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with
rural character.

(c)
Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall include measures
that apply to rural development and protect the rural character of the area, as
established by the county, by:

(i)
Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;

(ii)
Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the surrounding rural
area;

(iii)
Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling,
low-density development in the rural area;

(iv)
Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and surface water and
ground water resources; and

(v)
Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural, forest, and mineral
resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.

(d)
Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to the requirements
of this subsection and except as otherwise specifically provided in this
subsection (5)(d), the rural element may allow for limited areas of more
intensive rural development, including necessary public facilities and public
services to serve the limited area as follows:

(i)
Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or redevelopment of existing
commercial, industrial, residential, or mixed-use areas, whether characterized
as shoreline development, villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or
crossroads developments. A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or
mixed-use area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this
subsection, but shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and (iii)
of this subsection. An industrial area is not required to be principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population;

(ii)
The intensification of development on lots containing, or new development of,
small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including commercial facilities to
serve those recreational or tourist uses, that rely on a rural location and
setting, but that do not include new residential development. A small-scale
recreation or tourist use is not required to be principally designed to serve
the existing and projected rural population. Public services and public
facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or
tourist use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;

(iii)
The intensification of development on lots containing isolated nonresidential
uses or new development of isolated cottage industries and isolated small-scale
businesses that are not principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population and nonresidential uses, but do provide job
opportunities for rural residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion
of small-scale businesses as long as those small-scale businesses conform with
the rural character of the area. Rural counties may also allow new businesses
to utilize sites previously occupied by an existing business as long as the new
business conforms to the rural character of the area. Public services and
public facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated
nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit
low-density sprawl;

(iv)
A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the existing areas or
uses of more intensive rural development, as appropriate, authorized under this
subsection. Lands included in such existing areas or uses shall not extend
beyond the logical outer boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing
a new pattern of low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary delineated
predominately by the built environment, but that may also include undeveloped
lands if limited as provided in this subsection. The county shall establish
the logical outer boundary of an area of more intensive rural development. In
establishing the logical outer boundary the county shall address (A) the need
to preserve the character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities,
(B) physical boundaries such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and land
forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular boundaries, and
(D) the ability to provide public facilities and public services in a manner
that does not permit low-density sprawl;

(v)
For purposes of (d) of this subsection, an existing area or existing use is one
that was in existence:

(A)
On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to plan under all of
the provisions of this chapter;

(B)
On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2), in a
county that is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW
36.70A.040(2); or

(C)
On the date the office of financial management certifies the county's
population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that is planning under
all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040(5).

(e)
Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit in the rural
area a major industrial development or a master planned resort unless otherwise
specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and 36.70A.365.

(6)
A transportation element that implements, and is consistent with, the land use
element.

(a)
The transportation element shall include the following subelements:

(i)
Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;

(ii)
Estimated traffic impacts to state-owned transportation facilities resulting
from land use assumptions to assist the department of transportation in
monitoring the performance of state facilities, to plan improvements for the
facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned
transportation facilities;

(iii)
Facilities and services needs, including:

(A)
An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation facilities and services,
including transit alignments and general aviation airport facilities, to define
existing capital facilities and travel levels as a basis for future planning.
This inventory must include state-owned transportation facilities within the
city or county's jurisdiction boundaries;

(B)
Level of service standards for all locally owned arterials and transit routes
to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system. These standards should
be regionally coordinated;

(C)
For state-owned transportation facilities, level of service standards for
highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW, to gauge the
performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting level of service
standards for state highways in the local comprehensive plan are to monitor the
performance of the system, to evaluate improvement strategies, and to
facilitate coordination between the county's or city's six-year street, road, or
transit program and the department of transportation's six-year investment
program. The concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply
to transportation facilities and services of state-wide significance except for
counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the mainland are state
highways or ferry routes. In these island counties, state highways and ferry
route capacity must be a factor in meeting the concurrency requirements in (b)
of this subsection;

(D)
Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance locally owned
transportation facilities or services that are below an established level of
service standard;

(E)
Forecasts of traffic for at least ten years based on the adopted land use plan
to provide information on the location, timing, and capacity needs of future
growth;

(F)
Identification of state and local system needs to meet current and future
demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation facilities must be
consistent with the state-wide multimodal transportation plan required under
chapter 47.06 RCW;

(iv)
Finance, including:

(A)
An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against probable funding
resources;

(B)
A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the comprehensive
plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the basis for the six-year
street, road, or transit program required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW
36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems.
The multiyear financing plan should be coordinated with the six-year
improvement program developed by the department of transportation as required
by RCW 47.05.030;

(C)
If probable funding falls short of meeting identified needs, a discussion of
how additional funding will be raised, or how land use assumptions will be
reassessed to ensure that level of service standards will be met;

(v)
Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment of the impacts
of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on the transportation
systems of adjacent jurisdictions;

(vi)
Demand-management strategies.

(b)
After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions required to plan or
who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local jurisdictions must adopt and
enforce ordinances which prohibit development approval if the development
causes the level of service on a locally owned transportation facility to
decline below the standards adopted in the transportation element of the
comprehensive plan, unless transportation improvements or strategies to
accommodate the impacts of development are made concurrent with the
development. These strategies may include increased public transportation
service, ride sharing programs, demand management, and other transportation
systems management strategies. For the purposes of this subsection (6)
"concurrent with the development" shall mean that improvements or
strategies are in place at the time of development, or that a financial
commitment is in place to complete the improvements or strategies within six
years.

(c)
The transportation element described in this subsection (6), and the six-year
plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, RCW
35.58.2795 for public transportation systems, and RCW 47.05.030 for the state,
must be consistent.

(7)
An economic development element establishing a plan for economic growth and
promoting economic development opportunities that includes: (a) An inventory
of existing businesses, including the number, location, size, and type or
classification of businesses; (b) an analysis of the economic impact of
existing businesses operating within the county, considering factors including
but not limited to the number of employees, business activity, historical
growth patterns, and projected new employment capabilities; (c) a statement of
goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory provisions to promote the retention
and expansion of existing businesses and the recruitment of new businesses; and
(d) identification of future needs, including capital facilities,
infrastructure, and work force training, to foster economic development opportunities.

Sec.
5. RCW
36.70A.130 and 1997 c 429 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations shall be subject
to continuing review and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them.
((Not later than September 1, 2002, and at least every five years thereafter))
Within the time required by section 7 of this act, a county or city planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure that the plan
and regulations are complying with the requirements of this chapter. The
review and evaluation required by this subsection may be combined with the
review required by subsection (3) of this section.

Any
amendment or revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall conform to this
chapter, and any change to development regulations shall be consistent with and
implement the comprehensive plan.

(2)(a)
Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a
public participation program identifying procedures whereby proposed amendments
or revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of
the county or city no more frequently than once every year except that
amendments may be considered more frequently under the following circumstances:

(i)
The initial adoption of a subarea plan;

(ii)
The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures
set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(iii)
The amendment of the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that
occurs concurrently with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget.

(b)
Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be
considered by the governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the
various proposals can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public
participation a county or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its
comprehensive plan that conform with this chapter whenever an emergency exists
or to resolve an appeal of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management
hearings board or with the court.

(3)
Subject to section 7 of this act, each county that designates urban
growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 shall review, at least every ten years, its
designated urban growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both
the incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In
conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an urban
growth area shall review the densities permitted within its boundaries, and the
extent to which the urban growth occurring within the county has located within
each city and the unincorporated portions of the urban growth areas. The
county comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas, and the densities
permitted in the urban growth areas by the comprehensive plans of the county
and each city located within the urban growth areas, shall be revised to
accommodate the urban growth projected to occur in the county for the
succeeding twenty-year period. The review required by this subsection may be
combined with the review and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.

(4)
No later than September 1, 2002, counties and cities not planning under RCW
36.70A.040 shall review and, if needed, revise their policies and regulations
required by RCW 36.70A.060(2) and 36.70A.170 to ensure that these policies and
regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall conduct studies of the economic status of all counties
planning under RCW 36.70A.040. A study shall be conducted on each county planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 within the time required by subsection (2) of this
section. The purposes of the economic status study are to assess the current
economic status of each county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 and to evaluate
any changes in the county's economic status since the county began planning
under RCW 36.70A.040. Specifically, the study shall:

(a)
Inventory the number and type or classification of businesses existing within
the county, comparing the number currently existing with the number existing
when the county began planning under RCW 36.70A.040;

(b)
Evaluate the economic impact and value of businesses operating within the
county, considering factors including but not limited to the number of
employees, business activity, historical growth patterns, and projected new
employment capabilities, in comparison to businesses operating when the county
began planning under RCW 36.70A.040;

(c)
Identify the location, by mapping or categorization, of all businesses in
relationship to the boundaries of the urban growth area or areas designated
according to RCW 36.70A.110;

(d)
Assess the type and significance of any impediments to or constraints on
economic development opportunities within the county. For purposes of this
subsection, impediments and constraints may include but are not limited to
legal, regulatory, geographic, infrastructure, work force, or financial factors
that negatively impact the county's economic development opportunities and
potential;

(e)
Analyze and compare the economic development status of all jurisdictions within
the county; and

(f)
Assess whether the county's existing comprehensive plan and development
regulations promote economic development opportunities within the county and
identify what changes, if any, to the comprehensive plan and development
regulations may enhance the county's economic development opportunities.

(2)
The department shall develop a schedule for conducting and completing the
studies for each county planning under RCW 36.70A.040. The department shall
commence the studies based on the schedule no later than May 1, 2000. The
department shall complete economic status studies for all counties planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 no later than June 30, 2002.

(3)
During the period in which the study is being conducted, the department shall
submit progress reports to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature. The first progress report shall be submitted no later than
January 31, 2001, and the second progress report shall be submitted no later than
January 31, 2002. The department shall submit a final report on the economic
status studies to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature no
later than December 31, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Within two years after the county's economic status study required by section 6
of this act is completed, the county and each of its cities shall:

(a)
Include the economic development element required by RCW 36.70A.070(7) in their
comprehensive plans and adopt implementing development regulations; and

(b)
Review and, if needed, revise their comprehensive plans and development
regulations to ensure that the plan and regulations comply with the
requirements of this chapter.

(2)
In developing the economic development element of their comprehensive plans as
required by RCW 36.70A.070(7), counties and cities may use the information from
the study required by section 6 of this act and any other information developed
by or for the counties and cities. The department shall provide technical
assistance upon request to counties and cities for the development of the
economic development elements of their comprehensive plans.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 44.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Within the time required by subsection (2) of this section, the committee shall
conduct a study of economic development issues associated with implementation
of growth management act requirements in Washington. The issues under review
by the committee shall include, but not be limited to:

(a)
Evaluating local government's implementation and balancing of the planning
goals identified in RCW 36.70A.020 and considering the significance and
relative weight accorded to these goals by local governments, state agencies,
the growth management hearings boards, and the courts;

(b)
Assessing whether the economic development planning goal outlined in RCW
36.70A.020(5) has been effectively incorporated into comprehensive plans and
development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(c)
Determining whether the housing planning goal specified in RCW 36.70A.020(4)
has been achieved and whether the lack of affordable housing in some areas,
especially in large urban areas, may impede economic development efforts in
those and other areas; and

(d)
Considering whether the legislature's intent, as expressed in RCW 36.70A.010,
to share economic development programs with communities experiencing
insufficient growth has been realized.

(2)
The committee shall commence the study required by subsection (1) of this
section no later than May 1, 2000. The committee shall complete the study and
submit a final report and any legislative recommendations to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature no later than December 31, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 6 and 8 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of
the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10.
Section 8 of this act expires January 1, 2002.

---
END ---