BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
There are several commercial spaceports that either operate or are about to
begin operation within the United States;

(b)
All of these spaceports will be launching expendable launch vehicles based on
technologies developed many decades ago;

(c)
Due to the inherent dangers associated with present day expendable launch
vehicles, each of these spaceports are located on the shore of or within the
Atlantic or Pacific Ocean;

(d)
A commercially viable spaceport in Washington is only valid if developed primarily
for launching reusable launch vehicles;

(e)
The technologies required to build these vehicles have been developed, however,
no true reusable launch vehicle currently exists;

(f)
The National Aeronautics and Space Administration, in cooperation with private
industry, is currently leading the effort to develop a revolutionary method of
getting into space using single-stage-to-orbit reusable launch vehicles; and

(g)
Current plans involve the testing of a reusable launch vehicle in 2002,
followed by commercial operations as early as 2005, with the possible
replacement of the space shuttle with the reusable launch vehicle by 2012.

(2)
It is the intent of this chapter to promote economic growth and job creation
through the state designation of a Washington spaceport that would provide the
land, airspace, and facilities to enable its customers to achieve low-cost and
efficient access to space and support of space and space-related operations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(2)
"Director" means the director of community, trade, and economic development.

(3)
"Office" means the office of Washington spaceport development.

(4)
"Port district" means a governmental entity created under chapter
53.04 RCW.

(5)
"Spaceport" means an installation and related facilities used for the
takeoff, landing, retrieval, servicing, and monitoring of vehicles capable of
entering space.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The office of Washington spaceport development is created within the
department. The office shall serve as the state's official liaison with the
federal government and private industry representative regarding the
development of a spaceport in the state.

(2)
The office shall:

(a)
Promote space development and space-related activities in the state;

(b)
Provide technical assistance to a port district and consortium of local
governments and economic development organizations working to secure the
necessary federal designation as a spaceport in the state;

(c)
Work with the Washington economic development finance authority to develop
programs that can be used to assist in the financing of the spaceport and
space-related activities;

(d)
Advise the governor and director on policy matters that impact the development
of a spaceport and space-related activities in the state;

(e)
Solicit and accept federal, state, local, and private funds for the purpose of
feasibility, environmental, transportation, communication, land use, or
technical studies necessary or advisable to the selection or establishment of a
spaceport in the state; and

(f)
Conduct other activities the director deems necessary to secure the location of
a spaceport in the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. It is
the intent of this chapter to promote economic growth and job creation through
the development of facilities, in conjunction with private industry, that can
be used to support the launch and operation of reusable launch vehicles and
space-related businesses in the state. This chapter shall not be construed as
modifying or restricting any powers granted to port districts by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Obligations" means bonds, notes, securities, or other obligations or
evidences of indebtedness.

(2)
"Persons" means any natural person, firm, partnership, association,
private or public corporation, or governmental entity.

(3)
"Port district" means a governmental entity created under chapter
53.04 RCW.

(4)
"Spaceport" means an installation and related facilities used for the
takeoff, landing, retrieval, servicing, and monitoring of vehicles capable of
entering space.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
Port districts formed under chapter 53.04 RCW, either individually or as part
of a consortium consisting of two or more port districts, are authorized to
establish a spaceport for the purpose of owning, leasing, equipping,
reequipping, acquiring, developing, constructing, operating, and maintaining
facilities used for the takeoff, landing, retrieval, servicing, and monitoring
of vehicles capable of entering space.

(2)
A port district proposing to establish a spaceport shall work with the
department of community, trade, and economic development's office of Washington
spaceport development, created in section 3 of this act, to develop the
documents necessary to secure federal designation as a spaceport.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
port district that has established a spaceport under the provisions of this
chapter may:

(1)
Impose fees, rents, tolls, and charges for the use of the spaceport facility or
its related services;

(2)
Acquire real and personal property in its name for the purpose of establishing
a spaceport or space-related facility;

(3)
Perform or cause to be performed environmental, transportation, communication,
land use, or technical studies necessary or advisable to establish a spaceport;

(4)
Issue obligations to persons for the purpose of financing the acquisition of
real property and acquisition, construction, or renovation of facilities and
equipment necessary for the operation and support of a spaceport or
space-related facility;

(5)
Negotiate agreements, in consultation with the Washington state secretary of
transportation, for the overflight or recovery of space vehicles, rockets,
missiles, payloads, boosters, scientific experiments, or other space-related
materials, debris, or parts;

(6)
Solicit and accept federal, state, local, and private funds for the purpose of
developing, constructing, maintaining, and operating a spaceport; and

(7)
Report annually to the department of community, trade, and economic
development's office of Washington spaceport development on the status of the
spaceport and other space-related activities undertaken by the port district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 4 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 53 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act may be known and cited as the Washington
spaceport development act.

---
END ---