BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
declared to be the public policy of the state of Washington to encourage and
facilitate the improvement of transportation infrastructure. The construction
of necessary transportation improvements in accordance with local community
planning will encourage investment in job-producing economic development and
will expand the public tax base.

It
is the purpose of this chapter to allocate a portion of regular property taxes
for limited periods of time to assist in the financing of transportation
improvements which are needed to encourage economic development of urban areas;
to improve transportation mobility in congested urban areas due to the
inability of existing financing methods to provide needed transportation
improvements; to encourage local taxing districts to cooperate in the
allocation of future tax revenues arising in urban areas in order to facilitate
the long-term growth of their common tax base; and to encourage private
investment within congested urban areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. As
used in this chapter the following terms have the following meanings unless a
different meaning is clearly indicated by the context.

(1)
"Apportionment district" means the geographic area, within an urban
area, from which regular property taxes are to be apportioned to finance a
transportation improvement contained therein.

(2)
"Assessed value of real property" means the valuation of real
property as placed on the last completed assessment roll of the county.

(3)
"City" means any city or town.

(4)
"Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking a legislative
action by a county or city, whether known as a statute, resolution, ordinance,
or otherwise.

(5)
"Transportation improvement" means an undertaking to provide
transportation facilities in an urban area which the sponsor has authority to
provide.

(6)
"Transportation improvement costs" means the costs of design,
planning, right of way acquisition, site preparation, construction,
reconstruction, rehabilitation, maintenance, preservation, and installation of
the transportation improvement; costs of relocation, maintenance, and operation
of property pending construction of the transportation improvement; costs of
utilities relocated as a result of the transportation improvement; costs of
financing, including interest during construction, legal and other professional
services, taxes, and insurance; costs incurred by the assessor to revalue real
property for the purpose of determining the tax allocation base value that are
in excess of costs incurred by the assessor in accordance with his revaluation
plan under chapter 84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and
complying with this chapter and other applicable law; and administrative costs
reasonably necessary and related to these costs. These costs may include costs
incurred prior to the adoption of the transportation improvement ordinance, but
subsequent to the effective date of this section.

(7)
"Transportation improvement ordinance" means the ordinance passed
under section 4(4) of this act.

(8)
"Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as now or
hereafter defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied
by port districts or public utility districts specifically for the purpose of
making required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness; and
(b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of the common
schools under RCW 84.52.065.

(9)
"Sponsor" means the legislative authority of any county or city
initiating and undertaking a transportation improvement.

(10)
"Tax allocation base value of real property" means the true and fair
value of real property within an apportionment district for the year in which
the apportionment district was established.

(11)
"Tax allocation bonds" means any bonds, notes, or other obligations
issued by a sponsor under section 10 of this act.

(12)
"Tax allocation revenues" means those tax revenues allocated to a
sponsor under section 7(1)(b) of this act.

(13)
"Taxing districts" means any governmental entity which levies or has
levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located within a
proposed or approved apportionment district.

(14)
"Vacant land" means land that is not used for any purpose.
"Vacant land" does not include paved or unpaved revenue-generating
motor vehicle parking lots.

(15)
"Value of taxable property" means value of taxable property as
defined in RCW 39.36.015.

(16)
"Urban area" means an urban growth area designated under RCW
36.70A.110, a new fully contained community designated under RCW 36.70A.350, a
major industrial development designated under RCW 36.70A.365, or a master
planned location for major industrial developments designated under RCW
36.70A.367.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Only transportation improvements which are determined by the legislative
authority of the sponsor to meet the following criteria are eligible to be
financed under this chapter:

(a)
The transportation improvement is located within an urban area;

(b)
The transportation improvement will stimulate economic development within the
apportionment district;

(c)
The economic development within the apportionment district will increase the
assessed value of the apportionment district;

(d)
The economic development which is anticipated to occur within the apportionment
district as a result of the transportation improvement is consistent with an
existing comprehensive land use plan and approved growth policies of the
jurisdiction within which it is located;

(e)
A transportation improvement located within a city has been approved by the
legislative authority of such city; and

(f)
A transportation improvement located within an urban area in an unincorporated
area has been approved by the legislative authority of the county within whose
boundaries the area lies.

(2)
Apportionment of regular property tax revenues to finance the transportation
improvements is subject to the following limitations:

(a)
No apportionment of regular property tax revenues may take place within a
previously established apportionment district where regular property taxes are
still apportioned to finance public or transportation improvements without the
concurrence of the sponsor which established the district;

(b)
No apportionment district may be established which includes any geographic area
included within a previously established apportionment district which has
outstanding bonds payable in whole or in part from tax allocation revenues;

(c)
The total amount of outstanding bonds payable in whole or in part from tax
allocation revenues arising from property located within a city shall not
exceed two percent of the value of taxable property within the city, and the
total amount of outstanding bonds payable in whole or in part from tax
allocation revenues arising from property located within the unincorporated
areas of a county shall not exceed two percent of the value of taxable property
within the entire unincorporated area of the county; and

(d)
No taxes other than regular property taxes may be apportioned under this
chapter.

(3)
Transportation improvements may be undertaken and coordinated with other
programs or efforts undertaken by the sponsor or others and may be funded in
whole or in part from sources other than those provided by this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Transportation improvements funded by tax allocation revenues may only be
located within an urban area. In order to secure an allocation of regular
property taxes to finance a transportation improvement, a sponsor shall:

(1)
Propose by ordinance a plan for the transportation improvement which includes a
description of the contemplated transportation improvement, the estimated cost
thereof, the boundaries of the apportionment district, the estimated period
during which tax revenue apportionment is contemplated, and the ways in which
the sponsor plans to use tax allocation revenues to finance the transportation
improvement, and which sets at least three public hearings thereon before the
legislative authority of the sponsor or a committee thereof: PROVIDED, That
public hearings for the transportation improvement that is undertaken in
combination or coordination by two or more sponsors may be held jointly; and
public hearings, held before the legislative authority or a committee of a
majority thereof may be combined with public hearings held for other purposes;

(2)
At least fifteen days in advance of the hearing:

(a)
Deliver notice of the hearing to all taxing districts, the county treasurer,
and the county assessor, which notice includes a map or drawing showing the
location of the contemplated transportation improvement and the boundaries of
the proposed apportionment district, a brief description of the transportation
improvement, the estimated cost thereof, the anticipated increase in property
values within the apportionment district, the location of the sponsor's
principal business office where it will maintain information concerning the
transportation improvement for public inspection, and the date and place of
hearing; and

(b)
Post notice in at least six public places located in the proposed apportionment
district and publish notice in a legal newspaper of general circulation within
the sponsor's jurisdiction briefly describing the transportation improvement,
the proposed apportionment, the boundaries of the proposed apportionment
district, the location where additional information concerning the
transportation improvement may be inspected, and the date and place of hearing;

(3)
At the time and place fixed for the hearing under subsection (1) of this
section, and at such times to which the hearing may be adjourned, receive and
consider all statements and materials as may be submitted, and objections and
letters filed before or within ten days thereafter;

(4)
Within one hundred twenty days after completion of the public hearings, pass an
ordinance establishing the apportionment district and authorizing the proposed
transportation improvement, including any modifications which in the sponsor's
opinion the hearings indicated should be made, which includes the boundaries of
the apportionment district, a description of the transportation improvement,
the estimated cost thereof, the portion of the estimated cost thereof to be
reimbursed from tax allocation revenues, the estimated time during which
regular property taxes are to be apportioned, the date upon which apportionment
of the regular property taxes will commence, and a finding that the
transportation improvement meets the conditions of section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Within fifteen days after enactment of the public improvement ordinance, the
sponsor shall publish notice in a legal newspaper circulated within the
designated apportionment district summarizing the final transportation improvement,
including a brief description of the transportation improvement, the boundaries
of the apportionment district, and the location where the transportation
improvement ordinance and any other information concerning the transportation
improvement may be inspected.

Within
fifteen days after enactment of the transportation improvement ordinance, the
sponsor shall deliver a certified copy thereof to each taxing district, the
county treasurer, and the county assessor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
Any taxing district that objects to the apportionment district, the duration of
the apportionment, the manner of apportionment, or the propriety of cost items
established by the transportation improvement ordinance of the sponsor may,
within thirty days after mailing of the ordinance, petition for review thereof
by the state board of tax appeals. The state board of tax appeals shall meet
within a reasonable time, hear all the evidence presented by the parties on
matters in dispute, and determine the issues upon the evidence as may be
presented to it at the hearing. The board may approve or deny the
transportation improvement ordinance as enacted or may grant approval
conditioned upon modification of the ordinance by the sponsor. The decision by
the state board of tax appeals shall be final and conclusive but shall not
preclude modification or discontinuation of the transportation improvement.

(2)
If the sponsor modifies the transportation improvement ordinance as directed by
the board, the transportation improvement ordinance shall be effective without
further hearings or findings and shall not be subject to any further appeal.
If the sponsor modifies the transportation improvement ordinance in a manner
other than as directed by the board, the transportation improvement ordinance
shall be subject to the procedures established under sections 4 and 5 of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
Upon the date established in the transportation improvement ordinance, but not
sooner than the first day of the calendar year following the passage of the
ordinance, the regular property taxes levied upon the assessed value of real
property within the apportionment district shall be divided as follows:

(a)
That portion of the regular property taxes produced by the rate of tax levied
each year by or for each of the taxing districts upon the tax allocation base
value of real property, or upon the assessed value of real property in each
year, whichever is smaller, shall be allocated to and paid to the respective
taxing districts; and

(b)
That portion of the regular property taxes levied each year by or for each of
the taxing districts upon the assessed value of real property within an
apportionment district which is in excess of the tax allocation base value of
real property shall be allocated and paid to the sponsor, or the sponsor's
designated agent, until all transportation improvement costs to be paid from
the tax allocation revenues have been paid, except that the sponsor may agree
to receive less than the full amount of such portion as long as bond debt
service, reserve, and other bond covenant requirements are satisfied, in which
case the balance of the taxes shall be allocated to the respective taxing districts
as the sponsor and the taxing districts may agree.

(2)
The county assessor shall revalue the real property within the apportionment
district for the purpose of determining the tax allocation base value for the
apportionment district and shall certify to the sponsor the tax allocation base
value as soon as practicable after the assessor receives notice of the
transportation improvement ordinance and shall certify to the sponsor the total
assessed value of real property within thirty days after the property values
for each succeeding year have been established. Nothing in this section
authorizes revaluations of real property by the assessor for property taxation
that are not made in accordance with the assessor's revaluation plan under
chapter 84.41 RCW.

(3)
The date upon which the apportionment district was established shall be
considered the date upon which the transportation improvement ordinance was
enacted by the sponsor.

(4)
The apportionment of regular property taxes under this section shall cease when
tax allocation revenues are no longer necessary or obligated to pay
transportation improvement costs or to pay principal of and interest on bonds
issued to finance transportation improvement costs and payable in whole or in
part from tax allocation revenues. At the time of termination of the
apportionment, any excess money and any earnings thereon held by the sponsor
shall be returned to the county treasurer and distributed to the taxing
districts which were subject to the allocation in proportion to their regular
property tax levies due for the year in which the funds are returned.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Tax
allocation revenues may be applied as follows:

(1)
To pay transportation improvement costs;

(2)
To pay principal of and interest on, and to fund any necessary reserves for,
tax allocation bonds;

(3)
To pay into bond funds established to pay the principal of and interest on
general obligation bonds issued pursuant to law to finance transportation
facilities that are specified in the transportation improvement ordinance and
constructed following the establishment of and within the apportionment
district; or

(4)
To pay any combination of the foregoing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
General obligation bonds which are issued to finance transportation facilities
that are specified in the transportation improvement ordinance, and for which
part or all of the principal or interest is paid by tax allocation revenues,
shall be subject to the following requirements:

(1)
The intent to issue such bonds and the maximum amount which the sponsor
contemplates issuing are specified in the transportation improvement ordinance;
and

(2)
A statement of the intent of the sponsor to issue such bonds is included in all
notices required by sections 4 and 5 of this act.

In
addition, the ordinance or resolution authorizing the issuance of such general
obligation bonds shall be subject to potential referendum approval by the
voters of the issuing entity when the bonds are part of the nonvoter approved
indebtedness limitation established under RCW 39.36.020. If the voters of the
county or city issuing such bonds otherwise possess the general power of
referendum on county or city matters, the ordinance or resolution shall be
subject to that procedure. If the voters of the county or city issuing such
bonds do not otherwise possess the general power of referendum on county or
city matters, the referendum shall conform to the requirements and procedures
for referendum petitions provided for code cities in RCW 35A.11.100.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1) A
sponsor may issue such tax allocation bonds as it may deem appropriate for the
financing of transportation improvement costs and a reasonable bond reserve and
for the refunding of any outstanding tax allocation bonds.

(2)
The principal and interest of tax allocation bonds may be made payable from:

(a)
Tax allocation revenues;

(b)
Project revenues which may include: (i) Nontax income, revenues, fees, and
rents from the transportation improvement financed with the proceeds of the
bonds, or portions thereof; and (ii) contributions, grants, and nontax money
available to the sponsor for payment of costs of the transportation improvement
or the debt service of the bonds issued therefor;

(c)
Any combination of the revenues under (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(3)
Tax allocation bonds shall not be the general obligation of or guaranteed by
all or any part of the full faith and credit of the sponsor or any other state
or local government, or any tax revenues other than tax allocation revenues,
and shall not be considered a debt of the sponsor or other state or local
government for general indebtedness limitation purposes.

(4)
The terms and conditions of tax allocation bonds may include provisions for the
following matters, among others:

(a)
The date of issuance, maturity date or dates, denominations, form, series,
negotiability, registration, rank or priority, place of payment, interest rate
or rates which may be fixed or may vary over the life of the tax allocation
bonds, bond reserve, coverage, and such other terms related to repayment of the
tax allocation bonds;

(b)
The application of tax allocation bond proceeds; the use, sale, or disposition
of property acquired; consideration or rents and fees to be charged in the sale
or lease of property acquired; consideration or rents and fees to be charged in
the sale or lease of property within a transportation improvement; the
application of rents, fees, and revenues within a transportation improvement;
the maintenance, insurance, and replacement of property within a transportation
improvement; other encumbrances, if any, upon all or part of property within a transportation
improvement, then existing or thereafter acquired; and the type of debts that
may be incurred;

(c)
The creation of special funds; the money to be so applied; and the use and
disposition of the money;

(d)
The securing of the tax allocation bonds by a pledge of property and property
rights, by assignment of income generated by the transportation improvement, or
by pledging such additional specifically described resources other than tax
revenues as are available to the sponsor;

(e)
The terms and conditions for redemption;

(f)
The replacement of lost and destroyed bond instruments;

(g)
Procedures for amendment of the terms and conditions of the tax allocation
bonds;

(h)
The powers of a trustee to enforce covenants and take other actions in event of
default; the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach of
any covenant, condition, or obligation; and

(i)
When consistent with this chapter, such other terms, conditions, and provisions
which may make the tax allocation bonds more marketable and further the
purposes of this chapter.

(5)
Tax allocation bonds may be issued and sold in such manner as the legislative
authority of the sponsor shall determine.

(6)
The sponsor may also issue or incur obligations in anticipation of the receipt
of tax allocation bond proceeds or other money available to pay transportation
improvement costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. Tax
allocation bonds authorized in this chapter shall be legal investments for any
of the funds of the state and of municipal corporations, for trustees, and for
other fiduciaries.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12.
Whenever notice is required to be given to the state, notice shall be given to
the director of revenue.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. No
direct or collateral attack on any transportation improvement, transportation
improvement ordinance, or apportionment district purported to be authorized or
created in conformance with applicable legal requirements, including the
requirements of this chapter, may be commenced more than thirty days after
publication of notice as required by section 5 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. This
chapter supplements and neither restricts nor limits any powers which the state
or any municipal corporation might otherwise have under any laws of this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. This
chapter may be known and cited as transportation infrastructure financing act.

Sec.
16. RCW
82.03.130 and 1998 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall have jurisdiction to decide the following types of appeals:

(a)
Appeals taken pursuant to RCW 82.03.190.

(b)
Appeals from a county board of equalization pursuant to RCW 84.08.130.

(c)
Appeals by an assessor or landowner from an order of the director of revenue
made pursuant to RCW 84.08.010 and 84.08.060, if filed with the board of tax
appeals within thirty days after the mailing of the order, the right to such an
appeal being hereby established.

(d)
Appeals by an assessor or owner of an intercounty public utility or private car
company from determinations by the director of revenue of equalized assessed
valuation of property and the apportionment thereof to a county made pursuant
to chapter 84.12 and 84.16 RCW, if filed with the board of tax appeals within
thirty days after mailing of the determination, the right to such appeal being
hereby established.

(e)
Appeals by an assessor, landowner, or owner of an intercounty public utility or
private car company from a determination of any county indicated ratio for such
county compiled by the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.48.075:
PROVIDED, That

(i)
Said appeal be filed after review of the ratio under RCW 84.48.075(3) and not
later than fifteen days after the mailing of the certification; and

(ii)
The hearing before the board shall be expeditiously held in accordance with
rules prescribed by the board and shall take precedence over all matters of the
same character.

(f)
Appeals from the decisions of sale price of second class shorelands on
navigable lakes by the department of natural resources pursuant to RCW
79.94.210.

(g)
Appeals from urban redevelopment property tax apportionment district proposals
established by governmental ordinances pursuant to ((RCW 39.88.060)) section
6 of this act.

(h)
Appeals from interest rates as determined by the department of revenue for use
in valuing farmland under current use assessment pursuant to RCW 84.34.065.

(i)
Appeals from revisions to stumpage value tables used to determine value by the
department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.33.091.

(j)
Appeals from denial of tax exemption application by the department of revenue
pursuant to RCW 84.36.850.

(k)
Appeals pursuant to RCW 84.40.038(3).

(2)
Except as otherwise specifically provided by law hereafter, the provisions of
RCW 1.12.070 shall apply to all notices of appeal filed with the board of tax
appeals.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. A
new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

Pursuant
to chapter . . . RCW (sections 1 through 15 of this act), any
increase in the assessed value of real property within an apportionment
district resulting from new construction, improvements to property, or any
increase in the assessed value of state-assessed property shall not be included
in the increase in assessed value resulting from new construction,
improvements, or any increase in the assessed value of state-assessed property
for purposes of calculating any limitations upon regular property taxes under
this chapter until the termination of apportionment as set forth in section
7(4) of this act, except to the extent a taxing district actually will receive
the taxes levied upon this value. Tax allocation revenues, as defined in
section 2 of this act, shall not be deemed to be "regular property
taxes" for purposes of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
39.88.010 (Declaration) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 2;

(2) RCW
39.88.020 (Definitions) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 3;

(3) RCW
39.88.030 (Authority--Limitations) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 4;

(4) RCW
39.88.040 (Procedure for adoption of public improvement) and 1982
1st ex.s. c 42 s 5;

(5) RCW
39.88.050 (Notice of public improvement) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42
s 6;

(6) RCW
39.88.060 (Disagreements between taxing districts) and 1989 c 378
s 1 & 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 7;

(7) RCW
39.88.070 (Apportionment of taxes) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 8;

(8) RCW
39.88.080 (Application of tax allocation revenues) and 1982 1st
ex.s. c 42 s 9;

(9) RCW
39.88.090 (General obligation bonds) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s
10;

(10) RCW
39.88.100 (Tax allocation bonds) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 11;

(11) RCW
39.88.110 (Legal investments) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 13;

(12) RCW
39.88.120 (Notice to state) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 14;

(13) RCW
39.88.130 (Conclusive presumption of validity) and 1982 1st ex.s.
c 42 s 15;

(14) RCW
39.88.900 (Supplemental nature of chapter) and 1982 1st ex.s. c
42 s 16;

(15) RCW
39.88.905 (Short title) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 1;

(16) RCW
39.88.910 (Captions not part of law--1982 1st ex.s. c 42) and
1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 17;

(17) RCW
39.88.915 (Severability--1982 1st ex.s. c 42) and 1982 1st ex.s.
c 42 s 18; and

(18) RCW
84.55.080 (Adjustment to tax limitation) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42
s 12.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19.
Sections 1 through 15 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---