BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to promote the use of wetland preservation as a
compensatory mitigation option under appropriate circumstances, and to develop
a state policy regarding the preservation of existing wetlands for compensatory
mitigation credit. Preservation of existing high-quality wetlands can realize
considerable mitigation cost savings by reducing or eliminating the need for
site design work, site construction, plant materials and installation, and
intensive postconstruction monitoring. Often, more acres of existing,
high-quality natural wetlands can be purchased for preservation than could be
created for the same amount of money.

Preserving
existing wetlands also eliminates the uncertainty of success that accompanies
created wetlands. Mature, functioning wetlands develop over long periods of
time, achieving a level of quality that may be only attained by successful
created wetlands after a period of decades. The temporal loss of habitat while
a created wetland matures is completely avoided with wetland preservation.

The
legislature acknowledges that exclusive or excessive use of wetland
preservation as mitigation might lead to an overall net loss of wetlands in
Washington state. Therefore, it is also the intent of the legislature to
promote preservation as but one mitigation option of many, to be evaluated on a
case-by-case basis, and used only to preserve those wetlands of the highest
quality which may be threatened with degradation or destruction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. For
the purposes of this chapter:

(1)
"Compensatory mitigation" means the act of replacing an impacted or
destroyed wetland with a wetland of equal or greater function and/or acreage,
as required by state and federal regulations and guidelines; and

(2)
"No net loss" means the balance achieved when wetland function and
acreage lost due to development is replaced by a wetland amount equal to that
lost, a one-to-one replacement ratio.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The department of transportation shall colead the coordination of an
interagency committee to develop a state policy for wetland preservation as
compensatory mitigation and a memorandum of understanding to be signed by
participating agencies.

(2)
The department of transportation shall establish and cochair a committee of
agencies involved in wetland protection, regulation, and mitigation.

(3)
The committee shall include, but is not limited to, the state department of
transportation, department of ecology, department of natural resources,
department of fish and wildlife, parks and recreation commission, local
agencies, and tribes, and the federal environmental protection agency, corps of
engineers, fish and wildlife service, highway administration, and forest
service.

(4)
The committee shall report to the legislature on an annual basis as to the
development of the state preservation policy and the status of the memorandum
of understanding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

---
END ---