BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to Title 81 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that use of programmatic approaches to natural resource
regulation benefits agencies and applicants by permit streamlining and improves
environmental resource protection by allowing staff and resources to focus on
coordinating complex issues rather than routine documentation.

The
legislature encourages the development of programmatic approaches and general
permitting with state and federal agencies. The Washington state departments
of fish and wildlife, ecology, community, trade, and economic development, and
transportation shall work collaboratively to assess where the development of
programmatic permits can improve coordination among regulatory agencies and the
regulated community and to implement programmatic approaches to project
permitting. This assessment should focus on coordination required by the
federal endangered species act and clean water act.

A
programmatic approach to environmental permitting is one that considers general
categories of activities and outlines means by which these general activities
or programs can be accomplished in compliance with regulations. This reduces
the degree of project analysis and permit coordination by adopting general recommendations,
methods, and parameters which minimize or eliminate impacts. This is most
appropriate for routine activities with relatively minor environmental impacts.

These agencies shall report their findings to the legislature by
January 1, 2001.

---
END ---