BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The building code council shall develop and adopt a code requirement that all
restrooms in public facilities shall install baby changing devices. Existing
public facilities shall be retrofitted by January 1, 2001.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "public facilities" means any place
of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement as defined in RCW
49.60.040(10) that permits the presence of infants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---