BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes the need to address listings under the federal
endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) in a way that will make
the most efficient use of existing efforts. The legislature finds that the
principle of adaptive management requires that different models should be tried
so that the lessons learned from these models can be put to use throughout the
state. It is the intent of the legislature to create a program for
southeastern Washington that addresses the recent listings of salmon and takes
full advantage of all state and local efforts at habitat restoration in that
area to date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A program for the recovery of salmon is established in Walla Walla, Columbia,
Garfield, and Asotin counties within the habitat area designated as the Snake
river salmon recovery region by the salmon recovery office established under
RCW 75.46.040. The lead entity created under subsection (2) of this section is
responsible for developing and implementing the habitat portion of a salmon
recovery plan and is empowered to receive and disburse funds for this purpose,
including block grants from the salmon recovery funding board.

(2)
A lead entity consisting of fifteen voting members is created within the Snake
river salmon recovery region. The voting members shall consist of two citizen
members from each of the four counties in the Snake river salmon recovery
region; one representative each from the Nez Perce and Umatilla tribes,
appointed by the tribes; and one representative from each of the following
agencies: The United States natural resource conservation service, the United
States fish and wildlife service, the United States forest service, the
Washington department of ecology, and the Washington department of fish and
wildlife. The nonvoting members shall consist of the district manager or
designee from each of the four conservation districts serving the four counties
in the recovery region. The lead entity may appoint additional persons as
needed. In making appointments under this subsection, the conservation districts
shall consider recommendations of interested parties. Vacancies shall be
filled in the same manner as the original appointments were selected. No
action may be brought or maintained against any lead entity member, the lead
entity, or any of its agents, officers, or employees for any noncontractual
acts or omissions in carrying out the purposes of this section.

(3)(a)
In developing the habitat portion of a recovery plan, the lead entity shall
consider local watershed efforts and activities, as well as any habitat
conservation plans that may exist. Any of the participating counties may
continue its own efforts for restoring salmon habitat. This section does not
limit the authority of units of local government to enter into interlocal
agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW or any other provision of law.

(b)
The lead entity shall prioritize as appropriate and approve habitat projects
and programs related to the recovery of Snake river salmon runs, including the
funding of those projects and programs, and coordinate local government
efforts.

(4)(a)
The program administrator for the lead entity shall be selected from among the
four conservation districts participating in the lead entity.

(b)
The lead entity has the authority to hire and fire staff, including an
executive director, enter into contracts, accept grants and other moneys,
disburse funds, make recommendations to cities and counties about potential
code changes and the development of programs and incentives upon request, pay
all necessary expenses, and may choose a fiduciary agent.

(5) This section expires July 1, 2005.

---
END ---