BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that contracting and partnering with community-based
organizations is beneficial to the success of the WorkFirst program. The use
of the nationally recognized and certified family development program has
proven to be an effective model for use with families with complex issues and
multiple barriers to work in moving from poverty to employment and stable
self-sufficiency. The family development model creates a uniform set of
standards throughout the country and state so outcomes can be accurately
measured through a unified management information system.

The
legislature intends that community-based contracts currently under the
employment security department and funded with welfare-to-work funds that have
been rescinded by congress be continued as the family development program under
the department of community, trade, and economic development or its successor
agency.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

The
family development program is created within the department of community,
trade, and economic development, or its successor agency. The department shall
contract with community-based organizations for family development services.
Contracts shall be awarded to community-based organizations which have
certified family development specialists.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 74.12 RCW to read as follows:

The department of social and health services shall transfer
sufficient funding from the temporary assistance for needy families block grant
to the department of community, trade, and economic development, or its
successor agency, for the purpose of contracting for family development
services. The amount transferred for this purpose shall not be less than the
annual amount allocated in the employment security department in the 1998-1999
fiscal year for contracts with community-based organizations through private
industry councils under the welfare-to-work program.

---
END ---