BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
department of natural resources shall sell to the town of Darrington up to five
acres of public land contiguous to the town cemetery. The commissioner of
public lands shall immediately institute actions necessary to facilitate this
transfer, including determining the fair market value of the property.

The
commissioner shall take all measures necessary to facilitate the transfer of
legal ownership, including the conveyance of title and any other necessary
documents. The town of Darrington shall take all measures necessary to accept
the transfer of legal ownership from the department of natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---