BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.58.180 and 1997 c 199 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person aggrieved by the granting, denying, or rescinding of a permit on
shorelines of ((the state)) state-wide significance pursuant to
RCW 90.58.140 may seek review from the shorelines hearings board by filing a
petition for review within twenty-one days of the date of filing as defined in
RCW 90.58.140(6). Appeals of permits issued for shorelines that are not of
state-wide significance shall be governed by a local jurisdiction's critical
areas and land-use ordinances, subject to review under chapter 36.70C RCW.

Within
seven days of the filing of any petition for review with the board as provided
in this section pertaining to a final decision of a local government, the
petitioner shall serve copies of the petition on the department, the office of
the attorney general, and the local government. The department and the
attorney general may intervene to protect the public interest and insure that
the provisions of this chapter are complied with at any time within fifteen
days from the date of the receipt by the department or the attorney general of
a copy of the petition for review filed pursuant to this section. The
shorelines hearings board shall schedule review proceedings on the petition for
review without regard as to whether the period for the department or the
attorney general to intervene has or has not expired.

(2)
The department or the attorney general may obtain review of any final decision
granting a permit, or granting or denying an application for a permit issued by
a local government regarding a shoreline of state-wide significance by
filing a written petition with the shorelines hearings board and the
appropriate local government within twenty-one days from the date the final
decision was filed as provided in RCW 90.58.140(6).

(3)
The review proceedings authorized in subsections (1) and (2) of this section
are subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW pertaining to procedures in
adjudicative proceedings. Judicial review of such proceedings of the
shorelines hearings board is governed by chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall
issue its decision on the appeal authorized under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section within one hundred eighty days after the date the petition is
filed with the board or a petition to intervene is filed by the department or
the attorney general, whichever is later. The time period may be extended by
the board for a period of thirty days upon a showing of good cause or may be
waived by the parties.

(4)
Any person may appeal any rules, regulations, or guidelines adopted or approved
by the department within thirty days of the date of the adoption or approval.
The board shall make a final decision within sixty days following the hearing
held thereon.

(5)
The board shall find the rule, regulation, or guideline to be valid and enter a
final decision to that effect unless it determines that the rule, regulation,
or guideline:

(a)
Is clearly erroneous in light of the policy of this chapter; or

(b)
Constitutes an implementation of this chapter in violation of constitutional or
statutory provisions; or

(c)
Is arbitrary and capricious; or

(d)
Was developed without fully considering and evaluating all material submitted
to the department during public review and comment; or

(e)
Was not adopted in accordance with required procedures.

(6)
If the board makes a determination under subsection (5)(a) through (e) of this
section, it shall enter a final decision declaring the rule, regulation, or
guideline invalid, remanding the rule, regulation, or guideline to the
department with a statement of the reasons in support of the determination, and
directing the department to adopt, after a thorough consultation with the
affected local government and any other interested party, a new rule,
regulation, or guideline consistent with the board's decision.

(7)
A decision of the board on the validity of a rule, regulation, or guideline
shall be subject to review in superior court, if authorized pursuant to chapter
34.05 RCW. A petition for review of the decision of the shorelines hearings
board on a rule, regulation, or guideline shall be filed within thirty days
after the date of final decision by the shorelines hearings board.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.58.140 and 1995 c 347 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A development shall not be undertaken on ((the)) shorelines of ((the
state)) state-wide significance unless it is consistent with the
policy of this chapter and, after adoption or approval, as appropriate, the
applicable guidelines, rules, or master program. Development on shorelines
of the state shall be governed by a local jurisdiction's critical area and land
use ordinances adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW.

(2)
A substantial development shall not be undertaken on shorelines of ((the
state)) state-wide significance without first obtaining a permit
from the government entity having administrative jurisdiction under this
chapter.

A
permit shall be granted:

(a)
From June 1, 1971, until such time as an applicable master program has become
effective, only when the development proposed is consistent with: (i) The
policy of RCW 90.58.020; and (ii) after their adoption, the guidelines and
rules of the department; and (iii) so far as can be ascertained, the master
program being developed for the area;

(b)
After adoption or approval, as appropriate, by the department of an applicable
master program, only when the development proposed is consistent with the
applicable master program and this chapter.

(3)
The local government shall establish a program, consistent with rules adopted
by the department, for the administration and enforcement of the permit system
provided in this section. The administration of the system so established
shall be performed exclusively by the local government.

(4)
Except as otherwise specifically provided in subsection (11) of this section,
the local government shall require notification of the public of all
applications for permits governed by any permit system established pursuant to
subsection (3) of this section by ensuring that notice of the application is
given by at least one of the following methods:

(a)
Mailing of the notice to the latest recorded real property owners as shown by
the records of the county assessor within at least three hundred feet of the
boundary of the property upon which the substantial development is proposed;

(b)
Posting of the notice in a conspicuous manner on the property upon which the
project is to be constructed; or

(c)
Any other manner deemed appropriate by local authorities to accomplish the
objectives of reasonable notice to adjacent landowners and the public.

The
notices shall include a statement that any person desiring to submit written
comments concerning an application, or desiring to receive notification of the
final decision concerning an application as expeditiously as possible after the
issuance of the decision, may submit the comments or requests for decisions to
the local government within thirty days of the last date the notice is to be
published pursuant to this subsection. The local government shall forward, in
a timely manner following the issuance of a decision, a copy of the decision to
each person who submits a request for the decision.

If
a hearing is to be held on an application, notices of such a hearing shall
include a statement that any person may submit oral or written comments on an
application at the hearing.

(5)
The system shall include provisions to assure that construction pursuant to a
permit will not begin or be authorized until twenty-one days from the date the
permit decision was filed as provided in subsection (6) of this section; or
until all review proceedings are terminated if the proceedings were initiated
within twenty-one days from the date of filing as defined in subsection (6) of this
section except as follows:

(a)
In the case of any permit issued to the state of Washington, department of
transportation, for the construction and modification of SR 90 (I-90) on or
adjacent to Lake Washington, the construction may begin after thirty days from
the date of filing, and the permits are valid until December 31, 1995;

(b)
Construction may be commenced no sooner than thirty days after the date of the
appeal of the board's decision is filed if a permit is granted by the local
government and (i) the granting of the permit is appealed to the shorelines
hearings board within twenty-one days of the date of filing, (ii) the hearings
board approves the granting of the permit by the local government or approves a
portion of the substantial development for which the local government issued
the permit, and (iii) an appeal for judicial review of the hearings board
decision is filed pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. The appellant may request,
within ten days of the filing of the appeal with the court, a hearing before
the court to determine whether construction pursuant to the permit approved by
the hearings board or to a revised permit issued pursuant to the order of the
hearings board should not commence. If, at the conclusion of the hearing, the
court finds that construction pursuant to such a permit would involve a
significant, irreversible damaging of the environment, the court shall prohibit
the permittee from commencing the construction pursuant to the approved or
revised permit until all review proceedings are final. Construction pursuant
to a permit revised at the direction of the hearings board may begin only on
that portion of the substantial development for which the local government had
originally issued the permit, and construction pursuant to such a revised
permit on other portions of the substantial development may not begin until
after all review proceedings are terminated. In such a hearing before the
court, the burden of proving whether the construction may involve significant
irreversible damage to the environment and demonstrating whether such
construction would or would not be appropriate is on the appellant;

(c)
If the permit is for a substantial development meeting the requirements of
subsection (11) of this section, construction pursuant to that permit may not
begin or be authorized until twenty-one days from the date the permit decision
was filed as provided in subsection (6) of this section.

If
a permittee begins construction pursuant to subsections (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection, the construction is begun at the permittee's own risk. If, as
a result of judicial review, the courts order the removal of any portion of the
construction or the restoration of any portion of the environment involved or
require the alteration of any portion of a substantial development constructed
pursuant to a permit, the permittee is barred from recovering damages or costs
involved in adhering to such requirements from the local government that
granted the permit, the hearings board, or any appellant or intervener.

(6)
Any decision on an application for a permit under the authority of this
section, whether it is an approval or a denial, shall, concurrently with the
transmittal of the ruling to the applicant, be filed with the department and
the attorney general. With regard to a permit other than a permit governed by
subsection (10) of this section, "date of filing" as used herein
means the date of actual receipt by the department. With regard to a permit
for a variance or a conditional use, "date of filing" means the date
a decision of the department rendered on the permit pursuant to subsection (10)
of this section is transmitted by the department to the local government. The
department shall notify in writing the local government and the applicant of
the date of filing.

(7)
Applicants for permits under this section have the burden of proving that a
proposed substantial development is consistent with the criteria that must be
met before a permit is granted. In any review of the granting or denial of an
application for a permit as provided in RCW 90.58.180 (1) and (2), the person
requesting the review has the burden of proof.

(8)
Any permit may, after a hearing with adequate notice to the permittee and the
public, be rescinded by the issuing authority upon the finding that a permittee
has not complied with conditions of a permit. If the department is of the
opinion that noncompliance exists, the department shall provide written notice
to the local government and the permittee. If the department is of the opinion
that the noncompliance continues to exist thirty days after the date of the
notice, and the local government has taken no action to rescind the permit, the
department may petition the hearings board for a rescission of the permit upon
written notice of the petition to the local government and the permittee if the
request by the department is made to the hearings board within fifteen days of
the termination of the thirty-day notice to the local government.

(9)
The holder of a certification from the governor pursuant to chapter 80.50 RCW
shall not be required to obtain a permit under this section.

(10)
Any permit for a variance or a conditional use by local government under
approved master programs must be submitted to the department for its approval
or disapproval.

(11)(a)
An application for a substantial development permit for a limited utility
extension or for the construction of a bulkhead or other measures to protect a
single family residence and its appurtenant structures from shoreline erosion
shall be subject to the following procedures:

(i)
The public comment period under subsection (4) of this section shall be twenty
days. The notice provided under subsection (4) of this section shall state the
manner in which the public may obtain a copy of the local government decision
on the application no later than two days following its issuance;

(ii)
The local government shall issue its decision to grant or deny the permit
within twenty-one days of the last day of the comment period specified in (i)
of this subsection; and

(iii)
If there is an appeal of the decision to grant or deny the permit to the local
government legislative authority, the appeal shall be finally determined by the
legislative authority within thirty days.

(b)
For purposes of this section, a limited utility extension means the extension
of a utility service that:

(i)
Is categorically exempt under chapter 43.21C RCW for one or more of the
following: Natural gas, electricity, telephone, water, or sewer;

(ii)
Will serve an existing use in compliance with this chapter; and

(iii)
Will not extend more than twenty-five hundred linear feet within the shorelines
of the state.

Sec.
3. RCW
36.70A.030 and 1997 c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new
comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use
plan.

(2)
"Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial
production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary,
vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed,
Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through
84.33.140, finfish in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term
commercial significance for agricultural production.

(3)
"City" means any city or town, including a code city.

(4)
"Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or
"plan" means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of
the governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this
chapter.

(5)
"Critical areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a)
Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for
potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas; (d) frequently
flooded areas; ((and)) (e) geologically hazardous areas; and (f)
shorelines, as defined by RCW 90.58.030(2)(d).

(6)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(7)
"Development regulations" or "regulation" means the
controls placed on development or land use activities by a county or city,
including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances,
shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit development
ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together
with any amendments thereto. A development regulation does not include a
decision to approve a project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020,
even though the decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the
legislative body of the county or city.

(8)
"Forest land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for
long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically and
practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to
the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has
long-term commercial significance. In determining whether forest land is
primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production
on land that can be economically and practically managed for such production,
the following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to
urban, suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term
local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber
production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services
conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.

(9)
"Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because of their
susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are
not suited to the siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development
consistent with public health or safety concerns.

(10)
"Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing capacity, productivity,
and soil composition of the land for long-term commercial production, in
consideration with the land's proximity to population areas, and the
possibility of more intense uses of the land.

(11)
"Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.

(12)
"Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks,
street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems,
storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and
schools.

(13)
"Public services" include fire protection and suppression, law
enforcement, public health, education, recreation, environmental protection,
and other governmental services.

(14)
"Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and development
established by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:

(a)
In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the
built environment;

(b)
That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and
opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;

(c)
That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and
communities;

(d)
That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and
wildlife habitat;

(e)
That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling,
low‑density development;

(f)
That generally do not require the extension of urban governmental services; and

(g)
That are consistent with the protection of natural surface water flows and
ground water and surface water recharge and discharge areas.

(15)
"Rural development" refers to development outside the urban growth
area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses
and residential densities, including clustered residential development, at
levels that are consistent with the preservation of rural character and the
requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to agriculture
or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.

(16)
"Rural governmental services" or "rural services" include
those public services and public facilities historically and typically
delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include
domestic water systems, fire and police protection services, transportation and
public transit services, and other public utilities associated with rural
development and normally not associated with urban areas. Rural services do
not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW
36.70A.110(4).

(17)
"Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for
the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to such a
degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of
food, other agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral
resources, rural uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural development, as
provided in RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread
over wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental services.
"Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban growth
located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area with urban growth
on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.

(18)
"Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a county
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.

(19)
"Urban governmental services" or "urban services" include
those public services and public facilities at an intensity historically and
typically provided in cities, specifically including storm and sanitary sewer
systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning services, fire and police
protection services, public transit services, and other public utilities
associated with urban areas and normally not associated with rural areas.

(20) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that
are inundated or saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and
duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support,
a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions.
Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands
do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland
sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage ditches,
grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment
facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created
after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the
construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those
artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

---
END ---