BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
53.04.180 and 1999 c 250 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
By a majority vote of the commission, and with the written consent of all the
owners of the property to be annexed, a port commission of a district that is
less than county-wide, and that is located in a county with a population of
less than ninety thousand and located in either the Interstate 5 or
Interstate 90 corridor, may annex, for industrial development or other port
district purposes, property contiguous to the district's boundaries and not
located within the boundaries of any other port district.

(2)
The written consent required by subsection (1) of this section must contain a
full and correct legal description of the property to be annexed, must include
the signature of all owners of the property to be annexed, and must be
addressed to and filed with the commission.

(3)
If the commission approves annexation under this section, it shall do so by
resolution and shall file a certified copy of the resolution with the board of
county commissioners of the county in which the annexed property is located.
Upon the date fixed in the resolution, the area annexed becomes part of the
district.

Sec.
2. RCW
53.04.150 and 1999 c 250 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A port district that is less than county-wide, and that is located
in a county with a population of less than ninety thousand and located in either
the Interstate 5 or Interstate 90 corridor, may petition for annexation
of an area that is contiguous to its boundaries, is not located within the
boundaries of any other port district, and contains no registered voters. The
petition must be in writing, addressed to and filed with the port commission,
and signed by the owners of not less than seventy-five percent of the property
value in the area to be annexed, according to the assessed value for general
taxation. The petition must contain a legal description of the property
according to government legal subdivisions or legal plats, or a sufficient
metes and bounds description, and must be accompanied by a plat outlining the
boundaries of the property to be annexed.

---
END ---