BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
59.18.200 and 1979 ex.s. c 70 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When premises are rented for an indefinite time, with monthly or other periodic
rent reserved, such tenancy shall be construed to be a tenancy from month to
month, or from period to period on which rent is payable, and shall be
terminated by written notice of twenty days or more, preceding the end of any
of said months or periods, given by either party to the other.

(2)
Any tenant who is a member of the armed forces may terminate a rental
agreement with less than twenty days' notice if they receive reassignment
orders which do not allow greater notice. If notice is given under this
subsection, the landlord must refund moneys paid as deposit or security for
performance under the provisions of RCW 59.18.280.

(3) Whenever a landlord plans to change any apartment or
apartments to a condominium form of ownership or plans to change to a policy of
excluding children, the landlord shall give a written notice to a tenant at
least ninety days before termination of the tenancy to effectuate such change
in policy. Such ninety-day notice shall be in lieu of the notice required by
subsection (1) of this section: PROVIDED, That if after giving the ninety-day
notice the change in policy is delayed, the notice requirements of subsection
(1) of this section shall apply unless waived by the tenant.

---
END ---