BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
world economy is rapidly integrating peoples and cultures from all over the
globe. Washington's population is more diverse than ever, and getting more so
all the time. As diversity increases in Washington, the most trade-dependent
state, and as social and cultural ties around the world grow, strengthen, and
deepen, what it will take for our children to successfully live, learn, and
work in the future and to live productive and satisfying lives is changing.

Our
children deserve every opportunity for success in school, at work, and
throughout their lives. Having proficiency in a language in addition to
English is necessary for our children to realize their fullest academic,
economic, personal, and cultural potential.

Understanding
and appreciation of other world cultures is an essential part of being a fully
prepared and responsible citizen of the United States or any other country in
the twenty-first century and beyond.

Children
learn a second language much more readily before puberty and gain the strongest
grasp of a second language through sustained study and use over a long period
of time. Therefore, the legislature intends to determine the feasibility of
developing and implementing high quality world language instruction
opportunities in public elementary schools and of providing all students with
access to high quality world language instruction within articulated sequences
of courses and programs that extend from kindergarten through the twelfth
grade.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
superintendent of public instruction shall conduct a study of the feasibility
of implementing in every school district high quality foreign language
instruction programs consisting of articulated sequences of courses extending
from kindergarten through twelfth grade. The study shall also explore:

(1)
The creation of high school graduation requirements related to attainment of
proficiency in a language other than English;

(2)
The integration of foreign language instruction programs with the state's
education reforms, including but not limited to:

(a)
The development of language-specific and nonlanguage-specific academic
standards for foreign language study;

(b)
Development and implementation of performance-based assessments for measuring
foreign language proficiency attainment;

(c)
The accountability system already in place and the additional elements of the
accountability system being developed by the academic achievement and
accountability commission and others; and

(d)
Strategies for including local control for school districts to allow for local
selection of the language or languages in which instruction may be offered;

(3)
The potential for linking bilingual and English-as-a-second-language programs
with programs providing instruction in a language other than English for
native-English speaking students;

(4)
Strategies for providing qualified foreign language teachers in numbers
sufficient to enable all school districts to give all students access to high
quality articulated sequences of courses and programs of foreign language
instruction extending from kindergarten through grade twelve, including but not
limited to:

(a)
The potential role of heritage schools in helping provide qualified teachers;

(b)
The challenges facing teacher preparation programs in providing greater
capacity for training enough qualified foreign language teachers, especially at
the elementary grade levels, and how those challenges may be overcome; and

(c)
The potential for temporary, limited, or alternative certification to provide
increased numbers of individuals prepared to teach foreign languages;

(5)
The costs and benefits of implementing programs of foreign language instruction
of the kind described in section 1 of this act and of creating foreign language
high school graduation requirements; and

(6)
Other issues the superintendent or the advisory committee deem relevant to
determining the feasibility of implementing foreign language programs as
described in this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
superintendent shall appoint an advisory committee and shall work closely with
members of such committee through the entire conduct of the study and
development of the report required under this act. The committee shall
include, but not be limited to, foreign language teachers and representatives
of school districts, institutions of higher education, the business community,
and parents. The superintendent shall strive to appoint an advisory committee
that is reflective of the diversity of Washington's population and includes all
regions of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The
superintendent shall report the findings of the study to the governor, the
state board of education, and the education and higher education committees of
the house of representatives and senate by December 15, 2001.

---
END ---