BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
68.50.320 and 1984 c 17 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

When
a person reported missing has not been found within thirty days of the report,
the sheriff, chief of police, county coroner or county medical examiner, or
other law enforcement authority initiating and conducting the investigation for
the missing person shall ask the missing person's family or next of kin to give
written consent to contact the dentist or dentists of the missing person and
request the person's dental records.

When
a person reported missing has not been found within thirty days, the sheriff,
chief of police, or other law enforcement authority initiating and conducting
the investigation for the missing person shall confer with the county coroner
or medical examiner prior to the preparation of a missing person's report.
After conferring with the coroner or medical examiner, the sheriff, chief of
police, or other law enforcement authority shall submit a missing person's
report and the dental records received under this section to the dental
identification system of the state patrol identification, child abuse,
vulnerable adult abuse, and criminal history section on forms supplied by
the state patrol for such purpose.

When
a person reported missing has been found, the sheriff, chief of police, coroner
or medical examiner, or other law enforcement authority shall report such
information to the state patrol. ((The dental identification system shall
then erase all records with respect to such person.))

The
dental identification system shall maintain a file of information regarding
persons reported to it as missing ((and who have not been reported found)).
The file shall contain the information referred to in this section and such
other information as the state patrol finds relevant to assist in the location
of a missing person.

The files of the dental identification system shall, upon request,
be made available to law enforcement agencies attempting to locate missing
persons.

---
END ---