BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
Washington state has made considerable progress in the area of education
reform. The state will soon require our public school students to meet
performance-based standards to progress through the education system.

(2)
Because the state is requiring students to pass tough assessments, our teachers
will be required to bring students to the educational level necessary to
graduate.

(3)
Historically, teachers have been compensated based on their length of service
and level of education. This offers little financial incentive for teachers to
find innovative and creative methods of teaching.

(4)
Districts must have flexibility to reward exceptional teachers who are also
willing to acquire skills important to the districts' learning goals.

Therefore,
the legislature intends to offer a performance pay incentive to a number of
teachers who are exceptional in the classroom and have an extraordinary and
positive impact on student learning.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.400 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
School districts may choose to participate in the performance pay incentive
plan. Once a district has chosen to participate, schools may offer the
performance pay incentive plan to classroom teachers. "Classroom
teachers," as used in this section, are school personnel with duty codes
of 31, 32, or 33 according to the superintendent of public instruction's school
district personnel summary profiles. Participating districts shall make every
effort to ensure that at least one classroom teacher in each building is
eligible to participate.

(2)
Classroom teachers are eligible to participate, to the extent they wish to
participate, in the performance pay incentive plan for the purpose of receiving
one incentive per school year.

(3)
Subject to legislative appropriation, it is the intent of the legislature to
provide incentives for twenty-five percent of the state's classroom teachers.

(4)
School districts choosing to offer the program shall notify the superintendent
of public instruction by July 1st before the school year in which they intend
to participate. The superintendent of public instruction shall notify
districts by July 31st before the year of participation of the number of
incentives available to them. The number of incentives shall be based on the
number of classroom teachers in a district. Twenty-five percent of teachers in
the district funded pursuant to the biennial appropriations act, including
general apportionment, special education, transitional bilingual, and learning
assistance program funds, are eligible. In participating districts with fewer
than four teachers, at least one classroom teacher from each school building is
eligible to receive an incentive.

(5)
The school principal, in consultation with other educational staff and parents,
shall annually nominate the classroom teachers who are eligible to
participate. The manner of selecting the classroom teachers who are eligible
is not subject to collective bargaining. The selection criteria shall include
but not be limited to: Performance and evaluations during the previous school
year, to the extent that these are public record, and, in middle and high
schools, input from students. The principal shall notify the classroom
teachers nominated to participate before the beginning of the school year.

(a)
Input from students shall be in the form of a student survey or other method,
selected by the school, of gathering student perceptions of teachers.

(b)
The survey shall be designed so that students rate teachers based on how much
the students learned, how well the teacher communicated the lessons, and how
willing the teacher was to offer additional help. In addition to these areas,
schools are encouraged to identify other areas important to student learning to
be included on the survey.

(6)
Schools shall notify the superintendent of public instruction of those
classroom teachers who have earned the incentive by June 30th of the year in
which they will receive the incentive.

(7)
Incentives shall be awarded by the end of the school year.

(8)
Incentives shall be awarded in the amount of one thousand dollars and shall be
one-time incentives. Classroom teachers are eligible for one incentive per
year, and the incentives shall not become part of the district or state salary
schedule.

(9)
In order to receive an incentive, a classroom teacher must meet at least the
following two criteria:

(a)
The classroom teacher must receive an exceptional status on his or her second
annual performance evaluation required by RCW 28A.405.100 by the completion of
the school year in which the teacher is nominated for the award. Such status
shall be defined by the employee's ability to have a positive impact on student
learning. Positive impact on student learning means that a teacher, through
instruction and assessment, has been able to document students' increased
knowledge or demonstration of a skill or skills related to the state goals and
essential academic learning requirements. School districts may identify
additional criteria that must be met to achieve an exceptional status.

(b)
The classroom teacher must demonstrate knowledge or skill in one particular
subject or curricular area that must be identified by participating school
districts no later than July 1st of each year. Participating districts shall
annually identify where student learning could best be enhanced by teachers
gaining or having knowledge or skill in an area. The legislature also intends
that skill areas align with the mission and learning improvement plan of the
district as stated in the district's annual performance report required by RCW
28A.655.110. The principal and classroom teacher will have a performance plan
that includes one or more of the following:

(i)
The type of knowledge or skill the classroom teacher will gain;

(ii)
The method by which a classroom teacher will enhance existing knowledge or
skill; and

(iii)
The method by which the classroom teacher will share the knowledge or skill
with other teachers in the building.

(10)
The performance pay incentive plan established by this section is not a part of
basic education. Payments made under the performance pay incentive plan are
not basic education program salaries under RCW 28A.400.200.

(11)
If the legislature revokes any benefits granted under this section, no affected
employee is entitled to receive such benefits as a matter of contractual right.

(12)
This program does not apply during a time in which a district has a collective
bargaining agreement that was in effect on the effective date of this section
that would require bargaining regarding this program. For collective
bargaining agreements entered into after the effective date of this section,
this program may not be the subject of bargaining.

(13)
The performance pay incentive plan shall be in effect for the 2000-01, 2001-02,
and 2002-03 school years.

(14)
This section expires December 31, 2003.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.400.200 and 1997 c 141 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter, allow, and order
paid salaries and compensation for all district employees in conformance with
this section.

(2)(a)
Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be less than the salary
provided in the appropriations act in the state-wide salary allocation schedule
for an employee with a baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and

(b)
Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a masters degree shall not
be less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the state-wide
salary allocation schedule for an employee with a masters degree and zero years
of service;

(3)(a)
The actual average salary paid to basic education and special education
certificated instructional staff shall not exceed the district's average basic
education and special education program certificated instructional staff salary
used for the state basic education allocations for that school year as
determined pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410.

(b)
Fringe benefit contributions for basic education and special education
certificated instructional staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this
subsection only to the extent that the district's actual average benefit
contribution exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided
per certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating appropriations
act in effect at the time the compensation is payable. For purposes of this
section, fringe benefits shall not include payment for unused leave for illness
or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer contributions for old age survivors
insurance, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation, and retirement
benefits under the Washington state retirement system; or employer
contributions for health benefits in excess of the insurance benefits
allocation provided per certificated instructional staff unit in the state
operating appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is
payable. A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.

(c)
Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in programs other than
basic education and special education shall be consistent with the salary and
benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic education and
special education programs.

(4)
Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff may exceed the limitations
in subsection (3) of this section only for the performance pay incentive
plan in section 2 of this act or by separate contract for additional time,
additional responsibilities, or incentives. Supplemental contracts shall not
cause the state to incur any present or future funding obligation.
Supplemental contracts shall be subject to the collective bargaining provisions
of chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed
one year, and if not renewed shall not constitute adverse change in accordance
with RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380. No district may enter into a
supplemental contract under this subsection for the provision of services which
are a part of the basic education program required by Article IX, section 3 of
the state Constitution.

(5)
Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply with RCW
28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.

Sec.
4. RCW
28A.405.100 and 1997 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall establish and may amend from
time to time minimum criteria for the evaluation of the professional
performance capabilities and development of certificated classroom teachers and
certificated support personnel. For classroom teachers the criteria shall be
developed in the following categories: Instructional skill; classroom
management, professional preparation and scholarship; effort toward improvement
when needed; the handling of student discipline and attendant problems; and
interest in teaching pupils and knowledge of subject matter.

Every
board of directors shall, in accordance with procedure provided in RCW
41.59.010 through 41.59.170, 41.59.910 and 41.59.920, establish evaluative
criteria and procedures for all certificated classroom teachers and
certificated support personnel. The evaluative criteria must contain as a
minimum the criteria established by the superintendent of public instruction
pursuant to this section and must be prepared within six months following
adoption of the superintendent of public instruction's minimum criteria. The
district must certify to the superintendent of public instruction that
evaluative criteria have been so prepared by the district.

Except
as provided in subsection (5) of this section, it shall be the responsibility
of a principal or his or her designee to evaluate all certificated personnel in
his or her school. During each school year all classroom teachers and
certificated support personnel, hereinafter referred to as
"employees" in this section, shall be observed for the purposes of
evaluation at least twice in the performance of their assigned duties. Total
observation time for each employee for each school year shall be not less than
sixty minutes. Following each observation, or series of observations, the
principal or other evaluator shall promptly document the results of the
observation in writing, and shall provide the employee with a copy thereof
within three days after such report is prepared. New employees shall be
observed at least once for a total observation time of thirty minutes during
the first ninety calendar days of their employment period.

At
any time after October 15th, an employee whose work is judged unsatisfactory
based on district evaluation criteria shall be notified in writing of the
specific areas of deficiencies along with a reasonable program for
improvement. During the period of probation, the employee may not be
transferred from the supervision of the original evaluator. Improvement of
performance or probable cause for nonrenewal must occur and be documented by
the original evaluator before any consideration of a request for transfer or
reassignment as contemplated by either the individual or the school district.
A probationary period of sixty school days shall be established. The
establishment of a probationary period does not adversely affect the contract
status of an employee within the meaning of RCW 28A.405.300. The purpose of
the probationary period is to give the employee opportunity to demonstrate
improvements in his or her areas of deficiency. The establishment of the
probationary period and the giving of the notice to the employee of deficiency
shall be by the school district superintendent and need not be submitted to the
board of directors for approval. During the probationary period the evaluator
shall meet with the employee at least twice monthly to supervise and make a
written evaluation of the progress, if any, made by the employee. The
evaluator may authorize one additional certificated employee to evaluate the
probationer and to aid the employee in improving his or her areas of
deficiency; such additional certificated employee shall be immune from any
civil liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed with regard to the
good faith performance of such evaluation. The probationer may be removed from
probation if he or she has demonstrated improvement to the satisfaction of the
principal in those areas specifically detailed in his or her initial notice of
deficiency and subsequently detailed in his or her improvement program. Lack
of necessary improvement during the established probationary period, as
specifically documented in writing with notification to the probationer and
shall constitute grounds for a finding of probable cause under RCW 28A.405.300
or 28A.405.210.

Immediately
following the completion of a probationary period that does not produce
performance changes detailed in the initial notice of deficiencies and
improvement program, the employee may be removed from his or her assignment and
placed into an alternative assignment for the remainder of the school year.
This reassignment may not displace another employee nor may it adversely affect
the probationary employee's compensation or benefits for the remainder of the
employee's contract year. If such reassignment is not possible, the district
may, at its option, place the employee on paid leave for the balance of the
contract term.

(2)
Every board of directors shall establish evaluative criteria and procedures for
all superintendents, principals, and other administrators. It shall be the
responsibility of the district superintendent or his or her designee to
evaluate all administrators. Such evaluation shall be based on the administrative
position job description. Such criteria, when applicable, shall include at
least the following categories: Knowledge of, experience in, and training in
recognizing good professional performance, capabilities and development; school
administration and management; school finance; professional preparation and
scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; interest in pupils,
employees, patrons and subjects taught in school; leadership; and ability and
performance of evaluation of school personnel.

(3)
Each certificated employee shall have the opportunity for confidential
conferences with his or her immediate supervisor on no less than two occasions
in each school year. Such confidential conference shall have as its sole
purpose the aiding of the administrator in his or her assessment of the
employee's professional performance.

(4)
The failure of any evaluator to evaluate or supervise or cause the evaluation
or supervision of certificated employees or administrators in accordance with
this section, as now or hereafter amended, when it is his or her specific
assigned or delegated responsibility to do so, shall be sufficient cause for
the nonrenewal of any such evaluator's contract under RCW 28A.405.210, or the
discharge of such evaluator under RCW 28A.405.300.

(5)
After an employee has four years of satisfactory evaluations under subsection
(1) of this section, a school district may use a short form of evaluation, a
locally bargained evaluation emphasizing professional growth, an evaluation
under subsection (1) of this section, or any combination thereof. The short
form of evaluation shall include either a thirty minute observation during the
school year with a written summary or a final annual written evaluation based
on the criteria in subsection (1) of this section and based on at least two
observation periods during the school year totaling at least sixty minutes
without a written summary of such observations being prepared. However, the
evaluation process set forth in subsection (1) of this section shall be
followed at least once every three years unless this time is extended by a
local school district under the bargaining process set forth in chapter 41.59
RCW. The employee or evaluator may require that the evaluation process set
forth in subsection (1) of this section be conducted in any given school year.
No evaluation other than the evaluation authorized under subsection (1) of this
section may be used as a basis for determining that an employee's work is
unsatisfactory under subsection (1) of this section or as probable cause for
the nonrenewal of an employee's contract under RCW 28A.405.210 unless an
evaluation process developed under chapter 41.59 RCW determines otherwise.

(6)
For schools offering the performance pay incentive plan in section 2 of this
act, the evaluator shall indicate on the employee's second annual evaluation
summary whether the employee has achieved exceptional status. Such status will
be defined by the employee's ability to have a positive impact on student
learning. As used in this section, "positive impact on student
learning" means that a teacher, through instruction and assessment, has
been able to document students' increased knowledge or demonstration of a skill
or skills related to the state goals and essential academic learning
requirements. School districts may define additional criteria that must be met
to achieve exceptional status.

Sec.
5. RCW
28A.415.010 and 1991 c 285 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It shall be the responsibility of each educational service district board to
establish a center for the improvement of teaching. The center shall
administer, coordinate, and act as fiscal agent for such programs related to
the recruitment and training of certificated and classified K‑12
education personnel as may be delegated to the center by the superintendent of
public instruction under RCW 28A.310.470, or the state board of education under
RCW 28A.310.480. To assist in these activities, each educational service district
board shall establish an improvement of teaching coordinating council to
include, at a minimum, representatives as specified in RCW 28A.415.040. An
existing in-service training task force, established pursuant to RCW
28A.415.040, may serve as the improvement of teaching coordinating council.
The educational service district board shall ensure coordination of programs
established pursuant to RCW 28A.415.030, 28A.410.060, and 28A.415.250.

(2)(a)
The educational service district board may arrange each year for the holding of
one or more teachers' institutes and/or workshops for professional staff
preparation and in-service training in such manner and at such time as the
board believes will be of benefit to the teachers and other professional staff
of school districts within the educational service district and shall comply
with rules and regulations of the state board of education pursuant to RCW
28A.410.060 or the superintendent of public instruction or state board of
education pursuant to RCW 28A.415.250. The board may provide such additional
means of teacher and other professional staff preparation and in-service
training as it may deem necessary or appropriate and there shall be a proper
charge against the educational service district general expense fund when
approved by the educational service district board.

(b)
Educational service district boards of contiguous educational service
districts, by mutual arrangements, may hold joint institutes and/or workshops,
the expenses to be shared in proportion to the numbers of certificated
personnel as shown by the last annual reports of the educational service
districts holding such joint institutes or workshops.

(3)
In local school districts employing more than one hundred teachers and other
professional staff, the school district superintendent may hold a teachers'
institute of one or more days in such district, said institute when so held by
the school district superintendent to be in all respects governed by the
provisions of this title and state board of education rules and regulations
relating to teachers' institutes held by educational service district
superintendents.

(4)
A school offering the performance pay incentive plan in section 2 of this act
may work in conjunction with its educational service district's center for the
improvement of teaching. The center for the improvement of teaching may help
the school identify where student learning could best be enhanced by teachers
gaining or having knowledge or skill in an area aligned with the mission and
learning improvement plan of the district as stated in the district's annual
performance report required by RCW 28A.655.110.

Sec.
6. RCW
28A.300.130 and 1999 c 388 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Expanding activity in educational research, educational restructuring, and
educational improvement initiatives has produced and continues to produce much
valuable information. The legislature finds that such information should be
shared with the citizens and educational community of the state as widely as
possible. To facilitate access to information and materials on educational
improvement and research, the superintendent of public instruction, to the
extent funds are appropriated, shall establish the center for the improvement
of student learning. The primary purpose of the center is to provide
assistance and advice to parents, school board members, educators, and the
public regarding strategies for assisting students in learning the essential
academic learning requirements pursuant to RCW ((28A.630.885)) 28A.655.060.
The center shall work in conjunction with the academic achievement and
accountability commission, educational service districts, institutions of
higher education, and education, parent, community, and business organizations.

(2)
The center, in conjunction with other staff in the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, shall:

(a)
Serve as a clearinghouse for the completed work and activities of the academic
achievement and accountability commission;

(b)
Serve as a clearinghouse for information regarding successful educational
improvement and parental involvement programs in schools and districts, and
information about efforts within institutions of higher education in the state
to support educational improvement initiatives in Washington schools and
districts;

(c)
Provide best practices research and advice that can be used to help schools
develop and implement: Programs and practices to improve instruction of the
essential academic learning requirements ((under section 701 of this act));
systems to analyze student assessment data, with an emphasis on systems that
will combine the use of state and local data to monitor the academic progress
of each and every student in the school district; comprehensive, school-wide
improvement plans; school-based shared decision-making models; programs to
promote lifelong learning and community involvement in education;
school-to-work transition programs; programs to meet the needs of highly
capable students; programs and practices to meet the diverse needs of students
based on gender, racial, ethnic, economic, and special needs status; research,
information, and technology systems; and other programs and practices that will
assist educators in helping students learn the essential academic learning
requirements;

(d)
Develop and distribute, in conjunction with the academic achievement and
accountability commission, parental involvement materials, including
instructional guides developed to inform parents of the essential academic
learning requirements. The instructional guides also shall contain actions
parents may take to assist their children in meeting the requirements, and
should focus on reaching parents who have not previously been involved with
their children's education;

(e)
Identify obstacles to greater parent and community involvement in school shared
decision-making processes and recommend strategies for helping parents and
community members to participate effectively in school shared decision-making
processes, including understanding and respecting the roles of school building
administrators and staff;

(f)
Develop and maintain an internet web site to increase the availability of
information, research, and other materials;

(g)
Take other actions to increase public awareness of the importance of parental
and community involvement in education;

(h)
Work with appropriate organizations to inform teachers, district and school
administrators, and school directors about the waivers available and the
broadened school board powers under RCW 28A.320.015;

(i)
Provide training and consultation services, including conducting regional
summer institutes;

(j)
Address methods for improving the success rates of certain ethnic and racial
student groups; and

(k)
Perform other functions consistent with the purpose of the center as prescribed
in subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
The superintendent of public instruction, after consultation with the academic
achievement and accountability commission, shall select and employ a director
for the center.

(4)
The superintendent may enter into contracts with individuals or organizations
including but not limited to: School districts; educational service districts;
educational organizations; teachers; higher education faculty; institutions of
higher education; state agencies; business or community-based organizations;
and other individuals and organizations to accomplish the duties and
responsibilities of the center. In carrying out the duties and responsibilities
of the center, the superintendent, whenever possible, shall use practitioners
to assist agency staff as well as assist educators and others in schools and
districts.

(5)
A school offering the performance pay incentive plan in section 2 of this act
may work in conjunction with the center for the improvement of student
learning. The center for the improvement of student learning may help the
school identify where student learning could best be enhanced by teachers
gaining or having knowledge or skill in an area aligned with the mission and
learning improvement plan of the district as stated in the district's annual
performance report required by RCW 28A.655.110. In addition, the center for
the improvement of student learning shall work with participating schools as a
clearinghouse for those schools that identify teachers participating in the
incentive plan who have found methods of improving student learning that can be
shared with other schools.

Sec.
7. RCW
41.32.010 and 1997 c 254 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the
context:

(1)(a)
"Accumulated contributions" for plan 1 members, means the sum of all
regular annuity contributions and, except for the purpose of withdrawal at the
time of retirement, any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2) with regular
interest thereon.

(b)
"Accumulated contributions" for plan 2 members, means the sum of all
contributions standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual
account, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the
regular interest thereon.

(2)
"Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed
upon the basis of such mortality tables and regulations as shall be adopted by
the director and regular interest.

(3)
"Annuity" means the moneys payable per year during life by reason of
accumulated contributions of a member.

(4)
"Member reserve" means the fund in which all of the accumulated
contributions of members are held.

(5)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(6)
"Contract" means any agreement for service and compensation between a
member and an employer.

(7)
"Creditable service" means membership service plus prior service for
which credit is allowable. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(8)
"Dependent" means receiving one‑half or more of support from a
member.

(9)
"Disability allowance" means monthly payments during disability.
This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(10)(a)
"Earnable compensation" for plan 1 members, means:

(i)
All salaries and wages paid by an employer to an employee member of the
retirement system for personal services rendered during a fiscal year. In all
cases where compensation includes maintenance the employer shall fix the value
of that part of the compensation not paid in money.

(ii)
"Earnable compensation" for plan 1 members also includes the
following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(A)
Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the
employee in a position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of
reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of
the salary or wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll
period shall be considered earnable compensation and the individual shall receive
the equivalent service credit.

(B)
If a leave of absence, without pay, is taken by a member for the purpose of
serving as a member of the state legislature, and such member has served in the
legislature five or more years, the salary which would have been received for
the position from which the leave of absence was taken shall be considered as
compensation earnable if the employee's contribution thereon is paid by the
employee. In addition, where a member has been a member of the state
legislature for five or more years, earnable compensation for the member's two
highest compensated consecutive years of service shall include a sum not to
exceed thirty‑six hundred dollars for each of such two consecutive years,
regardless of whether or not legislative service was rendered during those two
years.

(iii)
For members employed less than full time under written contract with a school
district, or community college district, in an instructional position, for
which the member receives service credit of less than one year in all of the
years used to determine the earnable compensation used for computing benefits
due under RCW 41.32.497, 41.32.498, and 41.32.520, the member may elect to have
earnable compensation defined as provided in RCW 41.32.345. For the purposes
of this subsection, the term "instructional position" means a
position in which more than seventy‑five percent of the member's time is
spent as a classroom instructor (including office hours), a librarian, or a
counselor. Earnable compensation shall be so defined only for the purpose of
the calculation of retirement benefits and only as necessary to insure that
members who receive fractional service credit under RCW 41.32.270 receive
benefits proportional to those received by members who have received full‑time
service credit.

(iv)
"Earnable compensation" does not include:

(A)
Remuneration for unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210,
or 28A.310.490;

(B)
Remuneration for unused annual leave in excess of thirty days as authorized by
RCW 43.01.044 and 43.01.041;

(C)
Performance pay incentives awarded under section 2 of this act.

(b)
"Earnable compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means salaries
or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services, including
overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under
provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the
United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude performance pay
incentives under section 2 of this act, lump sum payments for deferred
annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual
leave, or any form of severance pay.

"Earnable
compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes the following
actual or imputed payments which, except in the case of (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection, are not paid for personal services:

(i)
Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the
employee in a position or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of
reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of
the salary or wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll
period shall be considered earnable compensation, to the extent provided above,
and the individual shall receive the equivalent service credit.

(ii)
In any year in which a member serves in the legislature the member shall have
the option of having such member's earnable compensation be the greater of:

(A)
The earnable compensation the member would have received had such member not
served in the legislature; or

(B)
Such member's actual earnable compensation received for teaching and
legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement
system required because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this
subsection is greater than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer
contributions.

(11)
"Employer" means the state of Washington, the school district, or any
agency of the state of Washington by which the member is paid.

(12)
"Fiscal year" means a year which begins July 1st and ends June 30th
of the following year.

(13)
"Former state fund" means the state retirement fund in operation for
teachers under chapter 187, Laws of 1923, as amended.

(14)
"Local fund" means any of the local retirement funds for teachers
operated in any school district in accordance with the provisions of chapter
163, Laws of 1917 as amended.

(15)
"Member" means any teacher included in the membership of the
retirement system. Also, any other employee of the public schools who, on July
1, 1947, had not elected to be exempt from membership and who, prior to that
date, had by an authorized payroll deduction, contributed to the member
reserve.

(16)
"Membership service" means service rendered subsequent to the first
day of eligibility of a person to membership in the retirement system:
PROVIDED, That where a member is employed by two or more employers the
individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during any
calendar month in which multiple service is rendered. The provisions of this
subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(17)
"Pension" means the moneys payable per year during life from the
pension reserve.

(18)
"Pension reserve" is a fund in which shall be accumulated an
actuarial reserve adequate to meet present and future pension liabilities of
the system and from which all pension obligations are to be paid.

(19)
"Prior service" means service rendered prior to the first date of
eligibility to membership in the retirement system for which credit is
allowable. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to plan 1
members.

(20)
"Prior service contributions" means contributions made by a member to
secure credit for prior service. The provisions of this subsection shall apply
only to plan 1 members.

(21)
"Public school" means any institution or activity operated by the
state of Washington or any instrumentality or political subdivision thereof
employing teachers, except the University of Washington and Washington State
University.

(22)
"Regular contributions" means the amounts required to be deducted
from the compensation of a member and credited to the member's individual
account in the member reserve. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1
members.

(23)
"Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(24)(a)
"Retirement allowance" for plan 1 members, means monthly payments
based on the sum of annuity and pension, or any optional benefits payable in
lieu thereof.

(b)
"Retirement allowance" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means monthly
payments to a retiree or beneficiary as provided in this chapter.

(25)
"Retirement system" means the Washington state teachers' retirement
system.

(26)(a)
"Service" for plan 1 members means the time during which a member has
been employed by an employer for compensation.

(i)
If a member is employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive
no more than one service credit month during any calendar month in which
multiple service is rendered.

(ii)
As authorized by RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be
creditable as service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to
retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(iii)
As authorized in RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement
system that covers teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the
purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(b)
"Service" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of employment
by a member for one or more employers for which earnable compensation is earned
subject to the following conditions:

(i)
A member employed in an eligible position or as a substitute shall receive one
service credit month for each month of September through August of the
following year if he or she earns earnable compensation for eight hundred ten
or more hours during that period and is employed during nine of those months,
except that a member may not receive credit for any period prior to the
member's employment in an eligible position except as provided in RCW 41.32.812
and 41.50.132;

(ii)
If a member is employed either in an eligible position or as a substitute
teacher for nine months of the twelve month period between September through
August of the following year but earns earnable compensation for less than
eight hundred ten hours but for at least six hundred thirty hours, he or she
will receive one‑half of a service credit month for each month of the
twelve month period;

(iii)
All other members in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher shall
receive service credit as follows:

(A)
A service credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable
compensation is earned for ninety or more hours;

(B)
A half-service credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable
compensation is earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours;
and

(C)
A quarter-service credit month is earned in those calendar months where
earnable compensation is earned for less than seventy hours.

(iv)
Any person who is a member of the teachers' retirement system and who is
elected or appointed to a state elective position may continue to be a member
of the retirement system and continue to receive a service credit month for
each of the months in a state elective position by making the required member
contributions.

(v)
When an individual is employed by two or more employers the individual shall
only receive one month's service credit during any calendar month in which
multiple service for ninety or more hours is rendered.

(vi)
As authorized by RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be
creditable as service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to
retire under RCW 41.32.470. For purposes of plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five
days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months.
Use of less than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under
this subsection as follows:

(A)
Less than eleven days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B)
Eleven or more days but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service
credit month;

(C)
Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;

(D)
More than twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and
one-quarter service credit month;

(E)
Thirty-three or more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half
service credit month.

(vii)
As authorized in RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement
system that covers teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the
purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(viii)
The department shall adopt rules implementing this subsection.

(27)
"Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service
credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(28)
"Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an
accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(29)
"Teacher" means any person qualified to teach who is engaged by a
public school in an instructional, administrative, or supervisory capacity.
The term includes state, educational service district, and school district
superintendents and their assistants and all employees certificated by the
superintendent of public instruction; and in addition thereto any full time
school doctor who is employed by a public school and renders service of an
instructional or educational nature.

(30)
"Average final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means the
member's average earnable compensation of the highest consecutive sixty service
credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods
constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of
average final compensation except under RCW 41.32.810(2).

(31)
"Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer while a member.

(32)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(33)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(34)
"State elective position" means any position held by any person
elected or appointed to state‑wide office or elected or appointed as a
member of the legislature.

(35)
"State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(36)
"Substitute teacher" means:

(a)
A teacher who is hired by an employer to work as a temporary teacher, except
for teachers who are annual contract employees of an employer and are
guaranteed a minimum number of hours; or

(b)
Teachers who either (i) work in ineligible positions for more than one employer
or (ii) work in an ineligible position or positions together with an eligible
position.

(37)(a)
"Eligible position" for plan 2 members from June 7, 1990, through
September 1, 1991, means a position which normally requires two or more uninterrupted
months of creditable service during September through August of the following
year.

(b)
"Eligible position" for plan 2 and plan 3 on and after September 1,
1991, means a position that, as defined by the employer, normally requires five
or more months of at least seventy hours of earnable compensation during
September through August of the following year.

(c)
For purposes of this chapter an employer shall not define "position"
in such a manner that an employee's monthly work for that employer is divided
into more than one position.

(d)
The elected position of the superintendent of public instruction is an eligible
position.

(38)
"Plan 1" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 1 providing the
benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of
the system prior to October 1, 1977.

(39)
"Plan 2" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 2 providing the
benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of
the system on and after October 1, 1977, and prior to July 1, 1996.

(40)
"Plan 3" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 3 providing the
benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first become members of
the system on and after July 1, 1996, or who transfer under RCW 41.32.817.

(41)
"Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average
consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and
clerical workers, all items compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United
States department of labor.

(42)
"Index A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of
a postretirement adjustment.

(43)
"Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(44)
"Index year" means the earliest calendar year in which the index is
more than sixty percent of index A.

(45)
"Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(46)
"Annual increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month per
year of service which amount shall be increased each July 1st by three percent,
rounded to the nearest cent.

(47)
"Member account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan
3 means the sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in
the defined contribution portion of plan 3.

(48)
"Separation from service or employment" occurs when a person has
terminated all employment with an employer.

(49)
"Employed" or "employee" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the
employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department
shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
By December 1, 2002, the Washington institute for public policy shall provide
an interim report to appropriate committees of the legislature on the impact of
the performance pay incentive plan in section 2 of this act.

(2) By December 1, 2003, the Washington institute for public policy
shall provide a final report to appropriate committees of the legislature on
the impact of the performance pay incentive plan in section 2 of this act.

---
END ---