BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.61.770 and 1982 c 55 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every person operating a bicycle upon a roadway at a rate of speed less than
the normal flow of traffic at the particular time and place shall ride as near
to the right side of the right through lane as is safe except as may be
appropriate while preparing to make or while making turning movements, or while
overtaking and passing another bicycle or vehicle proceeding in the same
direction. A person operating a bicycle upon a roadway or highway other than a
limited-access highway, which roadway or highway carries traffic in one
direction only and has two or more marked traffic lanes, may ride as near to
the left side of the left through lane as is safe. A person operating a
bicycle upon a roadway ((may)) shall use the shoulder of the
roadway or any specially designated bicycle lane if such exists.

(2) Persons riding bicycles upon a roadway shall not ride ((more
than)) two or more abreast except on paths or parts of roadways set
aside for the exclusive use of bicycles.

---
END ---