BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 79.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that contaminated sediments are widespread in Puget
Sound. As of the effective date of this act, at least sixty sites have been
identified as needing remedial action under the comprehensive environmental
response, compensation, and liability act of 1980 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq.)
and the model toxics control act, chapter 70.105D RCW. Many of the sites
needing remedial action are located on state-owned aquatic lands. The purpose
of this act is to clarify the responsibilities of the department of natural
resources and the department of ecology with respect to the cleanup of
contaminated sediments on state-owned aquatic lands and the possibility of
using state-owned aquatic lands as part of appropriate sediment remedial
actions consistent with existing state and federal laws.

(2)
The legislature finds that the purpose of cleaning up contaminated sediments is
to isolate contaminants from living organisms in the marine environment. As
such, cleanup is beneficial to the citizens of the state of Washington.
Conversely, delay of cleanup is harmful for biological resources, as well as
for port districts and local communities that depend on a revitalized
waterfront. Attempts to clean up contaminated sediments have resulted in
interagency debates about whether it is permissible to use state-owned aquatic
lands for sediment remedial actions. Processes to resolve this issue,
including a pilot bay-wide planning project and meetings of agency directors,
have kept the parties out of court but have not successfully resolved the
fundamental issues. These issues have been defined as concern over the
toxicity of the sediments, the permanence of contaminated sediment remediation
on state-owned aquatic lands, and determination of the true and complete costs
of sediment remedial actions that use state-owned aquatic lands. These are
challenging issues. Yet, the legislature believes enough time has passed
without resolving these issues and without remediating contaminated sediments,
that it must now assume responsibility for defining state policy on the use of
state-owned aquatic lands for contaminated sediment remediation, and for
addressing the other unresolved issues related to toxicity and costs of
cleanup.

(3)
The legislature also believes that the current system for addressing liability
and for allocating cleanup costs established under the state and federal
cleanup statutes is not an appropriate one for resolving interagency disputes
within state government. The legislature defines the responsibilities of state
agencies and must, when necessary, examine those responsibilities to resolve
conflicting mandates and to better meet the needs of the state. Through the
creation of a joint select committee on contaminated sediment management and
liability, the legislature intends to address these responsibilities and
related issues, including, but not limited to: The appropriateness of using
state-owned aquatic lands for remediation of contaminated sediments; the
liability for any remedial action on state-owned aquatic lands; the
distribution of responsibility for prospective liability among the parties
expecting to use state-owned aquatic lands for remediation; the availability of
treatment alternatives for contaminated sediments; the management of, and fair
market value for, any disposal sites on state lands; as well as the resolution
of the state's liability for causing or contributing to the creation of
contaminated sediments. In doing so, the legislature does not intend to impede
ongoing remedial actions.

(4)
The legislature finds that it is in the state's interest to undertake a program
of bay-wide planning where appropriate to provide opportunities for examining
the feasibility of sediment removal or consolidating most or all of the
contaminated sediments in an urban embayment in limited appropriate locations
within that embayment or within other more environmentally appropriate
locations in Puget Sound. The legislature also finds that bay-wide planning
should address needs for salmon recovery, public access to state-owned aquatic
lands, and economic development.

Sec.
2. RCW
79.90.465 and 1984 c 221 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout chapters 79.90 through 79.96 RCW.

(1)
"Water-dependent use" means a use which cannot logically exist in any
location but on the water. Examples include, but are not limited to,
water-borne commerce; terminal and transfer facilities; ferry terminals;
watercraft sales in conjunction with other water-dependent uses; watercraft
construction, repair, and maintenance; moorage and launching facilities;
aquaculture; log booming; habitat mitigation and restoration; and public
fishing piers and parks.

(2)
"Water-oriented use" means a use which historically has been
dependent on a waterfront location, but with existing technology could be
located away from the waterfront. Examples include, but are not limited to,
wood products manufacturing, watercraft sales, fish processing, petroleum
refining, sand and gravel processing, log storage, and house boats. For the
purposes of determining rent under this chapter, water-oriented uses shall be
classified as water-dependent uses if the activity either is conducted on
state-owned aquatic lands leased on October 1, 1984, or was actually conducted
on the state-owned aquatic lands for at least three years before October 1,
1984. If, after October 1, 1984, the activity is changed to a use other than a
water-dependent use, the activity shall be classified as a nonwater-dependent
use. If continuation of the existing use requires leasing additional
state-owned aquatic lands and is permitted under the shoreline management act
of 1971, chapter 90.58 RCW, the department may allow reasonable expansion of
the water-oriented use.

(3)
"Nonwater-dependent use" means a use which can operate in a location
other than on the waterfront. Examples include, but are not limited to,
hotels, condominiums, apartments, restaurants, retail stores, ((and))
warehouses not part of a marine terminal or transfer facility, and disposal
of contaminated sediments on state-owned aquatic lands except if such disposal
is also used to remediate preexisting on-site sediment contamination.

(4)
"Log storage" means the water storage of logs in rafts or otherwise
prepared for shipment in water-borne commerce, but does not include the
temporary holding of logs to be taken directly into a vessel or processing
facility.

(5)
"Log booming" means placing logs into and taking them out of the
water, assembling and disassembling log rafts before or after their movement in
water-borne commerce, related handling and sorting activities taking place in
the water, and the temporary holding of logs to be taken directly into a
processing facility. "Log booming" does not include the temporary
holding of logs to be taken directly into a vessel.

(6)
"Department" means the department of natural resources.

(7)
"Port district" means a port district created under Title 53 RCW.

(8)
The "real rate of return" means the average for the most recent ten
calendar years of the average rate of return on conventional real property
mortgages as reported by the federal home loan bank board or any successor
agency, minus the average inflation rate for the most recent ten calendar
years.

(9)
The "inflation rate" for a given year is the percentage rate of
change in the previous calendar year's all commodity producer price index of
the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of commerce. If
the index ceases to be published, the department shall designate by rule a
comparable substitute index.

(10)
"Public utility lines" means pipes, conduits, and similar facilities
for distribution of water, electricity, natural gas, telephone, other
electronic communication, and sewers, including sewer outfall lines.

(11)
"Terminal" means a point of interchange between land and water
carriers, such as a pier, wharf, or group of such, equipped with facilities for
care and handling of cargo and/or passengers.

(12)
"State-owned aquatic lands" means those aquatic lands and waterways
administered by the department of natural resources or managed under RCW
79.90.475 by a port district. "State-owned aquatic lands" does not
include aquatic lands owned in fee by, or withdrawn for the use of, state
agencies other than the department of natural resources.

(13)
"Bay-wide plan" means a multijurisdictional plan developed for the
aquatic lands of the state that includes the following elements:

(a)
Cleanup of contaminated sediments;

(b)
Restoration of estuary and salmon migration habitat;

(c)
The highest achievable control of ongoing sources of point and nonpoint sources
of pollutants to marine waters; and

(d)
Identification of existing and projected aquatic land uses, including
development of public access to the waterfront. Any such plan shall be
integrated with comprehensive plans under the growth management act, chapter
36.70A RCW; local master programs under the shoreline management act, chapter 90.58
RCW; and watershed plans under chapter 90.82 RCW.

(14)
"In-water disposal" means one of three methods for remediating
contaminated sediments:

(a)
Confined aquatic disposal is the dredging and disposal of contaminated
sediments in natural or excavated bottom depressions or behind berms to
minimize the spread of materials on the bottom. A variation of this method is
the dredging and disposal of contaminated material in a mound on an existing
flat or gently sloping surface. Both methods require capping of the dredged
material with clean sediments.

(b)
Nearshore confined disposal is the dredging and disposal of contaminated
sediments at a site constructed partially or completely in water adjacent to
shore, where the dredged material is contained by a dike or berm and capped
with clean sediment.

(c)
Containment of contaminated sediments by covering or capping them with clean
sediments of a sufficient thickness to isolate the contaminants from the
environment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 79.90 RCW to read as follows:

For
remedial actions initiated under state and federal cleanup authorities after
the effective date of this act, the department shall allow the use of
state-owned aquatic lands for the cleanup of contaminated sediments, or as
mitigation for the impacts of cleanup or disposal actions on aquatic habitat,
when all of the following apply:

(1)
A bay-wide plan has been completed as provided in section 4 of this act, and
such plan identifies in-water disposal on state-owned aquatic lands as the
preferred option available among a reasonable range of remedial actions. The
plan shall clearly identify the most environmentally protective remedial option
regardless of cost, and shall provide sufficient rationale and documentation in
the plan to support this finding. The plan shall also identify the most
cost-effective remedial option, and shall provide sufficient rationale and
documentation in the plan to support this finding. Any balancing of these two
factors done in developing the preferred option shall also be clearly
described.

(2)
The area to be used for disposal or mitigation is itself a site needing
remediation under state and federal cleanup statutes, or the area to be used
for disposal is a multiuser disposal site developed for the purpose of
accepting large volumes of contaminated sediments from multiple sites in Puget
Sound.

(3)
Financial assurances have been established to receive funds to address in
perpetuity any and all risks to the state from the contingencies identified in
the plan under subsection (1) of this section.

(4)
The state is indemnified from future liability to the fullest extent allowed by
law for contaminated sediments disposed of on state-owned aquatic land that are
not attached to the original liability of the state as established in a consent
decree under state or federal cleanup authorities, except for sediments for
which no responsible person has been identified in the consent decree.

(5)
Constitutionally protected uses of harbor areas for commerce and navigation are
not impaired.

(6)
Bay-wide plans shall include the elements defined in RCW 79.90.465(13) and
shall be initiated in urban embayments or in smaller bays and inlets where
remedial actions for contaminated sediment sites identified under state or
federal clean-up authorities have not been initiated as of the effective date
of this act.

(7)
A bay-wide planning group for an urban embayment shall include the following
representation: The department of ecology, the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of natural resources, the department of
transportation, the Puget Sound water quality action team, the local port
district, the nearest city, and the county in which the embayment is located.
In addition, affected tribes shall each be invited to provide a representative,
and the United States army corps of engineers, environmental protection agency,
fish and wildlife service, and national marine fisheries service also shall
each be invited to provide a representative. Each member shall have an equal
voice in the planning process and the group shall operate by consensus. If
consensus on planning outcomes is not achievable, state agencies shall resolve
the issues needing resolution through the process identified in RCW 43.17.320
through 43.17.340. The planning process shall be managed by a committee
comprised of the representatives of the department of ecology, the department
of natural resources, and the local port district.

(8)
The bay-wide planning process includes timely and meaningful opportunity for
public involvement, including public meetings and a citizen advisory panel.

(9)
Funding for plan development shall be from the local toxics control account
established in RCW 70.105D.070.

(10)
This section expires June 30, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
joint select committee on contaminated sediment management and liability is
established. The committee shall include two representatives from each of the
two major caucuses in the senate, appointed by the president of the senate, and
two representatives from each of the two major caucuses in the house of
representatives appointed by the co-speakers of the house of representatives.
The committee shall also include a representative from each of the following:
The attorney general's office, the governor's office, the department of
ecology, the department of natural resources, the department of transportation,
the department of fish and wildlife, and the Puget Sound action team.

(2)
The purpose of the joint select committee on contaminated sediment management
and liability is to address the following issues:

(a)
The appropriateness of using state-owned aquatic land for the remediation of
contaminated sediments;

(b)
The availability and feasibility of treatment for contaminated sediments;

(c)
The financial risk to the state associated with disposal of contaminated
sediments and how much funding should be available in a contingency fund to
offset this risk;

(d)
How contaminated sediment disposal sites on state-owned aquatic land should be
managed;

(e)
How the state's share of liability for contaminated sediments should be
determined;

(f)
The fair market return to the state for the use of state-owned aquatic land for
disposal of contaminated sediment, when such disposal occurs on already
contaminated land;

(g)
The sources of funding and financial mechanisms that are available to fund the
state's share of cleanup, the management of sediment remediation sites, and
contingency funding.

(3)
Staff support for the joint select committee on contaminated sediment
management and liability shall be provided by the office of program research
and senate committee services.

(4)
The committee shall provide a final report to the standing environment
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December 1, 2001.
The committee shall provide an interim progress report to the committees by
December 1, 2000.

(5) This section expires June 30, 2002.

---
END ---