BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.08.120 and 1973 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state treasurer may appoint an assistant state treasurer, who shall have the
power to perform any act or duty which may be performed by the state treasurer,
and in case of a vacancy in the office of state treasurer, perform the duties
of the office until the vacancy is filled as provided by law.

The
state treasurer may appoint no more than three deputy state treasurers, who
shall have the power to perform any act or duty which may be performed by the
state treasurer.

The
assistant state treasurer and the deputy state treasurers shall be exempt from
the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW and shall hold office at the pleasure of
the state treasurer; they shall, before entering upon the duties of their
office, take and subscribe, and file with the secretary of state, the oath of
office provided by law for other state officers.

The
state treasurer shall be responsible on his official bond for all official acts
of the assistant state treasurer and the deputy state treasurers.

The state treasurer may appoint personnel as necessary to carry
out the duties of the office of the state treasurer. These individuals serve
at the pleasure of the state treasurer and are exempt from the provisions of
chapter 41.06 RCW as stated in RCW 41.06.070 (1)(x) and (3).

---
END ---