BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.225.330 and 1999 c 198 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When enrolling a student who has attended school in another school district,
the school enrolling the student may request the parent and the student to
briefly indicate in writing whether or not the student has:

(a)
Any history of placement in special educational programs;

(b)
Any past, current, or pending disciplinary action;

(c)
Any history of violent behavior, or behavior listed in RCW 13.04.155;

(d)
Any unpaid fines or fees imposed by other schools; and

(e)
Any health conditions affecting the student's educational needs.

(2)
The school enrolling the student shall request the school the student
previously attended to send the student's permanent record including records of
disciplinary action, history of violent behavior or behavior listed in RCW
13.04.155, attendance, immunization records, and academic performance. If the
student has not paid a fine or fee under RCW 28A.635.060, or tuition, fees, or
fines at approved private schools the school may withhold the student's
official transcript, but shall transmit information about the student's
academic performance, special placement, immunization records, records of
disciplinary action, and history of violent behavior or behavior listed in RCW
13.04.155. If the official transcript is not sent due to unpaid tuition, fees,
or fines, the enrolling school shall notify both the student and parent or
guardian that the official transcript will not be sent until the obligation is
met, and failure to have an official transcript may result in exclusion from
extracurricular activities or failure to graduate.

(3)
If information is requested under subsection (2) of this section, the
information shall be transmitted within two school days after receiving the
request and the records shall be sent as soon as possible. Any school district
or district employee who releases the information in compliance with this
section is immune from civil liability for damages unless it is shown that the
school district employee acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The
state board of education shall provide by rule for the discipline under chapter
28A.410 RCW of a school principal or other chief administrator of a public
school building who fails to make a good faith effort to assure compliance with
this subsection.

(4)
Any school district or district employee who releases the information in
compliance with federal and state law is immune from civil liability for
damages unless it is shown that the school district or district employee acted
with gross negligence or in bad faith.

(5)
When a school receives information under this section or RCW 13.40.215 that a
student has a history of disciplinary actions, criminal or violent behavior, or
other behavior that indicates the student could be a threat to the safety of
educational staff or other students, the school shall provide this information
to ((the student's teachers and security)) all school personnel.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.04.155 and 1997 c 266 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a minor enrolled in any common school is convicted in adult criminal
court, or adjudicated or entered into a diversion agreement with the juvenile
court on any of the following offenses, the court must notify the principal of
the student's school of the disposition of the case, after first notifying the
parent or legal guardian that such notification will be made:

(a)
A violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b)
A sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(c)
Inhaling toxic fumes under chapter 9.47A RCW;

(d)
A controlled substances violation under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(e)
A liquor violation under RCW 66.44.270; and

(f)
Any crime under chapters 9.41, 9A.36, 9A.40, 9A.46, and 9A.48 RCW.

(2)
The principal must provide the information received under subsection (1) of
this section to ((every teacher of any student who qualifies under
subsection (1) of this section and any other personnel who, in the judgment of
the principal, supervises the student or for security purposes should be aware
of the student's record)) all school personnel. The principal must
provide the information to ((teachers and other)) all school
personnel based on any written records that the principal maintains or receives
from a juvenile court administrator or a law enforcement agency regarding the
student.

(3)
Any information received by a principal or school personnel under this section
is confidential and may not be further disseminated except as provided in RCW
28A.225.330, other statutes or case law, and the family and educational and
privacy rights act of 1994, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g et seq.

(4)
Any school district or district employee who releases the information in
compliance with this section is immune from civil liability for damages unless
it is shown that the school district or district employee acted with gross
negligence or in bad faith.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Schools shall maintain a list of students who have been convicted of any
offense described in RCW 13.04.155(1) and shall make the list available to
parents of other children in the school or parents of children who will be
entering the school, upon the request of the parents.

(2) Any school district or district employee, who releases the
information in compliance with this section, is immune from civil liability for
damages unless it is shown that the school district or district employee acted
with gross negligence or in bad faith.

---
END ---