BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that good teachers are the foundation of the state's
education system. These educators are central to assuring excellence and rigor
in the educational experience of every student. The legislature also finds
that the state has many experienced and exemplary teachers who could help
enrich the teaching experiences of other teachers in their buildings, including
beginning teachers. The legislature further finds that the state lacks a
career advancement structure that provides substantially enhanced compensation
packages for outstanding teachers who continue classroom teaching while they
act as instructional leaders for their buildings. The legislature intends to
create a pilot program designed to keep lead teachers working directly with
students in the classroom while they are providing instructional leadership and
mentoring for other teachers in their buildings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
teacher instructional leadership pilot program is established. The purposes of
the program are to:

(1)
Provide exemplary teachers with career advancement opportunities to serve as
lead teachers while they remain in their own classrooms part time working
directly with students;

(2)
Provide an opportunity for experienced and exemplary teachers to help and
mentor new teachers and other teachers in the building;

(3)
Help beginning teachers work toward mastery of state-defined knowledge and
skill standards for effective teaching;

(4)
Advance school or district student learning objectives;

(5)
Create collaborative lead teacher selection processes that will permit lead
teachers to be effective instructional resources for other educators in their
buildings; and

(6)
Help the state design a career advancement program for educators that
effectively uses and compensates the instructional skills and knowledge of lead
teachers, good teachers, beginning teachers, and other educators.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The teacher instructional leadership pilot program shall be administered by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office shall design
and administer the program with the assistance of an advisory committee that
shall include, but need not be limited to teachers, administrators, school
directors, parents, and representatives of higher education and business and
labor organizations.

(2)
The program shall include, but need not be limited to the following components:

(a)
Lead teachers shall be assigned to teach in their own classrooms part time and
act as instructional leaders and mentors for other teachers in the building
part time;

(b)
Lead teachers should have substantially enhanced compensation levels;

(c)
Lead teachers should be selected through processes that have the support of
parents, teachers, principals, building staff, school directors, and members of
the community;

(d)
One lead teacher may be selected for approximately every two hundred fifty
students;

(e)
With very limited exceptions, lead teachers are not expected to assume building
level administrative duties; and

(f)
Lead teachers will be expected to work beyond the districts' contracted days
for certificated personnel.

(3)
The teacher instructional leadership pilot program established in this act is
not a part of basic education. Stipends paid to lead teachers for their
instructional leadership duties shall be provided through supplemental
contracts and are not basic education program salaries under RCW 28A.400.200.

(4)
If the legislature revokes any benefits granted under this section, no affected
employee is entitled to receive such benefits as a matter of contractual right.

(5)
The selection criteria for lead teachers shall include, but need not be limited
to:

(a)
The ability to demonstrate exemplary skills and knowledge about effective
instructional and classroom management practices, the implementation and
interpretation of student assessment strategies, and planning and instruction
aligned with the essential academic learning requirements;

(b)
Training and experience as a coach and mentor;

(c)
Outstanding communication skills; and

(d)
A commitment to the purposes of the program.

(6)
At least annually, the office shall provide or fund training specifically
designed to train and support lead teachers.

(7)
Participation in the pilot program shall have the demonstrated support of, at a
minimum, the school's board of directors, superintendent, principal, and
teachers.

(8)
Participating lead teachers, beginning teachers, cooperating teachers, school
administrators, and others involved in the pilot program shall annually
evaluate the effectiveness of the program and share with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction information on the role of lead teachers
in the school, any results from the program, and any recommendations for
program improvements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
duties of lead teachers should include, but need not be limited to:

(1)
Observing and providing feedback to other teachers in the building;

(2)
Conducting demonstration classes;

(3)
Working with teachers to develop specific knowledge and skills that improve
student learning;

(4)
Working with teachers to measure and analyze improvements in student learning;

(5)
Assisting other mentors, beginning teachers, and cooperating teachers;

(6)
Working with other teachers in the building on school and district student
learning objectives;

(7)
Working with teachers to formulate clear plans with specific benchmarks and
improvement indicators over time for the improvement of knowledge and skills.
The knowledge and skills should be based on state-wide standards for effective
teaching practices; and

(8)
Instructing students part time.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
By May 31, 2000, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide to interested school districts a preliminary program design including a
process for the selection of pilot schools for the 2000-01 school year. The
program design shall incorporate, at a minimum, the provisions of sections 2
and 3 of this act, and any additional requirements contained in this section or
any act containing an appropriation for the program.

(2)
By August 1, 2000, to the extent that funding is provided through appropriation
for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, with
the assistance of the advisory committee created in section 3 of this act, and
subject to the following conditions, shall select pilot schools for the 2000-01
school year.

(a)
The process used to select pilot schools shall be reviewed in advance by the
advisory committee.

(b)
Each participating school may select a maximum of two lead teachers.

(c)
The pilot schools shall be geographically and demographically varied, and until
the 2003-04 school year, shall be elementary only.

(d)
Lead teachers shall be appointed for approximately an eleven-month to one-year
period.

(e)
Lead teachers shall receive the full-time salary to which they would normally
be entitled as certificated teachers plus an additional stipend of ten thousand
dollars.

(f)
Pilot schools shall have total flexibility in the way release time is provided
for their lead teachers.

(3)
By September 30, 2000, pilot schools shall select their lead teachers for the
2000-01 school year and commence the program.

(4)
By December 1, 2000, the office shall provide to the governor and appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the legislature a preliminary report on the
program. The report shall include an estimate of the number of schools that
wish to participate during the 2001-03 biennium, the approximate cost of
funding participation of interested schools, and any preliminary
recommendations for program improvements. The report may include estimates of
the cost of phasing additional participation in the program.

(5)
By November 30, 2001, the office shall provide to the governor and appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the legislature a report on the program with
findings and recommendations based on the

experience
of the first year of the pilots. The office shall require participating
schools to collect information in a uniform manner in order to evaluate the
effectiveness of the pilots. The report shall address questions that include
but need not be limited to:

(a)
What models were used for selection and deployment of lead teachers and what
lessons were learned about maximizing the effectiveness of the models selected,
including release time, the most appropriate selection processes, and
appropriate workloads for lead teachers?

(b)
What roles and responsibilities of lead teachers had the most effect on
improving student learning? What additional research and pilot testing is
needed to determine that effect?

(c)
What are the benefits and costs of having a lead teacher available at the
building level compared to having such resources deployed from the district
level? Which of the two organizational models is more effective for improving
student learning and under what circumstances is the model selected most
effective?

(d)
What did you learn at the elementary level about the issues of training,
assignment, selection, roles, and responsibilities that must be addressed in
order for lead teachers to be effective in middle schools and high schools?

(e)
What are the issues that must be addressed to make lead teaching assignments
viable career paths for exemplary teachers across the state?

(f)
Would participating school districts continue the program if funding is not an
issue? What data supports the decision? To what extent did districts
contribute resources to the pilot to augment the funds provided through the
program?

(6)
By December 1, 2006, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall provide to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees
of the house of representatives and the senate a final report on the teacher
instructional leadership pilot program. The report shall include an analysis
of the effectiveness of the program for improving both student learning and the
teaching experiences of teachers in pilot schools. The report shall also
include one or more possible designs for articulated, educator career
advancement programs that create opportunities for and recognize the skills and
contributions of all classroom educators, including paraprofessionals, beginning
teachers, good teachers, and lead teachers. At least one of the designs shall
include a model in which lead teachers need not be selected from certificated
staff already assigned to a particular school or building. Instead, teachers
may apply to become lead teachers in another school or school district. The
report shall also include the findings and recommendations of the office and of
the advisory committee for continuation, modification, or elimination of the
program.

Sec.
6. RCW
41.32.010 and 1997 c 254 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the
context:

(1)(a)
"Accumulated contributions" for plan 1 members, means the sum of all
regular annuity contributions and, except for the purpose of withdrawal at the
time of retirement, any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2) with regular
interest thereon.

(b)
"Accumulated contributions" for plan 2 members, means the sum of all
contributions standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual
account, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the
regular interest thereon.

(2)
"Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed
upon the basis of such mortality tables and regulations as shall be adopted by
the director and regular interest.

(3)
"Annuity" means the moneys payable per year during life by reason of
accumulated contributions of a member.

(4)
"Member reserve" means the fund in which all of the accumulated
contributions of members are held.

(5)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person in
receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(6)
"Contract" means any agreement for service and compensation between a
member and an employer.

(7)
"Creditable service" means membership service plus prior service for
which credit is allowable. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(8)
"Dependent" means receiving one‑half or more of support from a
member.

(9)
"Disability allowance" means monthly payments during disability.
This subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(10)(a)
"Earnable compensation" for plan 1 members, means:

(i)
All salaries and wages paid by an employer to an employee member of the
retirement system for personal services rendered during a fiscal year. In all
cases where compensation includes maintenance the employer shall fix the value
of that part of the compensation not paid in money.

(ii)
"Earnable compensation" for plan 1 members also includes the following
actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(A)
Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the
employee in a position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of
reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of
the salary or wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll
period shall be considered earnable compensation and the individual shall
receive the equivalent service credit.

(B)
If a leave of absence, without pay, is taken by a member for the purpose of
serving as a member of the state legislature, and such member has served in the
legislature five or more years, the salary which would have been received for
the position from which the leave of absence was taken shall be considered as
compensation earnable if the employee's contribution thereon is paid by the
employee. In addition, where a member has been a member of the state
legislature for five or more years, earnable compensation for the member's two
highest compensated consecutive years of service shall include a sum not to
exceed thirty‑six hundred dollars for each of such two consecutive years,
regardless of whether or not legislative service was rendered during those two
years.

(iii)
For members employed less than full time under written contract with a school
district, or community college district, in an instructional position, for
which the member receives service credit of less than one year in all of the
years used to determine the earnable compensation used for computing benefits
due under RCW 41.32.497, 41.32.498, and 41.32.520, the member may elect to have
earnable compensation defined as provided in RCW 41.32.345. For the purposes
of this subsection, the term "instructional position" means a
position in which more than seventy‑five percent of the member's time is
spent as a classroom instructor (including office hours), a librarian, or a
counselor. Earnable compensation shall be so defined only for the purpose of
the calculation of retirement benefits and only as necessary to insure that
members who receive fractional service credit under RCW 41.32.270 receive
benefits proportional to those received by members who have received full‑time
service credit.

(iv)
"Earnable compensation" does not include:

(A)
Remuneration for unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210,
or 28A.310.490;

(B)
Remuneration for unused annual leave in excess of thirty days as authorized by
RCW 43.01.044 and 43.01.041;

(C)
Stipends provided to lead teachers under sections 2 through 5 of this act.

(b)
"Earnable compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means salaries
or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services,
including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred
under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of
the United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude stipends provided
to lead teachers under sections 2 through 5 of this act, lump sum payments
for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated
annual leave, or any form of severance pay.

"Earnable
compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes the following
actual or imputed payments which, except in the case of (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection, are not paid for personal services:

(i)
Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the
employee in a position or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of
reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of
the salary or wages which the individual would have earned during a payroll
period shall be considered earnable compensation, to the extent provided above,
and the individual shall receive the equivalent service credit.

(ii)
In any year in which a member serves in the legislature the member shall have
the option of having such member's earnable compensation be the greater of:

(A)
The earnable compensation the member would have received had such member not
served in the legislature; or

(B)
Such member's actual earnable compensation received for teaching and
legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the retirement
system required because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of this
subsection is greater than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer
contributions.

(11)
"Employer" means the state of Washington, the school district, or any
agency of the state of Washington by which the member is paid.

(12)
"Fiscal year" means a year which begins July 1st and ends June 30th
of the following year.

(13)
"Former state fund" means the state retirement fund in operation for
teachers under chapter 187, Laws of 1923, as amended.

(14)
"Local fund" means any of the local retirement funds for teachers
operated in any school district in accordance with the provisions of chapter
163, Laws of 1917 as amended.

(15)
"Member" means any teacher included in the membership of the
retirement system. Also, any other employee of the public schools who, on July
1, 1947, had not elected to be exempt from membership and who, prior to that
date, had by an authorized payroll deduction, contributed to the member
reserve.

(16)
"Membership service" means service rendered subsequent to the first
day of eligibility of a person to membership in the retirement system:
PROVIDED, That where a member is employed by two or more employers the
individual shall receive no more than one service credit month during any
calendar month in which multiple service is rendered. The provisions of this
subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(17)
"Pension" means the moneys payable per year during life from the
pension reserve.

(18)
"Pension reserve" is a fund in which shall be accumulated an
actuarial reserve adequate to meet present and future pension liabilities of
the system and from which all pension obligations are to be paid.

(19)
"Prior service" means service rendered prior to the first date of
eligibility to membership in the retirement system for which credit is
allowable. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to plan 1
members.

(20)
"Prior service contributions" means contributions made by a member to
secure credit for prior service. The provisions of this subsection shall apply
only to plan 1 members.

(21)
"Public school" means any institution or activity operated by the
state of Washington or any instrumentality or political subdivision thereof
employing teachers, except the University of Washington and Washington State
University.

(22)
"Regular contributions" means the amounts required to be deducted
from the compensation of a member and credited to the member's individual
account in the member reserve. This subsection shall apply only to plan 1
members.

(23)
"Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(24)(a)
"Retirement allowance" for plan 1 members, means monthly payments
based on the sum of annuity and pension, or any optional benefits payable in
lieu thereof.

(b)
"Retirement allowance" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means monthly
payments to a retiree or beneficiary as provided in this chapter.

(25)
"Retirement system" means the Washington state teachers' retirement
system.

(26)(a)
"Service" for plan 1 members means the time during which a member has
been employed by an employer for compensation.

(i)
If a member is employed by two or more employers the individual shall receive
no more than one service credit month during any calendar month in which
multiple service is rendered.

(ii)
As authorized by RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be
creditable as service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to
retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(iii)
As authorized in RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement
system that covers teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the
purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(b)
"Service" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of employment
by a member for one or more employers for which earnable compensation is earned
subject to the following conditions:

(i)
A member employed in an eligible position or as a substitute shall receive one
service credit month for each month of September through August of the
following year if he or she earns earnable compensation for eight hundred ten
or more hours during that period and is employed during nine of those months,
except that a member may not receive credit for any period prior to the
member's employment in an eligible position except as provided in RCW 41.32.812
and 41.50.132;

(ii)
If a member is employed either in an eligible position or as a substitute
teacher for nine months of the twelve month period between September through
August of the following year but earns earnable compensation for less than
eight hundred ten hours but for at least six hundred thirty hours, he or she
will receive one‑half of a service credit month for each month of the
twelve month period;

(iii)
All other members in an eligible position or as a substitute teacher shall
receive service credit as follows:

(A)
A service credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable
compensation is earned for ninety or more hours;

(B)
A half-service credit month is earned in those calendar months where earnable
compensation is earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours;
and

(C)
A quarter-service credit month is earned in those calendar months where
earnable compensation is earned for less than seventy hours.

(iv)
Any person who is a member of the teachers' retirement system and who is
elected or appointed to a state elective position may continue to be a member
of the retirement system and continue to receive a service credit month for
each of the months in a state elective position by making the required member
contributions.

(v)
When an individual is employed by two or more employers the individual shall
only receive one month's service credit during any calendar month in which
multiple service for ninety or more hours is rendered.

(vi)
As authorized by RCW 28A.400.300, up to forty-five days of sick leave may be
creditable as service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to
retire under RCW 41.32.470. For purposes of plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five
days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months.
Use of less than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under
this subsection as follows:

(A)
Less than eleven days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B)
Eleven or more days but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service
credit month;

(C)
Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;

(D)
More than twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and
one-quarter service credit month;

(E)
Thirty-three or more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half
service credit month.

(vii)
As authorized in RCW 41.32.065, service earned in an out-of-state retirement
system that covers teachers in public schools may be applied solely for the
purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.32.470.

(viii)
The department shall adopt rules implementing this subsection.

(27)
"Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service
credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(28)
"Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an
accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(29)
"Teacher" means any person qualified to teach who is engaged by a
public school in an instructional, administrative, or supervisory capacity.
The term includes state, educational service district, and school district
superintendents and their assistants and all employees certificated by the
superintendent of public instruction; and in addition thereto any full time
school doctor who is employed by a public school and renders service of an
instructional or educational nature.

(30)
"Average final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means the
member's average earnable compensation of the highest consecutive sixty service
credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death. Periods
constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be used in the calculation of
average final compensation except under RCW 41.32.810(2).

(31)
"Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer while a member.

(32)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(33)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(34)
"State elective position" means any position held by any person
elected or appointed to state‑wide office or elected or appointed as a
member of the legislature.

(35)
"State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(36)
"Substitute teacher" means:

(a)
A teacher who is hired by an employer to work as a temporary teacher, except
for teachers who are annual contract employees of an employer and are
guaranteed a minimum number of hours; or

(b)
Teachers who either (i) work in ineligible positions for more than one employer
or (ii) work in an ineligible position or positions together with an eligible
position.

(37)(a)
"Eligible position" for plan 2 members from June 7, 1990, through
September 1, 1991, means a position which normally requires two or more uninterrupted
months of creditable service during September through August of the following
year.

(b)
"Eligible position" for plan 2 and plan 3 on and after September 1,
1991, means a position that, as defined by the employer, normally requires five
or more months of at least seventy hours of earnable compensation during
September through August of the following year.

(c)
For purposes of this chapter an employer shall not define "position"
in such a manner that an employee's monthly work for that employer is divided
into more than one position.

(d)
The elected position of the superintendent of public instruction is an eligible
position.

(38)
"Plan 1" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 1 providing the
benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of
the system prior to October 1, 1977.

(39)
"Plan 2" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 2 providing the
benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became members of
the system on and after October 1, 1977, and prior to July 1, 1996.

(40)
"Plan 3" means the teachers' retirement system, plan 3 providing the
benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first become members of
the system on and after July 1, 1996, or who transfer under RCW 41.32.817.

(41)
"Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average
consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and
clerical workers, all items compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United
States department of labor.

(42)
"Index A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of
a postretirement adjustment.

(43)
"Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(44)
"Index year" means the earliest calendar year in which the index is
more than sixty percent of index A.

(45)
"Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(46)
"Annual increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month per year
of service which amount shall be increased each July 1st by three percent,
rounded to the nearest cent.

(47)
"Member account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan
3 means the sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in
the defined contribution portion of plan 3.

(48)
"Separation from service or employment" occurs when a person has
terminated all employment with an employer.

(49)
"Employed" or "employee" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the
employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department
shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 2 through 5 of this act are each added to chapter 28A.405 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act expire June 30, 2007.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---