BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.52.053 and 1997 c 260 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and 84.52.043 shall not
prevent the levy of taxes by school districts, when authorized so to do by the
voters of such school district in the manner and for the purposes and number of
years allowable under Article VII, section 2(a) of the Constitution of this
state. Whenever such school district levies result in an aggregate to
exceed one percent of true and fair value, consistent with RCW 84.52.050, such
school levies may only be approved in the manner set forth in the Constitution
with a three-fifths voter approval. Whenever such school district levies
result in an aggregate less than one percent of true and fair value, such
levies may be approved by a simple majority of those voting in such election.
Elections for such taxes shall be held in the year in which the levy is made
or, in the case of propositions authorizing two-year through four-year levies
for maintenance and operation support of a school district, authorizing
two-year levies for transportation vehicle funds established in RCW
28A.160.130, or authorizing two-year through six-year levies to support the
construction, modernization, or remodeling of school facilities, in the year in
which the first annual levy is made: PROVIDED, That once additional tax levies
have been authorized for maintenance and operation support of a school district
for a two-year through four-year period, no further additional tax levies for
maintenance and operation support of the district for that period may be
authorized.

A special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by the
board of school directors, by giving notice thereof by publication in the
manner provided by law for giving notices of general elections, at which
special election the proposition authorizing such excess levy shall be
submitted in such form as to enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote
"yes" and those opposed thereto to vote "no".

---
END ---