BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
1

REFERENCES TO DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT

Sec.
101. RCW
19.27.150 and 1995 c 399 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
month a copy of the United States department of commerce, bureau of the census'
"report of building or zoning permits issued and local public
construction" or equivalent report shall be transmitted by the governing
bodies of counties and cities to the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

Sec.
102. RCW
19.27.097 and 1995 c 399 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each applicant for a building permit of a building necessitating potable water
shall provide evidence of an adequate water supply for the intended use of the
building. Evidence may be in the form of a water right permit from the
department of ecology, a letter from an approved water purveyor stating the
ability to provide water, or another form sufficient to verify the existence of
an adequate water supply. In addition to other authorities, the county or city
may impose conditions on building permits requiring connection to an existing
public water system where the existing system is willing and able to provide
safe and reliable potable water to the applicant with reasonable economy and
efficiency. An application for a water right shall not be sufficient proof of
an adequate water supply.

(2)
Within counties not required or not choosing to plan pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040, the county and the state may mutually determine those areas in the
county in which the requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not
apply. The departments of health and ecology shall coordinate on the
implementation of this section. Should the county and the state fail to
mutually determine those areas to be designated pursuant to this subsection,
the county may petition the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development to mediate or, if necessary, make the determination.

(3)
Buildings that do not need potable water facilities are exempt from the
provisions of this section. The department of ecology, after consultation with
local governments, may adopt rules to implement this section, which may
recognize differences between high-growth and low-growth counties.

Sec.
103. RCW
19.27.190 and 1996 c 186 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Not later than January 1, 1991, the state building code council, in
consultation with the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development, shall establish interim requirements for the maintenance of indoor
air quality in newly constructed residential buildings. In establishing the
interim requirements, the council shall take into consideration differences in
heating fuels and heating system types. These requirements shall be in effect
July 1, 1991, through June 30, 1993.

(b)
The interim requirements for new electrically space heated residential
buildings shall include ventilation standards which provide for mechanical
ventilation in areas of the residence where water vapor or cooking odors are
produced. The ventilation shall be exhausted to the outside of the structure.
The ventilation standards shall further provide for the capacity to supply
outside air to each bedroom and the main living area through dedicated supply
air inlet locations in walls, or in an equivalent manner. At least one exhaust
fan in the home shall be controlled by a dehumidistat or clock timer to ensure
that sufficient whole house ventilation is regularly provided as needed.

(c)(i)
For new single family residences with electric space heating systems, zero lot
line homes, each unit in a duplex, and each attached housing unit in a planned
unit development, the ventilation standards shall include fifty cubic feet per
minute of effective installed ventilation capacity in each bathroom and one
hundred cubic feet per minute of effective installed ventilation capacity in
each kitchen.

(ii)
For other new residential units with electric space heating systems the
ventilation standards may be satisfied by the installation of two exhaust fans
with a combined effective installed ventilation capacity of two hundred cubic
feet per minute.

(iii)
Effective installed ventilation capacity means the capability to deliver the
specified ventilation rates for the actual design of the ventilation system.
Natural ventilation and infiltration shall not be considered acceptable
substitutes for mechanical ventilation.

(d)
For new residential buildings that are space heated with other than electric
space heating systems, the interim standards shall be designed to result in
indoor air quality equivalent to that achieved with the interim ventilation
standards for electric space heated homes.

(e)
The interim requirements for all newly constructed residential buildings shall
include standards for indoor air quality pollutant source control, including
the following requirements: All structural panel components of the residence
shall comply with appropriate standards for the emission of formaldehyde; the
back-drafting of combustion by-products from combustion appliances shall be
minimized through the use of dampers, vents, outside combustion air sources, or
other appropriate technologies; and, in areas of the state where monitored data
indicate action is necessary to inhibit indoor radon gas concentrations from
exceeding appropriate health standards, entry of radon gas into homes shall be
minimized through appropriate foundation construction measures.

(2)
No later than January 1, 1993, the state building code council, in consultation
with the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development,
shall establish final requirements for the maintenance of indoor air quality in
newly constructed residences to be in effect beginning July 1, 1993. For new
electrically space heated residential buildings, these requirements shall
maintain indoor air quality equivalent to that provided by the mechanical
ventilation and indoor air pollutant source control requirements included in
the February 7, 1989, Bonneville power administration record of decision for
the environmental impact statement on new energy efficient homes programs
(DOE/EIS-0127F) built with electric space heating. In residential units other
than single family, zero lot line, duplexes, and attached housing units in
planned unit developments, ventilation requirements may be satisfied by the
installation of two exhaust fans with a combined effective installed
ventilation capacity of two hundred cubic feet per minute. For new residential
buildings that are space heated with other than electric space heating systems,
the standards shall be designed to result in indoor air quality equivalent to
that achieved with the ventilation and source control standards for electric
space heated homes. In establishing the final requirements, the council shall
take into consideration differences in heating fuels and heating system types.

Sec.
104. RCW
27.34.310 and 1995 c 399 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions apply
throughout RCW 27.34.320.

(1)
"Agency" means the state agency, department, or institution that has ownership
of historic property.

(2)
"Historic properties" means those buildings, sites, objects,
structures, and districts that are listed in or eligible for listing in the
National Register of Historic Places.

(3)
"Office" means the office of archaeology and historic preservation
within the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development.

Sec.
105. RCW
28A.300.160 and 1995 c 399 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall be the lead agency
and shall assist the department of social and health services, the department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development, and school districts
in establishing a coordinated primary prevention program for child abuse and
neglect.

(2)
In developing the program, consideration shall be given to the following:

(a)
Parent, teacher, and children's workshops whose information and training is:

(i)
Provided in a clear, age-appropriate, nonthreatening manner, delineating the
problem and the range of possible solutions;

(ii)
Culturally and linguistically appropriate to the population served;

(iii)
Appropriate to the geographic area served; and

(iv)
Designed to help counteract common stereotypes about child abuse victims and
offenders;

(b)
Training for school age children's parents and school staff, which includes:

(i)
Physical and behavioral indicators of abuse;

(ii)
Crisis counseling techniques;

(iii)
Community resources;

(iv)
Rights and responsibilities regarding reporting;

(v)
School district procedures to facilitate reporting and apprise supervisors and
administrators of reports; and

(vi)
Caring for a child's needs after a report is made;

(c)
Training for licensed day care providers and parents that includes:

(i)
Positive child guidance techniques;

(ii)
Physical and behavioral indicators of abuse;

(iii)
Recognizing and providing safe, quality day care;

(iv)
Community resources;

(v)
Rights and responsibilities regarding reporting; and

(vi)
Caring for the abused or neglected child;

(d)
Training for children that includes:

(i)
The right of every child to live free of abuse;

(ii)
How to disclose incidents of abuse and neglect;

(iii)
The availability of support resources and how to obtain help;

(iv)
Child safety training and age-appropriate self-defense techniques; and

(v)
A period for crisis counseling and reporting immediately following the
completion of each children's workshop in a school setting which maximizes the
child's privacy and sense of safety.

(3)
The primary prevention program established under this section shall be a
voluntary program and shall not be part of the basic program of education.

(4) Parents shall be given notice of the primary prevention program
and may refuse to have their children participate in the program.

Sec.
106. RCW
28B.06.030 and 1995 c 335 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state board for community and technical colleges, in consultation with the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development, the
department of social and health services, the superintendent of public
instruction, and community-based, nonprofit providers of adult literacy
services, shall develop an adult literacy program to serve eligible parents as
defined under RCW ((28A.610.020)) 28B.06.020. The program shall
give priority to serving parents with children who have not yet enrolled in school
or are in grades kindergarten through three.

(2)
In addition to providing basic skills instruction to eligible parents, the
program may include other program components which may include transportation,
child care, and such other directly necessary activities as may be necessary to
accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(3)
Parents who elect to participate in training or work programs, as a condition
of receiving public assistance, shall have the hours spent in parent
participation programs, conducted as part of a federal head start program, or
the state early childhood education and assistance program under RCW
28A.215.100 through 28A.215.200 and 28A.215.900 through 28A.215.908, or parent
literacy programs under this chapter, counted toward the fulfillment of their
work and training obligation for the receipt of public assistance.

(4)
State funds as may be appropriated for project even start shall be used solely
to expand and complement, but not supplant, federal funds for adult literary
programs.

(5)
The state board for community and technical colleges shall adopt rules as
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Sec.
107. RCW
34.05.330 and 1998 c 280 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person may petition an agency requesting the adoption, amendment, or repeal
of any rule. The office of financial management shall prescribe by rule the
format for such petitions and the procedure for their submission,
consideration, and disposition and provide a standard form that may be used to
petition any agency. Within sixty days after submission of a petition, the
agency shall either (a) deny the petition in writing, stating (i) its reasons
for the denial, specifically addressing the concerns raised by the petitioner,
and, where appropriate, (ii) the alternative means by which it will address the
concerns raised by the petitioner, or (b) initiate rule-making proceedings in
accordance with RCW 34.05.320.

(2)
If an agency denies a petition to repeal or amend a rule submitted under
subsection (1) of this section, and the petition alleges that the rule is not
within the intent of the legislature or was not adopted in accordance with all
applicable provisions of law, the person may petition for review of the rule by
the joint administrative rules review committee under RCW 34.05.655.

(3)
If an agency denies a petition to repeal or amend a rule submitted under
subsection (1) of this section, the petitioner, within thirty days of the
denial, may appeal the denial to the governor. The governor shall immediately
file notice of the appeal with the code reviser for publication in the
Washington state register. Within forty-five days after receiving the appeal,
the governor shall either (a) deny the petition in writing, stating (i) his or
her reasons for the denial, specifically addressing the concerns raised by the
petitioner, and, (ii) where appropriate, the alternative means by which he or
she will address the concerns raised by the petitioner; (b) for agencies listed
in RCW 43.17.010, direct the agency to initiate rule-making proceedings in
accordance with this chapter; or (c) for agencies not listed in RCW 43.17.010,
recommend that the agency initiate rule-making proceedings in accordance with
this chapter. The governor's response to the appeal shall be published in the
Washington state register and copies shall be submitted to the chief clerk of
the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate.

(4)
In petitioning for repeal or amendment of a rule under this section, a person
is encouraged to address, among other concerns:

(a)
Whether the rule is authorized;

(b)
Whether the rule is needed;

(c)
Whether the rule conflicts with or duplicates other federal, state, or local
laws;

(d)
Whether alternatives to the rule exist that will serve the same purpose at less
cost;

(e)
Whether the rule applies differently to public and private entities;

(f)
Whether the rule serves the purposes for which it was adopted;

(g)
Whether the costs imposed by the rule are unreasonable;

(h)
Whether the rule is clearly and simply stated;

(i)
Whether the rule is different than a federal law applicable to the same
activity or subject matter without adequate justification; and

(j)
Whether the rule was adopted according to all applicable provisions of law.

(5)
The department of community((, trade, and economic)) development and the
office of financial management shall coordinate efforts among agencies to
inform the public about the existence of this rules review process.

(6)
The office of financial management shall initiate the rule making required by
subsection (1) of this section by September 1, 1995.

Sec.
108. RCW
35.02.260 and 1995 c 399 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
identify federal, state, and local agencies that should receive notification
that a new city or town is about to incorporate and shall assist newly formed
cities and towns during the interim period before the official date of
incorporation in providing such notification to the identified agencies.

Sec.
109. RCW
35.21.300 and 1995 c 399 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The lien for charges for service by a city waterworks, or electric light or
power plant may be enforced only by cutting off the service until the
delinquent and unpaid charges are paid, except that until June 30, 1991,
utility service for residential space heating may be terminated between
November 15th and March 15th only as provided in subsections (2)
and (4) of this section. In the event of a disputed account and tender by the
owner of the premises of the amount the owner claims to be due before the
service is cut off, the right to refuse service to any premises shall not
accrue until suit has been entered by the city and judgment entered in the
case.

(2)
Utility service for residential space heating shall not be terminated between
November 15th through March 15th if the customer:

(a)
Notifies the utility of the inability to pay the bill, including a security
deposit. This notice should be provided within five business days of receiving
a payment overdue notice unless there are extenuating circumstances. If the
customer fails to notify the utility within five business days and service is
terminated, the customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and
fulfilling the requirements of this section, receive the protections of this
chapter;

(b)
Provides self-certification of household income for the prior twelve months to
a grantee of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development which administers federally funded energy assistance programs. The
grantee shall determine that the household income does not exceed the maximum
allowed for eligibility under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance
under 42 U.S.C. 8624 and shall provide a dollar figure that is seven percent of
household income. The grantee may verify information in the
self-certification;

(c)
Has applied for home heating assistance from applicable government and private
sector organizations and certifies that any assistance received will be applied
to the current bill and future utility bills;

(d)
Has applied for low-income weatherization assistance to the utility or other
appropriate agency if such assistance is available for the dwelling;

(e)
Agrees to a payment plan and agrees to maintain the payment plan. The plan
will be designed both to pay the past due bill by the following October 15th
and to pay for continued utility service. If the past due bill is not paid by
the following October 15th, the customer shall not be eligible for
protections under this chapter until the past due bill is paid. The plan shall
not require monthly payments in excess of seven percent of the customer's
monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date
application is made and thereafter during November 15th through March 15th.
A customer may agree to pay a higher percentage during this period, but shall
not be in default unless payment during this period is less than seven percent
of monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date
application is made and thereafter. If assistance payments are received by the
customer subsequent to implementation of the plan, the customer shall contact
the utility to reformulate the plan; and

(f)
Agrees to pay the moneys owed even if he or she moves.

(3)
The utility shall:

(a)
Include in any notice that an account is delinquent and that service may be
subject to termination, a description of the customer's duties in this section;

(b)
Assist the customer in fulfilling the requirements under this section;

(c)
Be authorized to transfer an account to a new residence when a customer who has
established a plan under this section moves from one residence to another
within the same utility service area;

(d)
Be permitted to disconnect service if the customer fails to honor the payment
program. Utilities may continue to disconnect service for those practices
authorized by law other than for nonpayment as provided for in this section.
Customers who qualify for payment plans under this section who default on their
payment plans and are disconnected can be reconnected and maintain the
protections afforded under this chapter by paying reconnection charges, if any,
and by paying all amounts that would have been due and owing under the terms of
the applicable payment plan, absent default, on the date on which service is
reconnected; and

(e)
Advise the customer in writing at the time it disconnects service that it will
restore service if the customer contacts the utility and fulfills the other
requirements of this section.

(4)
All municipal utilities shall offer residential customers the option of a
budget billing or equal payment plan. The budget billing or equal payment plan
shall be offered low-income customers eligible under the state's plan for
low-income energy assistance prepared in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 8624(C)(1)
without limiting availability to certain months of the year, without regard to
the length of time the customer has occupied the premises, and without regard
to whether the customer is the tenant or owner of the premises occupied.

(5)
An agreement between the customer and the utility, whether oral or written,
shall not waive the protections afforded under this chapter.

Sec.
110. RCW
35.21.687 and 1995 c 399 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every city and town, including every code city operating under Title 35A RCW,
shall identify and catalog real property owned by the city or town that is no
longer required for its purposes and is suitable for the development of
affordable housing for very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income
households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory shall include the
location, approximate size, and current zoning classification of the property.
Every city and town shall provide a copy of the inventory to the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development by November 1, 1993, with
inventory revisions each November 1st thereafter.

(2) By November 1st of each year, beginning in 1994, every
city and town, including every code city operating under Title 35A RCW, shall
purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer available for
the development of affordable housing. The inventory revision shall also
contain a list of real property that has become available since the last update.
As used in this section, "real property" means buildings, land, or
buildings and land.

Sec.
111. RCW
35.21.779 and 1995 c 399 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In cities or towns where the estimated value of state-owned facilities
constitutes ten percent or more of the total assessed valuation, the state
agency or institution owning the facilities shall contract with the city or
town to pay an equitable share for fire protection services. The contract shall
be negotiated as provided in subsections (2) through (6) of this section and
shall provide for payment by the agency or institution to the city or town.

(2)
A city or town seeking to enter into fire protection contract negotiations
shall provide written notification to the department of community((, trade,
and economic)) development and the state agencies or institutions that own
property within the jurisdiction, of its intent to contract for fire protection
services. Where there are multiple state agencies located within a single
jurisdiction, a city may choose to notify only the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development, which in turn shall notify the agencies
or institution that own property within the jurisdiction of the city's intent
to contract for fire protection services. Any such notification shall be based
on the valuation procedures, based on commonly accepted standards, adopted by
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development in
consultation with the department of general administration and the association
of Washington cities.

(3)
The department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
review any such notification to ensure that the valuation procedures and
results are accurate. The department will notify each affected city or town
and state agency or institution of the results of their review within thirty
days of receipt of notification.

(4)
The parties negotiating fire protection contracts under this section shall
conduct those negotiations in good faith. Whenever there are multiple state
agencies located within a single jurisdiction, every effort shall be made by
the state to consolidate negotiations on behalf of all affected agencies.

(5)
In the event of notification by one of the parties that an agreement cannot be
reached on the terms and conditions of a fire protection contract, the director
of the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development
shall mediate a resolution of the disagreement. In the event of a continued
impasse, the director of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development shall recommend a resolution.

(6)
If the parties reject the recommendation of the director and an impasse
continues, the director shall direct the parties to arbitration. The parties
shall agree on a neutral arbitrator, and the fees and expenses of the
arbitrator shall be shared equally between the parties. The arbitration shall
be a final offer, total arbitration, with the arbitrator empowered only to pick
the final offer of one of the parties or the recommended resolution by the
director of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development. The decision of the arbitrator shall be final, binding, and
nonappealable on the parties.

(7)
The provisions of this section shall not apply if a city or town and a state
agency or institution have contracted pursuant to RCW 35.21.775.

(8) The provisions of this section do not apply to cities and towns
not meeting the conditions in subsection (1) of this section. Cities and towns
not meeting the conditions of subsection (1) of this section may enter into
contracts pursuant to RCW 35.21.775.

Sec.
112. RCW
36.34.137 and 1993 c 461 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every county shall identify and catalog real property owned by the county that
is no longer required for its purposes and is suitable for the development of
affordable housing for very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income
households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory shall include the
location, approximate size, and current zoning classification of the property.
Every county shall provide a copy of the inventory to the department of
community development by November 1, 1993, with inventory revisions each
November 1st thereafter.

(2)
By November 1st of each year, beginning in 1994, every county shall
purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer available for
the development of affordable housing. The inventory revision shall include an
updated listing of real property that has become available since the last
update. As used in this section, "real property" means buildings,
land, or buildings and land.

Sec.
113. RCW
39.44.210 and 1995 c 399 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

For
each state or local government bond issued, the underwriter of the issue shall
supply the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development
with information on the bond issue within twenty days of its issuance. In
cases where the issuer of the bond makes a direct or private sale to a
purchaser without benefit of an underwriter, the issuer shall supply the
required information. The bond issue information shall be provided on a form
prescribed by the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development and shall include but is not limited to: (1) The par value of the
bond issue; (2) the effective interest rates; (3) a schedule of maturities; (4)
the purposes of the bond issue; (5) cost of issuance information; and (6) the
type of bonds that are issued. A copy of the bond covenants shall be supplied
with this information.

For
each state or local government bond issued, the issuer's bond counsel promptly
shall provide to the underwriter or to the department of community((, trade,
and economic)) development information on the amount of any fees charged
for services rendered with regard to the bond issue.

Each
local government that issues any type of bond shall make a report annually to
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development that
includes a summary of all the outstanding bonds of the local government as of
the first day of January in that year. Such report shall distinguish the
outstanding bond issues on the basis of the type of bond, as defined in RCW
39.44.200, and shall report the local government's outstanding indebtedness
compared to any applicable limitations on indebtedness, including RCW
35.42.200, 39.30.010, and 39.36.020.

Sec.
114. RCW
39.44.230 and 1995 c 399 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development may adopt
rules ((and regulations)) pursuant to the administrative procedure act
to require (1) the submission of bond issuance information by underwriters and
bond counsel to the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development in a timely manner and (2) the submission of additional information
on bond issues by state and local governments, including summaries of
outstanding bond issues.

Sec.
115. RCW
43.19.1920 and 1995 c 399 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

The
division of purchasing may donate state-owned, surplus, tangible personal
property to shelters that are: Participants in the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development's emergency shelter assistance program;
and operated by nonprofit organizations or units of local government providing
emergency or transitional housing for homeless persons. A donation may be made
only if all of the following conditions have been met:

(1)
The division of purchasing has made reasonable efforts to determine if any
state agency has a requirement for such personal property and no such agency
has been identified. Such determination shall follow sufficient notice to all
state agencies to allow adequate time for them to make their needs known;

(2)
The agency owning the property has authorized the division of purchasing to
donate the property in accordance with this section;

(3)
The nature and quantity of the property in question is directly germane to the
needs of the homeless persons served by the shelter and the purpose for which the
shelter exists and the shelter agrees to use the property for such needs and
purposes; and

(4) The director of general administration has determined that the
donation of such property is in the best interest of the state.

Sec.
116. RCW
43.19.19201 and 1995 c 399 s 64 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of general administration shall identify and catalog real
property that is no longer required for department purposes and is suitable for
the development of affordable housing for very low-income, low-income, and
moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory shall
include the location, approximate size, and current zoning classification of
the property. The department of general administration shall provide a copy of
the inventory to the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development by November 1, 1993, and every November 1st thereafter.

(2) By November 1st of each year, beginning in 1994, the
department of general administration shall purge the inventory of real property
of sites that are no longer available for the development of affordable
housing. The department shall include an updated listing of real property that
has become available since the last update. As used in this section,
"real property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.

Sec.
117. RCW
43.20A.037 and 1995 c 399 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall identify and catalog real property that is no longer
required for department purposes and is suitable for the development of
affordable housing for very low-income, and moderate-income households as
defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory shall include the location,
approximate size, and current zoning classification of the property. The
department shall provide a copy of the inventory to the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development by November 1, 1993, and
every November 1st thereafter.

(2)
By November 1st of each year, beginning in 1994, the department shall
purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer available for
the development of affordable housing. The department shall include an updated
listing of real property that has become available since the last update. As
used in this section, "real property" means buildings, land, or
buildings and land.

Sec.
118. RCW
43.22.495 and 1995 c 399 s 69 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning
on July 1, ((1991)) 2000, the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development shall be responsible for performing all
the consumer complaint and related functions of the state administrative agency
that are required for purposes of complying with the regulations established by
the federal department of housing and urban development for manufactured
housing, including the preparation and submission of the state administrative
plan.

The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development may enter
into state or local interagency agreements to coordinate site inspection
activities with record monitoring and complaint handling. The interagency
agreement may also provide for the reimbursement for cost of work that an
agency performs. The department may include other related areas in any
interagency agreements which are necessary for the efficient provision of
services.

The
directors of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development and the department of labor and industries shall immediately take
such steps as are necessary to ensure that chapter 176, Laws of 1990 is implemented
on June 7, 1990.

Sec.
119. RCW
43.70.530 and 1998 c 245 s 75 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of health, the department of social and health services, the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development, the
superintendent of public instruction, and the employment security department
shall, collectively and collaboratively, develop a plan for a home health
visitor program that shall have as its primary purpose the prevention of child
abuse and neglect through the provision of selected educational and supportive
services to high risk parents of newborns.

(1)
The program shall: (a) Be community-based; (b) include early hospital-based
screening to identify high risk parents of newborns; (c) provide for an
effective, in-home outreach and support program for high risk parents of
newborns that involves: (i) Frequent home visits, (ii) parent training on
early childhood development, parenting, and the stress factors that lead to
abuse and neglect, and (iii) referrals to needed social and health services;
and (d) demonstrate effective coordination among current community-based
programs that may also serve high risk parents and their infants, including
child abuse prevention programs, first steps, second steps, the early childhood
education and assistance program, the healthy kids program, child welfare
services, the women, infants, and children program, the high priority infant
tracking program, the birth to six program, local and state public health
prevention and early intervention services, and other services as identified.

(2)
The plan shall: (a) Include an estimate and a description of the high risk
groups to be served; (b) detail the screening process and mechanisms to be used
to identify high risk parents; (c) detail the services to be included in the
in-home program; (d) describe staffing that may include the use of teams of
professionals, paraprofessionals, and volunteers; (e) describe how the program
will be evaluated, including the measurable outcomes to be achieved; and (f)
provide an estimate of the costs to fully implement the program state-wide, and
for possible consideration, a series of pilot projects with a phased-in
schedule.

Sec.
120. RCW
43.70.540 and 1995 c 399 s 76 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that the state patrol, the office of the administrator
for the courts, the sheriffs' and police chiefs' association, the department of
social and health services, the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development, the sentencing guidelines commission, the
department of corrections, and the superintendent of public instruction each
have comprehensive data and analysis capabilities that have contributed greatly
to our current understanding of crime and violence, and their causes.

The
legislature finds, however, that a single health-oriented agency must be
designated to provide consistent guidelines to all these groups regarding the
way in which their data systems collect this important data. It is not the
intent of the legislature by RCW 43.70.545 to transfer data collection
requirements from existing agencies or to require the addition of major new
data systems. It is rather the intent to make only the minimum required
changes in existing data systems to increase compatibility and comparability,
reduce duplication, and to increase the usefulness of data collected by these
agencies in developing more accurate descriptions of violence.

Sec.
121. RCW
43.79.201 and 1995 c 399 s 77 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account is
hereby created, in the state treasury, into which account there shall be deposited
all moneys arising from the sale, lease or transfer of the land granted by the
United States government to the state for charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions by section 17 of the enabling act, or otherwise set
apart for such institutions, except all moneys arising from the sale, lease, or
transfer of that certain one hundred thousand acres of such land assigned for
the support of the University of Washington by chapter 91, Laws of 1903 and
section 9, chapter 122, Laws of 1893.

(2)
If feasible, not less than one-half of all income to the charitable,
educational, penal, and reformatory institutions account shall be appropriated
for the purpose of providing housing, including repair and renovation of state
institutions, for persons who are mentally ill, developmentally disabled, or
youth who are blind, deaf, or otherwise disabled. If moneys are appropriated
for community-based housing, the moneys shall be appropriated to the department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development for the housing
assistance program under chapter 43.185 RCW.

Sec.
122. RCW
43.105.020 and 1999 c 285 s 1 and 1999 c 80 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise, the following
definitions shall apply:

(1)
"Department" means the department of information services;

(2)
"Board" means the information services board;

(3)
"Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi municipal
corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such corporations
and subdivisions authorized to contract separately;

(4)
"Director" means the director of the department;

(5)
"Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions. This term includes,
but is not limited to, services acquired for equipment maintenance and repair,
operation of a physical plant, security, computer hardware and software
installation and maintenance, data entry, keypunch services, programming
services, and computer time-sharing;

(6)
"Backbone network" means the shared high-density portions of the
state's telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes specially
conditioned high-speed communications carrier lines, multiplexors, switches
associated with such communications lines, and any equipment and software
components necessary for management and control of the backbone network;

(7)
"Telecommunications" means the transmission of information by wire,
radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other means;

(8)
"Information processing" means the electronic capture, collection,
storage, manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and presentation of information
in the form of data, text, voice, or image and includes telecommunications and
office automation functions;

(9)
"Information services" means data processing, telecommunications, and
office automation;

(10)
"Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission facilities
used in information processing, such as computers, word processors, terminals,
telephones, and cables;

(11)
"Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a
strategic management process documenting relationships between agency missions
and information technology investments;

(12)
"Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk analysis and
management designed to ensure optimum use of information technology resources;

(13)
"Proprietary software" means that software offered for sale or
license;

(14)
"Video telecommunications" means the electronic interconnection of
two or more sites for the purpose of transmitting and/or receiving visual and
associated audio information. Video telecommunications shall not include
existing public television broadcast stations as currently designated by the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development under
chapter 43.330 RCW;

(15)
"K-20 educational network board" or "K-20 board" means the
K-20 educational network board created in RCW 43.105.800;

(16)
"K-20 network technical steering committee" or "committee"
means the K-20 network technical steering committee created in RCW 43.105.810;

(17)
"K-20 network" means the network established in RCW 43.105.820;

(18)
"Educational sectors" means those institutions of higher education,
school districts, and educational service districts that use the network for
distance education, data transmission, and other uses permitted by the K-20
board.

Sec.
123. RCW
43.133.030 and 1995 c 399 s 81 are each amended to read as follows:

The
office of financial management and the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development shall, in cooperation with appropriate legislative
committees and legislative staff, establish a procedure for the provision of
sunrise notes on the expected impact of bills and resolutions that authorize
the creation of new boards and new types of special purpose districts.

Sec.
124. RCW
43.133.050 and 1995 c 399 s 82 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The office of financial management shall prepare sunrise notes for legislation
concerning the creation of new boards. The department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development shall prepare sunrise notes for
legislation creating new types of special purpose districts.

(2)
A sunrise note shall be prepared for all executive and agency request
legislation that creates a board or special purpose district.

(3)
The office of financial management or the department of community((, trade,
and economic)) development shall also provide a sunrise note at the request
of any committee of the legislature.

Sec.
125. RCW
43.150.040 and 1995 c 399 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

The
governor may establish a state-wide center for volunteerism and citizen service
within the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development
and appoint an executive administrator, who may employ such staff as necessary
to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW
do not apply to the executive administrator and the staff.

Sec.
126. RCW
43.280.011 and 1996 c 123 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington state sexual assault services advisory committee issued a report to
the department of community, trade, and economic development and the department
of social and health services in June of 1995. The committee made several
recommendations to improve the delivery of services to victims of sexual abuse
and assault: (1) Consolidate the administration and funding of sexual assault
and abuse services in one agency instead of splitting those functions between
the department of social and health services and the department of community,
trade, and economic development; (2) adopt a funding allocation plan to pool
all funds for sexual assault services and to distribute them across the state
to ensure the delivery of core and specialized services; (3) establish service,
data collection, and management standards and outcome measurements for
recipients of grants; and (4) create a data collection system to gather
pertinent data concerning the delivery of sexual assault services to victims.

The
legislature approves the recommendations of the advisory committee and
consolidates the functions and funding for sexual assault services in the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development to
implement the advisory committee's recommendations.

The legislature does not intend to effect a reduction in service
levels within available funding by transferring department of social and health
services' powers and duties to the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development. At a minimum, the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development shall distribute the same percentage of
the services it provides victims of sexual assault and abuse, pursuant to RCW
43.280.020, 70.125.080, and 74.14B.060, to children as were distributed to
children through these programs in fiscal year 1996.

Sec.
127. RCW
43.280.070 and 1995 c 399 s 115 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development may receive
such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the
purposes of this chapter and expend the same or any income therefrom according
to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

Sec.
128. RCW
43.310.020 and 1995 c 399 s 116 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of community((, trade, and economic)) development may
recommend existing programs or contract with either school districts or
community organizations, or both, through a request for proposal process for
the development, administration, and implementation in the county of
community-based gang risk prevention and intervention pilot programs.

(2)
Proposals by the school district for gang risk prevention and intervention
pilot program grant funding shall begin with school years no sooner than the
1994-95 session, and last for a duration of two years.

(3)
The school district or community organization proposal shall include:

(a)
A description of the program goals, activities, and curriculum. The
description of the program goals shall include a list of measurable objectives
for the purpose of evaluation by the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development. To the extent possible, proposals shall contain
empirical data on current problems, such as drop-out rates and occurrences of
violence on and off campus by school-age individuals.

(b)
A description of the individual school or schools and the geographic area to be
affected by the program.

(c)
A demonstration of broad-based support for the program from business and
community organizations.

(d)
A clear description of the experience, expertise, and other qualifications of
the community organizations to conduct an effective prevention and intervention
program in cooperation with a school or a group of schools.

(e)
A proposed budget for expenditure of the grant.

(4)
Grants awarded under this section may not be used for the administrative costs
of the school district or the individual school.

Sec.
129. RCW
43.330.125 and 1995 c 347 s 430 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
provide training and technical assistance to counties and cities to assist them
in fulfilling the requirements of chapter 36.70B RCW.

Sec.
130. RCW
43.330.135 and 1995 c 13 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
distribute such funds as are appropriated for the state-wide technical support,
development, and enhancement of court-appointed special advocate programs.

(2)
In order to receive money under subsection (1) of this section, an organization
providing state-wide technical support, development, and enhancement of
court-appointed special advocate programs must meet all of the following
requirements:

(a)
The organization must provide state-wide support, development, and enhancement
of court-appointed special advocate programs that offer guardian ad litem
services as provided in RCW 26.12.175, 26.44.053, and 13.34.100;

(b)
All guardians ad litem working under court-appointed special advocate programs
supported, developed, or enhanced by the organization must be volunteers and
may not receive payment for services rendered pursuant to the program. The
organization may include paid positions that are exclusively administrative in
nature, in keeping with the scope and purpose of this section; and

(c)
The organization providing state-wide technical support, development, and
enhancement of court-appointed special advocate programs must be a public
benefit nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.490.

(3)
If more than one organization is eligible to receive money under this section,
the department shall develop criteria for allocation of appropriated money
among the eligible organizations.

Sec.
131. RCW
47.12.064 and 1995 c 399 s 121 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall identify and catalog real property that is no longer
required for department purposes and is suitable for the development of
affordable housing for very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income
households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory shall include the
location, approximate size, and current zoning classification of the property.
The department shall provide a copy of the inventory to the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development by November 1, 1993, and
every November 1st thereafter.

(2) By November 1st of each year, beginning in 1994, the
department shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no
longer available for the development of affordable housing. The department
shall include an updated listing of real property that has become available
since the last update. As used in this section, "real property"
means buildings, land, or buildings and land.

Sec.
132. RCW
47.50.090 and 1995 c 399 s 124 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall develop, adopt, and maintain an access control
classification system for all routes on the state highway system, the purpose
of which shall be to provide for the implementation and continuing applications
of the provision of this chapter.

(2)
The principal component of the access control classification system shall be
access management standards, the purpose of which shall be to provide specific
minimum standards to be adhered to in the planning for and approval of access
to state highways.

(3)
The control classification system shall be developed consistent with the
following:

(a)
The department shall, no later than January 1, 1993, adopt rules setting forth
procedures governing the implementation of the access control classification
system required by this chapter. The rule shall provide for input from the
entities described in (b) of this subsection as well as for public meetings to
discuss the access control classification system. Nothing in this chapter
shall affect the validity of the department's existing or subsequently adopted
rules concerning access to the state highway system. Such rules shall remain
in effect until repealed or replaced by the rules required by this chapter.

(b)
The access control classification system shall be developed in cooperation with
counties, cities and towns, the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development, regional transportation planning organizations, and
other local governmental entities, and for city streets designated as state highways
pursuant to chapter 47.24 RCW, adopted with the concurrence of the city design
standards committee.

(c)
The rule required by this section shall provide that assignment of a road
segment to a specific access category be made in consideration of the following
criteria:

(i)
Local land use plans and zoning, as set forth in comprehensive plans;

(ii)
The current functional classification as well as potential future functional
classification of each road on the state highway system;

(iii)
Existing and projected traffic volumes;

(iv)
Existing and projected state, local, and metropolitan planning organization
transportation plans and needs;

(v)
Drainage requirements;

(vi)
The character of lands adjoining the highway;

(vii)
The type and volume of traffic requiring access;

(viii)
Other operational aspects of access;

(ix)
The availability of reasonable access by way of county roads and city streets
to a state highway; and

(x)
The cumulative effect of existing and projected connections on the state highway
system's ability to provide for the safe and efficient movement of people and
goods within the state.

(d)
Access management standards shall include, but not be limited to, connection
location standards, safety factors, design and construction standards, desired
levels of service, traffic control devices, and effective maintenance of the
roads. The standards shall also contain minimum requirements for the spacing
of connections, intersecting streets, roads, and highways.

(e)
An access control category shall be assigned to each segment of the state
highway system by July 1, 1993.

Sec.
133. RCW
47.76.230 and 1995 c 380 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of transportation shall continue its responsibility for the
development and implementation of the state rail plan and programs, and the
utilities and transportation commission shall continue its responsibility for
intrastate rates, service, and safety issues.

(2)
The department of transportation shall maintain an enhanced data file on the
rail system. Proprietary annual station traffic data from each railroad and
the modal use of major shippers shall be obtained to the extent that such
information is available.

(3)
The department of transportation shall provide technical assistance, upon
request, to state agencies and local interests. Technical assistance includes,
but is not limited to, the following:

(a)
Rail project cost-benefit analyses conducted in accordance with methodologies
recommended by the Federal Railroad Administration;

(b)
Assistance in the formation of county rail districts and port districts; and

(c)
Feasibility studies for rail service continuation and/or rail service
assistance.

(4)
With funding authorized by the legislature, the department of transportation,
in collaboration with the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development, and local economic development agencies, and other interested
public and private organizations, shall develop a cooperative process to
conduct community and business information programs and to regularly
disseminate information on rail matters.

Sec.
134. RCW
53.36.030 and 1996 c 66 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a port district may at any time
contract indebtedness or borrow money for district purposes and may issue
general obligation bonds therefor not exceeding an amount, together with any
existing indebtedness of the district not authorized by the voters, of
one-fourth of one percent of the value of the taxable property in the district.

(b)
Port districts having less than eight hundred million dollars in value of
taxable property during 1991 may at any time contract indebtedness or borrow
money for port district purposes and may issue general obligation bonds
therefor not exceeding an amount, combined with existing indebtedness of the
district not authorized by the voters, of three-eighths of one percent of the
value of the taxable property in the district. Prior to contracting for any
indebtedness authorized by this subsection (1)(b), the port district must have
a comprehensive plan for harbor improvements or industrial development and a
long-term financial plan approved by the department of community((, trade,
and economic)) development. The department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development is immune from any liability for its part in
reviewing or approving port district's improvement or development plans, or
financial plans. Any indebtedness authorized by this subsection (1)(b) may be
used only to acquire or construct a facility, and, prior to contracting for
such indebtedness, the port district must have a lease contract for a minimum
of five years for the facility to be acquired or constructed by the debt.

(2)
With the assent of three-fifths of the voters voting thereon at a general or
special port election called for that purpose, a port district may contract
indebtedness or borrow money for district purposes and may issue general
obligation bonds therefor provided the total indebtedness of the district at
any such time shall not exceed three-fourths of one percent of the value of the
taxable property in the district.

(3)
In addition to the indebtedness authorized under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, port districts having less than two hundred million dollars in
value of taxable property and operating a municipal airport may at any time
contract indebtedness or borrow money for airport capital improvement purposes
and may issue general obligation bonds therefor not exceeding an additional
one-eighth of one percent of the value of the taxable property in the district
without authorization by the voters; and, with the assent of three-fifths of
the voters voting thereon at a general or special port election called for that
purpose, may contract indebtedness or borrow money for airport capital
improvement purposes and may issue general obligation bonds therefor for an
additional three-eighths of one percent provided the total indebtedness of the
district for all port purposes at any such time shall not exceed one and
one-fourth percent of the value of the taxable property in the district.

(4)
Any port district may issue general district bonds evidencing any indebtedness,
payable at any time not exceeding fifty years from the date of the bonds. Any
contract for indebtedness or borrowed money authorized by RCW 53.36.030(1)(b)
shall not exceed twenty-five years. The bonds shall be issued and sold in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

(5)
Elections required under this section shall be held as provided in RCW
39.36.050.

(6)
For the purpose of this section, "indebtedness of the district" shall
not include any debt of a county-wide district with a population less than
twenty-five hundred people when the debt is secured by a mortgage on property
leased to the federal government; and the term "value of the taxable
property" shall have the meaning set forth in RCW 39.36.015.

(7)
This section does not apply to a loan made under a loan agreement under chapter
39.69 RCW, and a computation of indebtedness under this chapter must exclude
the amount of a loan under such a loan agreement.

Sec.
135. RCW
59.24.020 and 1995 c 399 s 157 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
establish the rental security deposit guarantee program. Through this program
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
provide grants and technical assistance to local governments or nonprofit
corporations, including local housing authorities as defined in RCW 35.82.030,
who operate emergency housing shelters or transitional housing programs. The
grants are to be used for the payment of residential rental security deposits
under this chapter. The technical assistance is to help the local government
or nonprofit corporation apply for grants and carry out the program. In order
to be eligible for grants under this program, the recipient local government or
nonprofit corporation shall provide fifteen percent of the total amount needed
for the security deposit. The security deposit may include last month's rent
where such rent is required as a normal practice by the landlord.

(2)
The grants and matching funds shall be placed by the recipient local government
or nonprofit corporation in a revolving loan fund and deposited in a bank or
savings institution in an account that is separate from all other funds of the
recipient. The funds and interest earned on these funds shall be utilized only
as collateral to guarantee the payment of a security deposit required by a
residential rental property owner as a condition for entering into a rental
agreement with a prospective tenant.

(3)
Prospective tenants who are eligible to participate in the rental security
deposit guarantee program shall be limited to homeless persons or families who
are residing in an emergency shelter or transitional housing operated by a
local government or a nonprofit corporation, or to families who are temporarily
residing in a park, car, or are otherwise without adequate shelter. The local
government or nonprofit corporation shall make a determination regarding the
person's or family's eligibility to participate in this program and a
determination that a local rental unit is available for occupation. A
determination of eligibility shall include, but is not limited to: (a) A
determination that the person or family is homeless or is in transitional
housing; (b) a verification of income and that the person or family can
reasonably make the monthly rental payment; and (c) a determination that the
person or family does not have the financial resources to make the rental
security deposit.

Sec.
136. RCW
59.24.050 and 1995 c 399 s 158 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development may adopt
rules to implement this chapter, including but not limited to: (1) The
eligibility of and the application process for local governments and nonprofit
corporations; (2) the criteria by which grants and technical assistance shall
be provided to local governments and nonprofit corporations; and (3) the
criteria local governments and nonprofit corporations shall use in entering
into contracts with tenants and rental property owners.

Sec.
137. RCW
59.24.060 and 1995 c 399 s 159 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development may receive
such gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources, as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, to be used by the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development for its programs,
including the rental security deposit guarantee program. Funds from the
housing trust fund, chapter 43.185 RCW, up to one hundred thousand dollars, may
be used for the rental security deposit guarantee program by the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development, local governments, and
nonprofit organizations, provided all the requirements of this chapter and
chapter 43.185 RCW are met.

Sec.
138. RCW
66.08.195 and 1995 c 159 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter:

(1)
"Border area" means any incorporated city or town located within
seven miles of the Washington-Canadian border or any unincorporated area that
is a point of land surrounded on three sides by saltwater and adjacent to the
Canadian border.

(2)
"Border area per-capita law-enforcement spending" equals total per
capita expenditures in a border area on: Law enforcement operating costs,
court costs, law enforcement-related insurance, and detention expenses, minus
funds allocated to a border area under RCW 66.08.190 and 66.08.196.

(3)
"Border-crossing traffic total" means the number of vehicles,
vessels, and aircraft crossing into the United States through a United States
customs service border crossing that enter into the border area during a
federal fiscal year, using border crossing statistics and criteria included in
guidelines adopted by the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development.

(4)
"Border-related crime statistic" means the sum of infractions and
citations issued, and arrests of persons permanently residing outside
Washington state in a border area during a calendar year.

Sec.
139. RCW
66.08.198 and 1995 c 159 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
develop guidelines to determine the figures used under the three distribution
factors defined in RCW 66.08.195. At the request of any border community, the
department may review these guidelines once every three years.

Sec.
140. RCW
67.38.070 and 1995 c 399 s 167 are each amended to read as follows:

The
comprehensive cultural arts, stadium and convention plan adopted by the
district shall be reviewed by the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development to determine:

(1)
Whether the plan will enhance the progress of the state and provide for the
general welfare of the population; and

(2)
Whether such plan is eligible for matching federal funds.

After
reviewing the comprehensive cultural arts, stadium and convention plan, the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall have
sixty days in which to approve such plan and to certify to the state treasurer
that such district shall be eligible to receive funds. To be approved a plan
shall provide for coordinated cultural arts, stadium and convention planning,
and be consistent with the public cultural arts, stadium and convention
coordination criteria in a manner prescribed by chapter 35.60 RCW. In the
event such comprehensive plan is disapproved and ruled ineligible to receive
funds, the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development
shall provide written notice to the district within thirty days as to the
reasons for such plan's disapproval and such ineligibility. The district may
resubmit such plan upon reconsideration and correction of such deficiencies
cited in such notice of disapproval.

Sec.
141. RCW
68.60.030 and 1995 c 399 s 168 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The archaeological and historical division of the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development may grant by nontransferable certificate
authority to maintain and protect an abandoned cemetery upon application made
by a preservation organization which has been incorporated for the purpose of
restoring, maintaining, and protecting an abandoned cemetery. Such authority
shall be limited to the care, maintenance, restoration, protection, and
historical preservation of the abandoned cemetery, and shall not include
authority to make burials, unless specifically granted by the cemetery board.

(b)
Those preservation and maintenance corporations that are granted authority to
maintain and protect an abandoned cemetery shall be entitled to hold and possess
burial records, maps, and other historical documents as may exist. Maintenance
and preservation corporations that are granted authority to maintain and
protect an abandoned cemetery shall not be liable to those claiming burial
rights, ancestral ownership, or to any other person or organization alleging to
have control by any form of conveyance not previously recorded at the county
auditor's office within the county in which the abandoned cemetery exists.
Such organizations shall not be liable for any reasonable alterations made
during restoration work on memorials, roadways, walkways, features, plantings,
or any other detail of the abandoned cemetery.

(c)
Should the maintenance and preservation corporation be dissolved, the
archaeological and historical division of the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development shall revoke the certificate of
authority.

(d)
Maintenance and preservation corporations that are granted authority to
maintain and protect an abandoned cemetery may establish care funds pursuant to
chapter 68.44 RCW, and shall report in accordance with chapter 68.44 RCW to the
state cemetery board.

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development may, in its sole
discretion, authorize any Washington nonprofit corporation that is not
expressly incorporated for the purpose of restoring, maintaining, and
protecting an abandoned cemetery, to restore, maintain, and protect one or more
abandoned cemeteries. The authorization may include the right of access to any
burial records, maps, and other historical documents, but shall not include the
right to be the permanent custodian of original records, maps, or documents.
This authorization shall be granted by a nontransferable certificate of
authority. Any nonprofit corporation authorized and acting under this
subsection is immune from liability to the same extent as if it were a
preservation organization holding a certificate of authority under subsection
(1) of this section.

(3)
The department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
establish standards and guidelines for granting certificates of authority under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section to assure that any restoration,
maintenance, and protection activities authorized under this subsection are
conducted and supervised in an appropriate manner.

Sec.
142. RCW
70.05.125 and 1998 c 266 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The county public health account is created in the state treasury. Funds
deposited in the county public health account shall be distributed by the state
treasurer to each local public health jurisdiction based upon amounts certified
to it by the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development in consultation with the Washington state association of counties.
The account shall include funds distributed under RCW ((82.44.110 and))
82.14.200(8) and such funds as are appropriated to the account from the health
services account under RCW 43.72.900, the public health services account under
RCW 43.72.902, and such other funds as the legislature may appropriate to it.

(2)(a)
The director of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development shall certify the amounts to be distributed to each local public
health jurisdiction using 1995 as the base year of actual city contributions to
local public health.

(b)
Only if funds are available and in an amount no greater than available funds
under RCW 82.14.200(8), the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development shall adjust the amount certified under (a) of this subsection to
compensate for any annexation of an area with fifty thousand residents or more
to any city as a result of a petition during calendar year 1996 or 1997, or for
any city that became newly incorporated as a result of an election during
calendar year 1994 or 1995. The amount to be adjusted shall be equal to the
amount which otherwise would have been lost to the health jurisdiction due to
the annexation or incorporation as calculated using the jurisdiction's 1995
funding formula.

(c)
The county treasurer shall certify the actual 1995 city contribution to the
department. Funds in excess of the base shall be distributed proportionately
among the health jurisdictions based on incorporated population figures as last
determined by the office of financial management.

(3)
Moneys distributed under this section shall be expended exclusively for local
public health purposes.

Sec.
143. RCW
70.95.260 and 1995 c 399 s 189 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall in addition to its other powers and duties:

(1)
Cooperate with the appropriate federal, state, interstate and local units of
government and with appropriate private organizations in carrying out the
provisions of this chapter.

(2)
Coordinate the development of a solid waste management plan for all areas of
the state in cooperation with local government, the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development, and other appropriate state and regional
agencies. The plan shall relate to solid waste management for twenty years in
the future and shall be reviewed biennially, revised as necessary, and extended
so that perpetually the plan shall look to the future for twenty years as a guide
in carrying out a state coordinated solid waste management program. The plan
shall be developed into a single integrated document and shall be adopted no
later than October 1990. The plan shall be revised regularly after its initial
completion so that local governments revising local comprehensive solid waste
management plans can take advantage of the data and analysis in the state plan.

(3)
Provide technical assistance to any person as well as to cities, counties, and
industries.

(4)
Initiate, conduct, and support research, demonstration projects, and
investigations, and coordinate research programs pertaining to solid waste
management systems.

(5)
Develop state-wide programs to increase public awareness of and participation
in tire recycling, and to stimulate and encourage local private tire recycling
centers and public participation in tire recycling.

(6)
May, under the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05
RCW, as now or hereafter amended, from time to time promulgate such rules ((and
regulations)) as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Sec.
144. RCW
70.95.265 and 1995 c 399 s 190 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall work closely with the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development, the department of general administration, and with
other state departments and agencies, the Washington state association of
counties, the association of Washington cities, and business associations, to carry
out the objectives and purposes of chapter 41, Laws of 1975-'76 2nd ex. sess.

Sec.
145. RCW
70.95.810 and 1998 c 245 s 132 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In order to establish the feasibility of composting food and yard wastes, the
department shall provide funds, as available, to local governments submitting a
proposal to compost such wastes.

(2)
The department, in cooperation with the department of community((, trade,
and economic)) development, may approve an application if the project can
demonstrate the essential parameters for successful composting, including, but
not limited to, cost-effectiveness, handling and safety requirements, and
current and potential markets.

Sec.
146. RCW
70.105.020 and 1994 c 264 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department after notice and public hearing shall:

(1)
Adopt regulations designating as extremely hazardous wastes subject to the
provisions of this chapter those substances which exhibit characteristics
consistent with the definition provided in RCW 70.105.010(6);

(2)
Adopt and may revise when appropriate, minimum standards and regulations for
disposal of extremely hazardous wastes to protect against hazards to the
public, and to the environment. Before adoption of such standards and
regulations, the department shall consult with appropriate agencies of
interested local governments and secure technical assistance from the
department of agriculture, the department of social and health services, the
department of fish and wildlife, the department of natural resources, the
department of labor and industries, and the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development, through the director of fire protection.

Sec.
147. RCW
72.09.055 and 1995 c 399 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall identify and catalog real property that is no longer
required for department purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable
housing for very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as
defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory shall include the location,
approximate size, and current zoning classification of the property. The
department shall provide a copy of the inventory to the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development by November 1, 1993, and
every November 1st thereafter.

(2) By November 1st of each year, beginning in 1994, the
department shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no
longer available for the development of affordable housing. The department
shall include an updated listing of real property that has become available
since the last update. As used in this section, "real property" means
buildings, land, or buildings and land.

Sec.
148. RCW
72.65.210 and 1998 c 245 s 142 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall establish, by rule, inmate eligibility standards for
participation in the work release program.

(2)
The department shall:

(a)
Conduct an annual examination of each work release facility and its security
procedures;

(b)
Investigate and set standards for the inmate supervision policies of each work
release facility;

(c)
Establish physical standards for future work release structures to ensure the
safety of inmates, employees, and the surrounding communities;

(d)
Evaluate its recordkeeping of serious infractions to determine if infractions
are properly and consistently assessed against inmates eligible for work
release;

(e)
The department shall establish a written treatment plan best suited to the
inmate's needs, cost, and the relationship of community placement and community
corrections officers to a system of case management;

(f)
Adopt a policy to encourage businesses employing work release inmates to
contact the appropriate work release facility whenever an inmate is absent from
his or her work schedule. The department of corrections shall provide each
employer with written information and instructions on who should be called if a
work release employee is absent from work or leaves the job site without
authorization; and

(g)
Develop a siting policy, in conjunction with cities, counties, community
groups, and the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development for the establishment of additional work release facilities. Such
policy shall include at least the following elements: (i) Guidelines for
appropriate site selection of work-release facilities; (ii) notification requirements
to local government and community groups of intent to site a work release
facility; and (iii) guidelines for effective community relations by the work
release program operator.

The
department shall comply with the requirements of this section by July 1, 1990.

Sec.
149. RCW
74.08A.010 and 1997 c 58 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A family that includes an adult who has received temporary assistance for needy
families for sixty months after July 27, 1997, shall be ineligible for further
temporary assistance for needy families assistance.

(2)
For the purposes of applying the rules of this section, the department shall
count any month in which an adult family member received a temporary assistance
for needy families cash assistance grant unless the assistance was provided
when the family member was a minor child and not the head of the household or
married to the head of the household.

(3)
The department shall refer recipients who require specialized assistance to
appropriate department programs, crime victims' programs through the department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development, or the crime victims'
compensation program of the department of labor and industries.

(4)
The department may exempt a recipient and the recipient's family from the
application of subsection (1) of this section by reason of hardship or if the recipient
meets the family violence options of section 402(A)(7) of Title IVA of the
federal social security act as amended by P.L. 104-193. The number of
recipients and their families exempted from subsection (1) of this section for
a fiscal year shall not exceed twenty percent of the average monthly number of
recipients and their families to which assistance is provided under the
temporary assistance for needy families program.

(5)
The department shall not exempt a recipient and his or her family from the
application of subsection (1) of this section until after the recipient has
received fifty-two months of assistance under this chapter.

Sec.
150. RCW
74.14B.060 and 1996 c 123 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Treatment services for children who have been sexually assaulted must be
designed and delivered in a manner that accommodates their unique developmental
needs and also considers the impact of family dynamics on treatment issues. In
addition, the complexity of the civil and criminal justice systems requires
that children who are involved receive appropriate consideration and attention
that recognizes their unique vulnerability in a system designed primarily for
adults.

(2)
The department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
provide, subject to available funds, comprehensive sexual assault services to
sexually abused children and their families. The department shall provide
treatment services by qualified, registered, certified, or licensed
professionals on a one-to-one or group basis as may be deemed appropriate.

(3)
Funds appropriated under this section shall be provided solely for contracts or
direct purchase of specific treatment services from community organizations and
private service providers for child victims of sexual assault and sexual
abuse. Funds shall be disbursed through the request for proposal or request
for qualifications process.

(4)
As part of the request for proposal or request for qualifications process the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
ensure that there be no duplication of services with existing programs
including the crime victims' compensation program as provided in chapter 7.68
RCW. The department shall also ensure that victims exhaust private insurance
benefits available to the child victim before providing services to the child
victim under this section.

Sec.
151. RCW
79A.30.050 and 1995 c 200 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If the authority and state agencies find it mutually beneficial to do so, they
are authorized to collaborate and cooperate on projects of shared interest.
Agencies authorized to collaborate with the authority include but are not
limited to: The commission for activities and projects related to public
recreation; the department of agriculture for projects related to the equine
agricultural industry; the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development with respect to community and economic development and tourism
issues associated with development of the state horse park; Washington State
University with respect to opportunities for animal research, education, and
extension; the department of ecology with respect to opportunities for making
the state horse park's waste treatment facilities a demonstration model for the
handling of waste to protect water quality; and with local community colleges
with respect to programs related to horses, economic development, business, and
tourism.

(2)
The authority shall cooperate with 4-H clubs, pony clubs, youth groups, and
local park departments to provide youth recreational activities. The authority
shall also provide for preferential use of an area of the horse park facility
for youth and the disabled at nominal cost.

Sec.
152. RCW
79A.50.100 and 1995 c 399 s 209 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A public hearing may be held prior to any withdrawal of state trust lands and
shall be held prior to any revocation of withdrawal or modification of
withdrawal of state trust lands used for recreational purposes by the
department of natural resources or by other state agencies.

(2)
The department shall cause notice of the withdrawal, revocation of withdrawal
or modification of withdrawal of state trust lands as described in subsection
(1) of this section to be published by advertisement once a week for four weeks
prior to the public hearing in at least one newspaper published and of general
circulation in the county or counties in which the state trust lands are
situated, and by causing a copy of said notice to be posted in a conspicuous
place in the department's Olympia office, in the district office in which the
land is situated, and in the office of the county auditor in the county where
the land is situated thirty days prior to the public hearing. The notice shall
specify the time and place of the public hearing and shall describe with
particularity each parcel of state trust lands involved in said hearing.

(3)
The board of natural resources shall administer the hearing according to its
prescribed rules and regulations.

(4)
The board of natural resources shall determine the most beneficial use or
combination of uses of the state trust lands. Its decision will be conclusive as
to the matter: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That said decisions as to uses shall conform
to applicable state plans and policy guidelines adopted by the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development.

Sec.
153. RCW
84.36.560 and 1999 c 203 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The real and personal property owned or used by a nonprofit in providing rental
housing for very low-income households is exempt from taxation if:

(a)
The benefit of the exemption inures to the nonprofit organization, association,
or corporation;

(b)
At least seventy-five percent of the occupied dwelling units in the rental
housing are occupied by very low-income households; and

(c)
The rental housing was insured, financed, or assisted in whole or in part
through:

(i)
A federal or state housing program administered by the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development; or

(ii)
An affordable housing levy authorized under RCW 84.52.105.

(2)
If less than seventy-five percent of the dwelling units are occupied by very
low-income households, the rental housing used to provide housing for very
low-income households is eligible for a partial exemption on the real property
and a total exemption of the housing's personal property as follows:

(a)
The partial exemption shall be allowed for each dwelling unit in the rental
housing occupied by very low-income households.

(b)
The amount of exemption shall be calculated by multiplying the assessed value
of the property reasonably necessary to provide the rental housing by a
fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the number of dwelling units
occupied by very low-income households as of January 1st of the year for which
the exemption is claimed. The denominator of the fraction is the total number
of occupied dwelling units as of January 1st of the year for which exemption is
claimed.

(3)
Rental housing for very low-income households is exempt from property taxation
only if the nonprofit operating the housing is exempt from income tax under
section 501(c) of the federal internal revenue code.

(4)
To be exempt under this section, the property must be used exclusively for the
purposes for which exemption is granted, except as provided in RCW 84.36.805.

(5)
The nonprofit qualifying for the exemption under this section by providing
rental housing for very low-income households may agree to make payments to the
city, county, or other political subdivision for improvements, services, and
facilities furnished by the city, county, or political subdivision for the
benefit of the rental housing. However, these payments shall not exceed the
amount last levied as the annual tax of the city, county, or political
subdivision upon the property prior to exemption.

(6)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Occupied dwelling unit" means a living unit that is occupied on
January 1st of the year in which the claim for exemption is submitted;

(b)
"Rental housing" means residential housing that is occupied but not
owned by very low-income households;

(c)
"Very low-income households" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is at or below fifty percent of
the median income adjusted for family size as most recently determined by the
federal department of housing and urban development for the county in which the
rental housing is located and in effect as of January 1st of the year the
application for exemption is submitted; and

(d)
"Nonprofit" means a nonprofit as defined in RCW 84.36.800 and
includes a limited partnership where the nonprofit or a public corporation
established under RCW 35.21.660, 35.21.670, and 35.21.730 is a general partner,
or a limited liability company where the nonprofit or the public corporation is
a managing member.

Sec.
154. RCW
88.02.053 and 1996 c 3 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The maritime historic restoration and preservation account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the voluntary donations made
simultaneously with the registration of vessels under chapter 88.02 RCW shall
be deposited into this account. These deposits are not public funds and are
not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

(2)
At the end of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall pay from this account
to the department of licensing an amount equal to the reasonable administrative
expenses of that agency for that fiscal year for collecting the voluntary
donations and transmitting them to the state treasurer and shall pay to the
state treasurer an amount equal to the reasonable administrative expenses of
that agency for that fiscal year for maintaining the account and disbursing
funds from the account.

(3)
At the end of each fiscal year, the state treasurer shall pay one-half of the
balance of the funds in the account after payment of the administrative costs
provided in subsection (2) of this section, to the Grays Harbor historical
seaport or its corporate successor and the remainder to the Steamer Virginia V
foundation or its corporate successor.

(4)
If either the Grays Harbor historical seaport and its corporate successors or
the Steamer Virginia V foundation and its corporate successors legally ceases
to exist, the state treasurer shall, at the end of each fiscal year, pay the
balance of the funds in the account to the remaining organization.

(5)
If both the Grays Harbor historical seaport and its corporate successors and
the Steamer Virginia V foundation and its corporate successors legally cease to
exist, the department of licensing shall discontinue the collection of the
voluntary donations in conjunction with the registration of vessels under RCW
88.02.052, and the balance of the funds in the account escheat to the state.
If funds in the account escheat to the state, one-half of the fund balance
shall be provided to the office of archaeology and historic preservation and
the remainder shall be deposited into the parks renewal and stewardship
account.

(6)
The secretary of state, the directors of the state historical societies, the
director of the office of archaeology and historic preservation within the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development, and two
members representing the recreational boating community appointed by the
secretary of state, shall review the success of the voluntary donation program
for maritime historic restoration and preservation established under RCW
88.02.052 and report their findings to the appropriate legislative committees
by January 31, 1998. The findings must include the progress of the program and
the potential to expand the voluntary funding to other historic vessels.

Sec.
155. RCW
90.03.247 and 1996 c 186 s 523 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
an application for a permit to make beneficial use of public waters is approved
relating to a stream or other water body for which minimum flows or levels have
been adopted and are in effect at the time of approval, the permit shall be
conditioned to protect the levels or flows. No agency may establish minimum
flows and levels or similar water flow or level restrictions for any stream or
lake of the state other than the department of ecology whose authority to
establish is exclusive, as provided in chapter 90.03 RCW and RCW 90.22.010 and
90.54.040. The provisions of other statutes, including but not limited to RCW
75.20.100 and chapter 43.21C RCW, may not be interpreted in a manner that is
inconsistent with this section. In establishing such minimum flows, levels, or
similar restrictions, the department shall, during all stages of development by
the department of ecology of minimum flow proposals, consult with, and
carefully consider the recommendations of, the department of fish and wildlife,
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development, the
department of agriculture, and representatives of the affected Indian tribes.
Nothing herein shall preclude the department of fish and wildlife, the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development, or the
department of agriculture from presenting its views on minimum flow needs at
any public hearing or to any person or agency, and the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development,
and the department of agriculture are each empowered to participate in
proceedings of the federal energy regulatory commission and other agencies to
present its views on minimum flow needs.

PART
2

REFERENCES TO DEPARTMENT
OF TRADE AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Sec.
201. RCW
19.27A.020 and 1998 c 245 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No later than January 1, 1991, the state building code council shall adopt
rules to be known as the Washington state energy code as part of the state
building code.

(2)
The council shall follow the legislature's standards set forth in this section
to adopt rules to be known as the Washington state energy code. The Washington
state energy code shall be designed to require new buildings to meet a certain
level of energy efficiency, but allow flexibility in building design,
construction, and heating equipment efficiencies within that framework. The
Washington state energy code shall be designed to allow space heating equipment
efficiency to offset or substitute for building envelope thermal performance.

(3)
The Washington state energy code shall take into account regional climatic
conditions. Climate zone 1 shall include all counties not included in climate
zone 2. Climate zone 2 includes: Adams, Chelan, Douglas, Ferry, Grant,
Kittitas, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend Oreille, Spokane, Stevens, and Whitman
counties.

(4)
The Washington state energy code for residential buildings shall require:

(a)
New residential buildings that are space heated with electric resistance
heating systems to achieve energy use equivalent to that used in typical
buildings constructed with:

(i)
Ceilings insulated to a level of R‑38. The code shall contain an
exception which permits single rafter or joist vaulted ceilings insulated to a
level of R‑30 7 value
includes insulation only);

(ii)
In zone 1, walls insulated to a level of R‑19 7 value includes insulation only), or constructed with two
by four members, R‑13 insulation batts, R‑3.2 insulated sheathing,
and other normal assembly components; in zone 2 walls insulated to a level of R‑24
7 value includes insulation
only), or constructed with two by six members, R‑22 insulation batts, R‑3.2
insulated sheathing, and other normal construction assembly components; for the
purpose of determining equivalent thermal performance, the wall U-value shall
be 0.058 in zone 1 and 0.044 in zone 2;

(iii)
Below grade walls, insulated on the interior side, to a level of R‑19 or,
if insulated on the exterior side, to a level of R‑10 in zone 1 and R‑12
in zone 2 7 value includes insulation
only);

(iv)
Floors over unheated spaces insulated to a level of R‑30 7 value includes insulation only);

(v)
Slab on grade floors insulated to a level of R‑10 at the perimeter;

(vi)
Double glazed windows with values not more than U‑0.4;

(vii)
In zone 1 the glazing area may be up to twenty-one percent of floor area and in
zone 2 the glazing area may be up to seventeen percent of floor area where
consideration of the thermal resistance values for other building components
and solar heat gains through the glazing result in thermal performance
equivalent to that achieved with thermal resistance values for other components
determined in accordance with the equivalent thermal performance criteria of
(a) of this subsection and glazing area equal to fifteen percent of the floor
area. Throughout the state for the purposes of determining equivalent thermal
performance, the maximum glazing area shall be fifteen percent of the floor
area; and

(viii)
Exterior doors insulated to a level of R‑5; or an exterior wood door with
a thermal resistance value of less than R‑5 and values for other
components determined in accordance with the equivalent thermal performance
criteria of (a) of this subsection.

(b)
New residential buildings which are space-heated with all other forms of space
heating to achieve energy use equivalent to that used in typical buildings
constructed with:

(i)
Ceilings insulated to a level of R‑30 in zone 1 and R‑38 in zone 2
the code shall contain an exception which permits single rafter or joist
vaulted ceilings insulated to a level of R‑30 7 value includes insulation only);

(ii)
Walls insulated to a level of R‑19 7 value
includes insulation only), or constructed with two by four members, R‑13
insulation batts, R‑3.2 insulated sheathing, and other normal assembly
components;

(iii)
Below grade walls, insulated on the interior side, to a level of R‑19 or,
if insulated on the exterior side, to a level of R‑10 in zone 1 and R‑12
in zone 2 7 value includes insulation
only);

(iv)
Floors over unheated spaces insulated to a level of R‑19 in zone 1 and R‑30
in zone 2 7 value includes insulation
only);

(v)
Slab on grade floors insulated to a level of R‑10 at the perimeter;

(vi)
Heat pumps with a minimum heating season performance factor (HSPF) of 6.8 or
with all other energy sources with a minimum annual fuel utilization efficiency
(AFUE) of seventy-eight percent;

(vii)
Double glazed windows with values not more than U‑0.65 in zone 1 and U‑0.60
in zone 2. The state building code council, in consultation with the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development,
shall review these U-values, and, if economically justified for consumers,
shall amend the Washington state energy code to improve the U-values by
December 1, 1993. The amendment shall not take effect until July 1, 1994; and

(viii)
In zone 1, the maximum glazing area shall be twenty-one percent of the floor
area. In zone 2 the maximum glazing area shall be seventeen percent of the
floor area. Throughout the state for the purposes of determining equivalent
thermal performance, the maximum glazing area shall be fifteen percent of the
floor area.

(c)
The requirements of (b)(ii) of this subsection do not apply to residences with
log or solid timber walls with a minimum average thickness of three and
one-half inches and with space heat other than electric resistance.

(d)
The state building code council may approve an energy code for pilot projects
of residential construction that use innovative energy efficiency technologies
intended to result in savings that are greater than those realized in the
levels specified in this section.

(5)
U-values for glazing shall be determined using the area weighted average of all
glazing in the building. U-values for vertical glazing shall be determined,
certified, and labeled in accordance with the appropriate national fenestration
rating council (NFRC) standard, as determined and adopted by the state building
code council. Certification of U-values shall be conducted by a certified,
independent agency licensed by the NFRC. The state building code council may
develop and adopt alternative methods of determining, certifying, and labeling
U-values for vertical glazing that may be used by fenestration manufacturers if
determined to be appropriate by the council. The state building code council shall
review and consider the adoption of the NFRC standards for determining,
certifying, and labeling U-values for doors and skylights when developed and
published by the NFRC. The state building code council may develop and adopt
appropriate alternative methods for determining, certifying, and labeling
U-values for doors and skylights. U-values for doors and skylights determined,
certified, and labeled in accordance with the appropriate NFRC standard shall
be acceptable for compliance with the state energy code. Sealed insulation
glass, where used, shall conform to, or be in the process of being tested for,
ASTM E‑774‑81 class A or better.

(6)
The minimum state energy code for new nonresidential buildings shall be the
Washington state energy code, 1986 edition, as amended.

(7)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the Washington state energy code
for residential structures shall preempt the residential energy code of each
city, town, and county in the state of Washington.

(b)
The state energy code for residential structures does not preempt a city, town,
or county's energy code for residential structures which exceeds the
requirements of the state energy code and which was adopted by the city, town,
or county prior to March 1, 1990. Such cities, towns, or counties may not
subsequently amend their energy code for residential structures to exceed the
requirements adopted prior to March 1, 1990.

(8)
The state building code council shall consult with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development as provided in RCW 34.05.310 prior
to publication of proposed rules. The department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall review the proposed rules for
consistency with the guidelines adopted in subsection (4) of this section. The
director of the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development shall recommend to the state building code council any
changes necessary to conform the proposed rules to the requirements of this
section.

Sec.
202. RCW
19.29A.010 and 1998 c 300 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.

(2)
"Conservation" means an increase in efficiency in the use of energy
use that yields a decrease in energy consumption while providing the same or
higher levels of service. Conservation includes low-income weatherization
programs.

(3)
"Consumer-owned utility" means a municipal electric utility formed
under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title 54 RCW, an
irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a cooperative formed under
chapter 23.86 RCW, or a mutual corporation or association formed under chapter
24.06 RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to more
than one retail electric customer in the state.

(4)
"Department" means the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(5)
"Electric meters in service" means those meters that record in at
least nine of twelve calendar months in any calendar year not less than two
hundred fifty kilowatt hours per month.

(6)
"Electric utility" means a consumer-owned or investor-owned utility
as defined in this section.

(7)
"Electricity" means electric energy measured in kilowatt hours, or
electric capacity measured in kilowatts, or both.

(8)
"Governing body" means the council of a city or town, the
commissioners of an irrigation district, municipal electric utility, or public
utility district, or the board of directors of an electric cooperative or
mutual association that has the authority to set and approve rates.

(9)
"Investor-owned utility" means a company owned by investors that
meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010 and is engaged in distributing
electricity to more than one retail electric customer in the state.

(10)
"Proprietary customer information" means: (a) Information that
relates to the source and amount of electricity used by a retail electric
customer, a retail electric customer's payment history, and household data that
is made available by the customer solely by virtue of the utility-customer
relationship; and (b) information contained in a retail electric customer's
bill.

(11)
"Renewable resources" means electricity generation facilities fueled
by: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill
gas; or (f) biomass energy based on solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or
field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include wood pieces that
have been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.

(12)
"Resale" means the purchase and subsequent sale of electricity for
profit, but does not include the purchase and the subsequent sale of
electricity at the same rate at which the electricity was purchased.

(13)
"Retail electric customer" means a person or entity that purchases
electricity for ultimate consumption and not for resale.

(14)
"Small utility" means any consumer-owned utility with twenty-five
thousand or fewer electric meters in service, or that has an average of seven
or fewer customers per mile of distribution line.

(15)
"State" means the state of Washington.

Sec.
203. RCW
28B.38.020 and 1998 c 344 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The institute shall be administered by the board of directors.

(2)
The board shall consist of the following members:

(a)
Nine members of the general public. Of the general public membership, at least
six shall be individuals who are associated with or employed by
technology-based or manufacturing-based industries and have broad business experience
and an understanding of high technology;

(b)
The executive director of the Washington technology center or the director's
designee;

(c)
The provost of Washington State University or the provost's designee;

(d)
The provost of Eastern Washington University or the provost's designee;

(e)
The provost of Central Washington University or the provost's designee;

(f)
The provost of the University of Washington or the provost's designee;

(g)
An academic representative from the Spokane community colleges;

(h)
One member from Gonzaga University; and

(i)
One member from Whitworth College.

(3)
The term of office for each board member, excluding the executive director of
the Washington technology center, the provosts of Washington State University,
Eastern Washington University, Central Washington University, and the
University of Washington, shall be three years. The executive director of the
institute shall be an ex officio, nonvoting member of the board. Board members
shall be appointed by the governor. Initial appointments shall be for
staggered terms to ensure the long-term continuity of the board. The board
shall meet at least quarterly.

(4)
The duties of the board include:

(a)
Developing the general operating policies for the institute;

(b)
Appointing the executive director of the institute;

(c)
Approving the annual operating budget of the institute;

(d)
Establishing priorities for the selection and funding of research projects that
guarantee the greatest potential return on the state's investment;

(e)
Approving and allocating funding for research projects conducted by the
institute;

(f)
In cooperation with the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development, developing a biennial work plan and five-year
strategic plan for the institute that are consistent with the state-wide
technology development and commercialization goals;

(g)
Coordinating with public, independent, and private institutions of higher
education, and other participating institutions of higher education in the
development of training, research, and development programs to be conducted at
the institute that are targeted to meet industrial needs;

(h)
Assisting the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development in the department's efforts to develop state science and
technology public policies and coordinate publicly funded programs;

(i)
Reviewing annual progress reports on funded research projects;

(j)
Providing an annual report to the governor and the legislature detailing the
activities and performance of the institute; and

(k)
Submitting annually to the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development an updated strategic plan and a statement of
performance measured against the mission, roles, and contractual obligations of
the institute.

(5) The board may enter into contracts to fulfill its
responsibilities and purposes under this chapter.

Sec.
204. RCW
28B.38.050 and 1998 c 344 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
shall contract with the institute for the expenditure of state-appropriated
funds for the operation of the institute. The department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall provide guidance to the
institute regarding expenditure of state-appropriated funds and the development
of the institute's strategic plan. The director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall not withhold funds
appropriated for the institute if the institute complies with the provisions of
its contract with the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development. The department is responsible to the legislature for the
contractual performance of the institute.

Sec.
205. RCW
43.17.065 and 1995 c 226 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Where power is vested in a department to issue permits, licenses,
certifications, contracts, grants, or otherwise authorize action on the part of
individuals, businesses, local governments, or public or private organizations,
such power shall be exercised in an expeditious manner. All departments with
such power shall cooperate with officials of the business assistance center of
the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development, and any other state officials, when such officials request timely
action on the part of the issuing department.

(2)
After August 1, 1991, any agency to which subsection (1) of this section
applies shall, with regard to any permits or other actions that are necessary
for economic development in rural natural resources impact areas, as defined in
RCW 43.31.601, respond to any completed application within forty-five days of
its receipt; any response, at a minimum, shall include:

(a)
The specific steps that the applicant needs to take in order to have the
application approved; and

(b)
The assistance that will be made available to the applicant by the agency to
expedite the application process.

(3)
The agency rural community assistance task force established in RCW 43.31.621
shall oversee implementation of this section.

(4)
Each agency shall define what constitutes a completed application and make this
definition available to applicants.

Sec.
206. RCW
43.20A.750 and 1997 c 367 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of social and health services shall help families and workers in
rural natural resources impact areas make the transition through economic difficulties
and shall provide services to assist workers to gain marketable skills. The
department, as a member of the agency rural community assistance task force
and, where appropriate, under an interagency agreement with the department of
((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development, shall provide
grants through the office of the secretary for services to the unemployed in
rural natural resources impact areas and to dislocated salmon fishing workers
as defined in RCW 43.63A.021 who live in urban areas of qualifying rural
natural resource impact counties, including providing direct or referral
services, establishing and operating service delivery programs, and
coordinating delivery programs and delivery of services. These grants may be
awarded for family support centers, reemployment centers, or other local
service agencies.

(2)
The services provided through the grants may include, but need not be limited
to: Credit counseling; social services including marital counseling;
psychotherapy or psychological counseling; mortgage foreclosures and utilities
problems counseling; drug and alcohol abuse services; medical services; and
residential heating and food acquisition.

(3)
Funding for these services shall be coordinated through the agency rural community
assistance task force which will establish a fund to provide child care
assistance, mortgage assistance, and counseling which cannot be met through
current programs. No funds shall be used for additional full-time equivalents
for administering this section.

(4)(a)
Grants for family support centers are intended to provide support to families
by responding to needs identified by the families and communities served by the
centers. Services provided by family support centers may include parenting
education, child development assessments, health and nutrition education,
counseling, and information and referral services. Such services may be
provided directly by the center or through referral to other agencies
participating in the interagency team.

(b)
The department shall consult with the council on child abuse or neglect
regarding grants for family support centers.

(5)
"Rural natural resources impact area" means:

(a)
A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that meets
three of the five criteria set forth in subsection (6) of this section;

(b)
A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty thousand in the
1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five criteria as set forth in
subsection (6) of this section; or

(c)
A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that is located
in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five criteria set forth in
subsection (6) of this section.

(6)
For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact areas, the
following criteria shall be considered:

(a)
A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(b)
A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(c)
Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses of one hundred
positions or more;

(d)
Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses of one hundred
positions or more; and

(e)
An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state average. The
counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by the employment
security department for the most recent year for which data is available. For
the purposes of administration of programs under this chapter, the United
States post office five-digit zip code delivery areas will be used to determine
residence status for eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition,
a zip code delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an
urbanized area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by
zip codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also considered
nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make available a zip
code listing of the areas to all agencies and organizations providing services
under this chapter.

Sec.
207. RCW
43.31.805 and 1998 c 345 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state trade fair fund is created in the custody of the state treasury. All
moneys received by the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development for the purposes of this fund shall be deposited into
the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only for the purpose of
assisting state trade fairs. Only the director of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development or the director's designee may
authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
expenditures.

Sec.
208. RCW
43.63A.230 and 1993 c 280 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
integrate an employee ownership program within its existing technical
assistance programs. The employee ownership program shall provide technical
assistance to cooperatives authorized under chapter 23.78 RCW and conduct
educational programs on employee ownership and self-management. The department
shall include information on the option of employee ownership wherever
appropriate in its various programs.

(2)
The department shall maintain a list of firms and individuals with expertise in
the field of employee ownership and utilize such firms and individuals, as
appropriate, in delivering and coordinating the delivery of technical,
managerial, and educational services. In addition, the department shall work
with and rely on the services of the employment security department and state
institutions of higher education to promote employee ownership.

(3)
((The department shall report to the governor, the appropriate economic
development committees of the senate and the house of representatives, and the ways
and means committees of each house by December 1 of 1988, and each year
thereafter, on the accomplishments of the employee-ownership program. Such
reports shall include the number and types of firms assisted, the number of
jobs created by such firms, the types of services, the number of workshops
presented, the number of employees trained, and the results of client
satisfaction surveys distributed to those using the services of the program.

(4))) For
purposes of this section, an employee stock ownership plan qualifies as a
cooperative if at least fifty percent, plus one share, of its voting shares of
stock are voted on a one-person-one-vote basis.

Sec.
209. RCW
43.88.093 and 1998 c 299 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When developing a biennial budget for the tourism development division of the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development,
the request for funding submitted to the office of financial management shall
be calculated according to the formula in RCW 43.88.094. The request shall be
a specific designated amount in the budget request for the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development.

(2)
This section expires June 30, 2008.

Sec.
210. RCW
50.38.030 and 1995 c 399 s 142 are each amended to read as follows:

The
employment security department shall consult with the following agencies prior
to the issuance of the state occupational forecast:

(1)
Office of financial management;

(2)
Department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development;

(3)
Department of labor and industries;

(4)
State board for community and technical colleges;

(5)
Superintendent of public instruction;

(6)
Department of social and health services;

(7)
Work force training and education coordinating board; and

(8)
Other state and local agencies as deemed appropriate by the commissioner of the
employment security department.

These
agencies shall cooperate with the employment security department, submitting
information relevant to the generation of occupational forecasts.

Sec.
211. RCW
67.28.8001 and 1997 c 452 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each municipality imposing a tax under chapter 67.28 RCW shall submit a report
to the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development on October 1, 1998, and October 1, 2000. Each report shall include
the following information:

(a)
The rate of tax imposed under chapter 67.28 RCW;

(b)
The total revenue received under chapter 67.28 RCW for each of the preceding
six years;

(c)
A list of projects and activities funded with revenue received under chapter
67.28 RCW; and

(d)
The amount of revenue under chapter 67.28 RCW expended for each project and
activity.

(2)
The department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development shall summarize and analyze the data received under subsection (1)
of this section in a report submitted to the legislature on January 1, 1999,
and January 1, 2001. The report shall include, but not be limited to, analysis
of factors contributing to growth in revenue received under chapter 67.28 RCW
and the effects of projects and activities funded with revenue received under
chapter 67.28 RCW on tourism growth.

PART
3

REFERENCES
TO DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AND

DEPARTMENT OF
TRADE AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Sec.
301. RCW
43.06.115 and 1998 c 245 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governor may, by executive order, after consultation with or notification
of the executive-legislative committee on economic development created by
chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5300), Laws of 1993, declare a
community to be a "military impacted area." A "military
impacted area" means a community or communities, as identified in the
executive order, that experience serious social and economic hardships because
of a change in defense spending by the federal government in that community or
communities.

(2)
If the governor executes an order under subsection (1) of this section, the
governor shall establish a response team to coordinate state efforts to assist
the military impacted community. The response team may include, but not be
limited to, one member from each of the following agencies: (a) The department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development; (b) the department
of trade and economic development; (c) the department of social and health
services; (((c))) (d) the employment security department; (((d)))
(e) the state board for community and technical colleges; (((e)))
(f) the higher education coordinating board; and (((f))) (g)
the department of transportation. The governor may appoint a response team
coordinator. The governor shall seek to actively involve the impacted
community or communities in planning and implementing a response to the
crisis. The governor may seek input or assistance from the community diversification
advisory committee, and the governor may establish task forces in the community
or communities to assist in the coordination and delivery of services to the
local community. The state and community response shall consider economic
development, human service, and training needs of the community or communities
impacted.

Sec.
302. RCW
43.21J.030 and 1998 c 245 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is created the environmental enhancement and job creation task force
within the office of the governor. The purpose of the task force is to provide
a coordinated and comprehensive approach to implementation of chapter 516, Laws
of 1993. The task force shall consist of the commissioner of public lands, the
director of the department of fish and wildlife, the director of the department
of ecology, the director of the parks and recreation commission, the timber
team coordinator, the executive director of the work force training and
education coordinating board, and the executive director of the Puget Sound ((water
quality authority)) action team, or their designees. The task force
may seek the advice of the following agencies and organizations: The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development, the
department of trade and economic development, the conservation commission,
the employment security department, the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation, appropriate federal agencies, appropriate special districts, the
Washington state association of counties, the association of Washington cities,
labor organizations, business organizations, timber-dependent communities,
environmental organizations, and Indian tribes. The governor shall appoint the
task force chair. Members of the task force shall serve without additional
pay. Participation in the work of the committee by agency members shall be
considered in performance of their employment. The governor shall designate
staff and administrative support to the task force and shall solicit the
participation of agency personnel to assist the task force.

(2)
The task force shall have the following responsibilities:

(a)
Soliciting and evaluating, in accordance with the criteria set forth in RCW
43.21J.040, requests for funds from the environmental and forest restoration
account and making distributions from the account. The task force shall award
funds for projects and training programs it approves and may allocate the funds
to state agencies for disbursement and contract administration;

(b)
Coordinating a process to assist state agencies and local governments to
implement effective environmental and forest restoration projects funded under
this chapter;

(c)
Considering unemployment profile data provided by the employment security
department.

(3)
Beginning July 1, 1994, the task force shall have the following
responsibilities:

(a)
To solicit and evaluate proposals from state and local agencies, private
nonprofit organizations, and tribes for environmental and forest restoration
projects;

(b)
To rank the proposals based on criteria developed by the task force in
accordance with RCW 43.21J.040; and

(c)
To determine funding allocations for projects to be funded from the account
created in RCW 43.21J.020 and for projects or programs as designated in the
omnibus operating and capital appropriations acts.

Sec.
303. RCW
43.157.010 and 1997 c 369 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For purposes of this chapter and RCW 28A.525.166, 28B.80.330, 28C.18.080,
43.21A.350, 47.06.030, and 90.58.100 and (([an])) an industrial
project of state-wide significance is a border crossing project that involves
both private and public investments carried out in conjunction with adjacent
states or provinces or a private industrial development with private capital
investment in manufacturing or research and development. To qualify as an
industrial project of state-wide significance, the project must be completed
after January 1, 1997, and have:

(a)
In counties with a population of less than or equal to twenty thousand, a
capital investment of twenty million dollars;

(b)
In counties with a population of greater than twenty thousand but no more than
fifty thousand, a capital investment of fifty million dollars;

(c)
In counties with a population of greater than fifty thousand but no more than
one hundred thousand, a capital investment of one hundred million dollars;

(d)
In counties with a population of greater than one hundred thousand but no more
than two hundred thousand, a capital investment of two hundred million dollars;

(e)
In counties with a population of greater than two hundred thousand but no more
than four hundred thousand, a capital investment of four hundred million
dollars;

(f)
In counties with a population of greater than four hundred thousand but no more
than one million, a capital investment of six hundred million dollars;

(g)
In counties with a population of greater than one million, a capital investment
of one billion dollars; or

(h)
Been designated by the director of community((, trade, and economic))
development or the director of trade and economic development as an
industrial project of state-wide significance either: (i) Because the county
in which the project is to be located is a distressed county and the economic
circumstances of the county merit the additional assistance such designation
will bring; or (ii) because the impact on a region due to the size and
complexity of the project merits such designation.

(2)
The term manufacturing shall have the meaning assigned it in RCW 82.61.010.

(3)
The term research and development shall have the meaning assigned it in RCW
82.61.010.

Sec.
304. RCW
43.157.030 and 1997 c 369 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development and the
department of trade and economic development shall assign an ombudsman to
each industrial project of state-wide significance. The ((ombudsman)) ombudsmen
shall be responsible for assembling a team of state and local government and
private officials to help meet the planning and development needs of each
project. The ((ombudsman)) ombudsmen shall strive to include in
the teams those responsible for planning, permitting and licensing,
infrastructure development, work force development services including higher
education, transportation services, and the provision of utilities. The ((ombudsman))
ombudsmen shall encourage each team member to expedite their actions in
furtherance of the project.

PART
4

MISCELLANEOUS
REFERENCES

Sec.
401. RCW
46.16.340 and 1995 c 391 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director, from time to time, shall furnish the state military department, ((the
department of community, trade, and economic development,)) the Washington
state patrol, and all county sheriffs a list of the names, addresses, and
license plate or radio station call letters of each person possessing the
special amateur radio station license plates so that the facilities of such
radio stations may be utilized to the fullest extent in the work of these
governmental agencies.

Sec.
402. RCW
43.220.070 and 1999 c 280 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Conservation corps members shall be unemployed residents of the state between
eighteen and twenty-five years of age at the time of enrollment who are
citizens or lawful permanent residents of the United States. The age
requirements may be waived for corps leaders and specialists with special
leadership or occupational skills; such members shall be given special
responsibility for providing leadership, character development, and sense of
community responsibility to the corps members, groups, and work crews to which
they are assigned. The upper age requirement may be waived for residents who
have a sensory or mental handicap. Special effort shall be made to recruit
minority and disadvantaged youth who meet selection criteria of the
conservation corps. Preference shall be given to youths residing in areas,
both urban and rural, in which there exists substantial unemployment exceeding
the state average unemployment rate.

(2)
The legislature finds that people with developmental disabilities would benefit
from experiencing a meaningful work experience, and learning the value of labor
and of membership in a productive society.

The
legislature urges state agencies that are participating in the Washington
conservation corps program to consider for enrollment in the program people who
have developmental disabilities, as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.

If
an agency chooses to enroll people with developmental disabilities in its
Washington conservation corps program, the agency may apply to the United
States department of labor, employment standards administration for a special
subminimum wage certificate in order to be allowed to pay enrollees with
developmental disabilities according to their individual levels of
productivity.

(3)
Corps members shall not be considered state employees. Other provisions of law
relating to civil service, hours of work, rate of compensation, sick leave,
unemployment compensation, state retirement plans, and vacation leave do not
apply to the Washington conservation corps except for the crew supervisors, who
shall be project employees, and the administrative and supervisory personnel.

(4)
Enrollment shall be for a period of six months which may be extended for
additional six-month periods by mutual agreement of the corps and the corps
member, not to exceed two years. Corps members shall be reimbursed at the
minimum wage rate established by state or federal law, whichever is higher,
which may be increased by up to five percent for each additional six-month
period worked: PROVIDED, That if agencies elect to run a residential program,
the appropriate costs for room and board shall be deducted from the corps
member's paycheck as provided in chapter 43.220 RCW.

(5) Corps members are to be available at all times for emergency
response services coordinated through the military department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) or other public agency.
Duties may include sandbagging and flood cleanup, search and rescue, and other
functions in response to emergencies.

Sec.
403. RCW
48.50.040 and 1995 c 369 s 37 are each reenacted to read as follows:

(1)
When an insurer has reason to believe that a fire loss reported to the insurer
may be of other than accidental cause, the insurer shall notify the chief of
the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, in the
manner prescribed under RCW 48.05.320 concerning the circumstances of the fire
loss, including any and all relevant material developed from the insurer's
inquiry into the fire loss.

(2)
Notification of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director
of fire protection, under subsection (1) of this section does not relieve the
insurer of the duty to respond to a request for information from any other
authorized agency and does not bar an insurer from other reporting under RCW
48.50.030(2).

Sec.
404. RCW
90.56.100 and 1998 c 245 s 175 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington wildlife rescue coalition shall be established for the purpose
of coordinating the rescue and rehabilitation of wildlife injured or endangered
by oil spills or the release of other hazardous substances into the
environment.

(2)
The Washington wildlife rescue coalition shall be composed of:

(a)
A representative of the department of fish and wildlife designated by the
director of fish and wildlife. The department of fish and wildlife shall be
designated as lead agency in the operations of the coalition. The coalition
shall be chaired by the representative from the department of fish and
wildlife;

(b)
A representative of the department of ecology designated by the director;

(c)
A representative of the military department ((of community, trade,
and economic development)) emergency management program designated by the
director of ((community, trade, and economic development)) the
military department;

(d)
A licensed veterinarian, with experience and training in wildlife
rehabilitation, appointed by the veterinary board of governors;

(e)
The director of the Washington conservation corps;

(f)
A lay person, with training and experience in the rescue and rehabilitation of
wildlife appointed by the department; and

(g)
A person designated by the legislative authority of the county where oil spills
or spills of other hazardous substances may occur. This member of the
coalition shall serve on the coalition until wildlife rescue and rehabilitation
is completed in that county. The completion of any rescue or rehabilitation
project shall be determined by the director of fish and wildlife.

(3)
The duties of the Washington wildlife rescue coalition shall be to:

(a)
Develop an emergency mobilization plan to rescue and rehabilitate waterfowl and
other wildlife that are injured or endangered by an oil spill or the release of
other hazardous substances into the environment;

(b)
Develop and maintain a resource directory of persons, governmental agencies,
and private organizations that may provide assistance in an emergency rescue
effort;

(c)
Provide advance training and instruction to volunteers in rescuing and
rehabilitating waterfowl and wildlife injured or endangered by oil spills or
the release of other hazardous substances into the environment. The training
may be provided through grants to community colleges or to groups that conduct
programs for training volunteers. The coalition representatives from the
agencies described in subsection (2) of this section shall coordinate training
efforts with the director of the Washington conservation corps and work to
provide training opportunities for young citizens;

(d)
Obtain and maintain equipment and supplies used in emergency rescue efforts.

(4)(a)
Expenses for the coalition may be provided by the coastal protection fund
administered according to RCW 90.48.400.

(b)
The coalition is encouraged to seek grants, gifts, or donations from private
sources in order to carry out the provisions of this section and RCW
90.56.110. Any private funds donated to the commission shall be deposited into
the wildlife rescue account hereby created within the wildlife fund as
authorized under Title 77 RCW.

Sec.
405. RCW
90.56.280 and 1995 c 399 s 218 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be the duty of any person discharging oil or hazardous substances or
otherwise causing, permitting, or allowing the same to enter the waters of the
state, unless the discharge or entry was expressly authorized by the department
prior thereto or authorized by operation of law under RCW 90.48.200, to
immediately notify the coast guard and the division of emergency management. The
notice to the division of emergency management within the military
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall be
made to the division's twenty-four hour state-wide toll-free number established
for reporting emergencies.

PART
5

DECODIFIED
AND REPEALED SECTIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 501. The
following sections are each decodified:

(1) RCW
35.22.660 (Child care facilities--Review of need and
demand--Adoption of ordinances);

(2) RCW
35.22.680 (Residential care facilities--Review of need and
demand--Adoption of ordinances);

(3) RCW
35A.63.149 (Residential care facilities--Review of need and
demand--Adoption of ordinances);

(4) RCW
35A.63.210 (Child care facilities--Review of need and
demand--Adoption of ordinances);

(5) RCW
36.32.520 (Child care facilities--Review of need and
demand--Adoption of ordinances);

(6) RCW
36.32.560 (Home rule charter counties--Residential care
facilities--Review of need and demand--Adoption of ordinances);

(7) RCW
36.70.675 (Child care facilities--Review of need and
demand--Adoption of ordinances);

(8) RCW
36.70.755 (Residential care facilities--Review of need and
demand--Adoption of ordinances);

(9) RCW
70.95H.005 (Finding);

(10) RCW
70.95H.007 (Center created);

(11) RCW
70.95H.010 (Purpose--Market development defined);

(12) RCW
70.95H.030 (Duties and responsibilities);

(13) RCW
70.95H.040 (Authority);

(14) RCW
70.95H.050 (Funding);

(15) RCW
70.95H.800 (Clean Washington account);

(16) RCW
70.95H.900 (Termination); and

(17) RCW
70.95H.901 (Captions not law).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 502. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.31.409 (Investment opportunities office--Created) and 1993 c
280 s 42 & 1989 c 312 s 3;

(2) RCW
43.168.010 (Legislative findings and declaration) and 1999 c 164 s
501 & 1985 c 164 s 1;

(3) RCW
43.168.055 (Application priorities) and 1999 c 164 s 503;

(4) RCW
43.168.060 (Staff support and other duties of department--Rules)
and 1985 c 164 s 6;

(5) RCW
43.168.070 (Processing of applications--Contents of applications)
and 1993 c 512 s 14, 1987 c 461 s 5, & 1985 c 164 s 7;

(6) RCW
43.168.090 (Availability of funds for committee use) and 1985 c
164 s 9;

(7) RCW
43.168.100 (Entitlement community grants--Conditions) and 1993 c
512 s 15, 1986 c 204 s 1, & 1985 c 164 s 10;

(8) RCW
43.168.110 (Rural Washington loan fund) and 1999 c 164 s 504, 1992
c 235 s 11, & 1985 c 164 s 11;

(9) RCW
43.168.120 (Guidelines for use of funds for existing economic
development revolving loan funds--Grants to local governments to assist
existing economic development revolving loan funds) and 1999 c 164 s 505 &
1987 c 461 s 6;

(10) RCW
43.168.130 (Development of performance standards) and 1998 c 245 s
52 & 1987 c 461 s 7;

(11) RCW
43.168.140 (Rural natural resources impact areas) and 1995 c 226 s
28 & 1991 c 314 s 20;

(12) RCW
43.168.150 (Minority and women-owned businesses--Application
process--Joint loan guarantee program) and 1993 c 512 s 13; and

(13) RCW
43.168.900 (Severability--1985 c 164) and 1985 c 164 s 15.

PART
6

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601. Part
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602. (1)
If House Bill No. . . . (Z-0965/00) or Senate Bill No.
. . . (. . .) is enacted by July 1, 2000, this act takes
effect July 1, 2000.

(2) If House Bill No. . . . (Z-0965/00) or Senate Bill
No. . . . (. . .) is not enacted by July 1, 2000, this act
is null and void.

---
END ---