BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
department of transportation shall conduct a review of interchanges built at
state expense along Interstate 90 to ensure that the taxpayer's investment has
been properly used. The review must include, but not be limited to:

(1)
The original rationale for constructing the interchange (i.e. community
development, commercial/industrial, or recreational or natural resource-base
practices);

(2)
The interested parties, private or public, for whom the interchange was to
benefit, including (a) all private and public entities and their stated
commitments to using the interchange for any specific commercial or other
purposes, (b) a cost analysis of the state's investment and the activities that
have occurred because of those interchanges being constructed, and (c) the
interested entity's use of the interchange compared to their original claims to
the state and federal governments.

The
department shall report its findings to the legislative transportation
committee by December 1, 2000. The report will identify better accountability
measures to ensure that the state's ongoing investments in highway interchanges
are properly used and include a listing of interchanges that have not or will
not be used as planned and the rationale for any changes.

This section expires December 31, 2000.

---
END ---