BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that counties, cities, towns, and public transit
districts throughout the state face a crisis in their ability to meet growing
local transportation needs. Additionally, the need for transportation revenue
in the seventeen cities and towns that had implemented the street utility was
heightened by the 1995 decision of the state supreme court that invalidated
residential street utility charges imposed under the authority of section 2,
chapter 141, Laws of 1991. The legislature recognizes the need to assist
cities and towns to replace the local funding that would have been available to
them had RCW 82.80.050 been upheld, and to provide additional local
transportation revenue options to all cities.

The
legislature also intends to provide a range of local transportation funding
options that best fit the needs of the citizens residing in counties and public
transit districts. Any local funding option proposed by counties, cities,
towns, or public transit districts must be submitted for voter approval
pursuant to RCW 43.135.090.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.80.020 and 1998 c 281 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to voter approval under RCW 43.135.090, the legislative
authority of a county, or subject to subsection (7) of this section, a ((qualifying
city or town)) transportation benefit district located in a county
that has not imposed a ((fifteen-dollar)) fee under this section, may
fix and impose an additional fee((, not to exceed fifteen)) up to,
but not to exceed, sixty dollars per vehicle, for each vehicle that is
subject to license fees under RCW 46.16.060 and for each vehicle that is
subject to RCW 46.16.070 with an unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less,
and that is determined by the department of licensing to be registered within
the boundaries of the county or the transportation benefit district, as the
case may be.

(2)
The department of licensing shall administer and collect ((the)) fees
imposed under this section. The department shall deduct a percentage
amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes
collected, for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The
remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer for
monthly distribution under RCW 82.80.080.

(3)
The proceeds of ((this)) fees imposed under this section by counties
or transportation benefit districts shall be used strictly for
transportation purposes in accordance with RCW 82.80.070.

(4)
A county or ((qualifying city or town)) transportation benefit
district imposing this fee or initiating an exemption process shall delay
the effective date at least six months from the date the ordinance is enacted
to allow the department of licensing to implement administration and collection
of or exemption from the fee.

(5)
The legislative authority of a county or ((qualifying city or town)) transportation
benefit district may develop and initiate an exemption process of the ((fifteen
dollar)) fee imposed under this section for the registered owners of
vehicles residing within the boundaries of the county or ((qualifying city
or town)) transportation benefit district: (a) Who are sixty-one
years old or older at the time payment of the fee is due and whose household
income for the previous calendar year is less than an amount prescribed by the
county or ((qualifying city or town)) transportation benefit district
legislative authority; or (b) who have a physical disability.

(6)
The legislative authority of a county or ((qualifying city or town)) transportation
benefit district shall develop and initiate an exemption process of the ((fifteen-dollar))
fee for vehicles registered within the boundaries of the county that are
licensed under RCW 46.16.374.

(7)
((For purposes of this section, a "qualifying city or town" means
a city or town residing within a county having a population of greater than
seventy-five thousand in which is located all or part of a national monument.))
A ((qualifying city or town)) transportation benefit district may
impose the fee authorized in subsection (1) of this section subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(((a)
The city or town may impose the fee only if authorized to do so by a majority
of voters voting at a general or special election on a proposition for that
purpose. At a minimum, the ballot measure shall contain: (i) A description of
the transportation project proposed for funding, properly identified by
mileposts or other designations that specify the project parameters; (ii) the
proposed number of months or years necessary to fund the city or town's share
of the project cost; and (iii) the amount of fee to be imposed for the project.

(b))) The
((city or town)) transportation benefit district may not impose a
fee that, if combined with the county fee, exceeds ((fifteen)) sixty
dollars. If a county imposes or increases a fee under this section that, if
combined with the fee imposed by a ((city or town)) transportation
benefit district, exceeds ((fifteen)) sixty dollars, the ((city
or town)) transportation benefit district fee shall be reduced or
eliminated as needed so that in no ((city or town)) transportation
benefit district does the combined fee exceed ((fifteen)) sixty
dollars. All revenues from county-imposed fees shall be distributed as ((called
for)) provided in RCW ((82.80.020.

(c)
Any fee imposed by a city or town under this section shall expire at the end of
the term of months or years provided in the ballot measure, or when the city or
town's bonded indebtedness on the project is retired, whichever is sooner)) 82.80.080.

(8)
((The)) Fees imposed ((under subsection (7) of this
section shall apply only to renewals and)) by transportation benefit
districts shall not apply to ((ownership transfer transactions)) vehicles
sold by a vehicle dealer licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.80.080 and 1998 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state treasurer shall distribute revenues, less authorized deductions,
generated by the local option taxes authorized in RCW 82.80.010 and 82.80.020,
levied by counties to the levying counties, and cities contained in those
counties, based on the relative per capita population. County population for
purposes of this section is equal to one and one-half of the unincorporated
population of the county. In calculating the distributions, the state
treasurer shall use the population estimates prepared by the state office of financial
management and shall further calculate the distribution based on information
supplied by the departments of licensing and revenue, as appropriate.

(2)
The state treasurer shall distribute revenues, less authorized deductions,
generated by the local option taxes authorized in RCW ((82.80.010 and))
82.80.020 levied by ((qualifying cities and towns)) transportation
benefit districts to the levying ((cities and towns)) transportation
benefit districts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. For
efficient administration of the streets and for other city or town
transportation purposes, the legislative authority may establish in its
respective city or town a city street district, if authorized to do so by a
majority of its voters voting at a general or special election on a proposition
for that purpose, and shall cause its action in so doing to be entered upon its
records.

The
city street district must be coterminous with the city or town. Territory
later annexed into the city or town automatically becomes part of the city
street district, and territory ceasing to be part of the city or town
automatically ceases to be part of the city street district.

A
city street district may be disestablished, effective at the start of a new
calendar year, by action of the city or town legislative authority.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Each
city or town that has established a city street district must create an account
to be known as the city street district account. Any funds accruing to and to
be deposited in the city street district account arising from a levy in a city
street district must be expended for proper city street and other
transportation purposes, in accordance with RCW 82.80.070.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. For
the purpose of raising revenue for establishing, laying out, constructing,
altering, repairing, improving, and maintaining city streets and bridges, and
for other proper city transportation purposes in accordance with RCW 82.80.070,
a city or town that has created a city street district must make a uniform tax
levy throughout each city street district of an amount not to exceed fifty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of the last assessed valuation of
the taxable property in the city street district. This tax levy must be made
annually at the time of making the property tax levy for general purposes, and
must be made by the county legislative authority for the city pursuant to RCW
84.52.030, or by the city legislative authority in a city having a population
of three hundred thousand or more. All funds accruing from the levy must be
credited to and deposited in the city street district account.

Sec.
7. RCW
84.52.010 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in
specific amounts.

The
rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing
districts coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and
fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations
provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the county, as
shown by the completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all
taxes levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective
counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation
of the property of the taxing districts respectively.

When
a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property,
that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050,
exceeds the limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor
shall recompute and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1)
The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district,
and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not
exceeding the limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take
precedence over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other
than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed
under RCW 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park
district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined
rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent
limitation exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then
these levies shall be reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by a metropolitan
park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be reduced until the
combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate of regular property
tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed
under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate no longer
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or shall be
eliminated; and (c) if the combined rate of regular property tax levies that
are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true
and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall be reduced until
the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of
any property or eliminated.

(2)
The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior
taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated
as follows to bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the
provisions of these limitations:

(a)
First, the certified ((property tax)) levy ((rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and 67.38.130))
of a city street district shall be reduced ((on a pro rata basis))
or eliminated;

(b)
Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of ((flood control zone)) those
junior taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and
67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c)
Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations,
the certified property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be
reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d)
Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations,
the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts,
other than fire protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park
districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation
levies for public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or
eliminated;

(((d)
Fourth)) (e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds
these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro
rata basis or eliminated; and

(((e)
Fifth)) (f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds
these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park
districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levy, and public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated.

In
determining whether the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is
subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations
provided in that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy,
as apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

Sec.
8. RCW
84.52.120 and 1995 c 99 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
metropolitan park district with a population of one hundred fifty thousand or
more may submit a ballot proposition to voters of the district authorizing the
protection of the district's tax levy from prorationing under RCW 84.52.010(2)
by imposing all or any portion of the district's twenty-five cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation tax levy outside of the five dollar and ninety
cent per thousand dollar of assessed valuation limitation established under RCW
84.52.043(2), if those taxes otherwise would be prorated under RCW
84.52.010(2)(((c))) (d), for taxes imposed in any year on or
before the first day of January six years after the ballot proposition is
approved. A simple majority vote of voters voting on the proposition is
required for approval.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Cities and towns, subject to voter approval at a general or special election
held for this purpose, may fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this section, to be used strictly for transportation purposes
in accordance with RCW 82.80.070. The tax authorized pursuant to this section
shall be in addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state pursuant to chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the city or
town imposing the tax. The rate of tax equals one-tenth of one percent of the
selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the
case of a use tax. The exemptions in RCW 82.08.820 and 82.12.820 are for the
state portion of the sales and use tax and do not extend to the tax authorized
in this section.

(2)
The legislative authority of a city or town may limit the purposes or length of
time for which a sales and use tax authorized by this section will be imposed.
If the legislative authority determines to impose a sales and use tax only to
provide funds for a specific transportation project or projects, the referendum
submitted to the voters imposing the sales and use tax under this section shall
contain, at a minimum:

(a)
A description of the transportation project or projects proposed for funding,
properly identified by mileposts or other designations that specify the project
parameters;

(b)
The proposed number of months or years expected to be necessary to fund the
city's or town's share of the project costs; and

(c)
The tax rate of the proposed sales and use tax.

(3)
If a limited purpose was specified in an ordinance, the city or town
legislative authority must certify completion of payment when the costs of each
specific project for which the city or town sales and use tax was imposed have
been fully paid, including the retirement of any debt issued for the project.
Upon certification of completion of payment for all the projects, the sales and
use tax imposed to pay for the projects shall cease.

(4)
In no event shall the tax under this section begin at a date other than the
beginning of a calendar quarter or end at a date other than the end of a
calendar quarter.

(5)
The administrative provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to the tax imposed
under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW to read as follows:

Cities
and towns that impose a tax under section 9 of this act may contract with the
state department of revenue or other appropriate entities for administration
and collection of that tax.

Sec.
11. RCW
82.36.440 and 1991 c 173 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
tax levied in this chapter is in lieu of any excise, privilege, or occupational
tax upon the business of manufacturing, selling, or distributing motor vehicle
fuel, and no city, town, county, township or other subdivision or municipal
corporation of the state shall levy or collect any excise tax upon or measured
by the sale, receipt, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, except as
provided in RCW 82.80.010 and 82.47.020, and except that a city or town may
impose its license fee or tax upon the business of making retail sales of motor
vehicle fuel within the limits of the city or town at a rate of up to two
percent of the gross receipts from retail sales of motor vehicle fuel within
the limits of the city or town. The imposition or increase in rate of any city
or town license fee or tax is subject to voter approval pursuant to RCW
43.135.090.

Sec.
12. RCW
82.38.280 and 1991 c 173 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
tax levied in this chapter is in lieu of any excise, privilege, or occupational
tax upon the business of manufacturing, selling, or distributing special fuel,
and no city, town, county, township or other subdivision or municipal
corporation of the state shall levy or collect any excise tax upon or measured
by the sale, receipt, distribution, or use of special fuel, except as provided
in RCW 82.80.010 and 82.47.020, and except that a city or town may impose
its license fee or tax upon the business of making retail sales of special fuel
within the limits of the city or town at a rate of up to two percent of the
gross receipts from retail sales of special fuel within the limits of the city
or town. The imposition or increase in rate of any city or town license fee or
tax is subject to voter approval pursuant to RCW 43.135.090.

Sec.
13. RCW
35.21.710 and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
city which imposes a license fee or tax upon business activities consisting of
the making of retail sales of tangible personal property which are measured by
gross receipts or gross income from such sales, shall impose such tax at a
single uniform rate upon all such business activities. The taxing authority
granted to cities for taxes upon business activities measured by gross receipts
or gross income from sales shall not exceed a rate of .0020; except that any
city with an adopted ordinance at a higher rate, as of January 1, 1982 shall be
limited to a maximum increase of ten percent of the January 1982 rate, not to
exceed an annual incremental increase of two percent of current rate:
PROVIDED, That any adopted ordinance which classifies according to different
types of business or services shall be subject to both the ten percent and the
two percent annual incremental increase limitation on each tax rate: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That all surtaxes on business and occupation classifications in effect
as of January 1, 1982, shall expire no later than December 31, 1982, or by
expiration date established by local ordinance. Cities which impose a license
fee or tax upon business activities consisting of the making of retail sales of
tangible personal property which are measured by gross receipts or gross income
from such sales shall be required to submit an annual report to the state
auditor identifying the rate established and the revenues received from each
fee or tax. This section shall not apply to any business activities subject to
the tax imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW, by RCW 82.36.440, or by RCW 82.38.280.
For purposes of this section, the providing to consumers of competitive
telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, shall be deemed to be the
retail sale of tangible personal property.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. A
new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislative authority of a city or town may limit the purposes or length of
time for which a license fee or tax, or a portion thereof, authorized by RCW
82.36.440 or 82.38.280 will be imposed. If the legislative authority
determines that a license fee or tax upon the business of making retail sales
of motor vehicle fuel or special fuel, or a portion thereof, shall be
authorized only to provide funds for a specific transportation project or
projects, the referendum submitted to the voters authorizing or increasing the
rate of a license fee or tax must contain, at a minimum:

(1)
A description of the transportation project or projects proposed for funding,
properly identified by mileposts or other designations that specify the project
parameters; and

(2)
The proposed number of months or years expected to be necessary to fund the
city's or town's share of the project costs.

If
a limited purpose was specified in a referendum authorizing the license fee or
tax, or portion thereof, the city or town legislative authority must certify
the completion of payment when the costs of each specific project for which the
license fee or tax was authorized have been fully paid, including the
retirement of any debt issued for the project. Upon certification of
completion of payment for all the projects, the license fee or tax upon the
business of making retail sales of motor vehicle fuel or special fuel, or
portion thereof, authorized to pay for the projects shall cease.

Sec.
15. RCW
82.80.010 and 1998 c 176 s 86 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the conditions of this section, any county may levy, by approval of
its legislative body and a majority of the registered voters of the county
voting on the proposition at a general or special election, additional excise
taxes ((equal to ten percent of the state-wide motor vehicle fuel tax rate
under RCW 82.36.025)) up to, but not to exceed, five cents per gallon
on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each
gallon of special fuel as defined in RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries
of the county. Vehicles paying an annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are
exempt from the county fuel excise tax. An election held under this section
must be held not more than twelve months before the date on which the proposed
tax is to be levied. The ballot setting forth the proposition shall state the
tax rate that is proposed. The county's authority to levy additional excise
taxes under this section includes the incorporated and unincorporated areas of
the county. The additional excise taxes are subject to the same exceptions and
rights of refund as applicable to other motor vehicle fuel and special fuel
excise taxes levied under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW. The proposed tax shall
not be levied less than one month from the date the election results are
certified by the county election officer. The commencement date for the levy
of any tax under this section shall be the first day of January, April, July,
or October.

(2)
Every person subject to the tax shall pay, in addition to any other taxes
provided by law, an additional excise tax to the director of licensing at the
rate levied by a county exercising its authority under this section.

(3)
The state treasurer shall distribute monthly to the levying county and cities contained
therein the proceeds of the additional excise taxes collected under this
section, after the deductions for payments and expenditures as provided in RCW
46.68.090 (((1) and (2))) and under the conditions and limitations
provided in RCW 82.80.080.

(4)
The proceeds of the additional excise taxes levied under this section shall be
used strictly for transportation purposes in accordance with RCW 82.80.070.

(5)
The department of licensing shall administer and collect the county fuel
taxes. The department shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, for administrative, collection, refund, and audit expenses incurred.
The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer
for monthly distribution under RCW 82.80.080.

Sec.
16. RCW
82.80.030 and 1990 c 42 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the conditions of this section, the legislative authority of a
county or city, upon voter approval pursuant to RCW 43.135.090, may fix
and impose a parking tax on all persons engaged in a commercial parking
business within its respective jurisdiction. The jurisdiction of a county, for
purposes of this section, includes only the unincorporated area of the county.
The jurisdiction of a city includes only the area within its incorporated
boundaries.

(2)
In lieu of the tax in subsection (1) of this section, upon voter approval
pursuant to RCW 43.135.090, a city or a county in its unincorporated area
may fix and impose a tax for the act or privilege of parking a motor vehicle in
a facility operated by a commercial parking business.

(3)
In addition to the taxes in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a city may
fix and impose a tax upon an employer who provides parking, whether shared or
separately allocated, for his or her employees or upon the employee who is
provided parking, regardless of whether the employer or the employee pays a fee
for said parking.

(4)
The city or county may provide that:

(a)
The tax is paid by the commercial parking business operator or owner of
the motor vehicle, or by the employer or employee;

(b)
The tax applies to all parking for which a fee is paid, whether paid or leased,
including parking or the right to the use of parking supplied with a
lease of nonresidential space;

(c)
The tax is collected by the operator of the facility or the employer
providing the parking privileges and remitted to the city or county;

(d)
The tax is a fee per vehicle or is measured by the value of the parking
((charge));

(e)
The tax rate varies with, or its imposition depends on, zoning or
location of the facility, the duration of the parking, the time of entry or
exit, the type or use of the vehicle, or other reasonable factors; and

(f)
Tax exempt carpools as defined by the city or county, vehicles with
handicapped decals, or government vehicles are exempt from the tax.

(((3)))
(5) "Commercial parking business" as used in this section,
means the ownership, lease, operation, or management of a commercial parking
lot in which fees are charged. "Commercial parking lot" means a
covered or uncovered area with stalls or other capacity for the purpose
of parking motor vehicles. "Fee" as used in this section means
any form of consideration, whether or not separately stated, and includes the
consideration of laboring for an employer or other person who provides parking
in return. "Person" has the meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.030.

(((4)))
(6) The rate of the tax under subsection (1) of this section may be
based either upon gross proceeds or the number of vehicle stalls available or
actually used for commercial parking use. The rates charged must be
uniform for the same class or type of commercial parking business, and the
classifications made by the county or city may include consideration of the
location or zoning of the facility, its hours or method of operation, the type
or use or occupancy of the vehicles parked there, and other reasonable factors.

(((5)))
(7) The county or city levying the tax provided for in subsection (1) ((or)),
(2), or (3) of this section may provide for its ((payment)) collection
on a daily, monthly, quarterly, semiannual, or annual basis,
and may require the tax to be remitted to the county or city on a monthly,
quarterly, semiannual, or annual basis. Each local government may develop
by ordinance or resolution rules for administering the tax, including
provisions for reporting by commercial parking businesses, collection, and
enforcement.

(((6)))
(8) The proceeds of the ((commercial)) parking tax fixed and
imposed under subsection (1) ((or)), (2), or (3) of this
section shall be used strictly for transportation purposes in accordance with
RCW 82.80.070.

Sec.
17. RCW
82.14.045 and 1998 c 321 s 7 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
The legislative body of any city pursuant to RCW 35.92.060, of any county which
has created an unincorporated transportation benefit area pursuant to RCW
36.57.100 and 36.57.110, of any public transportation benefit area pursuant to
RCW 36.57A.080 and 36.57A.090, of any county transportation authority
established pursuant to chapter 36.57 RCW, and of any metropolitan municipal corporation
within a county with a population of one million or more pursuant to chapter
35.58 RCW, may, by resolution or ordinance for the sole purpose of providing
funds for the operation, maintenance, or capital needs of public transportation
systems and in lieu of the excise taxes authorized by RCW 35.95.040, submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters or include such authorization in a
proposition to perform the function of public transportation and if approved by
a majority of persons voting thereon, fix and impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter: PROVIDED, That no such legislative
body shall impose such a sales and use tax without submitting such an
authorizing proposition to the voters and obtaining the approval of a majority
of persons voting thereon: PROVIDED FURTHER, That where such a proposition is
submitted by a county on behalf of an unincorporated transportation benefit
area, it shall be voted upon by the voters residing within the boundaries of
such unincorporated transportation benefit area and, if approved, the sales and
use tax shall be imposed only within such area. Notwithstanding any provisions
of this section to the contrary, any county in which a county public
transportation plan has been adopted pursuant to RCW 36.57.070 and the voters
of such county have authorized the imposition of a sales and use tax pursuant
to the provisions of section 10, chapter 167, Laws of 1974 ex. sess., prior to
July 1, 1975, shall be authorized to fix and impose a sales and use tax as
provided in this section at not to exceed the rate so authorized without
additional approval of the voters of such county as otherwise required by this
section.

The
tax authorized pursuant to this section shall be in addition to the tax
authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within such city, public transportation benefit
area, county, or metropolitan municipal corporation as the case may be. The
rate of such tax shall be levied in increments of not less than
one-tenth((, two-tenths, three-tenths, four-tenths, five-tenths, or
six-tenths)) of one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales
tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax). The rate of such
tax shall not exceed the rate authorized by the voters unless such increase
shall be similarly approved.

(2)(a)
In the event a metropolitan municipal corporation shall impose a sales and use
tax pursuant to this chapter no city, county which has created an
unincorporated transportation benefit area, public transportation benefit area
authority, or county transportation authority wholly within such metropolitan
municipal corporation shall be empowered to levy and/or collect taxes pursuant
to RCW 35.58.273, 35.95.040, and/or 82.14.045, but nothing herein shall prevent
such city or county from imposing sales and use taxes pursuant to any other
authorization.

(b)
In the event a county transportation authority shall impose a sales and use tax
pursuant to this section, no city, county which has created an unincorporated
transportation benefit area, public transportation benefit area, or
metropolitan municipal corporation, located within the territory of the
authority, shall be empowered to levy or collect taxes pursuant to RCW
35.58.273, 35.95.040, or 82.14.045.

(c)
In the event a public transportation benefit area shall impose a sales and use
tax pursuant to this section, no city, county which has created an
unincorporated transportation benefit area, or metropolitan municipal
corporation, located wholly or partly within the territory of the public
transportation benefit area, shall be empowered to levy or collect taxes
pursuant to RCW 35.58.273, 35.95.040, or 82.14.045.

(3)
Any local sales and use tax revenue collected pursuant to this section by any
city or by any county for transportation purposes pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and
36.57.110 shall not be counted as locally generated tax revenues for the
purposes of apportionment and distribution, in the manner prescribed by chapter
82.44 RCW, of the proceeds of the motor vehicle excise tax authorized pursuant
to RCW 35.58.273, except that the local sales and use tax revenue collected
under this section by a city with a population greater than sixty thousand that
as of January 1, 1998, owns and operates a municipal public transportation
system shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for the purposes of
apportionment and distribution, in the manner prescribed by chapter 82.44 RCW,
of the proceeds of the motor vehicle excise tax authorized under RCW 35.58.273
as follows:

(a)
For fiscal year 2000, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as
locally generated tax revenues for up to 25 percent of the tax collected under
RCW 35.58.273;

(b)
For fiscal year 2001, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as
locally generated tax revenues for up to 50 percent of the tax collected under
RCW 35.58.273;

(c)
For fiscal year 2002, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as
locally generated tax revenues for up to 75 percent of the tax collected under
RCW 35.58.273; and

(d)
For fiscal year 2003 and thereafter, revenues collected under this section
shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for up to 100 percent of the
tax collected under RCW 35.58.273.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18.
Sections 4 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---