BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that state-wide enhanced 911 has proven to be a lifesaving
service and that routing a 911 call to the appropriate public safety answering
point with a display of the caller's identification and location should be
available for all users of telecommunications services, regardless of the
technology used to make and transmit the 911 call. The legislature also finds
that the total excise tax should be the same for all subscribers of telephone
services, regardless of the technology utilized by the carrier which provides
their telecommunications service.

Sec.
2. RCW
38.52.010 and 1997 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Emergency management" or "comprehensive emergency
management" means the preparation for and the carrying out of all
emergency functions, other than functions for which the military forces are
primarily responsible, to mitigate, prepare for, respond to, and recover from
emergencies and disasters, and to aid victims suffering from injury or damage,
resulting from disasters caused by all hazards, whether natural, technological,
or human caused, and to provide support for search and rescue operations for
persons and property in distress. However, "emergency management" or
"comprehensive emergency management" does not mean preparation for
emergency evacuation or relocation of residents in anticipation of nuclear
attack.

(2)
"Local organization for emergency services or management" means an
organization created in accordance with the provisions of this chapter by state
or local authority to perform local emergency management functions.

(3)
"Political subdivision" means any county, city or town.

(4)
"Emergency worker" means any person, including but not limited to an
architect registered under chapter 18.08 RCW or a professional engineer
registered under chapter 18.43 RCW, who is registered with a local emergency
management organization or the department and holds an identification card
issued by the local emergency management director or the department for the
purpose of engaging in authorized emergency management activities or is an
employee of the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof who is
called upon to perform emergency management activities.

(5)
"Injury" as used in this chapter shall mean and include accidental
injuries and/or occupational diseases arising out of emergency management
activities.

(6)(a)
"Emergency or disaster" as used in all sections of this chapter
except RCW 38.52.430 shall mean an event or set of circumstances which: (I)
Demands immediate action to preserve public health, protect life, protect
public property, or to provide relief to any stricken community overtaken by
such occurrences, or (ii) reaches such a dimension or degree of destructiveness
as to warrant the governor declaring a state of emergency pursuant to RCW
43.06.010.

(b)
"Emergency" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means an incident that requires
a normal police, coroner, fire, rescue, emergency medical services, or utility
response as a result of a violation of one of the statutes enumerated in RCW
38.52.430.

(7)
"Search and rescue" means the acts of searching for, rescuing, or
recovering by means of ground, marine, or air activity any person who becomes
lost, injured, or is killed while outdoors or as a result of a natural,
technological, or human caused disaster, including instances involving searches
for downed aircraft when ground personnel are used. Nothing in this section
shall affect appropriate activity by the department of transportation under
chapter 47.68 RCW.

(8)
"Executive head" and "executive heads" means the county
executive in those charter counties with an elective office of county
executive, however designated, and, in the case of other counties, the county
legislative authority. In the case of cities and towns, it means the mayor in
those cities and towns with mayor-council or commission forms of government,
where the mayor is directly elected, and it means the city manager in those
cities and towns with council manager forms of government. Cities and towns
may also designate an executive head for the purposes of this chapter by
ordinance.

(9)
"Director" means the adjutant general.

(10)
"Local director" means the director of a local organization of
emergency management or emergency services.

(11)
"Department" means the state military department.

(12)
"Emergency response" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means a public agency's
use of emergency services during an emergency or disaster as defined in
subsection (6)(b) of this section.

(13)
"Expense of an emergency response" as used in RCW 38.52.430 means
reasonable costs incurred by a public agency in reasonably making an
appropriate emergency response to the incident, but shall only include those
costs directly arising from the response to the particular incident.
Reasonable costs shall include the costs of providing police, coroner, fire
fighting, rescue, emergency medical services, or utility response at the scene
of the incident, as well as the salaries of the personnel responding to the
incident.

(14)
"Public agency" means the state, and a city, county, municipal
corporation, district, town, or public authority located, in whole or in part, within
this state which provides or may provide fire fighting, police, ambulance,
medical, or other emergency services.

(15)
"Incident command system" means: (a) An all-hazards, on-scene
functional management system that establishes common standards in organization,
terminology, and procedures; provides a means (unified command) for the
establishment of a common set of incident objectives and strategies during
multiagency/multijurisdiction operations while maintaining individual
agency/jurisdiction authority, responsibility, and accountability; and is a
component of the national interagency incident management system; or (b) an
equivalent and compatible all-hazards, on-scene functional management system.

(16) "Radio communications service company" has the
meaning ascribed to it in RCW 82.14B.020.

Sec.
3. RCW
38.52.530 and 1997 c 49 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
enhanced 911 advisory committee is created to advise and assist the state
enhanced 911 coordinator in coordinating and facilitating the implementation
and operation of enhanced 911 throughout the state. The director shall appoint
members of the committee who represent diverse geographical areas of the state
and include state residents who are members of the national emergency number
association, the associated public communications officers Washington chapter,
the Washington state fire chiefs association, the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington state council of fire fighters, the
Washington state council of police officers, the Washington ambulance
association, the state fire protection policy board, the Washington fire
commissioners association, the Washington state patrol, the association of
Washington cities, the Washington state association of counties, the utilities
and transportation commission or commission staff, and representatives of large
and small local exchange telephone companies and large and small radio
communications service companies offering commercial mobile radio service in
the state. This section ((shall)) expires December 31, ((2000))
2006.

Sec.
4. RCW
38.52.540 and 1998 c 304 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The
enhanced 911 account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the
state enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by RCW 82.14B.030(3) shall be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account shall be used only to help
implement and operate enhanced 911 state-wide. Moneys in the account may be
used to provide salary assistance on a temporary basis not to exceed three
years to counties with a population of less than seventy-five thousand that
need additional resources to cover unfunded costs that can be shown to result
from handling 911 calls. Moneys in the account may be used to assist
multicounty regions, including ongoing salary assistance for multicounty
regions consisting of counties with populations of less than seventy-five
thousand. However, funds shall not be distributed to any county that has not
imposed the maximum county enhanced 911 taxes allowed under RCW 82.14B.030 (1)
and (2). The state enhanced 911 coordinator, with the advice and assistance of
the enhanced 911 advisory committee, shall specify by rule the purposes for
which moneys may be expended from this account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The wireless enhanced 911 account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from the state enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by RCW 82.14B.030(4)
must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be used only to
help implement and operate wireless enhanced 911 state-wide.

(2)
Twenty-five cents of the forty-five cent excise tax imposed by RCW
82.14B.030(4) must be distributed to the county from which the tax originated
for implementation and operational costs of wireless enhanced 911 within thirty
days after the revenue is deposited in the wireless enhanced 911 account.

(3)
Twenty cents of the forty-five cent excise tax imposed by RCW 82.14B.030(4)
must remain in the wireless enhanced 911 account to be used to assist counties
with the implementation and operational costs of wireless enhanced 911 service
when the twenty-five cents specified in subsection (2) of this section and the
twenty-five cent excise tax imposed in RCW 82.14B.030(2) are not sufficient to
cover the costs of this service.

(4)
Funds may not be distributed to any county that has not imposed the maximum county
enhanced 911 tax allowed under RCW 82.14B.030(2). The distribution of funds
from the wireless enhanced 911 account is not contingent on counties imposing
the maximum county enhanced 911 tax allowed under RCW 82.14B.030(1).

(5)
The state enhanced 911 coordinator, with the advice and assistance of the
enhanced 911 advisory committee, shall specify by rule the purposes for which
moneys may be expended from this account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

The
state enhanced 911 coordinator, with the advice and assistance of the enhanced
911 advisory committee, shall set nondiscriminatory, uniform technical and
operational standards consistent with the rules of the federal communications
commission for the transmission of 911 calls from radio communications service
companies to enhanced 911 emergency communications systems. These standards
must not exceed the requirements set by the federal communications commission.
The authority given to the state enhanced 911 coordinator in this section is
limited to setting standards as set forth in this section and does not
constitute authority to regulate radio communications service companies.

Sec.
7. RCW 82.14B.020
and 1998 c 304 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Emergency services communication system" means a multicounty,
county-wide, or district-wide radio or landline communications network,
including an enhanced 911 telephone system, which provides rapid public access
for coordinated dispatching of services, personnel, equipment, and facilities
for police, fire, medical, or other emergency services.

(2)
"Enhanced 911 telephone system" means a public telephone system
consisting of a network, data base, and on-premises equipment that is accessed
by dialing 911 and that enables reporting police, fire, medical, or other
emergency situations to a public safety answering point. The system includes
the capability to selectively route incoming 911 calls to the appropriate
public safety answering point that operates in a defined 911 service area and
the capability to automatically display the name, address, and telephone number
of incoming 911 calls at the appropriate public safety answering point.

(3)
"Switched access line" means the telephone service line which
connects a subscriber's main telephone(s) or equivalent main telephone(s) to
the local exchange company's switching office.

(4)
"Local exchange company" has the meaning ascribed to it in RCW
80.04.010.

(5)
"Radio access line" means the telephone number assigned to or used by
a subscriber for two-way local wireless voice service available to the public
for hire from a radio communications service company. Radio access lines
include, but are not limited to, radio-telephone communications lines used in
cellular telephone service, personal communications services, and network radio
access lines, or their functional and competitive equivalent. Radio access
lines do not include lines that provide access to one-way signaling service,
such as paging service, or to communications channels suitable only for data
transmission, or to nonlocal radio access line service, such as wireless
roaming service, or to a private telecommunications system.

(6)
"Radio communications service company" has the meaning ascribed to it
in RCW 80.04.010, except that it does not include radio paging providers.
It does include those persons or entities that provide commercial mobile radio
services, as defined by 47 U.S.C. Sec. 332(d)(1), and both facilities-based and
nonfacilities-based resellers.

(7)
"Private telecommunications system" has the meaning ascribed to it in
RCW 80.04.010.

(8)
"Subscriber" means the retail purchaser of telephone service as
telephone service is defined in RCW 82.04.065(3).

Sec.
8. RCW
82.14B.030 and 1998 c 304 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a county may impose a county enhanced 911 excise
tax on the use of switched access lines in an amount not exceeding fifty cents
per month for each switched access line. The amount of tax shall be uniform
for each switched access line. Each county shall provide notice of such tax to
all local exchange companies serving in the county at least sixty days in
advance of the date on which the first payment is due.

(2)
The legislative authority of a county may also impose a county 911 excise tax
on the use of radio access lines located within the county in an amount not
exceeding twenty-five cents per month for each radio access line. The amount
of tax shall be uniform for each radio access line. The county shall provide
notice of such tax to all radio communications service companies serving in the
county at least sixty days in advance of the date on which the first payment is
due. Any county imposing this tax shall include in its ordinance a refund
mechanism whereby the amount of any tax ordered to be refunded by the judgment
of a court of record, or as a result of the resolution of any appeal therefrom,
shall be refunded to the radio communications service company or local exchange
company that collected the tax, and those companies shall reimburse the
subscribers who paid the tax. The ordinance shall further provide that to the
extent the subscribers who paid the tax cannot be identified or located, the
tax paid by those subscribers shall be returned to the county.

(3)
A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on all switched access lines in the
state. The amount of tax shall not exceed twenty cents per month for each
switched access line. The tax shall be uniform for each switched access line.
The tax imposed under this subsection shall be remitted to the department of
revenue by local exchange companies on a tax return provided by the
department. Tax proceeds shall be deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced
911 account created in RCW 38.52.540.

(4)
A state enhanced 911 excise tax is imposed on the use of all radio access
lines located within the state in an amount of forty-five cents per month for
each radio access line. The tax must be uniform for each radio access line.
The tax imposed under this section must be remitted to the department of
revenue by radio communications service companies, including those companies
that resell radio access lines, on a tax return provided by the department that
must include designation of the amount of tax originated from each county. Tax
proceeds must be deposited by the treasurer in the wireless enhanced 911 account
created in section 5 of this act. The tax imposed under this section is not
subject to the state sales and use tax or any local tax.

(5)
By August 31st of each year the state enhanced 911 coordinator shall recommend
the level for the next year of the state enhanced 911 excise tax imposed by
subsection (3) of this section, based on a systematic cost and revenue
analysis, to the utilities and transportation commission. The commission shall
by the following October 31st determine the level of the state enhanced 911
excise tax for the following year.

Sec.
9. RCW
82.14B.040 and 1998 c 304 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state enhanced 911 tax and the county enhanced 911 tax on switched access lines
shall be collected from the subscriber by the local exchange company providing
the switched access line. The state enhanced 911 tax and the county 911
tax on radio access lines shall be collected from the subscriber by the radio
communications service company providing the radio access line to the
subscriber. The amount of the tax shall be stated separately on the billing
statement which is sent to the subscriber.

Sec.
10. RCW
82.14B.042 and 1998 c 304 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state enhanced 911 excise ((tax)) taxes imposed by this
chapter must be paid by the subscriber to the local exchange company providing
the switched access line or the radio communications service company
providing the radio access line, and each local exchange company and
each radio communications service company shall collect from the subscriber
the full amount of the ((tax)) taxes payable. The state enhanced
911 excise ((tax)) taxes required by this chapter to be collected
by the local exchange company ((is)) or the radio communications
service company are deemed to be held in trust by the local exchange
company or the radio communications service company until paid to the
department. Any local exchange company or radio communications service
company that appropriates or converts the tax collected to its own use or
to any use other than the payment of the tax to the extent that the money
collected is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this
chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2)
If any local exchange company or radio communications service company
fails to collect the state enhanced 911 excise tax or, after collecting the
tax, fails to pay it to the department in the manner prescribed by this
chapter, whether such failure is the result of its own act or the result of
acts or conditions beyond its control, the local exchange company or the
radio communications service company is personally liable to the state for
the amount of the tax, unless the local exchange company or the radio
communications service company has taken from the buyer in good faith a
properly executed resale certificate under RCW 82.14B.200.

(3)
The amount of tax, until paid by the subscriber to the local exchange company,
the radio communications service company, or to the department, constitutes
a debt from the subscriber to the local exchange company or the radio
communications service company. Any local exchange company or radio
communications service company that fails or refuses to collect the tax as
required with intent to violate the provisions of this chapter or to gain some
advantage or benefit, either direct or indirect, and any subscriber who refuses
to pay any tax due under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor. The state
enhanced 911 excise ((tax)) taxes required by this chapter to be
collected by the local exchange company or the radio communications service
company must be stated separately on the billing statement that is sent to
the subscriber.

(4)
If a subscriber has failed to pay to the local exchange company or the radio
communications service company the state enhanced 911 excise ((tax))
taxes imposed by this chapter and the local exchange company or the
radio communications service company has not paid the amount of the tax to
the department, the department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against
the subscriber for collection of the tax, in which case a penalty of ten
percent may be added to the amount of the tax for failure of the subscriber to
pay the tax to the local exchange company or the radio communications service
company, regardless of when the tax is collected by the department. For
the sole purpose of applying the various provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW, ((the
last day of the month following the tax period in which the tax liability
accrued is to be considered as the due date of the)) tax under this
chapter is due at the same time the taxpayer reports other taxes under RCW
82.32.045. If no other tax is reported under RCW 82.32.045, the taxpayer shall
remit tax under this section on an annual basis as provided under RCW
82.14B.061.

Sec.
11. RCW
82.14B.061 and 1998 c 304 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of revenue shall administer and ((shall)) may
adopt such rules as may be necessary to enforce and administer the state
enhanced 911 excise ((tax)) taxes imposed by this chapter.
Chapter 82.32 RCW, with the exception of RCW 82.32.045, 82.32.145, and
82.32.380, applies to the administration, collection, and enforcement of the
state enhanced 911 excise ((tax)) taxes.

(2)
The state enhanced 911 excise ((tax)) taxes imposed by this
chapter, along with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department,
are due ((monthly on or before the last day of the month following the month
in which the tax liability accrues)) at the same time the taxpayer
reports other taxes under RCW 82.32.045. If no other taxes are reported under
RCW 82.32.045, the taxpayer shall remit tax on an annual basis.

(3)
The department of revenue may relieve any taxpayer or class of taxpayers from
the obligation of remitting monthly and may require the return to cover other
longer reporting periods, but in no event may returns be filed for a period
greater than one year. For these taxpayers, tax payments are due on or before
the last day of the month next succeeding the end of the period covered by the
return.

(4)
The state enhanced 911 excise ((tax)) taxes imposed by this
chapter ((is)) are in addition to any taxes imposed upon the same
persons under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW.

Sec.
12. RCW
82.14B.200 and 1998 c 304 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Unless a local exchange company or a radio communications service company
has taken from the buyer a resale certificate or equivalent document under RCW
82.04.470, the burden of proving that a sale of the use of a switched access ((lines
[line])) line or radio access line was not a sale to a subscriber is
upon the person who made the sale.

(2)
If a local exchange company or a radio communications service company
does not receive a resale certificate at the time of the sale, have a resale
certificate on file at the time of the sale, or obtain a resale certificate
from the buyer within a reasonable time after the sale, the local exchange
company or the radio communications service company remains liable for
the tax as provided in RCW 82.14B.042, unless the local exchange company or
the radio communications service company can demonstrate facts and
circumstances according to rules adopted by the department of revenue that show
the sale was properly made without payment of the state enhanced 911 excise
tax.

(3)
The penalty imposed by RCW 82.32.291 may not be assessed on state enhanced 911
excise taxes due but not paid as a result of the improper use of a resale
certificate. This subsection does not prohibit or restrict the application of
other penalties authorized by law.

Sec.
13. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 9, 1999 c 309 s 929, 1999 c 268 s 5, and 1999 c 94 s
4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects
to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal ((account)) fund, the volunteer fire fighters' ((relief
and pension)) and reserve officers' administrative ((account))
fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account,
the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, ((and))
the Western Washington University capital projects account, the enhanced 911
account, and the wireless enhanced 911 account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond
retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15.
Sections 1 through 12 of this act take effect April 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16.
Section 13 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. The
secretary of state shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and
ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this
state, in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and
the laws adopted to facilitate its operation. The ballot title for this act
shall be: "Shall the enhanced 911 tax on telephone lines be equal for all
types of telephones?"

---
END ---