BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.58.100 and 1997 c 369 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The master programs provided for in this chapter, when adopted or approved by
the department shall constitute use regulations for the various shorelines of
the state. In preparing the master programs, and any amendments thereto, the
department and local governments shall to the extent feasible:

(a)
Utilize a systematic interdisciplinary approach which will insure the
integrated use of the natural and social sciences and the environmental design
arts;

(b)
Consult with and obtain the comments of any federal, state, regional, or local
agency having any special expertise with respect to any environmental impact;

(c)
Consider all plans, studies, surveys, inventories, and systems of
classification made or being made by federal, state, regional, or local
agencies, by private individuals, or by organizations dealing with pertinent
shorelines of the state;

(d)
Conduct or support such further research, studies, surveys, and interviews as
are deemed necessary;

(e)
Utilize all available information regarding hydrology, geography, topography,
ecology, economics, and other pertinent data;

(f)
Employ, when feasible, all appropriate, modern scientific data processing and
computer techniques to store, index, analyze, and manage the information
gathered.

(2)
The master programs shall include, when appropriate, the following:

(a)
An economic development element for the location and design of industries,
industrial projects of state-wide significance, transportation facilities, port
facilities, tourist facilities, commerce and other developments that are
particularly dependent on their location on or use of the shorelines of the
state;

(b)
A public access element making provision for public access to publicly owned
areas;

(c)
A recreational element for the preservation and enlargement of recreational
opportunities, including but not limited to parks, tidelands, beaches, and
recreational areas;

(d)
A circulation element consisting of the general location and extent of existing
and proposed major thoroughfares, transportation routes, terminals, and other
public utilities and facilities, all correlated with the shoreline use element;

(e)
A use element which considers the proposed general distribution and general
location and extent of the use on shorelines and adjacent land areas for
housing, business, industry, transportation, agriculture, natural resources,
recreation, education, public buildings and grounds, and other categories of
public and private uses of the land;

(f)
A conservation element for the preservation of natural resources, including but
not limited to scenic vistas, aesthetics, and vital estuarine areas for
fisheries and wildlife protection;

(g)
An historic, cultural, scientific, and educational element for the protection
and restoration of buildings, sites, and areas having historic, cultural,
scientific, or educational values;

(h)
An element that gives consideration to the state-wide interest in the
prevention and minimization of flood damages; and

(i)
Any other element deemed appropriate or necessary to effectuate the policy of
this chapter.

(3)
Any setback adopted by a city or county under the authority of this chapter
shall be applied uniformly to all property within the city or county. No
exceptions to any setback ordinance or regulation adopted by a city or county
may be allowed, including but not limited to exceptions for development or
redevelopment in urban areas or other areas of more intensive development.

(4)
The master programs shall include such map or maps, descriptive text, diagrams
and charts, or other descriptive material as are necessary to provide for ease
of understanding.

(((4)))
(5) Master programs will reflect that state-owned shorelines of the
state are particularly adapted to providing wilderness beaches, ecological
study areas, and other recreational activities for the public and will give
appropriate special consideration to same.

(((5)))
(6) Each master program shall contain provisions to allow for the
varying of the application of use regulations of the program, including
provisions for permits for conditional uses and variances, to insure that
strict implementation of a program will not create unnecessary hardships or
thwart the policy enumerated in RCW 90.58.020. Any such varying shall be
allowed only if extraordinary circumstances are shown and the public interest suffers
no substantial detrimental effect. The concept of this subsection shall be
incorporated in the rules adopted by the department relating to the
establishment of a permit system as provided in RCW 90.58.140(3).

(((6)))
(7) Each master program shall contain standards governing the protection
of single family residences and appurtenant structures against damage or loss
due to shoreline erosion. The standards shall govern the issuance of
substantial development permits for shoreline protection, including structural
methods such as construction of bulkheads, and nonstructural methods of
protection. The standards shall provide for methods which achieve effective
and timely protection against loss or damage to single family residences and
appurtenant structures due to shoreline erosion. The standards shall provide a
preference for permit issuance for measures to protect single family residences
occupied prior to January 1, 1992, where the proposed measure is designed to
minimize harm to the shoreline natural environment.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In designating and protecting critical areas under this chapter, counties and
cities shall include the best available science in developing policies and
development regulations to protect the functions and values of critical areas.
In addition, counties and cities shall give special consideration to
conservation or protection measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous
fisheries.

(2)
If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts is necessary or
will be of substantial assistance in reaching its decision, a growth management
hearings board may retain scientific or other expert advice to assist in reviewing
a petition under RCW 36.70A.290 that involves critical areas.

(3) In designating and protecting critical areas under this
chapter, any setback adopted by a city or county under the authority of this
chapter shall be applied uniformly to all property within the city or county.
No exceptions to any setback ordinance or regulation adopted by a city or
county may be allowed, including but not limited to exceptions for development
or redevelopment in urban areas or other areas of more intensive development.

---
END ---