BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that the people of the state rank traffic congestion as
one of their greatest concerns and rightfully expect the state to seek
realistic, implementable solutions. Recent studies for Puget Sound have
indicated that the annual cost of congestion exceeds two billion dollars a year
with a national study ranking the region as third worse in the nation.
Congestion symptoms are becoming evident in parts of Eastern Washington and
Southwest Washington as well. As a result, the legislature declares that
reducing traffic congestion while increasing mobility is the primary objective
for state and local surface transportation programs.

Nevertheless,
the state's priority programming for highway development has arguably been
retarded by conflicting goals, with the result that financial resources have
been allocated in a manner that has allowed congestion to reach unacceptable
levels. Congestion has raised not only the accident and injury potential but
also dramatically impacted freight movement and service vehicle accessibility.
While planners had hoped that concentrated alternatives such as transit would
have had a far greater impact, these solutions at best will have less than five
percent of total daily trips by 2010 in Puget Sound, even with the Sound
Transit proposal.

The
legislature refocuses the state-wide responsibilities under this title to a
unified goal of reducing congestion while increasing mobility by twenty-five
percent by the year 2010 for areas outlined under this chapter that exceed the
Texas Transportation Institute index or such other congestion index approved by
the legislature. The plan will devote resources to reducing the index to a
level that occurred in the early 1980's for those noncompliance areas while
focusing on preemptive projects for other regions of the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Congestion index" means measures of performance as developed by the
Texas Transportation Institute using, but not limited to, delay-based measures
of performance (delay per driver), travel rate index (TRI), roadway congestion
index (RCI), or such other criteria as approved by the legislature. The
congestion index must be set at the level that occurred in the early 1980's.
If the index uses a measure of performance based on the roadway congestion
index (RCI), the index must be set at 0.95 or lower for the highway/principal
arterial system.

(2)
"Freeway/expressway" means a state or county road so designated in
accordance with criteria established by state and federal agencies.

(3)
"Guidelines" means the criteria developed jointly by the congestion
reduction board and the legislature to replace chapter 47.05 RCW and such other
statutes in order to accomplish the goals of section 1 of this act.

(4)
"Principal arterial" means a county road or city street so designated
in accordance with criteria established by state and federal agencies.

(5)
"Urban monitoring area" means every area in this state designated as
an urban monitoring area by the congestion reduction board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The congestion reduction board is created, consisting of twenty-five members
appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate as follows:

(a)
Seven county members, one each from each region comprising the seven regions in
section 5(2) of this act;

(b)
Seven city members, one each from each region comprising the seven regions in
section 5(2) of this act;

(c)
Five general members as follows: Two from the Washington state department of
transportation, one from the office of financial management, one from the
Public Ports Association, and one from a public transit agency; and

(d)
Six members from the private sector.

(2)
The board shall review plans developed by the state, county, and city
governments to identify urban monitoring areas and determine compliance with
congestion reduction goals of this chapter. The board may order changes in
plans adopted by metropolitan planning organizations (MPO) and regional
transportation planning organizations (RTPO) and a reallocation of funds
distributed to MPOs and RTPOs by the federal government. A jurisdiction deemed
not to be in compliance will have funds withheld from state and federal sources
until the jurisdiction complies with the requirements of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. On
June 30, 2001, the transportation commission is abolished and control and
administration of the department of transportation are placed under the
governor as an executive agency. The appropriations and expenditure powers of
the department are transferred to the congestion reduction board for surface
transportation programs, and in respect to surface transportation programs, the
department shall function as a planning and preservation and maintenance
department. The surface transportation programs of the transportation
improvement board, county road administration board, and freight mobility
strategic investment board are consolidated within the congestion reduction
board, and those powers are transferred to the congestion reduction board.
Control of dedicated funding sources from the transportation improvement board
and the county road administration board are transferred to the congestion
reduction board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Before the 2001 legislative session, the congestion reduction board will
evaluate the state transportation plan and other plans as adopted by the transportation
commission and department of transportation, local plans submitted through the
transportation improvement board, the county road administration board, and the
freight mobility strategic investment board, and transportation plans developed
by metropolitan planning organizations and regional transportation planning
organizations. The congestion reduction board will distinguish between those
urban monitoring areas exceeding an established standard of congestion or delay
and those not exceeding the standard. If the standard is based on the Texas
Transportation Institute's travel rate index, the standard will be 1.15 (peak
period travel times exceeding off-peak times by fifteen percent or more). If
the congestion reduction board uses a delay per driver approach, the standard
will be thirty annual hours of delay per driver. If the congestion reduction
board uses the roadway congestion index, the standard will be an index of 1.0.
Those urban monitoring areas exceeding the standard will be designated as
"congested," and the congestion reduction board will submit an action
plan to the legislature advocating solutions. For those urban monitoring areas
not exceeding the standard, the congestion reduction board will highlight
freeway/expressway and principal arterials that might exceed the standard by
2010 unless preemptive action is taken by state or local governments. For
succeeding biennia, the congestion reduction board will monitor and update the
plan as necessary.

(2)
For the purpose of analysis, the urban monitoring areas of the state are
classified as follows: (a) Puget Sound including areas within King, Pierce,
Snohomish, and Kitsap counties; (b) Olympic region including Clallam,
Jefferson, Grays Harbor, Mason, and Thurston counties; (c) Northwest region
including Whatcom, Skagit, Island, and San Juan counties; (d) Southwest region
including Clark, Cowlitz, Wahkiakum, Pacific, Lewis, Skamania, and Klickitat
counties; (e) North central region including Okanogan, Chelan, Douglas, Grant,
and Ferry counties; (f) South central region including Kittitas, Yakima,
Benton, Franklin, Walla Walla, Columbia, Garfield, and Asotin counties; (g)
Eastern region including Stevens, Pend Oreille, Lincoln, Spokane, Adams, and
Whitman counties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Funds
available for expenditure by the congestion reduction board under this chapter
and apportioned to the seven regions of the state must be budgeted and spent,
under proper appropriations, for specific highway or road improvement projects
within the urban monitoring areas of each region in accordance with the
guidelines. These expenditures in urban monitoring areas are in addition to
expenditures from all other construction funds regularly programmed before the
effective date of this section for highway improvements throughout the state
under chapter 47.05 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Funds
available for expenditure by the congestion reduction board must be apportioned
to the seven regions for expenditure upon freeways/expressways and local roads
in the seven regions in a manner that accomplishes the overall objective of
section 1 of this act. Necessary funds must be spent to achieve congestion
reduction under the standard index regardless of the overall distribution of
projected expenditures state-wide.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Under
this chapter, city and county governments shall dedicate required levels of
expenditures to achieve congestion reduction on principal arterials, arterials,
roads, and local highways under their jurisdiction in order to receive funds
from state and federal sources for surface transportation programs including,
but not limited to, transit, ferries, rail, bicycle, or any activity using
state and local highway and road systems. In addition, metropolitan planning
organizations distributing federal or other funds to city or county governments
may not do so unless the congestion reduction board has declared the city or
county government is in compliance with this chapter.

Sec.
9. RCW
43.17.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be known as: (1) The
secretary of social and health services, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the
director of labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the
director of fish and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the
director of licensing, (8) the director of general administration, (9) the
director of community, trade, and economic development, (10) the director of
veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement
systems, (13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary
of health, and (15) the director of financial institutions.

Such
officers, except ((the secretary of transportation and)) the director of
fish and wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the
senate, and hold office at the pleasure of the governor. ((The secretary of
transportation shall be appointed by the transportation commission as
prescribed by RCW 47.01.041.)) The director of fish and wildlife shall be
appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec.
10. RCW
47.01.021 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this title unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Department" means the department of transportation created in RCW
47.01.031((;)).

(2)
"Commission" means the secretary of transportation ((commission
created in RCW 47.01.051;)) as provided for in RCW 47.01.041.

(3)
"Secretary" means the secretary of transportation as provided for in
RCW 47.01.041.

Sec.
11. RCW
47.01.031 and 1988 c 167 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is created a department of state government to be known as the department
of transportation.

(2)
All powers, duties, and functions vested by law in the department of highways,
the state highway commission, the director of highways, the Washington toll
bridge authority, the aeronautics commission, the director of aeronautics, and
the canal commission, and the transportation related powers, duties, and
functions of the planning and community affairs agency, are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the department, except those powers, duties, and functions
which are expressly directed elsewhere in this or in any other act of the 1977
legislature.

(3)
The board of pilotage commissioners is transferred to the jurisdiction of the
department for its staff support and administration: PROVIDED, That nothing in
this section shall be construed as transferring any policy making powers of the
board of pilotage commissioners to the ((transportation commission or the))
department of transportation.

Sec.
12. RCW
47.01.041 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 53 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

The
executive head of the department of transportation shall be the secretary of
transportation, who shall be appointed by the ((transportation commission))
governor, and shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040. ((The secretary shall be
an ex officio member of the commission without a vote. The secretary shall be
the chief executive officer of the commission and be responsible to it, and
shall be guided by policies established by it.)) The secretary shall serve
((until removed by the commission, but only for incapacity, incompetence,
neglect of duty, malfeasance in office, or failure to carry out the
commission's policies. Before a motion for dismissal shall be acted on by the
commission, the secretary shall be granted a hearing on formal written charges
before the full commission. An action by the commission to remove the
secretary shall be final)) at the pleasure of the governor.

Sec.
13. RCW
47.01.071 and 1981 c 59 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((transportation commission shall have)) secretary has the
following functions, powers, and duties:

(1)
To propose policies to be adopted by the legislature designed to assure the
development and maintenance of a comprehensive and balanced state-wide
transportation system which will meet the needs of the people of this state for
safe and efficient transportation services. Wherever appropriate the policies
shall provide for the use of integrated, intermodal transportation systems to
implement the social, economic, and environmental policies, goals, and
objectives of the people of the state, and especially to conserve nonrenewable
natural resources including land and energy. To this end the ((commission))
secretary shall:

(a)
Develop transportation policies which are based on the policies, goals, and
objectives expressed and inherent in existing state laws;

(b)
Inventory the adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the local and area-wide
governmental bodies of the state and define the role of the state, regional,
and local governments in determining transportation policies, in transportation
planning, and in implementing the state transportation plan;

(c)
Propose a transportation policy for the state, and after notice and public
hearings, submit the proposal to the legislative transportation committee and
the senate and house transportation committees by January 1, ((1978)) 2001,
for consideration in the next legislative session;

(d)
Establish a procedure for review and revision of the state transportation
policy and for submission of proposed changes to the legislature;

(e)
To integrate the state-wide transportation plan with the needs of the elderly
and handicapped, and to coordinate federal and state programs directed at
assisting local governments to answer such needs;

(2)
To establish the policy of the department ((to be followed by the secretary))
on each of the following items:

(a)
To provide for the effective coordination of state transportation planning with
national transportation policy, state and local land use policies, and local
and regional transportation plans and programs;

(b)
To provide for public involvement in transportation designed to elicit the
public's views both with respect to adequate transportation services and
appropriate means of minimizing adverse social, economic, environmental, and
energy impact of transportation programs;

(c)
To provide for the administration of grants in aid and other financial
assistance to counties and municipal corporations for transportation purposes;

(d)
To provide for the management, sale, and lease of property or property rights
owned by the department which are not required for transportation purposes;

(3)
To ((direct the secretary to)) prepare ((and submit to the commission))
a comprehensive and balanced state-wide transportation plan which shall be
based on the transportation policy adopted by the legislature and applicable
state and federal laws. After public notice and hearings, the ((commission))
secretary shall adopt the plan and submit it to the legislative
transportation committee and to the house and senate ((standing)) transportation
committees ((on transportation)) before January 1, ((1980)) 2001,
for consideration in the ((1980)) 2001 regular legislative
session. The plan shall be reviewed and revised prior to each regular session
of the legislature during an even-numbered year thereafter. ((A preliminary
plan shall be submitted to such committees by January 1, 1979.))

The
plan shall take into account federal law and regulations relating to the
planning, construction, and operation of transportation facilities;

(4)
((To propose to the governor and the legislature prior to the convening of
each regular session held in an odd-numbered year a recommended budget for the
operations of the commission as required by RCW 47.01.061;

(5))) To
approve and propose to the governor and to the legislature prior to the
convening of each regular session during an odd-numbered year a recommended
budget for the operation of the department and for carrying out the program of
the department for the ensuing biennium. The proposed budget shall separately
state the appropriations to be made from the motor vehicle fund for highway
purposes in accordance with constitutional limitations and appropriations and
expenditures to be made from the general fund, or accounts thereof, and other
available sources for other operations and programs of the department;

(((6)))
(5) To review and authorize all departmental requests for legislation;

(((7)))
(6) To approve the issuance and sale of all bonds authorized by the
legislature for capital construction of state highways, toll facilities,
Columbia Basin county roads (for which reimbursement to the motor vehicle fund
has been provided), urban arterial projects, and aviation facilities;

(((8)))
(7) To adopt such rules((, regulations,)) and policy directives
as may be necessary to carry out reasonably and properly those functions
expressly vested in the ((commission)) secretary by statute;

(((9)
To delegate any of its powers to the secretary of transportation whenever it
deems it desirable for the efficient administration of the department and
consistent with the purposes of this title;

(10))) (8)
To exercise such other specific powers and duties as may be vested in the ((transportation
commission)) secretary by this or any other provision of law.

Sec.
14. RCW
47.01.101 and 1987 c 505 s 48 and 1987 c 179 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
secretary shall ((have the authority and it shall be his or her duty)),
subject to policy guidance from the ((commission)) congestion
reduction board:

(1)
((To)) Serve as chief executive officer of the department with
full administrative authority to direct all its activities;

(2)
((To)) Organize the department as he or she may deem necessary to
carry out the work and responsibilities of the department effectively;

(3)
((To)) Designate and establish such transportation district or
branch offices as may be necessary or convenient, and ((to)) appoint
assistants and delegate any powers, duties, and functions to them or any
officer or employee of the department as deemed necessary to administer the
department efficiently;

(4)
((To)) Direct and coordinate the programs of the various
divisions of the department to assure that they achieve the greatest possible
mutual benefit, produce a balanced overall effort, and eliminate unnecessary
duplication of activity;

(5)
((To)) Adopt all department rules that are subject to the
adoption procedures contained in the state Administrative Procedure
Act((, except rules subject to adoption by the commission pursuant to
statute));

(6)
((To)) Maintain and safeguard the official records of the
department((, including the commission's recorded resolutions and orders));

(7)
((To provide full staff support to the commission to assist it in carrying
out its functions, powers, and duties and to)) Execute the policy
established by the ((commission pursuant to its legislative authority)) congestion
reduction board;

(8)
((To)) Execute and implement the biennial operating budget for
the operation of the department in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW and with
legislative appropriation and, in such manner as prescribed therein, ((to))
make and report to the ((commission)) congestion reduction board
and the chairs of the transportation committees of the senate and house of
representatives, including one copy to the staff of each of the committees,
deviations from the planned biennial category A and H highway construction programs
necessary to adjust to unexpected delays or other unanticipated circumstances((.));
and

(9)
((To)) Exercise all other powers and perform all other duties as
are now or hereafter provided by law.

Sec.
15. RCW
47.01.250 and 1998 c 245 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

The
chief of the Washington state patrol, the director of the traffic safety
commission, the executive director of the county road administration board, and
the director of licensing are designated as official consultants to the ((transportation
commission)) secretary so that the goals and activities of their
respective agencies which relate to transportation are fully coordinated with
other related responsibilities of the department of transportation. In this
capacity, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the director of the traffic
safety commission, the executive director of the county road administration
board, and the director of licensing shall consult with the ((transportation
commission and the)) secretary of transportation on the implications and
impacts on the transportation-related functions and duties of their
respective agencies of any proposed comprehensive transportation plan, program,
or policy.

In
order to develop fully integrated, balanced, and coordinated transportation
plans, programs, and budgets the chief of the Washington state patrol, the
director of the traffic safety commission, the executive director of the county
road administration board, and the director of licensing shall consult with the
secretary of transportation on the matter of relative priorities during the
development of their respective agencies' plans, programs, and budgets as they
pertain to transportation activities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
47.01.051 (Commission created--Appointment of
members--Terms--Qualifications--Removal) and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 5; and

(2) RCW
47.01.061 (Commission--Procedures and internal operations) and
1987 c 364 s 2, 1984 c 287 s 94, 1983 1st ex.s. c 53 s 29, 1981 c 59 s 1, &
1977 ex.s. c 151 s 6.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
47.05.010 (Declaration of purpose) and 1993 c 490 s 1, 1969 ex.s.
c 39 s 1, & 1963 c 173 s 1;

(2) RCW
47.05.021 (Functional classification of highways) and 1998 c 245
s 95, 1998 c 171 s 5, 1993 c 490 s 2, 1987 c 505 s 50, 1979 ex.s. c 122 s 1,
& 1977 ex.s. c 130 s 1;

(3) RCW
47.05.030 (Six-year programs--Investments, improvements, preservation)
and 1998 c 171 s 6, 1993 c 490 s 3, 1987 c 179 s 2, 1979 ex.s. c 122 s 2, 1977
ex.s. c 151 s 44, 1975 1st ex.s. c 143 s 1, 1973 2nd ex.s. c 12 s 4, 1969 ex.s.
c 39 s 3, 1965 ex.s. c 170 s 33, & 1963 c 173 s 3;

(4) RCW 47.05.035
(Allocation of funds, factors) and 1993 c 490 s 4, 1987 c 179 s 3, 1979 ex.s. c
122 s 3, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 143 s 2;

(5) RCW
47.05.051 (Six-year comprehensive investment program--Priority
selection criteria--Improvement program criteria--Departure from criteria) and
1998 c 175 s 12, 1993 c 490 s 5, 1987 c 179 s 5, 1979 ex.s. c 122 s 5, &
1975 1st ex.s. c 143 s 4; and

(6) RCW
47.05.090 (Application of 1993 c 490--Deviations) and 1993 c 490
s 6.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18.
Sections 1 through 8 and 17 of this act take effect July 1, 2000. Sections 9
through 16 of this act take effect July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19.
Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20. This
act may be known and cited as the Congestion Reduction Act of 2000.

---
END ---