BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that current processes for the siting and operation of major
regional public facilities often fail to adequately address regional and
localized impacts and benefits of such facilities. Throughout the state there
are proposals for siting major public facilities in which surrounding
neighborhoods and communities will be disproportionately impacted while the
benefits of the facility are provided to the larger region or to the entire
state. These facilities include major transportation facilities such as
highways, bridges, airports, and rail lines, and other nontransportation
facilities such as prisons and landfills. The legislature also finds that
although the growth management act provides procedures for establishing
county-wide policies for coordinated planning of such facilities, those
procedures do not include all public entities that provide such facilities and
do not provide sufficient guidance to local jurisdictions to ensure
consideration and mitigation of impacts to surrounding communities and
participation in siting processes by those communities.

Therefore,
it is the intent of the legislature to ensure that these considerations are
incorporated into the county-wide planning policies required under the growth
management act, and to provide sufficient authority so that siting decisions
and mitigation measures adopted through using such policies may be fully
implemented.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

Recognizing that RCW 36.70A.103 requires state agencies to comply
with local comprehensive plans and development regulations, that planning for
public facilities and mitigating impacts from these public facilities are
cornerstones of this chapter, the requirement that county-wide planning
policies must address the siting of public capital facilities of a state-wide
significance, and the importance of siting essential public facilities recognized
under RCW 36.70A.200, it is the policy of the state that state agencies must
mitigate impacts to communities arising from the siting or expansion of state
capital facilities of state-wide significance, including transportation
facilities of state-wide significance that are provided under chapter 47.46
RCW. These mitigation requirements include, but are not limited to, impacts to
county, city, and town roads and streets, noise impacts, life-style impacts of
affected communities, and view impacts. The mitigation of these impacts is
declared to be part of the costs of the state capital facilities of state-wide
significance and shall be mitigated from moneys used to finance the state
capital facilities of state-wide significance.

---
END ---