BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
Parents of minors, and other persons who supervise or care for minors, have a
duty to protect such minors. That duty is at its greatest when minors are very
young, and the extent and nature of the duty changes as minors mature. As
minors mature, they have an increasing duty to take responsibility for their
own actions.

(2)
The law has long recognized that minors below a certain age cannot be held
criminally liable for their actions, but the law has also provided that as
minors mature they become increasingly subject to such liability.
Specifically, under RCW 9A.04.050:

(a)
Minors under the age of eight are incapable of committing crimes;

(b)
Minors ages eight through eleven are presumed to be incapable of committing
crimes, but this presumption may be overcome by proof that a minor has
sufficient capacity to understand his or her actions and to know if those
actions are wrong; and

(c)
Minors age twelve and older are capable of committing crimes.

(3)
In the pursuit of justice it is essential that the duty of parents, and the
maturity and capacity of minors, be appropriately evaluated and weighed in
making decisions regarding criminal culpability.

(4)
It is the intent of the legislature that in criminal matters arising under RCW
9A.36.050, careful consideration should be given to the following:

(a)
The responsibilities of persons with a duty to supervise or care for any minor
involved, such as the minor's parent, and the age and maturity of any minor
involved. To the extent a minor lacks the maturity to take responsibility for
his or her own actions, a person with a duty to supervise or care for the minor
ought to bear a greater degree of responsibility for the actions of the minor.
Conversely, to the extent a minor is mature enough to take responsibility and
to be tried for a crime, a person with a duty to supervise or care for the
minor ought to bear a lesser degree of responsibility for the actions of the
minor;

(b)
Maintaining a reasonable balance between an individual's constitutional right
to self-protection and the individual's corresponding obligation to exercise
that right in a responsible manner;

(c)
Promoting public safety, maintaining public confidence in the criminal justice
system, and upholding the right of victims and their families to see justice
done. Where criminal conduct results in death or serious injury, prosecutors
should clearly and concisely justify a decision not to prosecute in a
particular case.

Sec.
2. RCW
9A.36.050 and 1997 c 338 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of reckless endangerment when he or she recklessly:

(a)
Engages in conduct ((not amounting to drive-by shooting but)) that
creates a substantial risk of death or serious physical injury to another
person; or

(b)
Fails to engage in conduct and the failure creates a substantial risk of death
or serious physical injury to another person.

(2)
For purposes of this section, a person recklessly engages in conduct or
recklessly fails to engage in conduct when he or she knows of and disregards a
substantial risk that death or serious physical injury to another person may
occur and his or her disregard of such substantial risk through commission or
omission is a gross deviation from what a reasonable person would do or would
not do in the same situation.

(3)
Reckless endangerment is a gross misdemeanor.

(4)
If a charge of reckless endangerment is considered or brought under this
section because a person stored or left a loaded firearm in a location where
the person knew, or reasonably should have known, that a minor or mentally
incompetent person was likely to gain access to the loaded firearm, whether or
not a minor or mentally incompetent person actually obtained possession of the
loaded firearm, subsections (5) through (12) of this section apply.

(5)
It is not reckless endangerment under the circumstances described in subsection
(4) of this section if:

(a)
The minor or mentally incompetent person had access to the loaded firearm under
the supervision of an adult; or

(b)
The minor or mentally incompetent person had access to the loaded firearm as a
result of an unlawful entry by any person; or

(c)
The minor or mentally incompetent person had access to the loaded firearm as a
result of an unlawful taking of the loaded firearm by any person; or

(d)
The person alleged to have committed the offense had taken reasonable measures
to prevent a minor or mentally incompetent person from gaining access to the
loaded firearm, including but not limited to, securing the loaded firearm in a
locked box, safe, or other locked storage space, or securing the loaded firearm
with a lock or device that prevents the loaded firearm from discharging; or

(e)
The minor had access to the loaded firearm in accordance with RCW 9.41.042.

(6)(a)
In a prosecution for reckless endangerment under the circumstances described in
subsection (4) of this section, it is an absolute defense if the defendant
shows that the minor who had access to the loaded firearm knew that the
possession of the loaded firearm could create a substantial risk of death or
serious physical injury and that it would be wrong to create such a risk.

(b)
This defense does not apply if:

(i)
The defendant knew, or reasonably should have known:

(A)
The minor was a person under the age of twelve; or

(B)
The minor had previously been arrested or convicted for criminal behavior or had
a criminal record; or

(C)
The minor had a history of mental or psychological problems or had previously
been committed or treated for mental or psychological problems; or

(D)
The minor had been suspended or expelled from school based on violent acts or
threats of violent acts by the minor; and

(ii)
The defendant knew the minor had access to the loaded firearm.

(7)(a)
The following mitigating factors must be considered in any decision regarding
the sentencing of a person for reckless endangerment under the circumstances
described in subsection (4) of this section:

(i)
The minor who had access to the loaded firearm previously had been educated
regarding the use, handling, and dangers of the loaded firearm;

(ii)
The minor who had access to the loaded firearm had completed a hunter's or
firearms safety course;

(iii)
The minor or mentally incompetent person who had access to the loaded firearm
did not actually take possession of the loaded firearm;

(iv)
The minor or mentally incompetent person who took possession of the loaded
firearm did so without the permission and against the direction of the person
who had care and custody of the loaded firearm;

(v)
If the minor or mentally incompetent person took possession of the loaded
firearm, the minor or mentally incompetent person did not intend to discharge
the loaded firearm and the loaded firearm was not discharged;

(vi)
If the minor or mentally incompetent person took possession of the loaded
firearm and the loaded firearm was discharged, the minor or mentally
incompetent person did not intend for any person to be injured or property to
be damaged and no person was injured or property was damaged;

(vii)
The crime rate within the community and the impact of crime on the area was
sufficient to cause a reasonable person to take precautions for his or her
personal safety or the safety of his or her family;

(viii)
The defendant, or another person who resides with the defendant, previously had
been a victim of a crime of assault, kidnapping, criminal mistreatment, rape,
harassment, arson, burglary, robbery, incest, or any other crime pertaining to
domestic violence, or any anticipatory offense pertaining to such crimes under
the laws of this state or another state;

(ix)
The defendant, or another person who resides with the defendant, previously had
obtained a valid protection order issued by a court of this state or another
state, including an injunction or other order related to domestic or family
violence, harassment, sexual abuse, or stalking, for the purpose of preventing
violent or threatening acts or harassment against or contact or communication
with or physical proximity to another person;

(x)
The minor or mentally incompetent person had access to the loaded firearm during
a time of greater exposure to risk of personal safety, such as between the
hours of dusk and dawn; and

(xi)
The loaded firearm was the only loaded firearm in the vicinity, or was one of
only a few loaded firearms in the vicinity, reasonably necessary to provide
self-defense.

(b)
Mitigating factors other than those listed in this subsection may be considered
before making any decision regarding sentencing of a person for reckless
endangerment under the circumstances described in subsection (4) of this section.

(8)
If a death or serious injury occurs as a result of a violation of this section
under the circumstances described in subsection (4) of this section, and the
prosecuting attorney decides not to file charges, the prosecuting attorney
shall issue written findings supporting the decision, and those findings are a
public record.

(9)
A violation of this section under the circumstances described in subsection (4)
of this section is not a disqualifying domestic violence misdemeanor conviction
under RCW 9.41.040(1)(b)(i).

(10)(a)
The definitions in RCW 9.41.010 apply to this section unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(b)
"Minor" means a person under eighteen years of age unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(c)
"Mentally incompetent person" means a person who does not possess
sufficient mind or reason to enable the person to comprehend the nature, terms,
and effect of the particular act in which the person is engaged.

(11)
Nothing in this section mandates how or where a firearm must be stored.

(12) Nothing in this section is intended or may be construed to
limit a person's constitutional right to self-protection under the Second
Amendment to the United States Constitution or Article I, section 24 of the
Washington state Constitution.

---
END ---