BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

The commission shall establish a process for early notification and
early and continuous public participation in the licensing process for an
applicant seeking a license to conduct house-banked card games.

---
END ---