BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall establish a process for early notification and early
public participation in the licensing process for an applicant seeking a
license to conduct house-banked card games. This process shall include at
least one public meeting in the area affected and shall provide for submission
of written and oral comments.

(2)
Notification that a license application has been filed with the commission
shall be provided to the following:

(a)
All newspapers of general circulation in the local area and all local radio
stations, television stations, and cable networks;

(b)
The legislative authority of the local jurisdictions, the local law enforcement
agencies, and any other local agency or organization that requests such
notification from the commission; and

(c)
All residents and businesses within a one-half mile radius of the proposed card
room location.

(3)
The commission may issue a license to an applicant seeking to conduct
house-banked card games only after finding that issuing the license will have
no significant detrimental effect on the health, safety, and welfare of the
surrounding neighborhood in which the card room is or will be located. This
finding shall be part of the record approving the license. In making the
finding, the commission may conduct public hearings as necessary.

(4)
If requested by the commission, the applicant shall meet with neighboring
residents, organizations, and public agencies regarding any reasonable concerns
they may have on the impact of the gambling activity on the neighboring area.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

Any
city, town, city-county, or county may exercise all land use and zoning powers
granted or recognized under state law including the power to adopt moratoria
and interim zoning controls under chapters 36.70A and 90.58 RCW with respect to
gambling activity licensed by the commission under this chapter.

Sec.
3. RCW
9.46.295 and 1974 ex.s. c 155 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Any license to engage in any of the gambling activities authorized
by this chapter ((as now exists or as hereafter amended)), and issued
under the authority thereof shall be legal authority to engage in the gambling
activities for which issued throughout the incorporated and unincorporated area
of any county, except that a city located therein with respect to that city, or
a county with respect to all areas within that county except for such cities,
may absolutely prohibit or exercise its land use and zoning powers in
accordance with section 2 of this act, but may not change the scope of
license, any or all of the gambling activities for which the license was
issued.

---
END ---