BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that work-based learning is the best method for training
institutions to offer relevant technical skills and provide students an
understanding of the world of work. Because of the costs associated with the
high faculty-to-student ratio involved in work-based learning, community and
technical colleges find it difficult to offer such learning opportunities and
their availability is limited. Only four percent of community and technical
college students participate in a degree or certificate program with a
work-based component. It is the intent of the legislature to increase the
capacity of the state's community and technical colleges to defray the
extraordinary costs of work-based learning in high-demand vocational-technical
fields.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
state board for community and technical colleges shall provide a bonus to
community and technical colleges for each full-time equivalent student enrolled
in a vocational-technical degree or certificate program with a work-based
learning component.

---
END ---