BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer
shall continue to receive service credit as provided under the provisions of
RCW 43.43.130.

(2)
A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized
leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and
whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation
paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be
on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's
leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that
provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the
period of leave. The basic salary reported for a member who establishes
service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to
the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act applies on a retroactive basis to members for whom
compensation and hours were reported under the circumstances described in
section 1 of this act. Section 1 of this act may also be applied on a retroactive
basis to November 23, 1987, to members for whom compensation and hours would
have been reported except for explicit instructions from the department of
retirement systems.

---
END ---