BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1993
c 336 s 1202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Sections
502 through 504, 506, and 507 of this act shall take effect September 1, ((2000))
2005. However, these sections shall not take effect if, by September 1,
((2000)) 2005, a law is enacted stating that a school
accountability and academic assessment system is not in place.

Sec. 2. 1995
c 77 s 32 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Section
1 of this act shall expire September 1, ((2000)) 2005. However,
section 1 of this act shall not expire if, by September 1, ((2000)) 2005,
a law is not enacted stating that a school accountability and academic assessment
system is not in place.

Sec.
3. 1993
c 371 s 5 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Section
2 of this act shall take effect September 1, ((2000)) 2005.
However, section 2 of this act shall not take effect if, by September 1, ((2000))
2005, a law is enacted stating that a school accountability and academic
assessment system is not in place.

Sec. 4. 1997
c 13 s 15 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Section
2 of this act shall take effect September 1, ((2000)) 2005.
However, section 2 of this act shall not take effect if, by September 1, ((2000))
2005, a law is enacted stating that a school accountability and academic
assessment system is not in place.

Sec.
5. 1995
c 77 s 33 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Section
3 of this act shall take effect September 1, ((2000)) 2005.
However, section 3 of this act shall not take effect if, by September 1, ((2000))
2005, a law is enacted stating that a school accountability and academic
assessment system is not in place.

Sec.
6. 1994
c 245 s 11 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Section 302, chapter 141, Laws of 1992 shall expire September 1, ((2000))
2005, unless by September 1, ((2000)) 2005, a law is
enacted stating that a school accountability and academic assessment system is
not in place.

---
END ---