BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.08.02565 and 1999 c 211 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales to a manufacturer or
processor for hire of machinery and equipment used directly in a manufacturing
operation or research and development operation, to sales to a person engaged
in testing for a manufacturer or processor for hire of machinery and equipment
used directly in a testing operation, or to sales of or charges made for labor
and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering,
or improving the machinery and equipment, but only when the purchaser provides
the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department by rule. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.

(2)
For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02565:

(a)
"Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices, and
support facilities, and tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient
or component thereof, including repair parts and replacement parts.
"Machinery and equipment" includes pollution control equipment
installed and used in a manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research
and development operation to prevent air pollution, water pollution, or
contamination that might otherwise result from the manufacturing operation,
testing operation, or research and development operation.

(b)
"Machinery and equipment" does not include:

(i)
Hand-powered tools;

(ii)
Property with a useful life of less than one year, except for property used
by a manufacturer to create molds that are exempt under this section;

(iii)
Buildings, other than machinery and equipment that is permanently affixed to or
becomes a physical part of a building; and

(iv)
Building fixtures that are not integral to the manufacturing operation, testing
operation, or research and development operation that are permanently affixed
to and become a physical part of a building, such as utility systems for
heating, ventilation, air conditioning, communications, plumbing, or
electrical.

(c)
Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in a manufacturing
operation, testing operation, or research and development operation if the
machinery and equipment:

(i)
Acts upon or interacts with an item of tangible personal property;

(ii)
Conveys, transports, handles, or temporarily stores an item of tangible
personal property at the manufacturing site or testing site;

(iii)
Controls, guides, measures, verifies, aligns, regulates, or tests tangible
personal property at the site or away from the site;

(iv)
Provides physical support for or access to tangible personal property;

(v)
Produces power for, or lubricates machinery and equipment;

(vi)
Produces another item of tangible personal property for use in the
manufacturing operation, testing operation, or research and development
operation;

(vii)
Places tangible personal property in the container, package, or wrapping in
which the tangible personal property is normally sold or transported; or

(viii)
Is integral to research and development as defined in RCW 82.63.010.

(d)
"Manufacturing operation" means the manufacturing of articles,
substances, or commodities for sale as tangible personal property. A
manufacturing operation begins at the point where the raw materials enter the
manufacturing site and ends at the point where the processed material leaves
the manufacturing site. The term also includes that portion of a cogeneration
project that is used to generate power for consumption within the manufacturing
site of which the cogeneration project is an integral part. The term does not
include the production of electricity by a light and power business as defined
in RCW 82.16.010 or the preparation of food products on the premises of a
person selling food products at retail.

(e)
"Cogeneration" means the simultaneous generation of electrical energy
and low-grade heat from the same fuel.

(f)
"Research and development operation" means engaging in research and
development as defined in RCW 82.63.010 by a manufacturer or processor for
hire.

(g)
"Testing" means activities performed to establish or determine the
properties, qualities, and limitations of tangible personal property.

(h) "Testing operation" means the testing of tangible
personal property for a manufacturer or processor for hire. A testing
operation begins at the point where the tangible personal property enters the
testing site and ends at the point where the tangible personal property leaves
the testing site. The term also includes that portion of a cogeneration
project that is used to generate power for consumption within the site of which
the cogeneration project is an integral part. The term does not include the production
of electricity by a light and power business as defined in RCW 82.16.010 or the
preparation of food products on the premises of a person selling food products
at retail.

---
END ---