BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. This
act may be known and cited as the community service act of 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
Young people were four times more likely to volunteer if they were asked than
if they were not asked;

(b)
In Snohomish county, more than one hundred fifty thousand volunteers, about
half the county population, log more than two million five hundred thousand
hours each year. That is equivalent to more than thirty-three million dollars
in paid staff hours, including benefits;

(c)
A lot of colleges require community service on their applications;

(d)
People learn things they are good at, and that helps them decide what they want
to do as a career and also gives them valuable skills that they will use
forever; and

(e)
Community service gives students responsibility and allows them to prove that
they can make a difference in the community.

(2)
The purposes of this act are:

(a)
To get students involved in their community; and

(b)
To get students ready for the profession in which they are interested.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
All students in Washington state high schools shall complete a minimum of forty
hours of community service.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to implement this
section and establish a process for a school board to exempt a student from the
requirement under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
definitions in this section apply throughout sections 1 through 3 of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Community service" means activities that are noncurriculum-based and
nonprofit and are recognized or arranged through the school.

(2)
"Volunteer" means doing work without any payment.

(3)
"Students" means people who are in the ninth grade through the
twelfth grade and are enrolled in high school.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
This act applies to all federal and state law, and the implementation of that
law, whether statutory or otherwise, and whether adopted before or after the
effective date of this act.

(2)
State statutory law adopted after the effective date of this act is subject to
this act unless such law explicitly excludes such application by reference to
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Nothing in this act shall be construed to affect, interpret, or in any way
change the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of the state
of Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act takes effect August 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act are each added to chapter 28A.150 RCW.

---
END ---