BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
Lake Whatcom landscape management pilot project is created.

The
department of natural resources, in cooperation and consultation with local
citizens who have knowledge of the issues, shall develop a management plan
regarding state-owned forest lands in the Lake Whatcom watershed area. The
management plan shall address at least the following topics:

(1)
Procedures for coordinating management activities with other major forest land
owners in the watershed and involving watershed residents in management
activities;

(2)
Establishing riparian management zones along all type five streams, as
classified under chapter 5, Laws of 1999 sp. sess. The department shall manage
lands within such zones to protect water quality and riparian habitat, and
include restrictions upon timber harvest and yarding activities;

(3)
Harvest and road construction upon unstable slopes should be carefully
regulated, including limiting new road construction on unstable slopes and
providing windthrow buffers during harvest; and

(4)
Creating and implementing a sustainable yield model specific to the Lake
Whatcom watershed that encompasses the revised management standards.

The management plan shall be completed and implementation initiated
by June 30, 2001.

---
END ---