BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.30.020 and 1991 sp.s. c 25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Except as provided in section 2 of this act, no person may operate a
motor vehicle subject to registration under chapter 46.16 RCW in this state
unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle liability policy with
liability limits of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090, is
self-insured as provided in RCW 46.29.630, is covered by a certificate of
deposit in conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a liability bond of
at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090. Written proof of financial
responsibility for motor vehicle operation must be provided on the request of a
law enforcement officer in the format specified under RCW 46.30.030.

(b)
A person who drives a motor vehicle that is required to be registered in
another state that requires drivers and owners of vehicles in that state to
maintain insurance or financial responsibility shall, when requested by a law
enforcement officer, provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance
as is required by the laws of the state in which the vehicle is registered.

(c)
When asked to do so by a law enforcement officer, failure to display an
insurance identification card as specified under RCW 46.30.030 creates a
presumption that the person does not have motor vehicle insurance.

(d)
Failure to provide proof of motor vehicle insurance or proof of the
exemption under section 2 of this act is a traffic infraction and is
subject to penalties as set by the supreme court under RCW 46.63.110 or
community service.

(2)
If a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this section appears in
person before the court and provides written evidence that at the time the
person was cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the citation shall be
dismissed. In lieu of personal appearance, a person cited for a violation of
subsection (1) of this section may, before the date scheduled for the person's
appearance before the court, submit by mail to the court written evidence that
at the time the person was cited, he or she was in compliance with the
financial responsibility requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in
which case the citation shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court
may assess court administrative costs of twenty-five dollars at the time of
dismissal.

(3)
The provisions of this chapter shall not govern:

(a)
The operation of a motor vehicle registered under RCW 46.16.305(1), governed by
RCW 46.16.020, or registered with the Washington utilities and transportation
commission as common or contract carriers; or

(b)
The operation of a motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330, a motor-driven cycle
as defined in RCW 46.04.332, or a moped as defined in RCW 46.04.304.

(4)
RCW 46.29.490 shall not be deemed to govern all motor vehicle liability
policies required by this chapter but only those certified for the purposes
stated in chapter 46.29 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.30 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A low-income person may apply for an exemption from the requirements of this
chapter with the office of the insurance commissioner. For purposes of this
section, "low-income person" means a person whose household income
does not exceed one hundred twenty percent of the federal poverty level.

(2)
The insurance commissioner shall grant a six-month renewable certificate of
exemption to a low-income person, and other licensed drivers in the household,
as follows:

(a)
The person files an affidavit with the commissioner swearing that his or her
household income does not exceed the one hundred twenty percent of the federal
poverty level;

(b)
The exemption applies only to one vehicle per household specified on the
certificate;

(c)
The person applying for the certificate cannot have any moving violations or
at-fault accidents within the previous three years; and

(d)
The vehicle must be certified to be in good operating condition by a person
licensed to do automobile repairs or inspections in Washington state.

(3) The commissioner may revoke or not renew a certificate issued
under this section if the commissioner finds that the person does not meet the
income requirements or otherwise does not meet the criteria under subsection
(2) of this section.

---
END ---