BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
It is the intent of the legislature to encourage the development of creative programs
that streamline project permit processes, reduce costs of program
implementation, and increase environmental benefits and compliance.

(2)
The environmental affairs office of the department of transportation, in
coordination with the department of ecology, the department of fish and
wildlife, and representatives from cities and counties, shall convene a work
group to evaluate and assess existing transportation certification programs for
applicability to the environmental permit streamlining process. The work group
will consider, but is not limited to, technical expertise requirements,
evaluation criteria, compliance mechanisms, monitoring requirements, audit
functions of external agencies, enforcement capacity, and reporting
requirements. Cost-benefit analysis of the proposed program should be
included. The work group shall present its report to the legislature by
December 1, 2000.

(3) This section expires December 31, 2000.

---
END ---