BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to the sale of buses, vans, and
other vehicles used for public transportation purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The tax levied by RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to the use of buses,
vans, and other vehicles for public transportation purposes.

---
END ---