BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that additional funds or other benefits can be made available
to Washington regional transit authorities by facilitating their entry into
sale and leaseback, leaseout and leaseback, and similar transactions that
provide to private parties, in consideration for the funds or other benefits
obtained by the regional transit authorities, tax benefits that are not
otherwise available to regional transit authorities. The legislature further
finds that such transactions have been encouraged by agencies of the federal
government as ways to provide additional funds for public facilities. To
facilitate such transactions for regional transit authorities, the legislature
has determined that while regional transit authorities may currently have the
necessary statutory authority and may currently enjoy exemptions from
Washington state taxes for such transactions, a clear statement of statutory
authority and exemption from Washington state taxes is necessary and helpful
for the parties to such transactions. In recognition of the complexity of such
transactions, the legislature desires that the authority and exemptions
provided by this act be subject to certain limitations and be granted for a
period as specified in section 7 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In order to enable regional transit authorities to acquire or finance equipment
or facilities, or reduce the cost of equipment or facilities or to provide
additional funding to regional transit authorities for any other lawful public
purpose, regional transit authorities may enter into sale and leaseback,
leaseout and leaseback, and other similar transactions with respect to
equipment, facilities, and other real and personal property. In connection
with any such transaction, a regional transit authority may execute, as it
considers appropriate and consistent with this act, contracts, agreements,
notes, security agreements, conveyances, bills of sale, deeds, leases as lessee
or lessor, and currency hedges, defeasance arrangements, interest rate,
currency or other swap transactions, one or more payment undertaking
agreements, and agreements relating to foreign and domestic currency. These
agreements or instruments shall have terms, maturities, durations, provisions
as to governing laws, grants of security interests, and other provisions that
are approved by the board of the regional transit authority and which are
consistent with this act.

(2)
"Payment undertaking agreement" means one or more agreements,
undertakings or arrangements pursuant to which all or a portion of the funds
generated by a sale and leaseback, leaseout and leaseback, or other similar
transaction are directed or paid over to a financial institution, insurance
company or other entity which agrees to meet or fulfill, in consideration for
such funds, some or all of the obligations of the regional transit authority,
or any public corporation or other entity created under section 5 of this act,
to make future rent, debt service, or purchase price installment payments in
connection with such transaction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

Transactions
undertaken under section 2 of this act shall be subject to the following
conditions:

(1)
The financial institution, insurance company, or other entity which enters into
a payment undertaking agreement with the regional transit authority or public
development corporation or entity created pursuant to section 5 of this act as
a counterparty must have a rating from at least two nationally recognized
credit rating agencies, as of the date of execution of the payment undertaking
agreement, that is within the two highest long-term investment grade rating
categories, without regard to subcategories, or the obligations of such counterparty
must be guaranteed by a financial institution, insurance company, or other
entity with such credit rating. The payment undertaking agreement shall
require that the obligations of the counterparty or the guarantor, as the case
may be, shall be collateralized by collateral of a type and in an amount
specified by the governing body of the regional transit authority in the event
that the credit ratings of the counterparty or its guarantor fall below the
level required by the foregoing provisions.

(2)
The amount to be paid by the counterparties under payment undertaking
agreements for a transaction pursuant to the terms of such agreements, when
combined with the amount of securities, deposits, and investments set aside by
the regional transit authority for payment in respect of such transactions,
together with interest or other earnings on such securities, deposits, or
investments, shall be sufficient to pay when due all amounts required to be
paid by the regional transit authority, or public corporation or entity created
pursuant to section 5 of this act, as rent, debt service, or installments of
purchase price, as the case may be, over the full term of the transaction plus
any optional purchase price due under the transaction. A certification by an independent
financial expert, banker, or certified public accountant, who is not an
employee of the regional transit authority or public corporation or entity
created pursuant to section 5 of this act, certifying compliance with this
requirement constitutes conclusive evidence that such arrangements, by their
terms, comply with the requirement under this subsection on the sufficiency of
the amount.

(3)
The payment undertaking agreements, and all other basic and material agreements
entered into in connection with such transactions, shall specify that the
parties to such agreements consent to the jurisdiction of state courts of
Washington for disputes arising out of such agreements and agree not to contest
venue before such courts. Regardless of the choice of law specified in the
foregoing agreements, such agreements shall acknowledge that the regional
transit authority or public development corporation or entity created pursuant
to section 5 of this act which is a party to such agreements is an entity created
under the laws of the state of Washington whose power and authority and
limitations and restrictions on such power and authority are governed by the
laws of the state of Washington.

Payment
undertaking agreements that meet the foregoing requirement shall be treated for
all relevant purposes as agreements pursuant to which future services are
performed for a present payment and shall not be treated as payment agreements
within the meaning of chapter 39.96 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

Property
sold, acquired, leased, or otherwise transferred under any of the arrangements
described in this act shall be considered for all purposes, including, without
limitation, leasehold excise tax purposes, to be property owned, possessed,
used, and held by the regional transit authority and used for public purposes,
whether owned or held by the regional transit authority or by a public
corporation or entity contemplated by section 5 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

To
accomplish any of the activities under this act, a regional transit authority
may create a public corporation under RCW 35.21.730 through 35.21.755 or other
entity created under Washington law, which corporation or entity shall have the
authority to undertake any of the activities that regional transit authorities
may undertake, including any activities under this act. A regional transit
authority shall have all of the powers, authorities, and rights expressly or
impliedly granted to any city, town, or county, or their agents, under any
provision of RCW 35.21.730 through 35.21.755.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

A
sale, lease, sublease, or other transfer of property by or to the regional
transit authority or any public corporation or entity created pursuant to
section 5 of this act, and any payments or other consideration paid or received
therefrom, in each case in connection with transactions undertaken under
section 2 of this act, are exempt from all real estate excise, leasehold
excise, sales, use, business and occupation, public utility, motor vehicle, and
ad valorem real or personal property taxes, public corporation in lieu excise
taxes as provided under RCW 35.21.730 and 35.21.755, and any other taxes
imposed by this state or a political subdivision or municipality, city, town,
county, authority, political or public corporation, or other agency of this
state. The foregoing exemption is not intended to apply to taxes, if any,
payable upon first acquisition or use by the regional transit authority, or any
public corporation or entity created pursuant to section 5 of this act, of the
equipment or facilities that is the subject of a transaction undertaken under
section 2 of this act, provided, however, that other applicable exemptions may
be available.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no regional transit
authority may initiate a transaction authorized by this act after June 30,
2006.

(2)
The termination of authority to enter into such transactions after June 30,
2006, shall not affect the validity of any transactions entered into under this
act on or before that date or the exemptions from taxes provided by this act
for such transactions.

(3)
A regional transit authority may enter into a transaction in accordance with
this act after June 30, 2006, to replace or refinance a transaction that
relates to specific obligations entered into on or before that date and that
has terminated, or is, pursuant to the terms of the replacement or refinance,
to terminate, before the final stated term of that transaction. The exemptions
from taxes provided by this act shall apply to such replacement or refinance
transactions.

(4)
Any regional transit authority, or public corporation or entity created
pursuant to section 5 of this act, which undertakes a transaction
authorized by this act, shall provide to the state finance committee a copy of
all material agreements executed in connection with such transaction within
three months of the closing of the transaction. The state finance committee
shall make a report to the president of the senate and speaker of the house of
representatives on transactions authorized by this act. The report shall
include the amount of the transactions, the expected savings resulting from the
transactions, the transaction costs, and any other information the state
finance committee determines relevant. The report shall be submitted within
six months of the closing of each transaction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 81.112 RCW to read as follows:

The authority granted by this act shall be in addition and
supplemental to any authority previously granted and shall not limit or be
limited by any other powers or authority previously granted to regional transit
authorities or any public corporation, or restrictions on such powers or
authority. Nothing in this act shall be construed as limiting other statutory
authority previously granted to such regional transit authorities or public
corporations or other tax exemptions granted to such regional transit
authorities or public corporations. Nothing in this act shall be construed as limiting
the authority of the state, any political subdivision thereof, or any other
public or municipal corporation to undertake the activities described herein as
expressly or impliedly authorized by other provisions of law. Nothing in this
act shall be construed as an authorization to provide indemnification to the
extent such indemnification is prohibited or restricted by other provisions of
law or the Constitution of the state of Washington.

---
END ---