BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that laboratory- generated cultures of microorganisms are a
dangerous portion of the biomedical waste stream. It is the purpose of this
act to require the inactivation of such cultures.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.95K.010 and 1994 c 165 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Biomedical waste" means, and is limited to, the following types of
waste:

(a)
"Animal waste" is waste animal carcasses, body parts, and bedding of
animals that are known to be infected with, or that have been inoculated with,
human pathogenic microorganisms infectious to humans.

(b)
(("Biosafety level 4 disease waste" is waste contaminated with
blood, excretions, exudates, or secretions from humans or animals who are
isolated to protect others from highly communicable infectious diseases that
are identified as pathogenic organisms assigned to biosafety level 4 by the
centers for disease control, national institute of health, biosafety in
microbiological and biomedical laboratories, current edition.

(c)))
"Cultures ((and stocks))" are laboratory wastes
infectious to humans and includes specimen cultures, cultures ((and stocks))
of etiologic agents, wastes from production of biologicals and serums,
discarded live and attenuated vaccines, and laboratory waste that has come into
contact with cultures ((and stocks)) of etiologic agents or blood
specimens. Such waste includes but is not limited to culture dishes((,
blood specimen tubes,)) and devices used to transfer, inoculate, and mix
cultures.

(((d)))
(c) "Human blood and blood products" is discarded waste human
blood and blood components, and materials containing free-flowing blood and
blood products.

(((e)
"Pathological)) (d) "Pathology waste" is waste human
source biopsy materials, tissues, and anatomical parts that emanate from
surgery, obstetrical procedures, and autopsy. "((Pathological)) Pathology
waste" does not include teeth, human corpses, remains, and anatomical
parts that are intended for interment or cremation.

(((f)))
(e) "Sharps waste" is all hypodermic needles, syringes with
needles attached, IV tubing with needles attached, scalpel blades, and lancets
that have been removed from the original sterile package.

(2)
"Biosafety level 3 practices" means practices identified in the
centers for disease control and prevention publication "Biosafety in
Microbial and Biomedical Laboratories," fourth edition, May 1999, as
necessary to handle dangerous and exotic agents properly, which agents pose a
high risk of life-threatening disease, may be aerosol-transmitted, and may
cause serious and potentially lethal infection.

(3)
"Biosafety level 4 practices" means practices identified in the
centers for disease control and prevention publication "Biosafety in
Microbial and Biomedical Laboratories," fourth edition, May 1999, as
necessary to handle dangerous and exotic agents properly, which agents pose a
high risk of life-threatening disease, may be aerosol-transmitted, and for
which there is no available vaccine or therapy.

(4)
"Drop-off programs" means those program sites designated by the solid
waste planning jurisdiction where sharps users may dispose of their sharps
containers.

(5)
"Local government" means city, town, or county.

(((3)
"Local health department" means the city, county, city-county, or
district public health department.

(4))) (6)
"Local health jurisdiction" means the county, city-county, or
multicounty public health department or district.

(7)
"Mail programs" means those programs that provide sharps users with a
multiple barrier protection kit for the placement of a sharps container and
subsequent mailing of the wastes to an approved disposal facility.

(8)
"Person" means an individual, firm, corporation, association,
partnership, consortium, joint venture, commercial entity, state government
agency, or local government.

(((5)
"Treatment" means incineration, sterilization, or other method,
technique, or process that changes the character or composition of a biomedical
waste so as to minimize the risk of transmitting an infectious disease.

(6))) (9)
"Pharmacy return programs" means those programs where sharps
containers are returned by the user to designated return sites located at a
pharmacy to be transported by a biomedical or solid waste collection company
approved by the utilities and transportation commission.

(10)
"Residential sharps waste" has the same meaning as "sharps
waste" in subsection (1) of this section except that the sharps waste is
generated and prepared for disposal at a residence, apartment, dwelling, or
other noncommercial habitat.

(((7)))
(11) "Sharps waste container" means a leak-proof, rigid,
puncture-resistant red container that is taped closed or tightly lidded to
prevent the loss of the residential sharps waste.

(((8)
"Mail programs" means those programs that provide sharps users with a
multiple barrier protection kit for the placement of a sharps container and
subsequent mailing of the wastes to an approved disposal facility.

(9)
"Pharmacy return programs" means those programs where sharps
containers are returned by the user to designated return sites located at a
pharmacy to be transported by a biomedical or solid waste collection company
approved by the utilities and transportation commission.

(10)
"Drop-off programs" means those program sites designated by the solid
waste planning jurisdiction where sharps users may dispose of their sharps
containers.

(11))) (12)
"Source separation" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.95.030.

(((12)))
(13) "Treatment" means incineration, sterilization, or other
method, technique, or process that changes the character or composition of a
biomedical waste so as to minimize the risk of transmitting an infectious
disease.

(14)
"Unprotected sharps" means residential sharps waste that are not
disposed of in a sharps waste container.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 70.95K RCW to read as follows:

Generators
of cultures requiring biosafety level 3 or 4 practices shall treat those
cultures before final disposal in either of the following ways: (1) The
generators may treat the cultures before transport from the facility; or (2)
the generators segregate the cultures and transport them to a treatment
facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Section 3 of this act takes effect January 1, 2001.

---
END ---