BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the federal clean air act amendments of 1990 sought to
accelerate the deployment of clean-fuel vehicles through the use of nonmonetary
incentives. The federal regulations adopted to implement the clean air act
amendments direct states to exempt federally certified and labeled clean-fuel
vehicles in fleets from high occupancy vehicle restrictions for single-occupant
vehicles. In addition, the federal transportation equity act of the
twenty-first century encourages and permits states to extend the high occupancy
vehicle lane access exemption to nonfleet owners of clean-fuel vehicles.

The
legislature finds that the goals of the state and federal clean air acts will
be advanced by extending the use of the high occupancy vehicle lanes to
federally certified clean-fuel vehicles as long as the vehicles are not a
significant cause of congestion in the high occupancy vehicle lanes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
By June 30, 2001, the department shall issue special clean-fuel license plates,
bearing the standard background, for passenger vehicles that are federally
certified as: (a) Inherently low-emission vehicles; (b) ultra low-emission
vehicles; or (c) zero-emission vehicles. The license plates shall denote the
vehicle's certification with the inherently low-emission, ultra low-emission,
or zero-emission designation.

(2)
The department shall issue the special clean-fuel license plates upon payment
by the applicant of all license fees, but the department may not set or charge
an additional fee for the special clean-fuel license plates. The department
shall replace, at cost, license plates issued under this section if they are
lost, stolen, damaged, defaced, or destroyed. The clean-fuel license plates shall
remain with the vehicle for which they were initially issued and may not be
used on another vehicle.

(3)
The department shall revoke the special clean-fuel designation if the vehicle
is required to have a standard emission test, under chapter 70.120 RCW, and it
fails the test. If the vehicle fails the emission test, the vehicle's owner
shall return the special clean-fuel license plates to the department within
fifteen days and apply for regular license plates.

(4)
The use of a special clean-fuel license plate on a vehicle that is not
federally certified, or on a certified vehicle that has failed an emission test
more than fifteen days previous, is a misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The state department of transportation and the local authorities, in
consultation with the department of ecology, may permit a vehicle with one or
more occupants to operate in high occupancy vehicle lanes if it is certified as
an inherently low-emission vehicle, ultra low-emission vehicle, or
zero-emission vehicle pursuant to Title 40, Chapter 1, Part 88, Code of Federal
Regulations, is labeled in accordance with section 88.312-93(c) of that title,
and bears a special clean-fuel license plate as provided in section 2 of this
act.

(2)
Inherently low-emission fleet vehicles that have been certified, labeled, and
issued special clean-fuel license plates shall be allowed in the high occupancy
vehicle lanes with only one occupant in federally designated nonattainment air
pollution areas. For the purpose of this section "fleet" means a
vehicle owner who is in a nonattainment area and owns a total of at least ten
motor vehicles, including the inherently low-emission vehicle, that operate in
the owner's fleet.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 70.120 RCW to read as follows:

If a vehicle with special clean-fuel license plates bearing the
designation inherently low-emission, ultra low-emission, or zero-emission, as
provided in section 2 of this act, fails an emission test required under this
chapter, the department shall immediately send written notice of the failure to
the department of licensing.

---
END ---