BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
58.17.060 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative body of a city, town, or county shall adopt regulations and
procedures, and appoint administrative personnel for the summary approval of
short plats and short subdivisions or alteration or vacation thereof. When an
alteration or vacation involves a public dedication, the alteration or vacation
shall be processed as provided in RCW 58.17.212 or 58.17.215. Such regulations
shall be adopted by ordinance and shall provide that a short plat and short
subdivision may be approved only if written findings that are appropriate, as
provided in RCW 58.17.110, are made by the administrative personnel, and may
contain wholly different requirements than those governing the approval of
preliminary and final plats of subdivisions and may require surveys and
monumentations and shall require filing of a short plat, or alteration or
vacation thereof, for record in the office of the county auditor: PROVIDED,
That such regulations must contain a requirement that land in short
subdivisions may not be further divided in any manner within a period of five
years without the filing of a final plat, except that when the short plat
contains fewer than four parcels, nothing in this section shall prevent the
owner who filed the short plat from filing an alteration within the five-year
period to create up to a total of four lots within the original short plat
boundaries: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such regulations are not required to contain
a penalty clause as provided in RCW 36.32.120 and may provide for wholly
injunctive relief.

An
ordinance requiring a survey shall require that the survey be completed and
filed with the application for approval of the short subdivision.

(2)
Cities, towns, and counties shall include in their short plat regulations and
procedures pursuant to subsection (1) of this section provisions for
considering sidewalks and other planning features that assure safe walking
conditions for students who walk to and from school.

(3) The legislative body of a city, town, or county may by
ordinance exempt short plats or short subdivisions from the requirements in
subsection (1) of this section in which the division is for the purpose of
establishing a site solely used for an uninhabited public or private utility or
telecommunications facility, provided a record survey is recorded per chapter
58.09 RCW.

---
END ---