BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
77.32.235 and 1998 c 191 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

Physically or mentally disabled persons, mentally ill persons, persons
suffering from a life-threatening illness, terminally ill persons, hospital
patients, ((and)) senior citizens ((who are in the care of a
state-licensed or state-operated care facility)), and immediate family
members or caregivers of these persons accompanying these persons may fish
and harvest shellfish during open season without individual licenses or the
payment of individual license fees if such persons are in the care of a
state-licensed or state-operated care facility or legal nonprofit organization
serving handicapped or seriously or terminally ill persons, the fishing
activity is occasional, the fishing activity is conducted in a group
supervised by staff of the care facility or organization, and the
facility or organization holds a group fishing permit issued by the
director. For purposes of this section, immediate family member means a
spouse, brother, sister, parent, grandparent, child, or grandchild. The
director shall issue such a permit upon application by care facility or
organization staff.

---
END ---