BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
31.45.010 and 1995 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
(("Check casher")) (a) "Legalized loan shark"
means an individual, partnership, unincorporated association, or corporation
that, for compensation, engages, in whole or in part, in the business of
cashing checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper serving the
same purpose.

(((2)
"Check seller")) (b) "Legalized loan shark" also
means an individual, partnership, unincorporated association, or corporation
that, for compensation, engages, in whole or in part, in the business of or
selling checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper serving the
same purpose.

(((3)))
(2) "Licensee" means a ((check casher or seller)) legalized
loan shark licensed by the director to engage in business in accordance
with this chapter. For purposes of the enforcement powers of this chapter,
including the power to issue cease and desist orders under RCW 31.45.110,
"licensee" also means a ((check casher or seller)) legalized
loan shark who fails to obtain the license required by this chapter.

(((4)))
(3) "Small loan" means a loan of up to five hundred dollars
for a period of thirty-one days or less.

(((5)))
(4) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.

Sec.
2. RCW
31.45.030 and 1995 c 18 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in RCW 31.45.020, no ((check casher or seller)) legalized
loan shark may engage in business without first obtaining a license from
the director in accordance with this chapter. A license is required for each
location where a licensee engages in the business of cashing or selling checks
or drafts.

(2)
Each application for a license shall be in writing in a form prescribed by the
director and shall contain the following information:

(a)
The legal name, residence, and business address of the applicant and, if the
applicant is a partnership, association, or corporation, of every member,
officer, and director thereof;

(b)
The location where the initial registered office of the applicant will be
located in this state;

(c)
The complete address of any other locations at which the applicant proposes to
engage in business as a ((check casher or seller)) legalized loan
shark;

(d)
Such other data, financial statements, and pertinent information as the
director may require with respect to the applicant, its directors, trustees,
officers, members, or agents.

(3)
Any information in the application regarding the personal residential address
or telephone number of the applicant is exempt from the public records
disclosure requirements of chapter 42.17 RCW.

(4)
The application shall be filed together with an investigation and supervision
fee established by rule by the director. Such fees collected shall be
deposited to the credit of the banking examination fund in accordance with RCW
43.320.110.

(5)(a)
Before granting a license to sell checks, drafts, or money orders under this
chapter, the director shall require that the licensee file with the director a
surety bond running to the state of Washington, which bond shall be issued by a
surety insurer which meets the requirements of chapter 48.28 RCW, and be in a
format acceptable to the director. The director shall adopt rules to determine
the penal sum of the bond that shall be filed by each licensee. The bond shall
be conditioned upon the licensee paying all persons who purchase checks,
drafts, or money orders from the licensee the face value of any check, draft,
or money order which is dishonored by the drawee bank, savings bank, or savings
and loan association due to insufficient funds or by reason of the account
having been closed. The bond shall only be liable for the face value of the
dishonored check, draft, or money order, and shall not be liable for any
interest or consequential damages.

(b)
Before granting a small loan endorsement under this chapter, the director shall
require that the licensee file with the director a surety bond, in a format
acceptable to the director, issued by a surety insurer that meets the
requirements of chapter 48.28 RCW. The director shall adopt rules to determine
the penal sum of the bond that shall be filed by each licensee. A licensee who
wishes to engage in both check selling and making small loans may combine the
penal sums of the bonding requirements and file one bond in a form acceptable
to the director. The bond shall run to the state of Washington as obligee, and
shall run to the benefit of the state and any person or persons who suffer loss
by reason of the licensee's violation of this chapter or any rules adopted
under this chapter. The bond shall only be liable for damages suffered by
borrowers as a result of the licensee's violation of this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter, and shall not be liable for any interest or
consequential damages.

(c)
The bond shall be continuous and may be canceled by the surety upon the surety
giving written notice to the director and licensee of its intent to cancel the
bond. The cancellation is effective thirty days after the notice is received
by the director. Whether or not the bond is renewed, continued, reinstated,
reissued, or otherwise extended, replaced, or modified, including increases or
decreases in the penal sum, it shall be considered one continuous obligation,
and the surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate or cumulative
amount exceeding the penal sum set forth on the face of the bond. In no event
shall the penal sum, or any portion thereof, at two or more points in time be
added together in determining the surety's liability. The bond shall not be
liable for any liability of the licensee for tortious acts, whether or not such
liability is imposed by statute or common law, or is imposed by contract. The
bond shall not be a substitute or supplement to any liability or other
insurance required by law or by the contract. If the surety desires to make
payment without awaiting court action against it, the penal sum of the bond
shall be reduced to the extent of any payment made by the surety in good faith
under the bond.

(d)
Any person who is a purchaser of a check, draft, or money order from the
licensee having a claim against the licensee for the dishonor of any check,
draft, or money order by the drawee bank, savings bank, or savings and loan
association due to insufficient funds or by reason of the account having been
closed, or who obtained a small loan from the licensee and was damaged by the
licensee's violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, may
bring suit upon such bond or deposit in the superior court of the county in
which the check, draft, or money order was purchased, or in the superior court
of a county in which the licensee maintains a place of business. Jurisdiction
shall be exclusively in the superior court. Any such action must be brought
not later than one year after the dishonor of the check, draft, or money order
on which the claim is based. In the event valid claims against a bond or
deposit exceed the amount of the bond or deposit, each claimant shall only be
entitled to a pro rata amount, based on the amount of the claim as it is valid
against the bond, or deposit, without regard to the date of filing of any claim
or action.

(e)
In lieu of the surety bond required by this section, the applicant for a ((check
seller)) legalized loan shark license may file with the director a
deposit consisting of cash or other security acceptable to the director in an
amount equal to the penal sum of the required bond. In lieu of the surety bond
required by this section, the applicant for a small loan endorsement may file
with the director a deposit consisting of cash or other security acceptable to
the director in an amount equal to the penal sum of the required bond, or may
demonstrate to the director net worth in excess of three times the amount of
the penal sum of the required bond.

The
director may adopt rules necessary for the proper administration of the
security or to establish reporting requirements to ensure that the net worth
requirements continue to be met. A deposit given instead of the bond required
by this section is not an asset of the licensee for the purpose of complying
with the liquid asset provisions of this chapter. A deposit given instead of
the bond required by this section is a fund held in trust for the benefit of
eligible claimants under this section and is not an asset of the estate of any
licensee that seeks protection voluntarily or involuntarily under the bankruptcy
laws of the United States.

(f)
Such security may be sold by the director at public auction if it becomes
necessary to satisfy the requirements of this chapter. Notice of the sale
shall be served upon the licensee who placed the security personally or by
mail. If notice is served by mail, service shall be addressed to the licensee
at its address as it appears in the records of the director. Bearer bonds of
the United States or the state of Washington without a prevailing market price
must be sold at public auction. Such bonds having a prevailing market price
may be sold at private sale not lower than the prevailing market price. Upon
any sale, any surplus above amounts due shall be returned to the licensee, and
the licensee shall deposit with the director additional security sufficient to
meet the amount required by the director. A deposit given instead of the bond
required by this section shall not be deemed an asset of the licensee for the
purpose of complying with the liquid asset provisions of this chapter.

Sec.
3. RCW
31.45.073 and 1995 c 18 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No licensee may engage in the business of making small loans without first
obtaining a small loan endorsement to its license from the director in
accordance with this chapter. An endorsement will be required for each
location where a licensee engages in the business of making small loans, but a
small loan endorsement may authorize a licensee to make small loans at a
location different than the licensed locations where it cashes or sells checks
or drafts. A licensee may have more than one endorsement.

(2)
A licensee that has obtained the required small loan endorsement may charge
interest or fees for small loans not to exceed in the aggregate fifteen percent
of the principal amount borrowed. The director may determine by rule which
fees, if any, are not subject to the fifteen percent limitation.

(3)
In connection with making a small loan, a licensee may advance moneys on the
security of a postdated check or draft provided the time period between the
date the loan is granted and the date of the postdated check does not exceed
thirty-one days. A licensee shall deposit all postdated checks or drafts as
soon as practicable after the date of the check or draft has passed.

(4)
No person may at any time cash or advance any moneys on a postdated check or
draft in excess of the amount of goods or services purchased without first
obtaining a small loan endorsement to a ((check casher or check seller))
legalized loan shark license.

Sec.
4. RCW
31.45.077 and 1995 c 18 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each application for a small loan endorsement to a ((check casher or check
seller)) legalized loan shark license must be in writing and in a
form prescribed by the director and shall contain the following information:

(a)
The legal name, residence, and business address of the applicant, and if the
applicant is a partnership, corporation, or association, the name and address
of every member, partner, officer, and director thereof;

(b)
The street and mailing address of each location where the licensee will engage
in the business of making small loans;

(c)
A surety bond, or other security allowed under RCW 31.45.030, in the amount
required; and

(d)
Any other pertinent information, including financial statements, as the
director may require with respect to the licensee and its directors, officers,
trustees, members, or employees.

(2)
Any information in the application regarding the licensee's personal
residential address or telephone number is exempt from the public records
disclosure requirements of chapter 42.17 RCW.

(3) The application shall be filed together with an investigation
and supervision fee established by rule by the director. Fees collected shall
be deposited to the credit of the banking examination fund in accordance with
RCW 43.320.110.

---
END ---