BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
31.45.073 and 1995 c 18 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
No licensee may engage in the business of making small loans without first
obtaining a small loan endorsement to its license from the director in
accordance with this chapter. An endorsement will be required for each
location where a licensee engages in the business of making small loans, but a
small loan endorsement may authorize a licensee to make small loans at a
location different than the licensed locations where it cashes or sells checks
or drafts. A licensee may have more than one endorsement.

(b)
The director shall not issue any small loan endorsements after the effective
date of this act.

(2)(a)
A licensee that has obtained the required small loan endorsement may charge
interest or fees for small loans not to exceed in the aggregate fifteen percent
of the principal amount borrowed. The licensee shall disclose the amount
charged under this subsection in writing as a percentage of the amount loaned
and shall annualize this percentage by multiplying this percentage by
twenty-four for a two-week loan and by twelve for a four-week loan no later
than the time the small loan is made. The director may determine by rule
which fees, if any, are not subject to the fifteen percent limitation.

(b)
In all printed advertising, a licensee shall disclose the following using a
five hundred dollar small loan for thirty days as the example: (i) The total
cost of the small loan; and (ii) the equivalent of an annual percentage rate
which shall be the amount in (b)(i) of this subsection as a percentage of five
hundred dollars multiplied by twelve.

(3)
In connection with making a small loan, a licensee may advance moneys on the
security of a postdated check or draft provided the time period between the
date the loan is granted and the date of the postdated check does not exceed
thirty-one days. A licensee shall deposit all postdated checks or drafts as
soon as practicable after the date of the check or draft has passed.

(4)
No person may at any time cash or advance any moneys on a postdated check or
draft in excess of the amount of goods or services purchased without first
obtaining a small loan endorsement to a check casher or check seller license.

Sec.
2. RCW
31.45.170 and 1994 c 92 s 289 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
licensee violating or failing to comply with any provision of this chapter or
any lawful direction or requirement of the director is subject, in addition to
any penalty otherwise provided, to a penalty of not more than one ((hundred))
thousand dollars for each offense, to be recovered by the attorney
general in a civil action in the name of the state. Each day's continuance of
the violation is a separate and distinct offense.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 31.45 RCW to read as follows:

Every
applicant for a license or endorsement under this chapter made after the
effective date of this act shall undergo a record check through the Washington
state patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through
43.43.838, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050 and through the federal bureau of
investigation. The record check shall include a fingerprint check using a
complete Washington state criminal fingerprint identification card. The
director shall recover the cost of the record check required under this section
from the licensee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---