BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

The
governor's salmon recovery office, in coordination with the University of
Washington, Washington State University, and other salmon research institutions
located in the state, shall develop and sponsor an annual salmon science
conference. The purpose of the conference is to encourage a continuing
discussion between scientists engaged in research that is pertinent to salmon
recovery, and to foster the dissemination of scientific information relating to
salmon recovery. The first conference shall take place on or before June 30,
2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington rivers center is created at the University of Washington. The
Washington rivers center shall be an independent and politically neutral center
within the office of the vice-provost for research. It is the purpose of the
Washington rivers center to provide independent analysis of data relating to
salmon habitat, stream and river restoration, and river processes. The center
shall facilitate the transfer of emerging technology related to salmon
restoration. The center may also assist in tracking and monitoring salmon
restoration efforts across the state, and may provide feedback and analysis of
the effectiveness of specific habitat restoration projects funded by the salmon
recovery funding board under this chapter, as well as other habitat restoration
projects. The center may engage in basic and applied river research, the
purpose of which is to develop new ideas and technology related to salmon
restoration. The center may engage in scientific activities that are
specifically related to adaptive management in the context of salmon recovery
efforts. Activities of the center may be used to supplant, but shall not
replace, the state monitoring program and activities.

(2)
The Washington rivers center is eligible for grants and loans made by the
salmon recovery funding board under RCW 75.46.160.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

The
Washington rivers center shall be independently staffed, and may be assisted by
the faculty of the University of Washington or other state higher education
institutions. The center may provide funding for graduate students engaged in
studying salmon recovery, stream restoration, or related issues.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---