BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.57A.110 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 270 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The public transportation benefit area shall have and exercise all rights with
respect to the construction, acquisition, maintenance, operation, extension,
alteration, repair, control and management of passenger transportation which
any component city shall have been previously empowered to exercise and such
powers shall not thereafter be exercised by such component cities without the
consent of the public transportation benefit area((: PROVIDED, That)).
Any city owning and operating a public transportation system on July 1,
1975, may continue to operate such system within such city until such
system shall have been acquired by the public transportation benefit area and a
public transportation benefit area may not acquire such system without the
consent of the city council of such city except as provided in subsection
(2) of this section.

(2)
In any county where a public transportation benefit area and a city both
operate a public transportation system, the county shall submit a ballot
proposition to the voters of the public transportation benefit area and the
city on the question of whether the public transportation benefit area shall
acquire the public transportation system owned by the city. The ballot
proposition shall state that approval shall also constitute agreement that the
city shall be subject to all taxes and other liabilities and obligations of the
public transportation benefit area. Such vote shall take place before January
1, 2002, and a simple majority shall authorize acquisition. Upon a favorable
vote, the city shall be included within the boundaries of the transportation
benefit area and be subject to all taxes and other liabilities and obligations
of the public transportation benefit area. Public transportation facilities
and properties which are owned by the city shall become the property of the
public transportation benefit area.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.57A.130 and 1983 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
treasurer of the county in which a public transportation benefit area authority
is located shall be ex officio treasurer of the authority. In the case of a
multicounty public transportation benefit area the county treasurer of the
largest component county, by population, shall be the treasurer of the
authority. However, the authority, by resolution, and upon the approval of the
county treasurer, may designate some other person having experience in
financial or fiscal matters as treasurer of the authority. Such a treasurer
shall possess all of the powers, responsibilities, and duties the county
treasurer possesses for a public transportation benefit area authority related
to investing surplus authority funds. The authority may (and if the treasurer
is not a county treasurer, it shall) require a bond with a surety company
authorized to do business in the state of Washington in an amount and under the
terms and conditions the authority, by resolution, from time to time finds will
protect the authority against loss. The premium on any such bond shall be paid
by the authority.

All
authority funds shall be paid to the treasurer and shall be disbursed by the
treasurer only on warrants issued by the county auditor, upon orders or
vouchers approved by the authority. However, the authority may, by resolution,
designate some person having experience in financial or fiscal matters, other
than the county auditor, as the auditor of the authority. Such an auditor
shall possess all of the powers, responsibilities, and duties that the county
auditor possesses for a public transportation benefit area authority related to
creating and maintaining funds, issuing warrants, and maintaining a record of
receipts and disbursements.

The
treasurer shall establish a "transportation fund," into which shall
be paid all authority funds, and the treasurer shall maintain such special
accounts as may be created by the authority into which shall be placed all
money as the authority may, by resolution, direct.

If
the treasurer of the authority is a treasurer of the county, all authority
funds shall be deposited with the county depositary under the same
restrictions, contracts, and security as provided for county depositaries. If
the treasurer of the authority is some other person, all funds shall be
deposited in such bank or banks authorized to do business in this state that
have qualified for insured deposits under any federal deposit insurance act as
the authority, by resolution, shall designate.

An
authority may provide and require a reasonable bond of any other person
handling moneys or securities of the authority, but the authority shall pay the
premium on the bond.

The
county or counties and each city or town which is included in the authority
shall contribute such sums towards the expense for maintaining and operating
the public transportation system as shall be agreed upon between them.

On and after January 1, 2002, any city operating a public
transportation system within a county where a public transportation benefit
area operates a public transportation system shall by interlocal agreement
contribute such sums as necessary to fully compensate the public transportation
benefit area for services provided to the city.

---
END ---