BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.150.220 and 1995 c 77 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For the purposes of this section and RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260:

(a)
The term "total program hour offering" shall mean those hours when
students are provided the opportunity to engage in educational activity planned
by and under the direction of school district staff, as directed by the
administration and board of directors of the district, inclusive of
intermissions for class changes, recess and teacher/parent-guardian conferences
which are planned and scheduled by the district for the purpose of discussing
students' educational needs or progress, and exclusive of time actually spent
for meals.

(b)
"Instruction in work skills" shall include instruction in one or more
of the following areas: Industrial arts, home and family life education,
business and office education, distributive education, agricultural education,
health occupations education, vocational education, trade and industrial
education, technical education and career education.

(c)
"School year" means the minimum school year length as required under
subsection (5) of this section.

(2)
Satisfaction of the basic education goal identified in RCW 28A.150.210 shall be
considered to be implemented by the following program requirements:

(a)
Each school district shall make available to students in kindergarten at least
((a)) an average total program offering of ((four hundred
fifty hours)) two and one-half hours per school day. The program
shall include reading, arithmetic, language skills and such other subjects and
such activities as the school district shall determine to be appropriate for
the education of the school district's students enrolled in such program;

(b)
Each school district shall make available to students in grades one through
three, at least ((a)) an average total program hour offering of
((two thousand seven hundred hours)) five hours per school day.
A minimum of ninety-five percent of the total program hour offerings shall be
in the basic skills areas of reading/language arts (which may include languages
other than English, including American Indian languages), mathematics, social
studies, science, music, art, health and physical education. The remaining
five percent of the total program hour offerings may include such subjects and
activities as the school district shall determine to be appropriate for the
education of the school district's students in such grades;

(c)
Each school district shall make available to students in grades four through
six at least ((a)) an average total program hour offering of ((two
thousand nine hundred seventy hours)) five and one-half hours per school
day. A minimum of ninety percent of the total program hour offerings shall
be in the basic skills areas of reading/language arts (which may include
languages other than English, including American Indian languages),
mathematics, social studies, science, music, art, health and physical
education. The remaining ten percent of the total program hour offerings may
include such subjects and activities as the school district shall determine to
be appropriate for the education of the school district's students in such
grades;

(d)
Each school district shall make available to students in grades seven through
eight, at least ((a)) an average total program hour offering of
((one thousand nine hundred eighty hours)) six hours per school day.
A minimum of eighty-five percent of the total program hour offerings shall be
in the basic skills areas of reading/language arts (which may include languages
other than English, including American Indian languages), mathematics, social
studies, science, music, art, health and physical education. A minimum of ten
percent of the total program hour offerings shall be in the area of work
skills. The remaining five percent of the total program hour offerings may
include such subjects and activities as the school district shall determine to
be appropriate for the education of the school district's students in such grades;

(e)
Each school district shall make available to students in grades nine through
twelve at least a total program hour offering of four thousand three hundred
twenty hours. A minimum of sixty percent of the total program hour offerings
shall be in the basic skills areas of language arts, languages other than
English, which may be American Indian languages, mathematics, social studies,
science, music, art, health and physical education. A minimum of twenty
percent of the total program hour offerings shall be in the area of work
skills. The remaining twenty percent of the total program hour offerings may
include traffic safety or such subjects and activities as the school district
shall determine to be appropriate for the education of the school district's
students in such grades, with not less than one-half thereof in basic skills
and/or work skills: PROVIDED, That each school district shall have the option
of including grade nine within the program hour offering requirements of grades
seven and eight so long as such requirements for grades seven through nine are
increased to two thousand nine hundred seventy hours and such requirements for
grades ten through twelve are decreased to three thousand two hundred forty
hours.

(3)
In order to provide flexibility to the local school districts in the setting of
their curricula, and in order to maintain the intent of this legislation, which
is to stress the instruction of basic skills and work skills, any local school
district may establish minimum course mix percentages that deviate by up to
five percentage points above or below those minimums required by subsection (2)
of this section, so long as the total program hour requirement is still met.

(4)
Nothing contained in subsection (2) of this section shall be construed to
require individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours
per day or to take any particular courses.

(5)
Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic educational
program shall be accessible to all students who are five years of age, as
provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty-one years of age and shall
consist of a minimum of one hundred ((eighty)) eighty-five school
days for the 2000-01 school year and one hundred ninety school days per
school year thereafter in such grades as are conducted by a school
district, and one hundred ((eighty)) eighty-five half-days of
instruction, or equivalent for the 2000-01 school year and thereafter one
hundred ninety half-days of instruction, or equivalent, in kindergarten:
PROVIDED, That effective May 1, 1979, a school district may schedule the last
five school days of the ((one hundred and eighty day)) school year for
noninstructional purposes in the case of students who are graduating from high
school, including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early
release from school upon the request of a student, and all such students may be
claimed as a full time equivalent student to the extent they could otherwise
have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260.

(6)
The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and ensure
compliance with the program requirements imposed by this section, RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental program approval
requirements as the state board may establish: PROVIDED, That each school
district board of directors shall establish the basis and means for determining
and monitoring the district's compliance with the basic skills and work skills
percentage and course requirements of this section. The certification of the
board of directors and the superintendent of a school district that the
district is in compliance with such basic skills and work skills requirements
may be accepted by the superintendent of public instruction and the state board
of education.

(7)
Special education programs for students with disabilities, vocational-technical
institute programs, state institution and state residential school programs,
all of which programs are conducted for the common school age, kindergarten
through secondary school program students encompassed by this section, shall be
exempt from the basic skills and work skills percentage and course requirements
of this section in order that the unique needs, abilities or limitations of
such students may be met.

(8)
Any school district may petition the state board of education for a reduction
in the total program hour offering requirements for one or more of the grade
level groupings specified in this section. The state board of education shall
grant all such petitions that are accompanied by an assurance that the minimum
total program hour offering requirements in one or more other grade level
groupings will be exceeded concurrently by no less than the number of hours of
the reduction.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.150.220 and 1993 c 371 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"School year" means the minimum school year length as required
under subsection (4) of this section.

(2)
Satisfaction of the basic education program requirements identified in RCW
28A.150.210 shall be considered to be implemented by the following program:

(a)
Each school district shall make available to students enrolled in kindergarten
at least ((a)) an average total instructional offering of ((four
hundred fifty hours)) two and one-half hours per school day. The
program shall include instruction in the essential academic learning
requirements under RCW 28A.630.885 and such other subjects and such activities
as the school district shall determine to be appropriate for the education of
the school district's students enrolled in such program;

(b)
Each school district shall make available to students enrolled in grades one
through twelve, at least ((a)) an average district-wide annual
average total instructional hour offering of ((one thousand hours)) five
and one-half hours per school day. The state board of education may define
alternatives to classroom instructional time for students in grades nine
through twelve enrolled in alternative learning experiences. The state board
of education shall establish rules to determine annual average instructional
hours for districts including fewer than twelve grades. The program shall
include the essential academic learning requirements under RCW 28A.630.885 and
such other subjects and such activities as the school district shall determine
to be appropriate for the education of the school district's students enrolled
in such group;

(c)
If the essential academic learning requirements include a requirement of
languages other than English, the requirement may be met by students receiving
instruction in one or more American Indian languages.

(((2)))
(3) Nothing contained in subsection (((1))) (2) of this
section shall be construed to require individual students to attend school for
any particular number of hours per day or to take any particular courses.

(((3)))
(4) Each school district's kindergarten through twelfth grade basic
educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five years of
age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than twenty‑one years of
age and shall consist of a minimum of one hundred ((eighty)) eighty-five
school days for the 2000-01 school year and one hundred ninety school days
per school year thereafter in such grades as are conducted by a school
district, and one hundred ((eighty)) eighty-five half‑days
of instruction, or equivalent for the 2000-01 school year and thereafter one
hundred ninety half-days of instruction, or equivalent, in kindergarten: PROVIDED,
That effective May 1, 1979, a school district may schedule the last five school
days of the ((one hundred and eighty day)) school year for
noninstructional purposes in the case of students who are graduating from high
school, including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early
release from school upon the request of a student, and all such students may be
claimed as a full time equivalent student to the extent they could otherwise
have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260.

(((4)))
(5) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and
ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this section, RCW
28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental program approval requirements
as the state board may establish.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.150.250 and 1990 c 33 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

From
those funds made available by the legislature for the current use of the common
schools, the superintendent of public instruction shall distribute annually as
provided in RCW 28A.510.250 to each school district of the state operating a
program approved by the state board of education an amount which, when combined
with an appropriate portion of such locally available revenues, other than
receipts from federal forest revenues distributed to school districts pursuant
to RCW 28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020, as the superintendent of public instruction
may deem appropriate for consideration in computing state equalization support,
excluding excess property tax levies, will constitute a basic education
allocation in dollars for each annual average full time equivalent student
enrolled, based upon one full school year ((of one hundred eighty days))
as prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220, except that for kindergartens one full
school year shall be ((one hundred eighty half days of instruction, or))
the half-day school year equivalent as provided in RCW 28A.150.220.

Basic
education shall be considered to be fully funded by those amounts of dollars
appropriated by the legislature pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 to
fund those program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 in accordance
with the formula and ratios provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and those amounts of
dollars appropriated by the legislature to fund the salary requirements of RCW
28A.150.100 and 28A.150.410.

Operation
of a program approved by the state board of education, for the purposes of this
section, shall include a finding that the ratio of students per classroom
teacher in grades kindergarten through three is not greater than the ratio of
students per classroom teacher in grades four and above for such district:
PROVIDED, That for the purposes of this section, "classroom teacher"
shall be defined as an instructional employee possessing at least a provisional
certificate, but not necessarily employed as a certificated employee, whose
primary duty is the daily educational instruction of students: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the state board of education shall adopt rules and regulations to
insure compliance with the student/teacher ratio provisions of this section,
and such rules and regulations shall allow for exemptions for those special
programs and/or school districts which may be deemed unable to practicably meet
the student/teacher ratio requirements of this section by virtue of a small
number of students.

If
a school district's basic education program fails to meet the basic education
requirements enumerated in RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.220, the
state board of education shall require the superintendent of public instruction
to withhold state funds in whole or in part for the basic education allocation
until program compliance is assured: PROVIDED, That the state board of
education may waive this requirement in the event of substantial lack of
classroom space.

Sec.
4. RCW
28A.150.290 and 1990 c 33 s 111 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall have the power and duty to make
such rules and regulations as are necessary for the proper administration of
this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through ((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210,
28A.300.035, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010 not inconsistent with the provisions
thereof, and in addition to require such reports as may be necessary to carry
out his or her duties under this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through ((28A.160.220))
28A.160.210, 28A.300.035, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall have the authority to make rules
((and regulations which)) that establish the terms and conditions
for allowing school districts to receive state basic education moneys as
provided in RCW 28A.150.250 when said districts are unable to fulfill for one
or more schools as officially scheduled the requirement of a ((full)) minimum
school year ((of one hundred eighty days)) as provided in RCW
28A.150.220 or the total program hour offering, teacher contact hour, or
course mix and percentage requirements imposed by RCW 28A.150.220 and
28A.150.260 due to one or more of the following conditions:

(a)
An unforeseen natural event, including, but not necessarily limited to, a fire,
flood, explosion, storm, earthquake, epidemic, or volcanic eruption that has
the direct or indirect effect of rendering one or more school district
facilities unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible, or inoperable; and

(b)
An unforeseen mechanical failure or an unforeseen action or inaction by one or
more persons, including negligence and threats, that (i) is beyond the control
of both a school district board of directors and its employees and (ii) has the
direct or indirect effect of rendering one or more school district facilities
unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible, or inoperable. Such actions, inactions or
mechanical failures may include, but are not necessarily limited to, arson,
vandalism, riots, insurrections, bomb threats, bombings, delays in the
scheduled completion of construction projects, and the discontinuance or disruption
of utilities such as heating, lighting and water: PROVIDED, That an unforeseen
action or inaction shall not include any labor dispute between a school
district board of directors and any employee of the school district.

A
condition is foreseeable for the purposes of this subsection to the extent a
reasonably prudent person would have anticipated prior to August first of the
preceding school year that the condition probably would occur during the
ensuing school year because of the occurrence of an event or a circumstance
which existed during such preceding school year or a prior school year. A
board of directors of a school district is deemed for the purposes of this
subsection to have knowledge of events and circumstances which are a matter of
common knowledge within the school district and of those events and
circumstances which can be discovered upon prudent inquiry or inspection.

(3)
The superintendent of public instruction shall make every effort to reduce the
amount of paperwork required in administration of this chapter and RCW
28A.160.150 through ((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210, 28A.300.035,
28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010; to simplify the application, monitoring and
evaluation processes used; to eliminate all duplicative requests for
information from local school districts; and to make every effort to integrate
and standardize information requests for other state education acts and federal
aid to education acts administered by the superintendent of public instruction
so as to reduce paperwork requirements and duplicative information requests.

Sec.
5. RCW
28A.150.290 and 1992 c 141 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall have the power and duty to make
such rules and regulations as are necessary for the proper administration of
this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through ((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210,
28A.300.035, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010 not inconsistent with the
provisions thereof, and in addition to require such reports as may be necessary
to carry out his or her duties under this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through
((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210, 28A.300.035, 28A.300.170, and
28A.500.010.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall have the authority to make rules
and regulations which establish the terms and conditions for allowing school
districts to receive state basic education moneys as provided in RCW
28A.150.250 when said districts are unable to fulfill for one or more schools
as officially scheduled the requirement of a ((full)) minimum
school year ((of one hundred eighty days)) as provided in RCW
28A.150.220 or the annual average total instructional hour offering imposed
by RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.260 due to one or more of the following
conditions:

(a)
An unforeseen natural event, including, but not necessarily limited to, a fire,
flood, explosion, storm, earthquake, epidemic, or volcanic eruption that has
the direct or indirect effect of rendering one or more school district
facilities unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible, or inoperable; and

(b)
An unforeseen mechanical failure or an unforeseen action or inaction by one or
more persons, including negligence and threats, that (i) is beyond the control
of both a school district board of directors and its employees and (ii) has the
direct or indirect effect of rendering one or more school district facilities
unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible, or inoperable. Such actions, inactions or
mechanical failures may include, but are not necessarily limited to, arson, vandalism,
riots, insurrections, bomb threats, bombings, delays in the scheduled
completion of construction projects, and the discontinuance or disruption of
utilities such as heating, lighting and water: PROVIDED, That an unforeseen
action or inaction shall not include any labor dispute between a school
district board of directors and any employee of the school district.

A
condition is foreseeable for the purposes of this subsection to the extent a
reasonably prudent person would have anticipated prior to August first of the
preceding school year that the condition probably would occur during the
ensuing school year because of the occurrence of an event or a circumstance
which existed during such preceding school year or a prior school year. A
board of directors of a school district is deemed for the purposes of this
subsection to have knowledge of events and circumstances which are a matter of
common knowledge within the school district and of those events and
circumstances which can be discovered upon prudent inquiry or inspection.

(3)
The superintendent of public instruction shall make every effort to reduce the
amount of paperwork required in administration of this chapter and RCW
28A.160.150 through ((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210, 28A.300.035,
28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010; to simplify the application, monitoring and
evaluation processes used; to eliminate all duplicative requests for
information from local school districts; and to make every effort to integrate
and standardize information requests for other state education acts and federal
aid to education acts administered by the superintendent of public instruction
so as to reduce paperwork requirements and duplicative information requests.

Sec.
6. RCW
28A.190.030 and 1995 c 77 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
school district within which there is located a residential school shall,
singly or in concert with another school district pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160
and 28A.225.250 or pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW, conduct a program of
education, including related student activities, for residents of the
residential school. Except as otherwise provided for by contract pursuant to
RCW 28A.190.050, the duties and authority of a school district and its
employees to conduct such a program shall be limited to the following:

(1)
The employment, supervision and control of administrators, teachers,
specialized personnel and other persons, deemed necessary by the school
district for the conduct of the program of education;

(2)
The purchase, lease or rental and provision of textbooks, maps, audio-visual
equipment, paper, writing instruments, physical education equipment and other
instructional equipment, materials and supplies, deemed necessary by the school
district for the conduct of the program of education;

(3)
The development and implementation, in consultation with the superintendent or
chief administrator of the residential school or his or her designee, of the
curriculum;

(4)
The conduct of a program of education, including related student activities,
for residents who are three years of age and less than twenty-one years of age,
and have not met high school graduation requirements as now or hereafter
established by the state board of education and the school district which
includes:

(a)
((Not less than one hundred and eighty school days each school year)) The
minimum school year length as prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220;

(b)
Special education pursuant to RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100, and
vocational education, as necessary to address the unique needs and limitations
of residents; and

(c)
Such courses of instruction and school related student activities as are
provided by the school district for nonresidential school students to the
extent it is practical and judged appropriate for the residents by the school
district after consultation with the superintendent or chief administrator of
the residential school: PROVIDED, That a preschool special education program
may be provided for residential school students with disabilities;

(5)
The control of students while participating in a program of education conducted
pursuant to this section and the discipline, suspension or expulsion of
students for violation of reasonable rules of conduct adopted by the school
district; and

(6)
The expenditure of funds for the direct and indirect costs of maintaining and
operating the program of education that are appropriated by the legislature and
allocated by the superintendent of public instruction for the exclusive purpose
of maintaining and operating residential school programs of education, and
funds from federal and private grants, bequests and gifts made for the purpose
of maintaining and operating the program of education.

Sec.
7. RCW
28A.195.010 and 1993 c 336 s 1101 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature hereby recognizes that private schools should be subject only to
those minimum state controls necessary to insure the health and safety of all
the students in the state and to insure a sufficient basic education to meet
usual graduation requirements. The state, any agency or official thereof,
shall not restrict or dictate any specific educational or other programs for
private schools except as hereinafter in this section provided.

Principals
of private schools or superintendents of private school districts shall file
each year with the state superintendent of public instruction a statement
certifying that the minimum requirements hereinafter set forth are being met,
noting any deviations. After review of the statement, the state superintendent
will notify schools or school districts of those deviations which must be
corrected. In case of major deviations, the school or school district may
request and the state board of education may grant provisional status for one
year in order that the school or school district may take action to meet the
requirements. Minimum requirements shall be as follows:

(1)
The minimum school year for instructional purposes shall consist of no less
than ((one hundred eighty school days)) the minimum school year
length or the equivalent in annual minimum program hour offerings as
prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220.

(2)
The school day shall be the same as that required in RCW 28A.150.030 and
28A.150.220, except that the percentages of total program hour offerings as
prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220 for basic skills, work skills, and optional
subjects and activities shall not apply to private schools or private sectarian
schools.

(3)
All classroom teachers shall hold appropriate Washington state certification
except as follows:

(a)
Teachers for religious courses or courses for which no counterpart exists in
public schools shall not be required to obtain a state certificate to teach
those courses.

(b)
In exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without certification
may teach students so long as a certified person exercises general
supervision. Annual written statements shall be submitted to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction reporting and explaining such
circumstances.

(4)
An approved private school may operate an extension program for parents,
guardians, or persons having legal custody of a child to teach children in
their custody. The extension program shall require at a minimum that:

(a)
The parent, guardian, or custodian be under the supervision of an employee of
the approved private school who is certified under chapter 28A.410 RCW;

(b)
The planning by the certified person and the parent, guardian, or person having
legal custody include objectives consistent with this subsection and
subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (7) of this section;

(c)
The certified person spend a minimum average each month of one contact hour per
week with each student under his or her supervision who is enrolled in the
approved private school extension program;

(d)
Each student's progress be evaluated by the certified person; and

(e)
The certified employee shall not supervise more than thirty students enrolled
in the approved private school's extension program.

(5)
Appropriate measures shall be taken to safeguard all permanent records against
loss or damage.

(6)
The physical facilities of the school or district shall be adequate to meet the
program offered by the school or district: PROVIDED, That each school building
shall meet reasonable health and fire safety requirements. However, the state
board shall not require private school students to meet the student learning
goals, obtain a certificate of mastery to graduate from high school, to master
the essential academic learning requirements, or to be assessed pursuant to RCW
28A.630.885. However, private schools may choose, on a voluntary basis, to
have their students master these essential academic learning requirements, take
these assessments, and obtain certificates of mastery. A residential dwelling
of the parent, guardian, or custodian shall be deemed to be an adequate
physical facility when a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody is instructing
his or her child under subsection (4) of this section.

(7)
Private school curriculum shall include instruction of the basic skills of
occupational education, science, mathematics, language, social studies,
history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of
appreciation of art and music, all in sufficient units for meeting state board
of education graduation requirements.

(8)
Each school or school district shall be required to maintain up-to-date policy
statements related to the administration and operation of the school or school
district.

All
decisions of policy, philosophy, selection of books, teaching material, curriculum,
except as in subsection (7) above provided, school rules and administration, or
other matters not specifically referred to in this section, shall be the
responsibility of the administration and administrators of the particular
private school involved.

Sec.
8. RCW
28A.305.140 and 1992 c 141 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((self-study process requirements under RCW 28A.320.200, the))
teacher classroom contact requirements under RCW 28A.150.260(4)((,)) and
the program hour offerings requirements under RCW 28A.150.200 through
28A.150.220 shall be waived for school districts or individual schools within a
district if the school district submits to the state board of education a plan
for restructuring its educational program, or the educational program of
individual schools within the district that includes:

(a)
Specific standards for increased student learning that the district expects to
achieve;

(b)
How the district plans to achieve the higher standards, including timelines for
implementation;

(c)
How the district plans to determine if the higher standards are met;

(d)
Evidence that the board of directors, teachers, administrators, and classified
employees are committed to working cooperatively in implementing the plan;

(e)
Evidence that opportunities were provided for parents and citizens to be
involved in the development of the plan; and

(f)
Identification of the state requirements that will be waived.

(2)
Waivers granted by the state board of education under this section shall be
renewed every three years upon the state board of education receiving a renewal
request from the school district board of directors. Before filing the
request, the school district shall conduct at least one public meeting to
evaluate the educational programs that were implemented as a result of the
waivers. The request to the state board of education shall include information
regarding the activities and programs implemented as a result of the waivers,
whether the higher standards for students are being achieved, and a summary of
the comments received at the public meeting or meetings.

(3)
If a school district intends to waive the program hour offerings under RCW
28A.150.220, it shall make available to students enrolled in kindergarten at
least ((a)) an average total instructional offering of ((four
hundred fifty hours)) two and one-half hours per school day. Each
school district also shall make available to students enrolled in grades one
through twelve at least ((a)) an annual district-wide annual
average total instructional hour offering of ((one thousand hours)) five
and one-half hours per school day. A school district may schedule the last
thirty instructional hours of any school year for noninstructional purposes in
the case of students who are graduating from high school, including, but not
limited to, the observance of graduation and early release from school upon the
request of a student, and all such students may be claimed as full-time
equivalent students to the extent they could otherwise have been so claimed for
the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260. The state board of education
may define alternatives to classroom instructional time for students in grades
nine through twelve enrolled in alternative learning experiences. The state
board of education shall establish rules to determine annual average
instructional hours for districts having fewer than twelve grades. The program
shall include instruction in the essential academic learning requirements under
RCW 28A.630.885 and other subjects and activities the school district
determines to be appropriate.

(4) "Instructional hours" means those hours students are
provided the opportunity to engage in educational activity planned by and under
the direction of school district staff, as directed by the administration and
board of directors of the district, inclusive of intermissions for class
changes, recess, and teacher/parent-guardian conferences that are planned and
scheduled by the district for the purpose of discussing students' educational
needs or progress, and exclusive of time actually spent for meals.

Sec.
9. RCW
28A.310.240 and 1997 c 13 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every educational service district board shall adopt written policies granting
leaves to persons under contracts of employment with the district in positions
requiring either certification or classified qualifications, including but not
limited to leaves for attendance at official or private institutes and
conferences and sabbatical leaves for employees in positions requiring
certification qualification, and leaves for illness, injury, bereavement, and
emergencies for both certificated and classified employees, with such
compensation as the board prescribes. The board shall adopt written policies
granting annual leave with compensation for illness, injury, and emergencies as
follows:

(a)
For persons under contract with the district for a full fiscal year, at least
ten days;

(b)
For persons under contract with the district as part-time employees, at least
that portion of ten days as the total number of days contracted for bears to
one ((hundred eighty days)) school year as prescribed in RCW
28A.150.220;

(c)
For certificated and classified employees, annual leave with compensation for
illness, injury, and emergencies shall be granted and accrue at a rate not to
exceed twelve days per fiscal year. Provisions of any contract in force on
July 23, 1989, which conflict with requirements of this subsection shall
continue in effect until contract expiration; after expiration, any new
contract executed between the parties shall be consistent with this subsection;

(d)
Compensation for leave for illness or injury actually taken shall be the same
as the compensation the person would have received had the person not taken the
leave provided in this section;

(e)
Leave provided in this section not taken shall accumulate from fiscal year to
fiscal year up to a maximum of one hundred eighty days for the purposes of RCW
28A.310.490, and for leave purposes up to a maximum of the number of contract
days agreed to in a given contract, but not greater than one fiscal year. Such
accumulated time may be taken at any time during the fiscal year, or up to
twelve days per year may be used for the purpose of payments for unused sick
leave; and

(f)
Accumulated leave under this section shall be transferred to educational
service districts, school districts, and the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, and from any such district or office to another such
district or office. An intervening customary summer break in employment or the
performance of employment duties shall not preclude such a transfer.

(2)
Leave accumulated by a person in a district prior to leaving the district may,
under rules of the board, be granted to the person when the person returns to
the employment of the district.

(3)
Leave for illness or injury accumulated before July 23, 1989, under the administrative
practices of an educational service district, and such leave transferred before
July 23, 1989, to or from an educational service district, school district, or
the office of the superintendent of public instruction under the administrative
practices of the district or office, is declared valid and shall be added to
such leave for illness or injury accumulated after July 23, 1989.

Sec.
10. RCW
28A.330.100 and 1995 c 335 s 503 and 1995 c 77 s 22 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Every
board of directors of a school district of the first class, in addition to the
general powers for directors enumerated in this title, shall have the power:

(1)
To employ for a term of not exceeding three years a superintendent of schools
of the district, and for cause to dismiss him or her; and to fix his or her
duties and compensation.

(2)
To employ, and for cause dismiss one or more assistant superintendents and to
define their duties and fix their compensation.

(3)
To employ a business manager, attorneys, architects, inspectors of
construction, superintendents of buildings and a superintendent of supplies,
all of whom shall serve at the board's pleasure, and to prescribe their duties
and fix their compensation.

(4)
To employ, and for cause dismiss, supervisors of instruction and to define
their duties and fix their compensation.

(5)
To prescribe a course of study and a program of exercises which shall be
consistent with the course of study prepared by the state board of education
for the use of the common schools of this state.

(6)
To, in addition to the minimum requirements imposed by this title establish and
maintain such grades and departments, including night, high, kindergarten,
vocational training and, except as otherwise provided by law, industrial
schools, and schools and departments for the education and training of any
class or classes of youth with disabilities, as in the judgment of the board,
best shall promote the interests of education in the district.

(7)
To determine the length of time over and above ((one hundred eighty days))
the minimum school year length as prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220 that
school shall be maintained: PROVIDED, That for purposes of apportionment no
district shall be credited with more than ((one hundred and eighty-three))
three days' attendance in excess of any school year; and to fix
the time for annual opening and closing of schools and for the daily dismissal
of pupils before the regular time for closing schools.

(8)
To maintain a shop and repair department, and to employ, and for cause dismiss,
a foreman and the necessary help for the maintenance and conduct thereof.

(9)
To provide free textbooks and supplies for all children attending school.

(10)
To require of the officers or employees of the district to give a bond for the
honest performance of their duties in such penal sum as may be fixed by the
board with good and sufficient surety, and to cause the premium for all bonds
required of all such officers or employees to be paid by the district:
PROVIDED, That the board may, by written policy, allow that such bonds may
include a deductible proviso not to exceed two percent of the officer's or
employee's annual salary.

(11)
To prohibit all secret fraternities and sororities among the students in any of
the schools of the said districts.

(12)
To appoint a practicing physician, resident of the school district, who shall
be known as the school district medical inspector, and whose duty it shall be
to decide for the board of directors all questions of sanitation and health
affecting the safety and welfare of the public schools of the district who
shall serve at the board's pleasure: PROVIDED, That children shall not be
required to submit to vaccination against the will of their parents or
guardian.

Sec.
11. RCW
28A.400.300 and 1997 c 13 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
board of directors, unless otherwise specially provided by law, shall:

(1)
Employ for not more than one year, and for sufficient cause discharge all
certificated and classified employees;

(2)
Adopt written policies granting leaves to persons under contracts of employment
with the school district(s) in positions requiring either certification or
classified qualifications, including but not limited to leaves for attendance
at official or private institutes and conferences and sabbatical leaves for
employees in positions requiring certification qualification, and leaves for
illness, injury, bereavement and, emergencies for both certificated and
classified employees, and with such compensation as the board of directors
prescribe: PROVIDED, That the board of directors shall adopt written policies
granting to such persons annual leave with compensation for illness, injury and
emergencies as follows:

(a)
For such persons under contract with the school district for a full year, at
least ten days;

(b)
For such persons under contract with the school district as part time
employees, at least that portion of ten days as the total number of days
contracted for bears to one ((hundred eighty days)) school year as
prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220;

(c)
For certificated and classified employees, annual leave with compensation for
illness, injury, and emergencies shall be granted and accrue at a rate not to
exceed twelve days per year; provisions of any contract in force on June 12,
1980, which conflict with requirements of this subsection shall continue in
effect until contract expiration; after expiration, any new contract executed
between the parties shall be consistent with this subsection;

(d)
Compensation for leave for illness or injury actually taken shall be the same
as the compensation such person would have received had such person not taken
the leave provided in this proviso;

(e)
Leave provided in this proviso not taken shall accumulate from year to year up
to a maximum of one hundred eighty days for the purposes of RCW 28A.400.210 and
28A.400.220, and for leave purposes up to a maximum of the number of contract
days agreed to in a given contract, but not greater than one year. Such
accumulated time may be taken at any time during the school year or up to
twelve days per year may be used for the purpose of payments for unused sick
leave.

(f)
Sick leave heretofore accumulated under section 1, chapter 195, Laws of 1959
(former RCW 28.58.430) and sick leave accumulated under administrative practice
of school districts prior to the effective date of section 1, chapter 195, Laws
of 1959 (former RCW 28.58.430) is hereby declared valid, and shall be added to
leave for illness or injury accumulated under this proviso;

(g)
Any leave for injury or illness accumulated up to a maximum of forty-five days
shall be creditable as service rendered for the purpose of determining the time
at which an employee is eligible to retire, if such leave is taken it may not
be compensated under the provisions of RCW 28A.400.210 and 28A.310.490;

(h)
Accumulated leave under this proviso shall be transferred to and from one
district to another, the office of superintendent of public instruction and
offices of educational service district superintendents and boards, to and from
such districts and such offices;

(i)
Leave accumulated by a person in a district prior to leaving said district may,
under rules and regulations of the board, be granted to such person when the
person returns to the employment of the district.

When
any certificated or classified employee leaves one school district within the
state and commences employment with another school district within the state,
the employee shall retain the same seniority, leave benefits and other benefits
that the employee had in his or her previous position: PROVIDED, That
classified employees who transfer between districts after July 28, 1985, shall
not retain any seniority rights other than longevity when leaving one school
district and beginning employment with another. If the school district to
which the person transfers has a different system for computing seniority, leave
benefits, and other benefits, then the employee shall be granted the same
seniority, leave benefits and other benefits as a person in that district who
has similar occupational status and total years of service.

Sec.
12. RCW
28A.410.080 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.025 are each amended to read as
follows:

The
school year for all matters pertaining to teacher certification or for
computing experience in teaching shall consist of not ((fewer)) less
than ((one hundred eighty school days)) the minimum school year
length prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
Section 1 of this act expires September 1, 2000. However, section 1 of this
act shall not expire if, by September 1, 2000, a law is not enacted stating
that a school accountability and academic assessment system is not in place.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. With
respect to school employees and school districts who are parties to a
collective bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section
that conflicts with RCW 28A.150.220, this act does not apply to the extent of
the conflict until the first day following expiration of the collective
bargaining agreement or until a superseding agreement resolving the conflict is
executed by the parties before expiration. After expiration of the agreement,
this act shall apply without regard to renewal or extension of the agreement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15.
Sections 2 and 5 of this act take effect September 1, 2000. However, sections
2 and 5 of this act shall not take effect if, by September 1, 2000, a law is
enacted stating that a school accountability and academic assessment system is
not in place.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16.
Section 8 of this act expires September 1, 2000, unless by September 1, 2000, a
law is enacted stating that a school accountability and academic assessment
system is not in place.

---
END ---