BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a)
"Repair" means an activity that restores or mends to a sound or good
condition by replacing or fixing after decay, injury, dilapidation, or partial
destruction has occurred.

(b)
"Maintenance" means to preserve or retain in a condition of good
repair or efficiency.

(c)
"Traffic services" means maintenance activities such as, but not
limited to, pavement striping; pavement marking; raised pavement markers;
repairing and replacing highway signage, guideposts, and guardrails; traffic
signal maintenance; and highway lighting.

(2)
The department may purchase maintenance services by contract with individuals
or business entities. Maintenance services that may be contracted out include,
but are not limited to, roadway maintenance and repair, drainage maintenance
and slope repair, roadside and landscape maintenance, bridge and urban tunnel
maintenance, snow and ice control, traffic services, and rest area
maintenance. As prescribed in RCW 41.06.150(13), a discretionary decision by
the department to purchase maintenance services by contract is not a
bargainable issue.

(3)
If the department intends to purchase maintenance services, the department
shall notify any exclusive bargaining representative who represents any
employee whose employment status will be directly affected by such a contract.
The exclusive bargaining representative may offer alternatives to the proposed
contract, and the department must consider these alternatives in making the
final decision to contract out.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.06.150 and 1999 c 297 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this
chapter, as now or hereafter amended, and with the best standards of personnel
administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:

(1)
The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an employee;

(2)
Certification of names for vacancies, including departmental promotions, with
the number of names equal to six more names than there are vacancies to be
filled, such names representing applicants rated highest on eligibility lists:
PROVIDED, That when other applicants have scores equal to the lowest score
among the names certified, their names shall also be certified;

(3)
Examinations for all positions in the competitive and noncompetitive service;

(4)
Appointments;

(5)
Training and career development;

(6)
Probationary periods of six to twelve months and rejections of probationary
employees, depending on the job requirements of the class, except that entry
level state park rangers shall serve a probationary period of twelve months;

(7)
Transfers;

(8)
Sick leaves and vacations;

(9)
Hours of work;

(10)
Layoffs when necessary and subsequent reemployment, both according to
seniority;

(11)
Determination of appropriate bargaining units within any agency: PROVIDED,
That in making such determination the board shall consider the duties, skills,
and working conditions of the employees, the history of collective bargaining
by the employees and their bargaining representatives, the extent of
organization among the employees, and the desires of the employees;

(12)
Certification and decertification of exclusive bargaining representatives:
PROVIDED, That after certification of an exclusive bargaining representative
and upon the representative's request, the director shall hold an election
among employees in a bargaining unit to determine by a majority whether to
require as a condition of employment membership in the certified exclusive
bargaining representative on or after the thirtieth day following the beginning
of employment or the date of such election, whichever is the later, and the
failure of an employee to comply with such a condition of employment
constitutes cause for dismissal: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no more often than
once in each twelve-month period after expiration of twelve months following
the date of the original election in a bargaining unit and upon petition of
thirty percent of the members of a bargaining unit the director shall hold an
election to determine whether a majority wish to rescind such condition of
employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for purposes of this clause, membership in
the certified exclusive bargaining representative is satisfied by the payment
of monthly or other periodic dues and does not require payment of initiation,
reinstatement, or any other fees or fines and includes full and complete
membership rights: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in order to safeguard the right
of nonassociation of public employees, based on bona fide religious tenets or
teachings of a church or religious body of which such public employee is a
member, such public employee shall pay to the union, for purposes within the
program of the union as designated by such employee that would be in harmony
with his or her individual conscience, an amount of money equivalent to regular
union dues minus any included monthly premiums for union-sponsored insurance
programs, and such employee shall not be a member of the union but is entitled
to all the representation rights of a union member;

(13)
Agreements between agencies and certified exclusive bargaining representatives
providing for grievance procedures and collective negotiations on all personnel
matters over which the appointing authority of the appropriate bargaining unit
of such agency may lawfully exercise discretion. Discretionary decisions to
purchase maintenance services by contract by the department of transportation
is not subject to this subsection;

(14)
Written agreements may contain provisions for payroll deductions of employee
organization dues upon authorization by the employee member and for the
cancellation of such payroll deduction by the filing of a proper prior notice
by the employee with the appointing authority and the employee organization:
PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein permits or grants to any employee the
right to strike or refuse to perform his or her official duties;

(15)
Adoption and revision of a comprehensive classification plan for all positions
in the classified service, based on investigation and analysis of the duties
and responsibilities of each such position.

(a)
The board shall not adopt job classification revisions or class studies unless
implementation of the proposed revision or study will result in net cost
savings, increased efficiencies, or improved management of personnel or
services, and the proposed revision or study has been approved by the director
of financial management in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.

(b)
((Beginning July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, in addition to the
requirements of (a) of this subsection:

(i)
The board may approve the implementation of salary increases resulting from
adjustments to the classification plan during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium only
if:

(A)
The implementation will not result in additional net costs and the proposed
implementation has been approved by the director of financial management in
accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW;

(B)
The implementation will take effect on July 1, 1996, and the total net cost of
all such actions approved by the board for implementation during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium does not exceed the amounts specified by the legislature
specifically for this purpose; or

(C)
The implementation is a result of emergent conditions. Emergent conditions are
defined as emergency situations requiring the establishment of positions
necessary for the preservation of the public health, safety, or general
welfare, which do not exceed $250,000 of the moneys identified in section
718(2), chapter 18, Laws of 1995 2nd sp. sess.

(ii)
The board shall approve only those salary increases resulting from adjustments
to the classification plan if they are due to documented recruitment and
retention difficulties, salary compression or inversion, increased duties and
responsibilities, or inequities. For these purposes, inequities are defined as
similar work assigned to different job classes with a salary disparity greater
than 7.5 percent.

(iii)
Adjustments made to the higher education hospital special pay plan are exempt
from (b)(i) through (ii) of this subsection.

(c)))
Reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments to be implemented
during the 1997-99 and subsequent fiscal biennia are governed by (a) of this
subsection and RCW 41.06.152;

(16)
Allocation and reallocation of positions within the classification plan;

(17)
Adoption and revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the prevailing
rates in Washington state private industries and other governmental units but
the rates in the salary schedules or plans shall be increased if necessary to
attain comparable worth under an implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and
that, for institutions of higher education and related boards, shall be
competitive for positions of a similar nature in the state or the locality in
which an institution of higher education or related board is located, such
adoption and revision subject to approval by the director of financial
management in accordance with the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW;

(18)
Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay grade based on
length of service for all employees whose standards of performance are such as
to permit them to retain job status in the classified service;

(19)
Optional lump sum relocation compensation approved by the agency director,
whenever it is reasonably necessary that a person make a domiciliary move in
accepting a transfer or other employment with the state. An agency must
provide lump sum compensation within existing resources. If the person
receiving the relocation payment terminates or causes termination with the
state, for reasons other than layoff, disability separation, or other good
cause as determined by an agency director, within one year of the date of the
employment, the state is entitled to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation
from the person;

(20)
Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing statutes, with
recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and subsequent reemployment for
veterans and their surviving spouses by giving such eligible veterans and their
surviving spouses additional credit in computing their seniority by adding to
their unbroken state service, as defined by the board, the veteran's service in
the military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section,
"veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active
military service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who
has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability incurred
in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the government and
who, upon termination of such service has received an honorable discharge, a
discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record, or a release from
active military service with evidence of service other than that for which an
undesirable, bad conduct, or dishonorable discharge shall be given: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the surviving spouse of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of
this section regardless of the veteran's length of active military service:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the purposes of this section "veteran"
does not include any person who has voluntarily retired with twenty or more
years of active military service and whose military retirement pay is in excess
of five hundred dollars per month;

(21)
Permitting agency heads to delegate the authority to appoint, reduce, dismiss,
suspend, or demote employees within their agencies if such agency heads do not
have specific statutory authority to so delegate: PROVIDED, That the board may
not authorize such delegation to any position lower than the head of a major
subdivision of the agency;

(22)
Assuring persons who are or have been employed in classified positions before
July 1, 1993, will be eligible for employment, reemployment, transfer, and
promotion in respect to classified positions covered by this chapter((;

(23)
Affirmative action in appointment, promotion, transfer, recruitment, training,
and career development; development and implementation of affirmative action
goals and timetables; and monitoring of progress against those goals and
timetables.

The
board shall consult with the human rights commission in the development of
rules pertaining to affirmative action. The department of personnel shall
transmit a report annually to the human rights commission which states the
progress each state agency has made in meeting affirmative action goals and
timetables)).

Sec.
3. RCW
13.40.320 and 1997 c 338 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of social and health services shall establish and operate a medium
security juvenile offender basic training camp program. The department shall
site a juvenile offender basic training camp facility in the most
cost-effective facility possible and shall review the possibility of using an
existing abandoned and/or available state, federally, or military-owned site or
facility.

(2)
The department may contract under this chapter with private companies, the
national guard, or other federal, state, or local agencies to operate the
juvenile offender basic training camp((, notwithstanding the provisions of
RCW 41.06.380)). Requests for proposals from possible contractors shall
not call for payment on a per diem basis.

(3)
The juvenile offender basic training camp shall accommodate at least seventy
offenders. The beds shall count as additions to, and not be used as
replacements for, existing bed capacity at existing department of social and
health services juvenile facilities.

(4)
The juvenile offender basic training camp shall be a structured and regimented
model lasting one hundred twenty days emphasizing the building up of an
offender's self-esteem, confidence, and discipline. The juvenile offender
basic training camp program shall provide participants with basic education,
prevocational training, work-based learning, live work, work ethic skills,
conflict resolution counseling, substance abuse intervention, anger management
counseling, and structured intensive physical training. The juvenile offender
basic training camp program shall have a curriculum training and work schedule
that incorporates a balanced assignment of these or other rehabilitation and
training components for no less than sixteen hours per day, six days a week.

The
department shall adopt rules for the safe and effective operation of the
juvenile offender basic training camp program, standards for an offender's
successful program completion, and rules for the continued after-care
supervision of offenders who have successfully completed the program.

(5)
Offenders eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp option shall
be those with a disposition of not more than sixty-five weeks. Violent and sex
offenders shall not be eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp
program.

(6)
If the court determines that the offender is eligible for the juvenile offender
basic training camp option, the court may recommend that the department place
the offender in the program. The department shall evaluate the offender and
may place the offender in the program. The evaluation shall include, at a minimum,
a risk assessment developed by the department and designed to determine the
offender's suitability for the program. No juvenile who is assessed as a high
risk offender or suffers from any mental or physical problems that could
endanger his or her health or drastically affect his or her performance in the
program shall be admitted to or retained in the juvenile offender basic
training camp program.

(7)
All juvenile offenders eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp
sentencing option shall spend one hundred twenty days of their disposition in a
juvenile offender basic training camp. If the juvenile offender's activities
while in the juvenile offender basic training camp are so disruptive to the
juvenile offender basic training camp program, as determined by the secretary
according to rules adopted by the department, as to result in the removal of
the juvenile offender from the juvenile offender basic training camp program,
or if the offender cannot complete the juvenile offender basic training camp
program due to medical problems, the secretary shall require that the offender
be committed to a juvenile institution to serve the entire remainder of his or
her disposition, less the amount of time already served in the juvenile
offender basic training camp program.

(8)
All offenders who successfully graduate from the one hundred twenty day
juvenile offender basic training camp program shall spend the remainder of
their disposition on parole in a division of juvenile rehabilitation intensive
aftercare program in the local community. The program shall provide for the
needs of the offender based on his or her progress in the aftercare program as
indicated by ongoing assessment of those needs and progress. The intensive
aftercare program shall monitor postprogram juvenile offenders and assist them
to successfully reintegrate into the community. In addition, the program shall
develop a process for closely monitoring and assessing public safety risks.
The intensive aftercare program shall be designed and funded by the department
of social and health services.

(9)
The department shall also develop and maintain a data base to measure
recidivism rates specific to this incarceration program. The data base shall
maintain data on all juvenile offenders who complete the juvenile offender
basic training camp program for a period of two years after they have completed
the program. The data base shall also maintain data on the criminal activity,
educational progress, and employment activities of all juvenile offenders who
participated in the program.

Sec.
4. RCW
39.29.006 and 1998 c 101 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Agency" means any state office or activity of the executive and
judicial branches of state government, including state agencies, departments,
offices, divisions, boards, commissions, and educational, correctional, and
other types of institutions.

(2)
"Client services" means services provided directly to agency clients
including, but not limited to, medical and dental services, employment and
training programs, residential care, and subsidized housing.

(3)
"Competitive solicitation" means a documented formal process
providing an equal and open opportunity to qualified parties and culminating in
a selection based on criteria which may include such factors as the
consultant's fees or costs, ability, capacity, experience, reputation,
responsiveness to time limitations, responsiveness to solicitation
requirements, quality of previous performance, and compliance with statutes and
rules relating to contracts or services.

(4)
"Consultant" means an independent individual or firm contracting with
an agency to perform a service or render an opinion or recommendation according
to the consultant's methods and without being subject to the control of the
agency except as to the result of the work. The agency monitors progress under
the contract and authorizes payment.

(5)
"Emergency" means a set of unforeseen circumstances beyond the control
of the agency that either:

(a)
Present a real, immediate threat to the proper performance of essential
functions; or

(b)
May result in material loss or damage to property, bodily injury, or loss of
life if immediate action is not taken.

(6)
"Evidence of competition" means documentation demonstrating that the
agency has solicited responses from multiple firms in selecting a consultant.

(7)
"Personal service" means professional or technical expertise provided
by a consultant to accomplish a specific study, project, task, or other work
statement. This term does not include purchased services as defined under
subsection (9) of this section. This term does include client services.

(8)
"Personal service contract" means an agreement, or any amendment
thereto, with a consultant for the rendering of personal services to the state
((which is consistent with RCW 41.06.380)).

(9)
"Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to accomplish
routine, continuing and necessary functions. This term includes, but is not
limited to, services acquired under RCW 43.19.190 or 43.105.041 for equipment
maintenance and repair; operation of a physical plant; security; computer
hardware and software maintenance; data entry; key punch services; and computer
time-sharing, contract programming, and analysis.

(10)
"Sole source" means a consultant providing professional or technical
expertise of such a unique nature that the consultant is clearly and justifiably
the only practicable source to provide the service. The justification shall be
based on either the uniqueness of the service or sole availability at the
location required.

Sec.
5. RCW
47.46.040 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All projects designed, constructed, and operated under this authority must
comply with all applicable rules and statutes in existence at the time the
agreement is executed, including but not limited to the following provisions:
Chapter 39.12 RCW, this title, ((RCW 41.06.380,)) chapter 47.64 RCW, RCW
49.60.180, and 49 C.F.R. Part 21.

(2)
The secretary or a designee shall consult with legal, financial, and other
experts within and outside state government in the negotiation and development
of the agreements.

(3)
Agreements shall provide for private ownership of the projects during the
construction period. After completion and final acceptance of each project or
discrete segment thereof, the agreement shall provide for state ownership of
the transportation systems and facilities and lease to the private entity
unless the state elects to provide for ownership of the facility by the private
entity during the term of the agreement.

The
state shall lease each of the demonstration projects, or applicable project
segments, to the private entities for operating purposes for up to fifty years.

(4)
The department may exercise any power possessed by it to facilitate the
development, construction, financing operation, and maintenance of
transportation projects under this chapter. Agreements for maintenance
services entered into under this section shall provide for full reimbursement
for services rendered by the department or other state agencies. Agreements
for police services for projects, involving state highway routes, developed
under agreements shall be entered into with the Washington state patrol. The
agreement for police services shall provide that the state patrol will be
reimbursed for costs on a comparable basis with the costs incurred for
comparable service on other state highway routes. The department may provide
services for which it is reimbursed, including but not limited to preliminary
planning, environmental certification, and preliminary design of the demonstration
projects.

(5)
The plans and specifications for each project constructed under this section
shall comply with the department's standards for state projects. A facility
constructed by and leased to a private entity is deemed to be a part of the
state highway system for purposes of identification, maintenance, and
enforcement of traffic laws and for the purposes of applicable sections of this
title. Upon reversion of the facility to the state, the project must meet all
applicable state standards. Agreements shall address responsibility for
reconstruction or renovations that are required in order for a facility to meet
all applicable state standards upon reversion of the facility to the state.

(6)
For the purpose of facilitating these projects and to assist the private entity
in the financing, development, construction, and operation of the
transportation systems and facilities, the agreements may include provisions
for the department to exercise its authority, including the lease of facilities,
rights of way, and airspace, exercise of the power of eminent domain, granting
of development rights and opportunities, granting of necessary easements and
rights of access, issuance of permits and other authorizations, protection from
competition, remedies in the event of default of either of the parties,
granting of contractual and real property rights, liability during construction
and the term of the lease, authority to negotiate acquisition of rights of way
in excess of appraised value, and any other provision deemed necessary by the
secretary.

(7)
The agreements entered into under this section may include provisions
authorizing the state to grant necessary easements and lease to a private
entity existing rights of way or rights of way subsequently acquired with
public or private financing. The agreements may also include provisions to
lease to the entity airspace above or below the right of way associated or to
be associated with the private entity's transportation facility. In
consideration for the reversion rights in these privately constructed
facilities, the department may negotiate a charge for the lease of airspace
rights during the term of the agreement for a period not to exceed fifty
years. If, after the expiration of this period, the department continues to
lease these airspace rights to the private entity, it shall do so only at fair
market value. The agreement may also provide the private entity the right of
first refusal to undertake projects utilizing airspace owned by the state in the
vicinity of the public-private project.

(8)
Agreements under this section may include any contractual provision that is
necessary to protect the project revenues required to repay the costs incurred
to study, plan, design, finance, acquire, build, install, operate, enforce
laws, and maintain toll highways, bridges, and tunnels and which will not
unreasonably inhibit or prohibit the development of additional public
transportation systems and facilities. Agreements under this section must
secure and maintain liability insurance coverage in amounts appropriate to
protect the project's viability and may address state indemnification of the
private entity for design and construction liability where the state has
approved relevant design and construction plans.

(9)
Agreements shall include a process that provides for public involvement in
decision making with respect to the development of the projects.

(10)(a)
In carrying out the public involvement process required in subsection (9) of
this section, the private entity shall proactively seek public participation
through a process appropriate to the characteristics of the project that
assesses and demonstrates public support among: Users of the project,
residents of communities in the vicinity of the project, and residents of
communities impacted by the project.

(b)
The private entity shall conduct a comprehensive public involvement process
that provides, periodically throughout the development and implementation of
the project, users and residents of communities in the affected project area an
opportunity to comment upon key issues regarding the project including, but not
limited to: (i) Alternative sizes and scopes; (ii) design; (iii) environmental
assessment; (iv) right of way and access plans; (v) traffic impacts; (vi)
tolling or user fee strategies and tolling or user fee ranges; (vii) project
cost; (viii) construction impacts; (ix) facility operation; and (x) any other
salient characteristics.

(c)
If the affected project area has not been defined, the private entity shall
define the affected project area by conducting, at a minimum: (i) A comparison
of the estimated percentage of residents of communities in the vicinity of the
project and in other communities impacted by the project who could be subject to
tolls or user fees and the estimated percentage of other users and transient
traffic that could be subject to tolls or user fees; (ii) an analysis of the
anticipated traffic diversion patterns; (iii) an analysis of the potential
economic impact resulting from proposed toll rates or user fee rates imposed on
residents, commercial traffic, and commercial entities in communities in the
vicinity of and impacted by the project; (iv) an analysis of the economic
impact of tolls or user fees on the price of goods and services generally; and
(v) an analysis of the relationship of the project to state transportation
needs and benefits.

The
agreement may require an advisory vote by users of and residents in the
affected project area.

(d)
In seeking public participation, the private entity shall establish a local
involvement committee or committees comprised of residents of the affected
project area, individuals who represent cities and counties in the affected
project area, organizations formed to support or oppose the project, if such
organizations exist, and users of the project. The private entity shall, at a
minimum, establish a committee as required under the specifications of RCW
47.46.030(((5))) (6)(b) (ii) and (iii) and appointments to such
committee shall be made no later than thirty days after the project area is
defined.

(e)
Local involvement committees shall act in an advisory capacity to the
department and the private entity on all issues related to the development and
implementation of the public involvement process established under this
section.

(f)
The department and the private entity shall provide the legislative
transportation committee and local involvement committees with progress reports
on the status of the public involvement process including the results of an
advisory vote, if any occurs.

(11)
Nothing in this chapter limits the right of the secretary and his or her agents
to render such advice and to make such recommendations as they deem to be in
the best interests of the state and the public.

Sec.
6. RCW
72.09.100 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the power to provide
for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove statutory and other
restrictions which have limited work programs in the past. For purposes of
establishing such a comprehensive program, the legislature recommends that the
department consider adopting any or all, or any variation of, the following
classes of work programs:

(1)
CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES. The employer model industries in this class
shall be operated and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit
organization pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the
department. The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both
the public and private sector.

The
customer model industries in this class shall be operated and managed by the
department to provide Washington state manufacturers or businesses with
products or services currently produced or provided by out-of-state or foreign
suppliers. The correctional industries board of directors shall review these
proposed industries before the department contracts to provide such products or
services. The review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the
proposed products and services on the Washington state business community and
labor market.

The
department of corrections shall supply appropriate security and custody
services without charge to the participating firms.

Inmates
who work in free venture industries shall do so at their own choice. They shall
be paid a wage comparable to the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the
locality in which the industry is located, as determined by the director of
correctional industries. If the director cannot reasonably determine the
comparable wage, then the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.

An
inmate who is employed in the class I program of correctional industries shall
not be eligible for unemployment compensation benefits pursuant to any of the
provisions of Title 50 RCW until released on parole or discharged.

(2)
CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be
state-owned and operated enterprises designed to reduce the costs for goods and
services for tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations. The
industries selected for development within this class shall, as much as
possible, match the available pool of inmate work skills and aptitudes with the
work opportunities in the free community. The industries shall be closely
patterned after private sector industries but with the objective of reducing
public support costs rather than making a profit. The products and services of
this industry, including purchased products and services necessary for a
complete product line, may be sold to public agencies, to nonprofit
organizations, and to private contractors when the goods purchased will be
ultimately used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization. Clothing
manufactured by an industry in this class may be donated to nonprofit
organizations that provide clothing free of charge to low-income persons.
Correctional industries products and services shall be reviewed by the
correctional industries board of directors before offering such products and
services for sale to private contractors. The board of directors shall conduct
a yearly marketing review of the products and services offered under this
subsection. Such review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of
the proposed products and services on the Washington state business community.
To avoid waste or spoilage and consequent loss to the state, when there is no
public sector market for such goods, byproducts and surpluses of timber,
agricultural, and animal husbandry enterprises may be sold to private persons,
at private sale. Surplus byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural and
animal husbandry enterprises that cannot be sold to public agencies or to
private persons may be donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of
surplus products shall be carried out in accordance with rules prescribed by
the secretary.

Security
and custody services shall be provided without charge by the department of
corrections.

Inmates
working in this class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall
be paid for their work on a gratuity scale which shall not exceed the wage paid
for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry is located
and which is approved by the director of correctional industries.

((Subject
to approval of the correctional industries board, provisions of RCW 41.06.380
prohibiting contracting out work performed by classified employees shall not
apply to contracts with Washington state businesses entered into by the
department of corrections through class II industries.))

(3)
CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall
be operated by the department of corrections. They shall be designed and
managed to accomplish the following objectives:

(a)
Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and experience so that the
inmate will be able to qualify for better work both within correctional
industries and the free community. It is not intended that an inmate's work
within this class of industries should be his or her final and total work
experience as an inmate.

(b)
Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or work training per week.

(c)
Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public support costs.

Supervising,
management, and custody staff shall be employees of the department.

All
able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are not working in
other classes of industries shall work in this class.

Except
for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates in this class shall be
paid for their work in accordance with an inmate gratuity scale. The scale
shall be adopted by the secretary of corrections.

(4)
CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be
operated by the department of corrections. They shall be designed and managed
to provide services in the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The
services shall be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor or
infirm, or to nonprofit organizations.

Inmates
in this program shall reside in facilities owned by, contracted for, or
licensed by the department of corrections. A unit of local government shall
provide work supervision services without charge to the state and shall pay the
inmate's wage.

The
department of corrections shall reimburse participating units of local
government for liability and workers compensation insurance costs.

Inmates
who work in this class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall
receive a gratuity which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar
nature in the locality in which the industry is located.

(5)
CLASS V: COMMUNITY SERVICE PROGRAMS. Programs in this class shall be subject
to supervision by the department of corrections. The purpose of this class of
industries is to enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off
all or part of a community service order as ordered by the sentencing court.

Employment
shall be in a community service program operated by the state, local units of
government, or a nonprofit agency.

To
the extent that funds are specifically made available for such purposes, the
department of corrections shall reimburse nonprofit agencies for workers
compensation insurance costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. RCW
41.06.380 (Purchasing services by contract not
prohibited--Limitations) and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---