BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

Sec.
1. RCW
29.13.047 and 1985 c 45 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever state officers or measures are voted upon at a state primary or
general election ((held in an odd-numbered year)) under RCW 29.13.010,
the state of Washington shall assume a prorated share of the costs of that
state primary or general election.

(2)
Whenever a primary or vacancy election is held to fill a vacancy in the
position of United States senator or United States representative under chapter
29.68 RCW, the state of Washington shall assume a prorated share of the costs
of that primary or vacancy election.

(3)
The county auditor shall apportion the state's share of these expenses when
prorating election costs under RCW 29.13.045 and shall file such expense claims
with the secretary of state.

(4)
The secretary of state shall include in his or her biennial budget requests
sufficient funds to carry out this section. Reimbursements for election costs
shall be from appropriations specifically provided by law for that purpose.

PART II

Sec.
2. RCW
43.09.270 and 1995 c 301 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The
expense of auditing local governments and those expenses directly related to
prescribing accounting systems, training, maintenance of working capital
including reserves for late and uncollectible accounts and necessary
adjustments to billings, and field audit supervision, shall be considered
expenses of auditing public accounts within the meaning of RCW 43.09.280 and
43.09.282((, and shall be prorated for that purpose equally among all
entities directly affected by such service)).

Sec.
3. RCW
43.09.280 and 1995 c 301 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The
expense of auditing public accounts shall be borne by ((each entity subject
to such audit for the auditing of all accounts under its jurisdiction and the
state auditor shall certify the expense of such audit to the fiscal or
warrant-issuing officer of such entity, who shall immediately make payment to
the state auditor. If the expense as certified is not paid by any local
government within thirty days from the date of certification, the state auditor
may certify the expense to the auditor of the county in which the local
government is situated, who shall promptly issue his or her warrant on the
county treasurer payable out of the current expense fund of the county, which
fund, except as to auditing the financial affairs and making inspection and
examination of the county, shall be reimbursed by the county auditor or chief
financial officer out of the money due the local government at the next monthly
settlement of the collection of taxes and shall be transferred to the current
expense fund)) the state.

The
state auditor shall include in his or her biennial budget requests for
sufficient funds to carry out this section. Reimbursements for auditing costs
shall be from appropriations specifically provided by law for that purpose.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.09.2801 and 1995 c 301 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)
From July 1, 1992, to June 30, 1995, the state auditor shall charge an entity
subject to an audit an additional ten cents per hour billed under RCW 43.09.270
and 43.09.280, to)) The state auditor shall include in his or her
biennial budget requests for sufficient funds to carry out RCW 42.41.060.
Appropriations for this purpose shall be deposited in the local government
administrative hearings account.

(((2)
After June 30, 1995, the state auditor shall base the amount to be collected
and deposited into the local government administrative hearings account on the
funds remaining in the account on June 30, 1995, and the anticipated caseload
for the future.

(3)
The state auditor may exempt a local government that certifies that it is in
compliance with RCW 42.41.050 from a charge added under subsection (1) or (2)
of this section.))

Sec.
5. RCW
42.41.060 and 1992 c 44 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
local government administrative hearings account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. All receipts from penalties in RCW 42.41.040 and ((the
surcharges under RCW 43.09.2801)) legislative appropriations for
administrative hearings under this chapter shall be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for administrative
hearings under this chapter. Only the chief administrative law judge or his or
her designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation
is required for expenditures.

PART
III

Sec.
6. RCW
10.101.030 and 1989 c 409 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each county or city under this chapter shall adopt standards for the delivery
of public defense services, whether those services are provided by contract,
assigned counsel, or a public defender office. Standards shall include the
following: Compensation of counsel, duties and responsibilities of counsel,
case load limits and types of cases, responsibility for expert witness fees and
other costs associated with representation, administrative expenses, support
services, reports of attorney activity and vouchers, training, supervision,
monitoring and evaluation of attorneys, substitution of attorneys or assignment
of contracts, limitations on private practice of contract attorneys,
qualifications of attorneys, disposition of client complaints, cause for
termination of contract or removal of attorney, and nondiscrimination. The
standards endorsed by the Washington state bar association for the provision of
public defense services may serve as guidelines to contracting authorities.

(2)
The state shall pay one-half of the costs of public defense services under this
chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 2.70 RCW to read as follows:

The
office of public defense shall include in its biennial budget requests for
sufficient funds to carry out RCW 10.101.030(2). Reimbursements for public
defense services costs shall be from appropriations specifically provided by
law for that purpose.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. RCW
43.09.281 (Appeal procedure to be adopted--Inclusion of number
and disposition of appeals in annual report) and 1982 c 206 s 3 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. Part
headings used in this act do not constitute any part of the law.

---
END ---