BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
69.50.308 and 1993 c 187 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(a)
A controlled substance may be dispensed only as provided in this section.

(b)
Except when dispensed directly by a practitioner authorized to prescribe or
administer a controlled substance, other than a pharmacy, to an ultimate user,
a substance included in Schedule II may not be dispensed without the written
prescription of a practitioner. However, in accordance with federal law or
rule, Schedule II substances may be dispensed by a pharmacy pursuant to a
facsimile, transmitted by the practitioner or the practitioner's agent for
patients in a long-term care facility or hospice licensed by the state. The
practitioner or agent shall note on the prescription that the patient is a long-term
care or hospice patient. Facsimiles may also be used to transmit prescriptions
for injectable Schedule II substances. The facsimile shall serve as the
original prescription and shall be maintained in the same manner as other
Schedule II prescriptions.

(c)
In emergency situations, as defined by rule of the state board of pharmacy, a
substance included in Schedule II may be dispensed upon oral prescription of a
practitioner, reduced promptly to writing and filed by the pharmacy.
Prescriptions shall be retained in conformity with the requirements of RCW
69.50.306. A prescription for a substance included in Schedule II may not be
refilled.

(d)
Except when dispensed directly by a practitioner authorized to prescribe or
administer a controlled substance, other than a pharmacy, to an ultimate user,
a substance included in Schedule III or IV, which is a prescription drug as
determined under RCW 69.04.560, may not be dispensed without a written or oral
prescription of a practitioner. Any oral prescription must be promptly reduced
to writing. The prescription shall not be filled or refilled more than six
months after the date thereof or be refilled more than five times, unless
renewed by the practitioner.

(e)
A valid prescription or lawful order of a practitioner, in order to be
effective in legalizing the possession of controlled substances, must be issued
in good faith for a legitimate medical purpose by one authorized to prescribe
the use of such controlled substance. An order purporting to be a prescription
not in the course of professional treatment is not a valid prescription or
lawful order of a practitioner within the meaning and intent of this chapter;
and the person who knows or should know that the person is filling such an
order, as well as the person issuing it, can be charged with a violation of
this chapter.

(f)
A substance included in Schedule V must be distributed or dispensed only for a
medical purpose.

(g)
A practitioner may dispense or deliver a controlled substance to or for an individual
or animal only for medical treatment or authorized research in the ordinary
course of that practitioner's profession. Medical treatment includes
dispensing or administering a narcotic drug for pain, including intractable
pain.

(h)
No administrative sanction, or civil or criminal liability, authorized or
created by this chapter may be imposed on a pharmacist for action taken in
reliance on a reasonable belief that an order purporting to be a prescription
was issued by a practitioner in the usual course of professional treatment or
in authorized research.

(i)
An individual practitioner may not dispense a substance included in Schedule
II, III, or IV for that individual practitioner's personal use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
69.50.307 (Order forms) and 1971 ex.s. c 308 s 69.50.307 are each
repealed.

---
END ---