BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to lessen patients' waiting times, decrease
administrative burdens for pharmacies, and improve care to patients by
minimizing confusion, eliminating unnecessary paperwork, and streamlining
dispensing of prescription products paid for by third-party payors. This act
should be broadly applied and interpreted to effectuate this purpose.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Every health benefit plan that provides coverage for prescription drugs or
devices, or administers such a plan, including but not limited to third-party
administrators for self-insured plans and state-administered plans, shall issue
to its insured a card or other technology containing uniform prescription drug
information. The uniform prescription drug information card or technology
shall be in the format approved by the national council for prescription drug
programs and shall include all of the required and conditional or situational
fields and conform to the most recent pharmacy identification card or
technology implementation guide produced by the council or conform to a
national format acceptable to the insurance commissioner.

(2)
A new uniform prescription drug information card or technology, as required
under subsection (1) of this section shall be issued by a health benefit plan
upon enrollment and reissued upon any change in the insured coverage that
impacts data contained on the card or upon any change in the council
implementation guide. Newly issued cards or technology shall be updated with
the latest coverage information and shall conform to the council standards then
in effect and to the implementation guide then in use.

(3)(a)
This section applies to health benefit plans that are delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed on and after January 1, 2000. For purposes of this
section, renewal of a health benefit policy, contract, or plan occurs on each
anniversary of the date on which coverage was first effective on the person or
persons covered by the health benefit plan.

(b) Enforcement of this section is the responsibility of the
insurance commissioner. The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary. No
health benefit plan may be permitted to conduct business in this state if it is
in violation of this section.

---
END ---