BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.96.010 and 1995 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds and declares that the issuance by state and local governments
of bonds and other obligations((, and the investment of moneys in connection
with these obligations,)) involves exposure to changes in interest
rates; that a number of financial instruments are available to lower the net
cost of these borrowings, ((to increase the net return on these investments,))
or to reduce the exposure of state and local governments to changes in interest
rates; that these reduced costs ((and increased returns)) for state and
local governments will benefit taxpayers and ratepayers; and that the
legislature desires to provide state and local governments with express
statutory authority to take advantage of these instruments. In recognition of
the complexity of these financial instruments, the legislature desires that
this authority be subject to certain limitations, and be granted for a period
of ((seven)) twelve years.

Sec.
2. RCW
39.96.030 and 1993 c 273 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, any governmental entity may
enter into a payment agreement in connection with, or incidental to, the
issuance, incurring, or carrying of specific obligations, for the purpose of
managing or reducing the governmental entity's exposure to fluctuations or
levels of interest rates. No governmental entity may carry on a business of
acting as a dealer in payment agreements. Nothing in this chapter shall be
construed to provide governmental entities with separate or additional authority
to invest funds or moneys relating to or held in connection with any
obligations.

(2)
No governmental entity may enter into a payment agreement under this chapter
unless it first:

(a)
Finds and determines, by ordinance or resolution, that the payment agreement,
if fully performed by all parties thereto, will (i) reduce the amount or
duration of its exposure to changes in interest rates; or (ii) result in a
lower net cost of borrowing with respect to the related obligations((, or a
higher net rate of return on investments made in connection with, or incidental
to, the issuance, incurring, or carrying of those obligations));

(b)
Obtains, on or prior to the date of execution of the payment agreement, a
written certification from a financial advisor that (i) the terms and
conditions of the payment agreement and any ancillary agreements, including
without limitation, the interest rate or rates and any other amounts payable
thereunder, are commercially reasonable in light of then existing market
conditions; and (ii) the finding and determination contained in the ordinance
or resolution required by (a) of this subsection is reasonable.

(3)
Prior to selecting the other party to a payment agreement, a governmental
entity shall solicit and give due consideration to proposals from at least two
entities that meet the criteria set forth in RCW 39.96.040(2). Such
solicitation and consideration shall be conducted in such manner as the
governmental entity shall determine is reasonable.

Sec.
3. RCW
39.96.070 and 1998 c 245 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no governmental entity
may enter a payment agreement under RCW 39.96.030 after June 30, ((2000))
2005.

(2)
The termination of authority to enter payment agreements after June 30, ((2000))
2005, shall not affect the validity of any payment agreements or other
contracts entered into under RCW 39.96.030 on or before that date.

(3)
A governmental entity may enter into a payment agreement under and in
accordance with this chapter after June 30, ((2000)) 2005, to
replace a payment agreement that relates to specified obligations issued on or
before that date and that has terminated before the final term of those
obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---