BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

Any law enforcement officer using a vehicle to transport the
officer in the performance of official duties shall be allowed for an unlimited
time and free of charge to park the vehicle in any parking zone or area, including
any zone or area with parking meters, which is otherwise restricted as to the
length of time parking is permitted.

---
END ---