BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.030 and 1999 c 352 s 8, 1999 c 197 s 1, and 1999 c 196 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department
of corrections, means that the department, either directly or through a
collection agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.145, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial
obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with current
law, delivering daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk without
depositing it in a departmental account.

(2)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(3)
"Community corrections officer" means an employee of the department
who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced
offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.

(4)
"Community custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of
confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120
(5), (6), (7), (8), (10), or (11), or RCW 9.94A.383, served in the community
subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and activities by the
department of corrections. For offenders placed on community custody for crimes
committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department shall assess the offender's
risk of reoffense and may establish and modify conditions of community custody,
in addition to those imposed by the court, based upon the risk to community
safety.

(5)
"Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period of
community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW 9.94A.120(11), as
established by the sentencing guidelines commission or the legislature under
RCW 9.94A.040, for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000.

(6)
"Community placement" means that period during which the offender is
subject to the conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision,
which begins either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease supervision)
or at such time as the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of
earned release. Community placement may consist of entirely community custody,
entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination of the two.

(7)
"Community service" means compulsory service, without compensation,
performed for the benefit of the community by the offender.

(8)
"Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence conditions
imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or 46.61.524.
For first-time offenders, the supervision may include crime-related
prohibitions and other conditions imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(5). Where
the court finds that any offender has a chemical dependency that has
contributed to his or her offense, the conditions of supervision may, subject
to available resources, include treatment. For purposes of the interstate
compact for out-of-state supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW
9.95.270, community supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and
should be considered the same as probation by other states.

(9)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement as defined in this
section.

(10)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(11)
"Court-ordered legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that
is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal financial
obligations which may include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed
crime victims' compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court
costs, county or interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and
costs of defense, fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to
the offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular
assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense of an
emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction, subject to the
provisions in RCW 38.52.430.

(12)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders
directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs
or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts
necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by
the department.

(13)
"Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions
and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or
elsewhere. The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms
thereof; and (b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(14)
"Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing judge that equals
the difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(15)
"Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to
monitor the defendant's daily activities and compliance with sentence
conditions, and in which the defendant is required to report daily to a
specific location designated by the department or the sentencing judge.

(16)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(17)
"Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude
the number of actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial
confinement, of community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of
community service work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation.
The fact that an offender through "earned release" can reduce the
actual period of confinement shall not affect the classification of the
sentence as a determinate sentence.

(18)
"Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
individual remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amount
required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this definition,
"earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services,
whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and,
notwithstanding any other provision of law making the payments exempt from
garnishment, attachment, or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal
financial obligation, specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to
pension or retirement programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not
include payments made under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020
and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.

(19)
"Drug offense" means:

(a)
Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance
(RCW 69.50.403);

(b)
Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates to the
possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled
substance; or

(c)
Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state
would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(20)
"Escape" means:

(a)
Escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful
failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful failure to be
available for supervision by the department while in community custody (RCW
72.09.310); or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this
subsection.

(21)
"Felony traffic offense" means:

(a)
Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding
a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), ((or)) felony hit-and-run injury-accident
(RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or felony physical control of a vehicle
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6));
or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(22)
"Fines" means the requirement that the offender pay a specific sum of
money over a specific period of time to the court.

(23)
"First-time offender" means any person who is convicted of a felony
(a) not classified as a violent offense or a sex offense under this chapter, ((or))
(b) that is not the manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to
manufacture or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II
that is a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, nor the
manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to deliver methamphetamine,
its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers as defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2),
nor the selling for profit of any controlled substance or counterfeit substance
classified in Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of
marihuana, or (c) that is not driving while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or physical control of a vehicle while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, who previously has never
been convicted of a felony in this state, federal court, or another state, and
who has never participated in a program of deferred prosecution for a felony
offense.

(24)
"Home detention" means a program of partial confinement available to
offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to
electronic surveillance.

(25)
"Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a
felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now existing or
hereafter amended:

(a)
Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation
of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b)
Assault in the second degree;

(c)
Assault of a child in the second degree;

(d)
Child molestation in the second degree;

(e)
Controlled substance homicide;

(f)
Extortion in the first degree;

(g)
Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h)
Indecent liberties;

(i)
Kidnapping in the second degree;

(j)
Leading organized crime;

(k)
Manslaughter in the first degree;

(l)
Manslaughter in the second degree;

(m)
Promoting prostitution in the first degree;

(n)
Rape in the third degree;

(o)
Robbery in the second degree;

(p)
Sexual exploitation;

(q)
Vehicular assault;

(r)
Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by
any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as
defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless
manner;

(s)
Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as
"sexual motivation" is defined under this section;

(t)
Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.125;

(u)
Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is
comparable to a most serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i)
A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW ((9A.88.100)) 9A.44.100(1)
(a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until
July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1,
1979, until June 11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed
from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988;

(ii)
A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it
existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was
committed against a child under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship
between the victim and perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent
liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through
July 27, 1997, or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.

(26)
"Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(27)
"Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by
state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years
of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030
or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender"
and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(28)
"Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in
a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or
any other unit of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been
ordered by the court, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of
each day with the balance of the day spent in the community. Partial
confinement includes work release, home detention, work crew, and a combination
of work crew and home detention as defined in this section.

(29)
"Persistent offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i)
Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious
offense; and

(ii)
Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been
convicted as an offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this
state or elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be
considered most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score
under RCW 9.94A.360; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at
least one conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the
other most serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i)
Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the
first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree,
rape of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion; (B) murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second
degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a
child in the first degree, or burglary in the first degree, with a finding of
sexual motivation; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (29)(b)(i); and

(ii)
Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been
convicted as an offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for
rape of a child in the first degree constitutes a conviction under subsection
(29)(b)(i) only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second
degree constitutes a conviction under subsection (29)(b)(i) only when the
offender was eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the
offense.

(30)
"Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's community
placement that is not community custody.

(31)
"Restitution" means the requirement that the offender pay a specific
sum of money over a specific period of time to the court as payment of
damages. The sum may include both public and private costs. The imposition of
a restitution order does not preclude civil redress.

(32)
"Risk assessment" means the application of an objective instrument
supported by research and adopted by the department for the purpose of assessing
an offender's risk of reoffense, taking into consideration the nature of the
harm done by the offender, place and circumstances of the offender related to
risk, the offender's relationship to any victim, and any information provided
to the department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall not be
based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

(33)
"Serious traffic offense" means:

(a)
Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless
driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5));
or

(b)
Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense
under (a) of this subsection.

(34)
"Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and
means:

(a)
Murder in the first degree, homicide by abuse, murder in the second degree,
manslaughter in the first degree, assault in the first degree, kidnapping in
the first degree, or rape in the first degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, or an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit
one of these felonies; or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(35)
"Sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in
imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(36)
"Sex offense" means:

(a)
A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW, other than RCW 9A.44.130(((10)))
(11), or RCW 9A.64.020 or 9.68A.090 or a felony that is, under chapter
9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit such crimes;

(b)
Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this
subsection;

(c)
A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.127 or 13.40.135;
or

(d)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(37)
"Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the
defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual
gratification.

(38)
"Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries
of a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state
or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW
72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(39)
"Transition training" means written and verbal instructions and
assistance provided by the department to the offender during the two weeks
prior to the offender's successful completion of the work ethic camp program.
The transition training shall include instructions in the offender's
requirements and obligations during the offender's period of community custody.

(40)
"Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological,
physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the
crime charged.

(41)
"Violent offense" means:

(a)
Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a
class A felony, criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony, manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second
degree, indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in
the second degree, arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree,
assault of a child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree, robbery
in the second degree, drive-by shooting, vehicular assault, and vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b)
Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of
this subsection; and

(c)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b)
of this subsection.

(42)
"Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of
civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community of not less than
thirty-five hours per week that complies with RCW 9.94A.135. The civic
improvement tasks shall have minimal negative impact on existing private
industries or the labor force in the county where the service or labor is
performed. The civic improvement tasks shall not affect employment
opportunities for people with developmental disabilities contracted through
sheltered workshops as defined in RCW 82.04.385. Only those offenders
sentenced to a facility operated or utilized under contract by a county or the
state, or sanctioned under RCW 9.94A.205, are eligible to participate on a work
crew. Offenders sentenced for a sex offense as defined in subsection (36) of this
section are not eligible for the work crew program.

(43)
"Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program designed
to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders
to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills development,
substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy training, and basic adult
education.

(44)
"Work release" means a program of partial confinement available to
offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study
at school. Participation in work release shall be conditioned upon the
offender attending work or school at regularly defined hours and abiding by the
rules of the work release facility.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.185 and 1995 c 108 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Home detention may not be imposed for offenders convicted of a violent offense,
any sex offense, any drug offense, reckless burning in the first or second
degree as defined in RCW 9A.48.040 or 9A.48.050, assault in the third degree as
defined in RCW 9A.36.031, assault of a child in the third degree, unlawful
imprisonment as defined in RCW 9A.40.040, or harassment as defined in RCW
9A.46.020.

(2)
Home detention may be imposed for:

(a)
Offenders convicted of possession of a controlled substance under RCW 69.50.401(d)
or forged prescription for a controlled substance under RCW 69.50.403 if the
offender fulfills the participation conditions set forth in this subsection
[section] and is monitored for drug use by a treatment alternatives to street
crime program or a comparable court or agency-referred program((.));

(((1)
Home detention may be imposed for)) (b) Offenders convicted of
burglary in the second degree as defined in RCW 9A.52.030 or residential
burglary conditioned upon the offender: (((a))) (i) Successfully
completing twenty-one days in a work release program, (((b))) (ii)
having no convictions for burglary in the second degree or residential burglary
during the preceding two years and not more than two prior convictions for
burglary or residential burglary, (((c))) (iii) having no
convictions for a violent felony offense during the preceding two years and not
more than two prior convictions for a violent felony offense, (((d))) (iv)
having no prior charges of escape, and (((e))) (v) fulfilling the
other conditions of the home detention program((.));

(((2)
Participation in a home detention program shall be conditioned upon: (a) The
offender obtaining or maintaining current employment or attending a regular
course of school study at regularly defined hours, or the offender performing
parental duties to offspring or minors normally in the custody of the offender,
(b) abiding by the rules of the home detention program, and (c) compliance with
court-ordered legal financial obligations. The home detention program may also
be made available to))

(c)
Offenders whose charges and convictions do not otherwise disqualify them if
medical or health-related conditions, concerns or treatment would be better
addressed under the home detention program, or where the health and welfare of
the offender, other inmates, or staff would be jeopardized by the offender's
incarceration. Participation in the home detention program for medical or
health-related reasons is conditioned on the offender abiding by the rules of
the home detention program and complying with court-ordered restitution; and

(d)
Offenders convicted of felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined in RCW 46.61.502(6) or felony physical control of
a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as
defined in RCW 46.61.504(6).

(3) Participation in a home detention program shall be
conditioned upon: (a) The offender obtaining or maintaining current employment
or attending a regular course of school study at regularly defined hours, or
the offender performing parental duties to offspring or minors normally in the
custody of the offender, (b) abiding by the rules of the home detention
program, and (c) compliance with court-ordered legal financial obligations.

Sec.
3. RCW 9.94A.230
and 1987 c 486 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every offender who has been discharged under RCW 9.94A.220 may apply to the
sentencing court for a vacation of the offender's record of conviction. If the
court finds the offender meets the tests prescribed in subsection (2) of this
section, the court may clear the record of conviction by: (a) Permitting the
offender to withdraw the offender's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not
guilty; or (b) if the offender has been convicted after a plea of not guilty,
by the court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (c) by the court
dismissing the information or indictment against the offender.

(2)
An offender may not have the record of conviction cleared if: (a) There are
any criminal charges against the offender pending in any court of this state or
another state, or in any federal court; (b) the offense was a violent offense
as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; (c) the offense was a crime against persons as
defined in RCW 43.43.830; (d) the offender has been convicted of a new crime in
this state, another state, or federal court since the date of the offender's
discharge under RCW 9.94A.220; (e) the offense is a class B felony and less
than ten years have passed since the date the applicant was discharged under
RCW 9.94A.220; ((and)) (f) the offense was a class C felony, other
than a class C felony described in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), and
less than five years have passed since the date the applicant was discharged
under RCW 9.94A.220; or (g) the offense was a class C felony described in
RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6) and less than seven years have passed since
the applicant was discharged under RCW 9.94A.220.

(3)
Once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection (1) of this
section, the fact that the offender has been convicted of the offense shall not
be included in the offender's criminal history for purposes of determining a
sentence in any subsequent conviction, and the offender shall be released from
all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense. For all purposes,
including responding to questions on employment applications, an offender whose
conviction has been vacated may state that the offender has never been
convicted of that crime. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use
of an offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution.

Sec.
4. RCW
9.94A.320 and 1999 c 352 s 3, 1999 c 322 s 5, and 1999 c 45 s 4 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW
70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter 1 (RCW
9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild Molestation 1 (RCW
9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with
forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a
narcotic from Schedule I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone
under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV,
or V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule
I-V to someone under 18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW
9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any
vessel in a reckless manner (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with
intent to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle
in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary 1 (RCW
9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW
9A.44.086)

Dealing in depictions of
minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW
9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by
disregard for the safety of others (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion)
(RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW
70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW
9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of
others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail Jumping with Murder 1
(RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110,
9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II (except heroin or cocaine) or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW
9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

VAbandonment of dependent
person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property
for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A
Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW
9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct
1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person
eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Pretrial Condition (RCW 10.99.040(4) (b) and (c))

On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Sentence Condition (RCW 10.99.050(2))

On and after July 1, 2000: Protection Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Civil Action (RCW 26.50.110 (4) and (5))

On and after July 1, 2000: Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

IVArson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW ((88.12.032)) 79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Driving While Under the Influence (RCW
46.61.502(6))

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run‑-Injury Accident (RCW
46.52.020(4))

Hit and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW
((88.12.155(3))) 79A.60.200(3))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen
(subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW
9A.82.070)

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(2))

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Manufacture, deliver, or
possess with intent to deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or
nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines,
or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the
Influence (RCW 46.61.504(6))

Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW
72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for Controlled
Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing a Juvenile
Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun
or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2
(RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness
(RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or
threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW
69.53.010)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW
72.65.070)

IIComputer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create, deliver, or
possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession of controlled substance that is either
heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at one thousand five hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW
18.130.190(7))

IAttempting to Elude a
Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for
Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW
69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a
Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine
or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW
9A.56.070)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at two hundred fifty dollars or more but less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW
9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and
(3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec.
5. RCW
9.94A.360 and 1999 c 352 s 10 and 1999 c 331 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
offender score is measured on the horizontal axis of the sentencing grid. The
offender score rules are as follows:

The
offender score is the sum of points accrued under this section rounded down to
the nearest whole number.

(1)
A prior conviction is a conviction which exists before the date of sentencing
for the offense for which the offender score is being computed. Convictions
entered or sentenced on the same date as the conviction for which the offender
score is being computed shall be deemed "other current offenses"
within the meaning of RCW 9.94A.400.

(2)(a)
Prior class A and prior sex ((prior)) felony convictions
shall always be included in the offender score.

(b)
Prior class B ((prior)) felony convictions other than sex offenses
shall not be included in the offender score, if since the last date of release
from confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a
felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had
spent ten consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction.

(c)
Prior class C ((prior)) felony convictions other than sex offenses and
other than felony traffic offenses under RCW 46.61.502(6) and 46.61.504(6)
shall not be included in the offender score if, since the last date of release
from confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a
felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had
spent five consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction.

(d)
Prior class C felony traffic convictions under RCW 46.61.502(6) and
46.61.504(6) and prior serious traffic convictions shall not be included in
the offender score if((,)): (i) Since the last date of release
from confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a
felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender
spent five years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction; and (ii) if the present conviction is
a felony traffic offense under RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), the prior
traffic or serious traffic conviction is no longer a prior offense "within
seven years" for purposes of RCW 46.61.5055. This subsection applies
to both adult and juvenile prior convictions.

(3)
Out-of-state convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the
comparable offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. Federal
convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the comparable
offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. If there is no
clearly comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is one that is
usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the offense shall
be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a felony under the relevant
federal statute.

(4)
Score prior convictions for felony anticipatory offenses (attempts, criminal
solicitations, and criminal conspiracies) the same as if they were convictions
for completed offenses.

(5)(a)
In the case of multiple prior convictions, for the purpose of computing the
offender score, count all convictions separately, except:

(i)
Prior offenses which were found, under RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a), to encompass the
same criminal conduct, shall be counted as one offense, the offense that yields
the highest offender score. The current sentencing court shall determine with
respect to other prior adult offenses for which sentences were served
concurrently or prior juvenile offenses for which sentences were served
consecutively, whether those offenses shall be counted as one offense or as
separate offenses using the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in
RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a), and if the court finds that they shall be counted as one
offense, then the offense that yields the highest offender score shall be
used. The current sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses
were not the same criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate dates, or
in separate counties or jurisdictions, or in separate complaints, indictments,
or informations;

(ii)
In the case of multiple prior convictions for offenses committed before July 1,
1986, for the purpose of computing the offender score, count all adult
convictions served concurrently as one offense, and count all juvenile
convictions entered on the same date as one offense. Use the conviction for
the offense that yields the highest offender score.

(b)
As used in this subsection (5), "served concurrently" means that:
(i) The latter sentence was imposed with specific reference to the former; (ii)
the concurrent relationship of the sentences was judicially imposed; and (iii)
the concurrent timing of the sentences was not the result of a probation or
parole revocation on the former offense.

(6)
If the present conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior conviction as if the
present conviction were for a completed offense.

(7)
If the present conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not covered by
subsection (11) or (12) of this section, count one point for each adult prior
felony conviction and one point for each juvenile prior violent felony conviction
and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.

(8)
If the present conviction is for a violent offense and not covered in
subsection (9), (10), (11), or (12) of this section, count two points for each
prior adult and juvenile violent felony conviction, one point for each prior
adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.

(9)
If the present conviction is for a serious violent offense, count three points
for prior adult and juvenile convictions for crimes in this category, two
points for each prior adult and juvenile violent conviction (not already
counted), one point for each prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2
point for each prior juvenile nonviolent felony conviction.

(10)
If the present conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior convictions as in
subsection (8) of this section; however count two points for each prior adult
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each prior
juvenile Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(11)
If the present conviction is for a felony traffic offense count two points for
each adult or juvenile prior conviction for Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular
Assault; for each felony offense count one point for each adult and 1/2 point
for each juvenile prior conviction; for each serious traffic offense, other
than those used for an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one
point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction.

(12)
If the present conviction is for a drug offense count three points for each
adult prior felony drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile
drug offense. All other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in
subsection (8) of this section if the current drug offense is violent, or as in
subsection (7) of this section if the current drug offense is nonviolent.

(13)
If the present conviction is for Willful Failure to Return from Furlough, RCW
72.66.060, Willful Failure to Return from Work Release, RCW 72.65.070, or
Escape from Community Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape
convictions in the offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one
point and juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.

(14)
If the present conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or Escape 2, RCW
9A.76.120, count adult prior convictions as one point and juvenile prior
convictions as 1/2 point.

(15)
If the present conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential burglary, count
priors as in subsection (7) of this section; however, count two points for each
adult and juvenile prior Burglary 1 conviction, two points for each adult prior
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile
prior Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(16)
If the present conviction is for a sex offense, count priors as in subsections
(7) through (15) of this section; however count three points for each adult and
juvenile prior sex offense conviction.

(17)
If the present conviction is for an offense committed while the offender was
under community placement, add one point.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.20.720 and 1999 c 331 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The court may order that after a period of suspension, revocation, or denial of
driving privileges, and for up to as long as the court has jurisdiction, any
person convicted of any offense involving the use, consumption, or possession
of alcohol while operating a motor vehicle may drive only a motor vehicle
equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other biological or technical
device.

(2)
If a person is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an
equivalent local ordinance and it is: (a) The person's first conviction or a
deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW and his or her alcohol
concentration was at least 0.15, or by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the
person's alcohol concentration; or (b) the person's second or subsequent
conviction; or (c) the person's first conviction and the person has a previous
deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW or it is a deferred prosecution
under chapter 10.05 RCW and the person has a previous conviction, the court
shall order that after any applicable period of suspension, revocation, or
denial of driving privileges, the person may drive only a motor vehicle
equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other biological or technical
device. The court may waive the requirement for the use of such a device if
the court makes a specific finding in writing that such devices are not
reasonably available in the local area. Nothing in this section may be
interpreted as entitling a person to more than one deferred prosecution.

(3)
The court shall establish a specific calibration setting at which the ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device will prevent the motor
vehicle from being started and the period of time that the person shall be
subject to the restriction. In the case of a person under subsection (2) of
this section, the period of time of the restriction will be as follows:

(a)
For a person (i) who is subject to RCW 46.61.5055 (1)(b), (2), ((or))
(3), or (4), or who is subject to a deferred prosecution program under
chapter 10.05 RCW, and (ii) who has not previously been restricted under this
section, a period of not less than one year;

(b)
For a person who has previously been restricted under (a) of this subsection, a
period of not less than five years;

(c)
For a person who has previously been restricted under (b) of this subsection, a
period of not less than ten years.

For
purposes of this section, "convicted" means being found guilty of an
offense or being placed on a deferred prosecution program under chapter 10.05
RCW.

Sec.
7. RCW
46.61.502 and 1998 c 213 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug if the person drives a vehicle within this state:

(a)
And the person has, within two hours after driving, an alcohol concentration of
0.08 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood made under
RCW 46.61.506; or

(b)
While the person is under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor
or any drug; or

(c)
While the person is under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating
liquor and any drug.

(2)
The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section is or has been
entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state shall not constitute a
defense against a charge of violating this section.

(3)
It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that
the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of
driving and before the administration of an analysis of the person's breath or
blood to cause the defendant's alcohol concentration to be 0.08 or more within
two hours after driving. The court shall not admit evidence of this defense
unless the defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial
hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative
defense.

(4)
Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the
alleged driving may be used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged
driving, a person had an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more in violation of
subsection (1)(a) of this section, and in any case in which the analysis shows
an alcohol concentration above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was
under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation
of subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section.

(5)
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a violation of
this section is a gross misdemeanor.

(6)
A violation of this section by a person who has three or more prior offenses
within seven years is punishable as a class C felony according to chapter 9A.20
RCW. For the purposes of this subsection, the definitions of "prior
offense" and "within seven years" contained in RCW 46.61.5055
apply.

Sec.
8. RCW
46.61.504 and 1998 c 213 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the person has actual
physical control of a vehicle within this state:

(a)
And the person has, within two hours after being in actual physical control of
the vehicle, an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or higher as shown by analysis of
the person's breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or

(b)
While the person is under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor
or any drug; or

(c)
While the person is under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating
liquor and any drug.

(2)
The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section is or has been
entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state does not constitute a
defense against any charge of violating this section. No person may be
convicted under this section if, prior to being pursued by a law enforcement
officer, the person has moved the vehicle safely off the roadway.

(3)
It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that
the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of being
in actual physical control of the vehicle and before the administration of an
analysis of the person's breath or blood to cause the defendant's alcohol
concentration to be 0.08 or more within two hours after being in such control.
The court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the defendant
notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case
of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.

(4)
Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the
alleged being in actual physical control of a vehicle may be used as evidence
that within two hours of the alleged being in such control, a person had an
alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section, and in any case in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration
above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or
affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(b)
or (c) of this section.

(5)
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a violation of
this section is a gross misdemeanor.

(6)
A violation of this section by a person who has three or more prior offenses
within seven years is punishable as a class C felony according to chapter 9A.20
RCW. For the purposes of this subsection, the definitions of "prior
offense" and "within seven years" contained in RCW 46.61.5055
apply.

Sec.
9. RCW
46.61.5055 and 1999 c 324 s 5, 1999 c 274 s 6, and 1999 c 5 s 1 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who
has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than one year. Twenty-four
consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would
impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court
shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and
the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection
(1)(a)(i), the court may order not less than fifteen days of electronic home
monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring.
The county or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine
the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring
device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict
the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is
on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended
or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; or

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than one year. Two
consecutive days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would
impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court
shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and
the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection
(1)(b)(i), the court may order not less than thirty days of electronic home
monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring.
The county or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall
determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court
may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the
offender is on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(2)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who
has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than one year and sixty
days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer,
and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and
sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court
shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and
the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than one year and
ninety days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost
of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is
being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days
of imprisonment and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this
mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is
suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting
the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral
is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended
or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(3)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who
has two ((or more)) prior offenses within seven years shall be punished
as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than one year and one
hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for
the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the
penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require
the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Ninety days of
imprisonment and one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring may not
be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this
mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is
suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting
the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral
is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor more than one
year and one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender
shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or
municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The
court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include
an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred fifty days
of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the
mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon
which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(4)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and
who has three or more prior offenses within seven years shall be punished in
accordance with chapter 9.94A RCW. In addition, the court shall impose the
restrictions set forth in RCW 46.20.720 and may sentence the offender to a term
of home detention, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030. Any term of home detention
shall be served consecutively to the term of total confinement.

(5)
In exercising its discretion in setting nonfelony penalties within the
limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly consider the
following:

(a)
Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was responsible for
injury or damage to another or another's property; and

(b)
Whether the person was driving or in physical control of a vehicle with one or
more passengers at the time of the offense.

(((5)))
(6) An offender punishable under this section is subject to the alcohol
assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.

(((6)))
(7) The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person convicted
of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:

(a)
If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308
there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i)
Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be suspended or
denied by the department for ninety days;

(ii)
Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied
by the department for two years; or

(iii)
Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked
or denied by the department for three years;

(b)
If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or if by reason of the
person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test
result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i)
Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied
by the department for one year;

(ii)
Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied
by the department for nine hundred days; or

(iii)
Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked
or denied by the department for four years.

For
purposes of this subsection, the department shall refer to the driver's record
maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the existence of prior
offenses.

(((7)))
(8) After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or denial
of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive required by this
section, the department shall place the offender's driving privilege in
probationary status pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.

(((8)))
(9)(a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence
required by this section, whenever the court imposes less than one year in
jail, the court shall also suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement
for a period not exceeding five years. The court shall impose conditions of
probation that include: (i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this state
without a valid license to drive and proof of financial responsibility for the
future; (ii) not driving a motor vehicle within this state while having an
alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more within two hours after driving; and (iii)
not refusing to submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to determine
alcohol concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who has
reasonable grounds to believe the person was driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor. The court may impose conditions of probation that include
nonrepetition, installation of an ignition interlock or other biological or
technical device on the probationer's motor vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment,
supervised probation, or other conditions that may be appropriate. The
sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of
probation during the suspension period.

(b)
For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i) and (ii)
or (a)(i) and (iii) of this subsection, the court shall order the convicted
person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be suspended or
deferred.

(c)
For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory condition of probation
imposed under this subsection, the license, permit, or privilege to drive of
the person shall be suspended by the court for thirty days or, if such license,
permit, or privilege to drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the
time the finding of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or
denial then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall notify
the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any extension of a
suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection.

(((9)))
(10) A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements of
this chapter when:

(a)
The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or any other
necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system;

(b)
The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or

(c)
The court determines that there is reason to believe that the offender would
violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring penalty.

Whenever
the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring is waived, the court
shall state in writing the reason for granting the waiver and the facts upon
which the waiver is based, and shall impose an alternative sentence with
similar punitive consequences. The alternative sentence may include, but is
not limited to, additional jail time, work crew, or work camp.

Whenever
the combination of jail time and electronic home monitoring or alternative
sentence would exceed three hundred sixty-five days, the offender shall serve
the jail portion of the sentence first, and the electronic home monitoring or
alternative portion of the sentence shall be reduced so that the combination
does not exceed three hundred sixty-five days.

(((10)))
(11) An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an extraordinary medical
placement by the jail administrator subject to the standards and limitations
set forth in RCW 9.94A.150(4).

(((11)))
(12) For purposes of this section:

(a)
A "prior offense" means any of the following:

(i)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ii)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(iii)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(iv)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(v)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050 or an
equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the result of a charge that
was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an
equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

(vi)
An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of
(a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this subsection if committed in this
state;

(vii)
A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a
violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance; or

(viii)
A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a
violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge
under which the deferred prosecution was granted was originally filed as a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or
of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522; and

(b) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a
prior offense occurred within seven years of the arrest for the current
offense.

Sec.
10. RCW
46.61.5151 and 1995 c 332 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

A sentencing court may allow ((persons convicted of violating))
a person who is convicted of a nonfelony violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 to fulfill the terms of the sentence provided in RCW 46.61.5055 in
nonconsecutive or intermittent time periods. However, a term of confinement
of more than one year shall be served consecutively and any mandatory
minimum sentence under RCW 46.61.5055 shall be served consecutively unless
suspended or deferred as otherwise provided by law.

---
END ---