BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.08.160 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

On
or before the twenty-fifth day of each month, all taxes collected under RCW
82.08.150 during the preceding month shall be remitted to the state department
of revenue, to be deposited with the state treasurer. Upon receipt of such
moneys the state treasurer shall credit ((sixty-five percent of the sums
collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) and one hundred percent
of the sums collected and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (3) and (4) to the state
general fund and)) thirty-five percent of the sums collected and remitted
under RCW 82.08.150 (1) and (2) to a fund which is hereby created to be known
as the "liquor excise tax fund." Of the remaining sums collected
and remitted under RCW 82.08.150 (1), (2), (3), and (4), the state treasurer
shall credit thirty-five percent to the county criminal justice assistance
account for distribution under RCW 82.14.310, seven percent to the municipal
criminal justice assistance account for distribution under RCW 82.14.320, seven
percent to the municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution
under RCW 82.14.330, and the remainder to the state general fund.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.14.310 and 1999 c 309 s 920 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The county criminal justice assistance account is created in the state
treasury. Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall transfer
into the county criminal justice assistance account from the general fund the
sum of twenty-three million two hundred thousand dollars divided into four
equal deposits occurring on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For
each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase the total
transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast
for that fiscal year by the office of financial management in November of the
preceding year.

(2)
The moneys deposited in the county criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes
under subsection (4) of this section, shall be distributed ((at such times
as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) on the first day of the
months of January, April, July, and October of each year and on the
relative basis of each county's funding factor as determined under this
subsection.

(a)
A county's funding factor is the sum of:

(i)
The population of the county, divided by one thousand, and multiplied by
two-tenths;

(ii)
The crime rate of the county, multiplied by three-tenths; and

(iii)
The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county superior court, for
each one thousand in population, multiplied by five-tenths.

(b)
Under this section and RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330:

(i)
The population of the county or city shall be as last determined by the office of
financial management;

(ii)
The crime rate of the county or city is the annual occurrence of specified
criminal offenses, as calculated in the most recent annual report on crime in
Washington state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs, for each one thousand in population;

(iii)
The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county superior court shall be
determined by the most recent annual report of the courts of Washington, as
published by the office of the administrator for the courts;

(iv)
Distributions and eligibility for distributions in the 1989‑91 biennium
shall be based on 1988 figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii)
of this subsection and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as
described under (iii) of this subsection. Future distributions shall be based
on the most recent figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of
this subsection and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as
described under (iii) of this subsection.

(3)
Moneys distributed under this section shall be expended exclusively for
criminal justice purposes and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing
funding. Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that
substantially assist the criminal justice system, which may include
circumstances where ancillary benefit to the civil or juvenile justice system
occurs, and which includes (a) domestic violence services such as those
provided by domestic violence programs, community advocates, and legal
advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020, and (b) during the 1999-2001 fiscal
biennium, juvenile dispositional hearings relating to petitions for at-risk
youth, truancy, and children in need of services. Existing funding for
purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating
expenditures for criminal justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual
operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude the following:
Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in
contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the control of the
local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital
expenditures.

(4)
Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the county criminal
justice assistance account shall be available for appropriations for
enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing
costs related to these enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for
such enhancements shall not supplant existing funds from the state general
fund.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.14.320 and 1998 c 321 s 12 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
The municipal criminal justice assistance account is created in the state
treasury. Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall transfer
into the municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under
this section from the general fund the sum of four million six hundred thousand
dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring on July 1, October 1,
January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer
shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in
RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial
management in November of the preceding year.

(2)
No city may receive a distribution under this section from the municipal
criminal justice assistance account unless:

(a)
The city has a crime rate in excess of one hundred twenty-five percent of the
state-wide average as calculated in the most recent annual report on crime in
Washington state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs;

(b)
The city has levied the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate
or the tax authorized in RCW 82.46.010(3) at the maximum rate; and

(c)
The city has a per capita yield from the tax imposed under RCW 82.14.030(1) at
the maximum rate of less than one hundred fifty percent of the state-wide
average per capita yield for all cities from such local sales and use tax.

(3)
The moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes
under subsection (7) of this section, shall be distributed ((at such times
as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) on the first day of the
months of January, April, July, and October of each year. The distributions
shall be made as follows:

(a)
Unless reduced by this subsection, thirty percent of the moneys shall be distributed
ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial
management to those cities eligible under subsection (2) of this section that
have a crime rate determined under subsection (2)(a) of this section which is
greater than one hundred seventy-five percent of the state-wide average crime
rate. No city may receive more than fifty percent of any moneys distributed
under this subsection (a) but, if a city distribution is reduced as a result of
exceeding the fifty percent limitation, the amount not distributed shall be
distributed under (b) of this subsection.

(b)
The remainder of the moneys, including any moneys not distributed in subsection
(2)(a) of this section, shall be distributed to all cities eligible under
subsection (2) of this section ratably based on population as last determined
by the office of financial management.

(4)
No city may receive more than thirty percent of all moneys distributed under
subsection (3) of this section.

(5)
Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the distributions to any city
that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1,
1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which
the city is located.

(6)
Moneys distributed under this section shall be expended exclusively for
criminal justice purposes and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing
funding. Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that
substantially assist the criminal justice system, which may include
circumstances where ancillary benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and
which includes domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic
violence programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW
70.123.020, and publications and public educational efforts designed to provide
information and assistance to parents in dealing with runaway or at-risk
youth. Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar
year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes.
Calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes
exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to
reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond
the control of the local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(7)
Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the municipal criminal
justice assistance account shall be available for appropriations for
enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing
costs related to these enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for
such enhancements shall not supplant existing funds from the state general
fund.

Sec.
4. RCW
82.14.330 and 1998 c 321 s 13 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall transfer into the
municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this
section from the general fund the sum of four million six hundred thousand
dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring on July 1, October 1,
January 1, and April 1. For each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer
shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in
RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial
management in November of the preceding year. The moneys deposited in the
municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this
section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes under subsection (4) of this
section, shall be distributed to the cities of the state as follows:

(a)
Twenty percent appropriated for distribution shall be distributed to cities
with a three-year average violent crime rate for each one thousand in
population in excess of one hundred fifty percent of the state-wide three-year
average violent crime rate for each one thousand in population. The three-year
average violent crime rate shall be calculated using the violent crime rates
for each of the preceding three years from the annual reports on crime in
Washington state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs. Moneys shall be distributed under this subsection (1)(a)
ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial
management, but no city may receive more than one dollar per capita. Moneys
remaining undistributed under this subsection at the end of each calendar year
shall be distributed to the criminal justice training commission to reimburse
participating city law enforcement agencies with ten or fewer full-time
commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement of each officer
who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training, as provided in RCW
43.101.200.

(b)
Sixteen percent shall be distributed to cities ratably based on population as
last determined by the office of financial management, but no city may receive
less than one thousand dollars.

The
moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this subsection shall be distributed ((at such times as
distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) on the first day of the
months of January, April, July, and October of each year.

Moneys
distributed under this subsection shall be expended exclusively for criminal
justice purposes and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing funding.
Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that substantially assist
the criminal justice system, which may include circumstances where ancillary
benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and which includes domestic
violence services such as those provided by domestic violence programs,
community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW 70.123.020.
Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as calendar year
1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes. Calendar
year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude
the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur,
changes in contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the
control of the local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major
nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(2)
In addition to the distributions under subsection (1) of this section:

(a)
Fourteen percent shall be distributed to cities that have initiated innovative
law enforcement strategies, including alternative sentencing and crime
prevention programs. No city may receive more than one dollar per capita under
this subsection (2)(a).

(b)
Twenty percent shall be distributed to cities that have initiated programs to
help at-risk children or child abuse victim response programs. No city may
receive more than fifty cents per capita under this subsection (2)(b).

(c)
Twenty percent shall be distributed to cities that have initiated programs
designed to reduce the level of domestic violence within their jurisdictions or
to provide counseling for domestic violence victims. No city may receive more
than fifty cents per capita under this subsection (2)(c).

(d)
Ten percent shall be distributed to cities that contract with another
governmental agency for a majority of the city's law enforcement services.

Moneys
distributed under this subsection shall be distributed to those cities that
submit funding requests under this subsection to the department of community,
trade, and economic development based on criteria developed under RCW
82.14.335. Allocation of funds shall be in proportion to the population of
qualified jurisdictions, but the distribution to a city shall not exceed the
amount of funds requested. Cities shall submit requests for program funding to
the department of community, trade, and economic development by November 1 of
each year for funding the following year. The department shall certify to the
state treasurer the cities eligible for funding under this subsection and the
amount of each allocation.

The
moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this subsection, less any moneys appropriated for purposes
under subsection (4) of this section, shall be distributed ((at the times as
distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) on the first day of the
months of January, April, July, and October of each year. Moneys remaining
undistributed under this subsection at the end of each calendar year shall be
distributed to the criminal justice training commission to reimburse
participating city law enforcement agencies with ten or fewer full-time
commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement of each officer
who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training, as provided in RCW
43.101.200.

If
a city is found by the state auditor to have expended funds received under this
subsection in a manner that does not comply with the criteria under which the
moneys were received, the city shall be ineligible to receive future
distributions under this subsection until the use of the moneys are justified
to the satisfaction of the director or are repaid to the state general fund.
The director may allow noncomplying use of moneys received under this
subsection upon a showing of hardship or other emergent need.

(3)
Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the distributions to any city
that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1,
1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which
the city is located.

(4)
Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the municipal criminal
justice assistance account shall be available for appropriations for
enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing
costs related to these enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for
such enhancements shall not supplant existing funds from the state general
fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---