BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.04.010 and 1997 c 220 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

The
term state shall include the state of Washington and all departments,
supervisors, commissioners and agencies thereof.

The
term municipality shall include every city, county, town, district or other
public agency thereof which is authorized by law to require the execution of
public work, except drainage districts, diking districts, diking and drainage
improvement districts, drainage improvement districts, diking improvement
districts, consolidated diking and drainage improvement districts, consolidated
drainage improvement districts, consolidated diking improvement districts,
irrigation districts or any such other districts as shall from time to time be
authorized by law for the reclamation or development of waste or undeveloped
lands.

The
term public work shall include all work, construction, alteration, repair, or
improvement other than ordinary maintenance, executed at the cost of the state
or of any municipality, or which is by law a lien or charge on any property
therein. All public works, including maintenance when performed by contract
shall comply with the provisions of ((RCW 39.12.020)) chapter 39.12
RCW. The term does not include work, construction, alteration, repair, or
improvement performed under contracts entered into under RCW 36.102.060(4) or
under development agreements entered into under RCW 36.102.060(7) or leases
entered into under RCW 36.102.060(8).

The
term contract shall mean a contract in writing for the execution of public work
for a fixed or determinable amount duly awarded after advertisement and
competitive bid. However, a contract which is awarded from a small works
roster under the authority of RCW 39.04.150, 35.22.620, 28B.10.355, 35.82.075,
and 57.08.050 need not be advertised.

Sec.
2. RCW
39.12.010 and 1989 c 12 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The "prevailing rate of wage", for the intents and purposes of this
chapter, shall be the weighted average rate of hourly wage, usual
benefits, and overtime paid in the ((locality, as hereinafter defined,))
county to the ((majority of)) workers, laborers, or mechanics, in
the same trade or occupation. ((In the event that there is not a majority
in the same trade or occupation paid at the same rate, then the average rate of
hourly wage and overtime paid to such laborers, workers, or mechanics in the
same trade or occupation shall be the prevailing rate.)) The average
shall be weighted for the hours worked at each hourly wage. If the wage
paid by any contractor or subcontractor to laborers, workers, or mechanics on
any public work is based on some period of time other than an hour, the hourly
wage for the purposes of this chapter shall be mathematically determined by the
number of hours worked in such period of time.

(2)
((The "locality" for the purposes of this chapter shall be the
largest city in the county wherein the physical work is being performed.

(3))) The
"usual benefits" for the purposes of this chapter shall include the
amount of:

(a)
The rate of contribution irrevocably made by a contractor or subcontractor to a
trustee or to a third person pursuant to a fund, plan, or program; and

(b)
The rate of costs to the contractor or subcontractor which may be reasonably
anticipated in providing benefits to workers, laborers, and mechanics pursuant
to an enforcible commitment to carry out a financially responsible plan or
program which was communicated in writing to the workers, laborers, and
mechanics affected, for medical or hospital care, pensions on retirement or
death, compensation for injuries or illness resulting from occupational
activity, or insurance to provide any of the foregoing, for unemployment
benefits, life insurance, disability and sickness insurance, or accident
insurance, for vacation and holiday pay, for defraying costs of apprenticeship
or other similar programs, or for other bona fide fringe benefits, but only
where the contractor or subcontractor is not required by other federal, state,
or local law to provide any of such benefits.

(((4))) (3) An "interested party" for the
purposes of this chapter shall include a contractor, subcontractor, an employee
of a contractor or subcontractor, an organization whose members' wages,
benefits, and conditions of employment are affected by this chapter, and the
director of labor and industries or the director's designee.

Sec.
3. RCW
39.12.020 and 1989 c 12 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as provided in section 4 of this act, the hourly wages to be paid to
laborers, workers, or mechanics, upon all public works and under all public
building service maintenance contracts of the state or any county, municipality
or political subdivision created by its laws with a population of less than
one hundred thousand, shall be not less than the prevailing rate of wage
for an hour's work in the same trade or occupation in the ((locality)) county
within the state where such labor is performed. For a contract in excess of
ten thousand dollars, a contractor required to pay the prevailing rate of wage
shall post in a location readily visible to workers at the job site: PROVIDED,
That on road construction, sewer line, pipeline, transmission line, street, or
alley improvement projects for which no field office is needed or established,
a contractor may post the prevailing rate of wage statement at the contractor's
local office, gravel crushing, concrete, or asphalt batch plant as long as the
contractor provides a copy of the wage statement to any employee on request:

(1)
A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages approved by the
industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries under RCW
39.12.040; and

(2)
The address and telephone number of the industrial statistician of the
department of labor and industries where a complaint or inquiry concerning
prevailing wages may be made.

((This
chapter shall not apply to workers or other persons regularly employed on
monthly or per diem salary by the state, or any county, municipality, or
political subdivision created by its laws.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter does not apply to:

(1)
Workers or other persons regularly employed on monthly or per diem salary by
the state, or any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its
laws; or

(2) Common school construction performed under Title 28A RCW.

---
END ---