BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

A political or campaign committee authorized by a candidate for
president or vice-president of the United States, the United States senate, or
the United States house of representatives may not make a transfer of funds or
contribution to a state bona fide party political committee or caucus political
committee or organization or to a political or campaign committee authorized by
a candidate for a state office in excess of the contribution limits established
under RCW 42.17.640 and 42.17.690 for individuals contributing to a candidate
for that office.

---
END ---