BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes the need to secure an adequate revenue base for the
operation, maintenance, and improvement of the state parks system. It is the
intent of the legislature, by dedicating a portion of the general revenues of
the state to state parks, to provide sufficient revenues for state parks to
meet the needs of the state parks operating, capital, and transportation budget
appropriations previously met directly by the general revenues of the state of
Washington, including general transportation revenues and capital bond moneys
supported by the general fund.

Sec.
2. RCW
79A.05.215 and 1995 c 211 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state parks renewal and stewardship account is created in the state treasury.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all receipts from user fees,
concessions, leases, and other state park-based activities, and all revenues
derived under RCW 82.08.020(3), shall be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used for only operating state
parks, developing and renovating park facilities, undertaking deferred
maintenance, making capital investments in the state parks, maintaining
state parks roads, enhancing park stewardship, and other state park
purposes. Expenditures from the account may be made only after appropriation
by the legislature.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.08.020 and 1998 c 321 s 36 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this
state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price.

(2)
There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail
car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal
to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected
under this subsection shall be deposited and distributed in the same manner as
motor vehicle excise tax revenue collected under RCW 82.44.020(1).

(3)
There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in
this state equal to one-tenth percent of the selling price. The tax shall be
credited against the tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section. The
revenue collected under this subsection shall be deposited in the parks renewal
and stewardship account.

(4)
The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive retail sales of
the same property.

(((4)))
(5) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under
chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act takes effect July 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The
secretary of state shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and
ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this
state, in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and
the laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

---
END ---