BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
66.24.261 and 1997 c 321 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a license for beer importers that authorizes the licensee to import
beer manufactured within the United States by certificate of approval holders
(B5) into the state of Washington. The licensee may also contract with and
purchase beer from a domestic brewery in the state of Washington. The
licensee may also import beer manufactured outside the United States.

(1)
Beer so imported ((may)) or purchased must be sold to licensed
beer distributors or exported from the state.

(2)
Every person, firm, or corporation licensed as a beer importer shall establish
and maintain a principal office within the state at which shall be kept proper
records of all beer imported into the state under this license.

(3)
No beer importer's license shall be granted to a nonresident of the state nor
to a corporation whose principal place of business is outside the state until
such applicant has established a principal office and agent within the state
upon which service can be made.

(4)
As a requirement for license approval, a beer importer shall enter into a
written agreement with the board to furnish on or before the twentieth day of
each month, a report under oath, detailing the quantity of beer sold or
delivered to each licensed beer distributor. Failure to file such reports may
result in the suspension or cancellation of this license.

(5)
Beer imported or purchased under this license must conform to the
provisions of RCW 66.28.120 and have received label approval from the board.
The board shall not certify beer labeled with names which may be confused with
other nonalcoholic beverages whether manufactured or produced from a domestic
brewery or imported nor beer which fails to meet quality standards established
by the board.

(6) The license fee shall be one hundred sixty dollars per year.

---
END ---