BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
declared to be the public policy of the state of Washington to encourage and
facilitate the improvement of transportation facilities. The construction of
necessary transportation improvements in accordance with local community
planning will encourage investment in job-producing economic development and
will expand the public tax base.

It
is the purpose of this chapter to allocate a portion of regular property taxes
to assist in the financing of transportation improvements which are needed to
encourage economic development of areas; to improve transportation mobility in
congested areas due to the inability of existing financing methods to provide
needed transportation improvements; to encourage local taxing districts to
cooperate in the allocation of future tax revenues arising in areas in order to
facilitate the long-term growth of their common tax base; and to encourage
private investment within congested areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. As
used in this chapter the following terms have the following meanings unless a
different meaning is clearly indicated by the context.

(1)
"Transportation improvement district" means the geographic area,
within a designated area, from which regular property taxes are to be
apportioned to finance a transportation improvement contained therein.

(2)
"Assessed value of real property" means the valuation of real
property as placed on the last completed assessment roll of the county.

(3)
"City" means any city or town.

(4)
"Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking a legislative
action by a county or city, whether known as a statute, resolution, ordinance,
or otherwise.

(5)
"Transportation improvement" means an undertaking to provide
transportation facilities, including but not limited to buses and trains, in an
area which the sponsor has authority to provide.

(6)
"Transportation improvement costs" means the costs of design,
planning, right of way acquisition, site preparation, construction,
reconstruction, rehabilitation, maintenance, preservation, and installation of
transportation improvements or facilities; costs of relocation, maintenance,
and operation of property pending construction of transportation improvements
or facilities; costs of utilities relocated as a result of transportation
improvements or facilities; costs of financing, including interest during
construction, legal and other professional services, taxes, and insurance;
costs incurred by the assessor to revalue real property for the purpose of
determining the tax allocation base value that are in excess of costs incurred
by the assessor in accordance with his revaluation plan under chapter 84.41
RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with this chapter
and other applicable law; and administrative costs reasonably necessary and
related to these costs. These costs may include costs incurred prior to the
adoption of the transportation improvement ordinance, but subsequent to the
effective date of this section.

(7)
"Transportation improvement ordinance" means the ordinance passed
under section 4(4) of this act.

(8)
"Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as now or
hereafter defined in RCW 84.04.140. "Regular property taxes" does
not include taxes levied by port districts or public utility districts
specifically for the purpose of making required payments of principal and
interest on general indebtedness.

(9)
"Sponsor" means the legislative authority of any county or city
initiating and undertaking a transportation improvement.

(10)
"Tax allocation base value of real property" means the true and fair
value of real property within a transportation improvement district for the
year in which the transportation improvement district was established.

(11)
"Tax allocation bonds" means any bonds, notes, or other obligations
issued by a sponsor under section 10 of this act.

(12)
"Tax allocation revenues" means those tax revenues allocated to a
sponsor under section 7(1)(b) of this act.

(13)
"Taxing districts" means any governmental entity which levies or has
levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located within a
proposed or approved transportation improvement district.

(14)
"Vacant land" means land that is not used for any purpose. "Vacant
land" does not include paved or unpaved revenue-generating motor vehicle
parking lots.

(15)
"Value of taxable property" means value of taxable property as
defined in RCW 39.36.015.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Only transportation improvements which are determined by the legislative
authority of the sponsor to meet the following criteria are eligible to be
financed under this chapter:

(a)
The transportation improvement is located within an area reasonably requiring
transportation improvements;

(b)
The transportation improvement will stimulate economic development within the
transportation improvement district;

(c)
The economic development within the transportation improvement district will
increase the assessed value of the transportation improvement district;

(d)
The economic development which is anticipated to occur within the
transportation improvement district as a result of the transportation
improvement is consistent with an existing comprehensive land use plan and approved
growth policies of the jurisdiction within which it is located;

(e)
A transportation improvement located within a city has been approved by the
legislative authority of the city; and

(f)
A transportation improvement located within an area in an unincorporated area
has been approved by the legislative authority of the county within whose
boundaries the area lies.

(2)
Apportionment of regular property tax revenues to finance the transportation
improvements is subject to the following limitations:

(a)
No apportionment of regular property tax revenues may take place within a
previously established transportation improvement district where regular
property taxes are still apportioned to finance public or transportation
improvements without the concurrence of the sponsor which established the
district;

(b)
No transportation improvement district may be established which includes any
geographic area included within a previously established transportation
improvement district which has outstanding bonds payable in whole or in part
from tax allocation revenues;

(c)
The total amount of outstanding bonds payable in whole or in part from tax
allocation revenues arising from property located within a city shall not
exceed two percent of the value of taxable property within the city, and the
total amount of outstanding bonds payable in whole or in part from tax
allocation revenues arising from property located within the unincorporated
areas of a county shall not exceed two percent of the value of taxable property
within the entire unincorporated area of the county; and

(d)
No taxes other than regular property taxes may be apportioned under this
chapter.

(3)
Transportation improvements may be undertaken and coordinated with other
programs or efforts undertaken by the sponsor or others and may be funded in
whole or in part from sources other than those provided by this chapter,
subject to the limitations in RCW 39.92.030, 43.21C.065, 58.17.110, and
82.02.050.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Transportation
improvements funded by tax allocation revenues may only be located within a
transportation improvement district. In order to secure an allocation of
regular property taxes to finance a transportation improvement, a sponsor
shall:

(1)
Propose by ordinance a plan for the transportation improvement which includes a
description of the contemplated transportation improvement, the estimated cost,
the boundaries of the transportation improvement district, the estimated period
during which tax revenue apportionment is contemplated, and the ways in which
the sponsor plans to use tax allocation revenues to finance the transportation
improvement, and which sets at least three public hearings before the
legislative authority of the sponsor or a committee: PROVIDED, That public
hearings for the transportation improvement that is undertaken in combination
or coordination by two or more sponsors may be held jointly; and public
hearings, held before the legislative authority or a committee of a majority
may be combined with public hearings held for other purposes;

(2)
At least fifteen days in advance of the hearing:

(a)
Deliver notice of the hearing to all taxing districts, the county treasurer,
and the county assessor, which notice includes a map or drawing showing the
location of the contemplated transportation improvement and the boundaries of
the proposed transportation improvement district, a brief description of the
transportation improvement, the estimated cost, the anticipated increase in
property values within the transportation improvement district, the location of
the sponsor's principal business office where it will maintain information
concerning the transportation improvement for public inspection, and the date
and place of hearing; and

(b)
Post notice in at least six public places located in the proposed
transportation improvement district and publish notice in a legal newspaper of
general circulation within the sponsor's jurisdiction briefly describing the
transportation improvement, the proposed apportionment, the boundaries of the
proposed transportation improvement district, the location where additional
information concerning the transportation improvement may be inspected, and the
date and place of hearing;

(3)
At the time and place fixed for the hearing under subsection (1) of this
section, and at times to which the hearing may be adjourned, receive and
consider all statements and materials as may be submitted, and objections and
letters filed before or within ten days thereafter;

(4)
Within one hundred twenty days after completion of the public hearings, pass an
ordinance establishing the transportation improvement district and authorizing
the proposed transportation improvement, including any modifications which in
the sponsor's opinion the hearings indicated should be made, which includes the
boundaries of the transportation improvement district, a description of the
transportation improvement, the estimated cost, the portion of the estimated
cost to be reimbursed from tax allocation revenues, the estimated time during
which regular property taxes are to be apportioned, the date apportionment of
the regular property taxes will commence, and a finding that the transportation
improvement meets the conditions of section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Within fifteen days after enactment of the public improvement ordinance, the
sponsor shall publish notice in a legal newspaper circulated within the
designated transportation improvement district summarizing the final
transportation improvement, including a brief description of the transportation
improvement, the boundaries of the transportation improvement district, and the
location where the transportation improvement ordinance and any other
information concerning the transportation improvement may be inspected.

Within
fifteen days after enactment of the transportation improvement ordinance, the
sponsor shall deliver a certified copy to each taxing district, the county
treasurer, and the county assessor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
Any taxing district that objects to the transportation improvement district,
the duration of the apportionment, the manner of apportionment, or the
propriety of cost items established by the transportation improvement ordinance
of the sponsor may, within thirty days after mailing of the ordinance, petition
for review by the state board of tax appeals. The state board of tax appeals
shall meet within a reasonable time, hear all the evidence presented by the
parties on matters in dispute, and determine the issues upon the evidence as
may be presented to it at the hearing. The board may approve or deny the
transportation improvement ordinance as enacted or may grant approval conditioned
upon modification of the ordinance by the sponsor. The decision by the state
board of tax appeals shall be final and conclusive, but shall not preclude
modification or discontinuation of the transportation improvement.

(2)
If the sponsor modifies the transportation improvement ordinance as directed by
the board, the transportation improvement ordinance shall be effective without
further hearings or findings and shall not be subject to further appeal. If
the sponsor modifies the transportation improvement ordinance in a manner other
than as directed by the board, the transportation improvement ordinance shall
be subject to the procedures established under sections 4 and 5 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
Upon the date established in the transportation improvement ordinance, but not
sooner than the first day of the calendar year following the passage of the
ordinance, the regular property taxes levied upon the assessed value of real
property within the transportation improvement district shall be divided as
follows:

(a)
That portion of the regular property taxes produced by the rate of tax levied
each year by or for each of the taxing districts upon the tax allocation base
value of real property, or upon the assessed value of real property in each
year, whichever is smaller, shall be allocated to and paid to the respective
taxing districts; and

(b)
That portion of the regular property taxes levied each year by or for each of
the taxing districts upon the assessed value of real property within a
transportation improvement district which is in excess of the tax allocation
base value of real property shall be allocated and paid to the sponsor, or the
sponsor's designated agent, until all transportation improvement costs to be
paid from the tax allocation revenues have been paid, except that the sponsor
may agree to receive less than the full amount of such portion as long as bond
debt service, reserve, and other bond covenant requirements are satisfied, in
which case the balance of the taxes shall be allocated to the respective taxing
districts as the sponsor and the taxing districts may agree.

(2)
The county assessor shall revalue the real property within the transportation
improvement district for the purpose of determining the tax allocation base
value for the transportation improvement district and shall certify to the
sponsor the tax allocation base value as soon as practicable after the assessor
receives notice of the transportation improvement ordinance and shall certify
to the sponsor the total assessed value of real property within thirty days
after the property values for each succeeding year have been established.
Nothing in this section authorizes revaluations of real property by the
assessor for property taxation that are not made in accordance with the
assessor's revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW.

(3)
The date upon which the transportation improvement district was established
shall be considered the date upon which the transportation improvement ordinance
was enacted by the sponsor.

(4)
The apportionment of regular property taxes under this section shall cease when
tax allocation revenues are no longer necessary or obligated to pay
transportation improvement costs or to pay principal of and interest on bonds
issued to finance transportation improvement costs and payable in whole or in
part from tax allocation revenues. At the time of termination of the
apportionment, any excess money and any earnings held by the sponsor shall be
returned to the county treasurer and distributed to the taxing districts which
were subject to the allocation in proportion to their regular property tax
levies due for the year in which the funds are returned.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Tax
allocation revenues may be applied as follows:

(1)
To pay transportation improvement costs;

(2)
To pay principal of and interest on, and to fund any necessary reserves for,
tax allocation bonds;

(3)
To pay into bond funds established to pay the principal of and interest on
general obligation bonds issued pursuant to law to finance transportation
facilities that are specified in the transportation improvement ordinance and
constructed following the establishment of and within the transportation
improvement district; or

(4)
To pay any combination of the foregoing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
General obligation bonds which are issued to finance transportation facilities
that are specified in the transportation improvement ordinance, and for which
part or all of the principal or interest is paid by tax allocation revenues,
shall be subject to the following requirements:

(1)
The intent to issue bonds and the maximum amount which the sponsor contemplates
issuing are specified in the transportation improvement ordinance; and

(2)
A statement of the intent of the sponsor to issue bonds is included in all
notices required by sections 4 and 5 of this act.

In
addition, the ordinance or resolution authorizing the issuance of general
obligation bonds is subject to potential referendum approval by the voters of
the issuing entity when the bonds are part of the nonvoter approved
indebtedness limitation established under RCW 39.36.020. If the voters of the
county or city issuing bonds otherwise possess the general power of referendum
on county or city matters, the ordinance or resolution shall be subject to that
procedure. If the voters of the county or city issuing bonds do not otherwise
possess the general power of referendum on county or city matters, the
referendum shall conform to the requirements and procedures for referendum
petitions provided for code cities in RCW 35A.11.100.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1) A
sponsor may issue tax allocation bonds as it may deem appropriate for the
financing of transportation improvement costs and a reasonable bond reserve and
for the refunding of any outstanding tax allocation bonds.

(2)
The principal and interest of tax allocation bonds may be made payable from:

(a)
Tax allocation revenues;

(b)
Project revenues which may include: (i) Nontax income, revenues, fees, and
rents from the transportation improvement financed with the proceeds of the
bonds, or portions thereof; and (ii) contributions, grants, and nontax money
available to the sponsor for payment of costs of the transportation improvement
or the debt service of the bonds issued;

(c)
Any combination of the revenues under (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(3)
Tax allocation bonds shall not be the general obligation of or guaranteed by
all or any part of the full faith and credit of the sponsor or any other state
or local government, or any tax revenues other than tax allocation revenues, and
shall not be considered a debt of the sponsor or other state or local
government for general indebtedness limitation purposes.

(4)
The terms and conditions of tax allocation bonds may include provisions for the
following matters, among others:

(a)
The date of issuance, maturity date or dates, denominations, form, series,
negotiability, registration, rank or priority, place of payment, interest rate
or rates which may be fixed or may vary over the life of the tax allocation
bonds, bond reserve, coverage, and other terms related to repayment of the tax
allocation bonds;

(b)
The application of tax allocation bond proceeds; the use, sale, or disposition
of property acquired; consideration or rents and fees to be charged in the sale
or lease of property acquired; consideration or rents and fees to be charged in
the sale or lease of property within a transportation improvement; the
application of rents, fees, and revenues within a transportation improvement;
the maintenance, insurance, and replacement of property within a transportation
improvement; other encumbrances, if any, upon all or part of property within a
transportation improvement, then existing or thereafter acquired; and the type
of debts that may be incurred;

(c)
The creation of special funds; the money to be applied; and the use and
disposition of the money;

(d)
The securing of the tax allocation bonds by a pledge of property and property
rights, by assignment of income generated by the transportation improvement, or
by pledging additional specifically described resources other than tax revenues
as are available to the sponsor;

(e)
The terms and conditions for redemption;

(f)
The replacement of lost and destroyed bond instruments;

(g)
Procedures for amendment of the terms and conditions of the tax allocation
bonds;

(h)
The powers of a trustee to enforce covenants and take other actions in event of
default; the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach of
any covenant, condition, or obligation; and

(i)
When consistent with this chapter, any other terms, conditions, and provisions
which may make the tax allocation bonds more marketable and further the
purposes of this chapter.

(5)
Tax allocation bonds may be issued and sold in a manner that the legislative
authority of the sponsor determines.

(6)
The sponsor may also issue or incur obligations in anticipation of the receipt
of tax allocation bond proceeds or other money available to pay transportation
improvement costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. Tax
allocation bonds authorized in this chapter are legal investments for any of
the funds of the state and of municipal corporations, for trustees, and for
other fiduciaries.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12.
Whenever notice is required to be given to the state, notice shall be given to
the director of revenue.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. No
direct or collateral attack on any transportation improvement, transportation
improvement ordinance, or transportation improvement district purported to be
authorized or created in conformance with applicable legal requirements,
including the requirements of this chapter, may be commenced more than thirty
days after publication of notice as required by section 5 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. This
chapter supplements and neither restricts nor limits any powers which the state
or any municipal corporation might otherwise have under any laws of this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. This
chapter may be known and cited as transportation improvement financing act.

Sec.
16. RCW
82.03.130 and 1998 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall have jurisdiction to decide the following types of appeals:

(a)
Appeals taken pursuant to RCW 82.03.190.

(b)
Appeals from a county board of equalization pursuant to RCW 84.08.130.

(c)
Appeals by an assessor or landowner from an order of the director of revenue
made pursuant to RCW 84.08.010 and 84.08.060, if filed with the board of tax
appeals within thirty days after the mailing of the order, the right to such an
appeal being hereby established.

(d)
Appeals by an assessor or owner of an intercounty public utility or private car
company from determinations by the director of revenue of equalized assessed
valuation of property and the apportionment thereof to a county made pursuant
to chapter 84.12 and 84.16 RCW, if filed with the board of tax appeals within
thirty days after mailing of the determination, the right to such appeal being
hereby established.

(e)
Appeals by an assessor, landowner, or owner of an intercounty public utility or
private car company from a determination of any county indicated ratio for such
county compiled by the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.48.075:
PROVIDED, That

(i)
Said appeal be filed after review of the ratio under RCW 84.48.075(3) and not
later than fifteen days after the mailing of the certification; and

(ii)
The hearing before the board shall be expeditiously held in accordance with
rules prescribed by the board and shall take precedence over all matters of the
same character.

(f)
Appeals from the decisions of sale price of second class shorelands on
navigable lakes by the department of natural resources pursuant to RCW
79.94.210.

(g)
Appeals from urban redevelopment property tax apportionment district proposals
established by governmental ordinances pursuant to ((RCW 39.88.060)) section
6 of this act.

(h)
Appeals from interest rates as determined by the department of revenue for use
in valuing farmland under current use assessment pursuant to RCW 84.34.065.

(i)
Appeals from revisions to stumpage value tables used to determine value by the
department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.33.091.

(j)
Appeals from denial of tax exemption application by the department of revenue
pursuant to RCW 84.36.850.

(k)
Appeals pursuant to RCW 84.40.038(3).

(2)
Except as otherwise specifically provided by law hereafter, the provisions of
RCW 1.12.070 shall apply to all notices of appeal filed with the board of tax
appeals.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. A new
section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

Limitations
on regular property taxes that are provided in this chapter shall continue in a
taxing district whether or not a tax increment area exists within the taxing
district as provided under chapter 81.-- RCW (sections 1 through 15 of this
act).

Sec.
18. RCW
84.52.043 and 1995 c 99 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular
ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts
hereafter named shall be as follows:

(1)
Levies of the senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a) The levy by the
state shall not exceed three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the
indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively
for the support of the common schools, except that a portion of this levy
may be used as provided in chapter 81.-- RCW (sections 1 through 15 of this
act); (b) the levy by any county shall not exceed one dollar and eighty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c) the levy by any road district
shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or town shall not exceed three
dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value. However any county is hereby authorized to increase its levy from one
dollar and eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and
one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for general county
purposes if the total levies for both the county and any road district within
the county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as a result
of the increased county levy.

(2)
The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts,
other than the state, shall not exceed five dollars and ninety cents per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing
districts" includes all taxing districts other than the state, counties,
road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and public utility districts.
The limitations provided in this subsection shall not apply to: (a) Levies at
the rates provided by existing law by or for any port or public utility
district; (b) excess property tax levies authorized in Article VII, section 2
of the state Constitution; (c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as
authorized under RCW 84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or
emergency medical services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance
affordable housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; and
(f) the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are protected
under RCW 84.52.120.

Sec.
19. RCW
84.52.065 and 1991 sp.s. c 31 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject
to the limitations in RCW 84.55.010, in each year the state shall levy for
collection in the following year for the support of common schools of the state
a tax of three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value
upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the state adjusted
to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by
the state department of revenue, except that a portion of this levy may be
used as provided in chapter 81.-- RCW (sections 1 through 15 of this act).

As
used in this section, "the support of common schools" includes the
payment of the principal and interest on bonds issued for capital construction
projects for the common schools.

Sec.
20. RCW
84.52.067 and 1967 ex.s. c 133 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

All
property taxes levied by the state for the support of common schools, that
are not diverted under chapter 81.-- RCW (sections 1 through 15 of this act),
shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury as provided in RCW
84.56.280.

Sec.
21. RCW
39.92.030 and 1988 c 179 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Local
governments may develop and adopt programs for the purpose of jointly funding,
from public and private sources, transportation improvements necessitated in
whole or in part by economic development and growth within their respective
jurisdictions. Local governments shall adopt the programs by ordinance after
notice and public hearing. Each program shall contain the elements described
in this section.

(1)
The program shall identify the geographic boundaries of the entire area or
areas generally benefited by the proposed off-site transportation improvements
and within which transportation impact fees will be imposed under this chapter.

(2)
The program shall be based on an adopted comprehensive, long-term
transportation plan identifying the proposed off-site transportation
improvements reasonable and necessary to meet the future growth needs of the
designated plan area and intended to be covered by this joint funding program,
including acquisition of right of way, construction and reconstruction of all
major and minor arterials and intersection improvements, and identifying design
standards, levels of service, capacities, and costs applicable to the program.
The program shall also indicate how the transportation plan is coordinated with
applicable transportation plans for the region and for adjacent jurisdictions.
The program shall also indicate how public transportation and ride-sharing
improvements and services will be used to reduce off-site transportation
impacts from development.

(3)
The program shall include at least a six-year capital funding program, updated
annually, identifying the specific public sources and amounts of revenue
necessary to pay for that portion of the cost of all off-site transportation
improvements contained in the transportation plan that will not foreseeably be
funded by transportation impact fees. The program shall include a proposed
schedule for construction and expenditures of funds. The funding plan shall
consider the additional local tax revenue estimated to be generated by new
development within the plan area if all or a portion of the additional revenue
is proposed to be earmarked as future appropriations for such off-site
transportation improvements.

(4)
The program shall authorize transportation impact fees to be imposed on new
development within the plan area for the purpose of providing a portion of the
funding for reasonable and necessary off-site transportation improvements to
solve the cumulative impacts of planned growth and development in the plan
area. Off-site transportation impacts shall be measured as a pro rata share of
the capacity of the off-site transportation improvements being funded under the
program. The fees shall not exceed the amount that the local government can demonstrate
is reasonably necessary as a direct result of the proposed development.

(5)
The program shall provide that the funds collected as a result of a particular
new development shall be used in substantial part to pay for improvements
mitigating the impacts of the development or be refunded to the property owners
of record. Fees paid toward more than one transportation improvement may be
pooled and expended on any one of the improvements mitigating the impact of the
development. The funds shall be expended in all cases within six years of
collection by the local government or the unexpended funds shall be refunded.

(6)
The program shall also describe the formula, timing, security, credits, and
other terms and conditions affecting the amount and method of payment of the
transportation impact fees as further provided for in RCW 39.92.040. In
calculating the amount of the fee, local government shall consider and give
credit for the developer's participation in public transportation and
ride-sharing improvements and services.

(7)
The administrative element of the program shall include: An opportunity for
administrative appeal by the developer and hearing before an independent
examiner of the amount of the transportation impact fee imposed; establishment
of a designated account for the public and private funds appropriated or
collected for the transportation improvements identified in the plan; methods
to enforce collection of the public and private funds identified in the
program; designation of the administrative departments or other entities
responsible for administering the program, including determination of fee
amounts, transportation planning, and construction; and provisions for future
amendment of the program including the addition of other off-site
transportation improvements. The program shall not be amended in a manner to
relieve local government of any contractual obligations made to prior
developers.

(8)
The program shall provide that private transportation impact fees shall not be
collected for any off-site transportation improvement that is incapable of
being reasonably carried out because of lack of public funds or other
foreseeable impediment.

(9)
The program shall provide that no transportation impact fee may be imposed on a
development by local government pursuant to this program when mitigation of the
same off-site transportation impacts for the development is being required by
any government agency pursuant to any other local, state, or federal law.

(10)
Transportation impact fees shall not be imposed upon residential development
activity by a city or county within which a transportation improvement district
is established under chapter 81.-- RCW (sections 1 through 15 of this act).

Sec.
22. RCW
43.21C.065 and 1992 c 219 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person required to pay an impact fee for system improvements pursuant to RCW
82.02.050 through 82.02.090 shall not be required to pay a fee pursuant to RCW
43.21C.060 for those same system improvements. A person with a residential
development located within a city or county in which a transportation
improvement district is established under chapter 81.-- RCW (sections 1 through
15 of this act) is not required to pay a fee pursuant to RCW 43.21C.060 for
transportation system improvements.

Sec.
23. RCW
58.17.110 and 1995 c 32 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The city, town, or county legislative body shall inquire into the public use
and interest proposed to be served by the establishment of the subdivision and
dedication. It shall determine: (a) If appropriate provisions are made for,
but not limited to, the public health, safety, and general welfare, for open
spaces, drainage ways, streets or roads, alleys, other public ways, transit
stops, potable water supplies, sanitary wastes, parks and recreation,
playgrounds, schools and schoolgrounds, and shall consider all other relevant
facts, including sidewalks and other planning features that assure safe walking
conditions for students who only walk to and from school; and (b) whether the
public interest will be served by the subdivision and dedication.

(2)
A proposed subdivision and dedication shall not be approved unless the city, town,
or county legislative body makes written findings that: (a) Appropriate
provisions are made for the public health, safety, and general welfare and for
such open spaces, drainage ways, streets or roads, alleys, other public ways,
transit stops, potable water supplies, sanitary wastes, parks and recreation,
playgrounds, schools and schoolgrounds and all other relevant facts, including
sidewalks and other planning features that assure safe walking conditions for
students who only walk to and from school; and (b) the public use and interest
will be served by the platting of such subdivision and dedication. If it finds
that the proposed subdivision and dedication make such appropriate provisions
and that the public use and interest will be served, then the legislative body
shall approve the proposed subdivision and dedication. Dedication of land to
any public body, provision of public improvements to serve the subdivision,
and/or impact fees imposed under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 may be
required as a condition of subdivision approval, however, impact fees shall
not be imposed or transportation improvements required as a condition of
subdivision approval in a city or county in which a transportation improvement
district is established under chapter 81.-- RCW (sections 1 through 15 of this
act). Dedications shall be clearly shown on the final plat. No
dedication, provision of public improvements, or impact fees imposed under RCW
82.02.050 through 82.02.090 shall be allowed that constitutes an unconstitutional
taking of private property. The legislative body shall not as a condition to
the approval of any subdivision require a release from damages to be procured
from other property owners.

(3)
If the preliminary plat includes a dedication of a public park with an area of
less than two acres and the donor has designated that the park be named in
honor of a deceased individual of good character, the city, town, or county
legislative body must adopt the designated name.

Sec.
24. RCW
82.02.050 and 1994 c 257 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is the intent of the legislature:

(a)
To ensure that adequate facilities are available to serve new growth and
development;

(b)
To promote orderly growth and development by establishing standards by which
counties, cities, and towns may require, by ordinance, that new growth and
development pay a proportionate share of the cost of new facilities needed to
serve new growth and development; and

(c)
To ensure that impact fees are imposed through established procedures and
criteria so that specific developments do not pay arbitrary fees or duplicative
fees for the same impact.

(2)
Counties, cities, and towns that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 are authorized to impose impact fees on development activity as part
of the financing for public facilities, provided that the financing for system
improvements to serve new development must provide for a balance between impact
fees and other sources of public funds and cannot rely solely on impact fees.

(3)
The impact fees:

(a)
Shall only be imposed for system improvements that are reasonably related to
the new development;

(b)
Shall not exceed a proportionate share of the costs of system improvements that
are reasonably related to the new development; and

(c)
Shall be used for system improvements that will reasonably benefit the new
development.

(4)
Impact fees may be collected and spent only for the public facilities defined
in RCW 82.02.090 which are addressed by a capital facilities plan element of a
comprehensive land use plan adopted pursuant to the provisions of RCW
36.70A.070 or the provisions for comprehensive plan adoption contained in
chapter 36.70, 35.63, or 35A.63 RCW. After the date a county, city, or town is
required to adopt its development regulations under chapter 36.70A RCW,
continued authorization to collect and expend impact fees shall be contingent
on the county, city, or town adopting or revising a comprehensive plan in
compliance with RCW 36.70A.070, and on the capital facilities plan identifying:

(a)
Deficiencies in public facilities serving existing development and the means by
which existing deficiencies will be eliminated within a reasonable period of
time;

(b)
Additional demands placed on existing public facilities by new development; and

(c)
Additional public facility improvements required to serve new development.

If
the capital facilities plan of the county, city, or town is complete other than
for the inclusion of those elements which are the responsibility of a special
district, the county, city, or town may impose impact fees to address those
public facility needs for which the county, city, or town is responsible.

(5)
Impact fees shall not be imposed upon residential development activity by a
city or county within which a transportation improvement district is
established under chapter 81.-- RCW (sections 1 through 15 of this act).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
39.88.010 (Declaration) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 2;

(2) RCW
39.88.020 (Definitions) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 3;

(3) RCW
39.88.030 (Authority--Limitations) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 4;

(4) RCW
39.88.040 (Procedure for adoption of public improvement) and 1982
1st ex.s. c 42 s 5;

(5) RCW
39.88.050 (Notice of public improvement) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42
s 6;

(6) RCW
39.88.060 (Disagreements between taxing districts) and 1989 c 378
s 1 & 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 7;

(7) RCW
39.88.070 (Apportionment of taxes) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 8;

(8) RCW
39.88.080 (Application of tax allocation revenues) and 1982 1st
ex.s. c 42 s 9;

(9) RCW
39.88.090 (General obligation bonds) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s
10;

(10) RCW
39.88.100 (Tax allocation bonds) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 11;

(11) RCW
39.88.110 (Legal investments) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 13;

(12) RCW
39.88.120 (Notice to state) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 14;

(13) RCW
39.88.130 (Conclusive presumption of validity) and 1982 1st ex.s.
c 42 s 15;

(14) RCW
39.88.900 (Supplemental nature of chapter) and 1982 1st ex.s. c
42 s 16;

(15) RCW
39.88.905 (Short title) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 1;

(16) RCW
39.88.910 (Captions not part of law--1982 1st ex.s. c 42) and
1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 17;

(17) RCW
39.88.915 (Severability--1982 1st ex.s. c 42) and 1982 1st ex.s.
c 42 s 18; and

(18) RCW
84.55.080 (Adjustment to tax limitation) and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42
s 12.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 26.
Sections 1 through 15 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 81 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 27. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28. If
sections 21 through 24 of this act are vetoed, this act is null and void.

---
END ---