BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.86A.030 and 1993 c 512 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Funds held in public depositaries not as demand deposits as provided in RCW
43.86A.020 and 43.86A.030, shall be available for a time certificate of deposit
investment program according to the following formula: The state treasurer
shall apportion to all participating depositaries an amount equal to five
percent of the three year average mean of general state revenues as certified
in accordance with Article VIII, section 1(b) of the state Constitution, or
fifty percent of the total surplus treasury investment availability, whichever
is less. Within thirty days after certification, those funds determined to be
available according to this formula for the time certificate of deposit
investment program shall be deposited in qualified public depositaries. These
deposits shall be allocated among the participating depositaries on a basis to
be determined by the state treasurer.

(2)
The state treasurer may use up to fifty million dollars per year of all funds
available under this section for the purposes of RCW 43.86A.060. The amounts
made available to these public depositaries shall be equal to the amounts of
outstanding loans made under RCW 43.86A.060.

(3)
In addition to the funds in subsection (2) of this section, the state
treasurer may use up to twenty million dollars per year of all funds available
under this section for the purposes of section 2 of this act. The amounts made
available to these public depositaries shall be equal to the amounts of
outstanding loans made under section 2 of this act.

(4)
The formula so devised shall be a matter of public record giving consideration
to, but not limited to deposits, assets, loans, capital structure, investments
or some combination of these factors. However, if in the judgment of the state
treasurer the amount of allocation for certificates of deposit as determined by
this section will impair the cash flow needs of the state treasury, the state
treasurer may adjust the amount of the allocation accordingly.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.86A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to the linked deposit program under RCW 43.86A.060, the state
treasurer shall establish a linked deposit program for investment of deposits
in qualified public depositaries for dislocated workers. As a condition of
participating in the program under this section, qualified public depositaries
must make qualifying loans as provided in this section. The state treasurer
may purchase a certificate of deposit that is equal to the amount of the
qualifying loan made by the qualified public depositary or may purchase a
certificate of deposit that is equal to the aggregate amount of two or more
qualifying loans made by one or more qualified public depositaries.

(2)
Qualifying loans made under this section are those that:

(a)
Are loans that have terms that do not exceed ten years;

(b)
Are made to a dislocated worker as defined under RCW 50.04.075 and certified as
such by the employment security department;

(c)
Are loans that do not exceed twenty-two times the qualified individual's
insurance weekly benefit amount as determined by the employment security
department;

(d)
Are loans for education or retraining;

(e)
Are made where the interest rate on the loan to the dislocated worker does not
exceed an interest rate that is two hundred basis points below the interest
rate the qualified public depositary would charge for a loan for a similar
purpose and a similar term; and

(f)
Are made where the points or fees charged at loan closing do not exceed one
percent of the loan amount.

(3)
In setting interest rates of time certificates of deposit, the state treasurer
shall offer rates so that a two hundred basis point preference will be given to
the qualified public depositary.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.86A.070 and 1993 c 512 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The state and those acting as its agents are not liable in any
manner for payment of the principal or interest on qualifying loans made under
RCW 43.86A.060 or section 2 of this act. Any delay in payments or
defaults on the part of the borrower does not in any manner affect the deposit
agreement between the qualified public depositary and the state treasurer.

---
END ---