BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.61.440 and 1997 c 80 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to RCW 46.61.400(1), and except in those instances where a lower
maximum lawful speed is provided by this chapter or otherwise, it shall be
unlawful for the operator of any vehicle to operate the same at a speed in
excess of twenty miles per hour when operating any vehicle upon a highway
either inside or outside an incorporated city or town when passing any marked
school or playground crosswalk when (a) such marked crosswalk is fully
posted with standard school speed limit signs or standard playground speed
limit signs or (b) children having unencumbered movement are present at the
roadside. The speed zone at the crosswalk shall extend three hundred feet
in either direction from the marked crosswalk.

(2)
A person found to have committed any infraction relating to speed restrictions
within a school or playground speed zone shall be assessed a monetary penalty
equal to twice the penalty assessed under RCW 46.63.110. This penalty may not
be waived, reduced, or suspended.

(3) The school zone safety account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. Fifty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (2) of
this section shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only by the Washington traffic safety commission solely to
fund projects in local communities to improve school zone safety, pupil
transportation safety, and student safety in school bus loading and unloading
areas. Only the director of the traffic safety commission or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject
to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for expenditures until July 1, 1999, after which date moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation.

---
END ---