BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Affordable and accessible housing is of great concern and importance to the
legislature and the people of this state. The legislature recognizes the
important role housing authorities serve in creating and maintaining housing
for low-income persons and senior citizens. The legislature finds that tribal
housing authorities should be afforded the same exemptions from tax as all
other housing authorities and extends the exemption from state and local tax to
tribal housing authorities.

Sec.
2. RCW
35.82.210 and 1965 c 7 s 35.82.210 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The property of an authority is declared to be public property used for
essential public and governmental purposes and such property and an authority
shall be exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the city, the county,
the state or any political subdivision thereof: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in
lieu of such taxes an authority may agree to make payments to the city or the
county or any such political subdivision for improvements, services and
facilities furnished by such city, county or political subdivision for the
benefit of a housing project, but in no event shall such payments exceed the
amount last levied as the annual tax of such city, county or political subdivision
upon the property included in said project prior to the time of its acquisition
by the authority.

(2)
For the sole purpose of the exemption from tax under this section:

(a)
"Authority," in addition to the meaning in RCW 35.82.020, also means
tribal housing authorities and intertribal housing authorities.

(b)
"Intertribal housing authority" means a housing authority created by
a consortium of tribal governments to operate and administer housing programs
for persons of low income or senior citizens for and on behalf of such tribes.

(c)
"Tribal government" means the governing body of a federally
recognized Indian tribe.

(d)
"Tribal housing authority" means the tribal government or an agency
or branch of the tribal government that operates and administers housing
programs for persons of low income or senior citizens.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---