BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.09.170 and 1995 c 166 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
From time to time, but at least once each year, the state treasurer shall
refund from the ((motor vehicle)) general fund an amount
equivalent to one percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected
under chapter 82.36 RCW, based on the tax rate in effect January 1, 1990, less
proper deductions for refunds and costs of collection as provided in RCW
46.68.090. The treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as
follows:

(a)
Forty percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and
administered by the department of natural resources solely for planning,
maintenance, and management of ORV recreation facilities, nonhighway roads, and
nonhighway road recreation facilities. The funds under this subsection shall
be expended in accordance with the following limitations:

(i)
Not more than five percent may be expended for information programs under this
chapter;

(ii)
Not less than ten percent and not more than fifty percent may be expended for
ORV recreation facilities;

(iii)
Not more than twenty-five percent may be expended for maintenance of nonhighway
roads;

(iv)
Not more than fifty percent may be expended for nonhighway road recreation
facilities;

(v)
Ten percent shall be transferred to the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation for grants to law enforcement agencies in those counties where the
department of natural resources maintains ORV facilities. This amount is in
addition to those distributions made by the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation under (d)(i) of this subsection;

(b)
Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the department of fish and wildlife solely for the
acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management of nonhighway
roads and recreation facilities;

(c)
Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and
administered by the parks and recreation commission solely for the maintenance
and management of ORV use areas and facilities; and

(d)
Fifty-four and one-half percent, together with the funds received by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation under RCW 46.09.110, shall be
credited to the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to
be administered by the committee for planning, acquisition, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV recreation facilities and nonhighway road
recreation facilities; ORV user education and information; and ORV law
enforcement programs. The funds under this subsection shall be expended in
accordance with the following limitations:

(i)
Not more than twenty percent may be expended for ORV education, information,
and law enforcement programs under this chapter;

(ii)
Not less than an amount equal to the funds received by the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation under RCW 46.09.110 and not more than sixty
percent may be expended for ORV recreation facilities;

(iii)
Not more than twenty percent may be expended for nonhighway road recreation
facilities.

(2) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.09.110, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under this
chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying out this
chapter.

---
END ---