BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature to establish a long-term revenue source by
providing the matching of taxes already being collected by the state to the
users of the state's transportation systems. The revenue will be collected
from taxes being paid on transportation-related activities and then directed to
transportation improvement projects. This will provide a revenue stream that
can be used for transportation projects or to pay bond obligations that are issued
for transportation improvements that will benefit the end users.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall deposit into the motor vehicle fund all revenue received from
taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the sale of, use of,
repair of, lease of, or any charge made for:

(1)
Motor vehicles, vehicles, trailers, travel trailers as defined in RCW
46.04.623, campers as defined in RCW 46.04.085, and semitrailers used, or of
the type designed primarily to be used, upon the public streets and highways,
for the convenience or pleasure of the owner, or for the conveyance, for hire
or otherwise, of persons or property, including fixed loads and facilities for
human habitation; but not including (a) dock and warehouse tractors and their
cars or trailers, lumber carriers of the type known as spiders, and all other
automotive equipment not designed primarily for use upon public streets or
highways, (b) motor vehicles or their trailers used entirely upon private
property, or (c) mobile homes as defined in RCW 46.04.302;

(2)
Building, repairing, or improving of, or ingredients, including all materials,
labor, equipment, contracts, and components used for, any publicly owned
street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, signing, tunnel, or
trestle as described in RCW 82.04.050; and

(3)
Construction, improvement, equipment, components, or repair of a ferry, ferry
terminal, or other facility operated by the Washington State Ferries or for the
repair, overhaul, or the dry-docking of any ferry operated by Washington State
Ferries.

Subsection
(1) of this section will be implemented over the next five fiscal years
beginning July 1, 2000, at twenty percent of the tax imposed under chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW, with an increase of twenty percent per year until one
hundred percent is reached in the fifth fiscal year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---