BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.150.250 and 1990 c 33 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

From
those funds made available by the legislature for the current use of the common
schools, the superintendent of public instruction shall distribute annually as
provided in RCW 28A.510.250 to each school district of the state operating a
program approved by the state board of education an amount which((, when
combined with an appropriate portion of such locally available revenues, other
than receipts from federal forest revenues distributed to school districts
pursuant to RCW 28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020, as the superintendent of public
instruction may deem appropriate for consideration in computing state
equalization support, excluding excess property tax levies,)) will
constitute a basic education allocation in dollars for each annual average full
time equivalent student enrolled, based upon one full school year of one
hundred eighty days, except that for kindergartens one full school year shall
be one hundred eighty half days of instruction, or the equivalent as provided
in RCW 28A.150.220.

Basic
education shall be considered to be fully funded by those amounts of dollars
appropriated by the legislature pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 to
fund those program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 in accordance
with the formula and ratios provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and those amounts of
dollars appropriated by the legislature to fund the salary requirements of RCW
28A.150.100 and 28A.150.410.

Operation
of a program approved by the state board of education, for the purposes of this
section, shall include a finding that the ratio of students per classroom
teacher in grades kindergarten through three is not greater than the ratio of
students per classroom teacher in grades four and above for such district:
PROVIDED, That for the purposes of this section, "classroom teacher"
shall be defined as an instructional employee possessing at least a provisional
certificate, but not necessarily employed as a certificated employee, whose
primary duty is the daily educational instruction of students: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the state board of education shall adopt rules and regulations to
insure compliance with the student/teacher ratio provisions of this section,
and such rules and regulations shall allow for exemptions for those special
programs and/or school districts which may be deemed unable to practicably meet
the student/teacher ratio requirements of this section by virtue of a small
number of students.

If
a school district's basic education program fails to meet the basic education
requirements enumerated in RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.220, the
state board of education shall require the superintendent of public instruction
to withhold state funds in whole or in part for the basic education allocation
until program compliance is assured: PROVIDED, That the state board of
education may waive this requirement in the event of substantial lack of
classroom space.

Sec.
2. RCW
76.12.120 and 1998 c 71 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

All
land, acquired or designated by the department as state forest land, shall be
forever reserved from sale, but the timber and other products thereon may be
sold or the land may be leased in the same manner and for the same purposes as
is authorized for state granted land if the department finds such sale or lease
to be in the best interests of the state and approves the terms and conditions
thereof.

Except
as provided in RCW 79.12.035, all money derived from the sale of timber or
other products, or from lease, or from any other source from the land, except
where the Constitution of this state or RCW 76.12.030 requires other
disposition, shall be disposed of as follows:

(1)
Fifty percent shall be placed in the forest development account.

(2) Fifty percent shall be prorated and distributed to the state
general fund, to be dedicated for the benefit of the public schools, and the
county in which the land is located according to the relative proportions of
tax levies of all taxing districts in the county. The portion to be
distributed to the state general fund shall be based on the regular school levy
rate under RCW 84.52.065 ((as now or hereafter amended and the levy rate for
any maintenance and operation special school levies)). With regard to the
portion to be distributed to the counties, the department shall certify to the
state treasurer the amounts to be distributed within seven working days of
receipt of the money. The state treasurer shall distribute funds to the
counties four times per month, with no more than ten days between each payment
date. The money distributed to the county shall be paid, distributed, and
prorated to the various other funds in the same manner as general taxes are
paid and distributed during the year of payment.

---
END ---