BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that parents and teachers desire smaller class sizes. The
legislature also finds that school districts use class size reduction funding
for other purposes. Therefore the legislature intends to require school
districts to maintain class sizes that are not larger than those funded by the
legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

Any district that receives money in the omnibus appropriations act to
achieve a particular student-teacher ratio for any grade level must achieve and
maintain a student-teacher ratio for that grade level that does not exceed the
ratio specified in the appropriation for the duration of the appropriation.

---
END ---