BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the program of assertive community treatment is an
effective service delivery model of comprehensive community treatment,
rehabilitation, and support services for people with severe and persistent
mental illness. The intensive nature of the services combined with a team
approach has proven effective in reducing inpatient psychiatric
hospitalization, homelessness, and incarceration for hard-to-serve populations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Recognizing that other states have demonstrated program of assertive community
treatment effectiveness through pilot projects, the legislature directs the
secretary of the department of social and health services to contract one
million dollars for a pilot program of assertive community treatment to be
administered by a county with: (1) A willing provider who has facilities and
services appropriate for the project; (2) an estimated population of
approximately one hundred sixty-one thousand as of April 1, 1999; and (3)
estimated involuntary treatment act commitment investigations of seven hundred
one for 1999. This contract is contingent upon the explicit allocation of
matching funds by the county of an additional one million dollars.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
Washington institute for public policy is directed to complete a study of the
effectiveness of the pilot project of program of assertive community treatment
administered by the county designated under section 2 of this act. The study
shall track the people receiving program of assertive community treatment
services, comparing their usage of inpatient psychiatric hospital bed days,
homelessness, incarceration, and other measures to be developed, prior to
receiving program of assertive community treatment services and after receiving
program of assertive community treatment services for one year. The study must
be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1,
2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund to the mental health division of the
department of social and health services for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2001, to carry out the purposes of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
sum of two hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund to the Washington institute for public policy
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, to carry out the purposes of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire December 31, 2001.

---
END ---