BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department of revenue shall determine the number of gallons of motor
vehicle fuel and special fuel sold within each county that has a population
greater than five hundred thousand.

(2)
Businesses engaged in the retail sale of motor vehicle fuel, or special fuel as
defined in RCW 82.38.020, located within counties subject to subsection (1) of
this section, shall report the number of gallons sold each month to the
department of revenue.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.36 RCW to read as follows:

Each
quarter of the calendar year, the department of revenue shall report the number
of gallons of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel sold within the counties
meeting the requirements of section 1(1) of this act to the department of
transportation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of transportation shall expend motor vehicle fund revenues
attributed to counties under sections 1 and 2 of this act within the boundaries
of those counties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act expires June 30, 2005.

---
END ---