BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature intends that federal funding allocated to the state first be
used for debt service on the bonds authorized in section 2 of this act, known
as "Garvee bonds." The legislature also intends that the bonds
authorized in section 2 of this act serve as bridge financing for the state's
transportation system until a more comprehensive funding package is approved.

(2)
This section expires July 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 47.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In order to provide funds necessary for the location, design, right of way, and
construction of state highway improvements, there shall be issued and sold upon
the request of the Washington state transportation commission a total of one
billion dollars of general obligation bonds of the state of Washington.

(2)
The department of transportation is authorized to spend no more than eighty
million dollars per year on the repayment of any bonds issued under subsection
(1) of this section.

(3) These bonds are backed by the full faith and credit of the
state of Washington, the motor fuel tax revenues, and by the allocation of
federal funds as authorized by congress under the transportation efficiency act
for the 21st century.

---
END ---