BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature intends to further the government-to-government relationship
between the state of Washington and Indians in the state of Washington by
authorizing the governor to enter into cooperative agreements concerning the
sale of cigarettes. The legislature finds that these agreements will provide a
means to promote economic development, provide needed revenues for tribal
governments and Indian persons, and enhance enforcement of the state's
cigarette tax law, ultimately saving the state money and reducing conflict.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The governor may enter into cooperative agreements concerning the sale of
cigarettes. All cooperative agreements shall meet the requirements for
cooperative agreements under this section. Except for cooperative agreements
under section 3 of this act, the rates, revenue sharing, and exemption terms of
a cooperative agreement are not effective unless authorized in a bill enacted
by the legislature.

(2)
Cooperative agreements shall be in regard to retail sales in which Indian
retailers make delivery and physical transfer of possession of the cigarettes
from the seller to the buyer within the Indian lands. In addition, cooperative
agreements shall provide that retailers shall not sell or give, or permit to be
sold or given, cigarettes to any person under the age of eighteen years.

(3)
A cooperative agreement with a tribe shall provide for a tribal cigarette tax
in lieu of all state cigarette taxes and state and local sales and use taxes on
sales of cigarettes on Indian lands by Indian retailers. The tribe may allow
an exemption for sales to tribal members.

(4)
Cooperative agreements shall provide that all cigarettes possessed or sold by a
retailer shall bear a cigarette stamp obtained by wholesalers from a bank or
other suitable stamp vendor and applied to the cigarettes.

(5)
Cooperative agreements shall provide that retailers shall purchase cigarettes
only from:

(a)
Wholesalers or manufacturers licensed to do business in the state of
Washington;

(b)
Out-of-state wholesalers or manufacturers who, although not licensed to do
business in the state of Washington, agree to comply with the terms of the
cooperative agreement, are certified to the state as having so agreed, and who
do in fact so comply. However, the state may in its sole discretion exercise
its administrative and enforcement powers over such wholesalers or
manufacturers to the extent permitted by law;

(c)
A tribal wholesaler that purchases only from a wholesaler or manufacturer
described in (a), (b), or (d) of this subsection; and

(d)
A tribal manufacturer.

(6)
Cooperative agreements shall be for renewable periods of no more than eight
years. A renewal may not include a renewal of the phase-in period.

(7)
Cooperative agreements shall include provisions for compliance.

(8)
Tax revenue retained by a tribe must be used for essential government
services. Use of tax revenue for subsidization of cigarette and food retailers
is prohibited.

(9)
Cooperative agreements may provide for the submission of disputes regarding the
interpretation and administration of their provisions for judicial resolution,
and, if such submissions are agreed, shall include provision for a limited
waiver of sovereign immunity and consent by the state for the resolution
conditioned upon a similar limited waiver of sovereign immunity by the other
parties to the agreement.

(10)
The governor may delegate the power to negotiate cooperative agreements to the
department of revenue.

(11)
Information received by the state or open to state review under the terms of an
agreement is subject to the provisions of RCW 82.32.330.

(12)
For purposes of this section and sections 3 through 6 of this act:

(a)
"Essential government services" means services such as tribal
administration, public facilities, fire, police, public health, education, job
services, sewer, water, environmental and land use, transportation, utility
services, and economic development;

(b)
"Indian lands" means all land within the exterior boundaries of a
reservation and land held in trust for a tribe or Indian person by the United
States;

(c)
"Indian retailer" or "retailer" means (i) a retailer wholly
owned and operated by an Indian tribe, (ii) a business wholly owned and
operated by a tribal member and licensed by the tribe, or (iii) a business
owned and operated by the Indian person or persons in whose name the land is
held in trust; and

(d)
"Indian tribe" or "tribe" means a federally recognized
Indian tribe located within the geographical boundaries of the state of
Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The governor is authorized to enter into cooperative agreements with the
Squaxin Island Tribe, the Nisqually Tribe, Tulalip Tribes, and the Muckleshoot
Indian Tribe. Each agreement adopted under this section shall provide that the
tribal cigarette tax rate be one hundred percent of the state cigarette and
state and local sales and use taxes within three years of enacting the tribal
tax and shall be set no lower than eighty percent of the state cigarette and
state and local sales and use taxes during the three-year phase-in period. The
three-year phase-in period shall be shortened by three months each quarter the
number of cartons of nontribal manufactured cigarettes is ten percent or
more than the quarterly average number of cartons of nontribal manufactured
cigarettes from the six-month period preceding the imposition of the tribal tax
under the agreement. Sales at a retailer operation not in existence as of the
date a tribal tax under this section is imposed are subject to the full rate of
the tribal tax under the agreement. The tribal cigarette tax is in lieu of the
state cigarette and state and local sales and use taxes, as provided in section
2(3) of this act.

(2)
A cooperative agreement under this section is subject to section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of cigarettes by an Indian
retailer during the effective period of a cooperative agreement subject to
section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of cigarettes
sold by an Indian retailer during the effective period of a cooperative
agreement subject to section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 82.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter does not apply to the sale, use, consumption, handling,
possession, or distribution of cigarettes by an Indian retailer during the
effective period of a cooperative agreement subject to section 2 of this act.

(2)
Effective July 1, 2001, wholesalers and retailers subject to the provisions of
this chapter shall be allowed compensation for their services in affixing the
stamps required under this chapter a sum computed at the rate of six dollars
per one thousand stamps purchased or affixed by them.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. RCW
82.24.070 (Compensation of dealers), as now or hereafter amended,
and 1987 c 496 s 5, 1987 c 80 s 2, 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 14, 1965 ex.s. c 173 s
24, 1961 ex.s. c 24 s 4, & 1961 c 15 s 82.24.070 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Section 7 of this act takes effect July 1, 2001.

---
END ---