BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that chiropractors suffer from unfair treatment from
insurance companies in comparison with other health care providers.
Specifically, insurance companies often use the process of an independent
medical examination to limit an insured's use of chiropractic health services.
The legislature finds that this practice is against public policy and that
chiropractors provide a valuable service to the public.

Sec.
2. RCW
48.22.085 and 1993 c 242 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No new automobile liability insurance policy or renewal of such an existing
policy may be issued unless personal injury protection coverage benefits at
limits established in this chapter for medical and hospital expenses, funeral
expenses, income continuation, and loss of services sustained by an insured
because of bodily injury caused by an automobile accident are offered as an
optional coverage.

(2)
A named insured may reject, in writing, personal injury protection coverage and
the requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply. If a named
insured has rejected personal injury protection coverage, that rejection shall
be valid and binding as to all levels of coverage and on all persons who might
have otherwise been insured under such coverage. If a named insured has
rejected personal injury protection coverage, such coverage shall not be
included in any supplemental, renewal, or replacement policy unless a named
insured subsequently requests such coverage in writing.

(3) Any insured person who submits to an independent medical
examination for a chiropractic care condition, and who receives a report
concerning the independent medical examination for a chiropractic condition
that he or she feels is incorrect or unwarranted, may appeal the finding of the
examination with the commissioner's office. The commissioner or his or her
designee shall take such action as is necessary to review each appealed case,
and issue a determination within thirty days of the receipt of the appeal. The
commissioner or his or her designee must issue a determination that finds that
the results of the independent medical examination are valid, and deny the
appeal, or issue a determination that the results of the independent medical examination
are incorrect, and allow the insured person to continue to receive covered
chiropractic care for an additional six months. The commissioner may adopt
rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.

---
END ---