BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.94.521 and 1997 c 250 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that automotive traffic in Washington's metropolitan areas is
the major source of emissions of air contaminants. This air pollution causes
significant harm to public health, causes damage to trees, plants, structures,
and materials and degrades the quality of the environment.

Increasing
automotive traffic is also aggravating traffic congestion in Washington's
metropolitan areas. This traffic congestion imposes significant costs on
Washington's businesses, governmental agencies, and individuals in terms of
lost working hours and delays in the delivery of goods and services. Traffic
congestion worsens automobile-related air pollution, increases the consumption
of fuel, and degrades the habitability of many of Washington's cities and suburban
areas. The capital and environmental costs of fully accommodating the existing
and projected automobile traffic on roads and highways are prohibitive.
Decreasing the demand for vehicle trips is significantly less costly and at
least as effective in reducing traffic congestion and its impacts as
constructing new transportation facilities such as roads and bridges, to
accommodate increased traffic volumes.

The
legislature also finds that increasing automotive transportation is a major
factor in increasing consumption of gasoline and, thereby, increasing reliance
on imported sources of petroleum. Moderating the growth in automotive travel
is essential to stabilizing and reducing dependence on imported petroleum and
improving the nation's energy security.

The
legislature further finds that reducing the number of commute trips to work
made via single-occupant cars and light trucks is an effective way of reducing
automobile-related air pollution, traffic congestion, and energy use. Major
employers have significant opportunities to encourage and facilitate reducing
single-occupant vehicle commuting by employees. In addition, the legislature
also recognizes the importance of increasing individual citizens' awareness of
air quality, energy consumption, and traffic congestion, and the contribution
individual actions can make towards addressing these issues.

The
intent of this chapter is to require ((local governments)) employers
in those counties experiencing the greatest automobile-related air pollution and
traffic congestion to develop and implement plans to reduce single-occupant
vehicle commute trips. Such plans shall require major employers and employers
at major worksites to implement programs to reduce single-occupant vehicle
commuting by employees at major worksites. Local governments in counties
experiencing significant but less severe automobile-related air pollution and
traffic congestion may implement such plans. State agencies shall implement
programs to reduce single-occupant vehicle commuting at all major worksites
throughout the state.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.94.527 and 1997 c 250 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each county with a population over one hundred fifty thousand, and each city or
town within those counties containing a major employer shall, by October 1,
1992, ((adopt by ordinance and implement)) review and approve a
commute trip reduction plan ((for)) that is developed by all
major employers. The plan shall be developed by major employers and employers
at major worksites in cooperation with local transit agencies((,)) and
regional transportation planning organizations as established in RCW
47.80.020((, major employers, and the owners of and employers at major
worksites)). The plan shall be designed to achieve reductions in the
proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute trip
vehicle miles traveled per employee by employees of major public and private
sector employers in the jurisdiction.

(2)
All other counties, and cities and towns in those counties, may ((adopt and
implement)) review and approve a commute trip reduction plan proposed
by major employers or employers at major worksites within their jurisdictions.

(3)
The department of ecology may, after consultation with the department of
transportation, as part of the state implementation plan for areas that do not
attain the national ambient air quality standards for carbon monoxide or ozone,
require ((municipalities)) employers other than those identified
in subsection (1) of this section to adopt and implement commute trip reduction
plans if the department determines that such plans are necessary for attainment
of said standards.

(4)
A commute trip reduction plan shall be consistent with the guidelines
established under RCW 70.94.537 and shall include but is not limited to (a)
goals for reductions in the proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips
and the commute trip vehicle miles traveled per employee; (b) designation of
commute trip reduction zones; (c) requirements by the department of
transportation for major public and private sector employers to implement
commute trip reduction programs; (d) a commute trip reduction program for
employees of the county, city, or town; (e) ((a review of local parking
policies and ordinances as they relate to employers and major worksites and any
revisions necessary to comply with commute trip reduction goals and guidelines;
(f))) an appeals process by which major employers, who as a result of
special characteristics of their business or its locations would be unable to
((meet the requirements of a commute trip reduction plan)) obtain
approval of their plan after review by their local governmental entity, may
obtain waiver or modification of those requirements; and (((g))) (f)
means for determining base year values of the proportion of single-occupant
vehicle commute trips and the commute trip vehicle miles traveled per employee
and progress toward meeting commute trip reduction plan goals on an annual
basis. Goals which are established shall take into account existing
transportation demand management efforts which are made by major employers. ((Each
jurisdiction)) The department of transportation shall ensure that
employers shall receive full credit for the results of transportation demand
management efforts and commute trip reduction programs which have been
implemented by major employers prior to the base year. The goals for miles
traveled per employee for all major employers shall not be less than a fifteen
percent reduction from the worksite base year value or the base year value for
the commute trip reduction zone in which their worksite is located by January
1, 1995, twenty percent reduction from the base year values by January 1, 1997,
twenty-five percent reduction from the base year values by January 1, 1999, and
a thirty-five percent reduction from the base year values by January 1, 2005.

(5)
((A county, city, or town)) The department of transportation may,
as part of its commute trip reduction plan, require commute trip reduction
programs for employers with ten or more full time employees at major worksites
in federally designated nonattainment areas for carbon monoxide and ozone. The
((county, city or town)) department of transportation shall
develop the programs in cooperation with affected employers and provide
technical assistance to the employers in implementing such programs.

(6)
The commute trip reduction plans ((adopted)) approved by
counties, cities, and towns under this chapter shall be consistent with and may
be incorporated in applicable state or regional transportation plans and local
comprehensive plans and shall be coordinated, and consistent with, the commute
trip reduction plans of ((counties, cities, or towns with which the county,
city, or town has, in part, common borders or related regional issues. Such
regional issues shall include assuring consistency in the treatment of
employers who have worksites subject to the requirements of this chapter in
more than one jurisdiction. Counties, cities, or towns adopting commute trip
reduction plans may enter into agreements through the interlocal cooperation
act or by resolution or ordinance as appropriate with other jurisdictions,
local transit agencies, or regional transportation planning organizations to
coordinate the development and implementation of such plans)) the
department of transportation. Transit agencies shall work with ((counties,
cities, and towns)) major employers to take into account the
location of major employer worksites when planning transit service changes or
the expansion of public transportation services. ((Counties, cities, or
towns adopting a commute trip reduction plan shall review it annually and
revise it as necessary to be consistent with applicable plans developed under
RCW 36.70A.070.))

(7)
Each ((county, city, or town)) major employer or employer at a major
worksite implementing a commute trip reduction program shall((,))
within thirty days submit a summary of its plan along with certification of ((adoption))
approval to the commute trip reduction task force established under RCW
70.94.537.

(8)
((Each county, city, or town implementing a commute trip reduction program
shall submit an annual progress report to the commute trip reduction task force
established under RCW 70.94.537. The report shall be due July 1, 1994, and
each July 1st thereafter through July 1, 2006. The report shall describe
progress in attaining the applicable commute trip reduction goals for each commute
trip reduction zone and shall highlight any problems being encountered in
achieving the goals. The information shall be reported in a form established
by the commute trip reduction task force.

(9))) Any
waivers or modifications of the requirements of ((a)) an employer's
commute trip reduction plan ((granted)) approved by a
jurisdiction shall be submitted for review to the commute trip reduction task
force established under RCW 70.94.537. The commute trip reduction task force
may not deny the granting of a waiver or modification of the requirements of a
commute trip reduction plan by ((a jurisdiction)) an employer but
they may notify the ((jurisdiction)) employer of any comments or
objections.

(((10)))
(9) Each ((county, city, or town)) employer implementing a
commute trip reduction program shall count commute trips eliminated through
work-at-home options or alternate work schedules as one and two-tenths vehicle
trips eliminated for the purpose of meeting trip reduction goals.

(((11)))
(10) Each ((county, city, or town)) employer implementing
a commute trip reduction program shall ensure that ((employers that)) they
have modified their employees' work schedules so that some or all employees are
not scheduled to arrive at work between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. are provided
credit when calculating single-occupancy vehicle use and vehicle miles traveled
at that worksite. This credit shall be awarded if implementation of the
schedule change was an identified element in that worksite's approved commute
trip reduction program or if the schedule change occurred because of impacts
associated with chapter 36.70A RCW, the growth management act.

(((12)))
(11) Plans implemented under this section shall not apply to commute
trips for seasonal agricultural employees.

(((13)))
(12) Plans implemented under this section shall not apply to
construction worksites when the expected duration of the construction project
is less than two years.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.94.531 and 1997 c 250 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Not more than six months after the adoption of the commute trip reduction ((plan))
program by ((a jurisdiction)) the department of transportation,
each major employer ((in that jurisdiction)) shall develop a commute
trip reduction program and shall submit a description of that program to the local
jurisdiction for review and approval. The program shall be implemented
not more than six months after ((submission to)) approval by the local
jurisdiction.

(2)
A commute trip reduction program shall consist of, at a minimum (a) designation
of a transportation coordinator and the display of the name, location, and
telephone number of the coordinator in a prominent manner at each affected
worksite; (b) regular distribution of information to employees regarding
alternatives to single-occupant vehicle commuting; (c) an annual review of
employee commuting and reporting of progress toward meeting the single-occupant
vehicle reduction goals to the county, city, or town consistent with the method
established in the commute trip reduction plan; and (d) implementation of a set
of measures designed to achieve the applicable commute trip reduction goals
adopted by the ((jurisdiction)) department of transportation.
Such measures may include but are not limited to:

(i)
Provision of preferential parking or reduced parking charges, or both, for high
occupancy vehicles;

(ii)
Instituting or increasing parking charges for single-occupant vehicles;

(iii)
Provision of commuter ride matching services to facilitate employee ridesharing
for commute trips;

(iv)
Provision of subsidies for transit fares;

(v)
Provision of vans for van pools;

(vi)
Provision of subsidies for car pooling or van pooling;

(vii)
Permitting the use of the employer's vehicles for car pooling or van pooling;

(viii)
Permitting flexible work schedules to facilitate employees' use of transit, car
pools, or van pools;

(ix)
Cooperation with transportation providers to provide additional regular or
express service to the worksite;

(x)
Construction of special loading and unloading facilities for transit, car pool,
and van pool users;

(xi)
Provision of bicycle parking facilities, lockers, changing areas, and showers
for employees who bicycle or walk to work;

(xii)
Provision of a program of parking incentives such as a rebate for employees who
do not use the parking facility;

(xiii)
Establishment of a program to permit employees to work part or full time at
home or at an alternative worksite closer to their homes;

(xiv)
Establishment of a program of alternative work schedules such as compressed
work week schedules which reduce commuting; and

(xv)
Implementation of other measures designed to facilitate the use of
high-occupancy vehicles such as on-site day care facilities and emergency taxi
services.

(3)
Employers or owners of worksites may form or utilize existing transportation
management associations to assist members in developing and implementing
commute trip reduction programs.

(4)
Employers shall make a good faith effort towards achievement of the goals
identified in RCW 70.94.527(4)(((g))) (f).

Sec.
4. RCW
70.94.534 and 1997 c 250 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each local jurisdiction ((implementing a)) in which an
employer has implemented a commute trip reduction plan under this chapter
((or as part of a plan or ordinance developed under RCW 36.70A.070))
shall review and approve each employer's initial commute trip reduction
program to determine if the program is likely to meet the applicable commute
trip reduction goals. If the local jurisdiction approves the employer's
commute trip reduction plan, the employer shall forward the plan to the
department of transportation. The employer shall be notified by the local
jurisdiction of its ((findings)) approval or lack of approval.
If the local jurisdiction finds that the program is not likely to meet
the applicable commute trip reduction goals, the local jurisdiction will
notify the employer to work with the ((employer)) department
of transportation to modify the program as necessary. The local
jurisdiction shall complete review of each employer's initial commute trip
reduction program within three months of receipt.

(2)
Employers implementing commute trip reduction programs are expected to
undertake good faith efforts to achieve the goals outlined in RCW
70.94.527(4). Employers are considered to be making a good faith effort if the
following conditions have been met:

(a)
The employer has met the minimum requirements identified in RCW 70.94.531; and

(b)
The employer is working collaboratively with ((its jurisdiction)) the
department of transportation to continue its existing program or is
developing and implementing program modifications likely to result in
improvements to the program over an agreed upon length of time.

(3)
((Each jurisdiction)) The department of transportation shall
annually review each employer's progress and good faith efforts toward meeting
the applicable commute trip reduction goals. If an employer makes a good faith
effort, as defined in this section, but is not likely to meet the applicable
commute trip reduction goals, the ((jurisdiction)) department of
transportation shall work collaboratively with the employer to make
modifications to the commute trip reduction program. Failure of an employer to
reach the applicable commute trip reduction goals is not a violation of this
chapter.

(4)
If an employer fails to make a good faith effort and fails to meet the
applicable commute trip reduction goals, the ((jurisdiction)) department
of transportation shall work collaboratively with the employer to propose
modifications to the program and shall direct the employer to revise its
program within thirty days to incorporate those modifications or modifications
which the jurisdiction determines to be equivalent.

(5)
((Each jurisdiction implementing a commute trip reduction plan pursuant to
this chapter)) The department of transportation may impose civil
penalties, in the manner provided in chapter 7.80 RCW, for failure by an
employer to implement a commute trip reduction program or to modify its commute
trip reduction program as required in subsection (4) of this section. No major
employer may be held liable for civil penalties for failure to reach the
applicable commute trip reduction goals. No major employer shall be liable for
civil penalties under this chapter if failure to achieve a commute trip
reduction program goal was the result of an inability to reach agreement with a
certified collective bargaining agent under applicable laws where the issue was
raised by the employer and pursued in good faith.

(6)
((Jurisdictions)) The department of transportation shall notify
major employers of the procedures for applying for goal modification or
exemption from the commute trip reduction requirements based on the guidelines
established by the commute trip reduction task force.

Sec.
5. RCW
70.94.541 and 1996 c 186 s 515 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A technical assistance team shall be established under the direction of the
department of transportation and include representatives of the department of
ecology. The team shall provide staff support to the commute trip reduction
task force in carrying out the requirements of RCW 70.94.537 and to the department
of general administration in carrying out the requirements of RCW 70.94.551.

(2)
The team shall provide technical assistance to counties, cities, and towns, the
department of general administration, other state agencies, and other employers
in developing and implementing commute trip reduction ((plans and))
programs. The technical assistance shall include: (a) Guidance in determining
base and subsequent year values of single-occupant vehicle commuting proportion
and commute trip reduction vehicle miles traveled to be used in determining
progress in attaining plan goals; (b) developing model plans and programs
appropriate to different situations; and (c) providing consistent training and
informational materials for the implementation of commute trip reduction
programs. Model ((plans and)) programs, training and informational
materials shall be developed in cooperation with representatives of local
governments, transit agencies, and employers.

(((3)
In carrying out this section the department of transportation may contract with
state-wide associations representing cities, towns, and counties to assist
cities, towns, and counties in implementing commute trip reduction plans and
programs.))

Sec.
6. RCW
70.94.544 and 1991 c 202 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

A portion of the funds made available for the purposes of this
chapter shall be used to fund the commute trip reduction task force in carrying
out the responsibilities of RCW 70.94.541, and the interagency technical
assistance team, including the activities authorized under RCW 70.94.541(2),
and to assist employers, counties, cities, and towns implementing
commute trip reduction ((plans)) programs. ((Funds shall be
provided to the counties in proportion to the number of major employers and
major worksites in each county. The counties shall provide funds to cities and
towns within the county which are implementing commute trip reduction plans in
proportion to the number of major employers and major worksites within the city
or town.))

---
END ---