BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.40.197 and 1995 c 345 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Beginning July 1, 1995, and annually thereafter, the retirement allowance of a
person meeting the requirements of this section shall be increased by the
annual increase amount.

(2)
The following persons shall be eligible for the benefit provided in subsection
(1) of this section:

(a)
A beneficiary who has received a retirement allowance for at least one year by
July 1st in the calendar year in which the annual increase is given and has
attained at least age sixty-six by ((July 1st)) December 31st in
the calendar year in which the annual increase is given; or

(b)
A beneficiary whose retirement allowance is lower than the minimum benefit
provided under RCW 41.40.1984.

(3)
The following persons shall also be eligible for the benefit provided in
subsection (1) of this section:

(a)
A beneficiary receiving the minimum benefit on June 30, 1995, under RCW
41.40.198; or

(b)
A recipient of a survivor benefit on June 30, 1995, which has been increased by
RCW 41.40.325.

(4)
If otherwise eligible, those receiving an annual adjustment under RCW
41.40.188(1)(c) shall be eligible for the annual increase adjustment in
addition to the benefit that would have been received absent this section.

(5)
Those receiving a benefit under RCW 41.40.220(1), or a survivor of a disabled
member under RCW 41.44.170(5) shall be eligible for the benefit provided by
this section.

(6)
The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the
future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive this
postretirement adjustment not granted prior to that time.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.32.489 and 1995 c 345 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Beginning July 1, 1995, and annually thereafter, the retirement allowance of a
person meeting the requirements of this section shall be increased by the
annual increase amount.

(2)
The following persons shall be eligible for the benefit provided in subsection
(1) of this section:

(a)
A beneficiary who has received a retirement allowance for at least one year by
July 1st in the calendar year in which the annual increase is given and has
attained at least age sixty-six by ((July 1st)) December 31st in
the calendar year in which the annual increase is given; or

(b)
A beneficiary whose retirement allowance is lower than the minimum benefit
provided under RCW 41.32.4851.

(3)
The following persons shall also be eligible for the benefit provided in
subsection (1) of this section:

(a)
A beneficiary receiving the minimum benefit on June 30, 1995, under RCW
41.32.485; or

(b)
A recipient of a survivor benefit on June 30, 1995, which has been increased by
RCW 41.32.575.

(4)
If otherwise eligible, those receiving an annual adjustment under RCW
41.32.530(1)(d) shall be eligible for the annual increase adjustment in
addition to the benefit that would have been received absent this section.

(5)
Those receiving a temporary disability benefit under RCW 41.32.540 shall not be
eligible for the benefit provided by this section.

(6) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to
receive this postretirement adjustment not granted prior to that time.

---
END ---