BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.60.040 and 1993 c 457 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of criminal impersonation in the first degree if the person:

(a)
Assumes a false identity and does an act in his or her assumed character with
intent to defraud another or for any other unlawful purpose; or

(b)
Pretends to be a representative of some person or organization or a public
servant and does an act in his or her pretended capacity with intent to defraud
another or for any other unlawful purpose.

(2)
Criminal impersonation in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(3)
A person is guilty of criminal impersonation in the second degree if the
person:

(a)
Claims to be a law enforcement officer or creates an impression that he or she
is a law enforcement officer, or claims to be a representative of a
sheriff's office without the written approval of the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs; and

(b)
Under circumstances not amounting to criminal impersonation in the first degree,
does an act with intent to convey the impression that he or she is acting in an
official capacity and a reasonable person would believe the person is a law
enforcement officer or representing a sheriff's office.

(4) Criminal impersonation in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

---
END ---