BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.89.010 and 1993 sp.s. c 23 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

The
chief of the Washington state patrol ((is hereby authorized to)) may
establish a ((teletypewriter)) communications network ((which)) that
will inter-connect the law enforcement agencies of the state and its political
subdivisions into a unified ((written)) communications system. The
chief of the Washington state patrol ((is authorized to)) may
lease or purchase such facilities and equipment as may be necessary to
establish and maintain ((such teletypewriter)) the communications
network.

(1)
The communications network shall be used exclusively for the official business
of the state, and the official business of any city, county, city and county,
or other public agency.

(2)
This section does not prohibit the occasional use of the state's communications
network by any other state or public agency thereof when the messages
transmitted relate to the enforcement of the criminal laws of the state.

(3)
The chief of the Washington state patrol shall fix the monthly operational
charge to be paid by any department or agency of state government, or any city,
county, city and county, or other public agency participating in the
communications network((: PROVIDED, That)). In computing charges
to be made against a city, county, or city and county the state shall bear at
least fifty percent of the costs of ((such)) the service as its
share in providing a modern unified communications network to the law
enforcement agencies of the state. ((Of)) The fees collected
pursuant to this section((, one-half shall be deposited in the motor vehicle
fund and one-half shall be deposited in the transportation fund)) will
be deposited into the state patrol highway account.

(4) The chief of the Washington state patrol ((is authorized to))
may arrange for the connection of the communications network with the
law enforcement communications system of any adjacent state, or the province
of British Columbia, Canada.

---
END ---