BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
FINDINGS AND INTENT. The legislature finds that the public demands
that long‑term care services be client and family-centered, easy to
access, safe, and economically effective and efficient. To accomplish this,
the legislature recognizes the immediate need to administer and provide
long-term care services within the department of social and health services for
persons with chronic functional disabilities through a separate, integrated,
and comprehensive long-term care administration.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout sections 1 through 5 of this act.

(1)
"Administration" means the long-term care and rehabilitation services
administration in the department of social and health services.

(2)
"Functionally disabled person" is synonymous with chronic
functionally disabled and means a person who, because of a recognized chronic
physical condition or disease or acute or chronic mental condition or disease,
is impaired to the extent of being dependent upon others for direct care,
support, supervision, or monitoring to perform activities of daily living.
"Activities of daily living," in this context, means self-care
abilities related to personal care such as bathing, eating, using the toilet,
dressing, and transfer. Instrumental activities of daily living may also be
used to assess a person's functional abilities as they are related to the
mental capacity to perform activities in the home and the community such as
cooking, shopping, house cleaning, doing laundry, working, and managing
personal finances.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
No additional state employees may be hired as a result of establishing the
administration.

(2)
Any funds saved because of the elimination of management level positions within
the new administration must be redirected to direct long-term care services,
quality assurance, and complaint investigations provided by the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
OUTCOME MEASURES‑-DEVELOPMENT BENCHMARKS. The secretary shall develop
outcome measures for use in evaluating the long-term care and rehabilitation
services administration authorized in this act that include but are not limited
to:

(1)
Reducing current cost per person served by providing services more cost
effectively;

(2)
Developing specific procedures and plans within the administration that will
promote coordination and remove cross-administrative barriers and fragmentation
between the different administrative subelements;

(3)
Implementing a plan and procedures for a coordinated client and family
assessment;

(4)
Seeking and obtaining public and private alternative funding for long-term care
services;

(5)
Establishing a process for involving the meaningful participation of persons
with functional disabilities and their families, employees, vendors, community
advocates, and other federal, state, and local governmental entities in the
planning, development, and implementation of programs and services consistent
with the intent of this act;

(6)
Establishing a coordinated case management system that will equitably serve all
disability groups;

(7)
Implementing outcome-based quality standards that result in a measurable
improvement of reviews or inspections and provider compliance across all
long-term care programs; and

(8)
Conducting a comprehensive client survey to assess client satisfaction and to
identify specific areas where the new administration can improve effectiveness,
safety, and accessability of services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
ADVISORY COUNCIL ON LONG-TERM CARE INTEGRATION. The secretary shall appoint,
as soon as practical, but not later than July 1, 2000, an advisory council on
long-term care integration, hereafter referred to in this section as the
council.

The
council shall be composed of consumers and their family representatives,
providers of care, administrators, and advocates that reflect the departmental
programs that are being transferred to the administration. Members are to be
selected by the secretary. The assistant secretary of the administration shall
be the chair of the council.

The
council shall establish technical advisory panels composed of balanced
representation of all types of persons served by the administration to provide
expert technical assistance on matters necessary to implement this act.

The
council has the following duties:

(1)
Ensure that all appropriate interests participate in the departmental
integration activities;

(2)
Oversee the development, revision, implementation, and enforcement of all
quality assurance measures;

(3)
Report the following to the appropriate committees of the legislature, no later
than December 12, 2001:

(a)
Methods of cost-efficiencies that can be used to reallocate funds to unmet
needs in direct services;

(b)
Necessary modifications of the case management system and management
information systems to fully implement chapter . . ., Laws of 2000
(this act);

(c)
Federal waivers necessary to implement chapter . . ., Laws of 2000
(this act); and

(d)
Recommended legislation necessary to implement changes proposed by the council
to the appropriate legislative committees.

The
department shall make the council recommendations available to the public.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
FUNCTIONS TRANSFERRED TO THE LONG-TERM CARE AND REHABILITATION SERVICES
ADMINISTRATION. The department shall establish a long-term care and
rehabilitation services administration. The department shall transfer the
following programs and services and related management and support services to
the long-term care and rehabilitation services administration. The secretary
shall determine how to administratively coordinate any programs and services
that remain within the health and rehabilitative services administration:

Title
71 RCW - Mental illness programs;

Title
71A RCW - Developmental disabilities;

Chapter
72.06 RCW - Mental health;

Chapter
72.23 RCW - Public and private facilities for mentally ill;

Chapter
72.29 RCW - Multi-use facilities for the mentally or physically handicapped or
the mentally ill;

Chapter
70.10 RCW - Comprehensive community health centers;

Chapter
70.82 RCW - Cerebral palsy program;

Chapter
70.96A RCW - Treatment for alcoholism, intoxication, and drug addiction;

Chapter
70.124 RCW - Abuse of patients‑-Nursing homes, state hospitals;

Chapter
70.128 RCW - Adult family homes;

Chapter
70.129 RCW - Long-term care resident rights;

Chapter
74.26 RCW - Services for children with multiple handicaps;

Chapter
74.34 RCW - Abuse of vulnerable adults;

Chapter
74.36 RCW - Funding for community programs for the aging;

Chapter
74.39 RCW - Long-term care service options;

Chapter
74.41 RCW - Respite care services;

Chapter
74.42 RCW - Nursing homes‑-Resident care, operating standards;

Chapter
74.46 RCW - Nursing facility medicaid payment system;

Chapter
74.39A RCW - Long-term care services options‑-Expansion; and

Chapter
18.51 RCW - Nursing homes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
74.39.001 (Finding) and 1989 c 427 s 1;

(2) RCW
74.39.005 (Purpose) and 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 10 & 1989 c 427
s 2;

(3) RCW
74.39.030 (Community options program entry
system--Waiver--Respite services) and 1989 c 427 s 11;

(4) RCW
74.39A.005 (Findings) and 1993 c 508 s 1; and

(5) RCW
74.39A.007 (Purpose and intent) and 1993 c 508 s 2.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each added to chapter 43.20A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10.
Captions used in this act are not part of the law.

---
END ---