BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that no agency of government currently has authority to
modify current state rules in chapter 240-15 WAC. In the absence of
rule-making authority, the legislature adopts the following interim policy for
eligibility to purchase state and local government timber sales:

(a)
Processing facilities that purchased timber from state and local government
lands for more than five years prior to January 1, 2000, may continue to do so
at their historic levels, notwithstanding any changes in their ownership after
January 1, 2000, if their owners enter into agreements with the state
department of revenue to ensure that timber from state and local government
lands purchased for those facilities is not processed by ineligible facilities;
and

(b)
Processing facilities eligible to purchase unprocessed timber from federal land
within a sourcing area approved by the United States forest service may
purchase unprocessed timber from state and local government lands within the
boundaries of their federally approved sourcing area, if their owners enter
into agreements with the state department of revenue to ensure that the timber
from state and local government lands purchased for those facilities is not
processed by ineligible facilities.

(2)
The governor shall submit this modified policy to the United States secretary
of commerce for approval under the forest resources conservation and shortage
recovery act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 620).

(3) The interim policy under this section applies only to timber
sales made by a state agency or local government after the United States
secretary of commerce approves or is deemed to have approved the policy under
the forest resources conservation and shortage recovery act (16 U.S.C. Sec.
620), and until the legislature acts to adopt a permanent policy relating to
the eligibility to purchase state and local government timber, or until June
30, 2001, whichever occurs earlier.

---
END ---