BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of this chapter to protect the public by providing for the
certification of herbalists.

The
use of botanicals by the general public is growing daily. According to the Journal
of the American Medical Association, five billion dollars annually is spent
nation-wide on medicinal herbs. Retail book websites now list up to three
hundred fifty titles on herbal medicine for sale. Herbs are regularly a part
of health reports in the media, however not all of the information is related
in a useful or accurate way. Clearly, the public has a great desire to use and
learn about herbal medicine. The critical issue is for them to learn from a
capable and skilled individual. The legislature has an opportunity at this
time to set a precedent in protecting the public from misinformation by
regulating those qualified practitioners performing a public service.

The
qualifications and practices of herbalists in this state are virtually unknown
to potential clients. By promoting high standards of professional performance,
by requiring professional accountability, and by credentialing those persons
who seek to provide herbalism under the title certified herbalist, this chapter
identifies those practitioners who have achieved a particular level of competency.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Certified herbalist" means a person certified to practice herbalism
under this chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of health.

(3)
"Herbalism" means the use of a wide variety of plants and plant
materials to improve the health and well-being of a client. Herbalism
includes:

(a)
Providing herbal counseling, education, and information as components of
preventive and restorative health care;

(b)
Establishing priorities, goals, and objectives that meet client needs and are
consistent with available resources and constraints;

(c)
Developing, implementing, managing, and evaluating herbal care systems; and

(d)
Evaluating, making changes in, and maintaining appropriate standards of quality
in herbal care services.

(4)
"Herbalist" means an individual, or practitioner, who engages in the
practice of herbalism for a fee.

(5)
"Licensed practitioner" means any licensed health care practitioner
performing services within the person's authorized scope of practice.

(6)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Certification is a voluntary process recognizing an individual who qualifies by
examination and meets established educational prerequisites. Certification
protects the title of practice.

(2)
No person may represent oneself as certified or use any title or description of
services without applying for certification, meeting the required
qualifications, and being certified by the department of health, unless
otherwise exempted by this chapter.

(3)
A person represents himself or herself as a certified herbalist when any title
or any description of services is used that incorporates one or more of the
following designations: "Certified herbalist" or "C.H."

(4)
The secretary may by rule proscribe or regulate advertising and other forms of
client solicitation that are likely to mislead or deceive the public as to
whether someone is certified under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The secretary shall issue a certificate to any applicant who demonstrates to
the secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a)
Successful completion of an educational program approved by the secretary
consisting of:

(i)
Six hundred classroom contact hours; and

(ii)
One hundred clinical client contact hours; or

(b)
Successful completion of alternate training meeting established criteria; and

(c)
Successful completion of an approved examination.

(2)
The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of
meeting the criteria.

(3)
In addition, applicants are subject to the grounds for denial of a certificate
or issuance of a conditional certificate under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
secretary shall establish by rule the standards and procedures for approval of
educational programs and alternative training. The secretary may utilize or
contract with individuals or organizations having expertise in the profession
or in education to assist in the evaluations. The secretary shall establish by
rule the standards and procedures for revocation of approval of educational
programs. The standards and procedures set apply equally to educational
programs and training in the United States and in foreign jurisdictions. The
secretary may establish a fee for educational program evaluations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Applications for certification must be submitted on forms provided by the
secretary. The secretary may require any information and documentation that
reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the
requirements for certification provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130
RCW. Each applicant shall comply with administrative procedures,
administrative requirements, and fees determined by the secretary as provided
in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
secretary shall establish by rule the procedural requirements and fees for
renewal of certification. Failure to renew shall invalidate the certificate
and all privileges granted by the certificate. If a certificate has lapsed for
a period longer than three years, the person shall demonstrate competence to
the satisfaction of the secretary by taking continuing education courses, or
meeting other standards determined by the secretary.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
The secretary has the authority to appoint an advisory committee to further the
purposes of this chapter. The advisory committee shall be composed of five
members, one member initially appointed for a term of one year, two for a term
of two years, and two for a term of three years. Subsequent appointments shall
be for terms of three years. No person may serve as a member of the committee
for more than two consecutive terms. Members of the advisory committee must be
residents of the state. Members of the committee include one naturopath
licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, one acupuncturist licensed under chapter
18.06 RCW, two herbalists who are professional members of the American
herbalist guild, and one member of the general public who is not affiliated
directly or indirectly with herbalism. The two herbalist members of the
committee must be certified under this chapter within two years of the
effective date of this section.

(2)
The secretary may remove any member of the advisory committee for cause as
specified by rule. In the case of a vacancy, the secretary shall appoint a
person to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(3)
The advisory committee shall meet at the times and places designated by the
secretary and shall hold meetings during the year as necessary to provide
advice to the secretary. The committee may elect a chair and a vice chair. A
majority of the members currently serving shall constitute a quorum.

(4)
Each member of the advisory committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses
as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. In addition, members of the
committee shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 when engaged in
the authorized business of their committee.

(5)
The secretary, members of the advisory committee, or individuals acting on
their behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on
any credentialing or disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed
in the course of their duties.

(6)
The committee's duties include, but shall not be limited to:

(a)
Evaluating and designating those schools from which successful completion will
be accepted as proof of an applicant's eligibility to be certified; and

(b)
Determining whether alternative methods of training are equivalent to formal
education, and to establish forms, procedures, and criteria for evaluation of
an applicant's alternative training to determine the applicant's eligibility to
be certified.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
Persons certified under this chapter shall provide all clients, at the
commencement of any program of treatment, with accurate information concerning
their practice. The information must inform the client of the purposes of and
resources available under this chapter, including the right of the client to
refuse treatment, and that it is the responsibility of the client to choose the
provider and treatment modality that best suits the client's needs. The
information disclosed by the herbalist must include the herbalist's relevant
education and training, the therapeutic orientation of the practice, the
proposed course of treatment where known, any financial requirements, and other
information as the department may require. The information shall also include
a statement that certification of an individual under this chapter does not
include a recognition of any practice standards, nor necessarily imply the
effectiveness of any treatment. Both the client and the herbalist must
acknowledge in writing the receipt of the information required to be disclosed
in this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial
of credentials, unauthorized practice, and the discipline of persons
credentialed under this chapter. The secretary is the disciplining authority
under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1)
Owners, operators, or employees of health food stores or herbal apothecaries
provided the owners, operators, or employees do not hold themselves out to be
certified herbalists;

(2)
The practice by an individual licensed, certified, or registered under the laws
of this state and performing services within the authorized scope of practice;

(3)
The practice of herbalism by a person for no fee;

(4)
The practice of herbalism by a person under the auspices of a religious
denomination, church, or organization, or the practice of religion itself;

(5)
Herbalists who are not Washington residents from providing up to ten days per
quarter of training or workshops in the state, as long as they do not hold
themselves out to be certified in Washington state.

(6)
The practice by an individual employed by the government of the United States
while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United
States; and

(7)
The practice by a person who is a regular student in an educational program
approved by the secretary, and whose performance of services is pursuant to a
regular course of instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the
general supervision of the instructor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. In
addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary has the
authority to:

(1)
Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter;

(2)
Establish all certification and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;

(3)
Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4)
Register any applicants, and to issue certificates to applicants who have met
the education, training, and examination requirements for certification and to
deny a certificate to applicants who do not meet the minimum qualifications,
except that proceedings concerning the denial of a certificate based upon
unprofessional conduct or impairment shall be governed by the uniform
disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(5)
Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff as needed to
implement this chapter, and hire individuals certified under this chapter to
serve as examiners for any practical examinations;

(6)
Determine minimum educational requirements and evaluate and designate those
educational programs from which successful completion will be accepted as proof
of eligibility to take a qualifying examination for applicants for
certification;

(7)
Prepare, grade, and administer, or determine the nature of, and supervise the
grading and administration of, examinations for applicants for certification;

(8)
Determine whether alternative methods of training are equivalent to formal
education, and establish forms, procedures, and criteria for evaluation of an
applicant's alternative training to determine the applicant's eligibility to
take any qualifying examination;

(9)
Determine which states have certification requirements equivalent to those of
this state, and issue certificates to individuals certified in those states
without examinations;

(10)
Define and approve any experience requirement for certification;

(11)
Implement and administer a program for consumer education;

(12)
Adopt rules implementing a continuing competency program;

(13)
Maintain the official department record of all applicants and certificate
holders; and

(14)
Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. The
secretary shall keep an official record of all proceedings. A part of the
record shall consist of a register of all applicants for certification under
this chapter and the results of each application.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. An
applicant holding a certificate in another state may be certified to practice
in this state without examination if the secretary determines that the other
state's certification standards are substantially equivalent to the standards
in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. This
chapter only applies to a business or profession regulated under the laws of
this state if this chapter is specifically referenced in the laws regulating
that business or profession.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17.
Sections 1 through 16 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

---
END ---