BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
80.36.010 and 1985 c 450 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The right of eminent domain is hereby extended to all telecommunications
companies organized or doing business in this state.

(2)
Prior to exercising the right of eminent domain, a telecommunications company
must submit to the county and to the commission a written determination that
addresses the public benefit the county will derive from its presence. The
determination shall include without limitation:

(a)
The number of access points the telecommunications company will provide to the
county;

(b)
The advanced telecommunications brought to the county by way of the access
points; and

(c)
Any other benefit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Nothing in this act is intended to expand or limit existing rights or
obligations granted under the Washington state Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---