BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
23B.16.220 and 1993 c 290 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each domestic corporation, and each foreign corporation authorized to transact
business in this state, shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing
initial and annual reports that set forth:

(a)
The name of the corporation and the state or country under whose law it is
incorporated;

(b)
The street address of its registered office and the name of its registered
agent at that office in this state;

(c)
In the case of a foreign corporation, the address of its principal office in
the state or country under the laws of which it is incorporated;

(d)
The address of the principal place of business of the corporation in this
state;

(e)
The names and addresses of its directors, if the corporation has dispensed with
or limited the authority of its board of directors pursuant to RCW 23B.08.010,
in an agreement authorized under RCW 23B.07.320, or analogous authority, the
names and addresses of persons who will perform some or all of the duties of
the board of directors;

(f)
A brief description of the nature of its business; and

(g)
The names and addresses of its chairperson of the board of directors, if any,
president, secretary, and treasurer, or of individuals, however designated,
performing the functions of such officers.

(2)
Information in an initial report or an annual report must be current as of the
date the report is executed on behalf of the corporation.

(3)
A corporation's initial report must be delivered to the secretary of state
within one hundred twenty days of the date on which the articles of
incorporation for a domestic corporation were filed, or on which a foreign
corporation's certificate of authority was filed. Subsequent annual reports
must be delivered to the secretary of state on, or prior to, the date on which
the domestic or foreign corporation is required to pay its annual corporate
license fee, and at such additional times as the corporation elects.

(4)(a)
The secretary of state may allow a corporation to file an annual report through
electronic means. If allowed, the secretary of state shall adopt rules
detailing the circumstances under which the electronic filing of such reports
shall be permitted and how such reports may be filed.

(b)
For purposes of this section only, a person executing an electronically filed
annual report may deliver the report to the office of the secretary of state
without a signature and without an exact or conformed copy, but the person's
name must appear in the electronic filing as the person executing the filing,
and the filing must state the capacity in which the person is executing the
filing.

Sec.
2. RCW
25.15.105 and 1994 c 211 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each domestic limited liability company, and each foreign limited liability
company authorized to transact business in this state, shall deliver to the
secretary of state for filing, both initial and annual reports that set forth:

(a)
The name of the company and the state or country under whose law it is
organized;

(b)
The street address of its registered office and the name of its registered
agent at that office in this state;

(c)
In the case of a foreign company, the address of its principal office in the
state or country under the laws of which it is organized;

(d)
The address of the principal place of business of the company in this state;

(e)
The names and addresses of the company's members, or if the management of the
company is vested in a manager or managers, then the name and address of its
manager or managers; and

(f)
A brief description of the nature of its business.

(2)
Information in an initial report or an annual report must be current as of the
date the report is executed on behalf of the company.

(3)
A company's initial report must be delivered to the secretary of state within
one hundred twenty days of the date on which a domestic company's certificate
of formation was filed, or on which a foreign company's application for
registration was submitted. Subsequent annual reports must be delivered to the
secretary of state on a date determined by the secretary of state, and at such
additional times as the company elects.

(4)(a)
The secretary of state may allow a company to file an annual report through
electronic means. If allowed, the secretary of state shall adopt rules
detailing the circumstances under which the electronic filing of such reports
shall be permitted and how such reports may be filed.

(b)
For purposes of this section only, a person executing an electronically filed
annual report may deliver the report to the office of the secretary of state
without a signature and without an exact or conformed copy, but the person's
name must appear in the electronic filing as the person executing the filing,
and the filing must state the capacity in which the person is executing the
filing.

Sec.
3. RCW
25.15.085 and 1995 c 337 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each document required by this chapter to be filed in the office of the
secretary of state shall be executed in the following manner, except as set
forth in RCW 25.15.105(4)(b):

(a)
Each original certificate of formation must be signed by the person or persons
forming the limited liability company;

(b)
A reservation of name may be signed by any person;

(c)
A transfer of reservation of name must be signed by, or on behalf of, the
applicant for the reserved name;

(d)
A registration of name must be signed by any member or manager of the foreign
limited liability company;

(e)
A certificate of amendment or restatement must be signed by at least one
manager, or by a member if management of the limited liability company is
reserved to the members;

(f)
A certificate of cancellation must be signed by the person or persons
authorized to wind up the limited liability company's affairs pursuant to RCW
25.15.295(1);

(g)
If a surviving domestic limited liability company is filing articles of merger,
the articles of merger must be signed by at least one manager, or by a member
if management of the limited liability company is reserved to the members, or
if the articles of merger are being filed by a surviving foreign limited
liability company, limited partnership, or corporation, the articles of merger
must be signed by a person authorized by such foreign limited liability
company, limited partnership, or corporation; and

(h)
A foreign limited liability company's application for registration as a foreign
limited liability company doing business within the state must be signed by any
member or manager of the foreign limited liability company.

(2)
Any person may sign a certificate, articles of merger, limited liability
company agreement, or other document by an attorney-in-fact or other person
acting in a valid representative capacity, so long as each document signed in
such manner identifies the capacity in which the signator signed.

(3)
The person executing the document shall sign it and state beneath or opposite
the signature the name of the person and capacity in which the person signs.
The document must be typewritten or printed, and must meet such legibility or
other standards as may be prescribed by the secretary of state.

(4) The execution of a certificate or articles of merger by any
person constitutes an affirmation under the penalties of perjury that the facts
stated therein are true.

Sec.
4. RCW
25.15.095 and 1994 c 211 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The original signed copy, together with a duplicate copy that may be either a
signed, photocopied, or conformed copy, of the certificate of formation or any
other document required to be filed pursuant to this chapter, except as set
forth under RCW 25.15.105, shall be delivered to the secretary of state.
If the secretary of state determines that the documents conform to the filing
provisions of this chapter, he or she shall, when all required filing fees have
been paid:

(a)
Endorse on each signed original and duplicate copy the word "filed"
and the date of its acceptance for filing;

(b)
Retain the signed original in the secretary of state's files; and

(c)
Return the duplicate copy to the person who filed it or the person's
representative.

(2)
If the secretary of state is unable to make the determination required for
filing by subsection (1) of this section at the time any documents are
delivered for filing, the documents are deemed to have been filed at the time
of delivery if the secretary of state subsequently determines that:

(a)
The documents as delivered conform to the filing provisions of this chapter; or

(b)
Within twenty days after notification of nonconformance is given by the
secretary of state to the person who delivered the documents for filing or the
person's representative, the documents are brought into conformance.

(3)
If the filing and determination requirements of this chapter are not satisfied
completely within the time prescribed in subsection (2)(b) of this section, the
documents shall not be filed.

(4) Upon the filing of a certificate of amendment (or judicial
decree of amendment) or restated certificate in the office of the secretary of
state, or upon the future effective date or time of a certificate of amendment
(or judicial decree thereof) or restated certificate, as provided for therein,
the certificate of formation shall be amended or restated as set forth
therein. Upon the filing of a certificate of cancellation (or a judicial
decree thereof), or articles of merger which act as a certificate of
cancellation, or upon the future effective date or time of a certificate of
cancellation (or a judicial decree thereof) or of articles of merger which act
as a certificate of cancellation, as provided for therein, or as specified in
RCW 25.15.290, the certificate of formation is canceled.

---
END ---