BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

Public baccalaureate institutions of higher education are
prohibited from accepting funds from any source that places conditions or
restrictions on the use of such funds in a manner that may interfere with or
otherwise limit the academic freedom and integrity of a public baccalaureate
institution. This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit a donor from
earmarking funds for a particular purpose or use including but not limited to
research, scholarships, construction, or development.

---
END ---