BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

The state property tax levy for collection in 2001 shall be reduced
by ten percent of the levy amount that would otherwise be allowed under this
chapter without regard to this section. State levies for collection before
2001 shall not be used as the highest of the three most recent years for
purposes of limitation calculations under this chapter.

---
END ---