BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.332.005 and 1995 c 350 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
The expansion of international trade is vital to the overall growth of
Washington's economy;

(b)
On a per capita basis, Washington state is the most international trade
dependent state in the nation;

(c)
The North American free trade agreement (NAFTA) and the general agreement on
tariffs and trade (GATT) highlight the increased importance of international
trade opportunities to the United States and the state of Washington;

(d)
The passage of NAFTA and GATT will have a major impact on the state's
agriculture, aerospace, computer software, and textiles and apparel sectors;

(e)
There is a need to strengthen and coordinate the state's activities in
promoting and developing its agricultural, manufacturing, and service
industries overseas, especially for small and medium-sized businesses, and
minority and women-owned business enterprises; and

(f)
The importance of having a coherent vision for advancing Washington state's
interest in the global economy has rarely been so consequential as it is now.

(2)
The legislature declares that the purpose of the office of the Washington state
trade representative is to:

(a)
Strengthen and expand the state's activities in marketing its goods and
services overseas; and

(b)
Review and analyze proposed international trade agreements to access their
impact on goods and services produced by Washington businesses.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.332.010 and 1995 c 350 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The office of the Washington state trade representative is created under the
office of the governor. The office shall serve as the state's official liaison
with foreign governments on trade matters.

((The
office of the Washington state trade representative may accept or request
grants or gifts from citizens and other private sources to be used to defray
the costs of appropriate hosting of foreign dignitaries, including appropriate
gift-giving and reciprocal gift-giving, or other activities of the office. The
office shall open and maintain a bank account into which it shall deposit all
money received under this section. Such money and the interest accruing
thereon shall not constitute public funds, shall be kept segregated and apart
from funds of the state, and shall not be subject to appropriation or allotment
by the state or subject to chapter 43.88 RCW.))

(2)
The office shall:

(a)
Review and analyze proposed and enacted international trade agreements and
provide an assessment of the impact of a proposed agreement on Washington
businesses and firms;

(b)
Study the social and environmental impact of proposed and enacted trade
agreements and report to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature on the office's findings;

(c)
Work with the international trade division of the department of community,
trade, and economic development and the international marketing program of the
department of agriculture to develop a state-wide trade strategy designed to
increase the export of Washington goods and services, particularly goods and
services from small and medium-sized businesses and women and minority business
enterprises; and

(d)
Conduct other activities the governor deems necessary to promote international
trade within the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.332 RCW to read as follows:

The office of the Washington state trade representative may accept
or request grants or gifts from citizens and other private sources to be used
to defray the costs of appropriate hosting of foreign dignitaries, including
appropriate gift-giving and reciprocal gift-giving, or other activities of the
office. The office shall open and maintain a bank account into which it shall
deposit all money received under this section. The money and any accrued
interest shall not constitute public funds, shall be kept segregated and apart
from funds of the state, and shall not be subject to appropriation or allotment
by the state or subject to chapter 43.88 RCW.

---
END ---