BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.08.02567 and 1999 c 358 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of machinery and
equipment used directly in generating electricity using wind, sun, natural
gas in a combined cycle unit, or landfill gas as the principal source of
power, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing such machinery and equipment, but only if the purchaser
develops with such machinery, equipment, and labor a facility capable of
generating not less than two hundred kilowatts of electricity and provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department by rule. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the
seller's files.

(2)
For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02567:

(a)
"Combined cycle unit" means an electric generating unit that: (i)
Consists of one or more combustion turbines and one or more boilers with a
portion of the required energy input to the boiler(s) provided by the exhaust
gas of the combustion turbine or turbines; and (ii) has a heat rate efficiency
of less than eight thousand British thermal units per kilowatt hour.

(b)
"Landfill gas" means biomass fuel of the type qualified for federal
tax credits under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 29 collected from a landfill.
"Landfill" means a landfill as defined under RCW 70.95.030;

(((b)))
(c) "Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures,
devices, and support facilities that are integral and necessary to the
generation of electricity using wind, sun, or landfill gas as the principal
source of power;

(((c)))
(d) "Machinery and equipment" does not include: (i)
Hand-powered tools; (ii) property with a useful life of less than one year;
(iii) repair parts required to restore machinery and equipment to normal
working order; (iv) replacement parts that do not increase productivity,
improve efficiency, or extend the useful life of machinery and equipment; (v)
buildings; or (vi) building fixtures that are not integral and necessary to the
generation of electricity that are permanently affixed to and become a physical
part of a building;

(((d)))
(e) Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in generating
electricity by wind energy, solar, or landfill gas power if it provides any
part of the process that captures the energy of the wind, sun, or landfill gas,
converts that energy to electricity, and transforms or transmits that
electricity for entry into electric transmission and distribution systems.

(3)
This section expires June 30, 2005.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.12.02567 and 1999 c 358 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply with respect to machinery and
equipment used directly in generating not less than two hundred kilowatts of
electricity using wind, sun, natural gas in a combined cycle unit, or
landfill gas as the principal source of power.

(2)
The definitions in RCW 82.08.02567 apply to this section.

(3) This section expires June 30, 2005.

---
END ---