BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a county may impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter. The rate of this tax shall not
exceed six and one-half percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax
or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2)
Taxes imposed under this section are in addition to other taxes authorized by
law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within
the county. Taxes imposed under this section shall be deducted from the amount
of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department under
chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department shall perform the collection of
such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.

(3)
Before a county may impose the tax under this section, the county must make an
application to the transportation commission in a form and manner prescribed by
the commission. The transportation commission shall identify and prioritize
local transportation improvement projects eligible for funding from the tax
authorized under this section. The commission shall approve applications from
counties in which a local transportation improvement project identified by the
transportation commission is located. The commission shall not approve an
application if approval would cause the total amount of all approvals to exceed
thirty million dollars for the 2001 fiscal year, and forty-six million two
hundred fifty thousand dollars for each fiscal year 2002 through 2005.

(4)
A tax imposed under this section shall expire when the revenue from the tax is
equal to the amount approved by the transportation commission for each
identified local transportation improvement project located in the county, but
not later than July 1, 2005.

(5)
All revenues collected on behalf of a county under this section shall be
deposited in the local transportation improvement account hereby created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Only the secretary of transportation or the
secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account
is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but appropriations
are not required for expenditures from the account. Moneys in the account may
be used only to pay for local transportation improvement projects identified by
the transportation commission. Money received from a county may be used only for
an identified local transportation improvement project within that county.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of any county with a population less than five
hundred thousand may impose an annual sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this chapter. The rate of tax shall not exceed six and one-half
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article
used in the case of a use tax. The tax shall take effect on or after July 1st
of each year. The tax shall expire when the revenue from the tax for the
county equals one thousand four hundred fifty-five dollars and four cents
multiplied by the miles of shorelines in the county, but not later than June
30th of the following year. For the purposes of this section, "miles of
shorelines in the county" means the number of miles of shorelines of the
state, as defined in RCW 90.58.030, in the county as of January 1, 2000.

(2)
Taxes imposed under this section are in addition to other taxes authorized by
law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. Taxes imposed under this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department shall perform the
collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.

(3)
A county must have an approved shoreline master program, as defined in RCW
90.58.030, before expending any moneys collected under this section. If a county
does not have an approved shoreline master program before July 1, 2005, all
moneys collected under this section for the county shall be deposited in the
state general fund.

(4)
Moneys collected under this section shall be used for:

(a)
Fish habitat restoration projects; or

(b)
Acquisition and preservation of riparian habitat, however any acquisitions must
occur in the following manner:

(i)
Riparian parcels located within a county-designated critical area under chapter
36.70A RCW or within a county's shoreline management jurisdiction under chapter
90.58 RCW, may be acquired in fee simple. A county may also acquire less than
fee simple interests to be held in perpetuity, including conservation
easements, and conservation futures as defined by RCW 84.34.220 in such areas;
or

(ii)
Less than fee simple interests to be held in perpetuity, including conservation
easements, and conservation futures as defined by RCW 84.34.220, may be
acquired in other riparian properties.

(5)
In making acquisition decisions counties shall consult with a designated lead
entity that has been established under RCW 75.46.060, and shall give priority
to riparian properties that:

(a)
Can be acquired in coordination with acquisitions made by the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation according to chapter 43.99A RCW; or

(b)
Have been designated by the United States national marine fisheries service or
the United States fish and wildlife service as critical habitat for threatened
or endangered species according to 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1533(a)(3).

(6)
Once acquired, property or interests in property may be held and managed by the
county, transferred to an appropriate state agency or local governmental
entity, or transferred to a private nonprofit nature conservation corporation as
defined by RCW 64.04.130.

(7)
All taxes imposed under this section expire July 1, 2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
legislature recognizes that existing transportation facilities in the central
Puget Sound region are inadequate to address mobility needs of the area. The
geography of the region, growth in demand for travel, and public resistance to
new roadways combine to further necessitate the rapid development of
alternative modes of travel.

The
legislature has found and declared in RCW 47.06.140 that transportation
facilities and services of high-capacity transportation systems are of
state-wide significance. Pursuant to RCW 81.104.140, the legislature has also
declared that agencies authorized to provide high-capacity transportation
service, including regional transit authorities, should seek other funds in
addition to dedicated funding sources, including federal, state, local, and
private sector assistance.

The
imposition of state taxes on the purchase of the goods, services, and
activities necessary to construct a multicounty high-capacity transportation
system reduces the revenues available to successfully implement such a system.
The credit provided by section 4 of this act would facilitate the expansion of
high-capacity transportation services by offsetting the taxes paid by regional
transit authorities.

The
legislature intends that the savings resulting from the credit provided in
section 4 of this act will provide additional funds for the planning and
construction of high-capacity transportation systems.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a regional transit authority may impose a sales
and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the regional transit authority
district. The rate shall not exceed 0.065 percent of the selling price in the
case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the regional transit
authority at no cost to the regional transit authority.

(3)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purpose of
planning and constructing a high-capacity transportation system.

(4)
A tax imposed under this section shall expire when the revenue from the tax
equals two hundred fourteen million dollars, but not later than January 1,
2007.

(5)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Regional transit authority" means an authority authorized under
chapter 81.112 RCW; and

(b)
"High-capacity transportation system" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 81.104.015.

Sec.
5. RCW
84.36.381 and 1998 c 333 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person shall be exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a portion of the
amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and payable in the year
following the year in which a claim is filed, and thereafter, in accordance
with the following:

(1)
The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence which was occupied
by the person claiming the exemption as a principal place of residence as of
the time of filing((: PROVIDED, That)). Any person who sells,
transfers, or is displaced from his or her residence may transfer his or her
exemption status to a replacement residence, but no claimant shall receive an
exemption on more than one residence in any year((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
Confinement of the person to a hospital, adult family home, boarding
home, or nursing home shall not disqualify the claim of exemption if:

(a)
The residence is temporarily unoccupied;

(b)
The residence is occupied by a spouse and/or a person financially dependent on
the claimant for support; or

(c)
The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home, adult family
home, boarding home, or hospital costs;

(2)
The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time of filing, in
fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the residence on which the
property taxes have been imposed or if the person claiming the exemption lives
in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership, ((such))
the person must own a share therein representing the unit or portion of
the structure in which ((he or she)) the person resides. For
purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by a marital community or owned
by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each spouse or cotenant, and any
lease for life shall be deemed a life estate;

(3)
The person claiming the exemption must be sixty-one years of age or older on
December 31st of the year in which the exemption claim is filed, or must have
been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason
of physical disability((: PROVIDED, That any)). A surviving
spouse of ((a)) the person who was receiving an exemption at the
time of the person's death shall qualify if the surviving spouse is fifty-seven
years of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements of this section;

(4)
The amount that the person shall be exempt from an obligation to pay shall be
calculated on the basis of combined disposable income, as defined in RCW
84.36.383. If the person claiming the exemption was retired for two months or
more of the assessment year, the combined disposable income of ((such)) the
person shall be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined
disposable income of ((such)) the person during the months ((such))
the person was retired by twelve. If the income of the person claiming
exemption is reduced for two or more months of the assessment year by reason of
the death of the person's spouse, or when other substantial changes occur in
disposable income that are likely to continue for an indefinite period of time,
the combined disposable income of ((such)) the person shall be
calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of ((such))
the person after ((such)) the occurrences by twelve. If
it is necessary to estimate income to comply with this subsection, the assessor
may require confirming documentation of ((such)) the income prior
to May 31st of the year following application;

(5)(a)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less shall be exempt from all
excess property taxes; and

(b)(i)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of twenty-four thousand dollars or less but greater than
eighteen thousand dollars shall be exempt from all regular property taxes on
the greater of forty thousand dollars or thirty-five percent of the valuation
of ((his or her)) the residence, but not to exceed sixty thousand
dollars of the valuation of ((his or her)) the residence; or

(ii)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of eighteen thousand dollars or less shall be exempt from all
regular property taxes on the greater of fifty thousand dollars or sixty
percent of the valuation of ((his or her)) the residence; and

(6)
For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less, the valuation of the
residence shall be the assessed value of the residence on the later of January
1, 1995, or January 1st of the assessment year the person first qualifies under
this section. If the person subsequently fails to qualify under this section
only for one year because of high income, this same valuation shall be used
upon requalification. If the person fails to qualify for more than one year in
succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any other reason, the
valuation upon requalification shall be the assessed value on January 1st of
the assessment year in which the person requalifies. If the person transfers
the exemption under this section to a different residence, the valuation of the
different residence shall be the assessed value of the different residence on
January 1st of the assessment year in which the person transfers the exemption.

In
no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater than the true and
fair value of the residence on January 1st of the assessment year.

This
subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to the property in the
year in which the improvements are made. Subsequent improvements to the
property shall be added to the value otherwise determined under this subsection
at their true and fair value in the year in which they are made.

All
taxpayers who qualify for exemption under this section shall be allowed a
credit against the state levy equal to the tax imposed on the assessed value of
the owner-occupied residential property for the state levy.

Sec.
6. RCW
84.36.383 and 1999 c 358 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, except where the context clearly
indicates a different meaning:

(1)
The term "residence" means a single family dwelling unit whether such
unit be separate or part of a multiunit dwelling, including the land on which
such dwelling stands not to exceed one acre. The term shall also include a
share ownership in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or
partnership if the person claiming exemption can establish that his or her
share represents the specific unit or portion of such structure in which he or
she resides. The term shall also include a single family dwelling situated
upon lands the fee of which is vested in the United States or any
instrumentality thereof including an Indian tribe or in the state of
Washington, and notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090,
such a residence shall be deemed real property.

(2)
The term "real property" shall also include a mobile home which has
substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being fixed
in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile home and
placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe, connections with
sewer, water, or other utilities. A mobile home located on land leased by the
owner of the mobile home is subject, for tax billing, payment, and collection
purposes, only to the personal property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW
84.60.040.

(3)
"Department" means the state department of revenue.

(4)
"Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the
person claiming the exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her spouse,
and the disposable income of each cotenant occupying the residence for the
assessment year, less amounts paid by the person claiming the exemption or his
or her spouse during the assessment year for:

(a)
Drugs supplied by prescription of a medical practitioner authorized by the laws
of this state or another jurisdiction to issue prescriptions; ((and))

(b)
The treatment or care of either person received in the home or in a nursing
home, adult family home, or boarding home; and

(c)
Health care insurance of either person, including any deduction for medicare
under Title XVIII of the social security act.

(5)
"Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in the
federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989, or such
subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose
of this section, plus all of the following items to the extent they are not
included in or have been deducted from adjusted gross income:

(a)
Capital gains, other than gain excluded from income under section 121 of the
federal internal revenue code to the extent it is reinvested in a new principal
residence;

(b)
Amounts deducted for loss;

(c)
Amounts deducted for depreciation;

(d)
Pension and annuity receipts;

(e)
Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(f)
Veterans benefits, other than (i) attendant-care and medical-aid
payments or (ii) benefits for disabilities related to the performance of
military duties received by veterans of the armed forces of the United States
with service-connected disabilities of at least fifty percent;

(g)
Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;

(h)
Dividend receipts; and

(i)
Interest received on state and municipal bonds.

(6)
"Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming the
exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.

(7)
"Adult family home" means a home licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW.

(8)
"Boarding home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW.

(9)
"Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.

(10)
"Nursing home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

The
levy for a taxing district in any year shall be reduced as necessary to prevent
increased exemptions resulting from the 2000 amendments to RCW 84.36.381 in
section 5 of this act and to RCW 84.36.383 in section 6 of this act from
resulting in a higher tax rate than would have occurred without this amendment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a county may impose an annual sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter. The rate of tax shall not exceed
six and one-half percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax. The tax shall take effect
on or after January 1st of each year. The tax shall expire when the revenue
from the tax is equal to the total amount of revenue reductions for the year
for all taxing districts in the county, other than the state, resulting from
the 2000 amendments to RCW 84.36.381 in section 5 of this act and to RCW
84.36.383 in section 6 of this act, but not later than the end of the calendar
year.

(2)
Taxes imposed under this section are in addition to other taxes authorized by
law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. Taxes imposed under this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department shall perform the collection
of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.

(3)
All revenues collected under this section shall be distributed to taxing
districts in the county, other than the state, in proportion to the revenue
reductions for the year resulting from the 2000 amendments to RCW 84.36.381 in
section 5 of this act and to RCW 84.36.383 in section 6 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

The
levy for a taxing district in any year shall be reduced as necessary to prevent
limited values under RCW 84.40.0305 from resulting in a higher tax rate than
would apply if properties were valued without reference to that section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a county may impose an annual sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter. The rate of tax shall not exceed
six and one-half percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or
value of the article used in the case of a use tax. The tax shall take effect
on or after January 1st of each year. The tax shall expire when the revenue
from the tax is equal to the total amount of revenue reductions for the year
for all taxing districts in the county, other than the state, resulting from
limited values under RCW 84.40.0305, but not later than the end of the calendar
year.

(2)
Taxes imposed under this section are in addition to other taxes authorized by
law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. Taxes imposed under this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department shall perform the collection
of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.

(3)
All revenues collected under this section shall be distributed to taxing districts
in the county, other than the state, in proportion to the revenue reductions
for the year resulting from limited values under RCW 84.40.0305.

Sec.
11. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 9, 1999 c 309 s 929, 1999 c 268 s 5, and 1999 c 94 s
4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the local transportation
improvement account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal ((account)) fund, the volunteer fire fighters' ((relief
and pension)) and reserve officers' administrative ((account))
fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account,
the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund,
and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective
beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this subsection
(4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's
service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond
retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. The
rates of taxes imposed in a county under sections 1, 2, 4, 8, and 10 of this
act shall be ratably reduced as necessary so that the total rate of the taxes
imposed in a county under RCW 82.14.0485, 82.14.0494, 82.14.370, 82.14.390,
sections 1, 2, 4, 8, and 10 of this act do not exceed six and one-half percent
at any time.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
Section 11 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14.
Sections 9 and 10 of this act take effect January 1, 2002, if the proposed
amendment to Article VII of the state Constitution allowing property valuation
increases to be spread over time (House Joint Resolution No. . . .)
is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at a general
election held in November 2000. If the proposed amendment is not approved and
ratified, these sections are void in their entirety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15.
Sections 5 and 6 of this act apply to taxes levied for collection in 2001 and
thereafter.

---
END ---