BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

The
transportation progress account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for transportation purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Ten and twenty-five one-hundredths percent of automobile-related sales and use
tax revenue shall be deposited in the transportation progress account under
section 1 of this act.

(2)
Two and forty-five one-hundredths percent of automobile-related sales and use
tax revenue shall be deposited in the Puget Sound ferry operations account
under RCW 47.60.530.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, "automobile-related sales and use tax
revenue" includes:

(a)
Revenue from the taxes imposed in RCW 82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020 reported on
returns filed by persons engaged in the following businesses: New and used car
dealers; automotive parts, accessories, and tire stores; automotive repair
services, including body, paint and interior repair and maintenance, exhaust
system repair, glass replacement shops, transmission repair, oil change and
lubrication shops, car washes, and other automotive mechanical and electrical
repair and maintenance businesses; automobile and other motor vehicle
wholesalers, motor vehicle supplies and new part wholesalers, tire and tube
wholesalers, and motor vehicle used part wholesalers; and

(b)
Revenue from the taxes imposed in RCW 82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020 collected by
the department of licensing, county auditors, and subagents for the sale or use
of motor vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect June 1, 2000.

---
END ---