BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.05.170 and 1989 c 345 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each health plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents under
this chapter which is not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW and is
established or renewed on or after twelve months after July 23, 1989, shall
include coverage for neurodevelopmental therapies for covered individuals age
((six)) eighteen and under.

(2)
Benefits provided under this section shall cover the services of those
authorized to deliver occupational therapy, speech therapy, and physical
therapy. Benefits shall be payable only where the services have been delivered
pursuant to the referral and periodic review of a holder of a license issued
pursuant to chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW or where covered services have been
rendered by such licensee. Nothing in this section shall preclude a
self-funded plan authorized under this chapter from negotiating rates with
qualified providers.

(3)
Benefits provided under this section shall be for medically necessary services
as determined by the self-funded plan authorized under this chapter. Benefits
shall be payable for services for the maintenance of a covered individual in
cases where significant deterioration in the patient's condition would result
without the service. Benefits shall be payable to restore and improve
function.

(4)
It is the intent of this section that the state, as an employer providing
comprehensive health coverage including the benefits required by this section,
retains the authority to design and employ utilization and cost controls.
Therefore, benefits delivered under this section may be subject to contractual
provisions regarding deductible amounts and/or copayments established by the
self-funded plan authorized under this chapter. Benefits provided under this
section may be subject to standard waiting periods for preexisting conditions,
and may be subject to the submission of written treatment plans.

(5)
In recognition of the intent expressed in subsection (4) of this section,
benefits provided under this section may be subject to contractual provisions
establishing annual and/or lifetime benefit limits. Such limits may define the
total dollar benefits available, or may limit the number of services delivered
as established by the self-funded plan authorized under this chapter.

Sec.
2. RCW
48.21.310 and 1989 c 345 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each employer-sponsored group policy for comprehensive health insurance which
is entered into, or renewed, on or after twelve months after July 23, 1989,
shall include coverage for neurodevelopmental therapies for covered individuals
age ((six)) eighteen and under.

(2)
Benefits provided under this section shall cover the services of those
authorized to deliver occupational therapy, speech therapy, and physical
therapy. Benefits shall be payable only where the services have been delivered
pursuant to the referral and periodic review of a holder of a license issued pursuant
to chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW or where covered services have been rendered by
such licensee. Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from
negotiating rates with qualified providers.

(3)
Benefits provided under this section shall be for medically necessary services
as determined by the insurer. Benefits shall be payable for services for the
maintenance of an insured in cases where significant deterioration in the
patient's condition would result without the service. Benefits shall be payable
to restore and improve function.

(4)
It is the intent of this section that employers purchasing comprehensive health
insurance, including the benefits required by this section, together with the
insurer, retain authority to design and employ utilization and cost controls.
Therefore, benefits delivered under this section may be subject to contractual
provisions regarding deductible amounts and/or copayments established by the
employer purchasing insurance and the insurer. Benefits provided under this
section may be subject to standard waiting periods for preexisting conditions,
and may be subject to the submission of written treatment plans.

(5)
In recognition of the intent expressed in subsection (4) of this section,
benefits provided under this section may be subject to contractual provisions
establishing annual and/or lifetime benefit limits. Such limits may define the
total dollar benefits available or may limit the number of services delivered
as agreed by the employer purchasing insurance and the insurer.

Sec.
3. RCW
48.44.450 and 1989 c 345 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each employer-sponsored group contract for comprehensive health care service
which is entered into, or renewed, on or after twelve months after July 23,
1989, shall include coverage for neurodevelopmental therapies for covered
individuals age ((six)) eighteen and under.

(2)
Benefits provided under this section shall cover the services of those
authorized to deliver occupational therapy, speech therapy, and physical
therapy. Benefits shall be payable only where the services have been delivered
pursuant to the referral and periodic review of a holder of a license issued
pursuant to chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW or where covered services have been
rendered by such licensee. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health
care service contractor from requiring that covered services be delivered by a
provider who participates by contract with the health care service contractor
unless no participating provider is available to deliver covered services.
Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care service contractor from
negotiating rates with qualified providers.

(3)
Benefits provided under this section shall be for medically necessary services
as determined by the health care service contractor. Benefits shall be payable
for services for the maintenance of a covered individual in cases where
significant deterioration in the patient's condition would result without the
service. Benefits shall be payable to restore and improve function.

(4)
It is the intent of this section that employers purchasing comprehensive group
coverage including the benefits required by this section, together with the
health care service contractor, retain authority to design and employ
utilization and cost controls. Therefore, benefits delivered under this
section may be subject to contractual provisions regarding deductible amounts
and/or copayments established by the employer purchasing coverage and the
health care service contractor. Benefits provided under this section may be
subject to standard waiting periods for preexisting conditions, and may be
subject to the submission of written treatment plans.

(5)
In recognition of the intent expressed in subsection (4) of this section,
benefits provided under this section may be subject to contractual provisions
establishing annual and/or lifetime benefit limits. Such limits may define the
total dollar benefits available or may limit the number of services delivered
as agreed by the employer purchasing coverage and the health care service
contractor.

Sec.
4. RCW
48.46.520 and 1989 c 345 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each employer-sponsored group contract for comprehensive health care service
which is entered into, or renewed, on or after twelve months after July 23,
1989, shall include coverage for neurodevelopmental therapies for covered
individuals age ((six)) eighteen and under.

(2)
Benefits provided under this section shall cover the services of those
authorized to deliver occupational therapy, speech therapy, and physical
therapy. Covered benefits and treatment must be rendered or referred by the
health maintenance organization, and delivered pursuant to the referral and
periodic review of a holder of a license issued pursuant to chapter 18.71 or
18.57 RCW or where treatment is rendered by such licensee. Nothing in this
section shall prohibit a health maintenance organization from negotiating rates
with qualified providers.

(3)
Benefits provided under this section shall be for medically necessary services
as determined by the health maintenance organization. Benefits shall be
provided for the maintenance of a covered enrollee in cases where significant
deterioration in the patient's condition would result without the service.
Benefits shall be provided to restore and improve function.

(4)
It is the intent of this section that employers purchasing comprehensive group
coverage including the benefits required by this section, together with the
health maintenance organization, retain authority to design and employ
utilization and cost controls. Therefore, benefits provided under this section
may be subject to contractual provisions regarding deductible amounts and/or
copayments established by the employer purchasing coverage and the health
maintenance organization. Benefits provided under this section may be subject
to standard waiting periods for preexisting conditions, and may be subject to
the submission of written treatment plans.

(5) In recognition of the intent expressed in subsection (4) of
this section, benefits provided under this section may be subject to
contractual provisions establishing annual and/or lifetime benefit limits.
Such limits may define the total dollar benefits available, or may limit the
number of services delivered as agreed by the employer purchasing coverage and
the health maintenance organization.

---
END ---