BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
I

INCOME TAX

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101.
DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
definitions in this section apply throughout this title. Except as provided in
this section, any term used in this title has the same meaning as when used in
a comparable context in the internal revenue code.

(1)
"Adjusted gross income" means adjusted gross income as determined
under the internal revenue code.

(2)
"Department" means the state department of revenue.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(4)
"Federal base income" means:

(a)
For individuals, adjusted gross income.

(b)
For all other persons, taxable income as determined under the internal revenue
code.

(5)
"Individual" means a natural person.

(6)
"Internal revenue code" means the United States internal revenue code
of 1986 and amendments thereto, as existing and in effect on January 1, 2000.

(7)
"Person" includes individuals, partnerships, firms, companies,
fiduciaries, estates, trusts, and corporations.

(8)
"Resident individual" includes:

(a)
An individual who has resided in this state for the entire taxable year;

(b)
An individual who is domiciled in this state unless the individual:

(i)
Maintains no permanent place of abode in this state;

(ii)
Does maintain a permanent place of abode elsewhere; and

(iii)
Spends in the aggregate not more than thirty days in the taxable year in this
state;

(c)
An individual who is not domiciled in this state, but maintains a permanent
place of abode in this state and spends in the aggregate more than one hundred
eighty-three days of the taxable year in this state unless the individual
establishes to the satisfaction of the director of the department that the
individual is in the state only for temporary or transitory purposes; and

(d)
An individual who claims the state of Washington as the individual's tax home
for federal income tax purposes.

(9)
"Resident estate" means an estate of which a personal representative
was appointed by a Washington court, or, an estate the administration of which
is carried on in this state.

(10)
"Resident trust" means a trust whose situs as determined by RCW
11.96.040 is within the state of Washington.

(11)
"Taxable income" means federal base income after making the additions,
subtractions, apportionments, and allocations provided under this title.

(12)
"Taxable year" means the taxpayer's taxable year as defined under the
internal revenue code.

(13)
"Taxpayer" means a person receiving income subject to tax under this
title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 102.
INCOME TAX IMPOSED. A tax is imposed on taxable income of each individual,
estate, and trust at the rate of one and nine-tenths percent. A tax is imposed
on the taxable income of each corporation at the rate of six percent.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 103.
TAXABLE INCOME MODIFICATIONS. In computing taxable income, modifications shall
be made to the taxpayer's federal base income as required under this section,
unless the modification has the effect of duplicating an item of income or
deduction.

(1)
Add amounts that have been deducted in computing federal base income to the
extent the amounts have been carried over from taxable years ending before the
effective date of this section.

(2)
Add amounts that have been deducted in computing federal base income to the
extent the amounts have been carried back from future taxable years.

(3)
Add taxes on or measured by net income that have been deducted under the
internal revenue code in computing federal base income.

(4)
Add gross income that has been excluded under section 103 of the internal
revenue code in computing federal base income, except gross income derived from
obligations of the state of Washington or political subdivisions of the state
of Washington.

(5)
Subtract any expenses incurred in the production of amounts added under
subsection (4) of this section, to the extent the expenses have not been
deducted in computing federal base income.

(6)
Subtract gross income that the state is prohibited from taxing under the
Constitution or laws of the United States, to the extent the gross income was
included in computing federal base income.

(7)
Add any expenses incurred in the production of amounts subtracted under
subsection (6) of this section, to the extent the expenses have been deducted
in computing federal base income.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 104. TAX
RETURNS FOR FRACTIONAL YEAR. (1) If the first taxable year of any taxpayer
with respect to which a tax is imposed by this title ends before December 31st
of the calendar year in which this title becomes effective, referred to in this
section as a fractional taxable year, the taxable income for the fractional
taxable year shall be the taxpayer's taxable income for the entire taxable
year, adjusted by one of the following methods, at the taxpayer's election:

(a)
The taxable income shall be multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the
fraction is the number of days in the fractional taxable year. The denominator
of the fraction is the number of days in the entire taxable year.

(b)
The taxable income shall be adjusted, in accordance with rules of the
department, so as to include only such income and be reduced only by such
deductions as can be clearly determined from the permanent records of the
taxpayer to be attributable to the fractional taxable year.

(2)
If an individual taxpayer's taxable income is adjusted under subsection (1) of
this section, the deduction amounts allowed under section 402 of this act for
the taxpayer shall be reduced by multiplying the amount of the exemption by a
fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the number of days in the
taxpayer's fractional taxable year. The denominator of the fraction is the
number of days in the entire taxable year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 105.
APPORTIONMENT AND ALLOCATION OF INCOME‑-INDIVIDUALS, ESTATES, AND
TRUSTS. (1) For resident individuals, estates, and trusts, all income shall be
apportioned and allocated to this state.

(2)
For nonresident individuals, estates, and trusts, income derived from sources
within this state shall be apportioned and allocated to this state. For
purposes of this title:

(a)
The adjusted gross income of a nonresident derived from sources within this
state is the net amount of items of income, gain, loss, and deduction of the
nonresident's federal adjusted gross income that are derived from or connected
with sources in this state including any distributive share of partnership
income and deductions, and any share of estate or trust income and deductions,
including any unrelated business income of an otherwise exempt trust or
organization.

(b)
Items of income, gain, loss, and deduction derived from or connected with
sources within this state are those items attributable to the ownership or
disposition of any interest in real or tangible personal property in this
state, and a business, trade, profession, or occupation carried on within this
state.

(c)
Deduction with respect to expenses, capital losses, and net operating losses
shall be based solely on income, gains, losses, and deductions derived from or
connected with sources in this state but shall otherwise be determined in the
same manner as the corresponding federal deduction except as provided in this
title.

(d)
Income from intangible personal property, including annuities, dividends,
interest, and gains from the disposition of intangible personal property,
constitutes income derived from sources within the state of Washington only to
the extent that such income is from property employed in a business, trade,
profession, or occupation carried on within this state: PROVIDED, That
distributed and undistributed income of an electing S corporation for federal tax
purposes derived from or connected with sources within this state is income
derived from sources within this state for a nonresident shareholder. A net
operating loss of such corporation does constitute a loss or deduction
connected with sources within this state for a nonresident shareholder.

(e)
Compensation paid by the United States for service in the armed forces of the
United States performed in this state by a nonresident does not constitute
income derived from sources within this state.

(f)
If a business, trade, profession, or occupation is carried on partly within and
partly without this state, the determination of net income derived or connected
with sources within this state as provided in this section, shall be made by
apportionment and allocation under chapter 82.56 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 106.
ESTATES, TRUSTS, AND BENEFICIARIES. (1) The taxable incomes of estates,
trusts, and beneficiaries thereof shall be computed by including a share of the
modifications under sections 103 through 105 of this act and the credits
allowed under section 107 of this act. Each taxpayer's share of a modification
or credit is the amount of modification or credit multiplied by a fraction.
The numerator of the fraction is the taxpayer's share of the distributable net
income of the estate or trust. The denominator of the fraction is the total
distributable net income of the estate or trust. The fraction shall never be
greater than one.

(2)
As used in this section, "distributable net income" means
distributable net income as defined in the internal revenue code. If an estate
or trust has no federal distributable net income, the term means the income of
the estate or trust that is distributed or is required to be distributed during
the taxable year under local law or the terms of the estate or trust
instrument.

(3)
Any portion of a modification that is not included in calculating the taxable
incomes of the beneficiaries shall be included in calculating the taxable
income of the trust or estate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 107.
CREDIT FOR INCOME TAXES DUE ANOTHER JURISDICTION. (1) The intent of this
section is to prevent double taxation of income potentially subject to tax in
both Washington and another jurisdiction.

(2)
As used in this section, "another jurisdiction" means another state
or foreign country, or a political subdivision of another state or foreign
country.

(3)
A resident individual, estate, or trust is allowed a credit against the tax
imposed under this title, equal to the lesser of:

(a)
The amount of tax paid to another jurisdiction on net income derived from
sources within the other jurisdiction; or

(b)
The amount of tax due under this title, before application of credits allowable
by this title, multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the
amount of the taxpayer's adjusted gross income subject to tax in the other
jurisdiction. The denominator of the fraction is the taxpayer's total adjusted
gross income as modified under section 103 of this act. The fraction shall
never be greater than one.

(4)
If the laws of another jurisdiction contain a provision exempting a resident of
Washington from net income taxes on income derived from sources in that
jurisdiction, the director is authorized to enter into a reciprocal agreement
with that jurisdiction providing a similar tax exemption for residents of that
jurisdiction for income derived from sources within Washington.

(5)
The amount of tax credits received by any taxpayer under this section shall not
exceed the total amount of tax due, and there shall be no carryback or
carryforward of any unused credits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 108. DUAL
RESIDENCE. If an individual is regarded as a resident both of this state and
another jurisdiction for state personal income tax purposes, the department
shall reduce the tax on that portion of the individual's income that is
subjected to tax in both jurisdictions solely by virtue of dual residence, if
the other taxing jurisdiction allows a similar reduction. The reduction shall
equal the lower of the two taxes applicable to the income taxed twice,
multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the tax imposed by
this state on the income taxed twice. The denominator of the fraction is the
tax imposed by both jurisdictions on the income taxed twice. The fraction
shall never be greater than one.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 109.
EMPLOYER WITHHOLDING‑-REQUIREMENTS. (1) Every employer making a payment
of wages or salaries earned in this state, regardless of the place where the
payment is made, and who is required by the internal revenue code to withhold
taxes, shall deduct and withhold tax as prescribed by the department by rule.
The rules prescribed shall reasonably reflect the annual tax liability under
this title of the employee under this title. Every employer making such a
deduction and withholding shall furnish to the employee a record of the amount
of tax deducted and withheld from the employee on forms provided by the
department.

(2)
If the employee is a resident of this state and earns income from personal
services entirely performed in another state that imposes an income tax on the
income, and the employer withholds income taxes under the laws of the state in
which the income is earned, the employer is not required to withhold any tax
imposed by this title on the income if the laws of the state in which the
income is earned allow a similar exemption for its residents who earn income in
this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 110.
LIABILITY OF EMPLOYER FOR TAX WITHHELD. Any person required to deduct and
withhold the tax imposed by this title is liable to the department for the
payment of the amount deducted and withheld, and is not liable to any other
person for the amount of tax deducted and withheld under this title or for the
act of withholding. The amount of tax so deducted and withheld shall be held
to be a special fund in trust for this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 111.
CREDIT FOR TAX WITHHELD‑-HOW CLAIMED. The amount deducted and withheld
as tax under section 109 of this act during any taxable year shall be allowed
as a credit against the tax imposed for the taxable year by this title. If the
liability of any individual for taxes, interest, penalties, or other amounts
due the state of Washington is less than the total amount of the credit that the
individual is entitled to claim under this section, the individual is entitled
to a refund from the department in the amount of the excess of the credit over
the amounts otherwise due. If any individual entitled to claim a credit under
this section is not otherwise required by this title to file a return, a refund
may be obtained in the amount of the credit by filing a return, with applicable
sections completed, to claim the refund. No credit or refund is allowed under
this section unless the credit or refund is claimed on a return filed for the
taxable year for which the amount was deducted and withheld.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 112.
WITHHOLDING‑-FAILURE TO PAY OR COLLECT‑-PENALTIES. (1) The tax
required by this title to be collected by the employer shall be deemed to be
held in trust by the employer until paid to the department.

(2)
In case any employer, or a responsible person within the meaning of section
6672 of the internal revenue code, fails to collect the tax imposed by this
title or having collected the tax fails to pay it to the department, the
employer or responsible person shall, nevertheless, be personally liable to the
state for the amount of the tax. The interest and penalty provisions of
chapter 82.32 RCW apply to this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 113.
ESTIMATED TAX IMPOSED‑-DUE DATE OF ESTIMATED TAXES‑-AMOUNT OF
ESTIMATED TAX‑-UNDERPAYMENT PENALTY. (1) Each taxpayer who is required
by the internal revenue code to make payment of estimated taxes shall pay to
the department on forms prescribed by the department the estimated taxes due
under this title.

(2)
The provisions of the internal revenue code relating to the determination of
reporting periods and due dates of payments of estimated tax apply to the
estimated tax payments due under this section.

(3)
The amount of the estimated tax shall be the annualized tax divided by the
number of months in the reporting period. No estimated tax shall be due if the
annualized tax is less than five hundred dollars. The provisions of RCW
82.32.050 and 82.32.090 shall apply to underpayments of estimated tax but shall
not apply to underpayments if the tax remitted to the department under sections
101 through 122 of this act is either ninety percent of the tax shown on the
return or one hundred percent of the tax shown on the previous year's tax
return.

(4)
For purposes of this section, the annualized tax is the taxpayer's projected
tax liability for the taxable year as computed under section 6654 of the
internal revenue code and the regulations thereunder.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 114.
METHOD OF ACCOUNTING. (1) A taxpayer's method of accounting for purposes of
the tax imposed under this title shall be the same as the taxpayer's method of
accounting for federal income tax purposes. If no method of accounting has
been regularly used by a taxpayer for federal income tax purposes or if the
method used does not clearly reflect income, tax due under this title shall be
computed by a method of accounting that in the opinion of the department fairly
reflects income.

(2)
If a person's method of accounting is changed for federal income tax purposes,
it shall be similarly changed for purposes of this title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 115.
PERSONS REQUIRED TO FILE RETURNS. (1) All taxpayers shall file with the
department, on forms prescribed by the department, an income tax return for
each taxable year. An individual owing no tax for a taxable year is not
required to file a return for that year. Each person required to file a return
under this title shall, without assessment, notice, or demand, pay any tax due
thereon to the department on or before the date fixed for the filing of the
return.

(2)
The department may by rule require that certain taxpayers file, on forms
prescribed by the department, informational returns for any period.

(3)
If an adjustment to a taxpayer's federal return is made by the taxpayer or the
internal revenue service, the taxpayer shall, within ninety days of the final
determination of the adjustment by the internal revenue service or within
thirty days of the filing of a federal return adjusted by the taxpayer, file
with the department on forms prescribed by the department, a corrected return
reflecting the adjustments as finally determined. The taxpayer shall pay any
additional tax due resulting from the finally determined internal revenue
service adjustment or a taxpayer adjustment without notice and assessment. The
period of limitation for the collection of the additional tax, interest, and
penalty due as a result of an adjustment by the taxpayer or a finally
determined internal revenue service adjustment shall begin at the later of
thirty days following the final determination of the adjustment or the date of
the filing of the corrected return.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 116. DUE
DATE FOR FILING A RETURN‑-EXTENSIONS‑-INTEREST AND PENALTIES. The
due date of a return required to be filed with the department shall be the due
date of the federal income tax return or informational return for federal
income tax purposes. The department has the authority to grant extensions of
times by which returns required to be filed by this title may be submitted.
The department also has the authority to grant extensions of time to pay tax
with regard to taxes imposed by this title. Interest at the rate as specified
in RCW 82.32.050 shall accrue during any extension period and the interest and
penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW shall apply to late payments and
deficiencies. Notwithstanding the limitation of RCW 82.32.090, in the case of
the late filing of an informational return, there shall be imposed a penalty
the amount of which shall be established by the department by rule. The
penalty shall not exceed fifty dollars per month for a maximum of ten months.
RCW 82.32.105 shall apply to this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 117. JOINT
RETURN. (1) If the federal income tax liabilities of both spouses are
determined on a joint federal return for the taxable year, they shall file a
joint return under this title.

(2)
If neither spouse is required to file a federal income tax return for the
taxable year, a joint return shall be filed under this title under the same
conditions under which a joint return may be filed for purposes of the federal
income tax.

(3)
If the federal income tax liability of either spouse is determined on a
separate federal return for the taxable year, they shall file separate returns
under this title.

(4)
In any case in which a joint return is filed under this section, the liability
of the husband and wife is joint and several, unless the spouse is relieved of
liability under section 6013 of the internal revenue code.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 118.
RECORDS‑-RETURNS. (1) Every taxpayer and every person required to deduct
and withhold the tax imposed under this title shall keep records, render
statements, make returns, file reports, and perform other acts as the
department requires by rule. Each return shall be made under penalty of
perjury and on forms prescribed by the department. The department may require
other statements and reports be made under penalty of perjury and on forms
prescribed by the department. The department may require any taxpayer and any
person required to deduct and withhold the tax imposed under this title to
furnish to the department a correct copy of any return or document that the
taxpayer has filed with the internal revenue service or received from the
internal revenue service.

(2)
All books and records and other papers and documents required to be kept under
this title are subject to inspection by the department at all times during
business hours of the day.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 119.
PROVISIONS OF INTERNAL REVENUE CODE CONTROL. (1) To the extent possible
without being inconsistent with this title, all of the provisions of the
internal revenue code relating to the following subjects apply to the taxes
imposed under this title:

(a)
Time of payment of tax deducted and withheld under section 501 of this act;

(b)
Liability of transferees;

(c)
Time and manner of making returns, extensions of time for filing returns,
verification of returns, and the time when a return is deemed filed.

(2)
The department by rule may provide modifications and exceptions to the
provisions in subsection (1) of this section, if reasonably necessary to
facilitate the prompt, efficient, and equitable collection of tax under this
title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 120.
REFUNDS OF OVERPAYMENTS‑-OTHER ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS. (1) The
department shall refund all taxes improperly paid or collected.

(2)
The following sections apply to the administration of taxes imposed under this
title: RCW 82.32.020, 82.32.050, 82.32.060, 82.32.070, 82.32.090, 82.32.100,
82.32.105, 82.32.110, 82.32.120, 82.32.130, 82.32.140, 82.32.150, 82.32.160,
82.32.170, 82.32.180, 82.32.190, 82.32.200, 82.32.210, 82.32.220, 82.32.230,
82.32.235, 82.32.237, 82.32.240, 82.32.245, 82.32.260, 82.32.265, 82.32.300,
82.32.310, 82.32.320, 82.32.330, 82.32.340, 82.32.350, 82.32.360, and
82.32.380.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 121.
RULES. The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the
administration and enforcement of this title. The rules, to the extent
possible without being inconsistent with this title, shall follow the internal
revenue code and the regulations and rulings of the United States department of
the treasury with respect to the federal income tax. The department may adopt
as a part of these rules any portions of the internal revenue code and treasury
department regulations and rulings, in whole or in part.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 122.
CRIMES. (1) Any person who knowingly attempts to evade the tax imposed under
this title or payment thereof is guilty of a class C felony as provided in
chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2)
Any person required to collect tax imposed under this title who knowingly fails
to collect, truthfully account for, or pay over the tax is guilty of a class C
felony as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3)
Any person who knowingly fails to pay tax, pay estimated tax, make returns,
keep records, or supply information, as required under this title, is guilty of
a gross misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec.
123. RCW
41.40.052 and 1999 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the right of a person to a
pension, an annuity, or retirement allowance, any optional benefit, any other
right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter,
the various funds created by this chapter, and all moneys and investments and
income thereof, are hereby exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other
local tax, and shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the
operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or other process of law whatsoever,
and shall be unassignable.

(2)(a)
This section shall not be deemed to prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement
allowance from authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of premiums due on
any group insurance policy or plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised
of public employees of the state of Washington or its political subdivisions
and which has been approved for deduction in accordance with rules that may be
adopted by the state health care authority and/or the department, and this
section shall not be deemed to prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance
from authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of dues and other membership
fees to any retirement association or organization the membership of which is
composed of retired public employees, if a total of three hundred or more of
such retired employees have authorized such deduction for payment to the same
retirement association or organization.

(b)
This section does not prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from
authorizing deductions from that allowance for charitable purposes on the same
terms as employees and public officers under RCW 41.04.035 and 41.04.036.

(3)
Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the department from complying
with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter
26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter
74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll deduction issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060,
(d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court
order directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly
to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which
fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or
court order expressly authorized by federal law.

(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not exempt any pension
or other benefit received under this chapter from tax under Title 82A RCW, nor
does it prohibit the department of retirement systems from complying with the
tax withholding requirements of that title.

Sec.
124. RCW
82.03.130 and 1998 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall have jurisdiction to decide the following types of appeals:

(a)
Appeals taken pursuant to RCW 82.03.190.

(b)
Appeals from a county board of equalization pursuant to RCW 84.08.130.

(c)
Appeals by an assessor or landowner from an order of the director of revenue
made pursuant to RCW 84.08.010 and 84.08.060, if filed with the board of tax
appeals within thirty days after the mailing of the order, the right to such an
appeal being hereby established.

(d)
Appeals by an assessor or owner of an intercounty public utility or private car
company from determinations by the director of revenue of equalized assessed
valuation of property and the apportionment thereof to a county made pursuant
to chapter 84.12 and 84.16 RCW, if filed with the board of tax appeals within
thirty days after mailing of the determination, the right to such appeal being
hereby established.

(e)
Appeals by an assessor, landowner, or owner of an intercounty public utility or
private car company from a determination of any county indicated ratio for such
county compiled by the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.48.075:
PROVIDED, That

(i)
Said appeal be filed after review of the ratio under RCW 84.48.075(3) and not
later than fifteen days after the mailing of the certification; and

(ii)
The hearing before the board shall be expeditiously held in accordance with
rules prescribed by the board and shall take precedence over all matters of the
same character.

(f)
Appeals from the decisions of sale price of second class shorelands on
navigable lakes by the department of natural resources pursuant to RCW
79.94.210.

(g)
Appeals from urban redevelopment property tax apportionment district proposals
established by governmental ordinances pursuant to RCW 39.88.060.

(h)
Appeals from interest rates as determined by the department of revenue for use
in valuing farmland under current use assessment pursuant to RCW 84.34.065.

(i)
Appeals from revisions to stumpage value tables used to determine value by the
department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.33.091.

(j)
Appeals from denial of tax exemption application by the department of revenue
pursuant to RCW 84.36.850.

(k)
Appeals pursuant to RCW 84.40.038(3).

(l)
Appeals relating to income tax deficiencies and refunds including penalties and
interest under Title 82A RCW.

(2)
Except as otherwise specifically provided by law hereafter, the provisions of
RCW 1.12.070 shall apply to all notices of appeal filed with the board of tax
appeals.

Sec.
125. RCW
82.03.140 and 1988 c 222 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In
all appeals over which the board has jurisdiction under RCW 82.03.130, a party
taking an appeal may elect either a formal or an informal hearing, such
election to be made according to rules of practice and procedure to be
promulgated by the board: PROVIDED, That nothing shall prevent the assessor or
taxpayer, as a party to an appeal pursuant to RCW 84.08.130, within twenty days
from the date of the receipt of the notice of appeal, from filing with the
clerk of the board notice of intention that the hearing be a formal one:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall be construed to modify the
provisions of RCW 82.03.190: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That upon an appeal under
RCW 82.03.130(((5))) (1) (e) or (l), the director of revenue may,
within ten days from the date of its receipt of the notice of appeal, file with
the clerk of the board notice of its ((intention that the hearing be held
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW)) election of a formal hearing. In
the event that appeals are taken from the same decision, order, or
determination, as the case may be, by different parties and only one of such
parties elects a formal hearing, a formal hearing shall be granted.

PART
II

SALES
AND USE TAX REFORM

Sec.
201. RCW
82.04.050 and 1998 c 332 s 2, 1998 c 315 s 1, 1998 c 308 s 1, and 1998 c 275 s
1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of
tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business and
including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who
install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal
property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person who presents a
resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:

(a)
Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the
regular course of business without intervening use by such person; or

(b)
Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates
real or personal property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal
property becomes an ingredient or component of such real or personal property
without intervening use by such person; or

(c)
Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for
sale a new article of tangible personal property or substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing,
when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction
directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for
sale; or

(d)
Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing
ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the
primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(e)
Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of
competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065. The term shall
include every sale of tangible personal property which is used or consumed or
to be used or consumed in the performance of any activity classified as a
"sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property
is resold or utilized as provided in (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this
subsection following such use. The term also means every sale of tangible
personal property to persons engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW
82.04.280 (2) and (7) and 82.04.290.

(2)
The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include
the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for
labor and services rendered in respect to the following:

(a)
The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of
tangible personal property of or for consumers, including charges made for the
mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the
use of coin-operated laundry facilities when such facilities are situated in an
apartment house, rooming house, or mobile home park for the exclusive use of
the tenants thereof, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit
health care facilities((, and excluding services rendered in respect to live
animals, birds and insects));

(b)
The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for
consumers, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible
personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property
becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, and shall also include
the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of
earth excepting the mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or
agriculture;

(c)
The charge for labor and services rendered in respect to constructing,
repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or under any real property
owned by an owner who conveys the property by title, possession, or any other
means to the person performing such construction, repair, or improvement for
the purpose of performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the
property is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the
original owner;

(d)
The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the
cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing buildings or structures((,
but shall not include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes
of this section the term "janitorial services" shall mean those
cleaning and caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor
service businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing,
floor cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and
upholstery. The term "janitorial services" does not include
painting, papering, repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting));

(e)
The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to
automobile towing and similar automotive transportation services, but not in
respect to those required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f)
The sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging and all other
services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the
granting of any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the
renting or leasing of real property, and it shall be presumed that the
occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more
constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to use or
enjoy the same;

(g)
The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property, labor and services
to persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this subsection
when such sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used
or consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any activity
defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or consumption.
Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to modify subsection
(1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section
shall be construed to modify this subsection.

(3)
The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include
the sale of or charge made for all personal, business, or professional
services including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, ((received by persons engaging
in the following business activities:

(a)
Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to golf, pool,
billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips for sightseeing
purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;

(b)
Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;

(c)
Credit bureau services;

(d)
Automobile parking and storage garage services;

(e)
Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i)
horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming,
repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission
or distribution lines or equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an
electric utility;

(f)
Service charges associated with tickets to professional sporting events; and

(g)
The following personal services: Physical fitness services, tanning salon
services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services,
escort services, and dating services)) unless the purchaser
presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and purchases for the purpose
of:

(a)
Selling the service without intervening use by the purchaser in the regular course
of business; or

(b)
Incorporating the service as an integral part of a service specified in this
subsection that will be sold in the regular course of business.

(4)
The term shall also include the renting or leasing of tangible personal
property to consumers and the rental of equipment with an operator.

(5)
The term shall also include the providing of telephone service, as defined in
RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.

(6)
The term shall also include the sale of canned software other than a sale to a
person who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the
method of delivery to the end user, but shall not include custom software or
the customization of canned software.

(7)
The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services
rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or improving of any street,
place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal
or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and
which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.

(8)
The term shall also not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons
for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald,
fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings,
fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and
spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation
reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture; (b)
farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; and (c)
farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with
an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)
or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve
wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.

(9)
The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services
rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of
new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county
or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein
or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty
by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term include the sale of services or
charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority. Nor shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste
and other byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and
development.

(10)
Until July 1, 2003, the term shall not include the sale of or charge made for
labor and services rendered for environmental remedial action as defined in RCW
82.04.2635(2).

Sec.
202. RCW
82.04.060 and 1998 c 332 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

"Sale
at wholesale" or "wholesale sale" means any of the following
when not a sale at retail: (1) Any sale of tangible personal property; (2)
any sale of ((amusement or recreation)) services as defined in RCW
82.04.050(3)(((a))); (3) any sale of canned software; or (4) any sale of
telephone service as defined in RCW 82.04.065((, which is not a sale at
retail and)). "Sale at wholesale" or "wholesale
sale" also means any charge made for labor and services rendered for
persons who are not consumers, in respect to real or personal property, if such
charge is expressly defined as a retail sale by RCW 82.04.050 when rendered to
or for consumers: PROVIDED, That the term "real or personal
property" as used in this section shall not include any natural products
named in RCW 82.04.100.

Sec.
203. RCW
82.04.190 and 1998 c 332 s 6 and 1998 c 308 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

"Consumer"
means the following:

(1)
Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any article of
tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the person's business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who
install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal
property of or for consumers other than for the purpose (a) of resale as
tangible personal property in the regular course of business or (b) of
incorporating such property as an ingredient or component of real or personal
property when installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving,
constructing, or decorating such real or personal property of or for consumers
or (c) of consuming such property in producing for sale a new article of
tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such property becomes
an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in processing, when the
primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale or
(d) purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing
ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the
primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon;

(2)(a)
Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under RCW 82.04.290; (b)
any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any telephone service as defined in
RCW 82.04.065, other than for resale in the regular course of business; (c) any
person who purchases, acquires, or uses any amusement and recreation service
defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(((a))), other than for resale in the regular
course of business; and (d) any person who is an end user of software;

(3)
Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the building, repairing
or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass
public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state
of Washington or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily
for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any
kind as defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of such
publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass
public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
by installing, placing or spreading the property in or upon the right of way of
such street, place, road, highway, easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in
or upon the site of such mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility;

(4)
Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of possession to or an
easement in real property which is being constructed, repaired, decorated,
improved, or otherwise altered by a person engaged in business, excluding only
(a) municipal corporations or political subdivisions of the state in respect to
labor and services rendered to their real property which is used or held for
public road purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and
county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW in
respect to labor and services rendered to their real property. Nothing
contained in this or any other subsection of this definition shall be construed
to modify any other definition of "consumer";

(5)
Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of possession to personal
property which is being constructed, repaired, improved, cleaned, imprinted, or
otherwise altered by a person engaged in business;

(6)
Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating, or
improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above
real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a
county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW,
including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal
property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation; also, any person engaged in the
business of clearing land and moving earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant
to chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person shall be a consumer within the meaning
of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property incorporated into,
installed in, or attached to such building or other structure by such person;

(7)
((Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the rental of which
is exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under RCW 82.08.02565, with respect
to the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed in
respect to repairing the machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal
property has a useful life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or
any other subsection of this section shall be construed to modify any other
definition of "consumer";

(8))) Any
person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the United States, or its
instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production
and nuclear research and development; ((and

(9))) (8)
Until July 1, 2003, any person engaged in the business of conducting
environmental remedial action as defined in RCW 82.04.2635(2); and

(9)
Any person who purchases, acquires, uses, or receives the benefit of any
service specified in RCW 82.04.050(3), unless the person purchases for the
purpose of:

(a)
Selling the service without intervening use by the purchaser in the regular
course of business; or

(b)
Incorporating the service as an integral part of a service specified in this
subsection that will be sold in the regular course of business.

Sec.
204. RCW
82.04.460 and 1985 c 7 s 154 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person rendering services taxable under RCW 82.04.290 and maintaining
places of business both within and without this state which contribute to the
rendition of such services shall, for the purpose of computing tax liability
under RCW 82.04.290, apportion to this state that portion of his gross income
which is derived from services rendered within this state. Where such
apportionment cannot be accurately made by separate accounting methods, the
taxpayer shall apportion to this state that proportion of his total income
which the cost of doing business within the state bears to the total cost of
doing business both within and without the state.

(2)
Notwithstanding the provision of subsection (1) of this section, persons doing
business both within and without the state who receive gross income from
service charges, as defined in RCW 63.14.010 (relating to amounts charged for
granting the right or privilege to make deferred or installment payments) or
who receive gross income from engaging in business as financial institutions
within the scope of chapter 82.14A RCW (relating to city taxes on financial
institutions) shall apportion or allocate gross income taxable under RCW
82.04.290 to this state pursuant to rules promulgated by the department
consistent with uniform rules for apportionment or allocation developed by the
states.

(3)
The department shall by rule provide a method or methods of apportioning or
allocating gross income derived from sales of telephone services taxed under
this chapter or services defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050(3),
if the gross proceeds of sales subject to tax under this chapter do not fairly
represent the extent of the taxpayer's income attributable to this state. The
rules shall be, so far as feasible, consistent with the methods of
apportionment contained in this section and shall require the consideration of
those facts, circumstances, and apportionment factors as will result in an
equitable and constitutionally permissible division of the services.

Sec.
205. RCW
82.04.480 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
consignee, bailee, factor, or auctioneer having either actual or constructive
possession of tangible personal property, or having possession of the documents
of title thereto, with power to sell such tangible personal property in his or
its own name and actually so selling, and every agent with power to sell a
service defined as a retail sale in the agent's own name and actually so
selling, shall be deemed the seller of such tangible personal property or
service within the meaning of this chapter; and further, the consignor,
bailor, principal, or owner shall be deemed a seller of such property or
service to the consignee, bailee, factor, ((or)) auctioneer, or
agent.

The
burden shall be upon the taxpayer in every case to establish the fact that he or
she is not engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property or
service but is acting merely as broker or agent in promoting sales for a
principal. Such claim will be allowed only when the taxpayer's accounting
records are kept in such manner as the department ((of revenue)) shall
by general ((regulation)) rule provide.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 206. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of medical services. For
the purposes of this section, "medical services" means services
provided by physicians, dentists, chiropractors, optometrists, podiatrists, and
other health care practitioners; general medical and surgical hospitals,
psychiatric and substance abuse hospitals, specialty hospitals, outpatient care
centers, family planning centers, outpatient mental health and substance abuse
centers, health maintenance organization medical centers, kidney dialysis
centers, freestanding ambulatory surgery and emergency centers, medical and
diagnostic laboratories, diagnostic imaging centers, home health care
providers, ambulance businesses, blood and organ banks, nursing care
facilities, residential mental retardation facilities, residential mental
health and substance abuse facilities, care facilities for the elderly, continuing
care retirement communities, and homes for the elderly.

Sec.
207. RCW
82.08.020 and 1998 c 321 s 36 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this
state equal to ((six and five-tenths)) three percent of the
selling price.

(2)
((There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax on each
retail car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state,
equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue
collected under this subsection shall be deposited and distributed in the same
manner as motor vehicle excise tax revenue collected under RCW 82.44.020(1).

(3))) The
((taxes)) tax imposed under this chapter shall apply to
successive retail sales of the same property.

(((4)))
(3) The rate((s)) provided in this section ((apply)) applies
to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec.
208. RCW
82.08.0255 and 1998 c 176 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of((:

(a)
Motor vehicle fuel used in aircraft by the manufacturer thereof for research,
development, and testing purposes; and

(b))) motor
vehicle and special fuel if((:

(i)
The fuel is purchased for the purpose of public transportation and the
purchaser is entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW 82.36.275 or
82.38.080(3); or

(ii)
The fuel is purchased by a private, nonprofit transportation provider certified
under chapter 81.66 RCW and the purchaser is entitled to a refund or an
exemption under RCW 82.36.285 or 82.38.080(1)(h); or

(iii))) the
fuel is taxable under chapter 82.36 or 82.38 RCW.

(2)
Any person who has paid the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 on the sale of special
fuel delivered in this state shall be entitled to a credit or refund of such
tax with respect to fuel subsequently established to have been actually
transported and used outside this state by persons engaged in interstate
commerce. The tax shall be claimed as a credit or refunded through the tax
reports required under RCW 82.38.150.

Sec.
209. RCW
82.08.090 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the case of installment sales and leases of personal property, the
department ((of revenue, by regulation)) by rule, may provide for
the collection of taxes upon the installments of the purchase price, or amount
of rental, as of the time the same fall due.

(2)
In the case of services defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050(3), the
seller may collect taxes based upon payments of the purchase price, as of the
time the payments are made, regardless of the accounting method used by the
seller or whether the sales were made under an installment agreement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 210. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A seller shall collect the retail sales tax on all sales of services defined as
retail sales under RCW 82.04.050(3) unless the buyer provides the seller with a
multistate use certificate. A buyer shall not provide a multistate use
certificate if the service relates to or affects only a location, market,
property, or individual in this state.

(2)
The department shall adopt rules providing the form and information required to
be on multistate use certificates. The department shall establish by rule
evidence by which a buyer may demonstrate that the criteria in subsection (1)
of this section apply.

(3)
If a transaction involves both a service for which tax is collectible under
this section, and a service for which tax is not collectible under this
section, the charges shall be separately identified and stated with respect to
the collectible and noncollectible portions of the transaction. Failure to
separately state the charges creates a presumption that tax is collectible upon
the entire transaction under this section.

(4)
If the seller does not collect tax under this section, the buyer shall remit
any tax due with the buyer's next regularly scheduled return.

Sec.
211. RCW
82.12.010 and 1994 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter:

(1)(a)
"Value of the article used" shall mean the consideration, whether
money, credit, rights, or other property except trade-in property of like kind,
expressed in terms of money, paid or given or contracted to be paid or given by
the purchaser to the seller for the article of tangible personal property, the
use of which is taxable under this chapter. The term includes, in addition to
the consideration paid or given or contracted to be paid or given, the amount
of any tariff or duty paid with respect to the importation of the article
used. In case the article used is acquired by lease or by gift or is
extracted, produced, or manufactured by the person using the same or is sold
under conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
thereof, the value of the article used shall be determined as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar
products of like quality and character under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.

(b)
In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value of the use of the
articles so used shall be in an amount representing a reasonable rental for the
use of the articles so bailed, determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like quality
and character under such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In
case any such articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the
construction, repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become or are
to become an ingredient or component of, new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant
to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of any such
articles therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such
articles so used shall be determined according to the retail selling price of
such articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as possible
according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of
like quality and character or, in the absence of either of these selling price
measures, such value may be determined upon a cost basis, in any event under
such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe.

(c)
In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business outside the state
which are brought into the state for no more than one hundred eighty days in
any period of three hundred sixty-five consecutive days and which are
temporarily used for business purposes by the person in this state, the value
of the article used shall be an amount representing a reasonable rental for the
use of the articles, unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or
chapter 82.08 RCW upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of
this subsection.

(d)
In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user and used in the
manufacture or production of products sold or to be sold to the department of
defense of the United States, the value of the articles used shall be
determined according to the value of the ingredients of such articles.

(e)
In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes of serving as a
prototype for the development of a new or improved product, the value of the
article used shall be determined by: (i) The retail selling price of such new
or improved product when first offered for sale; or (ii) the value of materials
incorporated into the prototype in cases in which the new or improved product
is not offered for sale;

(2)
"Value of the service used" means the consideration, whether
money, credit, rights, or other property, expressed in terms of money, paid or
given or contracted to be paid or given by the purchaser to the seller for the
service, the use of which is taxable under this chapter. If the service is
received by gift or under conditions wherein the purchase price does not
represent the true value of the service, the value of the service used shall be
determined as nearly as possible according to the selling price at the place of
use of similar services under rules prescribed by the department of revenue;

(3)
"Use," "used," "using," or "put to use"
shall have their ordinary meaning, and shall mean:

(a)
With respect to tangible personal property, the first act within this state
by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of
tangible personal property (as a consumer), and include installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use
or consumption within this state; and

(b)
With respect to a service defined as a retail sale, the receipt by the taxpayer
of any part of the benefit afforded the service;

(((3)))
(4) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons
included within the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word
"consumer" as defined in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;

(((4)))
(5) "Retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010
and every person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property or
services at retail and every person required to collect from purchasers the
tax imposed under this chapter;

(((5)))
(6) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and
82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect
to taxes imposed under the provisions of this chapter. "Consumer,"
in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW insofar
as applicable, shall also mean any person who distributes or displays, or
causes to be distributed or displayed, any article of tangible personal
property, except newspapers, the primary purpose of which is to promote the
sale of products or services.

Sec.
212. RCW
82.12.020 and 1999 c 358 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from every person in this
state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within this state as a consumer:
(a) Any article of tangible personal property purchased at retail, or acquired
by lease, gift, repossession, or bailment, or extracted or produced or
manufactured by the person so using the same, or otherwise furnished to a
person engaged in any business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7); or (b)
any canned software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding canned
software that is either provided free of charge or is provided for temporary
use in viewing information, or both.

(2)
This tax shall apply to the use of every service defined as a retail sale in
RCW 82.04.050(3)(((a))) and the use of every article of tangible
personal property, including property acquired at a casual or isolated sale,
and including byproducts used by the manufacturer thereof, except as
hereinafter provided, irrespective of whether the article or similar articles
are manufactured or are available for purchase within this state.

(3)
Except as provided in RCW 82.12.0252, payment by one purchaser or user of tangible
personal property or service of the tax imposed by chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW
shall not have the effect of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same
property or service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.

(4)
The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the value of the
article used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in effect for the retail
sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 213. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of medical
services as defined in section 206 of this act.

Sec.
214. RCW
82.12.0252 and 1980 c 37 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property or service defined as a
retail sale purchased at retail or acquired by lease, gift or bailment if
the sale thereof to, or the use thereof by, the present user or ((his)) the
user's bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter
82.08 or 82.12 RCW and such tax has been paid by the present user or by his
bailor or donor; or in respect to the use of property acquired by bailment and
such tax has once been paid based on reasonable rental as determined by RCW
82.12.060 measured by the value of the article at time of first use multiplied
by the tax rate imposed by chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW as of the time of first
use; or in respect to the use of any article of tangible personal property
acquired by bailment, if the property was acquired by a previous bailee from
the same bailor for use in the same general activity and such original bailment
was prior to June 9, 1961.

Sec.
215. RCW
82.12.0255 and 1980 c 37 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of any article
of tangible personal property or any service defined as a retail sale
which the state is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution of the state
or under the Constitution or laws of the United States.

Sec.
216. RCW
82.12.0256 and 1998 c 176 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of((:

(1)
Motor vehicle fuel used in aircraft by the manufacturer thereof for research,
development, and testing purposes; and

(2)
Special fuel purchased in this state upon which a refund is obtained as
provided in RCW 82.38.180(2); and

(3))) motor
vehicle and special fuel if((:

(a)
The fuel is used for the purpose of public transportation and the purchaser is
entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW 82.36.275 or 82.38.080(3); or

(b)
The fuel is purchased by a private, nonprofit transportation provider certified
under chapter 81.66 RCW and the purchaser is entitled to a refund or an
exemption under RCW 82.36.285 or 82.38.080(1)(h); or

(c))) the fuel is taxable under chapter
82.36 or 82.38 RCW: PROVIDED, That the use of motor vehicle and special fuel
upon which a refund of the applicable fuel tax is obtained shall not be exempt
under this ((subsection (3)(c))) section, and the director of
licensing shall deduct from the amount of such tax to be refunded the amount of
tax due under this chapter and remit the same each month to the department of
revenue.

Sec.
217. RCW
82.12.035 and 1996 c 148 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A
credit shall be allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter upon the use
of tangible personal property, or services taxable under RCW 82.04.050(3)(((a))),
in the state of Washington in the amount that the present user thereof or his
or her bailor or donor has paid a retail sales or use tax with respect to such
property to any other state of the United States, any political subdivision
thereof, the District of Columbia, and any foreign country or political subdivision
thereof, prior to the use of such property in Washington.

Sec.
218. RCW
82.12.060 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the case of installment sales and leases of personal property, the
department, by ((regulation)) rule, may provide for the
collection of taxes upon the installments of the purchase price, or amount of
rental, as of the time the same fall due.

(2)
In the case of property acquired by bailment, the department, by ((regulation))
rule, may provide for payment of the tax due in installments based on
the reasonable rental for the property as determined under RCW 82.12.010(1).

(3)
In the case of services defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050(3), the
seller may collect taxes based upon payments of the purchase price, as of the
time the payments are made, regardless of the accounting method used by the
seller or whether the sales were made under an installment agreement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 219. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The entire value of a service used in this state is subject to tax under this
chapter, unless apportionment is allowed under this section.

(2)
A taxpayer maintaining places of business both within and without this state
may apportion the value of service used by the taxpayer. The taxable portion
of the value of the service equals the full value of the service multiplied by
an apportionment fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus
the payroll factor plus the sales factor, and the denominator of which is
three. The taxpayer's sales, property, and payroll factors shall be calculated
as provided in RCW 82.56.010, except the department may alter the components of
the apportionment factors by rule to be consistent with uniform rules for
apportionment or allocation developed by the states for particular industries.

(3)
The department shall provide by rule for the time and manner of recalculating
the apportionment formula. The apportionment factor shall not be required to
be recalculated more often than annually.

(4)
If the requirements of this section do not fairly represent the extent of the
taxpayer's use of a service in this state, the taxpayer may petition for, or
the department may require, in respect to all or any part of the taxpayer's use
of services, if reasonable:

(a)
Separate accounting;

(b)
The exclusion of any one or more of the factors;

(c)
The inclusion of one or more additional factors that will fairly represent the
taxpayer's use of services in this state; or

(d)
The employment of any other method to effectuate an equitable allocation and
apportionment of the taxpayer's use of services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 220. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
82.08.02525 (Exemptions--Sale of copied public records by state and
local agencies) and 1996 c 63 s 1;

(2) RCW
82.08.0253 (Exemptions--Sale and distribution of newspapers) and
1980 c 37 s 21;

(3) RCW
82.08.02535 (Exemptions--Sales and distribution of magazines or
periodicals by subscription for fund-raising) and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 8 s 1;

(4) RCW
82.08.02537 (Exemptions--Sales of academic transcripts) and 1996 c
272 s 2;

(5) RCW
82.08.0256 (Exemptions--Sale of the operating property of a public
utility to the state or a political subdivision) and 1980 c 37 s 24;

(6) RCW
82.08.02565 (Exemptions--Sales of machinery and equipment for manufacturing,
research and development, or a testing operation--Labor and services for
installation--Exemption certificate--Rules) and 1999 c 211 s 5, 1999 c 211 s 3,
& 1998 c 330 s 1;

(7) RCW
82.08.02566 (Exemptions--Sales of tangible personal property
incorporated in prototype for parts, auxiliary equipment, and aircraft
modification--Limitations on yearly exemption) and 1997 c 302 s 1 & 1996 c
247 s 4;

(8) RCW
82.08.02567 (Exemptions--Sales of, or labor and services for
installation of, machinery and equipment used in generating electricity using
wind, sun, or landfill gas--Exemption certificate--Rules) and 1999 c 358 s 4,
1998 c 309 s 1, & 1996 c 166 s 1;

(9) RCW
82.08.02568 (Exemptions--Sales of carbon and similar substances
that become an ingredient or component of anodes or cathodes used in producing
aluminum for sale) and 1996 c 170 s 1;

(10) RCW
82.08.02569 (Exemptions--Sales of tangible personal property
related to a building or structure that is an integral part of a laser
interferometer gravitational wave observatory) and 1996 c 113 s 1;

(11) RCW
82.08.0257 (Exemptions--Auction sales of tangible personal
property used in farming) and 1980 c 37 s 25;

(12) RCW
82.08.02573 (Exemptions--Sales by a nonprofit organization for
fund-raising activities) and 1998 c 336 s 3;

(13) RCW
82.08.0258 (Exemptions--Sales to federal corporations providing
aid and relief) and 1980 c 37 s 26;

(14) RCW
82.08.0259 (Exemptions--Sales of purebred livestock for
breeding--Cattle and milk cows) and 1980 c 37 s 27;

(15) RCW
82.08.0261 (Exemptions--Sales of personal property for use
connected with private or common carriers in interstate or foreign commerce)
and 1980 c 37 s 28;

(16) RCW
82.08.0262 (Exemptions--Sales of airplanes, locomotives, railroad
cars, or watercraft for use in interstate or foreign commerce or outside the
territorial waters of the state or airplanes sold to United States
government--Components thereof and of motor vehicles or trailers used for
constructing, repairing, cleaning, etc.--Labor and services for constructing,
repairing, cleaning, etc.) and 1998 c 311 s 5, 1994 c 43 s 1, & 1980 c 37 s
29;

(17) RCW
82.08.0263 (Exemptions--Sales of motor vehicles and trailers for
use in transporting persons or property in interstate or foreign commerce) and
1998 c 311 s 6, 1995 c 63 s 1, & 1980 c 37 s 30;

(18) RCW
82.08.0264 (Exemptions--Sales of motor vehicles, trailers, or
campers to nonresidents for use outside the state) and 1980 c 37 s 31;

(19) RCW
82.08.0265 (Exemptions--Sales to nonresidents of tangible personal
property which becomes a component of property of the nonresident by
installing, repairing, etc.--Labor and services for installing, repairing,
etc.) and 1980 c 37 s 32;

(20) RCW
82.08.0266 (Exemptions--Sales of watercraft to nonresidents for
use outside the state) and 1999 c 358 s 5 & 1980 c 37 s 33;

(21) RCW
82.08.02665 (Exemptions--Sales of watercraft, vessels to residents
of foreign countries) and 1999 c 358 s 6 & 1993 c 119 s 1;

(22) RCW
82.08.0267 (Exemptions--Sales of poultry for producing poultry and
poultry products for sale) and 1980 c 37 s 34;

(23) RCW
82.08.0268 (Exemptions--Sales of machinery and implements, and
related parts and labor, for farming to nonresidents for use outside the state)
and 1998 c 167 s 1 & 1980 c 37 s 35;

(24) RCW
82.08.0269 (Exemptions--Sales for use in states, territories, and
possessions of the United States which are not contiguous to any other state)
and 1980 c 37 s 36;

(25) RCW
82.08.0271 (Exemptions--Sales to municipal corporations, the
state, and political subdivisions of tangible personal property, labor and
services on watershed protection and flood prevention contracts) and 1980 c 37
s 37;

(26) RCW
82.08.0272 (Exemptions--Sales of semen for artificial insemination
of livestock) and 1980 c 37 s 38;

(27) RCW
82.08.0273 (Exemptions--Sales to nonresidents of tangible personal
property for use outside the state--Proof of nonresident status--Penalties) and
1993 c 444 s 1, 1988 c 96 s 1, 1982 1st ex.s. c 5 s 1, & 1980 c 37 s 39;

(28) RCW
82.08.0274 (Exemptions--Sales of form lumber to person engaged in
constructing, repairing, etc., structures for consumers) and 1980 c 37 s 40;

(29) RCW
82.08.02745 (Exemptions--Charges for labor and services or sales of
tangible personal property related to agricultural employee housing--Exemption
certificate--Rules) and 1997 c 438 s 1 & 1996 c 117 s 1;

(30) RCW
82.08.0275 (Exemptions--Sales of and labor and service charges for
mining, sorting, crushing, etc., of sand, gravel, and rock from county or city
quarry for public road purposes) and 1980 c 37 s 41;

(31) RCW
82.08.0276 (Exemptions--Sales of wearing apparel for use only as a
sample for display for sale) and 1980 c 37 s 42;

(32) RCW
82.08.0277 (Exemptions--Sales of pollen) and 1980 c 37 s 43;

(33) RCW
82.08.0278 (Exemptions--Sales between political subdivisions
resulting from annexation or incorporation) and 1980 c 37 s 44;

(34) RCW
82.08.0279 (Exemptions--Renting or leasing of motor vehicles and
trailers to a nonresident for use in the transportation of persons or property
across state boundaries) and 1980 c 37 s 45;

(35) RCW
82.08.02795 (Exemptions--Sales to free hospitals) and 1993 c 205 s
1;

(36) RCW 82.08.0282
(Exemptions--Sales of returnable containers for beverages and foods) and 1980 c
37 s 47;

(37) RCW
82.08.0285 (Exemptions--Sales of ferry vessels to the state or
local governmental units--Components thereof--Labor and service charges) and
1980 c 37 s 50;

(38) RCW
82.08.0287 (Exemptions--Sales of passenger motor vehicles as
ride-sharing vehicles) and 1996 c 244 s 4, 1995 c 274 s 2, 1993 c 488 s 2,
& 1980 c 166 s 1;

(39) RCW
82.08.02875 (Exemptions--Vehicle parking charges subject to tax at
stadium and exhibition center) and 1997 c 220 s 203;

(40) RCW
82.08.0288 (Exemptions--Lease of certain irrigation equipment) and
1983 1st ex.s. c 55 s 5;

(41) RCW
82.08.0289 (Exemptions--Certain network telephone service) and
1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 30;

(42) RCW
82.08.0291 (Exemptions--Sales of amusement and recreation services
or personal services by nonprofit youth organization--Local government physical
fitness classes) and 1994 c 85 s 1 & 1981 c 74 s 2;

(43) RCW
82.08.02915 (Exemptions--Sales used by health or social welfare
organizations for alternative housing for youth in crisis) and 1998 c 183 s 1,
1997 c 386 s 56, & 1995 c 346 s 1;

(44) RCW
82.08.02917 (Youth in crisis--Definition--Limited purpose) and 1995
c 346 s 3;

(45) RCW
82.08.0294 (Exemptions--Sales of feed for cultivating or raising
fish for sale) and 1985 c 148 s 3;

(46) RCW
82.08.0296 (Exemptions--Sales of feed consumed by livestock at a
public livestock market) and 1986 c 265 s 1;

(47) RCW
82.08.0298 (Exemptions--Sales of diesel fuel for use in operating
watercraft in commercial deep sea fishing or commercial passenger fishing boat
operations outside the state) and 1987 c 494 s 1;

(48) RCW
82.08.0299 (Exemptions--Emergency lodging for homeless
persons--Conditions) and 1988 c 61 s 1;

(49) RCW
82.08.031 (Exemptions--Sales to artistic or cultural
organizations of certain objects acquired for exhibition or presentation) and
1981 c 140 s 4;

(50) RCW
82.08.0311 (Exemptions--Sales of materials and supplies used in
packing horticultural products) and 1988 c 68 s 1;

(51) RCW
82.08.0315 (Exemptions--Rentals or sales related to motion picture
or video productions--Exceptions--Certificate) and 1997 c 61 s 1 & 1995 2nd
sp.s. c 5 s 1;

(52) RCW
82.08.036 (Exemptions--Vehicle battery core deposits or
credits--Replacement vehicle tire fees--"Core deposits or credits"
defined) and 1989 c 431 s 45;

(53) RCW
82.08.810 (Exemptions--Air pollution control facilities at a
thermal electric generation facility--Exceptions--Exemption
certificate--Payments on cessation of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 2;

(54) RCW
82.08.811 (Exemptions--Coal used at coal-fired thermal electric
generation facility--Application--Demonstration of progress in air pollution
control--Notice of emissions violations--Reapplication--Payments on cessation
of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 4;

(55) RCW
82.08.812 (Exemptions--Coal used at coal-fired thermal electric
generation facility--Forfeiture upon use of nonlocal coal
sources--Reinstatement) and 1997 c 368 s 5;

(56) RCW
82.08.820 (Exemptions--Remittance--Warehouse and grain elevators
and distribution centers--Material-handling and racking equipment--Construction
of warehouse or elevator--Information sheet--Rules--Records--Exceptions) and
1997 c 450 s 2;

(57) RCW
82.08.830 (Exemptions--Sales at camp or conference center by
nonprofit organization) and 1997 c 388 s 2;

(58) RCW
82.08.832 (Exemptions--Sales of gun safes) and 1998 c 178 s 1;

(59) RCW
82.12.02525 (Exemptions--Sale of copied public records by state and
local agencies) and 1996 c 63 s 2;

(60) RCW
82.12.02545 (Exemption--Use of naval aircraft training equipment
transferred due to base closure) and 1995 c 128 s 1;

(61) RCW
82.12.02565 (Exemptions--Machinery and equipment used for
manufacturing, research and development, or a testing operation) and 1999 c 211
s 6, 1998 c 330 s 2, 1996 c 247 s 3, & 1995 1st sp.s. c 3 s 3;

(62) RCW
82.12.02566 (Exemptions--Use of tangible personal property
incorporated in prototype for aircraft parts, auxiliary equipment, and aircraft
modification--Limitations on yearly exemption) and 1997 c 302 s 2 & 1996 c
247 s 5;

(63) RCW
82.12.02567 (Exemptions--Use of machinery and equipment used in
generating electricity using wind, sun, or landfill gas) and 1999 c 358 s 10,
1998 c 309 s 2, & 1996 c 166 s 2;

(64) RCW
82.12.02568 (Exemptions--Use of carbon and similar substances that
become an ingredient or component of anodes or cathodes used in producing
aluminum for sale) and 1996 c 170 s 2;

(65) RCW
82.12.02569 (Exemptions--Use of tangible personal property related
to a building or structure that is an integral part of a laser interferometer
gravitational wave observatory) and 1996 c 113 s 2;

(66) RCW
82.12.0257 (Exemptions--Use of tangible personal property of the
operating property of a public utility by state or political subdivision) and
1980 c 37 s 57;

(67) RCW
82.12.0258 (Exemptions--Use of tangible personal property
previously used in farming and purchased from farmer at auction) and 1980 c 37
s 58;

(68) RCW
82.12.0259 (Exemptions--Use of tangible personal property by
federal corporations providing aid and relief) and 1980 c 37 s 59;

(69) RCW
82.12.02595 (Exemptions--Use of donated tangible personal property
by nonprofit organization or governmental entity or for purpose donated--Use of
related property) and 1998 c 182 s 1 & 1995 c 201 s 1;

(70) RCW
82.12.0261 (Exemptions--Use of purebred livestock for
breeding--Cattle and milk cows) and 1980 c 37 s 60;

(71) RCW
82.12.0262 (Exemptions--Use of poultry for producing poultry and
poultry products for sale) and 1980 c 37 s 61;

(72) RCW
82.12.0263 (Exemptions--Use of fuel by extractor or manufacturer
thereof) and 1980 c 37 s 62;

(73) RCW
82.12.0264 (Exemptions--Use of dual-controlled motor vehicles by
school for driver training) and 1980 c 37 s 63;

(74) RCW
82.12.0265 (Exemptions--Use by bailee of tangible personal
property consumed in research, development, etc., activities) and 1980 c 37 s
64;

(75) RCW
82.12.0267 (Exemptions--Use of semen in artificial insemination of
livestock) and 1980 c 37 s 66;

(76) RCW
82.12.0268 (Exemptions--Use of form lumber by persons engaged in
constructing, repairing, etc., structures for consumers) and 1980 c 37 s 67;

(77) RCW
82.12.02685 (Exemptions--Use of tangible personal property related
to agricultural employee housing) and 1997 c 438 s 2 & 1996 c 117 s 2;

(78) RCW
82.12.0269 (Exemptions--Use of sand, gravel, or rock to extent of
labor and service charges for mining, sorting, crushing, etc., thereof from
county or city quarry for public road purposes) and 1980 c 37 s 68;

(79) RCW
82.12.0271 (Exemptions--Use of wearing apparel only as a sample
for display for sale) and 1980 c 37 s 69;

(80) RCW
82.12.0272 (Exemptions--Use of tangible personal property in
single trade shows) and 1980 c 37 s 70;

(81) RCW
82.12.0273 (Exemptions--Use of pollen) and 1980 c 37 s 71;

(82) RCW
82.12.0274 (Exemptions--Use of tangible personal property by
political subdivision resulting from annexation or incorporation) and 1980 c 37
s 72;

(83) RCW
82.12.02745 (Exemptions--Use by free hospitals of certain items)
and 1993 c 205 s 2;

(84) RCW
82.12.0276 (Exemptions--Use of returnable containers for beverages
and foods) and 1980 c 37 s 74;

(85) RCW
82.12.0279 (Exemptions--Use of ferry vessels by the state or local
governmental units--Components thereof) and 1980 c 37 s 77;

(86) RCW
82.12.0282 (Exemptions--Use of vans as ride-sharing vehicles) and
1999 c 358 s 11, 1996 c 88 s 4, 1993 c 488 s 4, & 1980 c 166 s 2;

(87) RCW
82.12.0283 (Exemptions--Use of certain irrigation equipment) and
1983 1st ex.s. c 55 s 6;

(88) RCW
82.12.0284 (Exemptions--Use of computers or computer components,
accessories, or software donated to schools or colleges) and 1983 1st ex.s. c
55 s 7;

(89) RCW
82.12.02915 (Exemptions--Use of items by health or social welfare
organizations for alternative housing for youth in crisis) and 1998 c 183 s 2,
1997 c 386 s 57, & 1995 c 346 s 2;

(90) RCW
82.12.02917 (Exemptions--Use of amusement and recreation services
by nonprofit youth organization) and 1999 c 358 s 7;

(91) RCW
82.12.0294 (Exemptions--Use of feed for cultivating or raising
fish for sale) and 1985 c 148 s 4;

(92) RCW
82.12.0296 (Exemptions--Use of feed consumed by livestock at a
public livestock market) and 1986 c 265 s 2;

(93) RCW
82.12.0298 (Exemptions--Use of diesel fuel in operating watercraft
in commercial deep sea fishing or commercial passenger fishing boat operations
outside the state) and 1987 c 494 s 2;

(94) RCW
82.12.031 (Exemptions--Use by artistic or cultural organizations
of certain objects) and 1981 c 140 s 5;

(95) RCW
82.12.0311 (Exemptions--Use of materials and supplies in packing
horticultural products) and 1988 c 68 s 2;

(96) RCW
82.12.0315 (Exemptions--Rental or sales related to motion picture
or video productions--Exceptions) and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 2;

(97) RCW
82.12.0345 (Exemptions--Use of newspapers) and 1994 c 124 s 11;

(98) RCW
82.12.0347 (Exemptions--Use of academic transcripts) and 1996 c
272 s 3;

(99) RCW
82.12.038 (Exemptions--Vehicle battery core deposits or
credits--Replacement vehicle tire fees--"Core deposits or credits"
defined) and 1989 c 431 s 46;

(100) RCW
82.12.800 (Exemptions--Uses of vessel, vessel's trailer by
manufacturer) and 1997 c 293 s 1;

(101) RCW
82.12.801 (Exemptions--Uses of vessel, vessel's trailer by
dealer) and 1997 c 293 s 2;

(102) RCW
82.12.802 (Vessels held in inventory by dealer or
manufacturer--Tax on personal use--Documentation--Rules) and 1997 c 293 s 3;

(103) RCW
82.12.810 (Exemptions--Air pollution control facilities at a
thermal electric generation facility--Exceptions--Payments on cessation of
operation) and 1997 c 368 s 3;

(104) RCW
82.12.811 (Exemptions--Coal used at coal-fired thermal electric generation
facility--Application--Demonstration of progress in air pollution
control--Notice of emissions violations-- Reapplication--Payments on cessation
of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 6;

(105) RCW
82.12.812 (Exemptions--Coal used at coal-fired thermal electric
generation facility--Forfeiture upon use of nonlocal coal
sources--Reinstatement) and 1997 c 368 s 7;

(106) RCW
82.12.820 (Exemptions--Remittance--Warehouse and grain elevators
and distribution centers--Material-handling and racking equipment--Construction
of warehouse or elevator--Information sheet--Rules--Records--Exceptions) and
1997 c 450 s 3; and

(107) RCW
82.12.832 (Exemptions--Use of gun safes) and 1998 c 178 s 2.

PART
III

BUSINESS
AND OCCUPATION TAX

Sec.
301. RCW
82.04.230 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
every person engaging within this state in business as an extractor; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be equal to
the value of the products, including byproducts, extracted for sale or for
commercial or industrial use, multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.33
percent.

The
measure of the tax is the value of the products, including byproducts, so
extracted, regardless of the place of sale or the fact that deliveries may be
made to points outside the state.

Sec.
302. RCW
82.04.240 and 1998 c 312 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
every person except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260 (1), (2), (4), (5), or
(6) engaging within this state in business as a manufacturer; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be equal to
the value of the products, including byproducts, manufactured, multiplied by
the rate of ((0.484)) 0.33 percent.

The
measure of the tax is the value of the products, including byproducts, so
manufactured regardless of the place of sale or the fact that deliveries may be
made to points outside the state.

Sec.
303. RCW
82.04.250 and 1998 c 312 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(EFFECTIVE
UNTIL JULY 1, 2001.) (1) Upon every person except persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(5) or subsection (2) of this section engaging within this state in
the business of making sales at retail, as to such persons, the amount of tax
with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of
the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.471)) 0.33 percent.

(2)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales at
retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW by reason
of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263, as to such persons, the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.33 percent.

Sec.
304. RCW
82.04.250 and 1998 c 343 s 5 and 1998 c 312 s 4 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2001.) (1) Upon every person except persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(5), 82.04.272, or subsection (2) of this section engaging within this
state in the business of making sales at retail, as to such persons, the amount
of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of
sales of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.471)) 0.33
percent.

(2)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales at
retail that are exempt from the tax imposed under chapter 82.08 RCW by reason
of RCW 82.08.0261, 82.08.0262, or 82.08.0263, as to such persons, the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales
of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.33
percent.

Sec.
305. RCW
82.04.255 and 1997 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
every person engaging within the state as a real estate broker; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be equal to
the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of ((1.5)) 0.33
percent.

The
measure of the tax on real estate commissions earned by the real estate broker
shall be the gross commission earned by the particular real estate brokerage
office including that portion of the commission paid to salesmen or associate
brokers in the same office on a particular transaction: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That where a real estate commission is divided between an originating brokerage
office and a cooperating brokerage office on a particular transaction, each
brokerage office shall pay the tax only upon their respective shares of said
commission: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That where the brokerage office has paid the
tax as provided herein, salesmen or associate brokers within the same brokerage
office shall not be required to pay a similar tax upon the same transaction.

Sec.
306. RCW
82.04.260 and 1998 c 312 s 5 and 1998 c 311 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:

(a)
Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola
into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts, or sunflower seeds into
sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola
meal, or canola byproduct manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent;

(b)
Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the
completion of the manufacturing by that person; as to such persons the amount
of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and

(c)
By canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits and vegetables,
or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and vegetables canned, preserved, frozen,
processed, or dehydrated by the seller and sold to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of this state; as to such persons
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of
the products canned, preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated multiplied by
the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of sale to a person who transports in the
ordinary course of business goods out of this state, the seller shall annually
provide a statement in a form prescribed by the department and retain the
statement as a business record.

(2)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or
processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
such business shall be equal to the value of the peas split or processed,
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(3)
Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this
state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations,
the amount of tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.33
percent.

(4)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering,
breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at
wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed shall be
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.

(5)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales,
at retail or wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies manufactured by that person,
as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be
equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the assemblies multiplied by the rate
of 0.275 percent.

(6)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing
nuclear fuel assemblies, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
such business shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(7)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a
travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the amount of the tax with
respect to such activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(8)
Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international
steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight
forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or
international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with
respect to only international activities shall be equal to the gross income
derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(9)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and
associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in
waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax
with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to
taxation under this subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed by
chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under
this subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce
are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation nature
whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges, passing
over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be moved to
a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await further
movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight station and
be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for delivery to
its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition are: Wharfage,
handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient place of delivery
to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement to export mode;
documentation services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking,
care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo; imported
automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal stevedoring and
incidental vessel services, including but not limited to plugging and
unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other refrigerated
cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.

(10)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of
low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such persons the amount of
the tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross income of the
business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by
the rate of ((3.3)) 0.33 percent.

If
the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and
without this state, the gross income attributable to this state shall be determined
in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.

(11)
Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance agent, insurance
broker, or insurance solicitor licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities shall
be equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))
0.33 percent.

(12)
Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as
defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by
the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount
of tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the gross income of
the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and
1.5 percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the health services account created under RCW 43.72.900.

Sec.
307. RCW
82.04.263 and 1996 c 112 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
every person engaging within this state in the business of cleaning up for the
United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other byproducts
of weapons production and nuclear research and development; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value
of the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of ((0.471)) 0.33
percent.

For the purposes of this chapter, "cleaning up radioactive
waste and other byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and
development" means the activities of handling, storing, treating,
immobilizing, stabilizing, or disposing of radioactive waste, radioactive tank
waste and capsules, nonradioactive hazardous solid and liquid wastes, or spent
nuclear fuel; spent nuclear fuel conditioning; removal of contamination in
soils and ground water; decontamination and decommissioning of facilities; and
activities integral and necessary to the direct performance of cleanup.

Sec.
308. RCW
82.04.2635 and 1998 c 308 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of environmental
remedial action, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the value of the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate ((0.471))
of 0.33 percent.

(2)
For purposes of this chapter, "environmental remedial action" means:

(a)
Those services related to the identification, investigation, or cleanup arising
out of the release or threatened release of hazardous substances that are
conducted under contract with the department of ecology or under an enforcement
order, agreed order, or consent decree executed by the department of ecology,
or those services, when evaluated as a whole, that are the substantial
equivalent of a department of ecology-conducted or supervised remedial action
under the model toxics control act, chapter 70.105D RCW; or

(b)
Those services related to the identification, investigation, or cleanup of a
facility that are conducted under contract with the United States environmental
protection agency or under an order or consent decree executed by the United
States environmental protection agency, or that are consistent with the
national contingency plan adopted under the comprehensive environmental
response compensation and liability act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605 as it exists on
July 1, 1998, and those services are conducted at facilities that are included
on the national priorities list adopted under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605 as it exists
on July 1, 1998, or at facilities subject to a removal action authorized under
42 U.S.C. Sec. 9604 as it exists on July 1, 1998.

(3)
A site is eligible for environmental remedial action upon submittal, via
certified mail to the department of ecology and the department of revenue, of
the following:

(a)
A certification from the owner, the department of ecology, or the United States
environmental protection agency, containing the following information:

(i)
The location of the site, shown on a map and identified by parcel number or
numbers and street address;

(ii)
The name and address and daytime phone number of a contact person;

(iii)
A statement that the proposed environmental remedial actions will be conducted
by the department of ecology or its authorized contractor under chapter 70.105D
RCW or will be substantially equivalent to a department of ecology-conducted or
supervised remedial action under the model toxics control act, chapter 70.105D
RCW, or will be conducted by the United States environmental protection agency
or its authorized contractor or will be consistent with the national
contingency plan under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 9605 as it exists on July 1, 1998; and

(iv)
A description of the proposed environmental remedial actions to be taken; and

(b)(i)
A certification from a certified underground storage tank service supervisor as
authorized in chapter 90.76 RCW, from a professional engineer licensed in the
state of Washington, or from an environmental professional who subscribes to a
code of professional responsibility administered by a recognized organization
representing such professions containing the following information:

(A)
Confirmation that an environmental remedial action as defined in this section
is to be conducted at the site;

(B)
The location of the site, shown on a map and identified by parcel number or
numbers and street address, and the approximate location of the proposed
environmental remedial action; and

(C)
The name, address, telephone number, and uniform business identifier of the
person providing the certification; or

(ii)
If applicable to the site, a copy of an enforcement order, agreed order, or
consent decree executed by the department of ecology or the United States
environmental protection agency.

(4)
The department of revenue shall respond in writing to the owner within thirty
days confirming receipt of the certification, or certifications, of
eligibility.

(5)
The owner shall provide a copy of the confirmation from the department of
revenue to each person who renders environmental remedial action at the site.
Each person who renders such action shall separately state the charges for
labor and services associated with the environmental remedial action.

(6)
Upon completion of the environmental remedial action, the owner shall submit to
the department of ecology a report documenting the environmental remedial
actions conducted at the site and documenting compliance with the requirements
of chapter 70.105D RCW.

(7)
In addition to any other penalties, a person who files a certificate with the
department of ecology or the department of revenue that contains falsehoods or
misrepresentations are subject to penalties authorized under chapter 18.43 or
90.76 RCW or RCW 9A.76.175. Also, a person who improperly reports the person's
tax class shall be assessed a penalty of fifty percent of the tax due, in
addition to other taxes or penalties, together with interest. The department
of revenue shall waive the penalty imposed under this section if it finds that
the falsehoods or misrepresentations or improper reporting of the tax
classification was due to circumstances beyond the control of the person.

(8) This section expires July 1, 2003.

Sec.
309. RCW
82.04.270 and 1999 c 358 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(EFFECTIVE
UNTIL JULY 1, 2001.) Upon every person except persons taxable under RCW
82.04.260(5) engaging within this state in the business of making sales at
wholesale; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of such business multiplied by
the rate of ((0.484)) 0.33 percent.

Sec.
310. RCW
82.04.270 and 1999 c 358 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2001.) Upon every person except persons taxable under RCW 82.04.260(5)
or 82.04.272 engaging within this state in the business of making sales at
wholesale; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the gross proceeds of sales of such business multiplied by
the rate of ((0.484)) 0.33 percent.

Sec.
311. RCW
82.04.280 and 1994 c 112 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(EFFECTIVE
UNTIL JULY 1, 2001.) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of: (1) Printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or
magazines; (2) building, repairing or improving any street, place, road,
highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation
or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used
or to be used, primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass
transportation vehicles of any kind and including any readjustment,
reconstruction or relocation of the facilities of any public, private or
cooperatively owned utility or railroad in the course of such building,
repairing or improving, the cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or
relocation, is the responsibility of the public authority whose street, place,
road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal or
parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle is being built, repaired or
improved; (3) extracting for hire or processing for hire; (4) operating a cold
storage warehouse or storage warehouse, but not including the rental of cold
storage lockers; (5) representing and performing services for fire or casualty
insurance companies as an independent resident managing general agent licensed under
the provisions of RCW 48.05.310; (6) radio and television broadcasting,
excluding network, national and regional advertising computed as a standard
deduction based on the national average thereof as annually reported by the
Federal Communications Commission, or in lieu thereof by itemization by the
individual broadcasting station, and excluding that portion of revenue
represented by the out-of-state audience computed as a ratio to the station's
total audience as measured by the 100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery
by wire, if any; (7) engaging in activities which bring a person within the
definition of consumer contained in RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the
amount of tax on such business shall be equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.33 percent.

As
used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables,
meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a
desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly
marketing.

As
used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are
received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit
warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW,
public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight sheds, docks and wharves,
and "self-storage" or "mini storage" facilities whereby
customers have direct access to individual storage areas by separate entrance.

As
used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at
least once every three months, including any supplement or special edition of
the publication.

Sec.
312. RCW
82.04.280 and 1998 c 343 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2001.) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of: (1) Printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or magazines; (2)
building, repairing or improving any street, place, road, highway, easement,
right of way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or political
subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is used or to be
used, primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation
vehicles of any kind and including any readjustment, reconstruction or
relocation of the facilities of any public, private or cooperatively owned
utility or railroad in the course of such building, repairing or improving, the
cost of which readjustment, reconstruction, or relocation, is the responsibility
of the public authority whose street, place, road, highway, easement, right of
way, mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel,
or trestle is being built, repaired or improved; (3) extracting for hire or
processing for hire; (4) operating a cold storage warehouse or storage
warehouse, but not including the rental of cold storage lockers; (5)
representing and performing services for fire or casualty insurance companies
as an independent resident managing general agent licensed under the provisions
of RCW 48.05.310; (6) radio and television broadcasting, excluding network,
national and regional advertising computed as a standard deduction based on the
national average thereof as annually reported by the Federal Communications
Commission, or in lieu thereof by itemization by the individual broadcasting
station, and excluding that portion of revenue represented by the out-of-state
audience computed as a ratio to the station's total audience as measured by the
100 micro-volt signal strength and delivery by wire, if any; (7) engaging in
activities which bring a person within the definition of consumer contained in
RCW 82.04.190(6); as to such persons, the amount of tax on such business shall
be equal to the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of ((0.484))
0.33 percent.

As
used in this section, "cold storage warehouse" means a storage
warehouse used to store fresh and/or frozen perishable fruits or vegetables,
meat, seafood, dairy products, or fowl, or any combination thereof, at a
desired temperature to maintain the quality of the product for orderly
marketing.

As
used in this section, "storage warehouse" means a building or
structure, or any part thereof, in which goods, wares, or merchandise are
received for storage for compensation, except field warehouses, fruit
warehouses, fruit packing plants, warehouses licensed under chapter 22.09 RCW,
public garages storing automobiles, railroad freight sheds, docks and wharves,
and "self-storage" or "mini storage" facilities whereby
customers have direct access to individual storage areas by separate entrance.
"Storage warehouse" does not include a building or structure, or that
part of such building or structure, in which an activity taxable under RCW
82.04.272 is conducted.

As
used in this section, "periodical or magazine" means a printed
publication, other than a newspaper, issued regularly at stated intervals at
least once every three months, including any supplement or special edition of
the publication.

Sec.
313. RCW
82.04.290 and 1998 c 331 s 2, 1998 c 312 s 8, and 1998 c 308 s 4 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(EFFECTIVE
UNTIL JULY 1, 2001.) (1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business multiplied by a rate of
0.275 percent.

(2)
Upon every person engaging within this state in any business activity other
than or in addition to those enumerated in RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250,
82.04.255, 82.04.260, 82.04.270, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2635, and
82.04.2907, and subsection (1) of this section; as to such persons the amount
of tax on account of such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of ((1.5)) 0.33 percent.

This
section includes, among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether
or not title to materials used in the performance of such business passes to
another by accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons
engaged in the business of rendering any type of service which does not
constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale."
The value of advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials
furnished to an agent by his principal or supplier to be used for
informational, educational and promotional purposes shall not be considered a
part of the agent's remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to
taxation under this section.

Sec.
314. RCW
82.04.290 and 1998 c 343 s 4, 1998 c 331 s 2, 1998 c 312 s 8, and 1998 c 308 s
4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2001, UNTIL JULY 1, 2003.) (1) Upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of providing international investment management
services, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.

(2)
Upon every person engaging within this state in any business activity other
than or in addition to those enumerated in RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250,
82.04.255, 82.04.260, 82.04.270, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2635, 82.04.2907,
and 82.04.272, and subsection (1) of this section; as to such persons the
amount of tax on account of such activities shall be equal to the gross income
of the business multiplied by the rate of ((1.5)) 0.33 percent.

This
section includes, among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether
or not title to materials used in the performance of such business passes to
another by accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons
engaged in the business of rendering any type of service which does not
constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale."
The value of advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials
furnished to an agent by his principal or supplier to be used for
informational, educational and promotional purposes shall not be considered a
part of the agent's remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to
taxation under this section.

Sec.
315. RCW
82.04.290 and 1998 c 343 s 4, 1998 c 331 s 2, 1998 c 312 s 8, and 1998 c 308 s
5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2003.) (1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business multiplied by a rate of
0.275 percent.

(2)
Upon every person engaging within this state in any business activity other
than or in addition to those enumerated in RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250,
82.04.255, 82.04.260, 82.04.270, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2907, and
82.04.272, and subsection (1) of this section; as to such persons the amount of
tax on account of such activities shall be equal to the gross income of the
business multiplied by the rate of ((1.5)) 0.33 percent.

This
section includes, among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether
or not title to materials used in the performance of such business passes to
another by accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons
engaged in the business of rendering any type of service which does not
constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale."
The value of advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials
furnished to an agent by his principal or supplier to be used for
informational, educational and promotional purposes shall not be considered a
part of the agent's remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to
taxation under this section.

Sec.
316. RCW
82.04.2905 and 1998 c 312 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
every person engaging within this state in the business of providing child care
for periods of less than twenty-four hours; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived
from such sales multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.33 percent.

Sec.
317. RCW
82.04.2907 and 1998 c 331 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
every person engaging within this state in the business of receiving income
from royalties or charges in the nature of royalties for the granting of
intangible rights, such as copyrights, licenses, patents, or franchise fees,
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross
income from royalties or charges in the nature of royalties from the business
multiplied by the rate of ((0.484)) 0.33 percent.

"Royalties"
means compensation for the use of intangible property, such as copyrights,
patents, licenses, franchises, trademarks, trade names, and similar items. It
does not include compensation for any natural resource.

PART
IV

REAL
PROPERTY EXCISE TAX

Sec.
401. RCW
82.45.060 and 1987 c 472 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property at the rate of
one ((and twenty-eight one-hundredths)) percent of the selling price.
An amount equal to seven and seven-tenths percent of the proceeds of this tax
to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the public works assistance
account created in RCW 43.155.050.

(((2)
There is imposed an additional excise tax through June 30, 1989, upon each sale
of real property at the rate of six one-hundredths of one percent of the
selling price. The tax imposed under this subsection shall be deposited in the
conservation area account under RCW 79.71.110.))

PART
V

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 501.
CAPTIONS AND HEADINGS. Section captions and part headings as used in this act
constitute no part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 502.
Sections 303, 309, 311, and 313 of this act expire July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 503.
Section 314 of this act expires July 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 504.
Sections 304, 310, 312, and 314 of this act take effect July 1, 2001, only if
the contingency in section 508 of this act requiring passage of a
constitutional amendment occurs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 505.
Section 315 of this act takes effect July 1, 2003, only if the contingency in
section 508 of this act requiring passage of a constitutional amendment occurs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 506.
CODIFICATION. Sections 101 through 122 of this act constitute a new title, to
be codified as Title 82A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 507.
SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of this act or its application to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the
application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508.
Except as provided in sections 504 and 505 of this act, this act takes effect
January 1, 2001, if an amendment to Article VII of the state Constitution
authorizing an income tax and setting maximum tax rates is validly submitted to
and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election. If
the proposed amendment is not so approved and ratified, this act is null and
void in its entirety.

---
END ---