BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.19.010 and 1987 c 512 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The qualifications and practices of counselors in this state are virtually
unknown to potential clients. Beyond the regulated practices of psychiatry and
psychology, there are a considerable variety of disciplines, theories, and
techniques employed by other counselors under a number of differing titles.
The legislature recognizes the right of all counselors to practice their skills
freely, consistent with the requirements of the public health and safety, as
well as the right of individuals to choose which counselors best suit their
needs and purposes. This chapter shall not be construed to require or prohibit
that individual or group policies or contracts of an insurance carrier, health
care service contractor, or health maintenance organization provide benefits or
coverage for services and supplies provided by a person registered or ((certified))
licensed under this chapter.

(2)
There are three existing professional mental health professions that have
become valued disciplines within the larger scope of mental health practices
over the past twenty-five years. These include social work, mental health
counseling, and marriage and family therapy. Though these professions may use
a variety of theoretical orientations, they have demonstrated a comprehensive
body of knowledge that can be quantified and used as the basis for ethical
practice. While all counselors have the right to practice their skills freely,
for a profession to become licensed, its practitioners must demonstrate skills
that are internally cohesive and successful in practice. Social work, mental
health counseling, and marriage and family therapy have met these criteria.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.19.020 and 1991 c 3 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.

(1)
(("Certified marriage and family therapist" means a person
certified to practice marriage and family therapy pursuant to RCW 18.19.130.

(2)
"Certified mental health counselor" means a person certified to
practice mental health counseling pursuant to RCW 18.19.120.

(3)
"Certified social worker" means a person certified to practice social
work pursuant to RCW 18.19.110.)) "Approved clinical
supervisor" means a licensed independent clinical social worker, licensed
marriage and family therapist, or licensed mental health counselor, who has met
the qualifications to be a clinical supervisor.

(2)
"Approved social work program" means a school of social work or a
social work educational program that has been accredited by the council on
social work education, as determined by the secretary.

(3)
"Case management" means the application of social work knowledge
including finding appropriate services, providing assistance with daily living
tasks, assessing needs of clients in terms of service needs, and providing
referrals to needed services.

(4)
"Client" means an individual ((who)), couple, family,
group, organization, or community that receives or participates in
counseling or group counseling.

(5)
"Clinical supervision" means a professional relationship between a
supervisor and a social worker, marriage and family therapist, or mental health
counselor that provides evaluation and direction to the supervisee and promotes
continued development of the social worker's knowledge skills and abilities in
master's, advanced, or clinical social work, marriage and family therapy, or
mental health counseling.

(6)
"Consultation" means problem solving in a process that offers social
work expertise to an individual, couple, family, group, organization, or
community.

(7)
"Continuing education" means education and training that will
maintain, improve, or enhance social work knowledge and practice.

(8)
"Counseling" means licensed counseling as defined in subsection
(13) of this section or employing any therapeutic techniques, including but
not limited to social work, mental health counseling, marriage and family
therapy, and hypnotherapy, for a fee that offer, assist or attempt to assist an
individual or individuals in the amelioration or adjustment of mental,
emotional, or behavioral problems, and includes therapeutic techniques to
achieve sensitivity and awareness of self and others and the development of
human potential. For the purposes of this chapter, nothing may be construed to
imply that the practice of hypnotherapy is necessarily limited to counseling.

(((6)))
(9) "Counselor" means an individual, practitioner, therapist,
or analyst who engages in the practice of counseling to the public for a fee,
including for the purposes of this chapter, hypnotherapists.

(((7)))
(10) "Department" means the department of health.

(11)
"Independent practice" means the practice of clinical social work,
marriage and family therapy, and mental health counseling outside an organized
setting, such as a social, governmental, or medical agency, in which a clinical
social worker, marriage and family therapist, and mental health counselor
assumes responsibility and accountability for services provided.

(12)
"Licensed advanced social worker" means a person licensed to practice
advanced social work under this chapter.

(13)
"Licensed counseling" means the application of social work, marriage
and family therapy, or mental health counseling knowledge to a client with
problems in relationships or with the environment through a supportive
relationship, providing advice, and techniques that help a client to cope with
current life stresses.

(14)
"Licensed independent clinical social worker" means a person licensed
to practice independent clinical social work under this chapter.

(15)
"Licensed marriage and family therapist" means a person licensed to
practice marriage and family therapy under this chapter.

(16)
"Licensed mental health counselor" means a person licensed to
practice mental health counseling under this chapter.

(17)
"Licensed social worker" means a person licensed to practice master's
level social work under this chapter.

(18)
"Mental health advisory committee" means the advisory committee
created under this chapter to advise the secretary on disciplinary matters,
continuing education, scope of practice issues, and any other matters related
to the professions of social work, marriage and family therapy, and mental
health counseling.

(19)
"Mental health counseling" means the application of principles of
human development, learning theory, group dynamics, and etiology of mental
illness and dysfunctional behavior to individuals, couples, families, groups,
and organizations, for the purpose of treating mental disorders and promoting
optimal mental health and functionality. It includes, but is not limited to,
the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of mental and emotional disorders, as
well as the application of a wellness model of mental health.

(20)
"Psychotherapy" means the diagnosis and treatment of emotional
disorders through the utilization of specialized formal interaction between a
clinical social worker, a marriage and family therapist, or a mental health
counselor, and a client. It includes a therapeutic relationship that is
established, maintained, and sustained through attention to conscious and
unconscious processes in the treatment of psychosocial disorders, emotional
disorders, behavioral disorders, addictive disorders, and interpersonal
disorders.

(((8)))
(21) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or the
secretary's designee.

PART
ONE

REGISTRATION
OF COUNSELORS

Sec.
3. RCW
18.19.030 and 1991 c 3 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

No
person may, for a fee or as a part of his or her position as an employee of a
state agency, practice counseling without being registered to practice by the
department under this chapter unless exempt under RCW 18.19.040. ((No
person may represent himself or herself as a certified social worker, certified
mental health counselor, or certified marriage and family therapist without
being so certified by the department under this chapter.))

Sec.
4. RCW
18.19.090 and 1991 c 3 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary shall issue a registration to any applicant who submits, on forms
provided by the secretary, the applicant's name, address, occupational title,
name and location of business, and other information as determined by the
secretary, including information necessary to determine whether there are
grounds for denial of registration or issuance of a conditional registration
under this chapter or chapter 18.130 RCW. Applicants for registration shall
register as counselors or may register as hypnotherapists if employing hypnosis
as a modality. Applicants shall, in addition, provide in their titles a
description of their therapeutic orientation, discipline, theory, or
technique. Each applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary as
provided in RCW 43.70.250, which ((shall)) must accompany the
application.

PART
TWO

LICENSED
SOCIAL WORK

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
legislature finds that the practice of social work affects the public health,
safety, and welfare, and that only qualified persons should be permitted to
engage in the practice. The legislature declares that the licensure of social
work practice by the state is in the public interest.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
No person may represent himself or herself as a licensed social worker,
licensed advanced social worker, or licensed independent clinical social worker
without being licensed by the department under this chapter unless exempted by
this chapter.

(2)
No public employee may represent himself or herself as a social worker,
advanced social worker, or independent clinical social worker without holding a
baccalaureate, master's, or doctoral degree from an educational program in
social work approved by the secretary.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
secretary shall issue a license to practice social work, advanced social work,
or independent clinical social work to an applicant who demonstrates to the
secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(1)
For a license to practice social work, the qualifications are:

(a)
Graduation from a master's level educational program approved by the secretary;
and

(b)
Successful completion of an approved examination.

(2)
For a license to practice advanced social work, the qualifications are:

(a)
Graduation from a master's or doctorate educational program approved by the
secretary; and

(b)
Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement. The experience
requirement consists of a minimum of three thousand two hundred hours of
experience over a two-year period as a licensed social worker, with supervision
by a licensed clinical social worker of at least ninety hours. Of the total
supervision, fifty hours must be in individual face-to-face supervision by a
licensed advanced social worker, and forty hours of supervision may be with
another qualified mental health professional. Distance supervision may be
obtained for no more than forty hours supervision.

(3)
For a license to practice independent clinical social work, the qualifications
are:

(a)
Graduation from a master's or doctorate level educational program approved by
the secretary;

(b)
Successful completion of an approved examination; and

(c)
Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement. The experience
requirement consists of a minimum of four thousand hours of experience over a
three-year period as a licensed social worker or licensed advanced social
worker with supervision by a licensed independent clinical social worker, with
at least one hundred thirty hours in individual supervision. Of total
supervision, seventy hours must be face-to-face supervision with a licensed
advanced social worker, and sixty hours may be supervised by another qualified
mental health professional. Distance supervision may be obtained for no more
than sixty hours.

(4)
Until twenty-four months after the effective date of this act, the secretary
shall waive the examination and issue a license to practice.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
The practice of licensed social work includes the knowledge and application of
social work theory, methods, and ethics, including emotional assessment, case
management, consultation, advocacy, counseling, and community organization.

(2)
The practice of licensed advanced social work is a specialty which requires the
knowledge and application of social work theory, methods, and ethics to
individuals, couples, families, groups, organizations, and communities, and
includes the ability to assess, develop, and implement treatment plans in the
areas of counseling for emotional disorders, family systems, prevention, and
psychosocial assessment. It also includes administration, policy development,
school social work, medical social work, case management, organizational
consultation, teaching, and research. Advanced social work involves the use of
independent judgment, but does not include the independent practice of
psychotherapy. Advanced social work practice that includes psychotherapy must
be practiced under the supervision of a licensed independent clinical social
worker. Other types of advanced social work may be practiced under the
supervision of a licensed advanced social worker. Advanced social work is
practiced in agency and organizational settings such as hospitals, community
mental health agencies, schools, and other locales.

(3)
The practice of licensed independent clinical social work is a specialty which
requires the knowledge and application of social theory, methods, and ethics to
individuals, couples, families, groups, organizations, and communities, and
includes the ability to work independently with vulnerable clients to diagnose
emotional disorders and treat disorders through psychotherapy, as well as
assessment, consultation, supervision, and prevention. It requires clinical
skills to restore, improve, or enhance emotional, cognitive, or social
functioning. It is practiced with diagnostic assessment and treatment tools
and the use of theory bases that may be psychodynamic, cognitive behavioral,
family therapeutic, case management, biopsychosocial, and other established
theory bases, including the functions of a licensed advanced social worker.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
social worker licensed under this chapter shall biennially attend at least
thirty-six hours of continuing education in curricula approved by the secretary
as a condition of license renewal, of which six hours must be devoted to
professional law and ethics. In approving the curricula, the secretary shall
consider the educational and training standards of nationally recognized professional
organizations of social work, mental health counseling, and marriage and family
counseling and accredited schools offering graduate degrees in these programs
in the state of Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. In addition
to acts of unprofessional conduct specified in RCW 18.130.180, a social worker
licensed under this chapter committing the following acts of unethical conduct
is subject to the disciplinary process and sanctions under the uniform
disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW.

(1)
A licensee shall not engage in sexual relations with a past, present, or future
client who has been, or is, in a counseling or therapeutic relationship with
the licensee.

(2)
A licensee shall not charge a client in a professional relationship a fee
higher than the usual and customary fees recognized by the profession, as
determined by the secretary, or otherwise profit from the professional
relationship.

(3)
A licensee shall not diagnose or treat a relative or other person who has a
social relationship with the licensee.

(4)
A licensee shall not have a business relationship outside the counseling or
psychotherapeutic relationship with his or her client during the counseling or
psychotherapy and for at least two years after the end of the counseling or
psychotherapy.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. A
social worker licensed for independent clinical social work for a period of at
least two years may supervise social work practice. A social worker licensed
for advanced social work for at least two years may supervise licensed social
work.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. (1) A
social worker certified pursuant to this chapter to practice social work for at
least two years before the effective date of this act is eligible for a license
as an independent clinical social worker, and upon application the secretary
shall issue the license.

(2)
An uncertified social worker meeting the requirements for licensure as an
advanced social worker or independent clinical social worker is eligible, upon
application to the secretary, for a license to practice as an advanced social
worker or independent clinical social worker for two years following the
effective date of this act.

(3)
An uncertified social worker meeting partial requirements for licensure under
this chapter may have up to two years from the effective date of this act to
complete the qualifications for licensure.

(4)
An uncertified social worker may have up to three years from the effective date
of this act to meet the qualifications for licensure under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. The
confidentiality standard for supervised licensed social workers, licensed
advanced social workers, and licensed independent social workers who are
working with clients practicing counseling or psychotherapy are privileged.
All other functions of social work practice have the same standard of
confidentiality.

PART
THREE

LICENSED
MENTAL HEALTH COUNSELING

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. No
person may represent himself or herself as a licensed mental health counselor
without holding a license issued by the department under this chapter unless
exempted under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. (1)
The secretary shall issue a license to practice mental health counseling to any
applicant who demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction that the education
and experience requirements for licensing have been met. Applications for
licensing must be submitted on forms provided by the secretary. The secretary
may require any information and documentation which reasonably relates to the
need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for a license
provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant shall pay
a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The fee must accompany
the application.

(2)
An applicant for a license must:

(a)
Provide official transcripts documenting the applicant's completion of a
master's or doctoral degree in mental health counseling or a related discipline
from a college or university accredited by a regional accrediting agency;

(b)
Successfully complete a written examination on knowledge and application of
mental health counseling which has been approved by the department for mental
health counselors;

(c)
Successfully complete thirty-six months or three thousand hours of postgraduate
mental health counseling experience under supervision of a qualified mental
health professional; and

(d)
Provide three letters of reference from health or mental health practitioners
attesting to the applicant's character and professional integrity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. The
applicant must demonstrate to the satisfaction of the secretary that the three
thousand hours of required experience:

(1)
Were performed under the general supervision of a qualified mental health
professional who either meets or exceeds the standards of a licensed mental
health counselor;

(2)
Included a minimum of one hundred hours spent in immediate supervision with the
qualified mental health professional; and

(3)
Included a minimum of one thousand two hundred hours of direct counseling with
individuals, couples, families, or groups.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. (1) A
mental health counselor certified pursuant to this chapter to practice mental
health counseling for at least two years before the effective date of this act
is eligible for a license as a mental health counselor, and upon application
the secretary shall issue the license.

(2)
An uncertified mental health counselor meeting the requirements for mental
health counselor licensure is eligible, upon application to the secretary, for
a license to practice as a mental health counselor for two years following the
effective date of this act.

(3)
An uncertified mental health counselor meeting partial requirements for
licensure under this chapter may have up to two years from the effective date
of this act to complete the qualifications for licensure.

(4)
An uncertified mental health counselor may have up to three years from the
effective date of this act to meet the qualifications for licensure under this
chapter.

PART
FOUR

MARRIAGE
AND FAMILY THERAPISTS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. (1)
No person may represent himself or herself as a licensed marriage and family
therapist, or use any title or description of services, without applying for
licensure, meeting the required qualifications, and being licensed by the
department under this chapter, unless otherwise exempted by this chapter.

(2)
The practice of marriage and family therapy means the rendering of professional
marriage and family therapy services to individuals, couples, and families,
singly or in groups, whether such services are offered directly to the general
public or through organizations, either public or private, for a fee, monetary
or otherwise. "Marriage and family therapy" means the diagnosis and
treatment of mental and emotional disorders, whether cognitive, affective, or
behavioral, within the context of marriage and family systems. Marriage and
family therapy involves the professional application of psychotherapeutic and
family systems theories and techniques in the delivery of services to
individuals, couples, and families for the purpose of treating diagnosed
nervous and mental disorders.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. (1)
The secretary shall issue a license to any applicant who demonstrates to the
secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a)
Graduation from a master's degree or doctoral degree educational program in
marriage and family therapy approved by the secretary, or from a graduate
degree educational program in an allied field equivalent to a master's degree
in marriage and family therapy approved by the secretary;

(b)
Successful completion of work experience equal to at least two calendar years
in marriage and family therapy under qualified supervision after graduation.
"Qualified supervision" means the supervision of clinical services by
an approved supervisor in accordance with standards approved by the secretary
in consultation with the advisory committee. Clinical membership in a
nationally recognized marriage and family therapy organization is deemed to
meet the educational and experience qualifications for licensure provided under
(a) and (b) of this subsection; and

(c)
Successful completion of an approved examination.

(2)
Applicants are subject to the grounds for denial of a license or temporary
permit under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(3)
The secretary shall issue a license to any applicant who is certified to
practice marriage and family therapy by the department on the effective date of
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. The
secretary is authorized to issue a temporary permit to an applicant to practice
marriage and family therapy for up to one year while the application for
examination is being processed, pending the taking of the examination and the
receipt of the results.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21. If
both parties to a marriage have obtained marriage and family therapy by the
same licensed marriage and family therapist, the therapist may not testify in
an alimony or divorce action concerning information acquired in the course of
the therapeutic relationship. The therapist is otherwise competent to testify
in custody actions.

PART
FIVE

COMMON
ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS FOR LICENSED SOCIAL WORK,

MENTAL HEALTH
COUNSELING, AND MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPY

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22. The
secretary shall establish by rule the procedural requirements and fees for
license renewal. Failure to renew invalidates the license and all privileges
granted by the license. If a license has lapsed for a period longer than three
years, the individual must demonstrate competence to the satisfaction of the
secretary by taking continuing education courses or meeting other standards
determined by the secretary.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23. (1) A
person licensed under this chapter to practice social work, mental health
counseling, or marriage and family therapy must provide clients at the
commencement of any program of treatment with accurate disclosure information
concerning the practice, in accordance with rules adopted by the secretary,
including the right of clients to refuse treatment, the responsibility of
clients to choose the provider and treatment modality which best suits their
needs, and the extent of confidentiality provided by this chapter. The
disclosure information must also include the license holder's professional
education and training, the therapeutic orientation of the practice, the
proposed course of treatment where known, financial requirements, and such
other information as required by rule. The disclosure must be acknowledged in
writing by the client and license holder.

(2)
The secretary, in consultation with the board, may adopt rules implementing this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24. (1)
The communication of a client in a treatment relationship with a person
licensed under this chapter is considered confidential health care information
and shall not be disclosed except as authorized pursuant to chapter 70.02 RCW.

(2)
Confidential health care information is privileged against public disclosure to
the same extent and subject to the same conditions as communications between an
attorney and client under RCW 5.60.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. An
applicant holding a credential in another state to practice social work, mental
health counseling, or marriage and family therapy may be licensed to practice
in this state without examination if the secretary determines that the other
state's credentialing standards are substantially equivalent to the licensing
standards in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 26. The
uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial
of a license, unauthorized practice, and the discipline of persons licensed
under this chapter.

Sec.
27. RCW
18.19.040 and 1987 c 512 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1)
The practice of a profession by a person who is either registered, certified,
licensed, or similarly regulated under the laws of this state and who is
performing services within the person's authorized scope of practice, including
any attorney admitted to practice law in this state when providing counseling
incidental to and in the course of providing legal counsel;

(2)
The practice of counseling by an employee or trainee of any federal agency, or
the practice of counseling by a student of a college or university, if the
employee, trainee, or student is practicing solely under the supervision of and
accountable to the agency, college, or university, through which he or she
performs such functions as part of his or her position for no additional fee
other than ordinary compensation;

(3)
The practice of counseling by a person without a mandatory charge;

(4)
The practice of counseling by persons offering services for public and private
nonprofit organizations or charities not primarily engaged in counseling for a
fee when approved by the organizations or agencies for whom they render their
services;

(5)
Evaluation, consultation, planning, policy-making, research, or related
services conducted by social scientists for private corporations or public
agencies;

(6)
The practice of counseling by a person under the auspices of a religious
denomination, church, or organization, or the practice of religion itself;

(7)
Counselors whose residency is not Washington state from providing up to ten
days per quarter of training or workshops in the state, as long as they don't
hold themselves out to be registered or ((certified)) licensed in
Washington state.

Sec.
28. RCW
18.19.050 and 1991 c 3 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary has the
following authority:

(a)
To adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to implement
this chapter;

(b)
To set all ((certification)) license, registration, and renewal
fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and to collect and deposit all such fees
in the health professions account established under RCW 43.70.320;

(c)
To establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(d)
To hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as needed to
implement this chapter;

(e)
To issue a registration to any applicant who has met the requirements for
registration;

(f)
To set educational, ethical, and professional standards of practice for ((certification))
licensure;

(g)
To prepare and administer or cause to be prepared and administered an
examination for all qualified applicants for ((certification)) licensure;

(h)
To establish criteria for evaluating the ability and qualifications of persons
applying for a ((certificate)) license, including standards for
passing the examination and standards of qualification for ((certification))
licensure to practice;

(i)
To evaluate and designate those schools from which graduation will be accepted
as proof of an applicant's eligibility to receive a ((certificate)) license
and to establish standards and procedures for accepting alternative training in
lieu of such graduation;

(j)
To issue a ((certificate)) license to any applicant who has met
the education, training, and conduct requirements for ((certification)) licensure;

(k)
To set competence requirements for maintaining ((certification)) licensure;
and

(l)
To develop a dictionary of recognized professions and occupations providing
counseling services to the public included under this chapter.

(2)
The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and
denial of ((certifications)) licenses and registrations and the
discipline of ((certified practitioners)) licensees and
registrants under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplining
authority under this chapter. The absence of educational or training
requirements for counselors registered under this chapter or the counselor's
use of nontraditional nonabusive therapeutic techniques shall not, in and of
itself, give the secretary authority to unilaterally determine the training and
competence or to define or restrict the scope of practice of such individuals.

(3)
The department shall publish and disseminate information in order to educate
the public about the responsibilities of counselors and the rights and
responsibilities of clients established under this chapter. ((Solely for
the purposes of administering this education requirement, the secretary shall
assess an additional fee for each registration and certification application
and renewal, equal to five percent of the fee. The revenue collected from the
assessment fee may be appropriated by the legislature for the department's use
in educating consumers pursuant to this section. The authority to charge the
assessment fee shall terminate on June 30, 1994.))

Sec.
29. RCW
18.19.060 and 1987 c 512 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Persons
registered or ((certified)) licensed under this chapter shall
provide clients at the commencement of any program of treatment with accurate
disclosure information concerning their practice, in accordance with guidelines
developed by the department, that will inform clients of the purposes of and
resources available under this chapter, including the right of clients to
refuse treatment, the responsibility of clients for choosing the provider and
treatment modality which best suits their needs, and the extent of
confidentiality provided by this chapter. The disclosure information provided
by the counselor, the receipt of which shall be acknowledged in writing by the
counselor and client, shall include any relevant education and training, the
therapeutic orientation of the practice, the proposed course of treatment where
known, any financial requirements, and such other information as the department
may require by rule. The disclosure information shall also include a statement
that registration of an individual under this chapter does not include a
recognition of any practice standards, nor necessarily imply the effectiveness
of any treatment.

Sec.
30. RCW
18.19.070 and 1996 c 191 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington state mental health quality assurance council is created,
consisting of seven members appointed by the secretary. All appointments shall
be for a term of four years. No person may serve as a member of the council
for more than two consecutive full terms.

Voting
members of the council must include one social worker ((certified)) licensed
under ((RCW 18.19.110)) this chapter, one mental health counselor
((certified)) licensed under ((RCW 18.19.120)) this
chapter, one marriage and family therapist ((certified)) licensed
under ((RCW 18.19.130)) this chapter, one counselor registered
under RCW 18.19.090, one hypnotherapist registered under RCW 18.19.090, and two
public members. Each member of the council must be a citizen of the United
States and a resident of this state. Public members of the council may not be
a member of any other health care licensing board or commission, or have a
fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering health services regulated by the
council, or have a material or financial interest in the rendering of health
services regulated by the council.

The
secretary may appoint the initial members of the council to staggered terms of
from one to four years. Thereafter, all members shall be appointed to full
four-year terms. Members of the council hold office until their successors are
appointed.

The
secretary may remove any member of the council for cause as specified by rule.
In the case of a vacancy, the secretary shall appoint a person to serve for the
remainder of the unexpired term.

(2)
The council shall meet at the times and places designated by the secretary and
shall hold meetings during the year as necessary to provide advice to the
secretary.

Each
member of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. In addition, members of the council shall be
compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 when engaged in the authorized
business of the council. The members of the council are immune from suit in an
action, civil or criminal, based on their official acts performed in good faith
as members of the council.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 31. (1)
The secretary shall appoint an advisory committee on licensed social work,
mental health counseling, and marriage and family therapy to further the
purposes of this chapter. The committee may provide recommendations to the
secretary on the implementation of the licensing provisions of this chapter,
including the development of credentialing standards for licensed social work,
mental health counseling, and marriage and family therapy, standards of
practice, ethics, clinical issues related to disciplinary proceedings,
administrative processes, and other matters within the secretary's authority
under this chapter. The secretary shall consult with the committee on all
policy or substantive matters pertaining to the implementation of this chapter,
and the secretary shall consider the recommendations of the committee with due
regard to the health, safety, and welfare of clients served by persons licensed
under this chapter.

(2)
The committee shall be composed of nine members, of which two members shall be mental
health counselors, two members shall be marriage and family therapists, one
member shall be an independent clinical social worker, one member shall be an
advanced social worker, and three shall represent the public. Three members
shall be appointed for a term of one year, three members appointed for a term
of two years, and three members appointed for a term of three years.
Subsequent members shall be appointed for terms of three years. No person may
serve as a member for more than two consecutive terms. Each member must have
been, for five years immediately preceding appointment, actively engaged in
practice or in the education or training of license holders and have spent the
majority of the time devoted to such activity in this state during the two
years immediately preceding appointment. Members of the committee must be
residents of the state. Three members must hold a license to practice social
work, mental health counseling, and marriage and family therapy respectively.
Two members must represent the public at large and be unaffiliated directly or
indirectly with the professions licensed under this chapter. No person who
holds an office in a mental health counseling, social work, or marriage and
family therapy professional association or who is a public employee may be a
member of the advisory committee.

(3)
The secretary may remove any member of the committee for cause as specified by
rule. In the case of a vacancy, the secretary shall appoint a qualified person
to serve the remainder of the unexpired term.

(4)
The committee shall meet at the times and places designated by the secretary
and shall hold meetings as necessary to advise the secretary on the
implementation of this chapter. The committee shall elect from its members a
chair and vice-chair. A majority of the members currently serving constitute a
quorum.

(5)
Each member shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW
43.03.250 and 43.03.060. In addition, members of the committee shall be
compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 when engaged in the authorized
business of the committee.

(6)
The secretary, members of the committee, and persons acting on their behalf are
immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on any official acts
performed in the course of their duties.

Sec.
32. RCW
18.19.080 and 1991 c 3 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary shall keep an official record of all proceedings, a part of which
record shall consist of a register of all applicants for registration or ((certification))
licensure under this chapter, with the result of each application.

Sec.
33. RCW
18.19.100 and 1996 c 191 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary shall establish administrative procedures, administrative
requirements, and fees for renewal of registrations and licenses as
provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

Sec.
34. RCW
18.19.140 and 1991 c 3 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

Applications
for ((certification)) licensure shall be submitted on forms
provided by the secretary. The secretary may require any information and
documentation which reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the
applicant meets the criteria for ((certification)) licensure
provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant shall pay
a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250, which shall
accompany the application. The department shall not knowingly permit access to
or use of its mailing list of ((certificate)) license holders for
commercial purposes.

Sec.
35. RCW
18.19.150 and 1991 c 3 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The date and location of the examinations required under this chapter shall be
established by the secretary. Applicants who have been found by the secretary
to meet the other requirements for ((certification)) licensure
will be scheduled for the next examination following the filing of the application.
However, the applicant will not be scheduled for any examination taking place
sooner than sixty days after the application is filed.

(2)
The secretary shall examine each applicant, by means determined most effective,
on subjects appropriate to the scope of practice. The examinations shall be
limited to the purpose of determining whether the applicant possesses the
minimum skill and knowledge necessary to practice competently.

(3)
The examination papers, all grading thereon, and the grading of any practical
work shall be preserved for a period of not less than one year after the
secretary has published the results. All examinations shall be conducted by
the secretary by means of fair and wholly impartial methods.

(4)
Any applicant who fails to make the required grade in the first examination is
entitled to take up to three subsequent examinations as the applicant desires
upon the prepayment of a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW
43.70.250 for each subsequent examination. Upon failure of four examinations,
the secretary may invalidate the original application and require remedial
education prior to admittance to future examinations.

(5)
The secretary may approve an examination prepared or administered, or both, by
a private testing agency or association of licensing agencies for use by an
applicant in meeting the licensing requirement.

Sec.
36. RCW
18.19.160 and 1991 c 3 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon receiving a written application, evidence of qualification and the
required fee, the department shall issue a certificate for ((certification))
licensure without examination to an applicant who is currently credentialed
under the laws of another jurisdiction, if the requirements of the other
jurisdiction are substantially equal to the requirements of this chapter.

(2)
A person ((certified)) licensed under this chapter who is or
desires to be temporarily retired from practice in this state shall send
written notice to the secretary. Upon receipt of the notice, the person shall
be placed upon the nonpracticing list. While on the list, the person is not
required to pay the renewal fees and shall not engage in any such practice. In
order to resume practice, application for renewal shall be made in the ordinary
course with the renewal fee for the current period. Persons in a nonpracticing
status for a period exceeding five years shall provide evidence of current knowledge
or skill, by examination, as the secretary may require.

Sec.
37. RCW
18.19.170 and 1998 c 32 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
((certificate)) license issued under this chapter shall be
renewed as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The secretary shall
establish continuing ((competence)) education requirements by
rule in consultation with the ((mental health quality assurance council))
advisory committee. ((Certified)) Licensed counselors are
responsible for obtaining thirty-six clock hours of continuing education during
the two-year reporting period immediately preceding renewal of ((certification))
licensure, including subjects in professional ethics and law.

Sec.
38. RCW
18.19.180 and 1991 c 3 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

An
individual registered or ((certified)) licensed under this
chapter shall not disclose the written acknowledgment of the disclosure
statement pursuant to RCW 18.19.060 nor any information acquired from persons
consulting the individual in a professional capacity when that information was
necessary to enable the individual to render professional services to those
persons except:

(1)
With the written consent of that person or, in the case of death or disability,
the person's personal representative, other person authorized to sue, or the
beneficiary of an insurance policy on the person's life, health, or physical
condition;

(2)
That a person registered or ((certified)) licensed under this
chapter is not required to treat as confidential a communication that reveals
the contemplation or commission of a crime or harmful act;

(3)
If the person is a minor, and the information acquired by the person registered
or ((certified)) licensed under this chapter indicates that the
minor was the victim or subject of a crime, the person registered or ((certified))
licensed under this chapter may testify fully upon any examination,
trial, or other proceeding in which the commission of the crime is the subject
of the inquiry;

(4)
If the person waives the privilege by bringing charges against the person
registered or ((certified)) licensed under this chapter;

(5)
In response to a subpoena from ((a court of law or)) the secretary. The
secretary may subpoena only records related to a complaint or report under
chapter 18.130 RCW; or

(6)
As required under chapter 26.44 RCW.

Sec.
39. RCW
18.19.190 and 1987 c 512 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter shall not be construed as permitting the administration or prescription
of drugs or in any way infringing upon the practice of medicine and surgery as
defined in chapter 18.71 RCW, or in any way infringing upon the practice of
psychology as defined in chapter 18.83 RCW, or restricting the scope of the
practice of counseling for those registered or ((certified)) licensed
under this chapter.

Sec.
40. RCW
18.19.900 and 1987 c 512 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter shall be known as the omnibus credentialing act for counselors,
social workers, mental health counselors, and marriage and family therapists.

Sec.
41. RCW
18.130.040 and 1999 c 335 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions
having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters
specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or
profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a)
The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation to the following
professions:

(i)
Dispensing opticians licensed under chapter 18.34 RCW;

(ii)
Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(iii)
Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(iv)
Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;

(v)
Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(vi)
Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(vii)
Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(viii)
Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under
chapter 18.84 RCW;

(ix)
Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;

(x)
Persons registered or ((certified)) licensed under chapter 18.19
RCW;

(xi)
Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;

(xii)
Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW;

(xiii)
Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;

(xiv)
Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;

(xv)
Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(xvi)
Sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;

(xvii)
Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;

(xviii)
Persons registered as adult family home providers and resident managers under
RCW 18.48.020;

(xix)
Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;

(xx)
Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW; and

(xxi)
Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW.

(b)
The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i)
The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(ii)
The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25
RCW;

(iii)
The dental quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW;

(iv)
The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;

(v)
The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as established in
chapter 18.52 RCW;

(vi)
The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses
issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;

(vii)
The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57
RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;

(viii)
The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses
issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;

(ix)
The medical quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW
governing licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A
RCW;

(x)
The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;

(xi)
The board of occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(xii)
The nursing care quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.79
RCW governing licenses issued under that chapter;

(xiii)
The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established
in chapter 18.83 RCW; and

(xiv)
The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW.

(3)
In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining
authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses based on the conditions
and criteria established in this chapter and the chapters specified in
subsection (2) of this section. This chapter also governs any investigation,
hearing, or proceeding relating to denial of licensure or issuance of a
license conditioned on the applicant's compliance with an order entered
pursuant to RCW 18.130.160 by the disciplining authority.

(4)
All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure substantially
consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform Disciplinary Act, among the
disciplining authorities listed in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 42. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
18.19.110 (Certification of social workers) and 1991 c 3 s 26
& 1987 c 512 s 12;

(2) RCW
18.19.120 (Certification of mental health counselors--Practice
defined--Continuing education) and 1995 c 183 s 1, 1991 c 3 s 27, & 1987 c
512 s 13; and

(3) RCW
18.19.130 (Certification of marriage and family therapists‑-Practice
defined) and 1993 c 259 s 1, 1991 c 3 s 28, & 1987 c 512 s 14.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 43.
Sections 5 through 26 and 31 of this act are each added to chapter 18.19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 44. Part
headings used in this act are not part of the law.

---
END ---