BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that nine to fifteen percent of children attending school
have emotional disturbances serious enough to impede their functioning in
school, family, and community activities. The mental health challenges of
these young students often inhibit their abilities to take full advantage of
the educational opportunities offered to them and can result in disruptions in
the learning environment, behavior problems, and, if untreated, more serious
delinquent behaviors that pose costly implications for schools and
communities. The legislature finds that these children would benefit greatly
from early intervention by community mental health specialists trained to help
when behavior problems begin in order to prevent more serious problems from
developing. Studies show that assistance from community mental health
specialists through a school-based screening, service, and referral program is
an important component of effective early intervention for children at risk in
schools. The legislature intends to provide an opportunity for each second
class school district to contract with community mental health specialists to
perform school-based mental health services and referral activities on a weekly
basis in each local school as needed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The school-based mental health services program is established. The purpose of
the program is to provide second class school districts and local schools with
funding to contract with community mental health specialists to help children
and youth in elementary school through high school who are at risk of emotional
disturbances and behavioral problems.

(2)
The program shall be administered by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. In its administration of the program, the responsibilities of the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall include, but need not
be limited to:

(a)
Adoption and distribution of rules and program guidelines;

(b)
Use of simple, brief, and clear application processes, forms, and reporting
requirements that help make the program accessible to second class school
districts with minimal administrative burden;

(c)
Distribution of funds to second class school districts;

(d)
Distribution of a report by November 15th of each even-numbered year to the
governor, the education and fiscal committees of the legislature, the
educational community, the community mental health system, and other interested
parties. The report shall focus primarily on the results of the program as a
whole, and shall include recommendations for program improvements, including
recommendations for the continuing annual program funding level. The reports
shall include information on the number of local schools participating in the
mental health services program, the nature and amount of mental health services
provided through the program, the number of children served, and the overall
results of the program for children.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

Any
second class school district may participate in the program in section 2 of
this act subject to the following requirements:

(1)
Funds shall be used to contract for community mental health specialists to work
exclusively with public school children and youth; and

(2)
Funds shall supplement and not supplant funding provided by the district to
support mental health services during a base year determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The
sum of one million eight hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the
purposes of this act.

---
END ---