BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
License tab fees shall be thirty dollars per year for motor vehicles,
regardless of year, value, make, or model, beginning January 1, 2000.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "license tab fees" are defined as
the general fees paid annually for licensing motor vehicles, including cars,
sport utility vehicles, motorcycles, and motor homes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
46.16.060 (License fee, general‑-Distribution of proceeds‑-House-moving
dollies) and 1992 c 216 s 4, 1987 1st ex.s. c 9 s 3, 1985 c 380 s 13, 1981 c
342 s 8, 1975 1st ex.s. c 118 s 3, 1969 ex.s. c 170 s 3, 1969 c 99 s 5, 1965 c
25 s 1, 1961 ex.s. c 7 s 9, & 1961 c 12 s 46.16.060;

(2) RCW
46.16.061 (Additional fees to help defray costs of studies) and
1985 c 380 s 14, 1984 c 7 s 49, & 1963 ex.s. c 3 s 40;

(3) RCW
46.16.650 (License plates‑-Additional fee) and 1997 c 291 s
12 & 1987 c 178 s 1;

(4) RCW
82.44.010 (Definitions) and 1990 c 42 s 301, 1979 c 107 s 10,
1971 ex.s. c 299 s 54, 1967 c 121 s 4, 1963 c 199 s 1, & 1961 c 15 s
82.44.010;

(5) RCW
82.44.015 (Ride-sharing passenger motor vehicles
excluded--Notice--Liability for tax) and 1996 c 244 s 7, 1993 c 488 s 3, 1982 c
142 s 1, & 1980 c 166 s 3;

(6) RCW
82.44.020 (Basic and clean air excise tax
imposed--Exceptions--Liability of residents for out-of-state licensing) and
1998 c 321 s 3, 1993 sp.s. c 23 s 61, 1993 c 123 s 2, 1991 c 199 s 220, 1990 c
42 s 302, & 1988 c 191 s 1;

(7) RCW
82.44.022 (Credit on personal-use motor vehicle) and 1998 c 321 s
2;

(8) RCW
82.44.023 (Exemption--Rental cars--Alteration of license plate
month and year tabs--Rules--Taxes upon sale) and 1998 c 321 s 38, 1998 c 145 s
1, 1994 c 227 s 3, & 1992 c 194 s 8;

(9) RCW
82.44.025 (Exemption--Vehicles of Taipei Economic and Cultural
Office) and 1998 c 321 s 39 & 1996 c 139 s 3;

(10) RCW
82.44.030 (Tax on motor vehicle dealers) and 1971 ex.s. c 299 s
51 & 1961 c 15 s 82.44.030;

(11) RCW
82.44.041 (Valuation of vehicles) and 1998 c 321 s 4 & 1990 c
42 s 303;

(12) RCW
82.44.060 (Payment of tax based on registration year--Transfer of
ownership) and 1990 c 42 s 304, 1981 c 222 s 12, 1979 c 158 s 233, 1975-'76 2nd
ex.s. c 54 s 2, 1975 1st ex.s. c 118 s 14, 1963 c 199 s 4, & 1961 c 15 s
82.44.060;

(13) RCW
82.44.065 (Appeal of valuation) and 1990 c 42 s 305;

(14) RCW
82.44.080 (Tax additional) and 1961 c 15 s 82.44.080;

(15) RCW
82.44.090 (Penalty for issuing plates without collecting tax) and
1961 c 15 s 82.44.090;

(16) RCW
82.44.100 (Tax receipt) and 1961 c 15 s 82.44.100;

(17) RCW
82.44.110 (Disposition of revenue) and 1998 c 321 s 5, 1997 c 338
s 68, & 1997 c 149 s 911;

(18) RCW
82.44.120 (Refunds, collections of erroneous
amounts--Claims--False statement, penalty) and 1993 c 307 s 3, 1990 c 42 s 307,
1989 c 68 s 2, 1983 c 26 s 3, 1979 c 120 s 2, 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 95, 1974
ex.s. c 54 s 4, 1967 c 121 s 2, 1963 c 199 s 5, & 1961 c 15 s 82.44.120;

(19) RCW
82.44.130 (Ad valorem taxation barred) and 1961 c 15 s 82.44.130;

(20) RCW
82.44.140 (Director of licensing may act) and 1979 c 158 s 237,
1967 c 121 s 3, & 1961 c 15 s 82.44.140;

(21) RCW
82.44.150 (Apportionment and distribution of motor vehicle excise
taxes generally) and 1999 c 94 s 30, 1998 c 321 s 6, 1995 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 538,
1994 c 241 s 1, & 1993 c 491 s 2;

(22) RCW
82.44.155 (City police and fire protection assistance
account--Distribution to cities and towns--Apportionment) and 1998 c 321 s 40,
1993 c 492 s 254, 1991 c 199 s 223, & 1990 c 42 s 309;

(23) RCW
82.44.157 (Transfer of funds pursuant to government service
agreement) and 1994 c 266 s 14;

(24) RCW
82.44.160 (Distribution to municipal research council) and 1999 c
309 s 931 & 1995 c 28 s 1;

(25) RCW
82.44.170 (Computation of excise taxes when commingled with
licensing fees) and 1990 c 42 s 311, 1987 c 244 s 56, & 1985 c 380 s 22;

(26) RCW
82.44.180 (Transportation fund--Deposits and distributions) and
1999 c 402 s 5, 1999 c 94 s 31, 1998 c 321 s 41, & 1995 c 269 s 2601;

(27) RCW
82.44.900 (Severability--Construction--1961 c 15) and 1961 c 15 s
82.44.900;

(28) RCW
82.50.010 (Definitions) and 1989 c 337 s 20, 1979 c 107 s 11,
1977 ex.s. c 22 s 6, 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 35, 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 44, & 1961 c
15 s 82.50.010;

(29) RCW
82.50.060 (Tax additional) and 1961 c 15 s 82.50.060;

(30) RCW
82.50.090 (Unlawful issuance of tax receipt--Penalty) and 1961 c
15 s 82.50.090;

(31) RCW
82.50.170 (Refund, collection of erroneous amounts--Penalty for
false statement) and 1992 c 154 s 6;

(32) RCW
82.50.250 (Term "house trailer" construed) and 1967
ex.s. c 149 s 59;

(33) RCW
82.50.400 (Tax imposed--Collection--Transfer of ownership‑-Out-of-state
registration to avoid tax, liability--Penalties) and 1999 c 277 s 9, 1993 c 238
s 7, 1992 c 154 s 5, 1990 c 42 s 320, 1979 c 123 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 118 s
15, & 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 55;

(34) RCW
82.50.405 (Additional annual clean air excise tax) and 1991 c 199
s 226;

(35) RCW
82.50.410 (Rate--Minimum payable--Dealer tax) and 1998 c 321 s
23, 1991 c 199 s 225, 1990 c 42 s 321, 1979 c 123 s 2, 1975 1st ex.s. c 118 s
16, 1972 ex.s. c 144 s 2, & 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 56;

(36) RCW
82.50.425 (Valuation of travel trailers and campers) and 1990 c
42 s 323;

(37) RCW
82.50.435 (Appeal of valuation) and 1990 c 42 s 324;

(38) RCW
82.50.440 (Tax receipt--Records) and 1979 c 158 s 242, 1975 1st
ex.s. c 9 s 2, & 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 59;

(39) RCW
82.50.460 (Notice of amount of tax payable--Contents) and 1979 c
123 s 3, 1975 1st ex.s. c 118 s 17, & 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 61;

(40) RCW
82.50.510 (Remittance of tax to state--Distribution to cities,
towns, counties, and schools) and 1998 c 321 s 24, 1991 c 199 s 227, 1990 c 42
s 322, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 75 s 1, & 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 66;

(41) RCW
82.50.520 (Exemptions) and 1983 c 26 s 4, 1979 c 123 s 4, &
1971 ex.s. c 299 s 67;

(42) RCW
82.50.530 (Ad valorem taxes prohibited as to mobile homes, travel
trailers or campers--Loss of identity, subject to property tax) and 1999 c 92 s
1, 1993 c 32 s 1, 1981 c 304 s 32, & 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 68;

(43) RCW
82.50.540 (Taxed and licensed travel trailers or campers entitled
to use of streets and highways) and 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 69; and

(44) RCW
82.50.901 (Effective dates--Operative dates--Expiration
dates--1971 ex.s. c 299 ss 35-76) and 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 53.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
provisions of this act are to be liberally construed to effectuate the policies
and purposes of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act applies retroactively to January 1, 2000.

---
END ---