BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.36.381 and 1998 c 333 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person shall be exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a portion of the
amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and payable in the year
following the year in which a claim is filed, and thereafter, in accordance
with the following:

(1)
The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence which was occupied
by the person claiming the exemption as a principal place of residence as of
the time of filing((: PROVIDED, That)). Any person who sells,
transfers, or is displaced from his or her residence may transfer his or her
exemption status to a replacement residence, but no claimant shall receive an
exemption on more than one residence in any year((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
Confinement of the person to a hospital, adult family home, boarding
home, or nursing home shall not disqualify the claim of exemption if:

(a)
The residence is temporarily unoccupied;

(b)
The residence is occupied by a spouse and/or a person financially dependent on
the claimant for support; or

(c)
The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home, adult family
home, boarding home, or hospital costs;

(2)
The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time of filing, in
fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the residence on which the
property taxes have been imposed or if the person claiming the exemption lives
in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership, ((such))
the person must own a share therein representing the unit or portion of
the structure in which ((he or she)) the person resides. For
purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by a marital community or owned
by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each spouse or cotenant, and any
lease for life shall be deemed a life estate;

(3)
The person claiming the exemption must be sixty-one years of age or older on
December 31st of the year in which the exemption claim is filed, or must have
been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason
of physical disability((: PROVIDED, That any)). A surviving
spouse of ((a)) the person who was receiving an exemption at the
time of the person's death shall qualify if the surviving spouse is fifty-seven
years of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements of this section;

(4)
The amount that the person shall be exempt from an obligation to pay shall be
calculated on the basis of combined disposable income, as defined in RCW
84.36.383. If the person claiming the exemption was retired for two months or
more of the assessment year, the combined disposable income of ((such)) the
person shall be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined
disposable income of ((such)) the person during the months ((such))
the person was retired by twelve. If the income of the person claiming
exemption is reduced for two or more months of the assessment year by reason of
the death of the person's spouse, or when other substantial changes occur in
disposable income that are likely to continue for an indefinite period of time,
the combined disposable income of ((such)) the person shall be
calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of ((such))
the person after ((such)) the occurrences by twelve. If
it is necessary to estimate income to comply with this subsection, the assessor
may require confirming documentation of ((such)) the income prior
to May 31st of the year following application;

(5)(a)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable
income of thirty thousand dollars or less shall be exempt from all excess
property taxes; and

(b)(i)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of twenty-four thousand dollars or less but greater than
eighteen thousand dollars shall be exempt from all regular property taxes on
the greater of forty thousand dollars or thirty-five percent of the valuation
of ((his or her)) the residence, but not to exceed sixty thousand
dollars of the valuation of ((his or her)) the residence; or

(ii)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of eighteen thousand dollars or less shall be exempt from all
regular property taxes on the greater of fifty thousand dollars or sixty
percent of the valuation of ((his or her)) the residence; and

(6)
For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less, the valuation of the
residence shall be the assessed value of the residence on the later of January
1, 1995, or January 1st of the assessment year the person first qualifies under
this section. If the person subsequently fails to qualify under this section
only for one year because of high income, this same valuation shall be used
upon requalification. If the person fails to qualify for more than one year in
succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any other reason, the
valuation upon requalification shall be the assessed value on January 1st of
the assessment year in which the person requalifies. If the person transfers
the exemption under this section to a different residence, the valuation of the
different residence shall be the assessed value of the different residence on
January 1st of the assessment year in which the person transfers the exemption.

In
no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater than the true and
fair value of the residence on January 1st of the assessment year.

This
subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to the property in the
year in which the improvements are made. Subsequent improvements to the
property shall be added to the value otherwise determined under this subsection
at their true and fair value in the year in which they are made.

All
taxpayers who qualify for exemption under this section shall be allowed a
credit against the state levy equal to the tax imposed on the assessed value of
the owner-occupied residential property for the state levy.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.36.383 and 1999 c 358 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, except where the context clearly
indicates a different meaning:

(1)
The term "residence" means a single family dwelling unit whether such
unit be separate or part of a multiunit dwelling, including the land on which
such dwelling stands not to exceed one acre. The term shall also include a
share ownership in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or
partnership if the person claiming exemption can establish that his or her
share represents the specific unit or portion of such structure in which he or
she resides. The term shall also include a single family dwelling situated
upon lands the fee of which is vested in the United States or any
instrumentality thereof including an Indian tribe or in the state of
Washington, and notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090,
such a residence shall be deemed real property.

(2)
The term "real property" shall also include a mobile home which has
substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being fixed
in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile home and
placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe, connections with
sewer, water, or other utilities. A mobile home located on land leased by the
owner of the mobile home is subject, for tax billing, payment, and collection
purposes, only to the personal property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW
84.60.040.

(3)
"Department" means the state department of revenue.

(4)
"Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the
person claiming the exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her spouse,
and the disposable income of each cotenant occupying the residence for the
assessment year, less amounts paid by the person claiming the exemption or his
or her spouse during the assessment year for:

(a)
Drugs supplied by prescription of a medical practitioner authorized by the laws
of this state or another jurisdiction to issue prescriptions; ((and))

(b)
The treatment or care of either person received in the home or in a nursing
home, adult family home, or boarding home; and

(c)
Health care insurance of either person, including any deduction for medicare
under Title XVIII of the social security act.

(5)
"Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in the
federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989, or such
subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose
of this section, plus all of the following items to the extent they are not
included in or have been deducted from adjusted gross income:

(a)
Capital gains, other than gain excluded from income under section 121 of the
federal internal revenue code to the extent it is reinvested in a new principal
residence;

(b)
Amounts deducted for loss;

(c)
Amounts deducted for depreciation;

(d)
Pension and annuity receipts;

(e)
Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(f)
Veterans benefits, other than (i) attendant-care and medical-aid
payments or (ii) benefits for disabilities related to the performance of
military duties received by veterans of the armed forces of the United States
with service-connected disabilities of at least fifty percent;

(g)
Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;

(h)
Dividend receipts; and

(i)
Interest received on state and municipal bonds.

(6)
"Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming the
exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.

(7)
"Adult family home" means a home licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW.

(8)
"Boarding home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW.

(9)
"Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.

(10)
"Nursing home" means a facility licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

The
levy for a taxing district in any year shall be reduced as necessary to prevent
increased exemptions resulting from the 2000 amendments to RCW 84.36.381 in
section 1 of this act and to RCW 84.36.383 in section 2 of this act from
resulting in a higher tax rate than would have occurred without this amendment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a county may impose an annual sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter. The rate of tax shall not exceed
three percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the
article used in the case of a use tax. The tax shall take effect on or after
January 1st of each year. The tax shall expire when the revenue from the tax
is equal to the total amount of revenue reductions for the year for all taxing
districts in the county, other than the state, resulting from the 2000
amendments to RCW 84.36.381 in section 1 of this act and to RCW 84.36.383 in
section 2 of this act, but not later than the end of the calendar year.

(2)
Taxes imposed under this section are in addition to other taxes authorized by
law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. Taxes imposed under this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department shall perform the collection
of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.

(3)
All revenues collected under this section shall be distributed to taxing
districts in the county, other than the state, in proportion to the revenue
reductions for the year resulting from the 2000 amendments to RCW 84.36.381 in
section 1 of this act and to RCW 84.36.383 in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply to taxes levied for collection in 2001 and
thereafter.

---
END ---