BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The treasurer shall deposit four and fifty-two one-hundredths percent of
automobile-related sales and use tax revenue in the multimodal transportation
account. The balance of automobile-related sales and use tax revenue shall be
deposited in the general fund.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "automobile-related sales and use tax
revenue" means:

(a)
Revenue from the taxes imposed in RCW 82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020 reported on
returns filed by persons engaged in the following businesses: New and used car
dealers; automotive parts, accessories, and tire stores; automotive repair
services, including body, paint, and interior repair and maintenance, exhaust
system repair, glass replacement shops, transmission repair, oil change and
lubrication shops, car washes, and other automotive mechanical and electrical
repair and maintenance businesses; automobile and other motor vehicle
wholesalers, motor vehicle supplies and new part wholesalers, tire and tube
wholesalers, and motor vehicle used part wholesalers; and

(b)
Revenue from the taxes imposed in RCW 82.08.020(1) and 82.12.020 collected by
the department of licensing, county auditors, and subagents for the sale or use
of motor vehicles.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning
in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, and each fiscal year thereafter
through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005, the treasurer shall transfer the
sum of twenty million dollars, divided into equal quarterly deposits, from the
general fund to the multimodal transportation account for the regional transit
authority.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning
in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, and each fiscal year thereafter, the
state treasurer shall transfer to the Puget Sound ferry operations account from
the general fund the sum of twenty million dollars, divided into equal
quarterly deposits. For each fiscal year after the fiscal year ending June 30,
2001, the state treasurer shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal
growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by
the office of financial management in November of the preceding year.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.135.035 and 1994 c 2 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the legislature
that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts may be taken
only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each house, and then only if state
expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will not exceed the
state expenditure limits established under this chapter.

(2)(a)
If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this section will result in
expenditures in excess of the state expenditure limit, then the action of the
legislature shall not take effect until approved by a vote of the people at a
November general election. The office of financial management shall adjust the
state expenditure limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the
voters under this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of
revenue generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be adjusted
downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.

(b)
The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this section shall
be substantially as follows:

"Shall
taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to
allow a spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
inflation and population increases?"

(3)(a)
The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration of an emergency
for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law approved by a two-thirds
vote of each house of the legislature and signed by the governor. The law
shall set forth the nature of the emergency, which is limited to natural
disasters that require immediate government action to alleviate human suffering
and provide humanitarian assistance. The state expenditure limit may be
exceeded for no more than twenty-four months following the declaration of the
emergency and only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.

(b)
Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section may be imposed
only until thirty days following the next general election, unless an extension
is approved at that general election. The additional taxes shall expire upon
expiration of the declaration of emergency. The legislature shall not impose
additional taxes for emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in the
education construction fund have been exhausted.

(c)
The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not impose any tax on
intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that statute exists on January
1, 1993.

(4)
If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from the state general
fund on or after January 1, 1993, to another source of funding, or if moneys
are transferred from the state general fund to another fund or account, the
office of financial management shall lower the state expenditure limit to
reflect the shift. This subsection does not apply to sections 1 through 3
of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 39.42 RCW to read as follows:

Deposits
in the multimodal transportation account under sections 1 and 2 of this act and
the Puget Sound ferry operations account under section 3 of this act shall not
be deducted from the calculation of general state revenues under RCW 39.42.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---