BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.135.025 and 1994 c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state shall not expend from the general fund during any fiscal year state
moneys in excess of the state expenditure limit established under this chapter.

(2)
Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW 43.135.035 or pursuant
to an appropriation under RCW 43.135.045(4)(b), the state treasurer shall not
issue or redeem any check, warrant, or voucher that will result in a state
general fund expenditure for any fiscal year in excess of the state expenditure
limit established under this chapter. A violation of this subsection
constitutes a violation of RCW 43.88.290 and shall subject the state treasurer
to the penalties provided in RCW 43.88.300.

(3)
The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the previous fiscal
year's state expenditure limit increased by a percentage rate that equals the
fiscal growth factor.

(4)
For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the fiscal year
beginning July 1, 1995, the phrase "the previous fiscal year's state
expenditure limit" means the total state expenditures from the state
general fund, not including federal funds, for the fiscal year beginning July
1, 1989, plus the fiscal growth factor. This calculation is then computed for
the state expenditure limit for fiscal years 1992, 1993, 1994, and 1995, and as
required under RCW 43.135.035(4).

(5)
A state expenditure limit committee is established for the purpose of
determining and adjusting the state expenditure limit as provided in this
chapter. The members of the state expenditure limit committee are the director
of financial management, the attorney general or the attorney general's
designee, and the chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on appropriations. All actions of the state
expenditure limit committee taken pursuant to this chapter require an
affirmative vote of at least three members.

(6)
Each November, the ((office of financial management)) state
expenditure limit committee shall adjust the expenditure limit for the preceding
fiscal year based on actual expenditures and known changes in the fiscal growth
factor and then project an expenditure limit for the next two fiscal years. ((The
office of financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees
of all adjustments to the state expenditure limit and projections of future
expenditure limits.)) If, by November 30th, the state expenditure limit
committee has not adopted the expenditure limit adjustment and projected
expenditure limit as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the attorney
general or his or her designee shall adjust or project the expenditure limit,
as necessary.

(((6)))
(7) "Fiscal growth factor" means the average of the sum of
inflation and population change for each of the prior three fiscal years.

(((7)))
(8) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit
price deflator for the United States for each fiscal year as published by the
federal bureau of labor statistics.

(((8)))
(9) "Population change" means the percentage change in state
population for each fiscal year as reported by the office of financial
management.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.135.035 and 1994 c 2 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the legislature
that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts may be taken
only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each house, and then only if state
expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will not exceed the
state expenditure limits established under this chapter.

(2)(a)
If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this section will result in
expenditures in excess of the state expenditure limit, then the action of the
legislature shall not take effect until approved by a vote of the people at a
November general election. The office of financial management shall adjust the
state expenditure limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the
voters under this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of
revenue generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be adjusted
downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.

(b)
The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this section shall
be substantially as follows:

"Shall
taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to
allow a spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
inflation and population increases?"

(3)(a)
The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration of an emergency
for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law approved by a two-thirds
vote of each house of the legislature and signed by the governor. The law
shall set forth the nature of the emergency, which is limited to natural
disasters that require immediate government action to alleviate human suffering
and provide humanitarian assistance. The state expenditure limit may be
exceeded for no more than twenty-four months following the declaration of the
emergency and only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.

(b)
Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section may be imposed
only until thirty days following the next general election, unless an extension
is approved at that general election. The additional taxes shall expire upon
expiration of the declaration of emergency. The legislature shall not impose
additional taxes for emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in
the education construction fund have been exhausted.

(c)
The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not impose any tax on
intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that statute exists on January
1, 1993.

(4)
If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from the state general
fund on or after January 1, 1993, to another source of funding, or if moneys
are transferred from the state general fund to another fund or account, the ((office
of financial management)) state expenditure limit committee, acting
pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure limit to
reflect the shift. For the purposes of this section, a transfer of money
from the state general fund to another fund or account includes any state
legislative action taken after July 1, 2000, that has the effect of reducing
revenues from a particular source, where such revenues would otherwise be
deposited into the state general fund, while increasing the revenues from that
particular source to another state or local government account.

(5)
If the cost of any state program or function is shifted to the state general
fund on or after January 1, 2000, from another source of funding, or if moneys
are transferred to the state general fund from another fund or account, the
state expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), shall
increase the state expenditure limit to reflect the shift.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.135.045 and 1994 c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The emergency reserve fund is established in the state treasury. During each
fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit in the emergency reserve fund
all general fund‑-state revenues in excess of the state expenditure limit
for that fiscal year. Deposits shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter
based on projections of state revenues and the state expenditure limit. The
treasurer shall make transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile
actual annual revenues and the expenditure limit for fiscal year 2000 and
thereafter.

(2)
The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency reserve fund only
with approval of at least two-thirds of the members of each house of the
legislature, and then only if the appropriation does not cause total
expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit under this chapter.

(3)
The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five percent of ((biennial))
annual general fund‑-state revenues as projected by the official
state revenue forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent shall be
transferred on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer to the education
construction fund hereby created in the treasury. The treasurer shall make
transfers between these accounts as necessary to reconcile actual annual
revenues for fiscal year 2000 and thereafter.

(4)(a)
Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund exclusively for
common school construction or higher education construction.

(b)
Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if approved by a
two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if approved by a vote of
the people at the next general election. An appropriation approved by the
people under this subsection shall result in an adjustment to the state
expenditure limit only for the fiscal period for which the appropriation is
made and shall not affect any subsequent fiscal period.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---