BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes the need for ongoing financial assistance to local
governments for the purposes of public safety, criminal justice, public health,
shorelines protection, and other operations.

Therefore,
it is the intent of the legislature that the state provide funding for the current
and future fiscal bienna for a portion of local governments' costs for these
programs and services that are the ongoing responsibility of the recipient
local government.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Moneys appropriated in sections 4 and 5, chapter . . ., Laws of 2000
(sections 4 and 5 of this act) shall be used to supplant a portion of the costs
of existing local programs, as specified in this section:

(a)
In section 4, chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (section 4 of this act),
moneys are provided for the superior court system, police operations, crime
prevention, care and custody of prisoners, and legal services; and

(b)
In section 5, chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (section 5 of this act),
moneys are provided for municipal court systems, police operations, fire
protection services, transportation, crime prevention, care and custody of
prisoners, and legal services.

(2)
Moneys appropriated in sections 4 and 5, chapter . . ., Laws of 2000
(sections 4 and 5 of this act) constitute a transfer to the state of local
government costs under RCW 43.135.060(2).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. COUNTY
PUBLIC HEALTH ASSISTANCE. The following amounts are
appropriated from the health services account to the office of financial
management for distribution to the following counties or health districts in
the amounts designated:

1999-2001

County or Health District FY 2000 FY 2001 Biennium

Adams County Health District 13,472 32,023 45,495

Asotin County Health District 26,568 63,455 90,023

Benton-Franklin Health District 488,007 1,166,106 1,654,113

Chelan-Douglas Health District 70,854 168,323 239,177

Clallam County Health and Human Services Department 60,756 144,780 205,536

Southwest Washington Health District 340,203 1,198,244 1,538,447

Columbia County Health District 17,552 42,020 59,572

Cowlitz County Health Department 115,242 274,521 389,763

Garfield County Health District 6,513 15,576 22,089

Grant County Health District 43,068 101,997 145,065

Grays Harbor Health Department 79,956 190,308 270,264

Island County Health Department 33,325 79,070 112,395

Jefferson County Health and Human Services 33,688 80,529 114,217

Seattle-King County Department of Public Health 3,623,823 8,835,544 12,459,367

Bremerton-Kitsap County Health District 239,942 573,169 813,111

Kittitas County Health Department 34,369 81,768 116,137

Klickitat County Health Department 21,250 50,756 72,006

Lewis County Health Department 44,160 104,953 149,113

Lincoln County Health Department 9,159 21,760 30,919

Mason County Department of Health Services 36,218 86,621 122,839

Okanogan County Health District 27,132 64,516 91,648

Pacific County Health Department 33,551 80,255 113,806

Tacoma-Pierce County Health Department 1,043,455 3,073,075 4,116,530

San Juan County Health and Community Services 13,308 31,866 45,174

Skagit County Health Department 87,172 207,173 294,345

Snohomish Health District 965,481 2,305,859 3,271,340

Spokane County Health District 908,599 2,172,447 3,081,046

Northeast Tri-County Health District 42,503 101,483 143,986

Thurston County Health Department 254,344 607,019 861,363

Wahkiakum County Health Department 5,960 14,283 20,243

Walla Walla County-City Health Department 74,137 176,458 250,595

Whatcom County Health Department 362,419 866,404 1,228,823

Whitman County Health Department 33,991 80,222 114,213

Yakima Health District 266,361 634,680 901,041

TOTAL APPROPRIATIONS $9,456,538 $23,727,263 $33,183,801

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. COUNTY
CORPORATION ASSISTANCE. Subject to section 2 of
this act, the following amounts are appropriated from the general fund to the
office of financial management for distribution to the following counties in
the amounts designated:

1999‑2001

County FY
2000 FY 2001 Biennium

Adams 128,162
501,826 629,988

Asotin 136,981
479,033 616,014

Benton 483,859
1,883,001 2,366,860

Chelan 179,876
698,835 878,711

Clallam 80,006
311,782 391,788

Clark 110,101
432,958 543,059

Columbia 161,529
667,785 829,314

Cowlitz 220,559
832,927 1,053,486

Douglas 313,681
909,324 1,223,005

Ferry 117,626
484,837 602,463

Franklin 121,173
471,203 592,376

Garfield 163,139
680,071 843,210

Grant 159,807
621,395 781,202

Grays
Harbor 97,806 380,022 477,828

Island 115,240
302,504 417,744

Jefferson 42,297
164,678 206,975

King 478,096
1,869,386 2,347,482

Kitsap 84,087
330,598 414,685

Kittitas 101,131
392,568 493,699

Klickitat 36,817
135,606 172,423

Lewis 163,896
638,560 802,456

Lincoln 102,254
414,306 516,560

Mason 600,137
1,629,265 2,229,402

Okanogan 352,831
1,010,748 1,363,579

Pacific 204,291
651,728 856,019

Pend
Oreille 138,708 558,807 697,515

Pierce 221,074
868,454 1,089,528

San
Juan 14,633 56,797 71,430

Skagit 252,633
983,498 1,236,131

Skamania 26,486
126,365 152,851

Snohomish 177,762
700,845 878,607

Spokane 143,868
563,861 707,729

Stevens 561,954
1,434,476 1,996,430

Thurston 240,751
662,538 903,289

Wahkiakum 145,072
604,010 749,082

Walla
Walla 43,444 168,975 212,419

Whatcom 70,851
277,220 348,071

Whitman 24,237
94,372 118,609

Yakima 1,131,490
3,556,491 4,687,981

TOTAL
APPROPRIATIONS $7,948,345 $27,551,655 $35,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. CITY
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION ASSISTANCE. Subject to section 2 of
this act, the following amounts are appropriated from the general fund to the
office of financial management for distribution to the following cities and
municipalities in the amounts designated:

1999‑2001

City FY
2000 FY 2001 Biennium

Aberdeen 43,600 166,181 209,781

Airway
Heights 38,735 147,933 186,668

Albion 18,025 69,133 87,158

Algona 9,829 37,292 47,121

Almira 2,499 9,536 12,035

Anacortes 25,924 98,089 124,013

Arlington 15,437 58,598 74,035

Asotin 13,279 52,328 65,607

Auburn 70,322 266,076 336,398

Bainbridge
Island 89,487 339,325 428,812

Battle
Ground 37,252 141,026 178,278

Beaux
Arts 544 2,060 2,604

Bellevue 191,592 724,916 916,508

Bellingham 134,566 510,799 645,365

Benton
City 26,013 99,419 125,432

Bingen 2,238 8,271 10,509

Black
Diamond 65,866 252,179 318,045

Blaine 7,602 28,857 36,459

Bonney
Lake 48,301 183,343 231,644

Bothell 50,171 189,830 240,001

Bremerton 80,205 293,983 374,188

Brewster 4,073 15,111 19,184

Bridgeport 51,414 197,116 248,530

Brier 148,377 569,076 717,453

Buckley 20,739 78,824 99,563

Bucoda 13,286 50,936 64,222

Burien 96,319 363,037 459,356

Burlington 10,016 37,902 47,918

Camas 19,610 74,198 93,808

Carbonado 15,419 59,122 74,541

Carnation 3,501 13,272 16,773

Cashmere 24,883 95,073 119,956

Castle
Rock 7,451 28,125 35,576

Cathlamet 1,988 7,510 9,498

Centralia 37,677 139,653 177,330

Chehalis 12,646 47,850 60,496

Chelan 7,114 27,005 34,119

Cheney 82,611 315,583 398,194

Chewelah 11,478 43,566 55,044

Clarkston 25,801 96,647 122,448

Cle
Elum 3,178 12,019 15,197

Clyde
Hill 22,799 87,079 109,878

Colfax 13,043 49,461 62,504

College
Place 147,511 565,148 712,659

Colton 6,334 24,269 30,603

Colville 8,547 32,346 40,893

Conconully 3,443 13,180 16,623

Concrete 4,728 18,003 22,731

Connell 35,572 136,166 171,738

Cosmopolis 4,719 17,747 22,466

Coulee
City 1,025 3,877 4,902

Coulee
Dam 12,724 48,721 61,445

Coupeville 2,820 10,658 13,478

Covington 193,947 741,986 935,933

Creston 2,983 11,403 14,386

Cusick 3,300 12,593 15,893

Darrington 12,448 47,572 60,020

Davenport 12,871 49,076 61,947

Dayton 21,973 83,839 105,812

Deer
Park 5,860 22,218 28,078

Des
Moines 409,408 1,567,294 1,976,702

Dupont 2,967 11,210 14,177

Duvall 20,134 76,365 96,499

East
Wenatchee 11,183 42,453 53,636

Eatonville 3,238 12,232 15,470

Edgewood 257,181 986,129 1,243,310

Edmonds 145,332 549,264 694,596

Electric
City 22,449 86,081 108,530

Ellensburg 29,887 113,449 143,336

Elma 15,813 60,136 75,949

Elmer
City 8,369 32,097 40,466

Endicott 7,836 30,025 37,861

Entiat 13,389 51,257 64,646

Enumclaw 19,376 73,311 92,687

Ephrata 19,563 73,681 93,244

Everett 180,675 685,522 866,197

Everson 12,012 45,836 57,848

Fairfield 3,958 15,061 19,019

Farmington 3,145 12,053 15,198

Federal
Way 146,667 543,402 690,069

Ferndale 24,466 92,053 116,519

Fife 9,285 35,142 44,427

Fircrest 104,079 398,906 502,985

Forks 20,367 77,576 97,943

Friday
Harbor 3,576 13,542 17,118

Garfield 11,990 45,927 57,917

George 4,298 16,389 20,687

Gig
Harbor 11,555 43,721 55,276

Gold
Bar 35,814 137,205 173,019

Goldendale 11,772 44,368 56,140

Grand
Coulee 2,123 8,026 10,149

Grandview 62,477 238,490 300,967

Granger 44,389 170,104 214,493

Granite
Falls 3,994 15,144 19,138

Hamilton 4,038 15,447 19,485

Harrah 12,614 48,357 60,971

Harrington 4,475 17,081 21,556

Hartline 2,895 11,078 13,973

Hatton 3,360 12,889 16,249

Hoquiam 100,222 383,625 483,847

Hunts
Point 888 3,364 4,252

Ilwaco 3,770 14,291 18,061

Index 707 2,688 3,395

Ione 4,342 16,551 20,893

Issaquah 18,275 69,147 87,422

Kahlotus 5,189 19,890 25,079

Kalama 2,886 10,913 13,799

Kelso 25,119 95,351 120,470

Kenmore 302,430 1,158,211 1,460,641

Kennewick 107,010 406,199 513,209

Kent 131,805 498,704 630,509

Kettle
Falls 11,169 42,655 53,824

Kirkland 80,930 306,212 387,142

Kittitas 18,314 70,083 88,397

Krupp 1,147 4,396 5,543

La
Center 6,610 25,039 31,649

La
Conner 1,396 5,278 6,674

La
Crosse 4,130 17,483 21,613

Lacey 52,354 198,089 250,443

Lake
Forest Park 252,131 966,274 1,218,405

Lake Stevens 32,382 123,327 155,709

Lakewood 835,623 3,165,857 4,001,480

Lamont 1,901 7,289 9,190

Langley 1,939 7,332 9,271

Latah 3,287 12,571 15,858

Leavenworth 4,443 16,867 21,310

Lind 812 3,066 3,878

Long
Beach 3,820 14,134 17,954

Longview 90,784 346,025 436,809

Lyman 4,226 16,643 20,869

Lynden 15,621 59,066 74,687

Lynnwood 59,787 226,212 285,999

Mabton 38,211 146,474 184,685

Malden 5,949 22,791 28,740

Mansfield 6,977 26,722 33,699

Maple
Valley 118,042 450,813 568,855

Marcus 3,749 14,374 18,123

Marysville 37,291 141,094 178,385

Mattawa 24,793 94,743 119,536

McCleary 24,004 91,938 115,942

Medical
Lake 29,124 111,111 140,235

Medina 5,247 19,851 25,098

Mercer
Island 116,538 443,137 559,675

Mesa 4,089 15,590 19,679

Metaline 4,032 15,454 19,486

Metaline
Falls 1,851 7,050 8,901

Mill
Creek 53,913 204,681 258,594

Millwood 5,552 20,925 26,477

Milton 10,242 38,766 49,008

Monroe 20,657 78,157 98,814

Montesano 15,829 60,005 75,834

Morton 2,156 8,144 10,300

Moses
Lake 39,254 145,498 184,752

Mossyrock 3,785 14,212 17,997

Mount
Vernon 47,677 180,976 228,653

Mountlake
Terrace 195,000 745,668 940,668

Moxee 6,877 26,212 33,089

Mukilteo 83,507 317,041 400,548

Naches 2,369 8,930 11,299

Napavine 24,560 94,091 118,651

Nespelem 4,804 18,988 23,792

Newcastle 87,208 333,438 420,646

Newport 4,717 17,624 22,341

Nooksack 14,040 53,752 67,792

Normandy
Park 138,454 530,541 668,995

North
Bend 7,572 28,715 36,287

North
Bonneville 6,131 23,447 29,578

Northport 6,013 22,885 28,898

Oak
Harbor 84,827 321,084 405,911

Oakesdale 7,708 29,514 37,222

Oakville 10,091 38,633 48,724

Ocean
Shores 19,613 74,683 94,296

Odessa 1,726 6,528 8,254

Okanogan 4,496 17,050 21,546

Olympia 72,541 274,471 347,012

Omak 9,519 36,142 45,661

Oroville 4,193 15,709 19,902

Orting 45,972 175,751 221,723

Othello 9,795 37,075 46,870

Pacific 21,106 79,766 100,872

Palouse 12,888 49,310 62,198

Pasco 47,988 181,570 229,558

Pateros 5,611 21,456 27,067

Pe Ell 14,380 55,099 69,479

Pomeroy 10,570 40,320 50,890

Port
Angeles 43,499 162,273 205,772

Port
Orchard 15,238 57,841 73,079

Port
Townsend 17,012 63,181 80,193

Poulsbo 11,627 43,994 55,621

Prescott 2,620 9,985 12,605

Prosser 8,820 33,382 42,202

Pullman 153,166 583,174 736,340

Puyallup 55,457 209,830 265,287

Quincy 7,398 27,997 35,395

Rainier 27,254 104,380 131,634

Raymond 15,760 59,917 75,677

Reardan 9,867 37,747 47,614

Redmond 78,675 297,680 376,355

Renton 85,910 325,052 410,962

Republic 4,516 17,126 21,642

Richland 140,457 530,962 671,419

Ridgefield 9,692 36,845 46,537

Ritzville 3,107 11,751 14,858

Riverside 7,223 27,674 34,897

Rock
Island 7,204 27,575 34,779

Rockford 4,670 17,810 22,480

Rosalia 9,346 35,751 45,097

Roslyn 16,194 61,584 77,778

Roy 626 2,363 2,989

Royal
City 15,811 60,310 76,121

Ruston 10,250 39,279 49,529

Sammamish 657,212 2,482,834 3,140,046

Seatac 49,645 181,461 231,106

Seattle 1,195,229 4,380,965 5,576,194

Sedro-Woolley 19,533 73,047 92,580

Selah 24,609 93,161 117,770

Sequim 7,991 30,241 38,232

Shelton 21,605 80,080 101,685

Shoreline 433,994 1,655,313 2,089,307

Skykomish 518 1,960 2,478

Snohomish 14,884 56,314 71,198

Snoqualmie 3,505 13,257 16,762

Soap
Lake 24,448 93,626 118,074

South
Bend 14,871 56,825 71,696

South
Cle Elum 11,949 45,833 57,782

South
Prairie 3,510 13,394 16,904

Spangle 431 1,629 2,060

Spokane 418,386 1,533,541 1,951,927

Sprague 5,944 22,725 28,669

Springdale 2,343 8,943 11,286

St.
John 1,427 5,342 6,769

Stanwood 7,697 29,265 36,962

Starbuck 2,522 9,951 12,473

Steilacoom 72,137 276,269 348,406

Stevenson 3,873 14,663 18,536

Sultan 13,348 50,618 63,966

Sumas 2,644 9,915 12,559

Sumner 15,326 57,987 73,313

Sunnyside 25,813 97,982 123,795

Tacoma 514,485 1,906,406 2,420,891

Tekoa 13,155 50,347 63,502

Tenino 14,149 54,022 68,171

Tieton 19,406 74,291 93,697

Toledo 2,076 7,805 9,881

Tonasket 2,007 7,610 9,617

Toppenish 121,568 462,123 583,691

Tukwila 28,420 103,269 131,689

Tumwater 22,605 85,529 108,134

Twisp 1,753 6,628 8,381

Union
Gap 10,234 37,199 47,433

Uniontown 4,699 17,979 22,678

University
Place 567,029 2,172,194 2,739,223

Vader 10,712 41,056 51,768

Vancouver 389,084 1,471,349 1,860,433

Waitsburg 19,854 76,051 95,905

Walla
Walla 106,511 393,789 500,300

Wapato 65,067 247,488 312,555

Warden 20,256 77,437 97,693

Washougal 46,222 175,924 222,146

Washtucna 5,574 21,355 26,929

Waterville 15,832 60,634 76,466

Waverly 2,938 11,259 14,197

Wenatchee 53,809 204,256 258,065

West
Richland 143,486 549,760 693,246

Westport 4,176 15,838 20,014

White
Salmon 9,251 35,753 45,004

Wilbur 4,406 16,730 21,136

Wilkeson 3,957 15,110 19,067

Wilson
Creek 5,129 19,652 24,781

Winlock 6,007 22,845 28,852

Winthrop 642 2,427 3,069

Woodinville 20,451 77,551 98,002

Woodland 6,566 24,836 31,402

Woodway 3,929 14,863 18,792

Yacolt 8,352 33,027 41,379

Yakima 181,195 671,606 852,801

Yarrow
Point 6,382 24,327 30,709

Yelm 5,716 21,692 27,408

Zillah 21,090 80,580 101,670

TOTAL
APPROPRIATIONS $13,869,524 $52,430,476 $66,300,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. In
addition to the requirements for the study required by section 3, chapter
. . ., Laws of 2000 (Substitute House Bill No. 2392) for the joint
task force on local governments, the joint task force on local governments
shall identify appropriate levels of ongoing state funding of city and county
program costs and the manner in which such funding would be distributed. The
joint task force on local governments shall consider factors that may be
incorporated into distribution mechanisms to provide equalization funding for
jurisdictions based on incorporation, growth, economic conditions, or other
economic changes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The shorelines protection account is created in the state treasury. Moneys
transferred into the account shall be distributed by the treasurer to eligible
counties as provided in this section. Beginning with the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2002, and in each of the following fiscal years through the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2006, the treasurer shall transfer the sum of twenty
million dollars into the shorelines protection account from the general
fund--state. The transfers shall be made in equal quarterly deposits.

(2)
Deposits in the shorelines protection account shall be distributed to eligible
counties as defined in subsection (3) of this section based on miles of
shorelines in the county. For purposes of this section, "miles of
shorelines in the county" means the number of miles of shorelines of the
state, as defined in RCW 90.58.030, in the county as of January 1, 2000.

(3)
A county is eligible for distributions from the shorelines protection account
created under this section if it: (a) Has shorelines of the state as defined
in RCW 90.58.030; and (b) has a population of less than five hundred thousand
as determined by the office of financial management.

(4)
Eligible counties may use the moneys received under this section solely for the
purposes authorized in subsection (5) of this section on riparian, marine, or
estuarine parcels, or the portion thereof, that:

(a)
Have been designated as critical areas under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(b)
Are located within a county's shoreline management jurisdiction under chapter
90.58 RCW; or

(c)
Have been identified as addressing a limiting factor under RCW 75.46.070.

(5)(a)
Eligible counties may use moneys received from the account for:

(i)
Voluntary leases or licenses from willing lessors or licensors for shoreline
conservation or preservation; or

(ii)
Voluntary acquisition of less than fee simple interests from willing sellers
for conservation futures, development rights, or conservation easements.

(b)
Eligible counties also may use moneys received from the account for
restoration, maintenance, and monitoring of property leased or property
interests acquired as specified in (a) of this subsection.

(6)
In making acquisition decisions, counties shall consult with a designated lead
entity that has been established under RCW 75.46.060, and municipalities within
the county, and shall give priority to riparian, marine, and estuarine projects
or parcels:

(a)
For which interests may be acquired or leases may be executed in coordination
with acquisitions made by the interagency committee for outdoor recreation
according to chapter 43.99A RCW; or

(b)
That have been designated by the United States national marine fisheries
service or the United States fish and wildlife service as critical habitat for
threatened or endangered species according to 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1533(a)(3).

Sec.
8. RCW
43.135.035 and 1994 c 2 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the legislature
that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts may be taken
only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each house, and then only if state
expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will not exceed the
state expenditure limits established under this chapter.

(2)(a)
If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this section will result in
expenditures in excess of the state expenditure limit, then the action of the
legislature shall not take effect until approved by a vote of the people at a
November general election. The office of financial management shall adjust the
state expenditure limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the
voters under this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of
revenue generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be adjusted
downward upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.

(b)
The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this section shall
be substantially as follows:

"Shall
taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to
allow a spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
inflation and population increases?"

(3)(a)
The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration of an emergency
for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law approved by a two-thirds
vote of each house of the legislature and signed by the governor. The law
shall set forth the nature of the emergency, which is limited to natural
disasters that require immediate government action to alleviate human suffering
and provide humanitarian assistance. The state expenditure limit may be
exceeded for no more than twenty-four months following the declaration of the
emergency and only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.

(b)
Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section may be imposed
only until thirty days following the next general election, unless an extension
is approved at that general election. The additional taxes shall expire upon
expiration of the declaration of emergency. The legislature shall not impose
additional taxes for emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in
the education construction fund have been exhausted.

(c)
The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not impose any tax on
intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that statute exists on January
1, 1993.

(4)
If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from the state general
fund on or after January 1, 1993, to another source of funding, or if moneys
are transferred from the state general fund to another fund or account, the
office of financial management shall lower the state expenditure limit to
reflect the shift. This subsection does not apply to transfers to the
shorelines protection account under section 7 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 39.42 RCW to read as follows:

Deposits
in the shorelines protection account under section 7 of this act shall not be
deducted from the calculation of general state revenues under RCW 39.42.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
Sections 1 through 6 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

(2) Sections 7 through 9 of this act take effect July 1, 2001.

---
END ---