BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The better schools fund is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the fund
may be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the fund shall be apportioned
in the same manner as moneys are apportioned under chapter 28A.510 RCW. The
amount allocated to each school district shall be based on the number of
full-time equivalent students in the school district during the school year
ending just prior to the allocation.

(2)
Allocations received under this section shall be used for only the following
new and expanded educational enhancements:

(a)
To reduce class sizes in kindergarten through fourth grade by hiring additional
certificated teachers and paying nonemployee-related costs associated with
those additional teachers;

(b)
To make selected reductions in class sizes in grades five through twelve;

(c)
To improve student academic achievement in grades kindergarten through twelve
by providing new and expanded learning opportunities, including, but not
limited to, before‑and‑after school programs, weekend school
programs, summer school programs, full‑day kindergarten programs, intercession
opportunities, and parental involvement;

(d)
To provide additional professional development for certificated and classified
staff, including additional paid time for curriculum and lesson redesign and
development work, training to ensure that instruction is aligned with state
standards and student needs, reimbursement for higher education costs related
to enhancing skills and knowledge, extended year and extended day teaching
contracts, and mentoring programs to match new teachers with skilled master
teachers;

(e)
To provide new and expanded developmental preschool programs designed to
prepare prekindergarten children for successful learning; and

(f)
To provide improvements or additions to school building facilities, which
improvements or additions are directly related to the new or expanded services
in (a) through (c) of this subsection.

(3)
Expenditure of better schools fund moneys for salary increases or additional
compensation must be directly related to additional duties or enhanced programs
under this section. Payments made under this section are not basic education
program salaries under RCW 28A.400.200.

(4)
School districts are prohibited from using moneys allocated under this section
for loan repayment or for debt service.

(5)
The educational enhancements provided pursuant to this section are not within
the state's program of basic education.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.135.035 and 1994 c 2 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the legislature
that raises state revenue or requires revenue-neutral tax shifts may be taken
only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each house, and then only if state
expenditures in any fiscal year, including the new revenue, will not exceed the
state expenditure limits established under this chapter.

(2)(a)
If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this section will result in
expenditures in excess of the state expenditure limit, then the action of the
legislature shall not take effect until approved by a vote of the people at a
November general election. The office of financial management shall adjust the
state expenditure limit by the amount of additional revenue approved by the
voters under this section. This adjustment shall not exceed the amount of
revenue generated by the legislative action during the first full fiscal year
in which it is in effect. The state expenditure limit shall be adjusted downward
upon expiration or repeal of the legislative action.

(b)
The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this section shall
be substantially as follows:

"Shall
taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to
allow a spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
inflation and population increases?"

(3)(a)
The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration of an emergency
for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law approved by a two-thirds
vote of each house of the legislature and signed by the governor. The law
shall set forth the nature of the emergency, which is limited to natural
disasters that require immediate government action to alleviate human suffering
and provide humanitarian assistance. The state expenditure limit may be
exceeded for no more than twenty-four months following the declaration of the
emergency and only for the purposes contained in the emergency declaration.

(b)
Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section may be imposed
only until thirty days following the next general election, unless an extension
is approved at that general election. The additional taxes shall expire upon
expiration of the declaration of emergency. The legislature shall not impose
additional taxes for emergency purposes under this subsection unless funds in
the education construction fund have been exhausted.

(c)
The state or any political subdivision of the state shall not impose any tax on
intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070 as that statute exists on January
1, 1993.

(4)
If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from the state general
fund on or after January 1, 1993, to another source of funding, or if moneys
are transferred from the state general fund to another fund or account, the
office of financial management shall lower the state expenditure limit to
reflect the shift. This subsection does not apply to transfers to the
better schools fund under RCW 67.70.040 and 67.70.240.

Sec.
3. RCW
67.70.040 and 1994 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall have the power, and it shall be its duty:

(1)
To promulgate such rules governing the establishment and operation of a state
lottery as it deems necessary and desirable in order that such a lottery be
initiated at the earliest feasible and practicable time, and in order that such
lottery produce the maximum amount of net revenues for the state consonant with
the dignity of the state and the general welfare of the people. Such rules
shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(a)
The type of lottery to be conducted which may include the selling of tickets or
shares. The use of electronic or mechanical devices or video terminals which
allow for individual play against such devices or terminals shall be
prohibited. Approval of the legislature shall be required before entering any
agreement with other state lotteries to conduct shared games;

(b)
The price, or prices, of tickets or shares in the lottery;

(c)
The numbers and sizes of the prizes on the winning tickets or shares;

(d)
The manner of selecting the winning tickets or shares;

(e)
The manner and time of payment of prizes to the holder of winning tickets or
shares which, at the director's option, may be paid in lump sum amounts or
installments over a period of years;

(f)
The frequency of the drawings or selections of winning tickets or shares.
Approval of the legislature is required before conducting any on-line game in
which the drawing or selection of winning tickets occurs more frequently than
once every twenty-four hours;

(g)
Without limit as to number, the type or types of locations at which tickets or
shares may be sold;

(h)
The method to be used in selling tickets or shares;

(i)
The licensing of agents to sell or distribute tickets or shares, except that a
person under the age of eighteen shall not be licensed as an agent;

(j)
The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid licensed sales agents
necessary to provide for the adequate availability of tickets or shares to
prospective buyers and for the convenience of the public;

(k)
The apportionment of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery
tickets or shares and from all other sources among: (i) The payment of prizes
to the holders of winning tickets or shares, which shall not be less than
forty-five percent of the gross annual revenue from such lottery, (ii)
transfers to the lottery administrative account created by RCW 67.70.260, and
(iii) transfer to the state's ((general)) better schools fund.
Transfers to the ((state general)) better schools fund shall be
made in compliance with RCW 43.01.050;

(l)
Such other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and economical
operation and administration of the lottery and for the convenience of the
purchasers of tickets or shares and the holders of winning tickets or shares.

(2)
To ensure that in each place authorized to sell lottery tickets or shares, on
the back of the ticket or share, and in any advertising or promotion there
shall be conspicuously displayed an estimate of the probability of purchasing a
winning ticket.

(3)
To amend, repeal, or supplement any such rules from time to time as it deems
necessary or desirable.

(4) To advise and make recommendations to the director for the
operation and administration of the lottery.

Sec.
4. RCW
67.70.240 and 1997 c 220 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

The
moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:

(1)
For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery tickets or shares;

(2)
For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account created by RCW
67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account created by RCW 67.70.260;

(3)
For purposes of making deposits into the state's ((general)) better
schools fund;

(4)
For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs. Three million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during calendar year 1996. During subsequent years, such
distributions shall equal the prior year's distributions increased by four
percent. Distributions under this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued
for the construction of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than
twenty years after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;

(5)
For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account, created in RCW
43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW 43.99N.070, six million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during the calendar year 1998.
During subsequent years, such distribution shall equal the prior year's
distributions increased by four percent. No distribution may be made under
this subsection after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of
the bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this subsection
shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than December 31, 2020;

(6)
For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and

(7)
For the payment of agent compensation.

The
office of financial management shall require the allotment of all expenses paid
from the account and shall report to the ways and means committees of the
senate and house of representatives any changes in the allotments.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 39.42 RCW to read as follows:

Deposits
in the better schools account under RCW 67.70.040 and 67.70.240 shall not be
deducted from the calculation of general state revenues under RCW 39.42.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act takes effect January 1, 2001.

---
END ---