BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The purpose
of this act is to establish a mechanism for the provision of basic health care
insurance to residents of the state by renaming public hospital districts as
public health care districts and authorizing these districts to provide basic
health care insurance to residents of the districts. Public health care
districts are authorized to use their property tax receipts to subsidize all or
a portion of the premiums for this basic health care insurance, which may be
provided directly by public health care districts joining together to form a
self-insurance program, purchasing group health care insurance on the open
market, or by paying the premiums, rates, or other amounts imposed for coverage
under the Washington basic health plan.

PART
I

AUTHORITY TO
SUBSIDIZE BASIC HEALTH CARE INSURANCE

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.44 RCW to read as follows:

A
public health care district may expend its property tax receipts to subsidize
all or a portion of the premiums for basic health care insurance for the
residents of the districts. This basic health care insurance may be obtained
by one or more districts forming a self-insurance program under chapter 48.62
RCW, one or more districts obtaining group health care coverage that is
purchased on the open market, or by paying the premiums, rates, or other
amounts imposed for coverage under the Washington basic health care plan.
Joint action by districts shall be taken under chapter 39.34 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 48.62 RCW to read as follows:

A
public health care district may individually self-insure, or may join or form a
self-insurance program together with other public health care districts, and
may jointly purchase basic health care insurance with other public health care
districts for basic health care insurance coverage for residents of the public
health care district under this chapter. This self-insuring or joint
self-insuring of basic health care insurance is subject to regulation under
this chapter.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.47.060 and 2000 c 79 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The
administrator has the following powers and duties:

(1)
To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered basic health care
services, including physician services, inpatient and outpatient hospital
services, prescription drugs and medications, and other services that may be
necessary for basic health care. In addition, the administrator may, to the
extent that funds are available, offer as basic health plan services chemical
dependency services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services shall
increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by more than
five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office of financial
management. All subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in any participating managed
health care system under the Washington basic health plan shall be entitled to
receive covered basic health care services in return for premium payments to
the plan. The schedule of services shall emphasize proven preventive and
primary health care and shall include all services necessary for prenatal,
postnatal, and well-child care. However, with respect to coverage for
subsidized enrollees who are eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal
services through the medical assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the
administrator shall not contract for such services except to the extent that
such services are necessary over not more than a one-month period in order to
maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the managed care
provider. The schedule of services shall also include a separate schedule of
basic health care services for children, eighteen years of age and younger, for
those subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees who choose to secure basic coverage
through the plan only for their dependent children. In designing and revising
the schedule of services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for
assessing health services under the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW
48.47.030, and such other factors as the administrator deems appropriate.

(2)(a)
To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due the administrator
from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross family income, giving
appropriate consideration to family size and the ages of all family members.
The enrollment of children shall not require the enrollment of their parent or
parents who are eligible for the plan. The structure of periodic premiums
shall be applied to subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals
pursuant to subsection (9) of this section and to the share of the cost of the
plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section.

(b)
To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from nonsubsidized
enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees shall be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to the
state for the plan plus the administrative cost of providing the plan to those
enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201.

(c)
An employer, public health care district, or other financial sponsor
may, with the prior approval of the administrator, pay the premium, rate, or
any other amount on behalf of a subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by
arrangement with the enrollee and through a mechanism acceptable to the
administrator.

(3)
To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost-sharing due a managed
health care system from subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees. The structure
shall discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care services,
and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing mechanisms, but
shall not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a barrier to appropriate
utilization of necessary health care services.

(4)
To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as to prevent an
overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes. Whenever the
administrator finds that there is danger of such an overexpenditure, the
administrator shall close enrollment until the administrator finds the danger
no longer exists.

(5)
To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as defined in RCW
70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who qualify may be based
on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the administrator.

(6)
To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery of services and
availability of the plan to residents of the state, subject to the limitations
contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act appropriating funds for the plan.

(7)
To solicit and accept applications from managed health care systems, as defined
in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic health care providers under
the plan for either subsidized enrollees, or nonsubsidized enrollees, or both.
The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered basic health care
services are available to any enrollee of the plan from among a selection of
two or more participating managed health care systems. In adopting any rules
or procedures applicable to managed health care systems and in its dealings
with such systems, the administrator shall consider and make suitable allowance
for the need for health care services and the differences in local availability
of health care resources, along with other resources, within and among the
several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed health care
systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who become eligible for
medical assistance may, at their option, continue to receive services from
their existing providers within the managed health care system if such
providers have entered into provider agreements with the department of social
and health services.

(8)
To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized and nonsubsidized
enrollees, deposit them in the basic health plan operating account, keep
records of enrollee status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health
care systems on the basis of the number of enrollees participating in the
respective managed health care systems.

(9)
To accept applications from individuals residing in areas served by the plan,
on behalf of themselves and their spouses and dependent children, for
enrollment in the Washington basic health plan as subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees, to establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as
may be necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a reasonable
schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any enrollee,
eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding scale premiums.
Funds received by a family as part of participation in the adoption support
program authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall
not be counted toward a family's current gross family income for the purposes
of this chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or income changes
accurately, the administrator shall have the authority either to bill the
enrollee for the amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil penalties of
up to two hundred percent of the amount of subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee
incorrectly reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules to define
the appropriate application of these sanctions and the processes to implement
the sanctions provided in this subsection, within available resources. No
subsidy may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family
income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW 70.47.110,
who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care services under chapter
74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their enrollment for no apparent good
cause, the administrator may establish appropriate rules or requirements that
are applicable to such individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in
the plan.

(10)
To accept applications from business owners on behalf of themselves and their
employees, spouses, and dependent children, as subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees, who reside in an area served by the plan. To accept applications
from public health care districts on behalf of their residents, as subsidized
or nonsubsidized enrollees, who reside in an area served by the plan. The
administrator may require all or the substantial majority of the eligible
employees of such businesses, or eligible residents of such public health
care districts, to enroll in the plan and establish those procedures
necessary to facilitate the orderly enrollment of groups in the plan and into a
managed health care system. The administrator may require that a business
owner or public health care district pay at least an amount equal to
what the employee pays after the state pays its portion of the subsidized
premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee or resident enrolled
in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for medicare who wish
to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic health care coverage and
services from a managed care system participating in the plan. The
administrator shall adjust the amount determined to be due on behalf of or from
all such enrollees whenever the amount negotiated by the administrator with the
participating managed health care system or systems is modified or the
administrative cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.

(11)
To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed health care
system in return for the provision of covered basic health care services to
enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of covered basic health care
services will be the same or actuarially equivalent for similar enrollees, the
rates negotiated with participating managed health care systems may vary among
the systems. In negotiating rates with participating systems, the
administrator shall consider the characteristics of the populations served by
the respective systems, economic circumstances of the local area, the need to conserve
the resources of the basic health plan trust account, and other factors the
administrator finds relevant.

(12)
To monitor the provision of covered services to enrollees by participating
managed health care systems in order to assure enrollee access to good quality
basic health care, to require periodic data reports concerning the utilization
of health care services rendered to enrollees in order to provide adequate
information for evaluation, and to inspect the books and records of
participating managed health care systems to assure compliance with the
purposes of this chapter. In requiring reports from participating managed
health care systems, including data on services rendered enrollees, the
administrator shall endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed health care
systems and to the plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such reporting
requirements with other state agencies, such as the insurance commissioner and
the department of health, to minimize duplication of effort.

(13)
To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private employer-based health care
coverage and to take appropriate measures consistent with state and federal
statutes that will discourage the reduction of such coverage in the state.

(14)
To develop a program of proven preventive health measures and to integrate it
into the plan wherever possible and consistent with this chapter.

(15)
To provide, consistent with available funding, assistance for rural residents,
underserved populations, and persons of color.

(16)
In consultation with appropriate state and local government agencies, to
establish criteria defining eligibility for persons confined or residing in
government-operated institutions.

(17)
To administer the premium discounts provided under RCW 48.41.200(3)(a) (i) and
(ii) pursuant to a contract with the Washington state health insurance pool.

Sec.
5. RCW
73.08.080 and 1985 c 181 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislative authorities of the several counties in this state shall levy, in
addition to the taxes now levied by law, a tax in a sum equal to the amount
which would be raised by not less than one and one-eighth cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value, and not greater than twenty-seven cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value against the taxable property of their respective
counties, to be levied and collected as now prescribed by law for the
assessment and collection of taxes, for the purpose of creating the veteran's
assistance fund for the relief of honorably discharged veterans as defined in
RCW 41.04.005 and the indigent wives, husbands, widows, widowers and minor
children of such indigent or deceased veterans, to be disbursed for such relief
by such county legislative authority: PROVIDED, That if the funds on deposit,
less outstanding warrants, residing in the veteran's assistance fund on the
first Tuesday in September exceed the expected yield of one and one-eighth
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the taxable property of the
county, the county legislative authority may levy a lesser amount: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the costs incurred in the administration of said veteran's
assistance fund shall be computed by the county treasurer not less than
annually and such amount may then be transferred from the veteran's assistance
fund as herein provided for to the county current expense fund. A county
may transfer moneys in the veteran's assistance fund to a public health care
district for purposes of providing all or a greater subsidized portion of the
premium for basic health care insurance to eligible veterans.

The
amount of a levy allocated to the purposes specified in this section may be
reduced in the same proportion as the regular property tax levy of the county
is reduced by chapter 84.55 RCW.

PART
II

TECHNICAL
CHANGES

Sec.
6. RCW
70.44.003 and 1982 c 84 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
purpose of chapter 70.44 RCW is to authorize the establishment of public ((hospital))
health care districts to own and operate hospitals and other health care
facilities ((and)), to provide hospital services and other health
care services for the residents of such districts and other persons, and to
provide basic health insurance to residents of such districts.

Sec.
7. RCW
70.44.007 and 1997 c 332 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the following words have the meanings indicated:

(1)
"Other health care facilities" means nursing home, extended care,
long-term care, outpatient and rehabilitative facilities, ambulances, and such
other facilities as are appropriate to the health needs of the population
served.

(2)
"Other health care services" means nursing home, extended care,
long-term care, outpatient, rehabilitative, health maintenance, and ambulance
services and such other services as are appropriate to the health needs of the
population served.

(3) (("Public hospital district" or)) "District"
means a public health care ((service)) district.

Sec.
8. RCW
70.44.010 and 1947 c 225 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Municipal
corporations, to be known as public ((hospital)) health care
districts, are hereby authorized and may be established within the several
counties of the state as hereinafter provided.

Sec.
9. RCW
70.44.015 and 1955 c 135 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
and all of the respective areas of land heretofore attempted to be organized
into ((public hospital)) districts under the provisions of this chapter
are validated and declared to be duly existing ((hospital)) districts
having the respective boundaries set forth in their organization proceedings as
shown by the files in the office of the ((board of)) county ((commissioners))
legislative authority of the county in question, and by the files of
such districts.

Sec.
10. RCW
70.44.016 and 1982 c 84 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
and all of the respective areas of land attempted to be organized into ((public
hospital)) districts prior to June 10, 1982, under the provisions of
chapter 70.44 RCW where the canvass of the election on the proposition of
creating a ((public hospital)) district shows the passage of the
proposition are validated and declared to be duly existing ((public hospital))
districts having the respective boundaries set forth in their organization
proceedings as shown by the files in the office of the legislative authority of
the county in question, and by the files of such districts.

Sec.
11. RCW
70.44.020 and 1990 c 259 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

At
any general election or at any special election which may be called for that
purpose the county legislative authority of a county may, or on petition of ten
percent of the registered voters of the county based on the total vote cast in
the last general county election, shall, by resolution, submit to the voters of
the county the proposition of creating a ((public hospital)) district
coextensive with the limits of the county. The petition shall be filed with
the county auditor, who shall within fifteen days examine the signatures
thereon and certify to the sufficiency thereof((, and for that purpose the
auditor shall have access to all registration books in the possession of
election officers in the county)). If the petition is found to be
insufficient, it shall be returned to the persons filing it, who may amend or
add names thereto for ten days, when it shall be returned to the auditor, who
shall have an additional fifteen days to examine it and attach the certificate
thereto. No person signing the petition may withdraw his or her name therefrom
after filing. When the petition is certified as sufficient, the auditor shall
forthwith transmit it, together with the certificate of sufficiency attached
thereto, to the county legislative authority, who shall immediately transmit
the proposition to the ((supervisor of elections or other election officer
of the)) county auditor, and he or she shall submit the
proposition to the voters at the next general election or if such petition so
requests, shall call a special election on such proposition in accordance with
RCW 29.13.010 and 29.13.020. The notice of the election shall state the
boundaries of the proposed district and the object of the election, and shall
in other respects conform to the requirements of law governing the time and
manner of holding elections. In submitting the question to the voters, the
proposition shall be expressed on the ballot substantially in the following
terms:

"For
public ((hospital)) health care district No.
. . . .

Against
public ((hospital)) health care district No.
. . . ."

Sec.
12. RCW
70.44.028 and 1982 c 84 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
commenced within thirty days after the date of the filing of the certificate of
the canvass of an election on the proposition of creating a new ((public
hospital)) district pursuant to chapter 70.44 RCW, no lawsuit whatever may
be maintained challenging in any way the legal existence of such district or
the validity of the proceedings had for the organization and creation thereof.
If the creation of a district is not challenged within the period specified in
this section, the district conclusively shall be deemed duly and regularly
organized under the laws of this state.

Sec.
13. RCW
70.44.030 and 1945 c 264 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
petition for the formation of a ((public hospital)) district may
describe a less area than the entire county in which the petition is filed, the
boundaries of which shall follow the then existing precinct boundaries and not
divide any voting precinct; and in the event that such a petition is filed
containing not less than ten percent of the voters of the proposed district who
voted at the last general election, certified by the auditor in like manner as
for a county-wide district, the ((board of)) county ((commissioners))
legislative authority shall fix a date for a hearing on such petition,
and shall publish the petition, without the signatures thereto appended, for
two weeks prior to the date of the hearing, together with a notice stating the
time of the meeting when such petition will be heard. Such publications
required by this chapter shall be in a newspaper published in the proposed or
established ((public hospital)) district, or, if there be no such
newspaper, then in a newspaper published in the county in which such district
is situated, and of general circulation in such county. The hearing on such
petition may be adjourned from time to time, not exceeding four weeks in all.
If upon the final hearing the ((board of)) county ((commissioners))
legislative authority shall find that any lands have been unjustly or
improperly included within the proposed ((public hospital)) district the
((said board)) legislative authority shall change and fix the
boundary lines in such manner as it shall deem reasonable and just and
conducive to the welfare and convenience, and make and enter an order
establishing and defining the boundary lines of the proposed ((public
hospital)) district: PROVIDED, That no lands shall be included within the
boundaries so fixed lying outside the boundaries described in the petition,
except upon the written request of the owners of such lands. Thereafter the
same procedure shall be followed as prescribed in this chapter for the
formation of a ((public hospital)) district including an entire county,
except that the petition and election shall be confined solely to the lesser ((public
hospital)) district.

Sec.
14. RCW
70.44.035 and 1953 c 267 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
petition for the formation of a ((public hospital)) district may
describe an area lying in more than one county, the boundaries of which shall
follow the then existing precinct boundaries and not divide a voting precinct;
and if a petition is filed with the county auditor of the respective counties
in which a portion of the proposed district is located, containing not less
than ten percent of the voters of that area of each county of the proposed
district who voted at the last general election, certified by the said
respective auditors in like manner as for a county-wide district, the ((board
of)) county ((commissioners)) legislative authority of each
of the counties in which a portion of the proposed district is located shall
fix a date for a hearing on the petition, and shall publish the petition,
without the signatures thereto appended, for two weeks prior to the hearing,
together with a notice stating the time of the meeting when the petition will
be heard. The publication required by this chapter shall be in a newspaper
published in the portion of each county lying within the proposed district, or
if there be no such newspaper published in any such portion of a county, then
in one published in the county wherein such portion of said district is situated,
and of general circulation in the county. The hearing before the respective
county ((commissioners)) legislative authority may be adjourned
from time to time not exceeding four weeks in all. If upon the final hearing
the respective ((boards of)) county ((commissioners)) legislative
authorities find that any land has been unjustly or improperly included
within the proposed district they may change and fix the boundary lines of the
portion of said district located within their respective counties in such
manner as they deem reasonable and just and conducive to the welfare and
convenience, and enter an order establishing and defining the boundary lines of
the proposed district located within their respective counties: PROVIDED, That
no lands shall be included within the boundaries so fixed lying outside the
boundaries described in the petition, except upon the written request of the
owners of the land to be so included. Thereafter the same procedure shall be
followed as prescribed for the formation of a district including an entire
county, except that the petition and election shall be confined solely to the
portions of each county lying within the proposed district.

Sec.
15. RCW
70.44.040 and 1997 c 99 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of Title 29 RCW relating to elections shall govern ((public
hospital)) districts, except as provided in this chapter.

A
((public hospital)) district shall be created when the ballot
proposition authorizing the creation of the district is approved by a simple
majority vote of the voters of the proposed district voting on the proposition
and the total vote cast upon the proposition exceeds forty percent of the total
number of votes cast in the proposed district at the preceding state general
election.

A
((public hospital)) district initially may be created with three, five,
or seven commissioner districts. At the election at which the proposition is
submitted to the voters as to whether a district shall be formed, three, five,
or seven commissioners shall be elected from either three, five, or seven
commissioner districts, or at-large positions, or both, as determined by
resolution of the county ((commissioners)) authority or authorities
of the county or counties in which the proposed ((public hospital))
district is located, all in accordance with RCW 70.44.054. The election of the
initial commissioners shall be null and void if the district is not authorized
to be created.

No
primary shall be held. A special filing period shall be opened as provided in
RCW 29.15.170 and 29.15.180. The person receiving the greatest number of votes
for the commissioner of each commissioner district or at-large position shall
be elected as the commissioner of that district. The terms of office of the
initial ((public hospital)) district commissioners shall be staggered,
with the length of the terms assigned so that the person or persons who are
elected receiving the greater number of votes being assigned a longer term or
terms of office and each term of an initial commissioner running until a
successor assumes office who is elected at one of the next three following
district general elections the first of which occurs at least one hundred
twenty days after the date of the election where voters approved the ballot
proposition creating the district, as follows:

(a)
If the ((public hospital)) district will have three commissioners, the
successor to one initial commissioner shall be elected at such first following
district general election, the successor to one initial commissioner shall be
elected at the second following district general election, and the successor to
one initial commissioner shall be elected at the third following district
general election;

(b)
If the ((public hospital)) district will have five commissioners, the
successor to one initial commissioner shall be elected at such first following
district general election, the successors to two initial commissioners shall be
elected at the second following district general election, and the successors
to two initial commissioners shall be elected at the third following district
general election;

(c)
If the ((public hospital)) district will have seven commissioners, the
successors to two initial commissioners shall be elected at such first
following district general election, the successors to ((three [two])) two
initial commissioners shall be elected at the second following district general
election, and the successors to three initial commissioners shall be elected at
the third following district general election.

The
initial commissioners shall take office immediately when they are elected and
qualified. The term of office of each successor shall be six years. Each
commissioner shall serve until a successor is elected and qualified and assumes
office in accordance with RCW 29.04.170.

(2)
Only a registered voter who resides in a commissioner district may be a
candidate for, or hold office as, a commissioner of the commissioner district.
Voters of the entire ((public hospital)) district may vote at a primary
or general election to elect a person as a commissioner of the commissioner
district.

If
the proposed public ((hospital)) health care district initially
will have three commissioner districts and the public ((hospital)) health
care district is county-wide, and if the county has three county
legislative authority districts, the county legislative authority districts
shall be used as public ((hospital)) health care district
commissioner districts. In all other instances the county auditor of the
county in which all or the largest portion of the proposed public ((hospital))
health care district is located shall draw the initial ((public
hospital district)) commissioner districts and designate at-large
positions, if appropriate, as provided in RCW 70.44.054. Each of the
commissioner positions shall be numbered consecutively and associated with the
commissioner district or at-large position of the same number.

The
commissioners of a public ((hospital)) health care district that
is not coterminous with the boundaries of a county that has three county
legislative authority districts shall at the times required in chapter 29.70
RCW and may from time to time redraw commissioner district boundaries in a
manner consistent with chapter 29.70 RCW.

Sec.
16. RCW
70.44.041 and 1997 c 99 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

No appointment to fill a vacant position on or election to the
board of commissioners of any ((public hospital)) district made after
June 9, 1994, and before April 21, 1997, is deemed to be invalid solely due to
the ((public hospital)) district's failure to redraw its commissioner
district boundaries if necessary to comply with chapter 223, Laws of 1994.

Sec.
17. RCW
70.44.042 and 1997 c 99 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any provision in RCW 70.44.040 to the contrary, any board of public ((hospital))
health care district commissioners may, by resolution, abolish
commissioner districts and permit candidates for any position on the board to
reside anywhere in the public ((hospital)) health care district.

At any general or special election which may be called for that
purpose, the board of public ((hospital)) health care district
commissioners may, or on petition of ten percent of the voters based on the
total vote cast in the last district general election in the ((public
hospital)) district shall, by resolution, submit to the voters of the
district the proposition to reestablish commissioner districts.

Sec.
18. RCW
70.44.053 and 1997 c 99 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

At any general or special election which may be called for that
purpose the board of public ((hospital)) health care district
commissioners may, or on petition of ten percent of the voters based on the
total vote cast in the last district general election in the ((public
hospital)) district shall, by resolution, submit to the voters of the
district the proposition increasing the number of commissioners to either five
or seven members. The petition or resolution shall specify whether it is
proposed to increase the number of commissioners to either five or seven members.

Sec.
19. RCW
70.44.056 and 1997 c 99 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In
all existing public ((hospital)) health care districts in which
an increase in the number of district commissioners is proposed, the additional
commissioner positions shall be deemed to be vacant and the board of
commissioners of the ((public hospital)) district shall appoint
qualified persons to fill those vacancies in accordance with RCW 42.12.070.

Each
person who is appointed shall serve until a qualified person is elected at the
next general election of the district occurring one hundred twenty days or more
after the date of the election at which the voters of the district approved the
ballot proposition authorizing the increase in the number of commissioners. If
needed, special filing periods shall be authorized as provided in RCW 29.15.170
and 29.15.180 for qualified persons to file for the vacant office. A primary
shall be held to nominate candidates if sufficient time exists to hold a
primary and more than two candidates file for the vacant office. Otherwise, no
primary shall be held and the candidate receiving the greatest number of votes
for each position shall be elected. Except for the initial terms of office,
persons elected to each of these additional commissioner positions shall be
elected to a six-year term. The newly elected commissioners shall assume
office as provided in RCW 29.04.170.

The initial terms of the new commissioners shall be staggered as
follows: (1) When the number of commissioners is increased from three to five,
the person elected receiving the greatest number of votes shall be elected to a
six-year term of office, and the other person shall be elected to a four-year
term; (2) when the number of commissioners is increased from three or five to
seven, the terms of the new commissioners shall be staggered over the next
three district general elections so that two commissioners will be elected at
the first district general election following the election where the additional
commissioners are elected, two commissioners will be at the second district
general election after the election of the additional commissioners, and three
commissioners will be elected at the third district general election following the
election of the additional commissioners, with the persons elected receiving
the greatest number of votes elected to serve the longest terms.

Sec.
20. RCW
70.44.059 and 1993 c 234 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((Public
hospital)) Districts may employ chaplains for their hospitals,
health care facilities, and hospice programs.

Sec.
21. RCW
70.44.060 and 1997 c 3 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

All
((public hospital)) districts organized under the provisions of this
chapter shall have power:

(1)
To make a survey of existing hospital and other health care facilities within
and without such district.

(2)
To construct, condemn and purchase, purchase, acquire, lease, add to, maintain,
operate, develop and regulate, sell and convey all lands, property, property
rights, equipment, hospital and other health care facilities and systems for
the maintenance of hospitals, buildings, structures, and any and all other
facilities, and to exercise the right of eminent domain to effectuate the
foregoing purposes or for the acquisition and damaging of the same or property
of any kind appurtenant thereto, and such right of eminent domain shall be
exercised and instituted pursuant to a resolution of the commission and
conducted in the same manner and by the same procedure as in or may be provided
by law for the exercise of the power of eminent domain by incorporated cities
and towns of the state of Washington in the acquisition of property rights:
PROVIDED, That no ((public hospital)) district shall have the right of
eminent domain and the power of condemnation against any health care facility.

(3)
To lease existing hospital and other health care facilities and equipment
and/or other property used in connection therewith, including ambulances, and
to pay such rental therefor as the commissioners shall deem proper; to provide
hospital and other health care services for residents of said district by
facilities located outside the boundaries of said district, by contract or in
any other manner said commissioners may deem expedient or necessary under the
existing conditions; and said ((hospital)) district shall have the power
to contract with other communities, corporations, or individuals for the
services provided by said ((hospital)) district; and they may further
receive in said hospitals and other health care facilities and furnish proper
and adequate services to all persons not residents of said district at such
reasonable and fair compensation as may be considered proper: PROVIDED, That
it must at all times make adequate provision for the needs of the district and
residents of said district shall have prior rights to the available hospital
and other health care facilities of said district, at rates set by the district
commissioners.

(4)
For the purpose aforesaid, it shall be lawful for any district so organized to
take, condemn and purchase, lease, or acquire, any and all property, and
property rights, including state and county lands, for any of the purposes
aforesaid, and any and all other facilities necessary or convenient, and in
connection with the construction, maintenance, and operation of any such
hospitals and other health care facilities, subject, however, to the applicable
limitations provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(5)
To contract indebtedness or borrow money for corporate purposes on the credit
of the corporation or the revenues of the hospitals thereof, and the revenues
of any other facilities or services that the district is or hereafter may be
authorized by law to provide, and to issue and sell: (a) Revenue bonds,
revenue warrants, or other revenue obligations therefor payable solely out of a
special fund or funds into which the district may pledge such amount of the
revenues of the hospitals thereof, and the revenues of any other facilities or
services that the district is or hereafter may be authorized by law to provide,
to pay the same as the commissioners of the district may determine, such
revenue bonds, warrants, or other obligations to be issued and sold in the same
manner and subject to the same provisions as provided for the issuance of
revenue bonds, warrants, or other obligations by cities or towns under the
Municipal Revenue Bond Act, chapter 35.41 RCW, as may hereafter be amended; (b)
general obligation bonds therefor in the manner and form as provided in RCW
70.44.110 and 70.44.130, as may hereafter be amended; or (c) interest-bearing
warrants to be drawn on a fund pending deposit in such fund of money sufficient
to redeem such warrants and to be issued and paid in such manner and upon such
terms and conditions as the board of commissioners may deem to be in the best
interest of the district; and to assign or sell hospital accounts receivable,
and accounts receivable for the use of other facilities or services that the
district is or hereafter may be authorized by law to provide, for collection
with or without recourse. General obligation bonds shall be issued and sold in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW. Revenue bonds, revenue warrants, or other
revenue obligations may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46
RCW.

(6)
To raise revenue by the levy of an annual tax on all taxable property within
such ((public hospital)) district not to exceed fifty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value, and an additional annual tax on all taxable property
within such ((public hospital)) district not to exceed twenty-five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value, or such further amount as has been or
shall be authorized by a vote of the people. Although ((public hospital))
districts are authorized to impose two separate regular property tax levies,
the levies shall be considered to be a single levy for purposes of the
limitation provided for in chapter 84.55 RCW. ((Public hospital)) Districts
are authorized to levy such a general tax in excess of their regular property
taxes when authorized so to do at a special election conducted in accordance
with and subject to all of the requirements of the Constitution and the laws of
the state of Washington now in force or hereafter enacted governing the
limitation of tax levies. The said board of district commissioners is
authorized and empowered to call a special election for the purpose of
submitting to the qualified voters of the ((hospital)) district a
proposition or propositions to levy taxes in excess of its regular property
taxes. The superintendent shall prepare a proposed budget of the contemplated
financial transactions for the ensuing year and file the same in the records of
the commission on or before the first Monday in September. Notice of the
filing of said proposed budget and the date and place of hearing on the same
shall be published for at least two consecutive weeks in a newspaper printed
and of general circulation in said county. On the first Monday in October the
commission shall hold a public hearing on said proposed budget at which any
taxpayer may appear and be heard against the whole or any part of the proposed
budget. Upon the conclusion of said hearing, the commission shall, by
resolution, adopt the budget as finally determined and fix the final amount of
expenditures for the ensuing year. Taxes levied by the commission shall be
certified to and collected by the proper county officer of the county in which
such ((public hospital)) district is located in the same manner as is or
may be provided by law for the certification and collection of port district
taxes. The commission is authorized, prior to the receipt of taxes raised by
levy, to borrow money or issue warrants of the district in anticipation of the
revenue to be derived by such district from the levy of taxes for the purpose
of such district, and such warrants shall be redeemed from the first money
available from such taxes when collected, and such warrants shall not exceed
the anticipated revenues of one year, and shall bear interest at a rate or
rates as authorized by the commission.

(7)
To enter into any contract with the United States government or any state,
municipality, or other ((hospital)) district, or any department of those
governing bodies, for carrying out any of the powers authorized by this
chapter.

(8)
To sue and be sued in any court of competent jurisdiction: PROVIDED, That all
suits against the ((public hospital)) district shall be brought in the
county in which the ((public hospital)) district is located.

(9)
To pay actual necessary travel expenses and living expenses incurred while in
travel status for (a) qualified physicians who are candidates for medical staff
positions, and (b) other qualified persons who are candidates for
superintendent or other managerial and technical positions, when the district
finds that hospitals or other health care facilities owned and operated by it
are not adequately staffed and determines that personal interviews with said
candidates to be held in the district are necessary or desirable for the
adequate staffing of said facilities.

(10)
To make contracts, employ superintendents, attorneys, and other technical or
professional assistants and all other employees; to make contracts with private
or public institutions for employee retirement programs; to print and publish
information or literature; and to do all other things necessary to carry out
the provisions of this chapter.

Sec.
22. RCW
70.44.070 and 1987 c 58 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The public ((hospital)) health care district commission shall
appoint a superintendent, who shall be appointed for an indefinite time and be
removable at the will of the commission. Appointments and removals shall be by
resolution, introduced at a regular meeting and adopted at a subsequent regular
meeting by a majority vote. The superintendent shall receive such compensation
as the commission shall fix by resolution.

(2)
Where a ((public hospital)) district operates more than one hospital,
the commission may in its discretion appoint up to one superintendent per
hospital and assign among the superintendents the powers and duties set forth
in RCW 70.44.080 and 70.44.090 as deemed appropriate by the commission.

Sec.
23. RCW
70.44.080 and 1987 c 58 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The superintendent shall be the chief administrative officer of the ((public))
district ((hospital)) and shall have control of administrative functions
of the district. The superintendent shall be responsible to the commission for
the efficient administration of all affairs of the district. In case of the
absence or temporary disability of the superintendent a competent person shall
be appointed by the commission. The superintendent shall be entitled to attend
all meetings of the commission and its committees and to take part in the
discussion of any matters pertaining to the district, but shall have no vote.

(2)
Where the commission has appointed more than one superintendent as provided in
RCW 70.44.070, the commission shall assign among the superintendents the powers
set forth in this section as deemed appropriate by the commission.

Sec.
24. RCW
70.44.090 and 1987 c 58 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((public hospital)) district superintendent shall have the power,
and duty:

(a)
To carry out the orders of the commission, and to see that all the laws of the
state pertaining to matters within the functions of the district are duly
enforced.

(b)
To keep the commission fully advised as to the financial condition and needs of
the district. To prepare, each year, an estimate for the ensuing fiscal year
of the probable expenses of the district, and to recommend to the commission
what development work should be undertaken, and what extensions and additions,
if any, should be made, during the ensuing fiscal year, with an estimate of the
costs of such development work, extensions and additions. To certify to the
commission all the bills, allowances and payrolls, including claims due
contractors of public works. To recommend to the commission a range of
salaries to be paid to district employees.

(2)
Where the commission has appointed more than one superintendent as provided in
RCW 70.44.070, the commission shall assign among the superintendents the duties
set forth in this section as deemed appropriate by the commission.

Sec.
25. RCW
70.44.140 and 2000 c 138 s 213 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All materials purchased and work ordered, the estimated cost of which is in
excess of five thousand dollars, shall be by contract. Before awarding any
such contract, the commission shall publish a notice at least thirteen days
before the last date upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed
proposals for such work. The plans and specifications must at the time of the
publication of such notice be on file at the office of the ((public hospital))
district, subject to public inspection: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the commission
may at the same time, and as part of the same notice, invite tenders for the
work or materials upon plans and specifications to be submitted by bidders.
The notice shall state generally the work to be done, and shall call for
proposals for doing the same, to be sealed and filed with the commission on or
before the day and hour named therein. Each bid shall be accompanied by bid
proposal security in the form of a certified check, cashier's check, postal
money order, or surety bond made payable to the order of the commission, for a
sum not less than five percent of the amount of the bid, and no bid shall be
considered unless accompanied by such bid proposal security. At the time and
place named, such bids shall be publicly opened and read, and the commission
shall proceed to canvass the bids, and may let such contract to the lowest
responsible bidder upon plans and specifications on file, or to the best bidder
submitting his or her own plans and specifications: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no
contract shall be let in excess of the estimated cost of the materials or work,
or if, in the opinion of the commission, all bids are unsatisfactory, they may
reject all of them and readvertise, and in such case all bid proposal security
shall be returned to the bidders. If the contract is let, then all bid
proposal security shall be returned to the bidders, except that of the
successful bidder, which is retained until a contract shall be entered into for
the purchase of such materials for doing such work, and a bond to perform such
work furnished, with sureties satisfactory to the commission, in an amount to
be fixed by the commission, not less than twenty-five percent of contract price
in any case, between the bidder and commission, in accordance with the bid. If
such bidder fails to enter into the contract in accordance with the bid and
furnish such bond within ten days from the date at which the bidder is notified
that he or she is the successful bidder, the bid proposal security and the
amount thereof shall be forfeited to the ((public hospital)) district.
A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited
from bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is
made for the project.

(2)
As an alternative to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, a ((public
hospital)) district may let contracts using the small works roster process
under RCW 39.04.155.

(3)
Any purchases with an estimated cost of up to fifteen thousand dollars may be
made using the process provided in RCW 39.04.190.

(4)
The commission may waive the competitive bidding requirements of this section
pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies
to the purchase or public work.

Sec.
26. RCW
70.44.171 and 1967 c 227 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
treasurer of the county in which a ((public hospital)) district is
located shall be treasurer of the district, except that the commission by
resolution may designate some other person having experience in financial or
fiscal matters as treasurer of the district. If the treasurer is not the
county treasurer, the commission shall require a bond, with a surety company
authorized to do business in the state of Washington, in an amount and under
the terms and conditions which the commission by resolution from time to time
finds will protect the district against loss. The premium on any such bond
shall be paid by the district.

All
district funds shall be paid to the treasurer and shall be disbursed by him or
her only on warrants issued by an auditor appointed by the commission, upon
orders or vouchers approved by it. The treasurer shall establish a public ((hospital))
health care district fund, into which shall be paid all district funds,
and he or she shall maintain such special funds as may be created by the
commission, into which he or she shall place all money as the commission
may, by resolution, direct.

If
the treasurer of the district is the treasurer of the county all district funds
shall be deposited with the county depositaries under the same restrictions,
contracts, and security as provided for county depositaries. If the treasurer
of the district is some other person, all funds shall be deposited in ((such
bank or banks authorized to do business in this state as the commission by
resolution shall designate, and with surety bond to the district or securities
in lieu thereof of the kind, no less in amount, as provided in RCW 36.48.020
for deposit of county funds. Such surety bond or securities in lieu thereof
shall be filed or deposited with the treasurer of the district, and approved by
resolution of the commission)) public depositories.

All
interest collected on district funds shall belong to the district and be
deposited to its credit in the proper district funds.

A district may provide and require a reasonable bond of any other
person handling moneys or securities of the district. The district may pay the
premium on such bond.

Sec.
27. RCW
70.44.185 and 1971 ex.s. c 218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, including RCW 70.44.040, whenever the boundary line
between contiguous ((hospital)) districts bisects an irrigation block
unit placing part of the unit in one ((hospital)) district and the
balance thereof in another such district, the county auditor, upon his or
her approval of a request therefor after public hearing thereon, shall
change the ((hospital)) district boundary lines so that the entire farm
unit of the person so requesting shall be wholly in one of such ((hospital))
districts and give notice thereof to those ((hospital)) district and
county officials as he or she shall deem appropriate therefor.

Sec.
28. RCW
70.44.190 and 1953 c 267 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Two
or more contiguous ((hospital)) districts, whether the territory therein
lies in one or more counties, may consolidate by following the procedure
outlined in chapter 35.10 RCW with reference to consolidation of cities and
towns.

Sec.
29. RCW
70.44.200 and 1993 c 489 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A ((public hospital)) district may annex territory outside the existing
boundaries of such district and contiguous thereto, whether the territory lies
in one or more counties, in accordance with this section.

(2)
A petition for annexation of territory contiguous to a ((public hospital))
district may be filed with the commission of the district to which annexation
is proposed. The petition must be signed by the owners, as prescribed by RCW
35A.01.040(9) (a) through (e), of not less than sixty percent of the area of
land within the territory proposed to be annexed. Such petition shall describe
the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed and shall be accompanied
by a map which outlines the boundaries of such territory.

(3)
Whenever such a petition for annexation is filed with the commission of a ((public
hospital)) district, the commission may entertain the same, fix a date for
public hearing thereon, and cause notice of the hearing to be published once a
week for at least two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation
within the territory proposed to be annexed. The notice shall also be posted
in three public places within the territory proposed to be annexed, shall
contain a description of the boundaries of such territory, and shall specify
the time and place of hearing and invite interested persons to appear and voice
approval or disapproval of the annexation.

(4)
Following the hearing, if the commission of the district determines to
accomplish the annexation, it shall do so by resolution. The resolution may
annex all or any portion of the proposed territory but may not include in the
annexation any property not described in the petition. Upon passage of the
annexation resolution, the territory annexed shall become part of the district
and a certified copy of such resolution shall be filed with the legislative
authority of the county or counties in which the annexed property is located.

(5)
If the petition for annexation and the annexation resolution so provide, as the
commission may require, and such petition has been signed by the owners of all
the land within the boundaries of the territory being annexed, the annexed
property shall assume and be assessed and taxed to pay for all or any portion
of the outstanding indebtedness of the district to which it is annexed at the
same rates as other property within such district. Unless so provided in the
petition and resolution, property within the boundaries of the territory
annexed shall not be assessed or taxed to pay for all or any portion of the
indebtedness of the district to which it is annexed that was contracted prior
to or which existed at the date of annexation. In no event shall any such
annexed property be released from any assessments or taxes previously levied
against it or from its existing liability for the payment of outstanding bonds
or warrants issued prior to such annexation.

(6)
The annexation procedure provided for in this section shall be an alternative
method of annexation applicable only if at the time the annexation petition is
filed either there are no registered voters residing in the territory proposed
to be annexed or the petition is also signed by all of the registered voters
residing in the territory proposed to be annexed.

Sec.
30. RCW
70.44.210 and 1967 c 227 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

As
an alternate method of annexation to ((public hospital)) districts, any
territory adjacent to a ((public hospital)) district may be annexed
thereto by vote of the ((qualified electors)) registered voters
residing in the territory to be annexed, in the manner provided in RCW
70.44.210 through 70.44.230. An election to annex such territory may be called
pursuant to a resolution calling for such an election adopted by the district
commissioners.

Any
resolution calling for such an election shall describe the boundaries of the
territory to be annexed, state that the annexation of such territory to the ((public
hospital)) district will be conducive to the welfare and benefit of the
persons or property within the district and within the territory proposed to be
annexed, and fix the date, time and place for a public hearing thereon which
date shall be not more than sixty nor less than forty days following the
adoption of such resolution.

Sec.
31. RCW
70.44.220 and 1967 c 227 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Notice
of such hearing shall be published once a week for at least two consecutive
weeks in one or more newspapers of general circulation within the territory
proposed to be annexed. The notice shall contain a description of the
boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed and shall state the time and
place of the hearing thereon and the fact that any changes in the boundaries of
such territory will be considered at such time and place. At such hearing or
any continuation thereof, any interested person may appear and be heard on all
matters relating to the proposed annexation. The district commissioners may
make such changes in the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed as
it shall deem reasonable and proper, but may not delete any portion of the
proposed area which will create an island of included or excluded lands. If
the district commissioners shall determine that any additional territory should
be included in the territory to be annexed, a second hearing shall be held and
notice given in the same manner as for the original hearing. The district
commissioners may adjourn the hearing on the proposed annexation from time to
time not exceeding thirty days in all. At the next regular meeting following
the conclusion of such hearing, the district commissioners shall, if it finds
that the annexation of such territory will be conducive to the welfare and
benefit of the persons and property therein and the welfare and benefit of the
persons and property within the ((public hospital)) district, adopt a
resolution fixing the boundaries of the territory to be annexed and causing to
be called a special election on such annexation to be held not more than one
hundred twenty days nor less than sixty days following the adoption of such
resolution.

Sec.
32. RCW
70.44.230 and 1967 c 227 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

An
election on the annexation of territory to a ((public hospital))
district shall be conducted and canvassed in the same manner as provided for
the conduct of an election on the formation of a ((public hospital))
district except that notice of such election shall be published in one or more
newspapers of general circulation in the territory proposed to be annexed and
the ballot proposition shall be in substantially the following form:

ANNEXATION TO (herein insert
name of ((public hospital)) the district)

"Shall the territory
described in a resolution of the public ((hospital)) health care
district commissioners of (here insert name of ((public hospital)) the
district) adopted on . . . .,
. . . . . ., 19. . ., be annexed to such
district?

YES ................................ G

NO................................... G"

If a
majority of those voting on such proposition vote in favor thereof, the
territory shall thereupon be annexed to the ((public hospital))
district.

Sec.
33. RCW
70.44.235 and 1987 c 138 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As provided in this section, a ((public hospital)) district may withdraw
areas from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the ((public hospital))
district that previously had been withdrawn from the ((public hospital))
district under this section.

(2)
The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a) Adoption of a
resolution by the ((hospital)) district commissioners requesting the
withdrawal and finding that, in the opinion of the commissioners, inclusion of
this area within the ((public hospital)) district will result in a
reduction of the district's tax levy rate under the provisions of RCW
84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city or town council
approving the withdrawal, if the area is located within the city or town, or
adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority of the county
within which the area is located approving the withdrawal, if the area is
located outside of a city or town. A withdrawal shall be effective at the end
of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the
resolutions are adopted, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for
property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the
adoption of the second resolution.

The
withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a ((public hospital))
district shall not exempt any property therein from taxation for the purpose of
paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the ((public hospital))
district existing at the time of the withdrawal.

(3)
An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a ((public hospital))
district under this section may be reannexed into the ((public hospital))
district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the ((hospital))
district commissioners proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of a
resolution by the city or town council approving the reannexation, if the area
is located within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county
legislative authority of the county within which the area is located approving
the reannexation, if the area is located outside of a city or town. The
reannexation shall be effective at the end of the day on the thirty-first day
of December in the year in which the adoption of the second resolution occurs,
but for purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the
boundaries shall be established immediately upon the adoption of the second
resolution. Referendum action on the proposed reannexation may be taken by the
voters of the area proposed to be reannexed if a petition calling for a
referendum is filed with the city or town council, or county legislative
authority, within a thirty-day period after the adoption of the second
resolution, which petition has been signed by registered voters of the area
proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten percent of the total number of
the registered voters residing in that area.

If
a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered voters has been
so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held in abeyance and a ballot
proposition to authorize the reannexation shall be submitted to the voters of
the area at the next special election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that
occurs forty-five or more days after the petitions have been validated.
Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the reannexation by a simple majority
vote shall authorize the reannexation.

Sec.
34. RCW
70.44.240 and 1997 c 332 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Any ((public hospital)) district may contract or join with
any other ((public hospital)) district, any publicly owned hospital, any
nonprofit hospital, any corporation, any other legal entity, or individual to
acquire, own, operate, manage, or provide any hospital or other health care
facilities or hospital services or other health care services to be used by
individuals, districts, hospitals, or others, including the providing of health
maintenance services. If a ((public hospital)) district chooses to
contract or join with another party or parties pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter, it may do so through the establishment of a nonprofit
corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other legal entity of
its choosing in which the ((public hospital)) district and the other
party or parties participate. The governing body of such legal entity shall
include representatives of the ((public hospital)) district, including
members of the ((public hospital)) district's board of commissioners. A
((public hospital)) district contracting or joining with another party
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may appropriate funds and may sell,
lease, or otherwise provide property, personnel, and services to the legal
entity established to carry out the contract or joint activity.

Sec.
35. RCW
70.44.260 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 78 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
((public hospital)) district may execute an executory conditional sales
contract with any other municipal corporation, the state, or any of its
political subdivisions, the government of the United States, or any private
party for the purchase of any real or personal property, or property rights, in
connection with the exercise of any powers or duties which such districts now
or hereafter are authorized to exercise, if the entire amount of the purchase
price specified in such contract does not result in a total indebtedness in
excess of the limitation imposed by RCW 39.36.020, as now or hereafter amended,
to be incurred without the assent of the voters of the district: PROVIDED,
That if such a proposed contract would result in a total indebtedness in excess
of three-fourths of one percent of the value of taxable property in such ((public
hospital)) district, a proposition in regard to whether or not such a
contract may be executed shall be submitted to the voters for approval or
rejection in the same manner that bond issues for capital purposes are
submitted to the voters. The term "value of taxable property" shall
have the meaning set forth in RCW 39.36.015.

Sec.
36. RCW
70.44.300 and 1997 c 332 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board of commissioners of any ((public hospital)) district may sell
and convey at public or private sale real property of the district if the board
determines by resolution that the property is no longer required for ((public
hospital)) district purposes or determines by resolution that the sale of
the property will further the purposes of the ((public hospital))
district.

(2)
Any sale of district real property authorized pursuant to this section shall be
preceded, not more than one year prior to the date of sale, by market value
appraisals by three licensed real estate brokers or professionally designated
real estate appraisers as defined in RCW 74.46.020 or three independent experts
in valuing health care property, selected by the board of commissioners, and no
sale shall take place if the sale price would be less than ninety percent of
the average of such appraisals.

(3)
When the board of commissioners of any ((public hospital)) district
proposes a sale of district real property pursuant to this section and the
value of the property exceeds one hundred thousand dollars, the board shall
publish a notice of its intention to sell the property. The notice shall be
published at least once each week during two consecutive weeks in a legal
newspaper of general circulation within the ((public hospital)) district.
The notice shall describe the property to be sold and designate the place where
and the day and hour when a hearing will be held. The board shall hold a
public hearing upon the proposal to dispose of the ((public hospital))
district property at the place and the day and hour fixed in the notice and
consider evidence offered for and against the propriety and advisability of the
proposed sale.

(4) If in the judgment of the board of commissioners of any
district the sale of any district real property not needed for ((public
hospital)) district purposes would be facilitated and greater value
realized through use of the services of licensed real estate brokers, a
contract for such services may be negotiated and concluded. The fee or
commissions charged for any broker service shall not exceed seven percent of
the resulting sale price for a single parcel. No licensed real estate broker
or professionally designated real estate appraisers as defined in RCW 74.46.020
or independent expert in valuing health care property selected by the board to
appraise the market value of a parcel of property to be sold may be a party to
any contract with the ((public hospital)) district to sell such property
for a period of three years after the appraisal.

Sec.
37. RCW
70.44.310 and 1982 c 84 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board of commissioners of any ((public hospital)) district may lease or
rent out real property of the district which the board has determined by
resolution presently is not required for ((public hospital)) district
purposes in such manner and upon such terms and conditions as the board in its
discretion finds to be in the best interest of the district.

Sec.
38. RCW
70.44.315 and 1997 c 332 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When evaluating a potential acquisition, the commissioners shall determine
their compliance with the following requirements:

(a)
That the acquisition is authorized under chapter 70.44 RCW and other laws
governing ((public hospital)) districts;

(b)
That the procedures used in the decision-making process allowed district
officials to thoroughly fulfill their due diligence responsibilities as
municipal officers, including those covered under chapter 42.23 RCW governing
conflicts of interest and chapter 42.20 RCW prohibiting malfeasance of public
officials;

(c)
That the acquisition will not result in the revocation of hospital privileges;

(d)
That sufficient safeguards are included to maintain appropriate capacity for
health science research and health care provider education;

(e)
That the acquisition is allowed under Article VIII, section 7 of the state
Constitution, which prohibits gifts of public funds or lending of credit and
Article XI, section 14, prohibiting private use of public funds;

(f)
That the ((public hospital)) district will retain control over district
functions as required under chapter 70.44 RCW and other laws governing ((hospital))
districts;

(g)
That the activities related to the acquisition process complied with chapters
42.17 and 42.32 RCW, governing disclosure of public records, and chapter 42.30
RCW, governing public meetings;

(h)
That the acquisition complies with the requirements of RCW 70.44.300 relating
to fair market value; and

(i)
Other state laws affecting the proposed acquisition.

(2)
The commissioners shall also determine whether the ((public hospital))
district should retain a right of first refusal to repurchase the assets by the
((public hospital)) district if the hospital is subsequently sold to,
acquired by, or merged with another entity.

(3)(a)
Prior to approving the acquisition of a district hospital, the board of
commissioners of the ((hospital)) district shall obtain a written
opinion from a qualified independent expert or the Washington state department
of health as to whether or not the acquisition meets the standards set forth in
RCW 70.45.080.

(b)
Upon request, the ((hospital)) district and the person seeking to
acquire its hospital shall provide the department or independent expert with
any needed information and documents. The department shall charge the ((hospital))
district for any costs the department incurs in preparing an opinion under this
section. The ((hospital)) district may recover from the acquiring
person any costs it incurs in obtaining the opinion from either the department
or the independent expert. The opinion shall be delivered to the board of
commissioners no later than ninety days after it is requested.

(c)
Within ten working days after it receives the opinion, the board of
commissioners shall publish notice of the opinion in at least one newspaper of
general circulation within the ((hospital)) district, stating how a person
may obtain a copy, and giving the time and location of the hearing required
under (d) of this subsection. It shall make a copy of the report and the
opinion available to anyone upon request.

(d)
Within thirty days after it received the opinion, the board of commissioners
shall hold a public hearing regarding the proposed acquisition. The board of
commissioners may vote to approve the acquisition no sooner than thirty days
following the public hearing.

(4)(a)
For purposes of this section, "acquisition" means an acquisition by a
person of any interest in a hospital owned by a ((public hospital))
district, whether by purchase, merger, lease, or otherwise, that results in a
change of ownership or control of twenty percent or more of the assets of a
hospital currently licensed and operating under RCW 70.41.090. Acquisition
does not include an acquisition where the other party or parties to the
acquisition are nonprofit corporations having a substantially similar
charitable health care purpose, organizations exempt from federal income tax
under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, or governmental
entities. Acquisition does not include an acquisition where the other party is
an organization that is a limited liability corporation, a partnership, or any
other legal entity and the members, partners, or otherwise designated
controlling parties of the organization are all nonprofit corporations having a
charitable health care purpose, organizations exempt from federal income tax
under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, or governmental
entities. Acquisition does not include activities between two or more
governmental organizations, including organizations acting pursuant to chapter
39.34 RCW, regardless of the type of organizational structure used by the
governmental entities.

(b) For purposes of this subsection (4), "person" means
an individual, a trust or estate, a partnership, a corporation including
associations, a limited liability company, a joint stock company, or an
insurance company.

Sec.
39. RCW
70.44.320 and 1982 c 84 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board of commissioners of any ((public hospital)) district may sell or
otherwise dispose of surplus personal property of the district which the board
has determined by resolution is no longer required for ((public hospital))
district purposes in such manner and upon such terms and conditions as the board
in its discretion finds to be in the best interest of the district.

Sec.
40. RCW
70.44.350 and 1982 c 84 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

An
existing ((public hospital)) district upon resolution of its board of
commissioners may be divided into two new ((public hospital)) districts,
in the manner provided in RCW 70.44.350 through 70.44.380, subject to the
approval of the plan therefor by the superior court in the county where such
district is located and by a majority of the voters voting on the proposition
for such approval at a special election to be held in each of the proposed new
districts. The board of commissioners of an existing district shall by
resolution or resolutions find that such division is in the public interest;
adopt and approve a plan of division; authorize the filing of a petition in the
superior court in the county in which the district is located to obtain court
approval of the plan of division; request the calling of a special election to
be held, following such court approval, for the purpose of submitting to the
voters in each of the proposed new districts the proposition of whether the
plan of division should be approved and carried out; and direct all officers
and employees of the existing district to take whatever actions are reasonable
and necessary in order to carry out the division, subject to the approval of
the plan therefor by the court and the voters.

Sec.
41. RCW
70.44.380 and 1982 c 84 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Following
the entry of the court order pursuant to RCW 70.44.370, the county officer
authorized to call and conduct elections in the county in which the existing
district is located shall call a special election as provided by the resolution
of the board of commissioners of such district for the purpose of submitting to
the voters in each of the proposed new districts the proposition of whether the
plan of division should be approved and carried out. Notice of the election
describing the boundaries of the proposed new districts and stating the objects
of the election shall be given and the election conducted in accordance with
the general election laws. The proposition expressed on the ballots at such
election shall be substantially as follows:

"Shall the plan of
division of public ((hospital)) health care district No.
. . . ., approved by the Superior Court on
. . . . . . (insert date), be approved and carried
out?

Yes
G No G"

At such
election three commissioners for each of the proposed new districts nominated
by petition pursuant to RCW 54.12.010 shall be elected to hold office pursuant
to RCW 70.44.040. If at such election a majority of the voters voting on the
proposition in each of the proposed new districts shall vote in favor of the
plan of division, the county canvassing board shall so declare in its canvass
of the returns of such election and upon the filing of the certificate of such
canvass: The division of the existing district shall be effective; such
original district shall cease to exist; the creation of the two new public ((hospital))
health care districts shall be complete; all assets of the original
district shall vest in and become the property of the new districts,
respectively, pursuant to the plan of division; all the outstanding obligations
of the original district shall be assumed by the new districts, respectively,
pursuant to such plan; the commissioners of the original district shall cease
to hold office; and the affairs of the new districts shall be governed by the
newly elected commissioners of such respective new districts. Unless commenced
within thirty days after the date of the filing of the certificate of the canvass
of such election, no lawsuit whatever may be maintained challenging in any way
the legal existence of the resulting new districts, the validity of the
proceedings had for the organization and creation thereof, or the lawfulness of
the plan of division. Upon the petition of either or both new districts, the
superior court in the county where they are located may take whatever actions
are reasonable and necessary to complete or confirm the carrying out of such
plan.

Sec.
42. RCW
70.44.400 and 1999 c 153 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

Territory
within a ((public hospital)) district may be withdrawn therefrom in the
same manner provided by law for withdrawal of territory from water-sewer
districts, as provided by chapter 57.28 RCW. For purposes of conforming with
such procedure, the ((public hospital)) district shall be deemed to be
the water-sewer district and the ((public hospital)) board of
commissioners shall be deemed to be the water-sewer district board of commissioners.

Sec.
43. RCW
70.44.450 and 1992 c 161 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to other powers granted to ((public hospital)) districts by
chapter 39.34 RCW, rural ((public hospital)) districts may enter into
cooperative agreements and contracts with other rural ((public hospital))
districts in order to provide for the health care needs of the people served by
the ((hospital)) districts. These agreements and contracts are
specifically authorized to include:

(1)
Allocation of health care services among the different facilities owned and
operated by the districts;

(2)
Combined purchases and allocations of medical equipment and technologies;

(3)
Joint agreements and contracts for health care service delivery and payment
with public and private entities; and

(4)
Other cooperative arrangements consistent with the intent of chapter 161, Laws
of 1992. The provisions of chapter 39.34 RCW shall apply to the development
and implementation of the cooperative contracts and agreements.

Sec.
44. RCW
70.44.460 and 1992 c 161 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definition in this section applies
throughout RCW 70.44.450.

"Rural ((public hospital)) district" means a ((public
hospital)) district authorized under chapter 70.44 RCW whose geographic
boundaries do not include a city with a population greater than thirty
thousand.

Sec.
45. RCW
84.52.010 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in
specific amounts.

The
rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing
districts coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and
fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
county, as shown by the completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent
of all taxes levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective
counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation
of the property of the taxing districts respectively.

When
a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property,
that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050,
exceeds the limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor
shall recompute and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1)
The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district,
and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not
exceeding the limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take
precedence over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other
than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed
under RCW 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park
district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined
rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then these
levies shall be reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate of
regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the
levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy
imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or shall be eliminated; and (c) if the combined rate of regular property tax
levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent
of the true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or eliminated.

(2)
The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior
taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated
as follows to bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the
provisions of these limitations:

(a)
First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts
authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(b)
Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be
reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c)
Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other
than fire protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts,
and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for
public ((hospital)) health care districts, shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d)
Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under
RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
and

(e)
Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts
under RCW 52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park districts under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public ((hospital))
health care districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars
of assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

In
determining whether the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is
subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations
provided in that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy,
as apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

Sec.
46. RCW
84.52.052 and 1996 c 230 s 1615 are each amended to read as follows:

The
limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and RCW 84.52.043 shall
not prevent the levy of additional taxes by any taxing district except school
districts in which a larger levy is necessary in order to prevent the
impairment of the obligation of contracts. As used in this section, the term
"taxing district" means any county, metropolitan park district, park
and recreation service area, park and recreation district, water-sewer
district, solid waste disposal district, public facilities district, flood
control zone district, county rail district, service district, public ((hospital))
health care district, road district, rural county library district,
island library district, rural partial-county library district, intercounty
rural library district, fire protection district, cemetery district, city,
town, transportation benefit district, emergency medical service district with
a population density of less than one thousand per square mile, or cultural
arts, stadium, and convention district.

Any
such taxing district may levy taxes at a rate in excess of the rate specified
in RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056 and 84.52.043, or 84.55.010 through
84.55.050, when authorized so to do by the voters of such taxing district in
the manner set forth in Article VII, section 2(a) of the Constitution of this
state at a special or general election to be held in the year in which the levy
is made.

A
special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by the county
legislative authority, or council, board of commissioners, or other governing
body of any such taxing district, by giving notice thereof by publication in
the manner provided by law for giving notices of general elections, at which
special election the proposition authorizing such excess levy shall be
submitted in such form as to enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote
"yes" and those opposed thereto to vote "no."

Sec.
47. RCW
84.52.069 and 1999 c 224 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As used in this section, "taxing district" means a county, emergency
medical service district, city or town, public ((hospital)) health
care district, urban emergency medical service district, or fire protection
district.

(2)
A taxing district may impose additional regular property tax levies in an
amount equal to fifty cents or less per thousand dollars of the assessed value
of property in the taxing district. The tax shall be imposed (a) each year for
six consecutive years, (b) each year for ten consecutive years, or (c)
permanently. A tax levy under this section must be specifically authorized by
a majority of at least three-fifths of the registered voters thereof approving
a proposition authorizing the levies submitted at a general or special
election, at which election the number of persons voting "yes" on the
proposition shall constitute three-fifths of a number equal to forty percent of
the total number of voters voting in such taxing district at the last preceding
general election when the number of registered voters voting on the proposition
does not exceed forty percent of the total number of voters voting in such
taxing district in the last preceding general election; or by a majority of at
least three-fifths of the registered voters thereof voting on the proposition
when the number of registered voters voting on the proposition exceeds forty
percent of the total number of voters voting in such taxing district in the
last preceding general election. Ballot propositions shall conform with RCW
29.30.111. A taxing district shall not submit to the voters at the same
election multiple propositions to impose a levy under this section.

(3)
A taxing district imposing a permanent levy under this section shall provide
for separate accounting of expenditures of the revenues generated by the levy.
The taxing district shall maintain a statement of the accounting which shall be
updated at least every two years and shall be available to the public upon
request at no charge.

(4)
A taxing district imposing a permanent levy under this section shall provide
for a referendum procedure to apply to the ordinance or resolution imposing the
tax. This referendum procedure shall specify that a referendum petition may be
filed at any time with a filing officer, as identified in the ordinance or
resolution. Within ten days, the filing officer shall confer with the
petitioner concerning form and style of the petition, issue the petition an
identification number, and secure an accurate, concise, and positive ballot
title from the designated local official. The petitioner shall have thirty
days in which to secure the signatures of not less than fifteen percent of the
registered voters of the taxing district, as of the last general election, upon
petition forms which contain the ballot title and the full text of the measure
to be referred. The filing officer shall verify the sufficiency of the
signatures on the petition and, if sufficient valid signatures are properly
submitted, shall certify the referendum measure to the next election within the
taxing district if one is to be held within one hundred eighty days from the
date of filing of the referendum petition, or at a special election to be
called for that purpose in accordance with RCW 29.13.020.

The
referendum procedure provided in this subsection shall be exclusive in all
instances for any taxing district imposing the tax under this section and shall
supersede the procedures provided under all other statutory or charter
provisions for initiative or referendum which might otherwise apply.

(5)
Any tax imposed under this section shall be used only for the provision of
emergency medical care or emergency medical services, including related
personnel costs, training for such personnel, and related equipment, supplies,
vehicles and structures needed for the provision of emergency medical care or
emergency medical services.

(6)
If a county levies a tax under this section, no taxing district within the
county may levy a tax under this section. No other taxing district may levy a
tax under this section if another taxing district has levied a tax under this
section within its boundaries: PROVIDED, That if a county levies less than
fifty cents per thousand dollars of the assessed value of property, then any
other taxing district may levy a tax under this section equal to the difference
between the rate of the levy by the county and fifty cents: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That if a taxing district within a county levies this tax, and the voters of
the county subsequently approve a levying of this tax, then the amount of the
taxing district levy within the county shall be reduced, when the combined
levies exceed fifty cents. Whenever a tax is levied county-wide, the service
shall, insofar as is feasible, be provided throughout the county: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That no county-wide levy proposal may be placed on the ballot without
the approval of the legislative authority of each city exceeding fifty thousand
population within the county: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section and RCW
36.32.480 shall not prohibit any city or town from levying an annual excess
levy to fund emergency medical services: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER, That if a
county proposes to impose tax levies under this section, no other ballot
proposition authorizing tax levies under this section by another taxing
district in the county may be placed before the voters at the same election at
which the county ballot proposition is placed: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That any
taxing district emergency medical service levy that is limited in duration and
that is authorized subsequent to a county emergency medical service levy that
is limited in duration, shall expire concurrently with the county emergency
medical service levy.

(7)
The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 shall not apply to the tax levy authorized in
this section.

(8)
If a ballot proposition approved under subsection (2) of this section did not
impose the maximum allowable levy amount authorized for the taxing district
under this section, any future increase up to the maximum allowable levy amount
must be specifically authorized by the voters in accordance with subsection (2)
of this section at a general or special election.

(9)
The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 shall not apply to the first levy imposed
pursuant to this section following the approval of such levy by the voters
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

Sec.
48. RCW
39.36.020 and 2000 c 156 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise expressly provided by law or in subsections (2), (3) and
(4) of this section, no taxing district shall for any purpose become indebted
in any manner to an amount exceeding three‑eighths of one percent of the
value of the taxable property in such taxing district without the assent of
three‑fifths of the voters therein voting at an election to be held for
that purpose, nor in cases requiring such assent shall the total indebtedness
incurred at any time exceed one and one-fourth percent on the value of the
taxable property therein.

(2)(a)(i)
Public ((hospital)) health care districts are limited to an
indebtedness amount not exceeding three-fourths of one percent of the value of
the taxable property in such public hospital and health insurance
districts without the assent of three-fifths of the voters therein voting at an
election held for that purpose.

(ii)
Counties, cities, and towns are limited to an indebtedness amount not exceeding
one and one-half percent of the value of the taxable property in such counties,
cities, or towns without the assent of three-fifths of the voters therein
voting at an election held for that purpose.

(b)
In cases requiring such assent counties, cities, towns, and public ((hospital))
health care districts are limited to a total indebtedness of two and
one-half percent of the value of the taxable property therein. However, any
county that has assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a metropolitan
municipal corporation under chapter 36.56 RCW may become indebted to a larger
amount for its authorized metropolitan functions, as provided under chapter
35.58 RCW, but not exceeding an additional three-fourths of one percent of the
value of the taxable property in the county without the assent of three-fifths
of the voters therein voting at an election held for that purpose, and in cases
requiring such assent not exceeding an additional two and one-half percent of
the value of the taxable property in the county.

(3)
School districts are limited to an indebtedness amount not exceeding
three-eighths of one percent of the value of the taxable property in such
district without the assent of three‑fifths of the voters therein voting
at an election held for that purpose. In cases requiring such assent school
districts are limited to a total indebtedness of two and one-half percent of
the value of the taxable property therein.

(4)
No part of the indebtedness allowed in this chapter shall be incurred for any
purpose other than strictly county, city, town, school district, township, port
district, metropolitan park district, or other municipal purposes: PROVIDED,
That a city or town, with such assent, may become indebted to a larger amount,
but not exceeding two and one-half percent additional, determined as herein
provided, for supplying such city or town with water, artificial light, and
sewers, when the works for supplying such water, light, and sewers shall be
owned and controlled by the city or town; and a city or town, with such assent,
may become indebted to a larger amount, but not exceeding two and one-half
percent additional for acquiring or developing open space, park facilities, and
capital facilities associated with economic development: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That any school district may become indebted to a larger amount but not
exceeding two and one-half percent additional for capital outlays.

(5)
Such indebtedness may be authorized in any total amount in one or more
propositions and the amount of such authorization may exceed the amount of
indebtedness which could then lawfully be incurred. Such indebtedness may be
incurred in one or more series of bonds from time to time out of such
authorization but at no time shall the total general indebtedness of any taxing
district exceed the above limitation.

The term "value of the taxable property" as used in this
section shall have the meaning set forth in RCW 39.36.015.

---
END ---