BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) The intent of the framers of that compact known as the
Constitution of the United States was to guarantee to each of the
several states sovereignty over all matters within its boundaries
excepting only those powers specifically granted to the government of
the United States, as agent of the several states, under the
Constitution of the United States;
(2) The imposition upon the state of Washington by the congress of
the United States, of a requirement that the state of Washington
"disclaim all right and title to the unappropriated public lands" lying
within the state as a condition prerequisite to acceptance of the state
of Washington into the union, was an act beyond the power of the
congress of the United States and is thus null and of no effect;
(3) The present purported ownership and control of the public lands
within the state of Washington by the government of the United States
is without foundation and violates the clear intent of the Constitution
of the United States; and
(4) The purported ownership and control of the public lands within
the state of Washington by the government of the United States works a
severe, continuous, and debilitating hardship upon the people of the
state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(2) "Public lands" means all unreserved, unappropriated public
lands within the exterior boundaries of the state, except lands:
(a) To which title is held by any private person or entity;
(b) To which title was held by the state or any political
subdivision of the state on the effective date of this section;
(c) Within the boundaries of:
(i) National parks;
(ii) National forests;
(iii) National monuments;
(iv) National wildlife and migratory bird sanctuaries established
prior to October 16, 1978; and
(v) Military reservations;
(d) That are essential to the operation, maintenance, and access
to:
(i) United States army corps of engineers and United States bureau
of reclamation projects;
(ii) Designated United States highways; or
(iii) Shipyards, docks, security and defense establishments,
magazines, and arsenals;
(e) On which buildings are sited to house operations of the United
States government; or
(f) Owned or controlled by sovereign Indian nations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Subject to existing rights of the
people, on and after the effective date of this section, fee title to
all public lands in Washington, all water on and below the surface of
the land, and all minerals not previously appropriated is vested in the
state of Washington.
(2) Until equivalent measures are enacted by the state of
Washington, the rights and privileges of the people of the state under
the national forest reserve transfer act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 471 et seq.),
the general mining laws (30 U.S.C. Sec. 21 et seq.), the homestead act
(43 U.S.C. 161 et seq.), the Taylor grazing act (43 U.S.C. Sec. 315 et
seq.), the desert land act (43 U.S.C. Sec. 321 et seq.), and all
rights-of-way and easements for public utilities shall be preserved
under administration by the state.
(3) Public lands that have been administered by the United States
under international treaties or interstate compacts must continue to be
administered by the state in conformance with those treaties or
compacts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The public lands under this chapter must be
managed by the department and used to the greatest extent possible for
recreation, wildlife habitat, agriculture, mineral and timber
production, and for the development, production, and transmission of
energy and other public utility services under principles of multiple
use that provide maximum benefit to the people of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Proceeds of sales, fees, rents,
royalties, or other money paid or due the state under this chapter must
be deposited with the state treasurer to be credited to the general
fund. However, the department shall deposit with each affected county
in which lands are transferred:
(a) An amount in equal proportion to revenues now or which would
have been received by the county from revenue sharing programs
established on those federal lands; and
(b) At least twenty-five percent of the gross revenues earned by
the state on the transferred lands.
(2) Where leases of the public lands are sought, annual fees not to
exceed fair market value must be charged, with provision in each lease
for tenure by the lessee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The state of Washington has exclusive
jurisdiction to enforce this chapter.
(2) A citizen of this state may institute a civil action to recover
damages for any injury or loss that is sustained as the result of a
violation of this chapter.
(3) A person who attempts to exercise jurisdiction over the public
lands under this chapter in a manner not permitted by the laws of this
state is subject to imprisonment for not less than two years nor more
than ten years.
(4) A corporation or other entity that attempts to exercise
jurisdiction over the public lands under this chapter in a manner not
permitted by the laws of this state is subject to a fine of not more
than five thousand dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The department of natural resources
shall conduct a study of the public lands of this state to determine
which lands should be:
(a) Made available for disposition; and
(b) Retained by the state as habitat for wildlife or for
recreational or other public purposes.
(2) The department of natural resources shall submit a report of
its findings and recommendations to the legislature by January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 2 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 79 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act takes effect January 1, 2012, if
the proposed amendment to Article XXVI of the state Constitution
(Senate Joint Resolution No. . . . . (S-0201.1/11)) revoking this
state's disclaimer of rights to unappropriated public lands is validly
submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next
general election. If the proposed amendment is not approved and
ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

--- END ---