BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 8.04 RCW
to read as follows:
Subject to section 2 of this act, property that may be appropriated
under this chapter includes property possessed by the federal
government, unless the property was acquired by the federal government
with the consent of the legislature and in accordance with the United
States Constitution Article I, section 8, clause 17.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 8.26 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to acquisitions under section 1 of this
act.

--- END ---