BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that evidence and
testimony from criminal informants who have reason to seek leniency and
other benefits from the criminal justice system are inherently suspect
because a system in which criminal informants are rewarded by the state
produces dangerous incentives to manufacture or fabricate evidence.
This act is intended to address the unreliability of informant
evidence and testimony by providing a method to assess informant
evidence and testimony and to corroborate its substance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Electronic recording" or "electronically recorded" means an
audio and visual recording that is an authentic, accurate, unaltered
record of an informant statement.
(2) "Informant" means any criminal suspect, whether or not they are
detained or incarcerated, who provides information in exchange for a
deal, promise, inducement, or benefit, or expectation thereof. This
definition does not include victims of the crime being prosecuted or
experts.
(3) "Statement" means an oral, written, sign language, or nonverbal
communication.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All statements made by an informant
relating to a crime by an adult or juvenile shall be electronically
recorded.
(2) If an audio and visual recording is not practicable, an audio
recording is an acceptable alternative to audio and visual recording.
(3) Every electronic recording of a statement by an informant shall
be clearly identified and catalogued by law enforcement personnel.
(4) Every electronic recording shall be preserved by law
enforcement personnel until all appeals, postconviction, and habeas
corpus proceedings connected to that testimony are final and concluded,
or the time within which such proceedings must be brought has expired.
(5) Upon motion by the defendant, the court may order that a copy
of the recording be preserved for any period beyond the expiration of
all appeals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) In any case relating to a crime by an
adult or juvenile, the prosecution must disclose in a timely manner its
intent to rely on evidence provided by an informant or to introduce the
testimony of an informant.
(2) The prosecution shall also in a timely manner, prior to trial
or the entry of a guilty plea, disclose in discovery the following
factors:
(a) The complete criminal history of the informant;
(b) Any deals, promises, inducements, or benefits that the offering
party has made or will make in the future to the informant;
(c) The substance of the statements made by the accused to the
informant;
(d) The time and place of the statements given by the accused to
the informant, the time and place of the disclosure of the informant
statement to law enforcement officials, and the names of all persons
present when the statements by the accused and the informant were made;
(e) Whether at any time the informant modified or recanted that
testimony or statement and, if so, the time and place of the
modification or recantation, the nature of the modification or
recantation, and the names of the persons who were present at the
modification or recantation;
(f) Other cases in which the informant testified, provided that the
existence of such testimony can be ascertained through reasonable
inquiry and whether the informant received any promise, inducement, or
benefit in exchange for or subsequent to that testimony or statement;
(g) If known, the relationship between the accused and the
informant, including the amount of time they were incarcerated in the
same custodial section of the jail or prison; and
(h) Any other information relevant to the informant's credibility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Before a trial or any other proceeding
in which the state intends to introduce the testimony of an informant,
the court shall hold a pretrial hearing to assess the reliability and
to determine whether the state can corroborate the content of informant
testimony relating to a crime by an adult or juvenile unless the
defendant waives such a hearing.
(2) On the issue of reliability, the court shall consider all of
the factors enumerated in section 4(2) of this act. If the prosecution
fails to show by a preponderance of the evidence that the informant's
testimony is reliable, the court shall render the testimony
inadmissible.
(3) On the issue of corroboration, the court must determine whether
the informant's testimony is corroborated by other evidence tending to
connect the defendant with the crime committed. Corroboration is not
sufficient if the corroboration only shows the commission of the
offense. Corroboration shall not be provided by evidence or testimony
from another informant. If the prosecution fails to show corroboration
by a preponderance of the evidence, the court shall render the
testimony inadmissible.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If, after conviction, a defendant makes a
substantial showing that an informant witness provided false
information that might have affected the outcome of the trial, the
court shall hold a reliability hearing as provided in section 5 of this
act. If the court concludes by clear and convincing evidence that the
informant witness provided false evidence, the court shall order a new
trial.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 10 RCW.

--- END ---