BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.210.090 and 1991 c 3 s 290 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any child shall be exempt in whole or in part from the
immunization measures required by RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170
upon the presentation of any one or more of the ((following))
certifications required by this section, on a form prescribed by the
department of health((:)). The form presented on or after the
effective date of this section must include a statement to be signed by
a health care practitioner stating that he or she provided the signator
with information about the benefits and risks of immunization to the
child.
(((1))) (a) A written certification signed by ((any physician
licensed to practice medicine pursuant to chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW))
a health care practitioner that a particular vaccine required by rule
of the state board of health is, in his or her judgment, not advisable
for the child: PROVIDED, That when it is determined that this
particular vaccine is no longer contraindicated, the child will be
required to have the vaccine;
(((2))) (b) A written certification signed by any parent or legal
guardian of the child or any adult in loco parentis to the child that
the religious beliefs of the signator are contrary to the required
immunization measures; ((and)) or
(((3))) (c) A written certification signed by any parent or legal
guardian of the child or any adult in loco parentis to the child that
the signator has either a philosophical or personal objection to the
immunization of the child.
(2) For purposes of this section, "health care practitioner" means
a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, a naturopath
licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, a physician assistant licensed under
chapter 18.71A or 18.57A RCW, or an advanced registered nurse
practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.

--- END ---