BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.08.710 and 2005 c 246 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The county auditor shall have custody of the original voter
registration records for each county. The original voter registration
form must be filed without regard to precinct and is considered
confidential and unavailable for public inspection and copying. An
automated file of all registered voters must be maintained pursuant to
RCW 29A.08.125. An auditor may maintain the automated file in lieu of
filing or maintaining the original voter registration forms if the
automated file includes all of the information from the original voter
registration forms including, but not limited to, a retrievable
facsimile of each voter's signature.
(2) The following information contained in voter registration
records or files regarding a voter or a group of voters is available
for public inspection and copying, except as provided in this section
or RCW 40.24.060: The voter's name, address, political jurisdiction,
gender, date of birth, voting record, date of registration, and
registration number. No other information from voter registration
records or files is available for public inspection or copying.
(3) The address of an employee or worker of a criminal justice
agency as defined in RCW 10.97.030 shall be exempt from public
disclosure under this section for a two-year period commencing upon the
date proof of qualifying employment is filed with the county auditor
who holds such voter registration records.

--- END ---