BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.23 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The issuing or implementation of a physician order for life
sustaining treatment does not restrict, inhibit, or impair in any
manner the sale, procurement, or issuance of any policy of life
insurance, nor does it modify the terms of an existing policy of life
insurance, notwithstanding any term of the policy to the contrary.
(2) For the purposes of this section "physician order for life
sustaining treatment" means a document, commonly referred to as a do
not resuscitate order, that is signed by a physician, summarizing the
wishes of an individual regarding life-sustaining treatment through
specific medical orders including an individual's preference for
resuscitation, medical intervention, use of antibiotics, and
artificially administered fluids and nutrition.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 48.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Section 1 of this act applies to group life insurance policies
regulated under this chapter.

--- END ---