BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends that the legislative
authority of each city and county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 adopt
a policy framework of comprehensive plan, capital budget, and
development regulations; however, the legislature does not intend that
a local legislative authority also administer or adjudicate permit
applications pursuant to that framework. The legislature finds that in
order to create a more timely, fair, and predictable permit process
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.020(7), local legislative bodies should divest
themselves of responsibility for administrative, quasi-judicial, and
appellate decision making, and assign those responsibilities to hearing
examiners or professional staff.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70B.060 and 1995 c 347 s 407 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Not later than March 31, 1996, each local government planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish by ordinance or resolution an
integrated and consolidated project permit process that may be included
in its development regulations. In addition to the elements required
by RCW 36.70B.050, the process shall include the following elements:
(((1))) (a) A determination of completeness to the applicant as
required by RCW 36.70B.070;
(((2))) (b) A notice of application to the public and agencies with
jurisdiction as required by RCW 36.70B.110;
(((3))) (c) Except as provided in RCW 36.70B.140, an optional
consolidated project permit review process as provided in RCW
36.70B.120. The review process shall provide for no more than one
consolidated open record hearing and one closed record appeal. If an
open record predecision hearing is provided prior to the decision on a
project permit, the process shall not allow a subsequent open record
appeal hearing;
(((4))) (d) Provision allowing for any public meeting or required
open record hearing to be combined with any public meeting or open
record hearing that may be held on the project by another local, state,
regional, federal, or other agency, in accordance with provisions of
RCW ((36.70B.090 and)) 36.70B.110;
(((5))) (e) A single report stating all the decisions made as of
the date of the report on all project permits included in the
consolidated permit process that do not require an open record
predecision hearing and any recommendations on project permits that do
not require an open record predecision hearing. The report shall state
any mitigation required or proposed under the development regulations
or the agency's authority under RCW 43.21C.060. The report may be the
local permit. If a threshold determination other than a determination
of significance has not been issued previously by the local government,
the report shall include or append this determination;
(((6))) (f) Except for the appeal of a determination of
significance as provided in RCW 43.21C.075, if a local government
elects to provide an appeal of its threshold determinations or project
permit decisions, the local government shall provide for no more than
one consolidated open record hearing on such appeal. The local
government need not provide for any further appeal and may provide an
appeal for some but not all project permit decisions. If an appeal is
provided after the open record hearing, it shall be a closed record
appeal before a single decision-making body or officer;
(((7))) (g) A notice of decision as required by RCW 36.70B.130 and
issued within the time period provided in RCW 36.70B.080 ((and
36.70B.090));
(((8))) (h) Completion of project review by the local government,
including environmental review and public review and any appeals to the
local government, within any applicable time periods ((under RCW
36.70B.090)); and
(((9))) (i) Any other provisions not inconsistent with the
requirements of this chapter or chapter 43.21C RCW.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, not later than
March 31, 2012, each local government that has a population of ten
thousand or greater and is planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt an
ordinance that requires all quasi-judicial permits be decided by either
the planning official or director at the local government or a hearing
examiner authorized by RCW 35.63.130, 35A.63.170, 36.70.970, or
58.17.330.
(b) A local government may adopt an ordinance opting out of the
requirements of (a) of this subsection no sooner than March 1, 2012, or
later than May 30, 2012.
(c) A local government may require a permit applicant or the
appellant to reimburse the local government for the costs of using a
hearing examiner, including all associated administrative and staff
costs, required notice costs, and environmental review costs. Issuance
of a hearing examiner decision may be delayed beyond the ten-day period
required by RCW 35.63.130, 35A.63.170, 36.70.970, or 58.17.330 until
the local government is reimbursed.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.63.130 and 1995 c 347 s 423 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As an alternative to those provisions of this chapter relating
to powers or duties of the planning commission to hear and report on
any proposal to amend a zoning ordinance, the legislative body of a
city or county may adopt a hearing examiner system under which a
hearing examiner or hearing examiners may hear and decide applications
for amending the zoning ordinance when the amendment which is applied
for is not of general applicability. In addition, the legislative body
may vest in a hearing examiner the power to hear and decide those
issues it believes should be reviewed and decided by a hearing
examiner, including but not limited to:
(a) Applications for conditional uses, variances, subdivisions,
shoreline permits, or any other class of applications for or pertaining
to development of land or land use;
(b) Appeals of administrative decisions or determinations; and
(c) Appeals of administrative decisions or determinations pursuant
to chapter 43.21C RCW.
The legislative body shall prescribe procedures to be followed by
the hearing examiner.
(2) Each city or county legislative body electing to use a hearing
examiner pursuant to this section shall by ordinance specify the legal
effect of the decisions made by the examiner. The legal effect of such
decisions may vary for the different classes of applications decided by
the examiner but shall include one of the following:
(a) The decision may be given the effect of a recommendation to the
legislative body;
(b) The decision may be given the effect of an administrative
decision appealable within a specified time limit to the legislative
body; or
(c) Except in the case of a rezone, the decision may be given the
effect of a final decision of the legislative body.
(3) Each final decision of a hearing examiner shall be in writing
and shall include findings and conclusions, based on the record, to
support the decision. Such findings and conclusions shall also set
forth the manner in which the decision would carry out and conform to
the city's or county's comprehensive plan and the city's or county's
development regulations. Each final decision of a hearing examiner,
unless a longer period is mutually agreed to in writing by the
applicant and the hearing examiner, shall be rendered within ten
working days following conclusion of all testimony and hearings.
Issuance of a hearing examiner decision may be delayed beyond the ten-day period until a local government is reimbursed pursuant to RCW
36.70B.060.

Sec. 4 RCW 35A.63.170 and 1995 c 347 s 424 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As an alternative to those provisions of this chapter relating
to powers or duties of the planning commission to hear and report on
any proposal to amend a zoning ordinance, the legislative body of a
city may adopt a hearing examiner system under which a hearing examiner
or hearing examiners may hear and decide applications for amending the
zoning ordinance when the amendment which is applied for is not of
general applicability. In addition, the legislative body may vest in
a hearing examiner the power to hear and decide those issues it
believes should be reviewed and decided by a hearing examiner,
including but not limited to:
(a) Applications for conditional uses, variances, subdivisions,
shoreline permits, or any other class of applications for or pertaining
to development of land or land use;
(b) Appeals of administrative decisions or determinations; and
(c) Appeals of administrative decisions or determinations pursuant
to chapter 43.21C RCW.
The legislative body shall prescribe procedures to be followed by
a hearing examiner. If the legislative authority vests in a hearing
examiner the authority to hear and decide variances, then the
provisions of RCW 35A.63.110 shall not apply to the city.
(2) Each city legislative body electing to use a hearing examiner
pursuant to this section shall by ordinance specify the legal effect of
the decisions made by the examiner. The legal effect of such decisions
may vary for the different classes of applications decided by the
examiner but shall include one of the following:
(a) The decision may be given the effect of a recommendation to the
legislative body;
(b) The decision may be given the effect of an administrative
decision appealable within a specified time limit to the legislative
body; or
(c) Except in the case of a rezone, the decision may be given the
effect of a final decision of the legislative body.
(3) Each final decision of a hearing examiner shall be in writing
and shall include findings and conclusions, based on the record, to
support the decision. Such findings and conclusions shall also set
forth the manner in which the decision would carry out and conform to
the city's comprehensive plan and the city's development regulations.
Each final decision of a hearing examiner, unless a longer period is
mutually agreed to in writing by the applicant and the hearing
examiner, shall be rendered within ten working days following
conclusion of all testimony and hearings. Issuance of a hearing
examiner decision may be delayed beyond the ten-day period until a
local government is reimbursed pursuant to RCW 36.70B.060.

Sec. 5 RCW 36.70.970 and 1995 c 347 s 425 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As an alternative to those provisions of this chapter relating
to powers or duties of the planning commission to hear and issue
recommendations on applications for plat approval and applications for
amendments to the zoning ordinance, the county legislative authority
may adopt a hearing examiner system under which a hearing examiner or
hearing examiners may hear and issue decisions on proposals for plat
approval and for amendments to the zoning ordinance when the amendment
which is applied for is not of general applicability. In addition, the
legislative authority may vest in a hearing examiner the power to hear
and decide those issues it believes should be reviewed and decided by
a hearing examiner, including but not limited to:
(a) Applications for conditional uses, variances, shoreline
permits, or any other class of applications for or pertaining to
development of land or land use;
(b) Appeals of administrative decisions or determinations; and
(c) Appeals of administrative decisions or determinations pursuant
to chapter 43.21C RCW.
The legislative authority shall prescribe procedures to be followed
by a hearing examiner.
Any county which vests in a hearing examiner the authority to hear
and decide conditional uses and variances shall not be required to have
a zoning adjuster or board of adjustment.
(2) Each county legislative authority electing to use a hearing
examiner pursuant to this section shall by ordinance specify the legal
effect of the decisions made by the examiner. Such legal effect may
vary for the different classes of applications decided by the examiner
but shall include one of the following:
(a) The decision may be given the effect of a recommendation to the
legislative authority;
(b) The decision may be given the effect of an administrative
decision appealable within a specified time limit to the legislative
authority; or
(c) Except in the case of a rezone, the decision may be given the
effect of a final decision of the legislative authority.
(3) Each final decision of a hearing examiner shall be in writing
and shall include findings and conclusions, based on the record, to
support the decision. Such findings and conclusions shall also set
forth the manner in which the decision would carry out and conform to
the county's comprehensive plan and the county's development
regulations. Each final decision of a hearing examiner, unless a
longer period is mutually agreed to in writing by the applicant and the
hearing examiner, shall be rendered within ten working days following
conclusion of all testimony and hearings. Issuance of a hearing
examiner decision may be delayed beyond the ten-day period until a
local government is reimbursed pursuant to RCW 36.70B.060.

Sec. 6 RCW 58.17.330 and 1995 c 347 s 429 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As an alternative to those provisions of this chapter requiring
a planning commission to hear and issue recommendations for plat
approval, the county or city legislative body may adopt a hearing
examiner system and shall specify by ordinance the legal effect of the
decisions made by the examiner. The legal effect of such decisions
shall include one of the following:
(a) The decision may be given the effect of a recommendation to the
legislative body;
(b) The decision may be given the effect of an administrative
decision appealable within a specified time limit to the legislative
body; or
(c) The decision may be given the effect of a final decision of the
legislative body.
The legislative authority shall prescribe procedures to be followed
by a hearing examiner.
(2) Each final decision of a hearing examiner shall be in writing
and shall include findings and conclusions, based on the record, to
support the decision. Each final decision of a hearing examiner,
unless a longer period is mutually agreed to by the applicant and the
hearing examiner, shall be rendered within ten working days following
conclusion of all testimony and hearings. Issuance of a hearing
examiner decision may be delayed beyond the ten-day period until a
local government is reimbursed pursuant to RCW 36.70B.060.

--- END ---