BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 While Article I, section 22 of the state
Constitution and the sixth amendment of the United States Constitution
protect the right of a defendant to represent him or herself in a
criminal trial, Article I, section 35 of the state Constitution
requires that crime victims be accorded due dignity and respect.
Conflicts may arise between these constitutional provisions when a pro
se defendant questions a victim in court. Procedures may be employed
that preserve the pro se defendant's control over his or her own trial
and that limit the trauma experienced by the victim. The legislature
commends consideration of these competing constitutional provisions to
the supreme court of Washington.

--- END ---