BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.36.030 and 2006 c 305 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following real and personal property shall be exempt from
taxation:
(1)(a) Property owned by nonprofit organizations or associations,
organized and conducted for nonsectarian purposes, which shall be used
for character-building, benevolent, protective or rehabilitative social
services directed at persons of all ages.
(b) The sale of donated merchandise shall not be considered a
commercial use of the property under this section if the proceeds are
devoted to the furtherance of the purposes of the selling organization
or association as specified in this subsection (1).
(c) In a county with a population of less than twenty thousand, the
rental or use of property, owned by a nonprofit organization or
association described in (a) of this subsection, by a person, group, or
organization in one of the following ways shall not nullify the
exemption:
(i) The property may be rented or used for pecuniary gain or for
business activities or by individuals, groups, and organizations for
private purposes if the rental or use:
(A) Does not exceed fifteen days each assessment year;
(B) No comparable private for-profit facility exists within ten
miles of the property that could be used for the same purpose for which
the property is loaned or rented; and
(C) All income from the rental or use of the exempt property is
used for capital improvements to the exempt property, maintenance and
operation of the exempt property, or for exempt purposes; or
(ii) The property is rented or used by a nonprofit community group
or other nonprofit organization that might not qualify for exemption if
it owned the property as long as the rental or use of the property:
(A) Does not exceed fifteen days each assessment year;
(B) Does not result in pecuniary gain;
(C) Does not involve business activities;
(D) Is always for the general public good; and
(E) All income from the rental or use of the exempt property is
used for capital improvements to the exempt property, maintenance and
operation of the exempt property, or for exempt purposes.
(d) Property primarily used for providing job training, placement,
or preemployment services or for supporting job training, placement, or
preemployment services through the sale of donated goods as provided in
(b) of this subsection (1) and which is leased by an organization or
association which otherwise meets the requirements in this subsection
(1) and is exempt from federal income taxation under 26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code. To qualify for the
exemption, the lease, sublease, or lease-purchase agreement must
expressly require the organization or association which is lessee or
sublessee to pay any property taxes for the leased or subleased
property.
(2) Property owned by any nonprofit church, denomination, group of
churches, or an organization or association, the membership of which is
comprised solely of churches or their qualified representatives, which
is utilized as a camp facility if used for organized and supervised
recreational activities and church purposes as related to such camp
facilities. The exemption provided by this paragraph shall apply to a
maximum of two hundred acres of any such camp as selected by the
church, including buildings and other improvements thereon.
(3) Property, including buildings and improvements required for the
maintenance and safeguarding of such property, owned by nonprofit
organizations or associations engaged in character building of boys and
girls under eighteen years of age, and used for such purposes and uses,
provided such purposes and uses are for the general public good:
PROVIDED, That if existing charters provide that organizations or
associations, which would otherwise qualify under the provisions of
this paragraph, serve boys and girls up to the age of twenty-one years,
then such organizations or associations shall be deemed qualified
pursuant to this section.
(4)(a) Property owned by all organizations and societies of
veterans of any war of the United States, recognized as such by the
department of defense, which shall have national charters, and which
shall have for their general purposes and objects the preservation of
the memories and associations incident to their war service and the
consecration of the efforts of their members to mutual helpfulness and
to patriotic and community service to state and nation. To be exempt
such property must be used in such manner as may be reasonably
necessary to carry out the purposes and objects of such societies.
(b) The use of the property for pecuniary gain or for business
activities, except as provided in this subsection (4), nullifies the
exemption otherwise available for the property for the assessment year.
The exemption is not nullified by:
(i) The collection of rent or donations if the amount is reasonable
and does not exceed maintenance and operation expenses.
(ii) Fund-raising activities conducted by a nonprofit organization.
(iii) The use of the property for pecuniary gain for periods of not
more than fifteen days in a year.
(c) An inadvertent use of the property in a manner inconsistent
with the purpose for which exemption is granted, if the inadvertent use
is not part of a pattern of use. A pattern of use is presumed when an
inadvertent use is repeated in the same assessment year or in two or
more successive assessment years.
(5) Property owned by all corporations, incorporated under any act
of congress, whose principal purposes are to furnish volunteer aid to
members of the armed forces of the United States and also to carry on
a system of national and international relief and to apply the same in
mitigating the sufferings caused by pestilence, famine, fire, floods,
and other national calamities and to devise and carry on measures for
preventing the same.
(6) Property owned by nonprofit organizations exempt from federal
income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of
1954, as amended, that are guarantee agencies under the federal
guaranteed student loan program or that issue debt to provide or
acquire student loans.
(7) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used
exclusively for the purposes for which exemption is granted, except as
provided in RCW 84.36.805.
(8) For the purposes of this section, "general public good" means
members of the community derive a benefit from the rental or use of the
property by the nonprofit community group or organization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2012 and thereafter.

--- END ---