BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the court in
Tobin v. Worden, 156 Wn. App. 507, 233 P.3d 906 (2010), did not apply
the one-year statute of limitations where the agency did not claim an
exemption or produce records on a partial or installment basis, but
instead produced records at one time. In enacting chapter 483, Laws of
2005, the legislature intended that a one-year statute of limitations
applies to all actions brought under RCW 42.56.550. This act clarifies
the legislature's intent that all actions brought under RCW 42.56.550
are subject to a one-year statute of limitations running from the date
of the events set forth in this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.550 and 2005 c 483 s 5 and 2005 c 274 s 288 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon the motion of any person having been denied an opportunity
to inspect or copy a public record by an agency, the superior court in
the county in which a record is maintained may require the responsible
agency to show cause why it has refused to allow inspection or copying
of a specific public record or class of records. The burden of proof
shall be on the agency to establish that refusal to permit public
inspection and copying is in accordance with a statute that exempts or
prohibits disclosure in whole or in part of specific information or
records.
(2) Upon the motion of any person who believes that an agency has
not made a reasonable estimate of the time that the agency requires to
respond to a public record request, the superior court in the county in
which a record is maintained may require the responsible agency to show
that the estimate it provided is reasonable. The burden of proof shall
be on the agency to show that the estimate it provided is reasonable.
(3) Judicial review of all agency actions taken or challenged under
RCW 42.56.030 through 42.56.520 shall be de novo. Courts shall take
into account the policy of this chapter that free and open examination
of public records is in the public interest, even though such
examination may cause inconvenience or embarrassment to public
officials or others. Courts may examine any record in camera in any
proceeding brought under this section. The court may conduct a hearing
based solely on affidavits.
(4) Any person who prevails against an agency in any action in the
courts seeking the right to inspect or copy any public record or the
right to receive a response to a public record request within a
reasonable amount of time shall be awarded all costs, including
reasonable attorney fees, incurred in connection with such legal
action. In addition, it shall be within the discretion of the court to
award such person an amount not less than five dollars and not to
exceed one hundred dollars for each day that he or she was denied the
right to inspect or copy said public record.
(5) For actions under this section against counties, the venue
provisions of RCW 36.01.050 apply.
(6) Actions under this section must be filed within one year of the
latest of:
(a) The agency's claim of exemption ((or));
(b) The last production of a record ((on a partial or installment
basis)) prior to the action being filed;
(c) A response indicating no records have been located; or
(d) A response indicating there are no additional records that will
be produced on a partial or installment basis.
If none of these events occur, an action under this section must be
filed within one year of the date of the public record request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act applies to all actions brought
under RCW 42.56.550 in which final judgment has not been entered as of
the effective date of this section. To this extent, this act applies
retroactively; provided, however, that for an action where the running
of the statute of limitations was triggered by the agency's production
of records at one time, as was the case in Tobin v. Worden, 156 Wn.
App. 507, 233 P.3d 906 (2010), and the one-year statute of limitations
period ended on or after June 21, 2010, and on or before the effective
date of this section, the one-year statute of limitations runs from the
effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---