BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.565 and 2009 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A court shall not award penalties under RCW 42.56.550(4) to a
person who was serving a criminal sentence in a state, local, or
privately operated correctional facility on the date the request for
public records was made, unless the court finds that the agency acted
in bad faith in denying the person the opportunity to inspect or copy
a public record.
(2) The inspection or copying of any nonexempt public record by
persons serving criminal sentences in state, local, or privately
operated correctional facilities may be enjoined pursuant to this
section.
(a) The injunction may be requested by: (i) An agency or its
representative; (ii) a person named in the record or his or her
representative; or (iii) a person to whom the requests specifically
pertains or his or her representative.
(b) The request must be filed in: (i) The superior court in which
the movant resides; or (ii) the superior court in the county in which
the record is maintained.
(c) In order to issue an injunction, the court must find that:
(i) The request was made to harass or intimidate the agency or its
employees;
(ii) Fulfilling the request would likely threaten the security of
correctional facilities;
(iii) Fulfilling the request would likely threaten the safety or
security of staff, inmates, family members of staff, family members of
other inmates, or any other person; or
(iv) Fulfilling the request may assist criminal activity.
(((2))) (3) In deciding whether to enjoin a request under
subsection (((1))) (2) of this section, the court may consider all
relevant factors including, but not limited to:
(a) Other requests by the requestor;
(b) The type of record or records sought;
(c) Statements offered by the requestor concerning the purpose for
the request;
(d) Whether disclosure of the requested records would likely harm
any person or vital government interest;
(e) Whether the request seeks a significant and burdensome number
of documents;
(f) The impact of disclosure on correctional facility security and
order, the safety or security of correctional facility staff, inmates,
or others; and
(g) The deterrence of criminal activity.
(((3))) (4) The motion proceeding described in this section shall
be a summary proceeding based on affidavits or declarations, unless the
court orders otherwise. Upon a showing by a preponderance of the
evidence, the court may enjoin all or any part of a request or
requests. Based on the evidence, the court may also enjoin, for a
period of time the court deems reasonable, future requests by:
(a) The same requestor; or
(b) An entity owned or controlled in whole or in part by the same
requestor.
(((4))) (5) An agency shall not be liable for penalties under RCW
42.56.550(4) for any period during which an order under this section is
in effect, including during an appeal of an order under this section,
regardless of the outcome of the appeal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to all actions brought
under RCW 42.56.550 in which final judgment has not been entered as of
the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---