BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that, for
purposes of federal tax law, dyed, off-road diesel fuel is generally
not allowed for use in vehicles traveling on public highways. However,
the legislature further recognizes that federal internal revenue
service guidelines include certain nontaxable uses of dyed, off-road
diesel fuel, including if the fuel is used on a farm for farming
purposes or if the fuel is used in vehicles designed for off-highway
transportation. The legislature was recently informed that federal
revenue agents have cited Washington state farmers for the unlawful use
of dyed, off-road diesel fuel in their hay harvesting vehicles known as
bale wagons or harrow beds. The legislature finds that these citations
are clearly erroneous and contrary to the permissible, nontaxable uses
of the fuel as the vehicles are designed strictly for use on farms to
transport bales of hay from the field to a farmer's haystack.
Therefore, the legislature intends to clarify that Washington law
defines farm vehicles to include bale wagons or harrow beds in order to
encourage the internal revenue service to also define qualified farm
vehicles as such for federal tax purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.04.181 and 1967 c 202 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Farm vehicle" means any vehicle other than a farm tractor or farm
implement, which is designed and/or used primarily in agricultural
pursuits on farms for the purpose of transporting machinery, equipment,
implements, farm products, supplies and/or farm labor thereon,
including a bale wagon or harrow bed, and is only incidentally operated
on or moved along public highways for the purpose of going from one
farm to another.

--- END ---