BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.70 RCW
to read as follows:
To ensure that motorcycles are accurately registered with the
department, if a motorcycle does not meet federal motor vehicle safety
standards for use on public streets, roads, or highways, the
manufacturer's statement of origin or certificate of origin must
include a statement indicating that the motorcycle is for off-road use
only.

--- END ---