BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.05.020 and 2009 c 320 s 1 and 2009 c 217 s 20 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Admission" or "admit" means a decision by a physician or
psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner that a person should
be examined or treated as a patient in a hospital;
(2) "Antipsychotic medications" means that class of drugs primarily
used to treat serious manifestations of mental illness associated with
thought disorders, which includes, but is not limited to atypical
antipsychotic medications;
(3) "Attending staff" means any person on the staff of a public or
private agency having responsibility for the care and treatment of a
patient;
(4) "Commitment" means the determination by a court that a person
should be detained for a period of either evaluation or treatment, or
both, in an inpatient or a less restrictive setting;
(5) "Conditional release" means a revocable modification of a
commitment, which may be revoked upon violation of any of its terms;
(6) "Crisis stabilization unit" means a short-term facility or a
portion of a facility licensed by the department of health and
certified by the department of social and health services under RCW
71.24.035, such as an evaluation and treatment facility or a hospital,
which has been designed to assess, diagnose, and treat individuals
experiencing an acute crisis without the use of long-term
hospitalization;
(7) "Custody" means involuntary detention under the provisions of
this chapter or chapter 10.77 RCW, uninterrupted by any period of
unconditional release from commitment from a facility providing
involuntary care and treatment;
(8) "Department" means the department of social and health
services;
(9) "Designated chemical dependency specialist" means a person
designated by the county alcoholism and other drug addiction program
coordinator designated under RCW 70.96A.310 to perform the commitment
duties described in chapters 70.96A and 70.96B RCW;
(10) "Designated crisis responder" means a mental health
professional appointed by the county or the regional support network to
perform the duties specified in this chapter;
(11) "Designated mental health professional" means a mental health
professional designated by the county or other authority authorized in
rule to perform the duties specified in this chapter;
(12) "Detention" or "detain" means the lawful confinement of a
person, under the provisions of this chapter;
(13) "Developmental disabilities professional" means a person who
has specialized training and three years of experience in directly
treating or working with persons with developmental disabilities and is
a psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse
practitioner, or social worker, and such other developmental
disabilities professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the
secretary;
(14) "Developmental disability" means that condition defined in RCW
71A.10.020(3);
(15) "Discharge" means the termination of hospital medical
authority. The commitment may remain in place, be terminated, or be
amended by court order;
(16) "Evaluation and treatment facility" means any facility which
can provide directly, or by direct arrangement with other public or
private agencies, emergency evaluation and treatment, outpatient care,
and timely and appropriate inpatient care to persons suffering from a
mental disorder, and which is certified as such by the department. A
physically separate and separately operated portion of a state hospital
may be designated as an evaluation and treatment facility. A facility
which is part of, or operated by, the department or any federal agency
will not require certification. No correctional institution or
facility, or jail, shall be an evaluation and treatment facility within
the meaning of this chapter;
(17) "Gravely disabled" means a condition in which a person, as a
result of a mental disorder: (a) Is in danger of serious physical harm
resulting from a failure to provide for his or her essential human
needs of health or safety; or (b) manifests severe deterioration in
routine functioning evidenced by repeated and escalating loss of
cognitive or volitional control over his or her actions and is not
receiving such care as is essential for his or her health or safety;
(18) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by
program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life
skills and in raising their levels of physical, mental, social, and
vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education,
training for employment, and therapy. The habilitative process shall
be undertaken with recognition of the risk to the public safety
presented by the person being assisted as manifested by prior charged
criminal conduct;
(19) "History of one or more violent acts" refers to the period of
time ten years prior to the filing of a petition under this chapter,
excluding any time spent, but not any violent acts committed, in a
mental health facility or in confinement as a result of a criminal
conviction;
(20) "Imminent" means the state or condition of being likely to
occur at any moment or near at hand, rather than distant or remote;
(21) "Individualized service plan" means a plan prepared by a
developmental disabilities professional with other professionals as a
team, for a person with developmental disabilities, which shall state:
(a) The nature of the person's specific problems, prior charged
criminal behavior, and habilitation needs;
(b) The conditions and strategies necessary to achieve the purposes
of habilitation;
(c) The intermediate and long-range goals of the habilitation
program, with a projected timetable for the attainment;
(d) The rationale for using this plan of habilitation to achieve
those intermediate and long-range goals;
(e) The staff responsible for carrying out the plan;
(f) Where relevant in light of past criminal behavior and due
consideration for public safety, the criteria for proposed movement to
less-restrictive settings, criteria for proposed eventual discharge or
release, and a projected possible date for discharge or release; and
(g) The type of residence immediately anticipated for the person
and possible future types of residences;
(22) "Information related to mental health services" means all
information and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course
of providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of
services by a mental health service provider. This may include
documents of legal proceedings under this chapter or chapter 71.34 or
10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information;
(23) "Judicial commitment" means a commitment by a court pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter;
(24) "Legal counsel" means attorneys and staff employed by county
prosecutor offices or the state attorney general acting in their
capacity as legal representatives of public mental health service
providers under RCW 71.05.130;
(25) "Likelihood of serious harm" means:
(a) A substantial risk that: (i) Physical harm will be inflicted
by a person upon his or her own person, as evidenced by threats or
attempts to commit suicide or inflict physical harm on oneself; (ii)
physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon another, as evidenced
by behavior which has caused such harm or which places another person
or persons in reasonable fear of sustaining such harm; or (iii)
physical harm will be inflicted by a person upon the property of
others, as evidenced by behavior which has caused substantial loss or
damage to the property of others; or
(b) The person has threatened the physical safety of another and
has a history of one or more violent acts;
(26) "Mental disorder" means any organic, mental, or emotional
impairment which has substantial adverse effects on a person's
cognitive or volitional functions;
(27) "Mental health professional" means a psychiatrist,
psychologist, psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner,
psychiatric nurse, or social worker, and such other mental health
professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(28) "Mental health service provider" means a public or private
agency that provides mental health services to persons with mental
disorders as defined under this section and receives funding from
public sources. This includes, but is not limited to, hospitals
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, evaluation and treatment facilities
as defined in this section, community mental health service delivery
systems or community mental health programs as defined in RCW
71.24.025, facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration
under chapter 10.77 RCW, and correctional facilities operated by state
and local governments;
(29) "Peace officer" means a law enforcement official of a public
agency or governmental unit, and includes persons specifically given
peace officer powers by any state law, local ordinance, or judicial
order of appointment;
(30) "Private agency" means any person, partnership, corporation,
or association that is not a public agency, whether or not financed in
whole or in part by public funds, which constitutes an evaluation and
treatment facility or private institution, or hospital, which is
conducted for, or includes a department or ward conducted for, the care
and treatment of persons who are mentally ill;
(31) "Professional person" means a mental health professional and
shall also mean a physician, psychiatric advanced registered nurse
practitioner, registered nurse, and such others as may be defined by
rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter;
(32) "Psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner" means a
person who is licensed as an advanced registered nurse practitioner
pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW; and who is board certified in advanced
practice psychiatric and mental health nursing;
(33) "Psychiatrist" means a person having a license as a physician
and surgeon in this state who has in addition completed three years of
graduate training in psychiatry in a program approved by the American
medical association or the American osteopathic association and is
certified or eligible to be certified by the American board of
psychiatry and neurology;
(34) "Psychologist" means a person who has been licensed as a
psychologist pursuant to chapter 18.83 RCW;
(35) "Public agency" means any evaluation and treatment facility or
institution, or hospital which is conducted for, or includes a
department or ward conducted for, the care and treatment of persons
with mental illness, if the agency is operated directly by, federal,
state, county, or municipal government, or a combination of such
governments;
(36) "Registration records" include all the records of the
department, regional support networks, treatment facilities, and other
persons providing services to the department, county departments, or
facilities which identify persons who are receiving or who at any time
have received services for mental illness;
(37) "Release" means legal termination of the commitment under the
provisions of this chapter;
(38) "Resource management services" has the meaning given in
chapter 71.24 RCW;
(39) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social
and health services, or his or her designee;
(40) "Serious violent offense" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 9.94A.030;
(41) "Social worker" means a person with a master's or further
advanced degree from an accredited school of social work or a degree
deemed equivalent under rules adopted by the secretary;
(42) "Therapeutic court personnel" means the staff of a mental
health court or other therapeutic court which has jurisdiction over
defendants who are dually diagnosed with mental disorders, including
court personnel, probation officers, a court monitor, prosecuting
attorney, or defense counsel acting within the scope of therapeutic
court duties;
(43) "Triage facility" means a short-term facility or a portion of
a facility licensed by the department of health and certified by the
department of social and health services under RCW 71.24.035, which is
designed as a facility to assess and stabilize an individual or
determine the need for involuntary commitment of an individual, and
must meet department of health residential treatment facility
standards. A triage facility may be structured as a voluntary or
involuntary placement facility;
(44) "Treatment records" include registration and all other records
concerning persons who are receiving or who at any time have received
services for mental illness, which are maintained by the department, by
regional support networks and their staffs, and by treatment
facilities. Treatment records include mental health information
contained in a medical bill including but not limited to mental health
drugs, a mental health diagnosis, provider name, and dates of service
stemming from a medical service. Treatment records do not include
notes or records maintained for personal use by a person providing
treatment services for the department, regional support networks, or a
treatment facility if the notes or records are not available to others;
(((44))) (45) "Violent act" means behavior that resulted in
homicide, attempted suicide, nonfatal injuries, or substantial damage
to property.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.05.153 and 2007 c 375 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a designated mental health professional receives
information alleging that a person, as the result of a mental disorder,
presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent
danger because of being gravely disabled, after investigation and
evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and
credibility of the person or persons providing the information if any,
the designated mental health professional may take such person, or
cause by oral or written order such person to be taken into emergency
custody in an evaluation and treatment facility for not more than
seventy-two hours as described in RCW 71.05.180.
(2) A peace officer may take or cause such person to be taken into
custody and immediately delivered to a triage facility, crisis
stabilization unit, ((an)) evaluation and treatment facility, or the
emergency department of a local hospital under the following
circumstances:
(a) Pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) When he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person
is suffering from a mental disorder and presents an imminent likelihood
of serious harm or is in imminent danger because of being gravely
disabled.
(3) Persons delivered to a crisis stabilization unit, evaluation
and treatment facility, ((or the)) emergency department of a local
hospital, or triage facility that has elected to operate as an
involuntary facility by peace officers pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section may be held by the facility for a period of up to twelve
hours((: PROVIDED, That they are examined by a mental health
professional)).
(4) Within three hours of ((their)) arrival, the person must be
examined by a mental health professional. Within twelve hours of
((their)) arrival, the designated mental health professional must
determine whether the individual meets detention criteria. If the
individual is detained, the designated mental health professional shall
file a petition for detention or a supplemental petition as appropriate
and commence service on the designated attorney for the detained
person.

Sec. 3 RCW 10.31.110 and 2007 c 375 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a police officer has reasonable cause to believe that the
individual has committed acts constituting a nonfelony crime that is
not a serious offense as identified in RCW 10.77.092 and the individual
is known by history or consultation with the regional support network
to suffer from a mental disorder, the arresting officer may:
(a) Take the individual to a crisis stabilization unit as defined
in RCW 71.05.020(6). Individuals delivered to a crisis stabilization
unit pursuant to this section may be held by the facility for a period
of up to twelve hours((: PROVIDED, That they are)). The individual
must be examined by a mental health professional within three hours of
((their)) arrival;
(b) Take the individual to a triage facility as defined in RCW
71.05.020. An individual delivered to a triage facility which has
elected to operate as an involuntary facility may be held up to a
period of twelve hours. The individual must be examined by a mental
health professional within three hours of arrival;
(c) Refer the individual to a mental health professional for
evaluation for initial detention and proceeding under chapter 71.05
RCW; or
(((c))) (d) Release the individual upon agreement to voluntary
participation in outpatient treatment.
(2) In deciding whether to refer the individual to treatment under
this section, the police officer shall be guided by standards mutually
agreed upon with the prosecuting authority, which address, at a
minimum, the length, seriousness, and recency of the known criminal
history of the individual, the mental health history of the individual,
where available, and the circumstances surrounding the commission of
the alleged offense.
(3) Any agreement to participate in treatment shall not require
individuals to stipulate to any of the alleged facts regarding the
criminal activity as a prerequisite to participation in a mental health
treatment alternative. The agreement is inadmissible in any criminal
or civil proceeding. The agreement does not create immunity from
prosecution for the alleged criminal activity.
(4) If an individual violates such agreement and the mental health
treatment alternative is no longer appropriate:
(a) The mental health provider shall inform the referring law
enforcement agency of the violation; and
(b) The original charges may be filed or referred to the
prosecutor, as appropriate, and the matter may proceed accordingly.
(5) The police officer is immune from liability for any good faith
conduct under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Facilities providing triage services as of
the effective date of this section are not required to relicense or
recertify under any new rules governing licensure or certification of
triage facilities. The department of social and health services shall
work with the Washington association of counties and the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs in creating rules that
establish standards for certification of triage facilities. These
rules must not require triage facilities to provide twenty-four hour
nursing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---