BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.58.210 and 2009 c 549 s 2103 are each amended to
read as follows:
If a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to
perform the function of metropolitan water pollution abatement, the
metropolitan council shall, prior to the effective date of the
assumption of such function, cause a metropolitan water pollution
abatement advisory committee to be formed by notifying the legislative
body of each component city and county which operates a sewer system to
appoint one person to serve on such advisory committee and the board of
commissioners of each water-sewer district which operates a sewer
system, any portion of which lies within the metropolitan area, to
appoint one person to serve on such committee ((who shall be a
commissioner of such a water-sewer district)). The metropolitan water
pollution abatement advisory committee shall meet at the time and place
provided in the notice and elect a chair. The members of such
committee shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing bodies and
shall receive no compensation other than reimbursement for expenses
actually incurred in the performance of their duties. The function of
such advisory committee shall be to advise the metropolitan council in
matters relating to the performance of the water pollution abatement
function.

--- END ---