BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.129.105 and 1997 c 392 s 211 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No long-term care facility or nursing facility licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW shall require or request residents to sign waivers
of:
(a) Potential liability for losses of personal property or
injury((, or to sign waivers of));
(b) Residents' rights set forth in this chapter or in the
applicable licensing or certification laws; or
(c) Any rights set forth in the vulnerable adults statute, chapter
74.34 RCW.
(2) This section does not prohibit a facility from asking residents
to agree to binding dispute resolution, if:
(a) The agreement is in writing;
(b) The resident is given the opportunity to consult with his or
her representative or attorney; and
(c) The request is made after the dispute arises.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies prospectively only and not
retroactively. It applies only to written documents signed on or after
the effective date of this section.

--- END ---