BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be known and cited as the
Washington enhanced intelligence act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means any state, local, or county law enforcement
agency.
(2) "Protected information" means information about the political,
religious, or other First Amendment protected views or opinions of any
individual or group. This includes the activities and associations
related to these views and opinions. Protected information does not
include:
(a) Administrative records;
(b) Incidental references;
(c) Confidential communications;
(d) Special investigations;
(e) Activities by departmental personnel as private citizens not
related to their law enforcement functions;
(f) The collection of information about police conduct regarding
internal investigations; or
(g) The participation of agency personnel in their official
capacities in the administrative and legislative processes with respect
to agency operations to the same extent and in the same manner as other
state or local departments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 An agency may not collect or maintain
protected information about an individual or group unless such
information directly relates to criminal conduct or activity and there
is reasonable suspicion that the subject of the information is or may
be involved in criminal conduct or activity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Within two years after the effective date of
this section, all agencies shall adopt a privacy policy governing
treatment of protected information. The privacy policy shall, at a
minimum, contain the following provisions:
(1) Except where prohibited by federal law, agencies shall not
disseminate protected information unless authorized in writing by the
executive authority of the agency, or his or her designee.
(2) Agencies that collect, maintain, or disseminate criminal
intelligence information as defined by 28 C.F.R. Sec. 23 (2011) shall
do so in compliance with the provisions of 28 C.F.R. Sec. 23 (2011) as
it existed on the effective date of this section.
(3) Agency personnel shall not conduct infiltration unless the
group to be infiltrated is reasonably suspected of criminal activity,
and the executive authority of the agency authorizes the infiltration
in writing. "Infiltration" occurs when a person acting under the
direction of an agency poses or acts as a member or associate of a
political, religious, advocacy, or community organization, and who
either aims to disrupt the organization or agrees to provide or
provides information about the organization to an agency without
disclosing his or her relationship to law enforcement.
(4) Agencies shall investigate and correct or delete, in a timely
manner, any errors and deficiencies in information retained or
disseminated, whether by internal discovery or external complaint of
error.
(5) The executive authority of an agency, or his or her designee,
shall conduct periodic reviews of agency files to ensure compliance
with both this chapter and the relevant privacy policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 To ensure compliance with this chapter, the
attorney general must conduct in-place audits of agency files and
records at unscheduled intervals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Agencies shall ensure that all employees are
properly trained with regard to protected information, agency privacy
policies, and the provisions of this chapter within one year of
adoption of a privacy policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Nothing in this chapter shall restrict
agency personnel from complying with a court order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 42 RCW.

--- END ---