BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.18.270 and 2004 c 136 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All moneys paid to the landlord by the tenant as a deposit as
security for performance of the tenant's obligations in a lease or
rental agreement shall promptly be deposited by the landlord in a trust
account, maintained by the landlord for the purpose of holding such
security deposits for tenants of the landlord, in a financial
institution as defined by RCW 30.22.041 or licensed escrow agent
located in Washington. ((Unless otherwise agreed in writing, the
landlord shall be entitled to receipt of interest paid on such trust
account deposits.)) The landlord shall provide the tenant with a
written receipt for the deposit and shall provide written notice of the
name and address and location of the depository and any subsequent
change thereof. If during a tenancy the status of landlord is
transferred to another, any sums in the deposit trust account affected
by such transfer shall simultaneously be transferred to an equivalent
trust account of the successor landlord, and the successor landlord
shall promptly notify the tenant of the transfer and of the name,
address, and location of the new depository. The tenant's claim to any
moneys paid under this section shall be prior to that of any creditor
of the landlord, including a trustee in bankruptcy or receiver, even if
such moneys are commingled.
(2) The interest accrued on trust account deposits in subsection
(1) of this section must be deposited monthly in the affordable housing
for all account created under RCW 43.185C.190, for the purpose of
funding affordable housing programs that are limited to low-income
households as defined in RCW 43.185A.010, by the financial institution
or licensed escrow agent, less reasonable deposit processing charges
that may only include an items deposited charge, a monthly maintenance
fee, a per check item charge, and a per deposit charge.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.18.280 and 2010 c 8 s 19027 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within fourteen days after the termination of the rental agreement
and vacation of the premises or, if the tenant abandons the premises as
defined in RCW 59.18.310, within fourteen days after the landlord
learns of the abandonment, the landlord shall give a full and specific
statement of the basis for retaining any of the deposit together with
the payment of any refund due the tenant under the terms and conditions
of the rental agreement. No portion of any deposit shall be withheld
on account of wear resulting from ordinary use of the premises. The
landlord complies with this section if the required statement or
payment, or both, are deposited in the United States mail properly
addressed with first-class postage prepaid within the fourteen days.
The notice shall be delivered to the tenant personally or by mail
to his or her last known address. If the landlord fails to give such
statement together with any refund due the tenant within the time
limits specified above he or she shall be liable to the tenant for the
full amount of the deposit. The landlord is also barred in any action
brought by the tenant to recover the deposit from asserting any claim
or raising any defense for retaining any of the deposit unless the
landlord shows that circumstances beyond the landlord's control
prevented the landlord from providing the statement within the fourteen
days or that the tenant abandoned the premises as defined in RCW
59.18.310. The court may in its discretion award up to two times the
amount of the deposit for the intentional refusal of the landlord to
give the statement or refund due. In any action brought by the tenant
to recover the deposit, the prevailing party shall additionally be
entitled to the cost of suit or arbitration including a reasonable
attorney's fee.
The legislature finds that the practices covered by this section
are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation
of this section is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or
commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.
Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the landlord from proceeding
against, and the landlord shall have the right to proceed against a
tenant to recover sums exceeding the amount of the tenant's damage or
security deposit for damage to the property for which the tenant is
responsible together with reasonable attorney's fees.

--- END ---