BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A license is required for any private
court reporting firm or agency doing business in Washington state,
whether domiciled in Washington state or not, that employs or contracts
with a Washington state-certified court reporter.
(2) The following requirements must be met in order to obtain a
court reporting firm or agency license:
(a) Pass an examination determined by the director to measure the
person's knowledge and competence in the court reporting industry; or
(b) Have had at least three years of experience as a manager,
supervisor, or administrator in the court reporting business or a
related field in Washington state as determined by the director. One
year of experience means not less than two thousand hours of actual
compensated work performed before the filing of an application. An
applicant shall substantiate the experience by written certifications
from previous employers. If the applicant is unable to supply written
certifications from previous employers, applicants may offer written
certifications from persons other than employers who, based on personal
knowledge, can substantiate the employment; and
(c) Pay any additional fees as established by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A court reporting firm or agency
licensed in Washington state must comply with all rules and regulations
pertaining to certified court reporters including, but not limited to,
page margin requirements, word or character limits, lines per page
standards, and billing for nonrequested services such as word indices.
(2) The director may impose a civil penalty for a violation of this
chapter. The civil penalty shall consist of:
(a) For a first violation, a written warning and a monetary penalty
of up to five hundred dollars;
(b) For a second violation, mandatory suspension of the court
reporting firm or agency's license for a maximum of one year and a
monetary penalty of up to one thousand dollars;
(c) For a third violation, mandatory revocation of the court
reporting firm or agency's license and a monetary penalty of up to five
thousand dollars.
(3) At the request of the director, the attorney general may bring
an action in the name of the state seeking:
(a) Injunctive relief to prevent the court reporting firm or agency
from further violation of this chapter;
(b) To recover civil penalties imposed under subsection (2) of this
section; or
(c) To recover attorneys' fees and other enforcement costs.
(4) All revenues derived from any civil penalties assessed under
this section shall be deposited in the business and professions
account, pursuant to RCW 43.24.150(1)(c).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added
to chapter 18.145 RCW.

--- END ---