BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.570 and 2000 c 28 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the statutory maximum sentence or any other
provision of this chapter, except when subsection (2) of this section
applies a persistent offender shall be sentenced to a term of total
confinement for life without the possibility of release or, when
authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for the crime of aggravated murder in the
first degree, sentenced to death. In addition, no offender subject to
this ((section)) subsection may be eligible for community custody,
earned release time, furlough, home detention, partial confinement,
work crew, work release, or any other form of release as defined under
RCW 9.94A.728 (((1),)) (2), (3), (((4), (6),)) (5), (7), or (8), ((or
(9),)) or any other form of authorized leave from a correctional
facility while not in the direct custody of a corrections officer or
officers, except: (((1))) (a) In the case of an offender in need of
emergency medical treatment; or (((2))) (b) for the purpose of
commitment to an inpatient treatment facility in the case of an
offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding the statutory maximum sentence or any other
provision of this chapter, a persistent offender shall be sentenced
under this subsection if none of the offender's convictions used as a
basis for the finding that the offender was a persistent offender is a
class A felony or sex offense, or a federal or out-of-state conviction
for an offense that under the laws of this state would be considered a
class A felony or sex offense, or a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.825 or 9.95.015.
(b) Upon a finding that the offender is subject to sentencing under
this subsection, the court shall impose a sentence with a maximum term
of life and a mandatory minimum term of fifteen years.
(c) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the
department under this subsection, the court shall, in addition to the
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody
under the supervision of the department and the authority of the board
for any period of time the person is released from total confinement
before the expiration of the maximum sentence.
(d)(i) As part of any sentence under this subsection, the court
shall also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed
by the board under section 4 of this act.
(ii) An offender released by the board under section 4 of this act
is subject to the supervision of the department for twenty-four months.
The department shall monitor the offender's compliance with conditions
of community custody imposed by the court, department, or board, and
promptly report any violations to the board. Any violation of
conditions of community custody established or modified by the board
are subject to the provisions of section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW
to read as follows:
In any criminal case wherein an offender has been sentenced as a
persistent offender prior to the effective date of this section, the
offender shall have a resentencing hearing if none of the convictions
used as a basis for the finding that the offender was a persistent
offender were a class A felony or sex offense, or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be considered a class A felony or sex offense, or a deadly weapon
verdict under RCW 9.94A.825 or 9.95.015. The prosecuting attorney for
the county in which any offender was sentenced as a persistent offender
shall review each sentencing document. If no current or past
conviction for a class A felony or sex offense, or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be considered a class A felony or sex offense, or a deadly weapon
verdict under RCW 9.94A.825 or 9.95.015 was used as a basis for a
finding that an offender was a persistent offender, the prosecuting
attorney shall, or the offender may, make a motion for relief from
sentence to the original sentencing court.
The sentencing court shall grant the motion if it finds that no
current or past conviction for a class A felony or sex offense, or a
federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be considered a class A felony or sex offense, or
a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.825 or 9.95.015 was used as a
basis for a finding that the offender was a persistent offender and
shall immediately set an expedited date for resentencing. At
resentencing, the court shall sentence the offender as specified in RCW
9.94A.570(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, not less
than ninety days prior to the expiration of the minimum term of a
person sentenced under RCW 9.94A.570(2), the board shall review the
person for conditional release to community custody as provided in
section 4 of this act. If the board does not release the person, it
shall set a new minimum term not to exceed an additional five years.
The board shall review the person again not less than ninety days prior
to the expiration of the new minimum term.
(2) If at the time a person sentenced under RCW 9.94A.570(2)
arrives at a department of corrections facility, the offender's minimum
term has expired or will expire within one hundred twenty days of the
offender's arrival, then no later than one hundred twenty days after
the offender's arrival at a department of corrections facility, the
board shall review the person for conditional release to community
custody as provided in section 4 of this act. If the board does not
release the person, it shall set a new minimum term not to exceed an
additional five years. The board shall review the person again not
less than ninety days prior to the expiration of the new minimum term.
(3) In setting a new minimum term, the board may consider the
length of time necessary for the offender to complete treatment and
programming as well as other factors that relate to the offender's
release under section 4 of this act. The board's rules shall permit an
offender to petition for an earlier review if circumstances change or
the board receives new information that would warrant an earlier
review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, before the
expiration of the minimum term, the department shall conduct, and the
offender shall participate in, an examination of the offender.
(b) If at the time the sentence is imposed by the superior court
the offender's minimum term has expired or will expire within one
hundred twenty days of the sentencing hearing, the department shall
conduct, within ninety days of the offender's arrival at a department
of corrections facility, and the offender shall participate in, an
examination of the offender.
(2) The board shall impose the conditions and instructions provided
for in RCW 9.94A.704. The board shall consider the department's
recommendations and may impose conditions in addition to those
recommended by the department. The board may impose or modify
conditions of community custody following notice to the offender.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.95.425 and 2009 c 28 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the board or a community corrections officer of this
state has reason to believe an offender released under RCW 9.95.420 or
section 4 of this act has violated a condition of community custody or
the laws of this state, any community corrections officer may arrest or
cause the arrest and detention of the offender pending a determination
by the board whether sanctions should be imposed or the offender's
community custody should be revoked. The community corrections officer
shall report all facts and circumstances surrounding the alleged
violation to the board, with recommendations.
(2) If the board or the department causes the arrest or detention
of an offender for a violation that does not amount to a new crime and
the offender is arrested or detained by local law enforcement or in a
local jail, the board or department, whichever caused the arrest or
detention, shall be financially responsible for local costs. Jail bed
costs shall be allocated at the rate established under RCW 9.94A.740.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.95.430 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 308 are each
amended to read as follows:
Any offender released under RCW 9.95.420 or section 4 of this act
who is arrested and detained in physical custody by the authority of a
community corrections officer, or upon the written order of the board,
shall not be released from custody on bail or personal recognizance,
except upon approval of the board and the issuance by the board of an
order reinstating the offender's release on the same or modified
conditions. All chiefs of police, marshals of cities and towns,
sheriffs of counties, and all police, prison, and peace officers and
constables shall execute any such order in the same manner as any
ordinary criminal process.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.95.435 and 2007 c 363 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an offender released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 or
section 4 of this act violates any condition or requirement of
community custody, the board may transfer the offender to a more
restrictive confinement status to serve up to the remaining portion of
the sentence, less credit for any period actually spent in community
custody or in detention awaiting disposition of an alleged violation
and subject to the limitations of subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Following the hearing specified in subsection (3) of this
section, the board may impose sanctions such as work release, home
detention with electronic monitoring, work crew, community restitution,
inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling
sessions, supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, or any
other sanctions available in the community, or may suspend the release
and sanction up to sixty days' confinement in a local correctional
facility for each violation, or revoke the release to community custody
whenever an offender released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 or
section 4 of this act violates any condition or requirement of
community custody.
(3) If an offender released by the board under RCW 9.95.420 or
section 4 of this act is accused of violating any condition or
requirement of community custody, he or she is entitled to a hearing
before the board or a designee of the board prior to the imposition of
sanctions. The hearing shall be considered as offender disciplinary
proceedings and shall not be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The board
shall develop hearing procedures and a structure of graduated sanctions
consistent with the hearing procedures and graduated sanctions
developed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.737. The board may suspend the
offender's release to community custody and confine the offender in a
correctional institution owned, operated by, or operated under contract
with the state prior to the hearing unless the offender has been
arrested and confined for a new criminal offense.
(4) The hearing procedures required under subsection (3) of this
section shall be developed by rule and include the following:
(a) Hearings shall be conducted by members or designees of the
board unless the board enters into an agreement with the department to
use the hearing officers established under RCW 9.94A.737;
(b) The board shall provide the offender with findings and
conclusions which include the evidence relied upon, and the reasons the
particular sanction was imposed. The board shall notify the offender
of the right to appeal the sanction and the right to file a personal
restraint petition under court rules after the final decision of the
board;
(c) The hearing shall be held unless waived by the offender, and
shall be electronically recorded. For offenders not in total
confinement, the hearing shall be held within thirty days of service of
notice of the violation, but not less than twenty-four hours after
notice of the violation. For offenders in total confinement, the
hearing shall be held within thirty days of service of notice of the
violation, but not less than twenty-four hours after notice of the
violation. The board or its designee shall make a determination
whether probable cause exists to believe the violation or violations
occurred. The determination shall be made within forty-eight hours of
receipt of the allegation;
(d) The offender shall have the right to: (i) Be present at the
hearing; (ii) have the assistance of a person qualified to assist the
offender in the hearing, appointed by the presiding hearing officer if
the offender has a language or communications barrier; (iii) testify or
remain silent; (iv) call witnesses and present documentary evidence;
(v) question witnesses who appear and testify; and (vi) be represented
by counsel if revocation of the release to community custody upon a
finding of violation is a probable sanction for the violation. The
board may not revoke the release to community custody of any offender
who was not represented by counsel at the hearing, unless the offender
has waived the right to counsel; and
(e) The sanction shall take effect if affirmed by the presiding
hearing officer.
(5) Within seven days after the presiding hearing officer's
decision, the offender may appeal the decision to the full board or to
a panel of three reviewing examiners designated by the chair of the
board or by the chair's designee. The sanction shall be reversed or
modified if a majority of the panel finds that the sanction was not
reasonably related to any of the following: (a) The crime of
conviction; (b) the violation committed; (c) the offender's risk of
reoffending; or (d) the safety of the community.
(6) For purposes of this section, no finding of a violation of
conditions may be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.95.440 and 2008 c 231 s 45 are each amended to read
as follows:
In the event the board suspends the release status of an offender
released under RCW 9.95.420 or section 4 of this act by reason of an
alleged violation of a condition of release, or pending disposition of
a new criminal charge, the board may nullify the suspension order and
reinstate release under previous conditions or any new conditions the
board determines advisable under RCW 9.94A.704. Before the board may
nullify a suspension order and reinstate release, it shall determine
that the best interests of society and the offender shall be served by
such reinstatement rather than return to confinement.

--- END ---