BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.28.237 and 1997 c 252 s 85 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within twenty days after appointment, the personal
representative of the estate of a decedent shall cause written notice
of his or her appointment and the pendency of said probate proceedings,
to be served personally or by mail to each heir, legatee and devisee of
the estate and each beneficiary or transferee of a nonprobate asset of
the decedent whose names and addresses are known to him or her, and
proof of such mailing or service shall be made by affidavit and filed
in the cause.
(2) If the personal representative does not otherwise give notice
to creditors under chapter 11.40 RCW within thirty days after
appointment, the personal representative shall cause written notice of
his or her appointment and the pendency of the probate proceedings to
be mailed to the state of Washington department of social and health
services' office of financial recovery, and proof of the mailing shall
be made by affidavit and the personal representative of the estate
shall cause the affidavit to be filed in the cause and shall mail a
copy of the affidavit to the state of Washington department of social
and health services division of child support.

--- END ---