BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.104A.290 and 2002 c 345 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((a))) (1) A tax required to be paid by a trustee based on
receipts allocated to income must be ((paid from)) charged to income.
(((b))) (2) A tax required to be paid by a trustee based on
receipts allocated to principal must be ((paid from)) charged to
principal, even if the tax is called an income tax by the taxing
authority.
(((c))) (3) A tax required to be paid by a trustee on the trust's
share of an entity's taxable income must be ((paid proportionately))
charged:
(((1) From)) (a) To income to the extent that receipts from the
entity are allocated only to income; ((and
(2) From)) (b) To principal to the extent that((:
(i) Receipts from the entity are allocated to principal; and
(ii) The trust's share of the entity's taxable income exceeds the
total receipts described in (1) and (2)(i) of this subsection.
(d) For purposes of this section, receipts allocated to principal
or income must be reduced by the amount distributed to a beneficiary
from principal or income for which the trust receives a deduction in
calculating the tax)) receipts from the entity are allocated only to
principal;
(c) Proportionately to income and principal to the extent that
receipts from the entity are allocated to both income and principal;
(d) Otherwise to principal.
(4) Before applying subsections (1) through (3) of this section,
the trustee must adjust income or principal receipts by the
distributions to a beneficiary for which the trust receives an income
tax deduction.

--- END ---