BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.60.025 and 2010 c 212 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A receiver may be appointed by the superior court of this state
in the following instances, but except in any case in which a
receiver's appointment is expressly required by statute, or any case in
which a receiver's appointment is sought by a state agent whose
authority to seek the appointment of a receiver is expressly conferred
by statute, or any case in which a receiver's appointment with respect
to real property is sought under (b)(ii) of this subsection, a receiver
shall be appointed only if the court additionally determines that the
appointment of a receiver is reasonably necessary and that other
available remedies either are not available or are inadequate:
(a) On application of any party, when the party is determined to
have a probable right to or interest in property that is a subject of
the action and in the possession of an adverse party, or when the
property or its revenue-producing potential is in danger of being lost
or materially injured or impaired. A receiver may be appointed under
this subsection (1)(a) whether or not the application for appointment
of a receiver is combined with, or is ancillary to, an action seeking
a money judgment or other relief;
(b) Provisionally, ((during the pendency)) after commencement of
any judicial action or nonjudicial proceeding to foreclose upon any
lien against or for forfeiture of any interest in real or personal
property, ((or after notice of a trustee's sale has been given under
RCW 61.24.040, or after notice of forfeiture has been given under RCW
61.30.040,)) on application of any person, when the interest in the
property that is the subject of ((foreclosure or forfeiture)) such an
action or proceeding of the person seeking the receiver's appointment
is determined to be probable and either:
(i) The property or its revenue-producing potential is in danger of
being lost or materially injured or impaired; or
(ii) The appointment of a receiver with respect to the real or
personal property that is the subject of the action((, the notice of
trustee's sale or notice of forfeiture)) or proceeding is provided for
by agreement or is reasonably necessary to effectuate or enforce an
assignment of rents or other revenues from the property. For purposes
of this subsection (1)(b), a judicial action is commenced as provided
in superior court civil rule 3(a), a nonjudicial proceeding is
commenced under chapter 61.24 RCW upon the service of notice of default
described in RCW 61.24.030(8), and a proceeding for forfeiture is
commenced under chapter 61.30 RCW upon the recording of the notice of
intent to forfeit described in RCW 61.30.060;
(c) After judgment, in order to give effect to the judgment;
(d) To dispose of property according to provisions of a judgment
dealing with its disposition;
(e) To the extent that property is not exempt from execution, at
the instance of a judgment creditor either before or after the issuance
of any execution, to preserve or protect it, or prevent its transfer;
(f) If and to the extent that property is subject to execution to
satisfy a judgment, to preserve the property during the pendency of an
appeal, or when an execution has been returned unsatisfied, or when an
order requiring a judgment debtor to appear for proceedings
supplemental to judgment has been issued and the judgment debtor fails
to submit to examination as ordered;
(g) Upon an attachment of real or personal property when the
property attached is of a perishable nature or is otherwise in danger
of waste, impairment, or destruction, or where the abandoned property's
owner has absconded with, secreted, or abandoned the property, and it
is necessary to collect, conserve, manage, control, or protect it, or
to dispose of it promptly, or when the court determines that the nature
of the property or the exigency of the case otherwise provides cause
for the appointment of a receiver;
(h) In an action by a transferor of real or personal property to
avoid or rescind the transfer on the basis of fraud, or in an action to
subject property or a fund to the payment of a debt;
(i) In an action against any person who is not an individual if the
object of the action is the dissolution of that person, or if that
person has been dissolved, or if that person is insolvent or is not
generally paying the person's debts as those debts become due unless
they are the subject of bona fide dispute, or if that person is in
imminent danger of insolvency;
(j) In accordance with RCW 7.08.030 (4) and (6), in cases in which
a general assignment for the benefit of creditors has been made;
(k) In quo warranto proceedings under chapter 7.56 RCW;
(l) As provided under RCW 11.64.022;
(m) In an action by the department of licensing under RCW
18.35.220(3) with respect to persons engaged in the business of
dispensing of hearing aids, RCW 18.85.430 in the case of persons
engaged in the business of a real estate broker, associate real estate
broker, or real estate salesperson, or RCW 19.105.470 with respect to
persons engaged in the business of camping resorts;
(n) In an action under RCW 18.44.470 or 18.44.490 in the case of
persons engaged in the business of escrow agents;
(o) Upon a petition with respect to a nursing home in accordance
with and subject to receivership provisions under chapter 18.51 RCW;
(p) Under RCW 19.40.071(3), in connection with a proceeding for
relief with respect to a transfer fraudulent as to a creditor or
creditors;
(q) Under RCW 19.100.210(1), in an action by the attorney general
or director of financial institutions to restrain any actual or
threatened violation of the franchise investment protection act;
(r) In an action by the attorney general or by a prosecuting
attorney under RCW 19.110.160 with respect to a seller of business
opportunities;
(s) In an action by the director of financial institutions under
RCW 21.20.390 in cases involving actual or threatened violations of the
securities act of Washington or under RCW 21.30.120 in cases involving
actual or threatened violations of chapter 21.30 RCW with respect to
certain businesses and transactions involving commodities;
(t) In an action for or relating to dissolution of a business
corporation under RCW 23B.14.065, 23B.14.300, 23B.14.310, or
23B.14.320, for dissolution of a nonprofit corporation under RCW
24.03.271, for dissolution of a mutual corporation under RCW 24.06.305,
or in any other action for the dissolution or winding up of any other
entity provided for by Title 23, 23B, 24, or 25 RCW;
(u) In any action in which the dissolution of any public or private
entity is sought, in any action involving any dispute with respect to
the ownership or governance of such an entity, or upon the application
of a person having an interest in such an entity when the appointment
is reasonably necessary to protect the property of the entity or its
business or other interests;
(v) Under RCW 25.05.215, in aid of a charging order with respect to
a partner's interest in a partnership;
(w) Under and subject to RCW 30.44.100, 30.44.270, and 30.56.030,
in the case of a bank or trust company or, under and subject to RCW
32.24.070 through 32.24.090, in the case of a mutual savings bank;
(x) Under and subject to RCW 31.12.637 and 31.12.671 through
31.12.724, in the case of credit unions;
(y) Upon the application of the director of financial institutions
under RCW 31.35.090 in actions to enforce chapter 31.35 RCW applicable
to agricultural lenders, under RCW 31.40.120 in actions to enforce
chapter 31.40 RCW applicable to entities engaged in federally
guaranteed small business loans, under RCW 31.45.160 in actions to
enforce chapter 31.45 RCW applicable to persons licensed as check
cashers or check sellers, or under RCW 19.230.230 in actions to enforce
chapter 19.230 RCW applicable to persons licensed under the uniform
money services act;
(z) Under RCW 35.82.090 or 35.82.180, with respect to a housing
project;
(aa) Under RCW 39.84.160 or 43.180.360, in proceedings to enforce
rights under any revenue bonds issued for the purpose of financing
industrial development facilities or bonds of the Washington state
housing finance commission, or any financing document securing any such
bonds;
(bb) Under and subject to RCW 43.70.195, in an action by the
secretary of health or by a local health officer with respect to a
public water system;
(cc) As contemplated by RCW 61.24.030, with respect to real
property that is the subject of nonjudicial foreclosure proceedings
under chapter 61.24 RCW;
(dd) As contemplated by RCW 61.30.030(3), with respect to real
property that is the subject of judicial or nonjudicial forfeiture
proceedings under chapter 61.30 RCW;
(((ee) Under RCW 64.32.200(2), in an action to foreclose upon a
lien for common expenses against a dwelling unit subject to the
horizontal property regimes act, chapter 64.32 RCW;
(ff) Under RCW 64.34.364(10), in an action by a unit owners'
association to foreclose a lien for nonpayment of delinquent
assessments against condominium units;)) (ee) Under RCW 64.32.200(2),
in an action or proceeding commenced under chapter 61.12 or 61.24 RCW
to foreclose upon a lien for common expenses against a dwelling unit
subject to the horizontal property regimes act, chapter 64.32 RCW. For
purposes of this subsection (1)(ee), a judicial action is commenced as
provided in superior court civil rule 3(a) and a nonjudicial proceeding
is commenced under chapter 61.24 RCW upon the service of notice of
default described in RCW 61.24.030(8);
(ff) Under RCW 64.34.364(10), in an action or proceeding commenced
under chapter 61.12 or 61.24 RCW by a unit owners' association to
foreclose a lien for nonpayment of delinquent assessments against
condominium units. For purposes of this subsection 1(ff), a judicial
action is commenced as provided in superior court civil rule (3)(a) and
a nonjudicial proceeding is commenced under chapter 61.24 RCW upon the
service of notice of default described in RCW 61.24.030(8);
(gg) Upon application of the attorney general under RCW
64.36.220(3), in aid of any writ or order restraining or enjoining
violations of chapter 64.36 RCW applicable to timeshares;
(hh) Under RCW 70.95A.050(3), in aid of the enforcement of payment
or performance of municipal bonds issued with respect to facilities
used to abate, control, or prevent pollution;
(ii) Upon the application of the department of social and health
services under RCW 74.42.580, in cases involving nursing homes;
(jj) Upon the application of the utilities and transportation
commission under RCW 80.28.040, with respect to a water company that
has failed to comply with an order of such commission within the time
deadline specified therein;
(kk) Under RCW 87.56.065, in connection with the dissolution of an
irrigation district;
(ll) Upon application of the attorney general or the department of
licensing, in any proceeding that either of them are authorized by
statute to bring to enforce Title 18 or 19 RCW; the securities act of
Washington, chapter 21.20 RCW; the Washington commodities act, chapter
21.30 RCW; the land development act, chapter 58.19 RCW; or under
chapter 64.36 RCW relating to the regulation of timeshares;
(mm) Upon application of the director of financial institutions in
any proceeding that the director of financial institutions is
authorized to bring to enforce chapters 31.35, 31.40, and 31.45 RCW; or
(nn) In such other cases as may be provided for by law, or when, in
the discretion of the court, it may be necessary to secure ample
justice to the parties.
(2) The superior courts of this state shall appoint as receiver of
property located in this state a person who has been appointed by a
federal or state court located elsewhere as receiver with respect to
the property specifically or with respect to the owner's property
generally, upon the application of the person or of any party to that
foreign proceeding, and following the appointment shall give effect to
orders, judgments, and decrees of the foreign court affecting the
property in this state held by the receiver, unless the court
determines that to do so would be manifestly unjust or inequitable.
The venue of such a proceeding may be any county in which the person
resides or maintains any office, or any county in which any property
over which the receiver is to be appointed is located at the time the
proceeding is commenced.
(3) At least seven days' notice of any application for the
appointment of a receiver shall be given to the owner of property to be
subject thereto and to all other parties in the action, and to other
parties in interest as the court may require. If any execution by a
judgment creditor under Title 6 RCW or any application by a judgment
creditor for the appointment of a receiver, with respect to property
over which the receiver's appointment is sought, is pending in any
other action at the time the application is made, then notice of the
application for the receiver's appointment also shall be given to the
judgment creditor in the other action. The court may shorten or expand
the period for notice of an application for the appointment of a
receiver upon good cause shown.
(4) The order appointing a receiver in all cases shall reasonably
describe the property over which the receiver is to take charge, by
category, individual items, or both if the receiver is to take charge
of less than all of the owner's property. If the order appointing a
receiver does not expressly limit the receiver's authority to
designated property or categories of property of the owner, the
receiver is a general receiver with the authority to take charge over
all of the owner's property, wherever located.
(5) The court may condition the appointment of a receiver upon the
giving of security by the person seeking the receiver's appointment, in
such amount as the court may specify, for the payment of costs and
damages incurred or suffered by any person should it later be
determined that the appointment of the receiver was wrongfully
obtained.

Sec. 2 RCW 7.60.055 and 2004 c 165 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided for by this chapter, the court in
all cases has exclusive authority over the receiver, and the exclusive
possession and right of control with respect to all real property and
all tangible and intangible personal property with respect to which the
receiver is appointed, wherever located, and the exclusive jurisdiction
to determine all controversies relating to the collection,
preservation, application, and distribution of all the property, and
all claims against the receiver arising out of the exercise of the
receiver's powers or the performance of the receiver's duties.
However, the court does not have exclusive jurisdiction over actions in
which a state agency is a party and in which a statute expressly vests
jurisdiction or venue elsewhere.
(2) For good cause shown, the court has the power to shorten or
expand the time frames specified in this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 7.60.090 and 2004 c 165 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event of a general assignment of property for the
benefit of creditors under chapter 7.08 RCW, the assignment shall have
annexed as schedule (([A])) A a true list of all of the person's known
creditors, their mailing addresses, the amount and nature of their
claims, and whether their claims are disputed; and as schedule B a true
list of all property of the estate, including the estimated liquidation
value and location of the property and, if real property, a legal
description thereof, as of the date of the assignment.
(2) In all other cases, within ((twenty)) thirty-five days after
the date of appointment of a general receiver, the receiver shall file
as schedule A a true list of all of the known creditors and applicable
regulatory and taxing agencies of the person over whose assets the
receiver is appointed, their mailing addresses, the amount and nature
of their claims, and whether their claims are disputed; and as schedule
B a true list of all property of the estate identifiable by the
receiver, including the estimated liquidation value and location of the
property and, if real property, a legal description thereof, as of the
date of appointment of the receiver.
(3) The schedules must be in substantially the following forms:

SCHEDULE A -- CREDITOR LIST

1. List all creditors having security interests or liens, showing:

Name
Address
Amount
Collateral
Whether or not disputed

2. List all wages, salaries, commissions, or contributions to an employee benefit plan owed, showing:

Name
Address
Amount

Whether or not disputed

3. List all consumer deposits owed, showing:

Name
Address
Amount

Whether or not disputed

4. List all taxes owed, showing:

Name
Address
Amount
Whether or not disputed

5. List all unsecured claims, showing:

Name
Address
Amount

Whether or not disputed

6. List all owners or shareholders, showing:

Name
Address
Percentage of Ownership

7. List all applicable regulatory agencies, showing:

Name Address

SCHEDULE B -- LIST OF PROPERTY

List each category of property and for each give approximate value obtainable for the asset on the date of
assignment/appointment of the receiver, and address where asset is located.

I. Nonexempt Property

Description
and Location
Liquidation Value on Date of
Assignment/Appointment of Receiver

1. Legal Description and street
address of real property,
including leasehold interests:

2. Fixtures:

3. Cash and bank accounts:

4. Inventory:

5. Accounts receivable:

6. Equipment:

7. Prepaid expenses, including
deposits, insurance, rents, and
utilities:

8. Other, including loans to third
parties, claims, and choses in
action:

II. Exempt Property

Description
and Location

Liquidation Value on Date of
Assignment/Appointment of Receiver

I DECLARE under penalty of perjury under the laws of the state of Washington that the foregoing is true, correct,
and complete to the best of my knowledge. DATED this . . . day of . . . . . . . . , . . . ., at . . . . . . . . , state of . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
[SIGNATURE]

(4) When schedules are filed by a person making a general
assignment of property for the benefit of creditors under chapter 7.08
RCW, the schedules shall be duly verified upon oath by such person.
(5) The receiver shall obtain an appraisal or other independent
valuation of the property in the receiver's possession if ordered by
the court.
(6) The receiver shall file a complete inventory of the property in
the receiver's possession if ordered by the court.

Sec. 4 RCW 7.60.110 and 2004 c 165 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise ordered by the court, the entry of an order
appointing a general receiver or a custodial receiver with respect to
all of a person's property shall operate as a stay, applicable to all
persons, of:
(a) The commencement or continuation, including the issuance or
employment of process, of a judicial, administrative, or other action
or proceeding against the person over whose property the receiver is
appointed that was or could have been commenced before the entry of the
order of appointment, or to recover a claim against the person that
arose before the entry of the order of appointment;
(b) The enforcement, against the person over whose property the
receiver is appointed or any estate property, of a judgment obtained
before the order of appointment;
(c) Any act to obtain possession of estate property from the
receiver, or to interfere with, or exercise control over, estate
property;
(d) Any act to create, perfect, or enforce any lien or claim
against estate property except by exercise of a right of setoff, to the
extent that the lien secures a claim against the person that arose
before the entry of the order of appointment; or
(e) Any act to collect, assess, or recover a claim against the
person that arose before the entry of the order of appointment.
(2) The stay shall automatically expire as to the acts specified in
subsection (1)(a), (b), and (e) of this section sixty days after the
entry of the order of appointment unless before the expiration of the
sixty-day period the receiver, for good cause shown, obtains an order
of the court extending the stay, after notice and a hearing. A person
whose action or proceeding is stayed by motion to the court may seek
relief from the stay for good cause shown. Any judgment obtained
against the person over whose property the receiver is appointed or
estate property following the entry of the order of appointment is not
a lien against estate property unless the receivership is terminated
prior to a conveyance of the property against which the judgment would
otherwise constitute a lien.
(3) The entry of an order appointing a receiver does not operate as
a stay of:
(a) The continuation of a judicial action or nonjudicial proceeding
of the type described in RCW 7.60.025(1) (b), (ee), or (ff), if the
action or proceeding was initiated by the party seeking the receiver's
appointment;
(b) The commencement or continuation of a criminal proceeding
against the person over whose property the receiver is appointed;
(((b))) (c) The commencement or continuation of an action or
proceeding to establish paternity, or to establish or modify an order
for alimony, maintenance, or support, or to collect alimony,
maintenance, or support under any order of a court;
(((c))) (d) Any act to perfect, or to maintain or continue the
perfection of, an interest in estate property if the interest perfected
would be effective against a creditor of the person over whose property
the receiver is appointed holding at the time of the entry of the order
of appointment either a perfected nonpurchase money security interest
under chapter 62A.9A RCW against the property involved, or a lien by
attachment, levy, or the like, whether or not such a creditor exists.
If perfection of an interest would require seizure of the property
involved or the commencement of an action, the perfection shall instead
be accomplished by filing, and by serving upon the receiver, or
receiver's counsel, if any, notice of the interest within the time
fixed by law for seizure or commencement;
(((d))) (e) The commencement or continuation of an action or
proceeding by a governmental unit to enforce its police or regulatory
power;
(((e))) (f) The enforcement of a judgment, other than a money
judgment, obtained in an action or proceeding by a governmental unit to
enforce its police or regulatory power, or with respect to any
licensure of the person over whose property the receiver is appointed;
(((f))) (g) The exercise of a right of setoff, including but not
limited to (i) any right of a commodity broker, forward contract
merchant, stockbroker, financial institution, or securities clearing
agency to set off a claim for a margin payment or settlement payment
arising out of a commodity contract, forward contract, or securities
contract against cash, securities, or other property held or due from
the commodity broker, forward contract merchant, stockbroker, financial
institution, or securities clearing agency to margin, guarantee,
secure, or settle the commodity contract, forward contract, or
securities contract, and (ii) any right of a swap participant to set
off a claim for a payment due to the swap participant under or in
connection with a swap agreement against any payment due from the swap
participant under or in connection with the swap agreement or against
cash, securities, or other property of the debtor held by or due from
the swap participant to guarantee, secure, or settle the swap
agreement; or
(((g))) (h) The establishment by a governmental unit of any tax
liability and any appeal thereof.

Sec. 5 RCW 7.60.130 and 2004 c 165 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A general receiver may assume or reject any executory contract
or unexpired lease of the person over whose property the receiver is
appointed upon order of the court following notice to the other party
to the contract or lease upon notice and a hearing. The court may
condition assumption or rejection of any executory contract or
unexpired lease on the terms and conditions the court believes are just
and proper under the particular circumstances of the case. A general
receiver's performance of an executory contract or unexpired lease
prior to the court's authorization of its assumption or rejection shall
not constitute an assumption of the contract or lease, or an agreement
by the receiver to assume it, nor otherwise preclude the receiver
thereafter from seeking the court's authority to reject it.
(2) Any obligation or liability incurred by a general receiver on
account of the receiver's assumption of an executory contract or
unexpired lease shall be treated as an expense of the receivership. A
general receiver's rejection of an executory contract or unexpired
lease shall be treated as a breach of the contract or lease occurring
immediately prior to the receiver's appointment; and the receiver's
right to possess or use property pursuant to any executory contract or
lease shall terminate upon rejection of the contract or lease. The
other party to an executory contract or unexpired lease that is
rejected by a general receiver may take such steps as may be necessary
under applicable law to terminate or cancel the contract or lease. The
claim of a party to an executory contract or unexpired lease resulting
from a general receiver's rejection of it shall be served upon the
receiver in the manner provided for by RCW 7.60.210 within thirty days
following the rejection.
(3) A general receiver's power under this section to assume an
executory contract or unexpired lease shall not be affected by any
provision in the contract or lease that would effect or permit a
forfeiture, modification, or termination of it on account of either the
receiver's appointment, the financial condition of the person over
whose property the receiver is appointed, or an assignment for the
benefit of creditors by that person.
(4) A general receiver may not assume an executory contract or
unexpired lease of the person over whose property the receiver is
appointed without the consent of the other party to the contract or
lease if:
(a) Applicable law would excuse a party, other than the person over
whose property the receiver is appointed, from accepting performance
from or rendering performance to anyone other than the person even in
the absence of any provisions in the contract or lease expressly
restricting or prohibiting an assignment of the person's rights or the
performance of the person's duties;
(b) The contract or lease is a contract to make a loan or extend
credit or financial accommodations to or for the benefit of the person
over whose property the receiver is appointed, or to issue a security
of the person; or
(c) The executory contract or lease expires by its own terms, or
under applicable law prior to the receiver's assumption thereof.
(5) A receiver may not assign an executory contract or unexpired
lease without assuming it, absent the consent of the other parties to
the contract or lease.
(6) If the receiver rejects an executory contract or unexpired
lease for:
(a) The sale of real property under which the person over whose
property the receiver is appointed is the seller and the purchaser is
in possession of the real property;
(b) The sale of a real property timeshare interest under which the
person over whose property the receiver is appointed is the seller;
(c) The license of intellectual property rights under which the
person over whose property the receiver is appointed is the licensor;
or
(d) The lease of real property in which the person over whose
property the receiver is appointed is the lessor;
then the purchaser, licensee, or lessee may treat the rejection as a
termination of the contract, license agreement, or lease, or
alternatively, the purchaser, licensee, or lessee may remain in
possession in which case the purchaser, licensee, or lessee shall
continue to perform all obligations arising thereunder as and when they
may fall due, but may offset against any payments any damages occurring
on account of the rejection after it occurs. The purchaser of real
property in such a case is entitled to receive from the receiver any
deed or any other instrument of conveyance which the person over whose
property the receiver is appointed is obligated to deliver under the
executory contract when the purchaser becomes entitled to receive it,
and the deed or instrument has the same force and effect as if given by
the person. A purchaser, licensee, or lessee who elects to remain in
possession under the terms of this subsection has no rights against the
receiver on account of any damages arising from the receiver's
rejection except as expressly provided for by this subsection. A
purchaser of real property who elects to treat rejection of an
executory contract as a termination has a lien against the interest in
that real property of the person over whose property the receiver is
appointed for the recovery of any portion of the purchase price that
the purchaser has paid.
(7) Any contract with the state shall be deemed rejected if not
assumed within sixty days of appointment of a general receiver unless
the receiver and state agency agree to its assumption or as otherwise
ordered by the court for good cause shown.
(8) Nothing in this chapter affects the enforceability of
antiassignment prohibitions provided under contract or applicable law.

Sec. 6 RCW 7.60.190 and 2004 c 165 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Creditors and parties in interest to whom written notice of the
pendency of the receivership is given in accordance with RCW 7.60.210,
and creditors or other persons submitting written claims in the
receivership or otherwise appearing and participating in the
receivership, are bound by the acts of the receiver with regard to
management and disposition of estate property whether or not they are
formally joined as parties.
(2) Any person having a claim against or interest in any estate
property or in the receivership proceedings may appear in the
receivership, either in person or by an attorney. Appearance must be
made by filing a written notice of appearance, including the name and
mailing address of the party in interest, and the name and address of
the person's attorney, if any, with the clerk, and by serving a copy of
the notice upon the receiver and the receiver's attorney of record, if
any. The receiver shall maintain a master mailing list of all persons
joined as parties in the receivership and of all persons serving and
filing notices of appearance in the receivership in accordance with
this section. A creditor or other party in interest has a right to be
heard with respect to all matters affecting the person, whether or not
the person is joined as a party to the action.
(3) Any request for relief against a state agency shall be mailed
to or otherwise served on the agency and on the office of the attorney
general.
(4) Orders of the court with respect to the treatment of claims and
disposition of estate property, including but not limited to orders
providing for sales of property free and clear of liens, are effective
as to any person having a claim against or interest in the receivership
estate and who has actual knowledge of the receivership, whether or not
the person receives written notice from the receiver and whether or not
the person appears or participates in the receivership.
(5) The receiver shall give not less than ten days' written notice
by mail of any examination by the receiver of the person with respect
to whose property the receiver has been appointed and to persons who
serve and file an appearance in the proceeding.
(6) Persons on the master mailing list are entitled to not less
than thirty days' written notice of the hearing of any motion or other
proceeding involving any proposed:
(a) Allowance or disallowance of any claim or claims;
(b) Abandonment, disposition, or distribution of estate property,
other than an emergency disposition of ((perishable)) property subject
to eroding value or a disposition of property in the ordinary course of
business;
(c) Compromise or settlement of a controversy that might affect the
distribution to creditors from the estate;
(d) Compensation of the receiver or any professional employed by
the receiver; or
(e) Application for termination of the receivership or discharge of
the receiver. Notice of the application shall also be sent to state
taxing and applicable regulatory agencies.
Any opposition to any motion to authorize any of the actions under
(a) through (e) of this subsection must be filed and served upon the
receiver and the receiver's attorney, if any, at least three days
before the date of the proposed action. Persons on the master mailing
list shall be served with all pleadings or in opposition to any motion.
The court may require notice to be given to persons on the master
mailing list of additional matters the court deems appropriate((, and
may enlarge or reduce any time period provided for by this section for
good cause shown)). The receiver shall make a copy of the current
master mailing list available to any person on that list upon the
person's request.
(7) All persons duly notified by the receiver of any hearing to
approve or authorize an action or a proposed action by the receiver is
bound by any order of the court with respect to the action, whether or
not the persons have appeared or objected to the action or proposed
action or have been joined formally as parties to the particular
action.
(8) Whenever notice is not specifically required to be given under
this chapter, the court may consider motions and grant or deny relief
without notice or hearing, if it appears that no person joined as a
party or who has appeared in the receivership would be prejudiced or
harmed by the relief requested.

Sec. 7 RCW 7.60.200 and 2004 c 165 s 22 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A general receiver shall give notice of the receivership by
publication in a newspaper of general circulation published in the
county or counties in which estate property is known to be located once
a week for three consecutive weeks, the first notice to be published
within ((twenty)) thirty days after the date of appointment of the
receiver; and by mailing notice to all known creditors and other known
parties in interest within ((twenty)) thirty days after the date of
appointment of the receiver. The notice of the receivership shall
include the date of appointment of the receiver; the name of the court
and the case number; the last day on which claims may be filed with the
court and mailed to or served upon the receiver; and the name and
address of the debtor, the receiver, and the receiver's attorney, if
any. For purposes of this section, all intangible property of a person
is deemed to be located in the county in which an individual owner
thereof resides, or in which any entity owning the property maintains
its principal administrative offices.
(2) The notice of the receivership shall be in substantially the
following form:

IN THE SUPERIOR COURT, IN AND FOR
COUNTY, WASHINGTON

[Case Name] ) Case No.

)

) NOTICE OF RECEIVERSHIP

)

)

)

TO CREDITORS AND OTHER PARTIES IN INTEREST:

PLEASE TAKE NOTICE that a receiver was appointed for , whose last known address
is , on , .

YOU ARE HEREBY FURTHER NOTIFIED that in order to receive any dividend in this proceeding you
must file proof of claim with the court within 30 days after the date of this notice. If you are a state agency,
you must file proof of claim with the receiver ((on or before , 120)) within 180 days ((from))
after the date of ((appointment of the receiver)) this notice. A copy of your claim must also be either mailed
to or served upon the receiver.

RECEIVER

Attorney for receiver (if any):

Address:

Sec. 8 RCW 7.60.230 and 2004 c 165 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Allowed claims in a general receivership shall receive
distribution under this chapter in the order of priority under (a)
through (h) of this subsection and, with the exception of (a) and (c)
of this subsection, on a pro rata basis.
(a) Creditors with liens on property of the estate, which liens are
duly perfected under applicable law, shall receive the proceeds from
the disposition of their collateral. However, the receiver may recover
from property securing an allowed secured claim the reasonable,
necessary expenses of preserving, protecting, or disposing of the
property to the extent of any benefit to the creditors. If and to the
extent that the proceeds are less than the amount of a creditor's
allowed claim or a creditor's lien is avoided on any basis, the
creditor is an unsecured claim under (h) of this subsection. Secured
claims shall be paid from the proceeds in accordance with their
respective priorities under otherwise applicable law.
(b) Actual, necessary costs and expenses incurred during the
administration of the estate, other than those expenses allowable under
(a) of this subsection, including allowed fees and reimbursement of
reasonable charges and expenses of the receiver and professional
persons employed by the receiver under RCW 7.60.180. Notwithstanding
(a) of this subsection, expenses incurred during the administration of
the estate have priority over the secured claim of any creditor
obtaining or consenting to the appointment of the receiver.
(c) Creditors with liens on property of the estate, which liens
have not been duly perfected under applicable law, shall receive the
proceeds from the disposition of their collateral if and to the extent
that unsecured claims are made subject to those liens under applicable
law.
(d) Claims for wages, salaries, or commissions, including vacation,
severance, and sick leave pay, or contributions to an employee benefit
plan, earned by the claimant within ((ninety)) one hundred eighty days
of the date of appointment of the receiver or the cessation of the
estate's business, whichever occurs first, but only to the extent of
((two)) ten thousand nine hundred fifty dollars.
(e) Allowed unsecured claims, to the extent of ((nine hundred)) two
thousand four hundred twenty-five dollars for each individual, arising
from the deposit with the person over whose property the receiver is
appointed before the date of appointment of the receiver of money in
connection with the purchase, lease, or rental of property or the
purchase of services for personal, family, or household use by
individuals that were not delivered or provided.
(f) Claims for a support debt as defined in RCW 74.20A.020(10), but
not to the extent that the debt (i) is assigned to another entity,
voluntarily, by operation of law, or otherwise; or (ii) includes a
liability designated as a support obligation unless that liability is
actually in the nature of a support obligation.
(g) Unsecured claims of governmental units for taxes which accrued
prior to the date of appointment of the receiver.
(h) Other unsecured claims.
(2) If all of the classes under subsection (1) of this section have
been paid in full, any residue shall be paid to the person over whose
property the receiver is appointed.

Sec. 9 RCW 7.60.260 and 2004 c 165 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The receiver, with the court's approval after notice and a
hearing, may use, sell, or lease estate property other than in the
ordinary course of business. Except in the case of a leasehold estate
with a remaining term of less than two years or a vendor's interest in
a real estate contract, estate property consisting of real property may
not be sold by a custodial receiver other than in the ordinary course
of business.
(2) The court may order that a general receiver's sale of estate
property either (a) under subsection (1) of this section, or (b)
consisting of real property which the debtor intended to sell in its
ordinary course of business be effected free and clear of liens and of
all rights of redemption, whether or not the sale will generate
proceeds sufficient to fully satisfy all claims secured by the
property, unless either:
(((a))) (i) The property is real property used principally in the
production of crops, livestock, or aquaculture, or the property is a
homestead under RCW 6.13.010(1), and the owner of the property has not
consented to the sale following the appointment of the receiver; or
(((b))) (ii) The owner of the property or a creditor with an
interest in the property serves and files a timely opposition to the
receiver's sale, and the court determines that the amount likely to be
realized by the objecting person from the receiver's sale is less than
the person would realize within a reasonable time in the absence of the
receiver's sale.
Upon any sale free and clear of liens authorized by this section,
all security interests and other liens encumbering the property
conveyed transfer and attach to the proceeds of the sale, net of
reasonable expenses incurred in the disposition of the property, in the
same order, priority, and validity as the liens had with respect to the
property immediately before the conveyance. The court may authorize
the receiver at the time of sale to satisfy, in whole or in part, any
allowed claim secured by the property out of the proceeds of its sale
if the interest of any other creditor having a lien against the
proceeds of the sale would not thereby be impaired.
(3) At a public sale of property under subsection (1) of this
section, a creditor with an allowed claim secured by a lien against the
property to be sold may bid at the sale of the property. A secured
creditor who purchases the property from a receiver may offset against
the purchase price its allowed secured claim against the property,
provided that the secured creditor tenders cash sufficient to satisfy
in full all secured claims payable out of the proceeds of sale having
priority over the secured creditor's secured claim. If the lien or the
claim it secures is the subject of a bona fide dispute, the court may
order the holder of the claim to provide the receiver with adequate
security to assure full payment of the purchase price in the event the
lien, the claim, or any part thereof is determined to be invalid or
unenforceable.
(4) If estate property includes an interest as a co-owner of
property, the receiver shall have the rights and powers of a co-owner
afforded by applicable state or federal law, including but not limited
to any rights of partition.
(5) The reversal or modification on appeal of an authorization to
sell or lease estate property under this section does not affect the
validity of a sale or lease under that authorization to an entity that
purchased or leased the property in good faith, whether or not the
entity knew of the pendency of the appeal, unless the authorization and
sale or lease were stayed pending the appeal.

--- END ---