BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is important to the citizens of this
state to have confidence in the security of the mail. Mail contains
personal information, medical records, and financial documents. Theft
of mail has become a serious problem in our state because mail is a key
source of information for identity thieves. Currently, there is no law
that adequately addresses the seriousness of this crime. This act is
intended to accurately recognize the seriousness of taking personal,
medical, or financial identifying information and compromising the
integrity of our mail system.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.56.010 and 2006 c 277 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following definitions are applicable in this chapter unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) "Access device" means any card, plate, code, account number, or
other means of account access that can be used alone or in conjunction
with another access device to obtain money, goods, services, or
anything else of value, or that can be used to initiate a transfer of
funds, other than a transfer originated solely by paper instrument;
(2) "Appropriate lost or misdelivered property or services" means
obtaining or exerting control over the property or services of another
which the actor knows to have been lost or mislaid, or to have been
delivered under a mistake as to identity of the recipient or as to the
nature or amount of the property;
(3) "Beverage crate" means a plastic or metal box-like container
used by a manufacturer or distributor in the transportation or
distribution of individually packaged beverages to retail outlets, and
affixed with language stating "property of . . . . .," "owned by
. . . . .," or other markings or words identifying ownership;
(4) "By color or aid of deception" means that the deception
operated to bring about the obtaining of the property or services; it
is not necessary that deception be the sole means of obtaining the
property or services;
(5) "Deception" occurs when an actor knowingly:
(a) Creates or confirms another's false impression which the actor
knows to be false; or
(b) Fails to correct another's impression which the actor
previously has created or confirmed; or
(c) Prevents another from acquiring information material to the
disposition of the property involved; or
(d) Transfers or encumbers property without disclosing a lien,
adverse claim, or other legal impediment to the enjoyment of the
property, whether that impediment is or is not valid, or is or is not
a matter of official record; or
(e) Promises performance which the actor does not intend to perform
or knows will not be performed;
(6) "Deprive" in addition to its common meaning means to make
unauthorized use or an unauthorized copy of records, information, data,
trade secrets, or computer programs;
(7) "Mail," in addition to its common meaning, means any letter,
postal card, package, magazine or commercial publication, bag, or other
item that is addressed to a specific address for delivery by the United
States postal service or any commercial carrier performing the function
of delivering similar items to residences or businesses, provided the
mail:
(a) Has been left for collection or delivery in any letter box,
mail box, mail receptacle, or other authorized depository for mail, or
given to a mail carrier, or left with any private business that
provides mail boxes or mail addresses for customers or when left in a
similar location for collection or delivery by any commercial carrier;
or
(b) Is in transit with a postal service, mail carrier, letter
carrier, commercial carrier, or that is at or in a postal vehicle,
postal station, mail box, postal airplane, transit station, or similar
location of a commercial carrier; or
(c) Has been delivered to the intended address, but has not been
received by the intended addressee;
(8) "Mail box," in addition to its common meaning, means any
authorized depository or receptacle of mail for the United States
postal service or authorized depository for a commercial carrier that
provides services to the general public, including any address to which
mail is or can be addressed, or a place where the United States postal
service or equivalent commercial carrier delivers mail to its
addressee;
(9) "Merchandise pallet" means a wood or plastic carrier designed
and manufactured as an item on which products can be placed before or
during transport to retail outlets, manufacturers, or contractors, and
affixed with language stating "property of . . .," "owned by . . .," or
other markings or words identifying ownership;
(((8))) (10) "Obtain control over" in addition to its common
meaning, means:
(a) In relation to property, to bring about a transfer or purported
transfer to the obtainer or another of a legally recognized interest in
the property; or
(b) In relation to labor or service, to secure performance thereof
for the benefits of the obtainer or another;
(((9))) (11) "Owner" means a person, other than the actor, who has
possession of or any other interest in the property or services
involved, and without whose consent the actor has no authority to exert
control over the property or services;
(((10))) (12) "Parking area" means a parking lot or other property
provided by retailers for use by a customer for parking an automobile
or other vehicle;
(((11))) (13) "Receive" includes, but is not limited to, acquiring
title, possession, control, or a security interest, or any other
interest in the property;
(((12))) (14) "Received by the intended addressee" means that the
addressee, owner of the delivery mail box, or authorized agent has
removed the delivered mail from its delivery mail box;
(15) "Services" includes, but is not limited to, labor,
professional services, transportation services, electronic computer
services, the supplying of hotel accommodations, restaurant services,
entertainment, the supplying of equipment for use, and the supplying of
commodities of a public utility nature such as gas, electricity, steam,
and water;
(((13))) (16) "Shopping cart" means a basket mounted on wheels or
similar container generally used in a retail establishment by a
customer for the purpose of transporting goods of any kind;
(((14))) (17) "Stolen" means obtained by theft, robbery, or
extortion;
(((15))) (18) "Subscription television service" means cable or
encrypted video and related audio and data services intended for
viewing on a home television by authorized members of the public only,
who have agreed to pay a fee for the service. Subscription services
include but are not limited to those video services presently delivered
by coaxial cable, fiber optic cable, terrestrial microwave, television
broadcast, and satellite transmission;
(((16))) (19) "Telecommunication device" means (a) any type of
instrument, device, machine, or equipment that is capable of
transmitting or receiving telephonic or electronic communications; or
(b) any part of such an instrument, device, machine, or equipment, or
any computer circuit, computer chip, electronic mechanism, or other
component, that is capable of facilitating the transmission or
reception of telephonic or electronic communications;
(((17))) (20) "Telecommunication service" includes any service
other than subscription television service provided for a charge or
compensation to facilitate the transmission, transfer, or reception of
a telephonic communication or an electronic communication;
(((18))) (21) Value. (a) "Value" means the market value of the
property or services at the time and in the approximate area of the
criminal act.
(b) Whether or not they have been issued or delivered, written
instruments, except those having a readily ascertained market value,
shall be evaluated as follows:
(i) The value of an instrument constituting an evidence of debt,
such as a check, draft, or promissory note, shall be deemed the amount
due or collectible thereon or thereby, that figure ordinarily being the
face amount of the indebtedness less any portion thereof which has been
satisfied;
(ii) The value of a ticket or equivalent instrument which evidences
a right to receive transportation, entertainment, or other service
shall be deemed the price stated thereon, if any; and if no price is
stated thereon, the value shall be deemed the price of such ticket or
equivalent instrument which the issuer charged the general public;
(iii) The value of any other instrument that creates, releases,
discharges, or otherwise affects any valuable legal right, privilege,
or obligation shall be deemed the greatest amount of economic loss
which the owner of the instrument might reasonably suffer by virtue of
the loss of the instrument.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 9A.56.340(4) and 9A.56.350(4),
whenever any series of transactions which constitute theft, would, when
considered separately, constitute theft in the third degree because of
value, and said series of transactions are a part of a criminal episode
or a common scheme or plan, then the transactions may be aggregated in
one count and the sum of the value of all said transactions shall be
the value considered in determining the degree of theft involved.
For purposes of this subsection, "criminal episode" means a series
of thefts committed by the same person from one or more mercantile
establishments on three or more occasions within a five-day period.
(d) Whenever any person is charged with possessing stolen property
and such person has unlawfully in his possession at the same time the
stolen property of more than one person, then the stolen property
possessed may be aggregated in one count and the sum of the value of
all said stolen property shall be the value considered in determining
the degree of theft involved. Thefts committed by the same person in
different counties that have been aggregated in one county may be
prosecuted in any county in which one of the thefts occurred.
(e) Property or services having value that cannot be ascertained
pursuant to the standards set forth above shall be deemed to be of a
value not exceeding two hundred and fifty dollars;
(((19))) (22) "Wrongfully obtains" or "exerts unauthorized control"
means:
(a) To take the property or services of another;
(b) Having any property or services in one's possession, custody or
control as bailee, factor, lessee, pledgee, renter, servant, attorney,
agent, employee, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, or officer
of any person, estate, association, or corporation, or as a public
officer, or person authorized by agreement or competent authority to
take or hold such possession, custody, or control, to secrete,
withhold, or appropriate the same to his or her own use or to the use
of any person other than the true owner or person entitled thereto; or
(c) Having any property or services in one's possession, custody,
or control as partner, to secrete, withhold, or appropriate the same to
his or her use or to the use of any person other than the true owner or
person entitled thereto, where the use is unauthorized by the
partnership agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 9A.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of theft of mail if he or she commits theft
of mail.
(2) Each item of mail stolen constitutes a separate and distinct
crime and may be punished accordingly.
(3) Theft of mail is a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 9A.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possession of stolen mail if he or she
possesses stolen mail.
(2) "Possesses stolen mail" means to knowingly receive, retain,
possess, conceal, or dispose of stolen mail knowing that it has been
stolen, and to withhold or appropriate to the use of any person other
than the true owner, or the person to whom the mail is addressed.
(3) The fact that the person who stole the mail has not been
convicted, apprehended, or identified is not a defense to the charge of
possessing stolen mail.
(4) Each item of stolen mail possessed constitutes a separate and
distinct crime and may be punished accordingly.
(5) Possession of stolen mail is a class C felony.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.94A.515 and 2010 c 289 s 11 and 2010 c 227 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN
EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVI Aggravated Murder 1 (RCW
10.95.020)

XV Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW
70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIV Murder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))

XIII Malicious explosion 2 (RCW
70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1
(RCW 70.74.270(1))

XII Assault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))

Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse
of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(2))

XI Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

X Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible
compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW
70.74.280(3))

Sexually Violent Predator Escape
(RCW 9A.76.115)

IX Abandonment of Dependent Person 1
(RCW 9A.42.060)

Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW
70.74.180)

Hit and Run--Death (RCW
46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being
under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW
79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2
(RCW 70.74.270(2))

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under
the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIII Arson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor
(RCW 9.68A.100)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the
operation of any vessel in a
reckless manner (RCW
79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW
9A.88.070)

Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation
of any vehicle in a reckless manner
(RCW 46.61.520)

VII Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Civil Disorder Training (RCW
9A.48.120)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged
in sexually explicit conduct 1
(RCW 9.68A.050(1))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible
compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)
(b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW
9A.76.140)

Malicious placement of an explosive 3
(RCW 70.74.270(3))

Negligently Causing Death By Use of a
Signal Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.675)

Sending, bringing into state depictions
of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct 1 (RCW
9.68A.060(1))

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in
the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission
of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for
the safety of others (RCW
46.61.520)

VI Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW
9A.76.170(3)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW
9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation
device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))

Possession of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.070(1))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW
69.55.020)

V Abandonment of Dependent Person 2
(RCW 9A.42.070)

Advancing money or property for
extortionate extension of credit
(RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW
9A.42.030)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW
9A.44.160)

Dealing in Depictions of Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.050(2))

Domestic Violence Court Order
Violation (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070,
or 74.34.145)

Driving While Under the Influence
(RCW 46.61.502(6))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW
9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect
Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW
9.94.070)

Physical Control of a Vehicle While
Under the Influence (RCW
46.61.504(6))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW
9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1
(RCW 9A.76.070)

Sending, Bringing into State Depictions
of Minor Engaged in Sexually
Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW
9.68A.060(2))

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1
(RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains
(RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)

IV Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a
Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW
9A.36.031(1)(h))

Assault by Watercraft (RCW
79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by
Witness (RCW 9A.72.090,
9A.72.100)

Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Endangerment with a Controlled
Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run -- Injury (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel -- Injury
Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under
Age Fourteen (subsequent sex
offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event
(RCW 9A.82.070)

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Possession of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct 2 (RCW ((9.68[A].070))
9.68A.070(2))

Residential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.82.050)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(b))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health care service
contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))

Unlawful transaction of health
coverage as a health maintenance
organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))

Unlawful transaction of insurance
business (RCW 48.15.023(3))

Unlicensed practice as an insurance
professional (RCW 48.17.063(2))

Use of Proceeds of Criminal
Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1)
and (2))

Vehicular Assault, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, or by the operation or
driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner (RCW 46.61.522)

Viewing of Depictions of a Minor
Engaged in Sexually Explicit
Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.075(1))

Willful Failure to Return from
Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

III Animal Cruelty 1 (Sexual Conduct or
Contact) (RCW 16.52.205(3))

Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace
Officer With a Projectile Stun
Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except
subsection (1)(h))

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony
(RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for
Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW
9A.46.120)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Cyberstalking (subsequent conviction
or threat of death) (RCW
9.61.260(3))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW
9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW
9A.76.150)

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property
(RCW 81.60.070)

Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)

Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily
Harm By Use of a Signal
Preemption Device (RCW
46.37.674)

Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW
9A.56.350(2))

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW
9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW
9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW
9A.88.080)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 1 (RCW
9A.56.360(2))

Securities Act violation (RCW
21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW
9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent
conviction or threat of death)
(RCW 9.61.230(2))

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)

Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW
9A.56.340(2))

Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.82.055)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW
9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the
second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))

Vehicular Assault, by the operation or
driving of a vehicle with disregard
for the safety of others (RCW
46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Work
Release (RCW 72.65.070)

II Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Escape from Community Custody
(RCW 72.09.310)

Failure to Register as a Sex Offender
(second or subsequent offense)
(RCW 9A.44.130(11)(a))

Health Care False Claims (RCW
48.80.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))

Improperly Obtaining Financial
Information (RCW 9.35.010)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW
9A.48.070)

Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW
9A.56.350(3))

Possession of Stolen Mail (section 4 of
this act)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW
9A.56.150)

Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.068)

Retail Theft with Extenuating
Circumstances 2 (RCW
9A.56.360(3))

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Mail (section 3 of this act)

Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW
9A.56.065)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one
thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))

Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW
9A.56.340(3))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW
48.30A.015)

Unlawful factoring of a credit card or
payment card transaction (RCW
9A.56.290(4)(a))

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW
2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or
Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))

Voyeurism (RCW 9A.44.115)

I Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police
Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW
74.08.055)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a
Mental Health Advance Directive
(RCW 9A.60.060)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW
9A.48.080)

Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW
9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without
Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two
hundred fifty dollars or more but
less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(5)(b))

Transaction of insurance business
beyond the scope of licensure
(RCW 48.17.063)

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts
(RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Possession of Fictitious
Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Instruments of
Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Possession of a Personal
Identification Device (RCW
9A.56.320)

Unlawful Production of Payment
Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)

Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps
(RCW 9.91.142)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW
9.91.144)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

--- END ---