BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.04.437 and 2010 c 161 s 133 are each amended to
read as follows:
"Purple heart license plates" means special license plates that may
be assigned to a motor vehicle required to display one or two license
plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon
terms and conditions established by the department, to recipients of
the Purple Heart medal or to another qualified person.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.18.215 and 2010 c 161 s 614 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall create, design, and issue a special baseball
stadium license plate that may be used in lieu of standard issue or
personalized license plates for motor vehicles required to display one
or two license plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter
46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the department.
The special license plates commemorate the construction of a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485. The department shall also issue
to each recipient of a special baseball stadium license plate a
certificate of participation in the construction of the baseball
stadium.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.18.225 and 2010 c 161 s 615 are each amended to
read as follows:
A state university, regional university, or state college as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016 may apply to the department, in a form
approved by the department and request the department to issue a series
of collegiate license plates, for display on motor vehicles required to
display one or two license plates, excluding vehicles registered under
chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions established by the
department, depicting the name and mascot or symbol of the college or
university, as submitted and approved for use by the requesting
institution.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.18.230 and 2010 c 161 s 618 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A registered owner who has been awarded the Congressional Medal
of Honor may apply to the department for special license plates for use
on a ((passenger)) motor vehicle required to display one or two license
plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon
terms and conditions established by the department. The Congressional
Medal of Honor recipient must:
(a) Provide proof from the Washington state department of veterans
affairs showing receipt of the medal; and
(b) Be recorded as the registered owner of the motor vehicle on
which the Congressional Medal of Honor license plate or plates will be
displayed.
(2) Congressional Medal of Honor license plates must be issued:
(a) Only for a personal ((passenger)) motor vehicle owned by
persons who have received the Congressional Medal of Honor; and
(b) Without payment of vehicle license fees, license plate fees,
and motor vehicle excise taxes.
(3) Congressional Medal of Honor license plates must be replaced,
free of charge, if the license plates become lost, stolen, damaged,
defaced, or destroyed.
(4) A Congressional Medal of Honor license plate or plates may be
transferred, free of charge, from one motor vehicle to another motor
vehicle owned by the Congressional Medal of Honor recipient upon
application to the department, county auditor or other agent, or
subagent appointed by the director.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.18.235 and 2010 c 161 s 619 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A registered owner who is a veteran, as defined in RCW
41.04.007, may apply to the department for disabled American veteran or
former prisoner of war license plates, for use on one personal use
motor vehicle required to display one or two license plates, excluding
vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions
established by the department. The veteran must be recorded as the
registered owner of the motor vehicle on which the disabled American
veteran or former prisoner of war license plate or plates will be
displayed and:
(a) Provide certification from the veterans administration or the
military service from which the veteran was discharged that the veteran
has a service-connected disability rating;
(b) Have lost the use of both hands or one foot;
(c) Have been captured and incarcerated by an enemy of the United
States during a period of war with the United States and have received
a prisoner of war medal;
(d) Have become blind in both eyes as the result of military
service; or
(e) Be rated by the veterans administration or the military service
from which the veteran was discharged and be receiving service-connected compensation at the one hundred percent rate that is expected
to exist for more than one year.
(2) The special license plates under this section must:
(a) Display distinguishing marks, letters, or numerals indicating
that the registered owner is a disabled American veteran or former
prisoner of war; and
(b) Be issued for one personal use vehicle without the payment of
any vehicle license fees, license plate fees, or excise taxes.
(3) A registered owner who is a veteran, as defined in RCW
41.04.007, may, in lieu of applying for the special license plates
under this section, apply for regular issue or any qualifying special
license plate and receive the full benefit of the vehicle license fee
and excise tax exemption provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(4) The department may periodically verify the one hundred percent
rate as described in subsection (1)(e) of this section.
(5) A veteran who has been issued disabled American veteran or
former prisoner of war license plates under this section before July 1,
1983, continues to be eligible for the vehicle license fee and excise
tax exemption described in subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(6) A disabled American veteran and former prisoner of war license
plate or plates may be transferred from one motor vehicle to another
motor vehicle owned by the veteran upon application to the department,
county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director.
(7) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Blind" means the definition of "blind" used by the state of
Washington in determining eligibility for financial assistance to the
blind under Title 74 RCW; and
(b) "Special license plates" does not include any plate from the
armed forces license plate collection established in RCW 46.18.200(3).
(8) Any unauthorized use of a special license plate under this
section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.18.270 and 2010 c 161 s 625 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A registered owner who has survived the attack on Pearl Harbor
on December 7, 1941, may apply to the department for special license
plates for use on only one motor vehicle required to display one or two
license plates, excluding vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW,
upon terms and conditions established by the department, and owned by
the qualified applicant. The applicant must:
(a) Be a resident of this state;
(b) Have been a member of the United States armed forces on
December 7, 1941;
(c) Have been on station on December 7, 1941, between the hours of
7:55 a.m. and 9:45 a.m. Hawaii time at Pearl Harbor, the island of
Oahu, or offshore at a distance not to exceed three miles;
(d) Have received an honorable discharge from the United States
armed forces;
(e) Provide certification by a Washington state chapter of the
Pearl Harbor survivors association showing that qualifications in (c)
of this subsection have been met;
(f) Be recorded as the registered owner of the motor vehicle on
which the Pearl Harbor survivor license plate or plates will be
displayed; and
(g) Pay all fees and taxes required by law for registering the
motor vehicle.
(2) Pearl Harbor survivor license plates must be issued without the
payment of any license plate fee.
(3) Pearl Harbor survivor license plates must be replaced, free of
charge, if the license plates have become lost, stolen, damaged,
defaced, or destroyed.
(4) Pearl Harbor survivor license plates may be issued to the
surviving spouse or domestic partner of a Pearl Harbor survivor who met
the requirements in subsection (1) of this section. The surviving
spouse or domestic partner must be a resident of this state. If the
surviving spouse remarries or the surviving domestic partner marries or
enters into a new domestic partnership, he or she must return the
special license plates to the department within fifteen days and apply
for regular license plates or another type of special license plate.
(5) A Pearl Harbor survivor license plate or plates may be
transferred from one motor vehicle to another motor vehicle owned by
the Pearl Harbor survivor or the surviving spouse or domestic partner
as described in subsection (4) of this section upon application to the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.18.280 and 2010 c 161 s 628 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A registered owner who has been awarded a Purple Heart medal by
any branch of the United States armed forces, including the merchant
marines and the women's air forces service pilots may apply to the
department for special license plates for use on only one motor vehicle
required to display one or two license plates, excluding vehicles
registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions
established by the department, and owned by the qualified applicant.
The applicant must:
(a) Be a resident of this state;
(b) Have been wounded during one of this nation's wars or conflicts
identified in RCW 41.04.005;
(c) Have received an honorable discharge from the United States
armed forces;
(d) Provide a copy of the armed forces document showing the
recipient was awarded the Purple Heart medal;
(e) Be recorded as the registered owner of the motor vehicle on
which the Purple Heart survivor license plate or plates will be
displayed; and
(f) Pay all fees and taxes required by law for registering the
motor vehicle.
(2) Purple Heart license plates must be issued without the payment
of any special license plate fee.
(3) Purple Heart license plates may be issued to the surviving
spouse or domestic partner of a Purple Heart recipient who met the
requirements in subsection (1) of this section. The surviving spouse
or domestic partner must be a resident of this state. If the surviving
spouse remarries or the surviving domestic partner marries or enters
into a new domestic partnership, he or she must return the special
license plates to the department within fifteen days and apply for
regular license plates or another type of special license plate.
(4) A Purple Heart license plate or plates may be transferred from
one motor vehicle to another motor vehicle owned by the Purple Heart
recipient or the surviving spouse or domestic partner as described in
subsection (3) of this section upon application to the department,
county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the director.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.18.290 and 2010 c 161 s 630 are each amended to
read as follows:
A registered owner may apply to the department, county auditor or
other agent, or subagent appointed by the director for a square dancer
license plate. The registered owner shall pay the special license
plate fee required under RCW 46.17.220(1)(q), in addition to any other
fee or tax required by law. The square dancer license plate may be
issued in lieu of standard issue or personalized license plates for
motor vehicles required to display one or two license plates, but may
not be issued for vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW.

--- END ---