BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.30.030 and 1985 c 280 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall not issue to any person a license to act as
a farm labor contractor until:
(((1))) (a) Such person has executed a written application on a
form prescribed by the director, subscribed and sworn to by the
applicant, and containing (((a))) (i) a statement by the applicant of
all facts required by the director concerning the applicant's
character, competency, responsibility, and the manner and method by
which he or she proposes to conduct operations as a farm labor
contractor if such license is issued, and (((b))) (ii) the names and
addresses of all persons financially interested, either as partners,
stockholders, associates, profit sharers, or providers of board or
lodging to agricultural employees in the proposed operation as a labor
contractor, together with the amount of their respective interests;
(((2))) (b) The director, after investigation, is satisfied as to
the character, competency, and responsibility of the applicant;
(((3))) (c) The applicant has paid to the director a license fee
of: (((1))) (i) Thirty-five dollars in the case of a farm labor
contractor not engaged in forestation or reforestation, or (((2))) (ii)
one hundred dollars in the case of a farm labor contractor engaged in
forestation or reforestation or such other sum as the director finds
necessary, and adopts by rule, for the administrative costs of
evaluating applications;
(((4))) (d) The applicant has filed proof satisfactory to the
director of the existence of a policy of insurance with any insurance
carrier authorized to do business in the state of Washington in an
amount satisfactory to the director, which insures the contractor
against liability for damage to persons or property arising out of the
contractor's operation of, or ownership of, any vehicle or vehicles for
the transportation of individuals in connection with the contractor's
business, activities, or operations as a farm labor contractor;
(((5))) (e) The applicant has filed a surety bond or other security
which meets the requirements set forth in RCW 19.30.040;
(((6))) (f) The applicant executes a written statement which shall
be subscribed and sworn to and shall contain the following declaration:
"With regards to any action filed against me concerning my
activities as a farm labor contractor, I appoint the director of the
Washington department of labor and industries as my lawful agent to
accept service of summons when I am not present in the jurisdiction in
which the action is commenced or have in any other way become
unavailable to accept service"; and
(((7))) (g) The applicant has stated on his or her application
whether or not his or her contractor's license or the license of any of
his or her agents, partners, associates, stockholders, or profit
sharers has ever been suspended, revoked, or denied by any state or
federal agency, and whether or not there are any outstanding judgments
against him or her or any of his or her agents, partners, associates,
stockholders, or profit sharers in any state or federal court arising
out of activities as a farm labor contractor.
(2) The farm labor contractor account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from farm labor contractor licenses, security
deposits, penalties, and donations must be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for administering the
farm labor contractor licensing program, subject to authorization from
the director or the director's designee.

--- END ---