BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Any employer, contractor, or subcontractor who fails to provide
requested records, or fails to allow adequate inspection of records in
an investigation by the department of labor and industries under this
chapter within sixty calendar days of service of the department's
request may not use the records in any proceeding under this chapter to
challenge the correctness of any determination by the department that
wages are owed, that a record or statement is false, or that the
employer, contractor, or subcontractor has failed to file a record or
statement.

--- END ---