BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.300 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of licensing may issue a guest artist license to
a nonresident of Washington state who intends to engage in the practice
of body art, body piercing, or tattooing in this state. Guest artists
must meet the requirements of RCW 18.300.040 and practice in accordance
with department rules. Guest artist licenses may be issued for a
period of up to thirty days. The department may adopt rules relating
to renewal or reissuance of guest artist licenses.
(2) The department of licensing may issue an individual operator
license to a nonresident of Washington state if the applicant can
demonstrate at least three consecutive years of documented experience
practicing in the profession of body art, body piercing, or tattooing
and that this experience occurred within the five-year period before
the date of the application.

--- END ---