BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Consumer-owned utility" has the same meaning as in RCW
19.27A.140.
(2) "Economic development" means any activity to increase tax
revenue, tax base, employment, or general economic health, when that
activity does not result in:
(a) The transfer of property to public possession, occupation, and
enjoyment;
(b) The transfer of property to a private entity that is a public
service company, consumer-owned utility, or common carrier;
(c) The use of eminent domain:
(i)(A) To remove a public nuisance;
(B) To remove a structure that is beyond repair or unfit for human
habitation or use; or
(C) To acquire abandoned property; and
(ii) To eliminate a direct threat to public health and safety
caused by the property in its current condition; or
(d) The transfer of property to private entities that occupy an
incidental area within a publicly owned and occupied project.
"Economic development" does not include the transfer of property to
a public service company, a consumer-owned utility, or a common carrier
for the purpose of constructing, operating, or maintaining generation,
transmission, or distribution facilities. "Economic development" also
does not include port districts' activities under Title 14 or 53 RCW.
"Economic development" also does not include highway projects.
(3) "Public service company" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.04.010.
(4)(a) "Public use" means:
(i) The possession, occupation, and enjoyment of the property by
the general public, or by public agencies;
(ii) The use of property for the creation or functioning of public
service companies, a consumer-owned utility, or common carriers; or
(iii) Where the use of eminent domain:
(A)(I) Removes a public nuisance;
(II) Removes a structure that is beyond repair or unfit for human
habitation or use; or
(III) Is used to acquire abandoned property; and
(B) Eliminates a direct threat to public health and safety caused
by the property in its current condition.
(b) The public benefits of economic development, including an
increase in tax base, tax revenues, employment, and general economic
health, may not constitute a public use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Private property may be taken only for
public use and the taking of private property by any public entity for
economic development does not constitute a public use. No public
entity may take property for the purpose of economic development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In an action to establish or challenge the
asserted public use of a taking of private property, the taking of
private property shall be deemed for economic development, and not a
proper basis for eminent domain, if the court determines that the
taking of the private property does not result in any of the exceptions
to economic development set forth in section 1(2) of this act, and
economic development was a substantial factor in the governmental
body's decision to take the property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 8 RCW.

--- END ---