BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.86.080 and 2007 c 66 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The attorney general may bring an action in the name of the
state, or as parens patriae on behalf of persons residing in the state,
against any person to restrain and prevent the doing of any act herein
prohibited or declared to be unlawful; and the ((prevailing party))
attorney general may, in the discretion of the court, recover the costs
of said action including a reasonable ((attorney's)) attorneys' fee.
(2) Reasonable attorneys' fees may be awarded to a prevailing
defendant upon a finding by the court that the state's action was
brought in bad faith. The defendant shall comply with, and the court
shall be guided by, the procedural standards of RCW 4.84.185 in
determining whether to award reasonable attorneys' fees.
(3) The court may make such additional orders or judgments as may
be necessary to restore to any person in interest any moneys or
property, real or personal, which may have been acquired by means of
any act herein prohibited or declared to be unlawful.
(((3))) (4) Upon a violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040,
19.86.050, or 19.86.060, the court may also make such additional orders
or judgments as may be necessary to restore to any person in interest
any moneys or property, real or personal, which may have been acquired,
regardless of whether such person purchased or transacted for goods or
services directly with the defendant or indirectly through resellers.
The court shall exclude from the amount of monetary relief awarded in
an action pursuant to this subsection any amount that duplicates
amounts that have been awarded for the same violation. The court
should consider consolidation or coordination with other related
actions, to the extent practicable, to avoid duplicate recovery.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.86.010 and 1961 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Person" shall include, where applicable, natural persons,
corporations, trusts, unincorporated associations and partnerships,
regardless of whether the natural persons or entities reside or are
located in the state of Washington.
(2) "Trade" and "commerce" shall include the sale of assets or
services, and any commerce directly or indirectly affecting the people
of the state of Washington, and shall include, but not be limited to,
commerce involving a person outside the state conducted by a person
residing in the state.
(3) "Assets" shall include any property, tangible or intangible,
real, personal, or mixed, and wherever situate, and any other thing of
value.
(4) "Bad faith" means implying or involving actual or constructive
fraud, or a design to mislead or deceive another, or a neglect or
refusal to fulfill some duty or some contractual obligation, not
prompted by an honest mistake as to one's rights or duties, but by some
interested or sinister motive.

--- END ---