BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.146.010 and 2009 c 479 s 51 are each amended to
read as follows:
The long-range health and environmental goals for the state of
Washington require the protection of the state's surface and
underground waters for the health, safety, use, enjoyment, and economic
benefit of its people. It is the purpose of this chapter to provide
financial assistance to the state and to local governments for the
planning, design, acquisition, construction, and improvement of water
pollution control facilities and related activities, including
repairing or replacing failing on-site sewage systems and
decommissioning and connecting failing on-site sewage systems to a
sewerage system, in the achievement of state and federal water
pollution control requirements for the protection of the state's
waters.
It is the intent of the legislature that distribution of moneys for
water pollution control facilities under this chapter be made on an
equitable basis taking into consideration legal mandates, local effort,
ratepayer impacts, and past distributions of state and federal moneys
for water pollution control facilities.
It is the intent of this chapter that the cost of any water
pollution control facility attributable to increased or additional
capacity that exceeds one hundred ten percent of existing needs at the
time of application for assistance under this chapter shall be entirely
a local or private responsibility. It is the intent of this chapter
that industrial pretreatment be paid by industries and that state funds
shall not be used for such purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.146.020 and 2009 c 479 s 52 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Eligible cost" means the cost of that portion of a water
pollution control facility that can be financed under this chapter
excluding any portion of a facility's cost attributable to capacity
that is in excess of that reasonably required to address one hundred
ten percent of the applicant's needs for water pollution control
existing at the time application is submitted for assistance under this
chapter.
(3) "Nonpoint source water pollution" means pollution that enters
any waters of the state from any dispersed water-based or land-use
activities, including, but not limited to, atmospheric deposition,
surface water runoff from agricultural lands, urban areas, and forest
lands, subsurface or underground sources, such as failing on-site
sewage systems, and discharges from boats or other marine vessels.
(4) "Public body" means the state of Washington or any agency,
county, city or town, conservation district, other political
subdivision, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, and
those Indian tribes now or hereafter recognized as such by the federal
government.
(5) "Sole source aquifer" means the sole or principal source of
public drinking water for an area designated by the administrator of
the environmental protection agency pursuant to Public Law 93-523, Sec.
1424(b).
(6) "Water pollution" means such contamination, or other alteration
of the physical, chemical, or biological properties of any waters of
the state, including change in temperature, taste, color, turbidity, or
odor of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid, gaseous, solid,
radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the state as will or
is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters harmful,
detrimental, or injurious to the public health, safety, or welfare, or
to domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or
other legitimate beneficial uses, or to livestock, wild animals, birds,
fish, or other aquatic life.
(7) "Water pollution control activities" means actions taken by a
public body for the following purposes: (a) To prevent or mitigate
pollution of underground water; (b) to control nonpoint sources of
water pollution, including failing on-site sewage systems; (c) to
restore the water quality of fresh water lakes; and (d) to maintain or
improve water quality through the use of water pollution control
facilities or other means. ((During the 1995-1997 fiscal biennium,))
"Water pollution control activities" includes activities by state
agencies to protect public drinking water supplies and sources.
(8) "Water pollution control facility" or "facilities" means any
facilities or systems for the control, collection, storage, treatment,
disposal, or recycling of wastewater, including but not limited to
sanitary sewage, storm water, residential, commercial, industrial, and
agricultural wastes, which are causing water quality degradation due to
concentrations of conventional, nonconventional, or toxic pollutants.
Water pollution control facilities include all equipment, utilities,
structures, real property, and interests in and improvements on real
property necessary for or incidental to such purpose. Water pollution
control facilities also include such facilities, equipment, and
collection systems as are necessary to protect federally designated
sole source aquifers.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.146.030 and 2009 c 479 s 53 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department may make grants or loans to public bodies, including
grants to public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where
federal, local, or other funds are made available on a cost-sharing
basis, for water pollution control facilities and activities, including
repairing or replacing failing on-site sewage systems and
decommissioning and connecting failing on-site sewage systems to a
sewerage system, or for purposes of assisting a public body to obtain
an ownership interest in water pollution control facilities and/or to
defray a part of the payments made by a public body to a service
provider under a service agreement entered into pursuant to RCW
70.150.060, within the purposes of this chapter and for related
administrative expenses. No more than three percent of the moneys may
be used by the department to pay for the administration of the grant
and loan program authorized by this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.50A.005 and 1988 c 284 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The long-range health and environmental goals for the state of
Washington require the protection of the state's surface and
underground waters for the health, safety, use, enjoyment, and economic
benefit of its people. It is the purpose of this chapter to provide an
account to receive federal capitalization grants to provide financial
assistance to the state and to local governments for the planning,
design, acquisition, construction, and improvement of water pollution
control facilities and related activities, including repairing or
replacing failing on-site sewage systems and decommissioning and
connecting failing on-site sewage systems to a sewerage system, in the
achievement of state and federal water pollution control requirements
for the protection of the state's waters.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.50A.010 and 1988 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Eligible cost" means the cost of that portion of a water
pollution control facility or activity that can be financed under this
chapter.
(3) "Fund" means the water pollution control revolving fund in the
custody of the state treasurer.
(4) "Water pollution control facility" or "water pollution control
facilities" means any facilities or systems owned or operated by a
public body for the control, collection, storage, treatment, disposal,
or recycling of wastewater, including but not limited to sanitary
sewage, storm water, combined sewer overflows, residential, commercial,
industrial, and agricultural wastes, which are causing water quality
degradation due to concentrations of conventional, nonconventional, or
toxic pollutants. Water pollution control facilities include all
equipment, utilities, structures, real property, and interests in and
improvements on real property necessary for or incidental to such
purpose. Water pollution control facilities also include such
facilities, equipment, and collection systems as are necessary to
protect federally designated sole source aquifers.
(5) "Water pollution control activities" means actions taken by a
public body for the following purposes: (a) To control nonpoint
sources of water pollution, including failing on-site sewage systems;
(b) to develop and implement a comprehensive management plan for
estuaries; and (c) to maintain or improve water quality through the use
of water pollution control facilities or other means.
(6) "Public body" means the state of Washington or any agency,
county, city or town, other political subdivision, municipal
corporation or quasi-municipal corporation, and those Indian tribes now
or hereafter recognized as such by the federal government.
(7) "Water pollution" means such contamination, or other alteration
of the physical, chemical, or biological properties of any waters of
the state, including change in temperature, taste, color, turbidity, or
odor of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid, gaseous, solid,
radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the state as will or
is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters harmful,
detrimental, or injurious to the public health, safety, or welfare, or
to domestic, commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or
other legitimate beneficial uses, or to livestock, wild animals, birds,
fish, or other aquatic life.
(8) "Nonpoint source water pollution" means pollution that enters
any waters of the state from any dispersed water-based or land-use
activities, including, but not limited to, atmospheric deposition,
failing on-site sewage systems, surface water runoff from agricultural
lands, urban areas, and forest lands, subsurface or underground
sources, and discharges from boats or other marine vessels.
(9) "Federal capitalization grants" means grants from the federal
government provided by the water quality act of 1987 (P.L. 100-4).

--- END ---