BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.05.630 and 2000 c 11 s 50 are each amended to read
as follows:
Lands within the Seashore Conservation Area shall not be sold,
leased, or otherwise disposed of, except as ((herein)) provided in this
section.
(1) The commission may, under authority granted in RCW 79A.05.175
and 79A.05.180, exchange state park lands in the Seashore Conservation
Area for lands of equal value to be managed by the commission
consistent with this chapter. Only state park lands lying east of the
Seashore Conservation Line, as it is located at the time of exchange,
may be so exchanged.
(2) The commission may, under authority granted in RCW 79A.05.178,
directly dispose of up to five contiguous acres of real property,
without public auction, to resolve trespass, property ownership
disputes, and boundary adjustments with adjacent property owners. Real
property to be disposed of under this subsection may be disposed of
only after appraisal and for at least fair market value, and only if
the transaction is in the best interest of the state. All conveyance
documents shall be executed by the governor. All proceeds from the
disposal of the property shall be paid into the parkland acquisition
account and proceeds received pursuant to any sale under this
subsection shall be reinvested in real property located inside or
within one mile of the Seashore Conservation Area.
(3) The department of natural resources may lease the lands within
the Washington State Seashore Conservation Area as well as the accreted
lands along the ocean in state ownership for the exploration and
production of oil and gas((: PROVIDED,)) except that oil drilling rigs
and equipment ((will)) shall not be placed on the Seashore Conservation
Area or state-owned accreted lands.
Sale of sand from accretions shall be made to supply the needs of
cranberry growers for cranberry bogs in the vicinity and shall not be
prohibited if found by the commission to be reasonable, and not
generally harmful or destructive to the character of the land((:
PROVIDED, That)). The commission may grant leases and permits for the
removal of sands for construction purposes from any lands within the
Seashore Conservation Area if found by the commission to be reasonable
and not generally harmful or destructive to the character of the
land((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). Net income from such leases shall
be deposited in the state parks renewal and stewardship account.

--- END ---