BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 78.60.040 and 1979 ex.s. c 2 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, geothermal resources
are found and hereby determined to be sui generis, being neither a
mineral resource nor a water resource and as such are ((hereby))
declared to be the ((private)) property of the holder of the title to
the surface land above the resource, unless the geothermal resources
have been reserved by or conveyed to another person or entity.
Interests in geothermal resources may be severed from the surface
estate and reserved or conveyed as separate and distinct property
interests.

Sec. 2 RCW 78.60.060 and 2003 c 39 s 40 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter is intended to preempt local regulation of the
drilling and operation of wells for geothermal resources but shall not
be construed to permit the locating of any well or drilling when such
well or drilling is prohibited under state or local land use law or
regulations promulgated thereunder. Geothermal resources((, by-products and/or)) or waste products which have escaped or been released
from the energy transfer system ((and/or)) or a mineral recovery
process shall be subject to provisions of state law relating to the
pollution of ground or surface waters (Title 90 RCW), provisions of the
state fisheries law and the state game laws (Title 77 RCW), and any
other state environmental pollution control laws. Authorization for a
beneficial use of ((by-product)) water related to geothermal resources
((for all beneficial uses)), other than commercial electricity
production, including but not limited to greenhouse heating, warm water
fish propagation, space heating plants, irrigation, swimming pools, and
hot springs baths, shall be subject to the appropriation procedure as
provided in Title 90 RCW. However, the use of geothermal resources for
commercial electricity production is not subject to the appropriation
procedure as provided in Title 90 RCW if the use takes place in a
closed loop system that is connected to and integrated into a
commercial electricity production project that meets the requirements
of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The purpose of this chapter is to provide
for the allocation of revenues distributed to the state under section
35 of the Mineral Lands Leasing Act of 1920, as amended (30 U.S.C. Sec.
191), with respect to activities of the United States bureau of land
management undertaken pursuant to the Geothermal Steam Act of 1970 (30
U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.) in order to accomplish the following general
objectives:
(1) Reduction of dependence on nonrenewable energy and stimulation
of the state's economy through development of geothermal energy.
(2) Mitigation of the social, economic, and environmental impacts
of geothermal development.
(3) Financial assistance to counties to offset the costs of
providing public services and facilities necessitated by the
development of geothermal resources within their jurisdictions.
(4) Maintenance of the productivity of renewable resources through
the investment of proceeds from these resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "County of origin" means any county in which the United States
bureau of land management has leased lands for geothermal development.
(2) "Geothermal energy" means the natural heat of the earth and the
medium by which this heat is extracted from the earth, including
liquids or gases, as well as any minerals contained in any natural or
injected fluids, brines, and associated gas but excluding oil,
hydrocarbon gas, and other hydrocarbon substances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 There is created the geothermal account in
the state treasury. All expenditures from this account are subject to
appropriation and chapter 43.88 RCW.
All revenues received by the state treasurer under section 35 of
the Mineral Lands Leasing Act of 1920, as amended (30 U.S.C. Sec. 191),
with respect to activities of the United States bureau of land
management undertaken pursuant to the Geothermal Steam Act of 1970 (30
U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.) shall be deposited in the geothermal account
in the state treasury immediately upon receipt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Distribution of funds from the geothermal
account of the general fund shall be subject to the following
limitations:
(1) Thirty percent to the department of natural resources for
geothermal exploration and assessment;
(2) Thirty percent to Washington State University or its statutory
successor for the purpose of encouraging the development of geothermal
energy; and
(3) Forty percent to the county of origin for mitigating impacts
caused by geothermal energy exploration, assessment, and development.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The state treasurer shall be responsible for
distribution of funds to the county of origin. Each county's share of
rentals and royalties from a lease including lands in more than one
county shall be computed on the basis of the ratio that the acreage
within each county has to the total acreage in the lease. Washington
State University shall obtain the necessary information to make the
distribution of funds on such a basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 3 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---