BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 17.10.080 and 1997 c 353 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state noxious weed control board shall each year or more
often, following a hearing, adopt a state noxious weed list.
(2) The state noxious weed control board shall adopt guidelines by
rule for placing plants on the state noxious weed list. These
guidelines must include criteria for reconsideration of proposed new
species that were not adopted by the state noxious weed control board,
including the need for the state noxious weed control board to be
presented with additional data from scientific sources before taking
any action for reconsideration.
(3) Any person may request during a comment period established by
the state noxious weed control board the inclusion, deletion, or
designation change of any plant to the state noxious weed list.
However, the state noxious weed control board may not include English
holly on the state noxious weed list.
(((3))) (4) The state noxious weed control board shall send a copy
of the list to each activated county noxious weed control board, to
each weed district, and to the county legislative authority of each
county with an inactive noxious weed control board.
(((4))) (5) The record of rule making must include the written
findings of the board for the inclusion of each plant on the list. The
findings shall be made available upon request to any interested person.

Sec. 2 RCW 17.10.090 and 1997 c 353 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each county noxious weed control board shall, within ninety
days of the adoption of the state noxious weed list from the state
noxious weed control board and following a hearing, select those weeds
from the class C list and those weeds from the class B list not
designated for control in the noxious weed control region in which the
county lies that it finds necessary to be controlled in the county.
(2) The weeds thus selected and all class A weeds and those class
B weeds that have been designated for control in the noxious weed
control region in which the county lies shall be classified within that
county as noxious weeds, and those weeds comprise the county noxious
weed list.
(3) Nothing in this chapter limits a county noxious weed control
board, or other branch of county or city government, from conducting
education, outreach, or other assistance regarding plant species not
included on the state noxious weed list if the county or city
determines that the plant species causes localized risk or concern.

--- END ---