BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.120 and 2005 c 483 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No fee shall be charged for the inspection of public records.
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no fee shall be
charged for locating public documents and making them available for
copying. A reasonable charge may be imposed for providing copies of
public records and for the use by any person of agency equipment or
equipment of the office of the secretary of the senate or the office of
the chief clerk of the house of representatives to copy public records,
which charges shall not exceed the amount necessary to reimburse the
agency, the office of the secretary of the senate, or the office of the
chief clerk of the house of representatives for its actual costs
directly incident to such copying. Agency charges for photocopies
shall be imposed in accordance with the actual per page cost or other
costs established and published by the agency. ((In no event may))
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an agency may not
charge a per page cost greater than the actual per page cost as
established and published by the agency. To the extent the agency has
not determined the actual per page cost for photocopies of public
records, the agency may not charge in excess of fifteen cents per page.
An agency may require a deposit in an amount not to exceed ten percent
of the estimated cost of providing copies for a request. If an agency
makes a request available on a partial or installment basis, the agency
may charge for each part of the request as it is provided. If an
installment of a records request is not claimed or reviewed, the agency
is not obligated to fulfill the balance of the request.
(2) If the production of records for one requester in a calendar
month exceeds five person hours, the public agency may require the
requester to pay the personnel costs for the request during the month
to complete the search and copying tasks. If the requester does not
wish to pay for the search costs, the agency shall complete the request
at a rate of five hours per month. The personnel costs may not exceed
the actual salary and benefit costs for the personnel required to
perform the search, review, and copying tasks. It shall not include
the cost of attorney review or for the preparation of the exemption
log. The requester shall pay the fee before the records are disclosed,
and the public agency may require payment of up to a ten percent
deposit in advance of the search.

--- END ---