BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The land, water, and other resources of
Washington state are being severely impacted by the invasion of an
increasing number of harmful invasive plant and animal species. These
impacts are resulting in damage to the state's environment and causing
economic hardships. The multitude of public and private organizations
with an interest and authority in controlling and preventing the spread
of harmful invasive species in Washington state need a mechanism for
cooperation, communication, collaboration, and implementation of the
statewide plan of action to combat these threats.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.25.310 and 2007 c 241 s 61 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created the Washington invasive species council to
exist until ((December 31, 2011)) June 30, 2017. Staff support to the
council shall be provided by the recreation and conservation office and
from the agencies represented on the council. For administrative
purposes, the council shall be located within the office.
(2) The purpose of the council is to provide policy level
direction, planning, and coordination for combating harmful invasive
species throughout the state and preventing the introduction of others
that may be potentially harmful.
(3) The council is a joint effort between local, tribal, state, and
federal governments, as well as the private sector and nongovernmental
interests. The purpose of the council is to foster cooperation,
communication, and coordinated approaches that support local, state,
and regional initiatives for the prevention and control of invasive
species.
(4) For the purposes of this chapter, "invasive species" include
nonnative organisms that cause economic or environmental harm and are
capable of spreading to new areas of the state. "Invasive species"
does not include domestic livestock, intentionally planted agronomic
crops, or nonharmful exotic organisms.

Sec. 3 RCW 79A.25.370 and 2007 c 241 s 62 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The invasive species council account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from appropriations, gifts,
grants, and donations must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only to carry out the purposes of the
council. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW and the approval of the director of the recreation and
conservation office is required for expenditures. All expenditures
must be directed by the council.
(2) This section expires June 30, 2017.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are
repealed:
(1) 2007 c 241 s 75 (uncodified); and
(2) 2006 c 152 s 10 (uncodified).

--- END ---