BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 49.86.030 and 2009 c 544 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning October 1, ((2012)) 2015, family leave insurance benefits
are payable to an individual during a period in which the individual is
unable to perform his or her regular or customary work because he or
she is on family leave if the individual:
(1) Files a claim for benefits in each week in which the individual
is on family leave, and as required by rules adopted by the director;
(2) Has been employed for at least six hundred eighty hours in
employment during the individual's qualifying year;
(3) Establishes an application year. An application year may not
be established if the qualifying year includes hours worked before
establishment of a previous application year;
(4) Consents to the disclosure of information or records deemed
private and confidential under chapter 50.13 RCW. Initial disclosure
of this information and these records by the employment security
department to the department is solely for purposes related to the
administration of this chapter. Further disclosure of this information
or these records is subject to RCW 49.86.020(3);
(5) Discloses whether or not he or she owes child support
obligations as defined in RCW 50.40.050; and
(6) Documents that he or she has provided the employer from whom
family leave is to be taken with written notice of the individual's
intention to take family leave in the same manner as an employee is
required to provide notice in RCW 49.78.250.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.86.210 and 2009 c 544 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning September 1, ((2013)) 2016, the department shall report
to the legislature by September 1st of each year on projected and
actual program participation, premium rates, fund balances, and
outreach efforts.

--- END ---