BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the legislature's intent to suspend
Washington state's participation in the western climate initiative.
While protecting the environment is of utmost importance, we must
balance such regulation with the ability to maintain jobs and protect
our economy. Numerous economic studies predict that a regional cap and
trade program will cost Washingtonians billions of dollars with massive
increases in the price of gasoline, electricity, food, and water,
further hampering an already fragile economy. Washington families
cannot afford to pay the increased costs of new regulations at this
time. Washington businesses cannot drive our economic recovery and
create the jobs we need when faced with billions of dollars in new
regulations and added costs.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.235.005 and 2008 c 14 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that Washington has long been a national
and international leader on energy conservation and environmental
stewardship, including air quality protection, renewable energy
development and generation, emission standards for fossil-fuel based
energy generation, energy efficiency programs, natural resource
conservation, vehicle emission standards, and the use of biofuels.
Washington is also unique among most states in that in addition to its
commitment to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases, it has established
goals to grow the clean energy sector and reduce the state's
expenditures on imported fuels.
(2) ((The legislature further finds that Washington should continue
its leadership on climate change policy by creating accountability for
achieving the emission reductions established in RCW 70.235.020,
participating in the design of a regional multisector market-based
system to help achieve those emission reductions, assessing other
market strategies to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases, and ensuring
the state has a well trained workforce for our clean energy future.
(3))) It is the intent of the legislature that the state will: (a)
Limit and reduce emissions of greenhouse gas consistent with the
emission reductions established in RCW 70.235.020; (b) minimize the
potential to export pollution, jobs, and economic opportunities; and
(c) reduce emissions at the lowest cost to Washington's economy,
consumers, and businesses.
(((4) In the event the state elects to participate in a regional
multisector market-based system, it is the intent of the legislature
that the system will become effective by January 1, 2012, after
authority is provided to the department for its implementation. By
acting now, Washington businesses and citizens will have adequate time
and opportunities to be well positioned to take advantage of the low-carbon economy and to make necessary investments in low-carbon
technology.
(5) It is also the intent of the legislature that the regional
multisector market-based system recognize Washington's unique emissions
portfolio, including the state's hydroelectric system, the
opportunities presented by Washington's abundant forest resources and
agriculture land, and the state's leadership in energy efficiency and
the actions it has already taken that have reduced its generation of
greenhouse gas emissions and that entities receive appropriate credit
for early actions to reduce greenhouse gases.
(6) If any revenues that accrue to the state are created by a
market system, they must be used to further the state's efforts to
achieve the goals established in RCW 70.235.020, address the impacts of
global warming on affected habitats, species, and communities, and
increase investment in the clean energy economy particularly for
communities and workers that have suffered from heavy job losses and
chronic unemployment and underemployment.))

Sec. 3 RCW 70.235.010 and 2010 c 146 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Carbon dioxide equivalents" means a metric measure used to
compare the emissions from various greenhouse gases based upon their
global warming potential.
(2) "Climate advisory team" means the stakeholder group formed in
response to executive order 07-02.
(3) "Climate impacts group" means the University of Washington's
climate impacts group.
(4) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department.
(6) "Greenhouse gas" and "greenhouse gases" includes carbon
dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons,
sulfur hexafluoride, and any other gas or gases designated by the
department by rule.
(7) "Person" means an individual, partnership, franchise holder,
association, corporation, a state, a city, a county, or any subdivision
or instrumentality of the state.
(8) "Program" means the department's climate change program.
(((9) "Western climate initiative" means the collaboration of
states, Canadian provinces, Mexican states, and tribes to design a
multisector market-based mechanism as directed under the western
regional climate action initiative signed by the governor on February
22, 2007.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 70.235.030 (Development of a design for
a regional multisector market-based system to limit and reduce
emissions of greenhouse gas -- Information required to be submitted to
the legislature) and 2008 c 14 s 4 are each repealed.

--- END ---