BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.230 and 2010 c 106 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2) Personal information in any files maintained for a participant
in an agency or in a community-based program including, but not limited
to, early learning or child care services, parks and recreation
programs, youth development programs, and after-school programs;
(3) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(((3))) (4) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with
the assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons
by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance
authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to
privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;
(((4))) (5) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic
check numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial
account numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or
governed by other law;
(((5))) (6) Personal and financial information related to a small
loan or any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093; and
(((6))) (7) Documents and related materials and scanned images of
documents and related materials used to prove identity, age,
residential address, social security number, or other personal
information required to apply for a driver's license or identicard.

--- END ---