BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature acknowledges that
housing options for sex offenders in the community continue to be a
challenge. While sex offender registration and notification serves an
important purpose in giving information to the public so that they may
keep themselves safe, it has had the counterproductive impact of
reducing available housing for these individuals. Housing can also
serve an important safety function by providing stability and giving
law enforcement a known location where a sex offender resides.
(2) This problem is only exacerbated when a sex offender is aging
and/or has health-related issues. Available housing options are
further limited and specialty providers may house other vulnerable
populations. Often, providers do not have the proper training to
understand how to recognize risky behavior that may put others at risk
or who to contact for help in serving these populations. Further,
housing these individuals in a prison or other institutional setting
becomes costly for the state when their physical infirmities could be
better cared for elsewhere.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The sex offender policy board shall conduct
a thorough review of the housing options for sex offenders who are
aging and/or have health-related issues and therefore need some form of
assisted living. By December 1, 2011, the sex offender policy board
shall report to the governor and the legislature regarding:
(1) To the extent determinable, the scope of the need for housing,
including sex offender populations that may be released from the
special commitment center and department of corrections as well as
aging sex offenders already in the community;
(2) The types of housing available for these populations and how
they are being served currently including adult family homes, boarding
homes, nursing homes, or other housing situations;
(3) Recommended policy options to increase available housing while
protecting the general public and other vulnerable persons.

--- END ---