BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.84.010 and 2009 c 525 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Abuser" means any person who participates, either as a
principal or an accessory before the fact, in the willful and unlawful
financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult.
(2) "Decedent" means:
(a) Any person whose life is taken by a slayer; or
(b) Any deceased person who, at any time during life in which he or
she was a vulnerable adult, was the victim of financial exploitation by
an abuser.
(3) "Financial exploitation" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 74.34.020, as enacted or hereafter amended.
(4) "Property" includes any real and personal property and any
right or interest therein.
(5) "Slayer" means any person who participates, either as a
principal or an accessory before the fact, in the willful and unlawful
killing of any other person including a person charged with the willful
and unlawful killing of any other person who is acquitted by reason of
insanity.
(6) "Vulnerable adult" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
74.34.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.84.130 and 2009 c 525 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any record of conviction or acquittal by reason of insanity for
having participated in the willful and unlawful killing of the decedent
or for conduct constituting financial exploitation against the
decedent, including but not limited to theft, forgery, fraud, identity
theft, robbery, burglary, or extortion, shall be admissible in evidence
against a claimant of property in any civil proceeding arising under
this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.04.273 and 2009 c 525 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall
apply:
(a) "Abuser" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 11.84.010.
(b) "Decedent" means any person who is entitled to benefits from
the Washington state department of retirement systems by written
designation or by operation of law:
(i) Whose life is taken by a slayer; or
(ii) Who is deceased and who, at any time during life in which he
or she was a vulnerable adult, was the victim of financial exploitation
by an abuser, except as provided in RCW 11.84.170.
(c) "Slayer" means a slayer as defined in RCW 11.84.010.
(2) Property that would have passed to or for the benefit of a
beneficiary under one of the retirement systems listed in RCW 41.50.030
shall not pass to that beneficiary if the beneficiary was a slayer or
abuser of the decedent and the property shall be distributed as if the
slayer or abuser had predeceased the decedent.
(3) A slayer or abuser is deemed to have predeceased the decedent
as to property which, by designation or by operation of law, would have
passed from the decedent to the slayer or abuser because of the
decedent's entitlement to benefits under one of the retirement systems
listed in RCW 41.50.030.
(4)(a) The department of retirement systems has no affirmative duty
to determine whether a beneficiary is, or is alleged to be, a slayer or
abuser. However, upon receipt of written notice that a beneficiary is
a defendant in a civil lawsuit or probate proceeding that alleges the
beneficiary is a slayer or abuser, or is charged with a crime that, if
committed, means the beneficiary is a slayer or abuser, the department
of retirement systems shall determine whether the beneficiary is a
defendant in such a civil proceeding or has been formally charged in
court with the crime, or both. If so, the department shall withhold
payment of any benefits until:
(i) The case or charges, or both if both are pending, are
dismissed;
(ii) The beneficiary is found not guilty, other than by reason of
insanity, in the criminal case or prevails in the civil proceeding, or
both if both are pending; ((or))
(iii) The beneficiary is convicted or is found to be a slayer or
abuser in the civil proceeding; or
(iv) The beneficiary is acquitted by reason of insanity and the
department has given the decedent's personal representative thirty
days' notice of the intent to distribute such proceeds.
(b) If the case or charges, or both if both are pending, are
dismissed or if a beneficiary is found not guilty, other than by reason
of insanity, or prevails in the civil proceeding, or both if both are
pending, the department shall pay the beneficiary the benefits the
beneficiary is entitled to receive. If the beneficiary is convicted or
found to be a slayer or abuser in a civil proceeding, the department
shall distribute the benefits according to subsection (2) of this
section.
(5) Any record of conviction or acquittal by reason of insanity for
having participated in the willful and unlawful killing of the decedent
or for conduct constituting financial exploitation against the
decedent, including but not limited to theft, forgery, fraud, identity
theft, robbery, burglary, or extortion, shall be admissible in evidence
against a claimant of property in any civil action arising under this
section.
(6) In the absence of a criminal conviction, a superior court may
determine:
(a) By a preponderance of the evidence whether a person
participated in the willful and unlawful killing of the decedent;
(b) By clear, cogent, and convincing evidence whether a person
participated in conduct constituting financial exploitation against the
decedent, as provided in chapter 11.84 RCW.
(7) This section shall not subject the department of retirement
systems to liability for payment made to a slayer or abuser or alleged
slayer or abuser, prior to the department's receipt of written notice
that the slayer or abuser has been convicted or acquitted by reason of
insanity of, or the alleged slayer or abuser has been formally
criminally or civilly charged in court with, the death or financial
exploitation of the decedent. If the conviction or civil judgment of
a slayer or abuser is reversed on appeal, the department of retirement
systems shall not be liable for payment made prior to the receipt of
written notice of the reversal to a beneficiary other than the person
whose conviction or civil judgment is reversed.

--- END ---