BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In determining whether to support an application for
conditional release on behalf of a person committed as criminally
insane which would permit the person to reside outside of a state
hospital, the secretary may not support a conditional release
application to a location outside the person's county of origin unless
it is determined by the secretary that the person's return to his or
her county of origin would be inappropriate considering any court-issued protection orders, victim safety concerns, the availability of
appropriate treatment, negative influences on the person, or the
location of family or other persons or organizations offering support
to the person. When the department assists in developing a placement
under this section which is outside of the county of origin, and there
are two or more options for placement, it shall endeavor to develop the
placement in a manner that does not have a disproportionate effect on
a single county.
(2) If the committed person is not conditionally released to his or
her county of origin, the department shall provide the law and justice
council of the county in which the person is conditionally released
with a written explanation.
(3) For purposes of this section, the offender's county of origin
means the county of the court which ordered the person's commitment.

--- END ---