BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This act shall be known as the higher
education consolidation act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The legislature finds that Washington needs
to reexamine and transform the way higher education programs and
services are delivered. Washington's adult citizens face significant
challenges in the coming years as they strive to meet the challenge of
an increasingly complex world. One arena that poses a major challenge
is Washington's economy. It is in the process of a radical
transformation from an economy heavily dependent on natural resources
to an economy that depends increasingly on the strength of
international trade, technology industries, and other emerging new
businesses. Successful economic transformations will require an
educated populace, able to compete in a technologically complex world.
Yet, enrollments in Washington's public baccalaureate institutions have
been strictly controlled. The state has not yet made a commitment to
providing enrollment opportunities for those new high school graduates.
Failure to provide postsecondary educational opportunities for those
graduates may well restrict their future earning power as well as the
state's economic health.
The legislature finds that Washington needs to find a way to
increase access to colleges and universities in a cost-effective
manner. Washington can no longer afford extensive program
duplications, low faculty-to-student ratios, modest faculty teaching
loads in some academic departments, and the amount of funding devoted
to administrative functions at public colleges and universities. In
order to assist the institutions to meet the challenges facing higher
education, the legislature intends to revise the governance structure
of the public baccalaureate college and universities. The legislature
further intends to create a consolidated governing board for those
institutions. The consolidated governing board will be able to reduce
unnecessary program duplications, increase the average teaching loads
of faculty members, prove the average amount of time needed to obtain
a degree, reduce administrative overhead, and advocate for the needs of
the baccalaureate system. The institutions will be able to concentrate
on meeting the needs of students and of members of the communities
served by the institutions. To assist the board in its work, the
legislature intends to reduce administrative requirements placed on the
institutions by state agencies and to provide a budgeting method that
includes incentive funding and performance based budgeting procedures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Board" means the board of regents of the Washington state
college and university system.
(2) "System" means the Washington state college and university
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The Washington state college and
university system is created. The system shall include, but need not
be limited to: The University of Washington, Washington State
University, Central Washington University, Eastern Washington
University, The Evergreen State College, Western Washington University,
and the branch campuses and extension centers of each of the
universities and the state college.
(2) Each state college and university shall retain:
(a) Separate accreditation;
(b) The power to establish academic standards including admissions
and graduation requirements;
(c) Individual branding, identification, trademarks, and mascots;
and
(d) Individual athletics, sports clubs, and league affiliations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The governance of the Washington state
college and university system shall be vested in a board of regents
consisting of nineteen members. Members shall be appointed by the
governor with the consent of the senate, and may not serve more than
one year without confirmation. Confirmed members shall hold their
offices for a term of six years from the first day of October and until
their successors are appointed and qualified. Eighteen members of the
board shall be selected based on the congressional district in which
they reside as follows: Two members shall be selected from each
congressional district. Ten members of the board shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business. In the case of a vacancy, or
when an appointment is made after the date of the expiration of a term,
the governor shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term of
the regent whose office has become vacant or expired. No more than the
terms of three members may expire simultaneously on the last day of
September in any one year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The board may organize by electing from its
membership a president and an executive committee. If an executive
committee is appointed, the president shall be ex officio chair. The
board may adopt bylaws or rules for its own government. The board
shall hold regular meetings, at least quarterly, and during the interim
between such meetings the executive committee may transact business for
the whole board. The executive committee may call special meetings of
the whole board when such action is deemed necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The board shall ensure that a record of
all board proceedings is carefully preserved.
(2) The board may appoint a nonvoting secretary and a treasurer who
shall hold their respective offices during the pleasure of the board
and carry out such respective duties as the board prescribes.
(3) If appointed, the treasurer shall give bond for the faithful
performance of the duties of his or her office in such amount as the
regents may require. The university shall pay the fee for such bond.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The general powers and duties of the board
shall be as follows:
(1) To have full control of the system and its money and property
of various kinds, except as otherwise provided by law;
(2) To employ a chancellor for the system, a chief operating
officer or president for each campus of the system, assistants, members
of the faculty, and employees of each institution of higher education,
who except as otherwise provided by law, shall hold their positions
during the pleasure of the board;
(3) To establish entrance requirements for students seeking
admission to each campus of the system. The requirements shall meet or
exceed the standards specified under RCW 28B.76.290(2). Completion of
examinations satisfactory to the board may be a prerequisite for
entrance by any applicant at the board's discretion. Evidence of
completion of public high schools and other educational institutions
whose courses of study meet the approval of the board may be acceptable
for entrance;
(4) To establish such colleges, schools, or departments necessary
to carry out the purposes of the system and not otherwise proscribed by
law;
(5) With the assistance of the faculty of the system, to prescribe
the course of study in the various colleges, schools, and departments
of each campus of the system and publish the necessary catalogues
thereof;
(6) To grant to students such certificates or degrees as
recommended for such students by the faculty. The board, upon
recommendation of the faculty, may also confer honorary degrees upon
persons other than graduates of the system in recognition of their
learning or devotion to literature, art, or science, however no degree
may ever be conferred in consideration of the payment of money or the
giving of property of whatsoever kind;
(7) To accept such gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and
devises, whether real or personal property, or both, in trust or
otherwise, for the use or benefit of the system, its campuses, its
colleges, schools, departments, or agencies; and sell, lease or
exchange, invest, or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits,
and income thereof except as limited by the terms of the gifts, grants,
conveyances, bequests, and devises. The board shall adopt proper rules
to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds of
all fees, and the proceeds, rents, profits, and income of all gifts,
grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises accepted under this
subsection, and shall make full report of the same in the customary
biennial report to the governor and members of the legislature, or more
frequently if required by law;
(8) Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such
contracts as the regents deem essential to the purposes of the system
and its campuses;
(9) To submit upon request such reports as will be helpful to the
governor and to the legislature in providing for the system; and
(10) Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating
board pursuant to RCW 28B.76.230, to offer new degree programs, offer
off-campus programs, participate in consortia or centers, contract for
off-campus educational programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus
facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 In addition to the duties in sections 6
through 8 of this act, the board shall have the following additional
duties for Washington State University and its branch campuses:
(1) To collect such information as the board deems desirable as to
the schemes of technical instruction adopted in other parts of the
United States and foreign countries;
(2) To provide for holding agricultural institutes including farm
marketing forums;
(3) To provide that instruction, as far as practicable, be conveyed
by means of laboratory work and provide one or more physical, chemical,
and biological laboratories, and suitably furnish and equip the
laboratories;
(4) To provide training in military tactics for those students
electing to participate in military tactics;
(5) To establish a department of elementary science and in
connection therewith provide instruction in elementary mathematics,
including elementary trigonometry, elementary mechanics, elementary and
mechanical drawing, and land surveying;
(6) To establish a department of agriculture and in connection
therewith provide instruction in physics with special application of
its principles to agriculture, chemistry with special application of
its principles to agriculture, morphology and physiology of plants with
special reference to common grown crops and fungus enemies, morphology
and physiology of the lower forms of animal life, with special
reference to insect pests, morphology and physiology of the higher
forms of animal life and in particular of the horse, cow, sheep, and
swine, agriculture with special reference to the breeding and feeding
of livestock and the best mode of cultivation of farm produce, and
mining and metallurgy, appointing demonstrators in each of these
subjects to superintend the equipment of a laboratory and to give
practical instruction therein;
(7) To establish agricultural experiment stations in connection
with the department of agriculture, including at least one in the
western portion of the state, and appoint the officers and prescribe
rules for their management;
(8) To receive and expend the money appropriated under the act of
congress approved May 8, 1914, entitled "An Act to provide for
cooperative agricultural extension work between the agricultural
colleges in the several States receiving the benefits of the Act of
Congress approved July 2, 1862, and Acts supplemental thereto and the
United States Department of Agriculture" and organize and conduct
agricultural extension work in accordance with the terms and conditions
expressed in the acts of congress;
(9) To acquire by lease, gift, or otherwise, lands necessary to
further the work of the system or for experimental or demonstrational
purposes;
(10) To establish and maintain at least one agricultural experiment
station in an irrigation district to conduct investigational work upon
the principles and practices of irrigational agriculture including the
use of water and its relation to soil types, crops, climatic
conditions, ditch and drain construction, fertility investigations,
plant disease, insect pests, marketing, farm management, use of fruit
byproducts, and general development of agriculture under irrigation
conditions;
(11) To supervise and control the agricultural experiment station
at Puyallup;
(12) To establish and maintain at Wenatchee an agricultural
experiment substation for the purpose of conducting investigational
work upon the principles and practices of orchard culture, spraying,
fertilization, pollenization, new fruit varieties, fruit diseases and
pests, byproducts, marketing, management, and general horticultural
problems; and
(13) To construct when the board so determines a new foundry and a
mining, physical, technological building and fabrication shop, or add
to the present foundry and other buildings, in order that both
instruction and research be expanded to include permanent molding and
die casting with a section for new fabricating techniques, especially
for light metals, including magnesium and aluminum; purchase equipment
for the shops and laboratories in mechanical, electrical, and civil
engineering; establish a pilot plant for the extraction of alumina from
native clays and other possible light metal research; purchase
equipment for a research laboratory for technological research
generally; and purchase equipment for research in electronics,
instrumentation, energy sources, plastics, food technology, mechanics
of materials, hydraulics, and similar fields.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The governing boards of the University of Washington,
Washington State University, the regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College are hereby abolished and their powers, duties,
and functions are hereby transferred to the board of regents of the
Washington state college and university system. All references to the
trustees, regents, or the governing boards of the University of
Washington, Washington State University, the regional universities, and
The Evergreen State College in the Revised Code of Washington shall be
construed to mean the board of regents of the Washington state college
and university system.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the governing boards
of the University of Washington, Washington State University, the
regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall be
delivered to the custody of the board of regents of the Washington
state system. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the governing boards
of the University of Washington, Washington State University, the
regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall be made
available to the board of regents of the Washington state college and
university system. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the
governing boards of the University of Washington, Washington State
University, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College
shall be assigned to the board of regents of the Washington state
college and university system.
(b) Any appropriations made to the governing boards of the
University of Washington, Washington State University, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall, on the effective
date of this section, be transferred and credited to the board of
regents of the Washington state college and university system.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the governing boards of the University of
Washington, Washington State University, the regional universities, and
The Evergreen State College are transferred to the jurisdiction of the
board of regents of the Washington state college and university system.
All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil
service law, are assigned to the board of regents of the Washington
state college and university system to perform their usual duties upon
the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any
action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws
and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the governing boards
of the University of Washington, Washington State University, the
regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall be
continued and acted upon by the board of regents of the Washington
state college and university system. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
board of regents of the Washington state college and university system.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the governing boards of the University of Washington, Washington State
University, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College
shall not affect the validity of any act performed before the effective
date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees transferred under this section shall
become a part of a bargaining unit of the board of regents of the
Washington state college and university system and it shall be
considered an appropriate modification of the existing bargaining unit
under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The Washington state college and university
system shall have no more than one full-time equivalent position
assigned to perform governmental relations functions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.20.100 (Regents -- Appointment -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Quorum)
and 2006 c 78 s 1, 1998 c 95 s 1, 1985 c 61 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c 103 s 2,
1973 c 62 s 7, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.100;
(2) RCW 28B.20.105 (Regents -- Organization and conduct of business--Bylaws, rules and regulations -- Meetings) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28B.20.105;
(3) RCW 28B.20.110 (Regents -- Secretary -- Treasurer -- Duties--Treasurer's bond) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.110;
(4) RCW 28B.20.130 (Powers and duties of regents -- General) and 2010
c 51 s 1, 2004 c 275 s 52, 1998 c 245 s 16, 1985 c 370 s 92, 1977 c 75
s 20, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.130;
(5) RCW 28B.30.100 (Regents -- Appointment -- Terms -- Vacancies--Quorum -- Bond) and 2006 c 78 s 2, 1998 c 95 s 2, 1985 c 61 s 2, 1979
ex.s. c 103 s 3, 1973 c 62 s 10, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.100;
(6) RCW 28B.30.120 (Regents -- Meetings -- Vacancy not to affect rights
of remaining members) and 1979 ex.s. c 103 s 6 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28B.30.120;
(7) RCW 28B.30.125 (Regents -- Board organization -- President--President's duties -- Bylaws, laws) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.125;
(8) RCW 28B.30.130 (Regents -- Treasurer of board -- Bond -- Disbursement
of funds by) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.130;
(9) RCW 28B.30.135 (Regents -- University president as secretary of
board -- Duties -- Bond) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.135;
(10) RCW 28B.30.150 (Regents -- General powers and duties) and 2010
c 51 s 2, 2004 c 275 s 53, 1998 c 245 s 19, 1985 c 370 s 93, 1977 c 75
s 21, 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 47, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.150;
(11) RCW 28B.35.100 (Trustees -- Appointment -- Terms -- Quorum--Vacancies) and 2006 c 78 s 3, 1998 c 95 s 3, 1985 c 137 s 1, 1979 ex.s.
c 103 s 4, & 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 45;
(12) RCW 28B.35.105 (Trustees -- Organization and officers of board--Quorum) and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 46;
(13) RCW 28B.35.110 (Trustees -- Meetings of board) and 1977 ex.s. c
169 s 47;
(14) RCW 28B.35.120 (Trustees -- General powers and duties of board)
and 2006 c 263 s 824, 2004 c 275 s 54, 1985 c 370 s 94, & 1977 ex.s. c
169 s 48;
(15) RCW 28B.40.100 (Trustees -- Appointment -- Terms -- Quorum--
Vacancies) and 2006 c 78 s 4, 1998 c 95 s 4, 1985 c 137 s 2, 1979 ex.s.
c 103 s 5, 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 65, 1973 c 62 s 11, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28B.40.100;
(16) RCW 28B.40.105 (Trustees -- Organization and officers of board--Quorum) and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 66 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.105;
(17) RCW 28B.40.110 (Trustees -- Meetings of board) and 1977 ex.s. c
169 s 67 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.110;
(18) RCW 28B.40.120 (Trustees -- General powers and duties of board)
and 2006 c 263 s 825, 2004 c 275 s 56, 1985 c 370 s 95, 1977 ex.s. c
169 s 68, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.120;
(19) RCW 28B.45.080 (Partnership between community and technical
colleges and branch campuses) and 2004 c 57 s 5 & 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s
8;
(20) RCW 28B.76.010 (Board created) and 1985 c 370 s 1;
(21) RCW 28B.76.020 (Definitions) and 2010 c 245 s 4 & 1985 c 370
s 2;
(22) RCW 28B.76.040 (Members -- Appointment) and 2002 c 348 s 1, 2002
c 129 s 1, & 1985 c 370 s 10;
(23) RCW 28B.76.050 (Members -- Terms) and 2007 c 458 s 101, 2004 c
275 s 3, 2002 c 129 s 2, & 1985 c 370 s 11;
(24) RCW 28B.76.060 (Members -- Vacancies) and 1985 c 370 s 12;
(25) RCW 28B.76.070 (Bylaws -- Meetings) and 1985 c 370 s 13;
(26) RCW 28B.76.080 (Members -- Compensation and travel expenses) and
1985 c 370 s 16, 1984 c 287 s 65, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 77, & 1969
ex.s. c 277 s 12;
(27) RCW 28B.76.090 (Director -- Duties -- Board use of state agencies)
and 2007 c 458 s 102, 2004 c 275 s 4, 1987 c 330 s 301, & 1985 c 370 s
14;
(28) RCW 28B.76.110 (Board as state commission for federal law
purposes) and 2004 c 275 s 5, 1985 c 370 s 20, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 132
s 9;
(29) RCW 28B.76.120 (Adoption of rules) and 1985 c 370 s 8;
(30) RCW 28B.76.210 (Budget priorities and levels of funding--Guidelines for institutions -- Review and evaluation of budget requests--Recommendations) and 2010 c 245 s 10, 2008 c 205 s 4, 2007 c 458 s 202,
2004 c 275 s 7, 2003 c 130 s 3, 1997 c 369 s 10, 1996 c 174 s 1, 1993
c 363 s 6, & 1985 c 370 s 4;
(31) RCW 28B.76.240 (Statewide transfer and articulation policies)
and 2004 c 275 s 10, 1998 c 245 s 23, 1985 c 370 s 27, & 1983 c 304 s
1;
(32) RCW 28B.76.2401 (Statewide transfer of credit policy and
agreement -- Requirements) and 2004 c 55 s 5 & 1983 c 304 s 2;
(33) RCW 28B.76.500 (Student financial aid programs -- Administration
by board -- College information web-based portal) and 2009 c 215 s 7,
1985 c 370 s 23, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 132 s 15;
(34) RCW 28B.76.510 (Board to administer certain federal programs)
and 1985 c 370 s 21 & 1975 1st ex.s. c 132 s 12;
(35) RCW 28B.76.520 (Federal funds, private gifts or grants, board
to administer) and 1985 c 370 s 22 & 1975 1st ex.s. c 132 s 14;
(36) RCW 28B.76.530 (Board may develop and administer demonstration
projects) and 1989 c 306 s 2;
(37) RCW 28B.76.540 (Administrative responsibilities) and 2004 c
275 s 18, 1998 c 245 s 24, 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 12, 1990 c 33 s 561,
1986 c 136 s 20, & 1985 c 370 s 7;
(38) RCW 28B.76.640 (Board to coordinate state participation within
student exchange compact programs -- Designate certifying officer) and
1985 c 370 s 17 & 1974 ex.s. c 4 s 3;
(39) RCW 28B.76.645 (Board to coordinate state participation within
student exchange compact programs -- Criteria -- Washington interstate
commission on higher education professional student exchange program
trust fund) and 2004 c 275 s 23, 1995 c 217 s 1, 1985 c 370 s 18, &
1974 ex.s. c 4 s 4;
(40) RCW 28B.76.650 (Board to coordinate state participation within
student exchange compact programs -- Advice to governor, legislature) and
1985 c 370 s 19 & 1974 ex.s. c 4 s 5;
(41) RCW 28B.76.660 (Washington scholars award and Washington
scholars-alternate award) and 2005 c 518 s 917, 2004 c 275 s 24, 1999
c 159 s 3, 1995 1st sp.s. c 5 s 3, 1990 c 33 s 560, & 1988 c 210 s 1;
(42) RCW 28B.76.665 (Washington scholars award waivers or grants--Transfers between colleges and universities) and 2004 c 275 s 25, 1995
1st sp.s. c 5 s 4, & 1988 c 210 s 2;
(43) RCW 28C.18.005 (Findings) and 1996 c 99 s 1 & 1991 c 238 s 1;
(44) RCW 28C.18.010 (Definitions) and 2009 c 151 s 5, 2008 c 103 s
2, 1996 c 99 s 2, & 1991 c 238 s 2;
(45) RCW 28C.18.020 (Workforce training and education coordinating
board) and 2010 c 128 s 6 & 1991 c 238 s 3;
(46) RCW 28C.18.030 (Purpose of the board) and 1996 c 99 s 3 & 1991
c 238 s 4;
(47) RCW 28C.18.040 (Director's duties) and 1994 c 154 s 307 & 1991
c 238 s 5;
(48) RCW 28C.18.050 (Board designation and functions for federal
purposes -- Monitoring state plans for consistency) and 1995 c 130 s 3 &
1991 c 238 s 6; and
(49) RCW 28C.18.060 (Board's duties) and 2009 c 151 s 6, 2008 c 212
s 2, 2007 c 149 s 1, 1996 c 99 s 4, 1993 c 280 s 17, & 1991 c 238 s 7.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The council of presidents is abolished.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The house of representatives and the senate
higher education and fiscal committees shall report to the legislature
by December 1, 2011, their recommendations and draft legislation to
conform existing higher education statutes to the system of higher
education governance in this act. The recommendations shall include
but need not be limited to: (1) Methods of increasing access in a cost
effective manner; (2) optional budgeting systems that will provide
performance-based budgeting procedures and incentive funding methods;
and (3) methods for accomplishing any vital responsibilities of the
higher education coordinating board and the work force training and
education coordinating board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) The governor shall appoint the board of
regents created in section 5 of this act no later than November 1,
2011.
(2) The board of regents shall begin meeting as soon as possible
after appointment in order to plan for the orderly transition of
baccalaureate institutions of higher education to the jurisdiction of
the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 5 and 14 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 1 through 4 and 6 through 13 of
this act take effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---