BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) In 2009, discarded carpet equaled 2.9 percent of Washington's
disposed waste by weight. The estimated recycling rate for carpet and
padding in Washington was less than two percent in 2009.
(2) The national, voluntary, and industry-led approach to carpet
stewardship, the 2002 memorandum of understanding for carpet
stewardship, has not met its agreed-upon goal of forty percent carpet
recovery and has only achieved a four to five percent recovery rate
nationwide.
(3) Numerous products can be manufactured from recycled carpet,
including carpet backing and backing components, carpet fiber, carpet
underlayment, plastics and engineered materials, and erosion control
products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Brand" means a name, symbol, word, or mark that identifies the
carpet, rather than its components, and attributes the carpet to the
owner or licensee of the brand as the manufacturer.
(2) "Carpet" means a manufactured article that is used in
commercial or residential buildings affixed or placed on the floor or
building walking surface as a decorative or functional building
interior or exterior feature and that is primarily constructed of a top
visible surface of synthetic face fibers or yarns or tufts attached to
a backing system derived from synthetic or natural materials. "Carpet"
includes, but is not limited to, a commercial or a residential
broadloom carpet or modular carpet tiles. "Carpet" includes a pad or
underlayment used in conjunction with a carpet. "Carpet" does not
include handmade rugs, area rugs, or mats.
(3) "Carpet stewardship organization" or "organization" means
either of the following:
(a) An organization appointed by one or more producers to act as an
agent on behalf of the producer to design, submit, and administer a
product stewardship program under this chapter; or
(b) A carpet producer that complies with this chapter as an
individual producer.
(4) "Consumer" means a purchaser, owner, or lessee of carpet,
including a person, business, corporation, limited partnership,
nonprofit organization, or governmental entity.
(5) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(6) "Discarded carpet" means carpet that is no longer used for its
manufactured purpose. However, the term does not include carpet scrap
generated during carpet production.
(7) "Market share" means the percentage of carpet by weight
identified for an individual producer that is put on the market in the
state during the reporting period as compared to all carpet identified
for all producers by weight put on the market in the state during the
same reporting period.
(8) "Producer" means the person who:
(a) Has legal ownership of the brand, brand name, or cobrand of the
carpet sold in Washington state. "Producer" does not include a
retailer who puts its store label on a carpet;
(b) Imports carpet branded or manufactured by a producer that meets
the definition under (a) of this subsection and has no physical
presence in the United States; or
(c) Sells, at retail or wholesale, carpet, does not have legal
ownership of the brand, and elects to fulfill the responsibilities of
the producer for that carpet.
(9) "Product stewardship program" or "program" means the methods,
systems, and services financed and provided by producers of carpet sold
in the state including collecting, transporting, processing, and
recycling of discarded carpet necessary to implement the program.
(10) "Product stewardship program plan" or "plan" means a detailed
plan describing the manner in which a product stewardship program will
be implemented.
(11) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing waste
materials into a finished product for use other than landfill disposal
or incineration.
(12) "Reporting period" means the period commencing January 1st and
ending December 31st in the same calendar year.
(13) "Retailer" means every person who purchases, sells, offers for
sale, or distributes new carpet for sale in this state.
(14) "Reuse" means donating or selling collected carpet back into
the market for its original intended use in which the carpet retains
its original purpose and performance characteristics.
(15) "Sell" or "sales" means a transfer of title of a carpet for
consideration, including a remote sale conducted through a sales
outlet, catalog, internet web site, or similar electronic means. For
purposes of this chapter, "sell" or "sales" includes a lease through
which a carpet is provided to a consumer by a producer, wholesaler, or
retailer.
(16) "Source separated" means carpet that has been separated or
segregated from all other wastes, including but not limited to all
municipal solid waste, at the place where the carpet is discarded.
(17) "Wholesaler" means every person who purchases, sells, or
distributes new carpet in this state in a sale that is not a retail
sale, and in which the carpet is intended to be resold.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By January 1, 2012, a producer of carpet
sold in this state or brought into the state by other means shall
participate in a carpet stewardship organization. A producer shall
notify the department of its participation in a carpet stewardship
organization.
(2)(a) By January 1, 2012, every carpet stewardship organization
must submit to the department sales data from the years 2002 through
2011. The data must include: (i) The amount of carpet sold in or into
the state by square yards and weight in pounds, separating data for
residential and commercial carpet, providing a total for each and an
overall total; and (ii) the market share, by percentage, of each
producer participating in the carpet stewardship organization.
(b) Beginning January 31, 2013, and annually thereafter, carpet
stewardship organizations must submit to the department the previous
year's sales data that includes the amount of carpet sold in or into
the state by square yards and weight in pounds, for residential and
commercial carpet, providing a total for each and an overall total, and
the market share, by percentage, of each producer participating in the
carpet stewardship organization.
(c) Beginning January 31, 2013, carpet stewardship organizations
must collect annual fees, as established in section 8 of this act, from
producers selling carpet in or into the state. The total amount of
annual fees collected must not exceed the amount necessary to recover
costs incurred by the department and carpet stewardship organization to
implement the requirements of the carpet stewardship program. Carpet
stewardship organizations must calculate the annual fee based on each
producer's portion of the market share for the previous year.
(i) The fees must be sufficient for capital costs of the program
and for the product stewardship program to fund: Education and
outreach efforts; administrative and operational activities; and other
efforts that will advance the purposes of this chapter.
(ii) Each carpet stewardship organization must submit an initial
fee of one thousand dollars for each producer represented to cover the
one-time cost of the department's estimated first annual fee as
established in section 8 of this act.
(3)(a) A carpet stewardship organization shall submit to the
department a product stewardship program plan that is consistent with
the requirements of this section by January 1, 2014. A carpet
stewardship organization with a department-approved product stewardship
program plan must implement their program by July 1, 2014.
(b) A carpet stewardship organization must consult with
stakeholders, including retailers, installers, collectors, recyclers,
and local governments during the development of the product stewardship
program plan.
(4) A product stewardship program must:
(a) Have in place methods and systems for financing the program and
collecting, transporting, processing for recycling, and recycling
discarded carpet;
(b) Be provided throughout the state as established in subsection
(6) of this section at no cost to all entities that remove carpet,
including but not limited to carpet and flooring installers, and
construction and demolition companies. The program may not charge a
fee at the time discarded carpet is collected. Collection services
must include convenient locations for entities that remove carpet and,
at minimum, one public collection location per one hundred thousand
residents, and a minimum of one public collection site per county;
(c) Include:
(i) Interim milestones to:
(A) Increase the recycling of discarded carpet throughout the
state;
(B) Increase the recyclability of carpets; and
(C) Incentivize the market growth of secondary products made from
discarded carpet; and
(ii) Five-year performance goals for:
(A) Collecting and recycling discarded carpet;
(B) Managing discarded carpet consistent with the state's solid
waste management plan; and
(C) Collecting source separated carpet that meets acceptable
standards as required under subsection (7)(a) of this section;
(d) Describe how discarded carpet will be collected and recycled
throughout the state;
(e) Identify each producer participating in the product stewardship
program and provide contact information for each producer and the
brands covered by each producer;
(f) Include a proposal for achieving and maintaining performance
standards, beyond the five-year period described in (c) of this
subsection;
(g) Provide opportunities for public comment on the product
stewardship program, a summary of comments received, and responses to
those comments both prior to its submittal as a plan to the department
and annually thereafter; and
(h) Include education and outreach efforts to consumers, commercial
building owners, carpet installation contractors, and retailers
throughout the state to promote their participation in achieving the
product stewardship program's performance goals. At a minimum, the
education and outreach efforts must include:
(i) Written materials and templates of materials for reproduction
to be provided to retailers, local governments, carpet installation
contractors, and consumers at the time of purchase and delivery; and
(ii) Information addressing the condition of acceptable carpet as
required in subsection (7)(a) of this section. The product stewardship
program must provide the templates and materials free of charge.
(5) The carpet stewardship organization may offer incentives or
payments to collectors if necessary to ensure the carpet stewardship
program requirements are met, as described in subsection (4) of this
section.
(6) Carpet stewardship organizations shall implement programs
beginning:
(a) July 1, 2014, for the counties of Clark, King, Kitsap, Pierce,
Snohomish, and Spokane;
(b) July 1, 2015, for the counties of Benton, Franklin, Walla
Walla, and Yakima;
(c) July 1, 2016, for the counties of Chelan, Clallam, Cowlitz,
Grant, Grays Harbor, Island, Lewis, Mason, Skagit, Thurston, and
Whatcom; and
(d) July 1, 2017, for the counties of Adams, Asotin, Douglas,
Ferry, Garfield, Jefferson, Kittitas, Klickitat, Whitman, Pacific, Pend
Oreille, Okanogan, Columbia, San Juan, Skamania, Stevens, and Wahkiakum
in the cities where a carpet retailer is located, with a minimum of one
public collection site per county.
(7) The program must:
(a) Accept all carpet that is source separated, dry, free of paint,
mold, mildew, asbestos, construction or demolition debris, and other
hazardous materials or chemicals that render the carpet unrecyclable;
and
(b) Ensure that carpet collected meeting the standards in (a) of
this subsection is processed for recycling or reuse and a minimum of
sixty percent of the processed carpet material by weight is recycled or
reused.
(8) The carpet stewardship organization administering a product
stewardship program shall notify the department within thirty days
after instituting a change that affects any part of requirements in
subsection (4) of this section to an approved product stewardship
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department may adopt rules necessary
to implement, administer, and enforce this chapter.
(2) The department or its designee may inspect or review audits of
carpet stewardship organizations or of carpet processing and recycling
facilities used to fulfill the requirements of a product stewardship
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Within sixty days after receiving a
product stewardship program plan for approval, the department shall
review the program, determine whether the program complies with the
requirements of this chapter, and notify the carpet stewardship
organization of its decision to approve or not approve the program.
(2) A product stewardship program may not be approved if the
department determines that the program will have the effect of reducing
the level of recycling of discarded carpet that has been achieved since
the effective date of this section or if the product stewardship
program does not meet program elements as required in section 3 of this
act.
(3) The department shall describe the reasons for its decision to
not approve a product stewardship program in the notice to a carpet
stewardship organization. The carpet stewardship organization shall
revise and resubmit the product stewardship program within sixty days
after receiving notice that the program was not approved. The
department shall review and approve or not approve the revised product
stewardship program within sixty days after receipt.
(4) On and after July 1, 2014, a product stewardship program not
approved by the department is not in compliance with this chapter. The
department must list any producer relying on such a product stewardship
program as noncompliant with the requirements of this chapter.
(5) The department must make all approved product stewardship
programs and annual reports available for public review on the
department's web site and at the department's headquarters. By July 1,
2014, and no later than July 1st annually thereafter, the department
shall post a notice on its web site listing producers that are and are
not in compliance with this chapter.
(6) The decision of the department to approve or to not approve a
product stewardship program under this section is appealable to the
pollution control hearings board as provided in RCW 43.21B.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Beginning July 1, 2015, and each year
thereafter, a carpet stewardship organization must submit to the
department an annual report describing its activities to achieve the
purposes of this chapter.
(2) The report must demonstrate that the carpet stewardship
organization's product stewardship program has met the performance
goals of the program including achieving continuous meaningful
improvement in the rate of recycling discarded carpet subject to the
program. Further, the report must include all of the following:
(a) A description of how the product stewardship program has
implemented all of its required elements, including collecting,
transporting, processing, and recycling activities and how the program
has been implemented throughout the state as required in section 3(4)
and (6) of this act;
(b) The amount of carpet sold in the state, by square yards and
weight in pounds, for residential and commercial carpet and provide an
overall total, during the reporting period;
(c) The amount of discarded carpet recycled and reused, by weight
in pounds, during the reporting period;
(d) The names and locations of carpet processing and recycling
facilities used by the product stewardship program and recycled and
reused end uses of collected carpet by weight, during the reporting
period;
(e) The amount of discarded carpet collected but not recycled or
reused, by weight, and its ultimate disposition;
(f) The total cost of implementing the product stewardship program
and an evaluation of the funding mechanism;
(g) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the product stewardship
program, and anticipated steps, if needed, to improve performance
throughout the state;
(h) Examples of educational materials that were provided to
consumers, commercial building owners, carpet installation contractors,
and retailers during the reporting period and a summary of outreach
efforts, including timeline and frequency; and
(i) A summary of public comments received regarding the product
stewardship program and response to those comments.
(3) Proprietary information submitted to the department under this
chapter is exempt from public disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Beginning March 1, 2012, a producer that
offers carpet for sale in this state, but is not participating in a
carpet stewardship organization, is not in compliance with this
chapter.
(2) No producer may sell or offer for sale carpet in or into the
state unless the producer of the carpet is participating in an approved
product stewardship program. The department shall send a written
warning and a copy of this chapter and any rules adopted to implement
this chapter to a producer that is not participating in an approved
program. The written warning must inform the producer that it must
participate in an approved program within thirty days of the notice.
(3) A producer that is not listed on the department's internet web
site as required in section 5(5) of this act, but demonstrates to the
satisfaction of the department that the producer is in compliance with
this chapter before the next notice is required to be posted, may
request a certification letter from the department stating that the
producer is in compliance with this chapter. The letter constitutes
proof of compliance with this chapter.
(4) No one may distribute or sell carpet in or into the state from
producers who are not in compliance with this chapter. In-state
wholesalers, distributors, and retailers who have: (a) Possession of
carpet on the date that restrictions on the sale of carpet become
effective may exhaust their existing stock through sales; and (b)
specified and bid for a project prior to the effective date of this
section or prior to the date a producer has been determined to be out
of compliance may complete the specified project.
(5) The department shall serve, or send with delivery confirmation,
a written warning explaining the violation to any person known to be
distributing or selling carpet in or into the state from producers who
are not participating in a product stewardship program or who are not
in compliance with this chapter and any rules adopted under this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Beginning January 1, 2013, and annually
thereafter, the department shall establish an annual fee sufficient to
cover the costs of administering and enforcing product stewardship
programs under this chapter. The total amount of annual fees collected
must not exceed the amount necessary to recover costs incurred by the
department in connection with the administration, oversight, and
enforcement of the requirements of this chapter. Any unspent money
from the previous year must be retained in the carpet product
stewardship account created in section 11 of this act and applied to
reduce the payments by carpet stewardship organizations in the
following year. The department shall establish a fee based on market
share data provided by carpet stewardship organizations as required in
section 3(2)(b) of this act.
(2) The department must estimate the annual fee for the period of
July 1st through June 30th and notify the carpet stewardship
organizations by March 1st of each year. The department must collect
the annual fee from the carpet stewardship organizations by June 30th.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Any person acquiring a producer, or who has
acquired a producer, has all responsibility for the acquired producer's
carpet, including carpet manufactured prior to July 1, 2011, unless
that responsibility remains with another entity under the purchase
agreement. The acquiring producer must provide the department a letter
from the entity that accepts responsibility for the carpet. Cobranding
producers may negotiate with retailers for responsibility for those
products and must notify the department of the results of their
negotiations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Nothing in this chapter changes or limits
the authority of the Washington utilities and transportation commission
to regulate collection of solid waste, including curbside collection of
residential recyclable materials, nor does this chapter change or limit
the authority of a city or town to provide such service itself or by
contract under RCW 81.77.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The carpet product stewardship account is
created in the state treasury. All receipts received by the department
from producers and carpet stewardship organizations must be deposited
in the account. Expenditures from the account may be used by the
department only for administering and implementing product stewardship
programs. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 7 and 2010 c 84 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the parks and recreation
commission:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, section 5 of this act, 70.105.095,
86.16.020, 88.46.070, 90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) A final decision by the department or director made under
chapter 183, Laws of 2009.
(d) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(f) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(g) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(h) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(i) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(j) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(k) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(l) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(m) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(n) Decisions of a state agency that is an authorized public entity
under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of a
vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are
reviewable under RCW 79.100.120.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 8 and 2010 c 84 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the parks and recreation
commission:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, section 5 of this act, 70.105.095,
86.16.020, 88.46.070, 90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(i) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(j) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(k) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(l) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(m) Decisions of a state agency that is an authorized public entity
under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of a
vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are
reviewable under RCW 79.100.120.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 By December 1, 2016, the department shall
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature concerning the
status of adoption and implementation of product stewardship programs
and recommendations for revisions to improve the rate of carpet
recycling and other goals of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Section 12 of this act expires June 30,
2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 13 of this act takes effect June
30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Proprietary data submitted to the department of ecology under
section 7(3) of this act is exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 1 through 11 and 14 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---