BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.05.232 and 2004 c 166 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a state hospital admits a person for evaluation or
treatment under this chapter who has a history of one or more violent
acts and:
(a) Has ((been)) transferred from a correctional facility to one or
more secure treatment facilities without a break in custody; or
(b) Is or has been under the authority of the department of
corrections or the indeterminate sentence review board,
the state hospital shall consult with the appropriate corrections and
chemical dependency personnel and the appropriate forensic staff at the
state hospital to conduct a discharge review to determine whether the
person presents a likelihood of serious harm and whether the person is
appropriate for release to a less restrictive alternative.
(2) When a state hospital returns a person who was reviewed under
subsection (1) of this section to a correctional facility, the hospital
shall notify the correctional facility that the person was subject to
a discharge review pursuant to this section.

--- END ---