BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.77.060 and 2004 c 9 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1)(a) Whenever a defendant has pleaded not guilty by reason of
insanity, or there is reason to doubt his or her competency, the court
on its own motion or on the motion of any party shall either appoint or
request the secretary to designate ((at least two)) a qualified
expert((s)) or professional person((s)), ((one of whom)) who shall be
approved by the prosecuting attorney, to ((examine)) evaluate and
report upon the mental condition of the defendant. If the defendant is
charged with aggravated murder, the court may require the appointment
of two evaluators. The signed order of the court shall serve as
authority for the ((experts)) evaluator to be given access to all
records held by any mental health, medical, educational, or
correctional facility that relate to the present or past mental,
emotional, or physical condition of the defendant. ((At least one of
the experts or professional persons appointed shall be a developmental
disabilities professional)) If the court is advised by any party that
the defendant may ((be developmentally disabled)) have a developmental
disability, the examination must be performed by a developmental
disabilities professional. ((Upon agreement of the parties, the court
may designate one expert or professional person to conduct the
examination and report on the mental condition of the defendant. For
purposes of the examination, the court may order))
(b) The order of the court shall require the evaluation to take
place in the community or in a jail or detention facility. In the case
of an evaluation in a jail or detention facility which is performed by
an evaluator designated by the secretary, the signed order of the court
shall grant authority to the evaluator to cause the jail to transport
the defendant ((committed)) to a hospital or other suitably secure
public or private mental health facility for a period of ((time
necessary to complete the examination, but)) commitment not to exceed
fifteen days from the time of admission to the facility, if the
evaluator determines that inpatient commitment is necessary in order to
complete an accurate evaluation. Such commitment shall not extend
beyond the reasonable time needed to complete the evaluation. If the
evaluator determines that inpatient commitment is necessary, the
evaluator shall promptly notify the court and all parties and shall
provide an estimated time for the completion of the evaluation. ((If
the defendant is being held in jail or other detention facility, upon
agreement of the parties, the court may direct that the examination be
conducted at the jail or other detention facility.
(b))) (c) When a defendant is ordered to ((be committed for
inpatient examination)) undergo an evaluation under this subsection
(1), the court may delay granting bail until the defendant has been
evaluated for competency or sanity and appears before the court.
Following the evaluation, in determining bail the court shall consider:
(i) Recommendations of the ((expert or professional persons)) evaluator
regarding the defendant's competency, sanity, or diminished capacity;
(ii) whether the defendant has a recent history of one or more violent
acts; (iii) whether the defendant has previously been acquitted by
reason of insanity or found incompetent; (iv) whether it is reasonably
likely the defendant will fail to appear for a future court hearing;
and (v) whether the defendant is a threat to public safety.
(2) The court may direct that a qualified expert or professional
person retained by or appointed for the defendant be permitted to
witness the examination authorized by subsection (1) of this section,
and that the defendant shall have access to all information obtained by
the court appointed expert((s)) or professional person((s)). The
defendant's expert or professional person shall have the right to file
his or her own report following the guidelines of subsection (3) of
this section. If the defendant is indigent, the court shall upon the
request of the defendant assist him or her in obtaining an expert or
professional person.
(3) The report of the examination shall include the following:
(a) A description of the nature of the examination;
(b) A diagnosis of the mental condition of the defendant;
(c) If the defendant suffers from a mental disease or defect, or
((is developmentally disabled)) has a developmental disability, an
opinion as to competency;
(d) If the defendant has indicated his or her intention to rely on
the defense of insanity pursuant to RCW 10.77.030, an opinion as to the
defendant's sanity at the time of the act, and an opinion as to whether
the defendant presents a substantial danger to other persons, or
presents a substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts
jeopardizing public safety or security, unless kept under further
control by the court or other persons or institutions;
(e) When directed by the court, an opinion as to the capacity of
the defendant to have a particular state of mind which is an element of
the offense charged;
(f) An opinion as to whether the defendant should be evaluated by
a ((county)) designated mental health professional under chapter 71.05
RCW((, and an opinion as to whether the defendant is a substantial
danger to other persons, or presents a substantial likelihood of
committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security, unless
kept under further control by the court or other persons or
institutions)).
(4) The secretary may execute such agreements as appropriate and
necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.77.065 and 2008 c 213 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a)(i) The ((facility)) expert conducting the evaluation shall
provide ((its)) his or her report and recommendation to the court in
which the criminal proceeding is pending. A copy of the report and
recommendation shall be provided to the designated mental health
professional, the prosecuting attorney, the defense attorney, and the
professional person at the local correctional facility where the
defendant is being held, or if there is no professional person, to the
person designated under (a)(ii) of this subsection. Upon request, the
((facility)) evaluator shall also provide copies of any source
documents relevant to the evaluation to the designated mental health
professional. The report and recommendation shall be provided not less
than twenty-four hours preceding the transfer of the defendant to the
correctional facility in the county in which the criminal proceeding is
pending.
(ii) If there is no professional person at the local correctional
facility, the local correctional facility shall designate a
professional person as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in cooperation with
the regional support network, a professional person at the regional
support network to receive the report and recommendation.
(iii) ((When a defendant is transferred to the facility conducting
the evaluation, or)) Upon commencement of a defendant's evaluation in
the local correctional facility, the local correctional facility must
notify the evaluator ((or the facility conducting the evaluation)) of
the name of the professional person, or person designated under (a)(ii)
of this subsection to receive the report and recommendation.
(b) If the ((facility)) evaluator concludes, under RCW
10.77.060(3)(f), the person should be ((kept under further control, an
evaluation shall be conducted)) evaluated by a designated mental health
professional, the court shall order the evaluation of such person under
chapter 71.05 RCW((. The court shall order an evaluation be conducted
by the appropriate designated mental health professional: (i))) prior
to release from confinement ((for such person who is convicted, if
sentenced to confinement for twenty-four months or less; (ii) for any
person who is acquitted; or (iii) for any person: (A) Whose charges
are dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4); or (B) whose nonfelony
charges are dismissed)), if the person is acquitted, convicted and
sentenced to confinement for twenty-four months or less, or if the
charges are dismissed pursuant to a finding of incompetent to stand
trial.
(2) The designated mental health professional shall provide written
notification within twenty-four hours of the results of the
determination whether to commence proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.
The notification shall be provided to the persons identified in
subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(3) The prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the results of
any proceedings commenced by the designated mental health professional
under subsection (2) of this section to the ((facility conducting the
evaluation under this chapter)) secretary.
(4) The fact of admission and all information and records compiled,
obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services under this
chapter may also be disclosed to the courts solely to prevent the entry
of any evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any
order entered under chapter 71.05 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 10.77.084 and 2007 c 375 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If at any time during the pendency of an action and prior to
judgment the court finds, following a report as provided in RCW
10.77.060, a defendant is incompetent, the court shall order the
proceedings against the defendant be stayed except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section.
(b) ((A defendant found incompetent shall be evaluated at the
direction of the secretary and a determination made whether the
defendant is an individual with a developmental disability. Such
evaluation and determination shall be accomplished as soon as possible
following the court's placement of the defendant in the custody of the
secretary.
(i) When appropriate, and subject to available funds, if the
defendant is determined to be an individual with a developmental
disability, he or she may be placed in a program specifically reserved
for the treatment and training of persons with developmental
disabilities where the defendant shall have the right to habilitation
according to an individualized service plan specifically developed for
the particular needs of the defendant. A copy of the evaluation shall
be sent to the program.
(A) The program shall be separate from programs serving persons
involved in any other treatment or habilitation program.
(B) The program shall be appropriately secure under the
circumstances and shall be administered by developmental disabilities
professionals who shall direct the habilitation efforts.
(C) The program shall provide an environment affording security
appropriate with the charged criminal behavior and necessary to protect
the public safety.
(ii) The department may limit admissions of such persons to this
specialized program in order to ensure that expenditures for services
do not exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and allocated by
the department for such services.
(iii) The department may establish admission priorities in the
event that the number of eligible persons exceeds the limits set by the
department.
(c))) At the end of the mental health treatment and restoration
period, if any, or at any time a professional person determines
competency has been, or is unlikely to be, restored, the defendant
shall be returned to court for a hearing. If, after notice and
hearing, competency has been restored, the stay entered under (a) of
this subsection shall be lifted. If competency has not been restored,
the proceedings shall be dismissed. If the court concludes that
competency has not been restored, but that further treatment within the
time limits established by RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.088 is likely to
restore competency, the court may order that treatment for purposes of
competency restoration be continued. Such treatment may not extend
beyond the combination of time provided for in RCW 10.77.086 or
10.77.088.
(((d))) (c) If at any time during the proceeding the court finds,
following notice and hearing, a defendant is not likely to regain
competency, the proceedings shall be dismissed and the defendant shall
be evaluated for civil commitment proceedings.
(2) If the defendant is referred to the designated mental health
professional for consideration of initial detention proceedings under
chapter 71.05 RCW pursuant to this chapter, the designated mental
health professional shall provide prompt written notification of the
results of the determination whether to commence initial detention
proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW and whether the person was
detained. The notification shall be provided to the court in which the
criminal action was pending, the prosecutor, the defense attorney in
the criminal action, and the facility that evaluated the defendant for
competency.
(3) The fact that the defendant is unfit to proceed does not
preclude any pretrial proceedings which do not require the personal
participation of the defendant.
(4) A defendant receiving medication for either physical or mental
problems shall not be prohibited from standing trial, if the medication
either enables the defendant to understand the proceedings against him
or her and to assist in his or her own defense, or does not disable him
or her from so understanding and assisting in his or her own defense.
(5) At or before the conclusion of any commitment period provided
for by this section, the facility providing evaluation and treatment
shall provide to the court a written evaluation report ((of
examination)) which meets the requirements of RCW 10.77.060(3). If the
defendant is charged with a felony, the report of the first restoration
period must include an assessment of the defendant's future
dangerousness which is evidence-based regarding predictive validity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A defendant found incompetent shall be evaluated at the
direction of the secretary and a determination made whether the
defendant is an individual with a developmental disability. The
evaluation and determination must be accomplished as soon as possible
following the court's placement of the defendant in the custody of the
secretary.
(2) When appropriate, and subject to available funds, if the
defendant is determined to be an individual with a developmental
disability, he or she may be placed in a program specifically reserved
for the treatment and training of persons with developmental
disabilities where the defendant has the right to habilitation
according to an individualized service plan specifically developed for
the particular needs of the defendant. A copy of the evaluation must
be sent to the program.
(a) The program must be separate from programs serving persons
involved in any other treatment or habilitation program.
(b) The program must be appropriately secure under the
circumstances and must be administered by developmental disabilities
professionals who shall direct the habilitation efforts.
(c) The program shall provide an environment affording security
appropriate with the charged criminal behavior and necessary to protect
the public safety.
(3) The department may limit admissions of such persons to this
specialized program in order to ensure that expenditures for services
do not exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and allocated by
the department for such services.
(4) The department may establish admission priorities in the event
that the number of eligible persons exceeds the limits set by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The legislature does not intend to increase
or decrease the prevailing waiting times for competency evaluations as
a result of this act. Rather, the intent of this act is to capture
savings by reducing state hospital admissions to the extent practicable
without sacrificing the quality of competency evaluations or increasing
the burden on counties or jails. The department of social and health
services shall provide adequate staffing for competency evaluations so
that the increase in the proportion of competency evaluations performed
in a jail or secure detention facility as a result of this act does not
cause the number of jail days consumed by defendants waiting for a
competency evaluation to increase during the 2011-2013 biennium.

Sec. 6 2010 c 280 s 5 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect January 1, ((2012)) 2013.

--- END ---