BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.44.460 and 1992 c 161 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definition in
this section applies throughout RCW 70.44.450.
"Rural public hospital district" means a public hospital district
authorized under chapter 70.44 RCW whose geographic boundaries do not
include a city with a population greater than ((thirty)) fifty
thousand.

--- END ---