BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that output-based air
emission standards encourage energy efficiency and a clean energy
supply. An output-based air emission standards approach increases fuel
conversion efficiency, reduces fuel consumption, promotes pollution
prevention, and reduce emissions. The legislature also finds that
combined heat and power is affordable, efficient, clean, and reliable.
Combined heat and power simultaneously generate electric energy and
utilize thermal energy as well, which is significantly more efficient
than separate generation. Thermal energy has many applications, such
as space heating, hot water, steam, and air conditioning.
The legislature intends that, where feasible and practical,
output-based air emission standards must be used to increase energy
efficiency, improve air quality, and reduce greenhouse gas emissions

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW
to read as follows:
The department and the boards of any activated authority shall
consider an output-based air emission standards approach when issuing
technology determinations in permits, orders, and regulations. The
output-based air emission standards approach must include a broad range
of energy efficiency best available control technologies such as
cogeneration, waste heat recovery, and other energy efficiency measures
that are appropriate for the stationary source, source, or source
category being regulated.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.94.030 and 2005 c 197 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Air contaminant" means dust, fumes, mist, smoke, other
particulate matter, vapor, gas, odorous substance, or any combination
thereof.
(2) "Air pollution" is presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or
more air contaminants in sufficient quantities and of such
characteristics and duration as is, or is likely to be, injurious to
human health, plant or animal life, or property, or which unreasonably
interfere with enjoyment of life and property. For the purpose of this
chapter, air pollution shall not include air contaminants emitted in
compliance with chapter 17.21 RCW.
(3) "Air quality standard" means an established concentration,
exposure time, and frequency of occurrence of an air contaminant or
multiple contaminants in the ambient air which shall not be exceeded.
(4) "Ambient air" means the surrounding outside air.
(5) "Authority" means any air pollution control agency whose
jurisdictional boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of one or
more counties.
(6) "Best available control technology" (BACT) means an emission
limitation based on the maximum degree of reduction for each air
pollutant subject to regulation under this chapter emitted from or that
results from any new or modified stationary source, that the permitting
authority, on a case-by-case basis, taking into account energy,
environmental, and economic impacts and other costs, determines is
achievable for such a source or modification through application of
production processes and available methods, systems, and techniques,
including fuel cleaning, clean fuels, or treatment or innovative fuel
combustion techniques for control of each such a pollutant. In no
event shall application of "best available control technology" result
in emissions of any pollutants that will exceed the emissions allowed
by any applicable standard under 40 C.F.R. Part 60 and Part 61, as they
exist on July 25, 1993, or their later enactments as adopted by
reference by the director by rule. Emissions from any source utilizing
clean fuels, or any other means, to comply with this subsection shall
not be allowed to increase above levels that would have been required
under the definition of BACT as it existed prior to enactment of the
federal clean air act amendments of 1990.
(7) "Best available retrofit technology" (BART) means an emission
limitation based on the degree of reduction achievable through the
application of the best system of continuous emission reduction for
each pollutant that is emitted by an existing stationary facility. The
emission limitation must be established, on a case-by-case basis,
taking into consideration the technology available, the costs of
compliance, the energy and nonair quality environmental impacts of
compliance, any pollution control equipment in use or in existence at
the source, the remaining useful life of the source, and the degree of
improvement in visibility that might reasonably be anticipated to
result from the use of the technology.
(8) "Board" means the board of directors of an authority.
(9) "Control officer" means the air pollution control officer of
any authority.
(10) "Department" or "ecology" means the department of ecology.
(11) "Emission" means a release of air contaminants into the
ambient air.
(12) "Emission standard" and "emission limitation" mean a
requirement established under the federal clean air act or this chapter
that limits the quantity, rate, or concentration of emissions of air
contaminants on a continuous basis, including any requirement relating
to the operation or maintenance of a source to assure continuous
emission reduction, and any design, equipment, work practice, or
operational standard adopted under the federal clean air act or this
chapter.
(13) "Fine particulate" means particulates with a diameter of two
and one-half microns and smaller.
(14) "Lowest achievable emission rate" (LAER) means for any source
that rate of emissions that reflects:
(a) The most stringent emission limitation that is contained in the
implementation plan of any state for such class or category of source,
unless the owner or operator of the proposed source demonstrates that
such limitations are not achievable; or
(b) The most stringent emission limitation that is achieved in
practice by such class or category of source, whichever is more
stringent.
In no event shall the application of this term permit a proposed
new or modified source to emit any pollutant in excess of the amount
allowable under applicable new source performance standards.
(15) "Modification" means any physical change in, or change in the
method of operation of, a stationary source that increases the amount
of any air contaminant emitted by such source or that results in the
emission of any air contaminant not previously emitted. The term
modification shall be construed consistent with the definition of
modification in Section 7411, Title 42, United States Code, and with
rules implementing that section.
(16) "Multicounty authority" means an authority which consists of
two or more counties.
(17) "New source" means (a) the construction or modification of a
stationary source that increases the amount of any air contaminant
emitted by such source or that results in the emission of any air
contaminant not previously emitted, and (b) any other project that
constitutes a new source under the federal clean air act.
(18) "Permit program source" means a source required to apply for
or to maintain an operating permit under RCW 70.94.161.
(19) "Person" means an individual, firm, public or private
corporation, association, partnership, political subdivision of the
state, municipality, or governmental agency.
(20) "Reasonably available control technology" (RACT) means the
lowest emission limit that a particular source or source category is
capable of meeting by the application of control technology that is
reasonably available considering technological and economic
feasibility. RACT is determined on a case-by-case basis for an
individual source or source category taking into account the impact of
the source upon air quality, the availability of additional controls,
the emission reduction to be achieved by additional controls, the
impact of additional controls on air quality, and the capital and
operating costs of the additional controls. RACT requirements for a
source or source category shall be adopted only after notice and
opportunity for comment are afforded.
(21) "Silvicultural burning" means burning of wood fiber on forest
land consistent with the provisions of RCW ((70.94.660)) 70.94.6534.
(22) "Source" means all of the emissions units including
quantifiable fugitive emissions, that are located on one or more
contiguous or adjacent properties, and are under the control of the
same person, or persons under common control, whose activities are
ancillary to the production of a single product or functionally related
group of products.
(23) "Stationary source" means any building, structure, facility,
or installation that emits or may emit any air contaminant.
(24) "Trigger level" means the ambient level of fine particulates,
measured in micrograms per cubic meter, that must be detected prior to
initiating a first or second stage of impaired air quality under RCW
70.94.473.
(25) "Output-based air emission standards" means emissions
limitations based on emissions per unit of product produced. Power
plants and cogeneration facilities must use the methodology established
under RCW 80.80.040.

--- END ---