BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that there are many
challenging issues facing the forest sector, such as climate change,
loss of forest cover in rural and urban areas, forest health and fire,
development of environmental services markets, enhancement of habitat
and biodiversity, timber and water supplies, restoration of forest
ecosystems, and the economic health of forest dependent communities
that rely on the retention of working forests. These forest issues,
occurring in both urban and rural environments, and the approaches
taken to address them, transcend the expertise and mission of the
University of Washington school of forest resources' centers and
cooperatives. While each center and cooperative contributes important
expertise and resources, the structure and continuity for the
integrated, interdisciplinary approach needed to address these complex
issues is lacking. The institute of forest resources will provide this
structure and continuity by drawing contributions from the centers and
cooperatives into a more consolidated, collaborative,
interdisciplinary, and integrated process that is responsive to the
critical issues confronting the forest sector.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.44.070 and 2010 c 188 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that there are many issues facing the forest
sector, such as climate change, forest health and fire, carbon
accounting, habitat and diversity, timber and water supplies, economic
competitiveness, and the economic health of forest dependent
communities. Enhancing the capability to effectively address these
forest issues is critical to the state of Washington. To meet this
need, the University of Washington school of forest resources will
continue to work with the various interests concerned with the state's
forest resources, including the legislature, state and federal
governments, environmental organizations, local communities, the timber
industry, and tribes, to improve these entities' ability to
competitively recruit, educate, and train a high quality workforce. In
order to meet these goals, it is important to our state and in
particular, the University of Washington, to continue to have strong
undergraduate and graduate programs in forestry and natural resources
to provide well-trained professionals to meet workforce needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 76.44 RCW
to read as follows:
The director of the school of forest resources of the University of
Washington must coordinate the school of forest resources' cooperatives
and centers to promote a more holistic, efficient, and integrated
approach to broaden its research and outreach programs to address the
issues facing the forest sector.

Sec. 4 RCW 76.44.030 and 1979 c 50 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The institute of forest resources ((shall)) must pursue
coordinated research and education related to the forest ((resource))
sector and its multiple ((use)) uses, including: Its conservation,
restoration, sustainable management and utilization; its ((evaluation
of forest land use and the maintenance of its)) economic, ecological,
and societal value in both urban and rural environments; the
manufacture and marketing of forest products, including timber,
nontimber, and environmental services; and the provision of recreation
and aesthetic values.
(2) The institute of forest resources must seek to provide a
framework to identify, prioritize, fund, and conduct interdisciplinary
research critical to the forest sector and to develop integrated,
synthesized information and decision support tools to improve
understanding of these complex issues for stakeholders, policymakers,
and others.
(3) In pursuit of these objectives, the institute of forest
resources is authorized to cooperate with other entities, including,
but not limited to, universities, state and federal agencies,
conservation and environmental organizations, and domestic or foreign
industrial and business institutions((, domestic or foreign,)) where
such cooperation advances these objectives.
(4) The institute of forest resources may solicit gifts, grants,
conveyances, bequests, and devises, whether real or personal property,
or both, in trust or otherwise, to be directed to the institute for
carrying out the purposes of the institute. The institute may solicit
contracts for work, financial and in-kind contributions, and support
from private industries, interest groups, federal and state sources,
and other sources. It may also use separately appropriated moneys of
the University of Washington for the institute's activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 76.44 RCW
to read as follows:
The director of the school of forest resources of the University of
Washington may appoint a policy advisory committee consisting of eleven
members to advise the director of the school of forest resources on
policies for the institute of forest resources that are consistent with
the purposes of the institute. Membership on the policy advisory
committee must broadly represent the various interests concerned with
the purposes of the institute of forest resources, including state and
federal governments, conservation and environmental organizations,
urban forestry interests, rural communities, industry and business, and
tribal interests.

--- END ---