BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.015 and 2001 c 73 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Salaries for elected officials of towns and cities may be set
by salary commissions established in accordance with city charter or by
ordinance and in conformity with this section.
(2) The members of such commissions shall be appointed in
accordance with the provisions of a city charter, or as specified in
this subsection:
(a) Shall be appointed by the mayor with approval of the city
council;
(b) May not be appointed to more than two terms;
(c) May only be removed during their terms of office for cause of
incapacity, incompetence, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office or
for a disqualifying change of residence; and
(d) May not include any officer, official, or employee of the city
or town or any of their immediate family members. "Immediate family
member" as used in this subsection means the parents, spouse, siblings,
children, or dependent relatives of the officer, official, or employee,
whether or not living in the household of the officer, official, or
employee.
(3) Any change in salary shall be filed by the commission with the
city clerk and shall become effective and incorporated into the city or
town budget without further action of the city council or salary
commission.
(4) Any change in salary ((increases)) established by the
commission shall be effective as to all city or town elected officials,
regardless of their terms of office.
(5) ((Salary decreases established by the commission shall become
effective as to incumbent city or town elected officials at the
commencement of their next subsequent terms of office.
(6))) Salary increases and decreases shall be subject to referendum
petition by the people of the town or city in the same manner as a city
ordinance upon filing of such petition with the city clerk within
thirty days after filing of the salary schedule. In the event of the
filing of a valid referendum petition, the salary increase or decrease
shall not go into effect until approved by vote of the people.
(((7))) (6) Referendum measures under this section shall be
submitted to the voters of the city or town at the next following
general or municipal election occurring thirty days or more after the
petition is filed, and shall be otherwise governed by the provisions of
the state Constitution, or city charter, or laws generally applicable
to referendum measures.
(((8))) (7) The action fixing the salary by a commission
established in conformity with this section shall supersede any other
provision of state statute or city or town ordinance related to
municipal budgets or to the fixing of salaries.
(((9))) (8) Salaries for mayors and councilmembers established
under an ordinance or charter provision in existence on July 22, 2001,
that substantially complies with this section shall remain in effect
unless and until changed in accordance with such charter provision or
ordinance.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.17.024 and 2001 c 73 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Salaries for county commissioners and councilmembers may be set
by county commissioner and councilmember salary commissions established
by ordinance or resolution of the county legislative authority and in
conformity with this section.
(2) Commissions established under subsection (1) of this section
shall be known as the (Insert name of county) county citizens'
commission on salaries for elected officials. Each commission shall
consist of ten members appointed by the county commissioner or
executive with the approval of the county legislative authority, or by
a majority vote of the county legislative authority if there is no
single county commissioner or executive, as provided in this section.
(a) Six of the ten commission members shall be selected by lot by
the county auditor from among those registered voters eligible to vote
at the time persons are selected for appointment to full terms on the
commission under (c) of this subsection. In noncharter counties, the
county auditor shall select two commission members living in each
commissioner's district. The county auditor shall establish policies
and procedures for conducting the selection by lot. The policies and
procedures shall include, but not be limited to, those for notifying
persons selected and for providing a new selection from a
commissioner's district if a person selected from the district declines
appointment to the commission or if, following the person's
appointment, the person's position on the commission becomes vacant
before the end of the person's term of office.
(b) The remaining four of the ten commission members must be
residents of the county and shall be appointed by the county
commissioner or executive with approval of the county legislative
authority, or by a majority vote of the county legislative authority if
there is no single county commissioner or executive. The persons
selected under this subsection shall have had experience in the field
of personnel management. Of these four members, one shall be selected
from each of the following four sectors in the county: Business,
professional personnel management, legal profession, and organized
labor.
(c) If there is a single county commissioner or executive, the
county auditor shall forward the names of persons selected under (a) of
this subsection to the county commissioner or executive who shall
appoint these persons to the commission.
(d) No person may be appointed to more than two terms. No member
of the commission may be removed by the county commissioner or
executive, or county legislative authority if there is no single county
commissioner or executive, during his or her term of office unless for
cause of incapacity, incompetence, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in
office, or for a disqualifying change of residence.
(e) The members of the commission may not include any officer,
official, or employee of the county or any of their immediate family
members. "Immediate family member" as used in this subsection means
the parents, spouse, siblings, children, or dependent relatives of the
officer, official, or employee, whether or not living in the household
of the officer, official, or employee.
(f) Upon a vacancy in any position on the commission, a successor
shall be selected and appointed to fill the unexpired term. The
selection and appointment shall be concluded within thirty days of the
date the position becomes vacant and shall be conducted in the same
manner as for the original appointment.
(3) Any change in salary shall be filed by the commission with the
county auditor and shall become effective and incorporated into the
county budget without further action of the county legislative
authority or salary commission.
(4) Any change in salary ((increases)) established by the
commission shall be effective as to county commissioners and all
members of the county legislative authority, regardless of their terms
of office.
(5) ((Salary decreases established by the commission shall become
effective as to incumbent county commissioners and councilmembers at
the commencement of their next subsequent terms of office.
(6))) Salary increases and decreases shall be subject to referendum
petition by the people of the county in the same manner as a county
ordinance upon filing of such petition with the county auditor within
thirty days after filing of the salary schedule. In the event of the
filing of a valid referendum petition, the salary increase or decrease
shall not go into effect until approved by vote of the people.
(((7))) (6) Referendum measures under this section shall be
submitted to the voters of the county at the next following general or
municipal election occurring thirty days or more after the petition is
filed, and shall be otherwise governed by the provisions of the state
Constitution and laws generally applicable to referendum measures.
(((8))) (7) The action fixing the salary of a county commissioner
or councilmember by a commission established in conformity with this
section shall supersede any other provision of state statute or county
ordinance related to municipal budgets or to the fixing of salaries of
county commissioners and councilmembers.
(((9))) (8) Salaries for county commissioners and councilmembers
established under an ordinance or resolution of the county legislative
authority in existence on July 22, 2001, that substantially complies
with this section shall remain in effect unless and until changed in
accordance with such charter provision or ordinance.

Sec. 3 RCW 35.23.091 and 1990 c 212 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The mayor and the members of the city council may be reimbursed for
actual expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties,
upon presentation of a claim therefor, after allowance and approval
thereof, by resolution of the city council; and each city councilmember
may be paid for attending council meetings an amount which shall be
fixed by ordinance and may be revised from time to time by ordinance,
but any increase ((or reduction)) in the compensation attaching to an
office shall not be applicable to the term then being served by the
incumbent.
The city attorney, clerk and treasurer, if elective, shall
severally receive at stated times a compensation to be fixed by
ordinance by the city council.
The mayor and other officers shall receive such compensation as may
be fixed by the city council at the time the estimates are made as
provided by law.
Any city that provides a pension for any of its employees under a
plan not administered by the state must notify the state auditor of the
existence of the plan at the time of an audit of the city by the
auditor. No city may establish a pension plan for its employees that
is not administered by the state, except that any defined contribution
plan in existence as of January 1, 1990, is deemed to have been
authorized. No city that provides a defined contribution plan for its
employees as authorized by this section may make any material changes
in the terms or conditions of the plan after June 7, 1990.

Sec. 4 RCW 35A.13.040 and 2009 c 549 s 3021 are each amended to
read as follows:
The salaries of the councilmembers, including the mayor, shall be
fixed by ordinance and may be revised from time to time by ordinance,
but any increase ((or reduction)) in the compensation attaching to an
office shall not become effective until the expiration of the term then
being served by the incumbent: PROVIDED, That compensation of
councilmembers may not be increased ((or diminished)) after their
election nor may the compensation of the mayor be increased ((or
diminished)) after the mayor has been chosen by the council.
Until councilmembers of a newly organized council-manager code city
may lawfully be paid as provided by salary ordinance, such
councilmembers shall be entitled to compensation in the same manner and
in the same amount as councilmembers of such city prior to the adoption
of this council-manager plan.
Until a salary ordinance can be passed and become effective as to
elective officers of a newly incorporated code city, the first
councilmembers shall be entitled to compensation as follows: In cities
having less than five thousand inhabitants -- twenty dollars per meeting
for not more than two meetings per month; in cities having more than
five thousand but less than fifteen thousand inhabitants -- a salary of
one hundred and fifty dollars per calendar month; in cities having more
than fifteen thousand inhabitants -- a salary of four hundred dollars per
calendar month. A councilmember who is occupying the position of
mayor, in addition to his or her salary as a councilmember, shall be
entitled, while serving as mayor, to an additional amount per calendar
month, or portion thereof, equal to twenty-five percent of the
councilmember salary: PROVIDED, That such interim compensation shall
remain in effect only until a salary ordinance is passed and becomes
effective as to such officers, and the compensation provided herein
shall not be construed as fixing the usual compensation of such
officers. Councilmembers shall receive reimbursement for their actual
and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the duties of
their office, or the council by ordinance may provide for a per diem
allowance. Procedure for approval of claims for expenses shall be as
provided by ordinance.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.03.310 and 2009 c 564 s 925 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials
shall study the relationship of salaries to the duties of members of
the legislature, all elected officials of the executive branch of state
government, and all judges of the supreme court, court of appeals,
superior courts, and district courts, and shall fix the salary for each
respective position.
(2) Except as provided otherwise in RCW 43.03.305 and this section,
the commission shall be solely responsible for its own organization,
operation, and action and shall enjoy the fullest cooperation of all
state officials, departments, and agencies.
(3) Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for
their services, but shall be eligible to receive a subsistence
allowance and travel expenses pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The members of the commission shall elect a chair from among
their number. The commission shall set a schedule of salaries by an
affirmative vote of not less than nine members of the commission.
(5) The commission shall file its initial schedule of salaries for
the elected officials with the secretary of state no later than ((the
first Monday in June, 1987, and shall file a schedule)) October 1st
biennially ((thereafter)), or more frequently as necessary to implement
Article XXX, section 1 of the state Constitution. Each such schedule
shall be filed in legislative bill form, shall be assigned a chapter
number and published with the session laws of the legislature, and
shall be codified by the statute law committee. The signature of the
chair of the commission shall be affixed to each schedule submitted to
the secretary of state. The chair shall certify that the schedule has
been adopted in accordance with the provisions of state law and with
the rules, if any, of the commission. Such schedules shall become
effective ninety days after the filing thereof, except as provided in
Article XXVIII, section 1 of the state Constitution. State laws
regarding referendum petitions shall apply to such schedules to the
extent consistent with Article XXVIII, section 1 of the state
Constitution.
(6) Before the filing of any salary schedule, the commission shall
first develop a proposed salary schedule and then hold no fewer than
four regular meetings as defined by chapter 42.30 RCW to take public
testimony on the proposed schedule within the four months immediately
preceding the filing. In the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the commission
shall hold no more than two regular meetings as defined by chapter
42.30 RCW to take public testimony on the proposed schedule within the
four months immediately preceding the filing. At the last public
hearing that is held as a regular meeting on the proposed schedule, the
commission shall adopt the salary schedule as originally proposed or as
amended at that meeting that will be filed with the secretary of state.
(7) All meetings, actions, hearings, and business of the commission
shall be subject in full to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30
RCW.
(8) Salaries of the officials referred to in subsection (1) of this
section that are in effect on January 12, 1987, shall continue until
modified by the commission under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act takes effect if the proposed
amendment to Article XXX, section 1 of the state Constitution
authorizing salaries of state, county, and municipal officials to be
diminished during the term of office is validly submitted to and is
approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election. If
the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void
in its entirety.

--- END ---