BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
SHORT TITLE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 This act shall be known as the 2012 jobs
now act.

PART II
BOND AUTHORIZATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 For the purpose of providing funds to
finance the projects described and authorized by the legislature in the
capital and operating appropriations acts for the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, and all costs incidental thereto, the state finance committee
is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of
Washington in the sum of five hundred five million four hundred sixty-six thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance
these projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in
this section may be sold at such price as the state finance committee
shall determine. No bonds authorized in this section may be offered
for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of
the sale of the bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 (1) The proceeds from the sale of the
bonds authorized in section 201 of this act shall be deposited in the
state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020. The
proceeds shall be transferred as follows:
(a) Four hundred eighty million forty-five thousand dollars to
remain in the state building construction account created by RCW
43.83.020;
(b) Twenty million four hundred sixteen thousand dollars to the
state taxable building construction account. All receipts from taxable
bond issues are to be deposited into the account. If the state finance
committee deems it necessary or advantageous to issue more than the
amount specified in this subsection (b) as taxable bonds in order to
comply with federal internal revenue service rules and regulations
pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds or in order to reduce
the total financing costs for bonds issued, the proceeds of such
additional taxable bonds shall be transferred to the state taxable
building construction account in lieu of any transfer otherwise
provided by this section. If the state finance committee determines
that a portion of the amount specified in this subsection (b) as
taxable bonds may be issued as nontaxable bonds in compliance with
federal internal revenue service rules and regulations pertaining to
the use of nontaxable bond proceeds, then such bond proceeds shall be
transferred to the state building construction account in lieu of the
transfer to the state taxable building construction account otherwise
provided by this subsection (b). The state treasurer shall submit
written notice to the director of financial management if it is
determined that any such additional transfer to the state taxable
building construction account is necessary or that a transfer from the
state taxable building construction account to the state building
construction account may be made. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation.
(2) These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes
specified in this section and for the payment of expenses incurred in
the issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this
section, and shall be administered by the office of financial
management subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 (1) The debt-limit general fund bond
retirement account shall be used for the payment of the principal of
and interest on the bonds authorized in section 202(1) of this act.
(2) The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of
each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount needed in the
ensuing twelve months to meet the bond retirement and interest
requirements on the bonds authorized in section 202(1) of this act.
(3) On each date on which any interest or principal and interest
payment is due on bonds issued for the purposes of section 202(1) of
this act, the state treasurer shall withdraw from any general state
revenues received in the state treasury and deposit in the debt-limit
general fund bond retirement account an amount equal to the amount
certified by the state finance committee to be due on the payment date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 (1) Bonds issued under sections 201
through 203 of this act shall state that they are a general obligation
of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and credit of
the state to the payment of the principal thereof and the interest
thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to pay the
principal and interest as the same shall become due.
(2) The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for
the owner and holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other
appropriate proceeding require the transfer and payment of funds as
directed in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 The legislature may provide additional
means for raising moneys for the payment of the principal of and
interest on the bonds authorized in section 201 of this act, and
sections 202 and 203 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an
exclusive method for the payment.

PART III
APPROPRIATIONS--GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Energy Efficiency Grants for Local Governments (91000241)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants
to local agencies for operational cost savings improvements to local
agency facilities and related projects that result in energy and
operational cost savings. Related projects are those projects that
must be completed in order for the energy efficiency improvements to be
effective. Grants may also be used for loan interest payments over the
term of a loan.
(2) The community services and housing division within the
department of commerce, in consultation with the department of
enterprise services, and the Washington State University energy program
shall establish a competitive process to solicit and evaluate
applications from local agencies. Final grant awards shall be
determined by the department of commerce.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Cost-effectiveness" means that the present value to the local
agency of the energy reasonably expected to be saved or produced by a
facility, activity, measure, or piece of equipment over its useful
life, including any compensation received from a utility or the
Bonneville power administration, is greater than the net present value
of the costs of implementing, maintaining, and operating such facility,
activity, measure, or piece of equipment over its useful life, when
discounted at the cost of public borrowing.
(b) "Energy equipment" means energy management systems and any
equipment, materials, or supplies that are expected, upon installation,
to reduce the energy use or energy cost of an existing building or
facility, and the services associated with the equipment, materials, or
supplies, including, but not limited to, design, engineering,
financing, installation, project management, guarantees, operations,
and maintenance. Reduction in energy use or energy cost may also
include reductions in the use or cost of water, wastewater, or solid
waste.
(c) "Energy cost savings" means savings realized in expenses for
energy use and expenses associated with water, wastewater, or solid
waste systems.
(d) "Energy savings performance contracting" means the process
authorized by chapter 39.35C RCW by which a company contracts with a
local agency to conduct energy audits and guarantee energy savings from
energy efficiency.
(e) "Operational cost savings" means savings realized from parts,
service fees, capital renewal costs, and other measurable annual
expenses to maintain and repair systems. This definition does not mean
labor savings related to existing facility staff.
(f) "Public facilities" means buildings, building components, and
major equipment or systems owned by local agencies.
(g) "Local agency" means any city and any town, county, special
district, municipal corporation, agency, port district or authority, or
political subdivision of any type, or any other entity or authority of
local government in corporate form or otherwise.
(4) Grants must be awarded in competitive rounds, based on demand
and capacity, with at least ten percent of each competitive grant round
awarded to small cities or towns with a population of fewer than five
thousand residents.
(5) In order to be eligible for energy efficiency grants under this
section, applicants must complete an investment grade audit, or an
equivalent, prior to submitting an application for funding.
(6) Within each competitive round, projects must be weighted and
prioritized based on the following criteria and in the following order:
(a) Leverage ratio: In each round, the higher the leverage ratio
of nonstate funding sources to state grant, the higher the project
ranking.
(b) Energy savings: In each round, the higher the energy savings,
the higher the project ranking. Applicants must submit documentation
that demonstrates energy and operational cost savings resulting from
the installation of the energy equipment and improvements. The energy
savings analysis shall be performed by a licensed engineer, and the
documentation must include but is not limited to the following:
(i) A description of the energy equipment and improvements; and
(ii) A description of the energy and operational cost savings.
(c) Expediency of expenditure: Project readiness to spend funds
must be prioritized so that the legislative intent to expend funds
quickly is met.
(7) Projects that do not use energy savings performance contracting
must: (a) Verify energy and operational cost savings for ten years or
until the energy and operational costs savings pay for the project,
whichever is shorter; (b) follow the department of enterprise services
energy savings performance contracting project guidelines; and (c)
employ a licensed engineer for the energy audit and construction. The
department of commerce may require third-party verification of savings
if a project is not implemented by an energy savings performance
contractor selected by the department of enterprise services through
the request of qualifications process. Third-party verification must
be conducted either by an energy savings performance contractor
selected by the department of enterprise services through a request for
qualifications, a licensed engineer that is a certified energy manager,
or a project resource conservation manager.
(8) To intensify competition, the department of commerce may only
award funds to the top eighty-five percent of projects applying in a
round until the department of commerce determines a final round is
appropriate. Projects that do not receive a grant award in one round
may reapply in subsequent rounds.
(9) Grant amounts awarded to each project must allow for the
maximum number of projects funded with the greatest energy and cost
benefit.
(10) The department of commerce may charge projects administrative
fees and may pay the department of enterprise services, and the
Washington State University energy program administration fees in an
amount determined through a memorandum of understanding.
(11) The department of commerce and the department of enterprise
services must submit a joint report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature and the office of financial management on the timing
and use of the grant funds, program administrative function, compliance
with apprenticeship utilization requirements in RCW 39.04.320,
compliance with prevailing wage requirements, and administration fees
by the end of each fiscal year, until the funds are fully expended and
all savings verification requirements are fulfilled.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2012 Local and Community Projects (91000417)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project
Authorized Amount

Clark County Family YMCA Building Remodel $1,500,000

Community Space for Completion of Capitol Hill Housing $1,500,000

Covington Aquatics Center Roof Replacement and Related Construction $400,000

Drug Abuse Prevention Center $61,000

El Centro de la Raza Life Safety Seismic Retrofit $408,000

Everett Medical Clinic $250,000

Life Support $2,000,000

Santos Place $525,000

Sprague Emergency Response Center $339,000

Star Center - SERA Campus $2,640,000

Total $9,623,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,623,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,623,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Connell Klindworth Water Line Distribution (91000318)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $540,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $540,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
CERB Administered Economic Development, Innovation & Export Grants
(92000096)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the following specified economic development projects. The board may
allocate up to twenty-five percent of the amounts for specified
projects to other specified projects or to additional grants awarded on
a competitive basis if, upon further review of the specified projects,
the cost of the projects is less than originally assumed or other
nonstate funds become available. If specified projects have not met
the requirements for executing a contract with the department by April
30, 2013, the board may allocate the amount specified to additional
grants awarded on a competitive basis provided that the grant awardee
is ready to proceed with the project.

Project
Authorized Amount

Chelatchee Prairie RR Project $500,000

Trans Alta Industrial Park Infrastructure $998,000

Lakehaven Utility Dist/Federal Way Sewer Project $1,000,000

Renton Aerospace Center $2,500,000

NE Redevelopment Area - Storm Water Facilities $3,500,000

WA Aerospace Training & Research Center Expansion $1,500,000

Infrastructure for NW Friberg Development in Camas $3,000,000

Port of Quincy Industrial Park No. 6 Infrastructure $1,100,000

Federal Way Sewer Line $1,500,000

Vancouver Waterfront Park Development $1,000,000

Total $16,598,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,598,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,598,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Main Street Improvement Grants (92000098)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the following main street improvement projects
administered by the public works board (board). The board may allocate
up to twenty-five percent of the amounts for specified projects in this
section to other specified projects or to grants awarded on a
competitive basis if, upon further review of the specified projects,
the cost of the projects is less than originally assumed or other
nonstate funds become available. If specified projects have not met
the requirements for executing a contract with the department by April
30, 2013, the board may allocate the amount specified to additional
grants awarded on a competitive basis provided that the grant awardee
is ready to proceed with the project.

Project
Authorized Amount

Bay Street Pedestrian Path $500,000

Downtown Longview Corridor Project $500,000

Edmonds Main Street Project $500,000

La Conner Boardwalk $750,000

Cushman Phase 4 $1,200,000

Kendall Yards Public Infrastructure $2,000,000

Pacific Ave Streetscape Improvements $3,000,000

University District Pedestrian/Bike $3,200,000

Bridge Design & Acquisition Cross Kirkland Corridor $2,000,000

Everett Parks Roofs $400,000

Total $14,050,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,050,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Port and Export Related Infrastructure (92000102)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the following list of projects. The department may
allocate up to twenty-five percent of the amounts for specified
projects to other specified projects or to additional grants awarded on
a competitive basis if, upon further review of the specified projects,
the cost of the projects is less than originally assumed or other
nonstate funds become available. If specified projects have not met
the requirements for executing a contract with the department by April
30, 2013, the department may allocate the amount specified to
additional grants awarded on a competitive basis provided that the
grant awardee is ready to proceed with the project.

Project
Authorized Amount

Benton - Railroad Bridge Replacement $2,200,000

Camas Washougal - Steigerwald Commerce Center Development $1,500,000

Columbia - Blue Mountain Station Site $750,000

Pasco - Heritage Industrial Rail Extension $1,800,000

Pasco - Rail Hub Development - Phase 5 $1,400,000

Skamania - Access Road $650,000

Skamania - Water and Wastewater System $350,000

Tacoma - Puyallup River Bridge Replacement $7,000,000

Vancouver - Centennial Industrial Park Infrastructure $5,750,000

Walla Walla - Infrastructure for Warehouse Project $2,750,000

Tacoma - South Lead Rail $5,000,000

Speed Improvements for Short Line Rail for Agricultural Exports $4,000,000

Total $33,150,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Energy Efficiency Grants For Higher Education (91000242)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants
to public higher education institutions for operational cost savings
improvements to higher education facilities and related projects that
result in energy and operational cost savings. Related projects are
those projects that must be completed in order for the energy
efficiency improvements to be effective. Grants may also be used for
loan interest payments over the term of a loan.
(2) The community services and housing division within the
department of commerce, in consultation with the department of
enterprise services, and the Washington State University energy program
shall establish a competitive process to solicit and evaluate
applications from public higher education institutions. Final grant
awards shall be determined by the department of commerce.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Cost-effectiveness" means that the present value to the higher
education institution of the energy reasonably expected to be saved or
produced by a facility, activity, measure, or piece of equipment over
its useful life, including any compensation received from a utility or
the Bonneville power administration, is greater than the net present
value of the costs of implementing, maintaining, and operating such
facility, activity, measure, or piece of equipment over its useful
life, when discounted at the cost of public borrowing.
(b) "Energy equipment" means energy management systems and any
equipment, materials, or supplies that are expected, upon installation,
to reduce the energy use or energy cost of an existing building or
facility, and the services associated with the equipment, materials, or
supplies, including, but not limited to, design, engineering,
financing, installation, project management, guarantees, operations,
and maintenance. Reduction in energy use or energy cost may also
include reductions in the use or cost of water, wastewater, or solid
waste.
(c) "Energy cost savings" means savings realized in expenses for
energy use and expenses associated with water, wastewater, or solid
waste systems.
(d) "Energy savings performance contracting" means the process
authorized by chapter 39.35C RCW by which a company contracts with a
public agency to conduct energy audits and guarantee energy savings
from energy efficiency.
(e) "Operational cost savings" means savings realized from parts,
service fees, capital renewal costs, and other measurable annual
expenses to maintain and repair systems. This definition does not mean
labor savings related to existing facility staff.
(f) "Public facilities" means buildings, building components, and
major equipment or systems owned by public higher education
institutions.
(4) Grants must be awarded in competitive rounds, based on demand
and capacity.
(5) In order to be eligible for energy efficiency grants under this
section, applicants must complete an investment grade audit, or an
equivalent, prior to submitting an application for funding.
(6) Within each competitive round, projects must be weighted and
prioritized based on the following criteria and in the following order:
(a) Leverage ratio: In each round, the higher the leverage ratio
of nonstate funding sources to state grant, the higher the project
ranking.
(b) Energy savings: In each round, the higher the energy savings,
the higher the project ranking. Applicants must submit documentation
that demonstrates energy and operational cost savings resulting from
the installation of the energy equipment and improvements. The energy
savings analysis shall be performed by a licensed engineer, and the
documentation must include, but is not limited to, the following:
(i) A description of the energy equipment and improvements; and
(ii) A description of the energy and operational cost savings.
(c) Expediency of expenditure: Project readiness to spend funds
must be prioritized so that the legislative intent to expend funds
quickly is met.
(7) Projects that do not use energy savings performance contracting
must: (a) Verify energy and operational cost savings for ten years or
until the energy and operational costs savings pay for the project,
whichever is shorter; (b) follow the department of enterprise services
energy savings performance contracting project guidelines; and (c)
employ a licensed engineer for the energy audit and construction. The
department of commerce may require third-party verification of savings
if a project is not implemented by an energy savings performance
contractor selected by the department of enterprise services through
the request of qualifications process. Third-party verification must
be conducted either by an energy savings performance contractor
selected by the department of enterprise services through a request for
qualifications, a licensed engineer that is a certified energy manager,
or a project resource conservation manager.
(8) To intensify competition, the department of commerce may only
award funds to the top eighty-five percent of projects applying in a
round until the department of commerce determines a final round is
appropriate. Projects that do not receive a grant award in one round
may reapply in subsequent rounds.
(9) Grant amounts awarded to each project must allow for the
maximum number of projects funded with the greatest energy and cost
benefit.
(10) The department of commerce may charge projects administrative
fees and may pay the department of enterprise services, and the
Washington State University energy program administration fees in an
amount determined through a memorandum of understanding.
(11) The department of commerce and the department of enterprise
services must submit a joint report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature and the office of financial management on the timing
and use of the grant funds, program administrative function, compliance
with apprenticeship utilization requirements in RCW 39.04.320,
compliance with prevailing wage requirements, and administration fees
by the end of each fiscal year, until the funds are fully expended and
all savings verification requirements are fulfilled.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Sec. 308 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1027 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building Communities Fund Grants (30000102)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been
either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient
to complete the projects or a distinct phase of the project that is
useable to the public for this purpose intended by the legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Authorized
Amount

Serenity House of Clallam County $52,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of King County $316,000

YMCA of Pierce and Kitsap
Counties $1,250,000

Jewish Family Service $2,313,000

Low Income Housing Institute $313,000

The Salvation Army $56,000

Share $581,000

Navos (($2,500,000))
$2,350,000

Kitsap Community Resources $600,000

Transitions $109,000

Boys & Girls Clubs of the Columbia
Basin $648,000

Village Green Foundation $1,029,000

Community Action Council of LMT $95,000

United Way of Kitsap County $605,000

ARC of Spokane $862,000

Dynamic Family Services $575,000

University District Food Bank $573,000

Kent Youth and Family Services $298,000

Safe Place $778,000

Total (($12,327,000))
$13,403,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,327,000))
$13,403,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,327,000))
$69,403,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Innovation Partnership Zones - Facilities and Infrastructure
(92000089)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the following list of projects. The department may
allocate up to twenty-five percent of the amounts for specified
projects to other specified projects or to additional grants awarded on
a competitive basis if, upon further review of the specified projects,
the cost of the projects is less than originally assumed or other
nonstate funds become available. If specified projects have not met
the requirements for executing a contract with the department by April
30, 2013, the department may allocate the amount specified to
additional grants awarded on a competitive basis provided that the
grant awardee is ready to proceed with the project.

Project Authorized Amount

Tri-Cities Research District - Wine Science Center $5,000,000

Alternative Energy - Training and Innovation - Walla Walla $3,670,000

Reuse of Industrial By-Products and Waste - Grays Harbor $750,000

Biomedical Technology Innovation - Bothell $500,000

Clean Water Innovations - University of Washington Tacoma
& Washington State University - Pierce $3,600,000

Total $13,520,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,520,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Families with Children (91000409)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
Families with Children" in LEAP capital document No. 2012-7A, developed
April 3, 2012. The department shall evaluate projects on the LEAP list
and allocate the funding based on the requirements of RCW 43.185.050
and 43.185.070. Upon review of a completed application, if the
department determines that a project is not eligible or is not ready to
proceed, the department may allocate funding to a project in another
category on the LEAP list, or to any type of alternate project. The
department shall, at its discretion, determine the actual amount of
funding to be allocated to each project, provided that the total
allocation does not exceed the appropriation provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Seniors and People with Physical Disabilities
(91000411)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
Seniors and People with Physical Disabilities" in LEAP capital document
No. 2012-7A, developed April 3, 2012. The department shall evaluate
projects on the LEAP list and allocate the funding based on the
requirements of RCW 43.185.050 and 43.185.070. Upon review of a
completed application, if the department determines that a project is
not eligible or is not ready to proceed, the department may allocate
funding to a project in another category on the LEAP list, or to any
type of alternate project. The department shall, at its discretion,
determine the actual amount of funding to be allocated to each project,
provided that the total allocation does not exceed the appropriation
provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,666,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,666,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for People at Risk of Homelessness (91000415)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
People at Risk of Homelessness" in LEAP capital document No. 2012-7A,
developed April 3, 2012. The department shall evaluate projects on the
LEAP list and allocate the funding based on the requirements of RCW
43.185.050 and 43.185.070. Upon review of a completed application, if
the department determines that a project is not eligible or is not
ready to proceed, the department may allocate funding to a project in
another category on the LEAP list, or to any type of alternate project.
The department shall, at its discretion, determine the actual amount of
funding to be allocated to each project, provided that the total
allocation does not exceed the appropriation provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Chehalis River Basin Flood Relief Projects (91000398)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Projects funded under this section must be reviewed and
approved by both the Chehalis River basin flood authority and the
Chehalis tribe prior to the allotment of funds by the office of
financial management.
(2) Up to $1,875,000 of the appropriation is for repairing and
modifying levees and dikes, including but not limited to, the airport
levee, levees protecting the Adna and Bucoda areas.
(3) Up to $2,075,000 of the appropriation is for modification of
the Sickman Ford bridge, and floodplain culverts, to open up the
channel, increase conveyance, and allow for flood relief.
(4) Up to $50,000 of the appropriation is for installation and
calibration of a rain gauge on the Chehalis reservation.
(5) Up to $500,000 of the appropriation is for construction of
evacuation routes and pads to avoid future livestock losses.
(6) Up to $500,000 of the appropriation is for improvements to
areas affected by the Satsop river.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 314 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Aerospace and Manufacturing Training Equipment Pool (91000003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,265,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,265,000

PART IV
APPROPRIATIONS--HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Rainier School: Cottages Remodel and Renovation (91000017)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Safe Reliable Drinking Water Grants (92000002)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the following list of projects. The department may
allocate up to twenty-five percent of the amounts for specified
projects to other specified projects or to additional grants awarded on
a competitive basis if, upon further review of the specified projects,
the cost of the projects is less than originally assumed or other
nonstate funds become available. If specified projects have not met
the requirements for executing a contract with the department by April
30, 2013, the department may allocate the amount specified to
additional grants awarded on a competitive basis provided that the
grant awardee is ready to proceed with the project.

Project
Authorized Amount

Cowlitz County Water System - Arsenic Treatment $200,000

Kapowsin Water District Cryptosporidium Treatment $50,000

Rhodena Beach Water District Arsenic Treatment $72,000

Greater Bar Water District Consolidations System $1,000,000

City of Ilwaco Water Treatment $940,000

Town of Malden Water Facility Repair $975,000

City of Colville System Repair/Upgrade $750,000

Skagit PUD Water System Consolidation $200,000

Pend Oreille PUD System Repair/Upgrade $900,000

Gig Harbor - Replace Asbesto Water Mains $2,000,000

Everett Water System Extension to Tulalip $1,000,000

Tacoma - Fennel Heights Consolidation $300,000

Kitsap PUD - Consolidate to Resolve Water Quality
Concerns $2,500,000

Mason County PUD No. 1 Canal Mutual System Upgrade $650,000

Agency Program Administration $101,000

Total $11,638,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,638,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,638,000

Sec. 403 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 2017 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Walla Walla Nursing Facility (20082008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,400,000))
$16,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,141,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,666,000))
$16,925,000

PART V
APPROPRIATIONS--NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Skagit Mitigation (91000181)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the department to develop mitigation options and
alternative water sources or tools to make water available for stream
flows and for rural domestic permit-exempt uses within the Carpenter-Fisher, East Nookachamps, and Upper Nookachamps Subbasins. Up to
$100,000 of the amount specified shall be used to develop a rural
domestic demonstration project to determine if on-site best management
practices, including, but not limited to, rainwater infiltration, water
conservation, and low impact development standards, can meet the
mitigation requirements of chapter 173-503 WAC and be reasonably and
feasibly integrated into rural domestic developments.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Water Management Projects (91000179)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for the Lake Roosevelt Incremental Storage Release - East Low
Canal Project.
(2) $2,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for the Keechelus to Kachess Pipeline I-90 Crossing Project in
Kittitas County.

Appropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Flood Levee Improvements (92000057)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the Mt. Vernon flood protection project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Ground Water Management Yakima Basin (92000061)

Appropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Comfort Stations (91000036)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,754,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,754,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Rocky Reach Trail (91000035)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Farms and Water Quality (91000004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (91000007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,277,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,277,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 509 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Dry Forest Restoration (91000039)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $375,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
Sherman Creek prescribed burning project.
(2) $421,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
Sinlahekin dry forest restoration project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $796,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $796,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 510 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Fishway Improvements/Diversions (91000033)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 511 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Hatchery Improvements (91000036)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,775,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 512 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Dam and Dike (91000042)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 513 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Access Sites (91000044)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,406,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 514 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Fish Passage Barriers (Culverts) (91000045)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,495,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 515 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works - Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (91000046)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $516,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $516,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 516 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Wildlife Area Improvements (91000047)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 517 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Acquire Dryden Gravel Pit from Washington Department of
Transportation (92000028)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,000

Sec. 518 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 3082 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Voights Creek Hatchery (20081003)

((The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for property acquisition, design, and permitting. If
the department does not acquire property, the amounts provided in this
section shall lapse.))

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $115,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$14,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,182,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,000,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,297,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (91000040)

The appropriation is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(l) $1,084,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely to replace fish passage barriers and bring roads up to salmon
recovery and clean water standards within natural area preserves and
natural resource conservation areas.
(2) $5,750,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely to replace fish passage barriers and bring roads up to salmon
recovery and clean water standards on state grant lands and state
forest lands.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,834,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,834,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 520 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Restoration Projects to Improve Natural Resources (91000054)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $435,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant to
a nonprofit organization for road repairs and restoration of
forestlands along the Clearwater River.
(2) $1,020,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant
for road repairs and forest treatments in the Ellsworth Creek
watershed.
(3) $1,030,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant
for dike removal and construction of a setback dike and flood
attenuation structure at Port Susan Bay.
(4) $75,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to the
department of fish and wildlife for forest restoration treatments in
the Oak Creek - Tieton landscape.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,560,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,560,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 521 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Hazard Reduction and Safety (91000066)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $4,320,000 of the appropriation in this section is for
forest treatments that benefit state trust lands in eastern Washington
by reducing insect, disease and wildfire hazards, of which not more
than $500,000 may be used for implementing treatments on federal lands
solely within areas identified by a forest health technical advisory
committee to warrant a forest health hazard warning or order authorized
under RCW 76.06.180;
(2) Up to $4,150,000 of the appropriation in this section is for
noxious weed abatement and precommercial thinning on state trust lands;
and
(3) Forest treatments to reduce insect, disease and wildfire
hazards on private or federal lands shall require a contract with the
department of natural resources to provide at least a one-to-one
nonstate or in-kind fund match, and to provide a ten-year landowner
maintenance agreement.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,470,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,470,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 522 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Puget SoundCorps (91000046)

The appropriation is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for
water quality and habitat protection and restoration projects that
benefit Puget Sound recovery and that are primarily on public lands.
The department of natural resources must contract with the department
of ecology for Puget SoundCorps crews of youth and military veterans to
implement these projects pursuant to chapter 20, Laws of 2011.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 523 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Creosote Piling Removal (92000014)

The appropriation is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely to
remove creosote pilings from Puget Sound.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 524 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Derelict Vessel Removal and Disposal (91000049)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 525 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Shoreline Restoration (92000011)

The appropriation is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely to
fund aquatic restoration projects in Puget Sound through partnerships
with other agencies and organizations. Within the amount provided,
$1,966,000 is provided solely for the Admiralty Inlet feeder bank
preservation project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,966,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,966,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 526 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Urban Forest Restoration (Puget Sound Basin)(91000051)

The appropriation is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely to
assist municipalities and jurisdictions across the state to better
manage existing urban forests and plan for improvements to the urban
forest infrastructure.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 527 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Large Debris Removal (91000052)

The appropriation is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely to
assist public and private shoreline property owners with the removal of
large, artificial marine debris from Puget Sound shorelines.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 528 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Secret Harbor Estuary Restoration - Cypress Island (91000053)

The appropriation is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely to
restore the Secret Harbor estuary, enhance public access, and expand
the capacity of the Cypress Island natural resources conservation area
for tourism and low-impact public use.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $535,000

PART VI
APPROPRIATIONS--EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Energy Efficiency Grants for K-12 Schools (91000017)

The appropriation is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The superintendent of public instruction may charge
program administrative fees.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Distressed Schools (92000009)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $9,400,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for updating existing classrooms at John Marshall, Boren, and
Van Asselt schools in the Seattle school district.
(2) $1,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for emergency repairs at Orcas Island schools.
(3) $17,000,000 is provided solely for additional state funding for
the Grand Coulee Dam school project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Grant County Branch Campus of Wenatchee Valley Skills Center
(30000091)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,408,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,488,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,896,000

Sec. 604 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5013 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
SEA-Tech Branch Campus of Tri-Tech Skills Center (30000078)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,169,000))
$11,519,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,739,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,908,000))
$11,519,000

Sec. 605 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5003 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Pierce County Skills Center (20084856)

Reappropriation:
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,087,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,100,000))
$11,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,949,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,772,000))
$11,427,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,908,000))
$35,363,000

Sec. 606 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5012 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Clark County Skills Center (30000093)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,000))
$1,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,750,000))
$12,300,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,850,000))
$13,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 607 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Wenatchee Valley Skills Center (92000004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Spokane Area Professional-Technical Skills Center (92000005)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
WA-NIC Skills Center - Snoqualmie Valley School District/Bellevue
Community College (92000006)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,715,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,715,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Puget Sound Skills Center (92000007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center Sunnyside Satellite
(92000013)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,225,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 612 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Campus Preservation (30000018)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,557,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,107,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 613 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR THE
CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS
Minor Public Works (30000013)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $536,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,811,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,347,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 614 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Burke Museum Renovation (20082850)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 615 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Tacoma Campus Development and Soil
Remediation (92000002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,300,000

Sec. 616 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5017 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Bothell (20082006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,887,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,216,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,435,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,585,000))
$25,037,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 617 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Spokane - Riverpoint Biomedical and
Health Sciences (20162953)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 618 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
High-Technology Education Equipment (92000007)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,821,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,821,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 619 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Equipment Pool (92000011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is for major equipment
in high demand fields from among the list as specified in LEAP capital
document No. 2012-34, developed March 7, 2012. The state board for
community and technical colleges may allocate amounts among the
equipment items specified to cover differences in actual bid prices,
but may not allocate amounts to equipment items not on the list.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 620 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Olympic College: College Instruction Center (30000122)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,624,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,079,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,703,000

Sec. 621 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5075 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College: Technology Building Renewal
(30000129)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,478,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,335,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $606,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,950,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,034,000))
$25,419,000

Sec. 622 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5062 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Grants (30000117)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
27.34.330.
(2) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Authorized Amount

Schooner Martha Foundation $118,000

Cascade Land Conservancy $155,000

Port of Chinook $45,000

City of Bellingham $100,000

La Conner Quilt and Textile
Museum $25,000

City of Vancouver $610,000

Blue Mountain Heritage
Society $30,000

Metro Parks Tacoma $60,000

Si View Metro Park District $25,000

City of Port Townsend $375,000

San Juan County Parks
Department $18,000

Seattle Theatre Group $531,000

Jefferson County $300,000

Sound Experience $288,000

Museum of History and
Industry $1,000,000

Seattle Department of
Transportation $700,000

Historic Seattle Preservation
and Development Authority $470,000

Town of Wilkeson $75,000

Maryhill Museum of Fine Art $57,000

Clymer Museum of Art $9,000

Phinney Neighborhood
Association $995,000

Foss Waterway Seaport $750,000

Polson Museum $143,000

Broadway Center for the
Performing Arts $203,000

Total (($1,168,000))
$7,082,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,168,000))
$7,082,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,168,000))
$7,082,000

PART VII
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 (1) Allotments for appropriations in this
act shall be provided in accordance with expedited capital project
review requirements adopted by the office of financial management.
(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget
notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 (1) To ensure minor works appropriations
are carried out in accordance with legislative intent, funds
appropriated in this act shall not be allotted until project lists are
on file at the office of financial management, the house of
representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means
committee. All projects must meet the criteria included in subsection
(2)(a) of this section. Revisions to the lists must be filed with the
office of financial management, the house of representatives capital
budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee and include
an explanation of variances from the prior lists before funds may be
expended on the revisions.
(2)(a) Minor works projects are single line appropriations that
include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued
between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exceptions of: (i)
Higher education minor works projects that may be valued up to
$2,000,000; and (ii) department of fish and wildlife minor works
projects funded in this act that may be valued up to $3,200,000. These
projects can generally be completed within two years of the
appropriation with the funding provided. Except for department of fish
and wildlife minor works projects funded in this act, agencies are
prohibited from including projects on their minor works lists that are
a phase of a larger project, and that if combined over a continuous
period of time, would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher
education minor works projects. Improvements for accessibility in
compliance with the Americans with disabilities act may be included in
any of the above minor works categories.
(b) Minor works appropriations shall not be used for, among other
things: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or
designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor
works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works
list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment
not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office
of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a
specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; or
to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless
expressly authorized elsewhere in this act. The office of financial
management may make an exception to the limitations described in this
subsection (2)(b) for exigent circumstances after notifying the
legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the
legislature regarding the proposed exception.
(c) Minor works preservation projects may include program
improvements of no more than twenty-five percent of the individual
minor works preservation project cost.
(3) It is generally not the intent of the legislature to make
future appropriations for capital expenditures or for maintenance and
operating expenses for an acquisition project or a significant
expansion project that is initiated through the minor works process and
therefore does not receive a policy and fiscal analysis by the
legislature. Minor works projects are intended to be one-time
expenditures that do not require future state resources to complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 (1) The office of financial management may
authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a capital
project that is in excess of the amount required for the completion of
such project to another capital project for which the appropriation is
insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand the capacity of
any facility beyond that intended in making the appropriation. Such
transfers may be effected only between capital appropriations to a
specific department, commission, agency, or institution of higher
education and only between capital projects that are funded from the
same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects to local
government agencies except where the grants are provided within a
single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically
authorized by the implementing statutes that govern the grants.
(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is
in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only
if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is
substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have
been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that
the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be
completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in
this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each
project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's
budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history
that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a
different way.
(4) The office of financial management shall report any transfer
effected under this section to the house of representatives capital
budget committee, the senate ways and means committee, and the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, at least
thirty days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of
financial management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers
within thirty days from the date of transfer. The governor's capital
budget request following any transfer shall reflect that transfer in
the affected agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 (1) It is expected that projects be ready
to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the
project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this
act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two
biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large
infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often
take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does
not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for
smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.
(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and
appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate
infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation
and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural
environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition
and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional
employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.
(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate
expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and
shall use contracted design and construction services wherever
necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 FOR THE ARTS COMMISSION--ART WORK
ALLOWANCE POOLING
(1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction of school plant facilities may be expended for
the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The Washington state arts commission
may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order to fund
larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and representatives of school
district boards.
(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding
two hundred thousand dollars by colleges or universities may be
expended for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027. The Washington state arts
commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order
to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with
the board of regents or trustees.
(3) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the
Washington state arts commission during the 2011-2013 biennium for the
purposes of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended
solely for direct acquisition of works of art. The commission may use
up to $100,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing pieces
in the state art collection pursuant to chapter 36, Laws of 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 CODIFICATION. Sections 201 through 205 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this
act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid,
the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 EFFECTIVE DATE. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

(End of Bill)

INDEX PAGE #

COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR THE CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
--- END ---