BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Transportation planning is a
responsibility that crosses jurisdictions, including the state,
regional transportation planning organizations, metropolitan planning
organizations, tribal nations, and local government. All levels of
government, including the federal government, fund transportation
planning and research. The legislature intends to allow more
flexibility to organize the transportation planning process across
modes and jurisdictions by providing policy direction on the desired
outcome and reducing statutory procedural requirements. It is not the
legislature's intent to discontinue planning or discount the importance
of particular plans, but to eliminate statutory requirements that may
impede the efficacy of statewide transportation planning.
(2) Transportation planning across jurisdictions should be:
(a) Consistent with the transportation system policy goals in RCW
47.04.280 (as recodified by this act);
(b) Aligned and integrated with common transportation system
performance measures and attainment reporting;
(c) Technically competent;
(d) Based on consistent and uniform transportation system
performance and user data;
(e) The result of extensive public outreach and input;
(f) Conducted in a cost-efficient manner; and
(g) Compliant with federal requirements.
(3) The legislature intends that transportation planning will:
(a) Identify mode-neutral, long-range performance alternatives for
the state transportation system; and
(b) Be linked to shorter-term capital programming, policy, and
financial decisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.06 RCW
to read as follows:
The long-range statewide transportation plan required under 23
U.S.C. Sec. 135 must be developed by an ad hoc planning committee
convened July 1, 2013. Thereafter, the planning committee must be
convened pursuant to legislative direction at least every seven years.
(1) The planning committee must be comprised of:
(a) The chair of the Washington transportation commission or the
chair's designee, who shall serve as chair of the committee;
(b) The secretary of transportation or the secretary's designee;
and
(c) A representative of transportation planning organizations.
(2) The long-range statewide transportation plan must, at a
minimum:
(a) Establish a vision for the development of the statewide
transportation system;
(b) Incorporate the transportation system policy goals in RCW
47.04.280 (as recodified by this act) and be consistent with the
state's growth management goals;
(c) Address statewide transportation issues, without regard to
jurisdiction, and be based on ongoing mode, metropolitan, regional, and
tribal transportation planning;
(d) Be outcome and performance based; consider mode-neutral
alternatives; integrate state, regional, metropolitan, tribal, and
local transportation planning; and establish system performance
measures that will form the basis for the attainment report required
under RCW 47.04.280(4) (as recodified by this act);
(e) Involve representatives of significant transportation interests
and the general public from across the state. As part of this process,
the planning committee shall utilize data developed by the
transportation commission's statewide transportation survey conducted
under RCW 47.01.075 (as recodified by this act);
(f) Identify significant statewide transportation policy issues;
(g) Recommend statewide transportation policies and strategies to
the legislature; and
(h) Provide clear financial assumptions, identify the need for new
resources, and provide a financial plan that can be linked with
biennial budget decisions.
(3) The planning committee shall negotiate and agree upon a
proposed federally compliant long-range statewide transportation plan.
Once adopted, the planning committee shall forward the plan to the
legislature and governor. The governor shall submit it to the federal
department of transportation as Washington's federally compliant long-range statewide transportation plan.
(4) When there are inconsistencies between the long-range statewide
transportation plan and state, regional, metropolitan, tribal, or local
transportation plans, the department of transportation shall negotiate
with the respective entity proposing the plans, consistent with federal
law and regulation.
(5) Other state mode, regional, metropolitan, and tribal
transportation plans may be updated using the same public outreach
process and information that is developed for the update of the long-range statewide transportation plan.
(6) This section does not create a private right of action.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.01.071 and 2007 c 516 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The transportation commission ((shall have)) has the following
functions, powers, and duties:
(1) To propose transportation policies ((to be adopted)) for
adoption by the governor and the legislature ((designed to assure the
development and maintenance of a comprehensive and balanced statewide
transportation system which will meet the needs of the people of this
state for safe and efficient transportation services. Wherever
appropriate, the policies shall provide for the use of integrated,
intermodal transportation systems. The policies must be aligned with
the goals established in RCW 47.04.280. To this end the commission
shall:
(a) Develop transportation policies which are based on the
policies, goals, and objectives expressed and inherent in existing
state laws;
(b) Inventory the adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the
local and area-wide governmental bodies of the state and define the
role of the state, regional, and local governments in determining
transportation policies, in transportation planning, and in
implementing the state transportation plan;
(c) Establish a procedure for review and revision of the state
transportation policy and for submission of proposed changes to the
governor and the legislature; and
(d) Integrate the statewide transportation plan with the needs of
the elderly and persons with disabilities, and coordinate federal and
state programs directed at assisting local governments to answer such
needs;
(2) To provide for the effective coordination of state
transportation planning with national transportation policy, state and
local land use policies, and local and regional transportation plans
and programs));
(((3))) (2) In conjunction with ((the provisions under)) RCW
47.01.075 (as recodified by this act), to provide for public
involvement in transportation designed to elicit the public's views
((both with respect to adequate transportation services and appropriate
means of minimizing adverse social, economic, environmental, and energy
impact of transportation programs;
(4) By December 2010, to prepare a comprehensive and balanced
statewide transportation plan consistent with the state's growth
management goals and based on the transportation policy goals provided
under RCW 47.04.280 and applicable state and federal laws. The plan
must reflect the priorities of government developed by the office of
financial management and address regional needs, including multimodal
transportation planning. The plan must, at a minimum: (a) Establish
a vision for the development of the statewide transportation system;
(b) identify significant statewide transportation policy issues; and
(c) recommend statewide transportation policies and strategies to the
legislature to fulfill the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section. The plan must be the product of an ongoing process that
involves representatives of significant transportation interests and
the general public from across the state. Every four years, the plan
shall be reviewed and revised, and submitted to the governor and the
house of representatives and senate standing committees on
transportation.
The plan shall take into account federal law and regulations
relating to the planning, construction, and operation of transportation
facilities;
(5) By December 2007, the office of financial management shall
submit a baseline report on the progress toward attaining the policy
goals under RCW 47.04.280 in the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium. By October
1, 2008, beginning with the development of the 2009-2011 biennial
transportation budget, and by October 1st biennially thereafter, the
office of financial management shall submit to the legislature and the
governor a report on the progress toward the attainment by state
transportation agencies of the state transportation policy goals and
objectives prescribed by statute, appropriation, and governor
directive. The report must, at a minimum, include the degree to which
state transportation programs have progressed toward the attainment of
the policy goals established under RCW 47.04.280, as measured by the
objectives and performance measures established by the office of
financial management under RCW 47.04.280)) on transportation policy;
(((6))) (3) To develop a long-range statewide transportation plan
in conjunction with the department of transportation, regional
transportation planning organizations, and metropolitan planning
organizations under section 2 of this act;
(4) To propose to the governor and the legislature prior to the
convening of each regular session held in an odd-numbered year a
recommended budget for the operations of the commission as required by
RCW 47.01.061 (as recodified by this act);
(((7))) (5) To adopt such rules as may be necessary to carry out
reasonably and properly those functions expressly vested in the
commission by statute;
(((8))) (6) To contract with the office of financial management or
other appropriate state agencies for administrative support, accounting
services, computer services, and other support services necessary to
carry out its other statutory duties;
(((9))) (7) To conduct transportation-related studies and policy
analysis to the extent directed by the legislature or governor in the
biennial transportation budget act, or as otherwise provided in law,
and subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose; and
(((10))) (8) To exercise such other specific powers and duties as
may be vested in the transportation commission by this or any other
provision of law.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.01.075 and 2007 c 516 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The transportation commission shall provide a public forum for
the development of transportation policy in Washington state to include
coordination with regional transportation planning organizations,
transportation stakeholders, counties, cities, and citizens.
(a) At least every ((five)) seven years, the commission shall
convene regional forums to gather citizen input on transportation
issues. The commission, department, metropolitan planning
organizations, and regional transportation planning organizations shall
consider the input gathered at the forums ((as it establishes)) in the
development of the long-range statewide transportation plan under ((RCW
47.01.071(4))) section 2 of this act.
(b) Beginning in 2013, the commission shall, with the involvement
of the department, conduct a survey to gather data on users of the
statewide transportation system, including the state ferry system, to
help inform level of service, operational, pricing, planning, and
investment decisions. The survey must be updated at least every two
years and be maintained to support the development and implementation
of adaptive management of the statewide transportation system.
(2) In fulfilling its responsibilities under this section, the
commission may create ad hoc committees or other such committees of
limited duration as necessary.
(3) In order to promote a better transportation system, the
commission may offer policy guidance and make recommendations to the
governor and the legislature in key issue areas, including but not
limited to:
(a) Transportation finance;
(b) Preserving, maintaining, and operating the statewide
transportation system;
(c) Transportation infrastructure needs;
(d) Promoting best practices for adoption and use by
transportation-related agencies and programs;
(e) Transportation efficiencies that will improve service delivery
and/or coordination;
(f) Improved planning and coordination among transportation
agencies and providers; and
(g) Use of intelligent transportation systems and other technology-based solutions.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.04.280 and 2010 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to establish policy goals
for the planning, operation, performance of, and investment in, the
state's transportation system. The policy goals established under this
section are deemed consistent with the benchmark categories adopted by
the state's blue ribbon commission on transportation on November 30,
2000. Public investments in transportation should support achievement
of these policy goals:
(a) Economic vitality: To promote and develop transportation
systems that stimulate, support, and enhance the movement of people and
goods to ensure a prosperous economy;
(b) Preservation: To maintain, preserve, and extend the life and
utility of prior investments in transportation systems and services;
(c) Safety: To provide for and improve the safety and security of
transportation customers and the transportation system;
(d) Mobility: To improve the predictable movement of goods and
people throughout Washington state;
(e) Environment: To enhance Washington's quality of life through
transportation investments that promote energy conservation, enhance
healthy communities, and protect the environment; and
(f) Stewardship: To continuously improve the quality,
effectiveness, and efficiency of the transportation system.
(2) The powers, duties, and functions of state transportation
agencies must be performed in a manner consistent with the policy goals
set forth in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) These policy goals are intended to be the basis for
establishing detailed and measurable objectives and related performance
measures.
(4) ((It is the intent of the legislature that the office of
financial management establish objectives and performance measures for
the department of transportation and other state agencies with
transportation-related responsibilities to ensure transportation system
performance at local, regional, and state government levels progresses
toward the attainment of the policy goals set forth in subsection (1)
of this section. The office of financial management shall submit
initial objectives and performance measures to the legislature for its
review and shall provide copies of the same to the commission during
the 2008 legislative session.)) The office of financial management
shall submit ((objectives and performance measures)) a report on the
attainment of the policy goals established in subsection (1) of this
section and the objectives established in the long-range statewide
transportation plan required under section 2 of this act, including
performance measures on the statewide transportation system, to the
legislature for its review and shall provide copies of the ((same))
report to the commission, department, regional transportation planning
organizations, and metropolitan planning organizations during each
regular session of the legislature during an even-numbered year
thereafter. Prior to the convening of each regular session held in an
odd-numbered year, the governor's proposed biennial transportation
budget must include a statement of how the proposed biennial
transportation budget relates to the long-range statewide
transportation plan's performance goals and financial plan.
(5) This section does not create a private right of action.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.06.130 and 2002 c 5 s 404 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall develop a long-range statewide
transportation plan in conjunction with the transportation commission,
regional transportation planning organizations, and metropolitan
planning organizations under section 2 of this act.
(2) The department may carry out special transportation planning
studies to resolve specific issues with the development of the state
transportation system or other statewide transportation issues.
(((2))) (3) The department shall conduct multimodal corridor
analyses on major congested corridors where needed improvements are
likely to cost in excess of one hundred million dollars. Analysis will
include the cost-effectiveness of all feasible strategies in addressing
congestion or improving mobility within the corridor, and must
recommend the most effective strategy or mix of strategies to address
identified deficiencies. A long-term view of corridors must be
employed to determine whether an existing corridor should be expanded,
a city or county road should become a state route, and whether a new
corridor is needed to alleviate congestion and enhance mobility based
on travel demand. To the extent practicable, full costs of all
strategies must be reflected in the analysis. At a minimum, this
analysis must include:
(a) The current and projected future demand for total person trips
on that corridor;
(b) The impact of making no improvements to that corridor;
(c) The daily cost per added person served for each mode or
improvement proposed to meet demand;
(d) The cost per hour of travel time saved per day for each mode or
improvement proposed to meet demand; and
(e) How much of the current and anticipated future demand will be
met and left unmet for each mode or improvement proposed to meet
demand.
The end result of this analysis will be to provide a cost-benefit
analysis by which policymakers can determine the most cost-effective
improvement or mode, or mix of improvements and modes, for increasing
mobility and reducing congestion.
(4) The department shall:
(a) Present its proposed transportation planning and research
budget to the legislature biennially. The budget must include: A list
of planning activities and plans to be completed in the biennium; state
and federal funds anticipated for each activity and plan; and a
comparison of the minimum state funds required to match federal
planning expenditures and proposed state funds; and
(b) Include in its ongoing performance reporting the status of the
plans that are authorized by the legislature in the biennial
transportation budget, including whether the plans are being developed
on schedule and within the allocated budget.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.06.140 and 2009 c 514 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature declares the following transportation
facilities and services to be of statewide significance: Highways of
statewide significance as designated by the legislature under chapter
47.05 RCW, the interstate highway system, interregional state principal
arterials including ferry connections that serve statewide travel,
intercity passenger rail services, intercity high-speed ground
transportation, major passenger intermodal terminals excluding all
airport facilities and services, the freight railroad system, the
Columbia/Snake navigable river system, marine port facilities and
services that are related solely to marine activities affecting
international and interstate trade, key freight transportation
corridors serving these marine port facilities, and high capacity
transportation systems serving regions as defined in RCW 81.104.015.
((The department, in cooperation with regional transportation planning
organizations, counties, cities, transit agencies, public ports,
private railroad operators, and private transportation providers, as
appropriate, shall plan for improvements to transportation facilities
and services of statewide significance in the statewide multimodal
transportation plan.)) Improvements to facilities and services of
statewide significance ((identified in the statewide multimodal
transportation plan)), or to highways of statewide significance
designated by the legislature under chapter 47.05 RCW, are essential
state public facilities under RCW 36.70A.200.
(2) The department of transportation, in consultation with local
governments, shall set level of service standards for state highways
and state ferry routes of statewide significance. Although the
department shall consult with local governments when setting level of
service standards, the department retains authority to make final
decisions regarding level of service standards for state highways and
state ferry routes of statewide significance. In establishing level of
service standards for state highways and state ferry routes of
statewide significance, the department shall consider the necessary
balance between providing for the free interjurisdictional movement of
people and goods and the needs of local communities using these
facilities. When setting the level of service standards under this
section for state ferry routes, the department may allow for a standard
that is adjustable for seasonality.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.01.011 and 2007 c 516 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The legislature hereby recognizes the following imperative needs
within the state: To create a statewide transportation development
plan which identifies present status and sets goals for the future; to
coordinate transportation modes; to promote and protect land use
programs required in local, state, and federal law; to coordinate
transportation with the economic development of the state; to supply a
broad framework in which regional, metropolitan, and local
transportation needs can be related; to facilitate the supply of
federal and state aid to those areas which will most benefit the state
as a whole; to provide for public involvement in the transportation
planning and development process; to administer programs within the
jurisdiction of this title relating to the safety of the state's
transportation systems; and to coordinate and implement national
transportation policy with the state transportation planning program.))
The legislature finds and declares that placing all elements of
transportation in a single department is fully consistent with and
shall in no way impair the use of moneys in the motor vehicle fund
exclusively for highway purposes.
Through this chapter, a unified department of transportation is
created. To the jurisdiction of this department will be transferred
the present powers, duties, and functions of the department of
highways, the highway commission, the toll bridge authority, the
aeronautics commission, and the canal commission, and the
transportation related powers, duties, and functions of the planning
and community affairs agency. The powers, duties, and functions of the
department of transportation must be performed in a manner consistent
with the policy goals set forth in RCW 47.04.280 (as recodified by this
act).

Sec. 9 RCW 47.01.300 and 1994 c 258 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall, in cooperation with environmental regulatory
authorities:
(1) ((Identify and document environmental resources in the
development of the statewide multimodal plan under RCW 47.06.040;
(2) Allow for public comment regarding changes to the criteria used
for prioritizing projects under chapter 47.05 RCW before final adoption
of the changes by the commission;
(3))) Use an environmental review as part of the project prospectus
identifying potential environmental impacts, mitigation, and costs
during the early project identification and selection phase, submit the
prospectus to the relevant environmental regulatory authorities, and
maintain a record of comments and proposed revisions received from the
authorities;
(((4))) (2) Actively work with the relevant environmental
regulatory authorities during the design alternative analysis process
and seek written concurrence from the authorities that they agree with
the preferred design alternative selected;
(((5))) (3) Develop a uniform methodology, in consultation with
relevant environmental regulatory authorities, for submitting plans and
specifications detailing project elements that impact environmental
resources, and proposed mitigation measures, to the relevant
environmental regulatory authorities during the preliminary
specifications and engineering phase of project development;
(((6))) (4) Screen construction projects to determine which
projects will require complex or multiple permits. The permitting
authorities shall develop methods for initiating review of the permit
applications for the projects before the final design of the projects;
(((7))) (5) Conduct special prebid meetings for those projects that
are environmentally complex; and
(((8))) (6) Review environmental considerations related to
particular projects during the preconstruction meeting held with the
contractor who is awarded the bid.

Sec. 10 RCW 47.01.330 and 2005 c 318 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary shall establish an office of transit mobility.
The purpose of the office is to facilitate the integration of
decentralized public transportation services with the state
transportation system. The goals of the office of transit mobility
are: (a) To facilitate connection and coordination of transit services
and planning; and (b) maximizing opportunities to use public
transportation to improve the efficiency of transportation corridors.
(2) The duties of the office include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(a) ((Developing a statewide strategic plan that creates common
goals for transit agencies and reduces competing plans for cross-jurisdictional service;
(b))) Developing a park and ride lot program;
(((c))) (b) Encouraging long-range transit planning;
(((d))) (c) Providing public transportation expertise to improve
linkages between regional transportation planning organizations and
transit agencies;
(((e))) (d) Strengthening policies for inclusion of transit and
transportation demand management strategies in route development,
corridor plan standards, and budget proposals;
(((f))) (e) Recommending best practices to integrate transit and
demand management strategies with regional and local land use plans in
order to reduce traffic and improve mobility and access;
(((g) Producing recommendations for the public transportation
section of the Washington transportation plan;)) and
(((h))) (f) Participating in all aspects of corridor planning,
including freight planning, ferry system planning, and passenger rail
planning.
(3) In forming the office, the secretary shall use existing
resources to the greatest extent possible.
(4) The office of transit mobility shall establish measurable
performance objectives for evaluating the success of its initiatives
and progress toward accomplishing the overall goals of the office.
(5) The office of transit mobility must report quarterly to the
secretary, and annually to the transportation committees of the
legislature, on the progress of the office in meeting the goals and
duties provided in this section.

Sec. 11 RCW 47.05.010 and 2002 c 5 s 401 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that solutions to state highway deficiencies
have become increasingly complex and diverse and that anticipated
transportation revenues will fall substantially short of the amount
required to satisfy all transportation needs. Difficult investment
trade-offs will be required.
It is the intent of the legislature that investment of state
transportation funds to address deficiencies on the state highway
system be based on a policy of priority programming having as its basis
the rational selection of projects and services according to factual
need and an evaluation of life cycle costs and benefits that are
systematically scheduled to carry out defined objectives within
available revenue. The state must develop analytic tools to use a
common methodology to measure benefits and costs for all modes.
The priority programming system must ensure preservation of the
existing state highway system, relieve congestion, provide mobility for
people and goods, support the state's economy, and promote
environmental protection and energy conservation.
The priority programming system must ((implement the state-owned
highway component of the statewide transportation plan,)) be consistent
with the long-range statewide transportation plan required under
section 2 of this act and local, metropolitan, and regional
transportation plans, by targeting state transportation investment to
appropriate multimodal solutions that address identified state highway
system deficiencies.
The priority programming system for improvements must incorporate
a broad range of solutions ((that are identified in the statewide
transportation plan as)) appropriate to address state highway system
deficiencies, including but not limited to highway expansion,
efficiency improvements, nonmotorized transportation facilities, high
occupancy vehicle facilities, transit facilities and services, rail
facilities and services, and transportation demand management programs.

Sec. 12 RCW 47.05.030 and 2007 c 516 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall propose a
comprehensive ten-year investment program for the preservation and
improvement programs defined in this section, consistent with the
policy goals described under RCW 47.04.280 (as recodified by this act).
((The proposed ten-year investment program must be forwarded as a
recommendation by the office of financial management to the
legislature, and must be based upon the needs identified in the
statewide transportation plan established under RCW 47.01.071(4).))
(2) The preservation program consists of those investments
necessary to preserve the existing state highway system and to restore
existing safety features, giving consideration to lowest life cycle
costing.
(3) The improvement program consists of investments needed to
address identified deficiencies on the state highway system to meet the
policy goals established in RCW 47.04.280 (as recodified by this act).

Sec. 13 RCW 47.80.023 and 2009 c 515 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each regional transportation planning organization shall have the
following duties:
(1) Prepare and periodically update a transportation strategy for
the region. The strategy shall address alternative transportation
modes and transportation demand management measures in regional
corridors and shall recommend preferred transportation policies to
implement adopted growth strategies. The strategy shall serve as a
guide in preparation of the regional transportation plan.
(2) Prepare a regional transportation plan as set forth in RCW
47.80.030 that is consistent with countywide planning policies if such
have been adopted pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, with county, city,
and town comprehensive plans, and state transportation plans.
(3) Certify by December 31, 1996, that the transportation elements
of comprehensive plans adopted by counties, cities, and towns within
the region reflect the guidelines and principles developed pursuant to
RCW 47.80.026, are consistent with the adopted regional transportation
plan, and, where appropriate, conform with the requirements of RCW
36.70A.070.
(4) Where appropriate, certify that countywide planning policies
adopted under RCW 36.70A.210 and the adopted regional transportation
plan are consistent.
(5) Develop, in cooperation with the department of transportation,
operators of public transportation services and local governments
within the region, a six-year regional transportation improvement
program which proposes regionally significant transportation projects
and programs and transportation demand management measures. The
regional transportation improvement program shall be based on the
programs, projects, and transportation demand management measures of
regional significance as identified by transit agencies, cities, and
counties pursuant to RCW 35.58.2795, 35.77.010, and 36.81.121,
respectively, and any recommended programs or projects identified by
the agency council on coordinated transportation, as provided in
chapter 47.06B RCW, that advance special needs coordinated
transportation as defined in RCW 47.06B.012. The program shall include
a priority list of projects and programs, project segments and
programs, transportation demand management measures, and a specific
financial plan that demonstrates how the transportation improvement
program can be funded. The program shall be updated at least every two
years for the ensuing six-year period.
(6) Include specific opportunities and projects to advance special
needs coordinated transportation, as defined in RCW 47.06B.012, in the
coordinated transit-human services transportation plan, after providing
opportunity for public comment.
(7) Designate a lead planning agency to coordinate preparation of
the regional transportation plan and carry out the other
responsibilities of the organization. The lead planning agency may be
a regional organization, a component county, city, or town agency, or
the appropriate Washington state department of transportation district
office.
(8) Review level of service methodologies used by cities and
counties planning under chapter 36.70A RCW to promote a consistent
regional evaluation of transportation facilities and corridors.
(9) Work with cities, counties, transit agencies, the department of
transportation, and others to develop level of service standards or
alternative transportation performance measures.
(10) Work with the transportation commission, department, and other
regional transportation planning organizations and metropolitan
planning organizations under section 2 of this act on the development
of the long-range statewide transportation plan.
(11) Submit biennial reports to the office of financial management
in support of the attainment report required under RCW 47.04.280(4) (as
recodified by this act).
(12) Submit to the agency council on coordinated transportation, as
provided in chapter 47.06B RCW, beginning on July 1, 2007, and every
four years thereafter, an updated plan that includes the elements
identified by the council. Each regional transportation planning
organization must submit to the council every two years a prioritized
regional human service and transportation project list.

Sec. 14 RCW 47.80.030 and 2005 c 328 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each regional transportation planning organization shall
develop in cooperation with the department of transportation, providers
of public transportation and high capacity transportation, ports, and
local governments within the region, adopt, and periodically update a
regional transportation plan that:
(a) ((Is based on a least cost planning methodology that identifies
the most cost-effective facilities, services, and programs;
(b) Identifies existing or planned transportation facilities,
services, and programs, including but not limited to major roadways
including state highways and regional arterials, transit and
nonmotorized services and facilities, multimodal and intermodal
facilities, marine ports and airports, railroads, and noncapital
programs including transportation demand management that should
function as an integrated regional transportation system, giving
emphasis to those facilities, services, and programs that exhibit one
or more of the following characteristics:
(i) Crosses member county lines;
(ii) Is or will be used by a significant number of people who live
or work outside the county in which the facility, service, or project
is located;
(iii) Significant impacts are expected to be felt in more than one
county;
(iv) Potentially adverse impacts of the facility, service, program,
or project can be better avoided or mitigated through adherence to
regional policies;
(v) Transportation needs addressed by a project have been
identified by the regional transportation planning process and the
remedy is deemed to have regional significance; and
(vi) Provides for system continuity;
(c))) Is consistent with the long-range statewide transportation
plan required under section 2 of this act and with the transportation
system policy goals in RCW 47.04.280 (as recodified by this act);
(b) Establishes level of service standards for state highways and
state ferry routes, with the exception of transportation facilities of
statewide significance as defined in RCW 47.06.140. These regionally
established level of service standards for state highways and state
ferries shall be developed jointly with the department of
transportation, to encourage consistency across jurisdictions. In
establishing level of service standards for state highways and state
ferries, consideration shall be given for the necessary balance between
providing for the free interjurisdictional movement of people and goods
and the needs of local commuters using state facilities;
(((d))) (c) Includes a financial plan demonstrating how the
regional transportation plan can be implemented, indicating resources
from public and private sources that are reasonably expected to be made
available to carry out the plan, and recommending any innovative
financing techniques to finance needed facilities, services, and
programs;
(((e))) (d) Assesses regional development patterns, capital
investment and other measures necessary to:
(i) Ensure the preservation of the existing regional transportation
system, including requirements for operational improvements,
resurfacing, restoration, and rehabilitation of existing and future
major roadways, as well as operations, maintenance, modernization, and
rehabilitation of existing and future transit, railroad systems and
corridors, and nonmotorized facilities; and
(ii) Make the most efficient use of existing transportation
facilities to relieve vehicular congestion and maximize the mobility of
people and goods;
(((f))) (e) Sets forth a proposed regional transportation approach,
including capital investments, service improvements, programs, and
transportation demand management measures to guide the development of
the integrated, multimodal regional transportation system. For
regional growth centers, the approach must address transportation
concurrency strategies required under RCW 36.70A.070 and include a
measurement of vehicle level of service for off-peak periods and total
multimodal capacity for peak periods; and
(((g))) (f) Where appropriate, sets forth the relationship of high
capacity transportation providers and other public transit providers
with regard to responsibility for, and the coordination between,
services and facilities.
(2) The organization shall review the regional transportation plan
biennially for currency and forward the adopted plan along with
documentation of the biennial review to the state department of
transportation.
(3) All transportation projects, programs, and transportation
demand management measures within the region that have an impact upon
regional facilities or services must be consistent with the plan and
with the adopted regional growth and transportation strategies.

Sec. 15 RCW 47.82.010 and 1990 c 43 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department, in conjunction with local jurisdictions, shall
coordinate as appropriate with the designated metropolitan planning
organizations to develop a program for improving Amtrak passenger rail
service. The program may include:
(1) Determination of the appropriate level of Amtrak passenger rail
service;
(2) Implementation of higher train speeds for Amtrak passenger rail
service, where safety considerations permit;
(3) Recognition, in the ((state's long-range planning process))
development of the long-range statewide transportation plan under
section 2 of this act, of potential higher speed intercity passenger
rail service, while monitoring socioeconomic and technological
conditions as indicators for higher speed systems; and
(4) Identification of existing intercity rail rights-of-way which
may be used for public transportation corridors in the future.

Sec. 16 RCW 36.70A.070 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 26 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
The comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps,
and descriptive text covering objectives, principles, and standards
used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an
internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent
with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted
and amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140.
Each comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for
each of the following:
(1) A land use element designating the proposed general
distribution and general location and extent of the uses of land, where
appropriate, for agriculture, timber production, housing, commerce,
industry, recreation, open spaces, general aviation airports, public
utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land use
element shall include population densities, building intensities, and
estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall
provide for protection of the quality and quantity of groundwater used
for public water supplies. Wherever possible, the land use element
should consider utilizing urban planning approaches that promote
physical activity. Where applicable, the land use element shall review
drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby
jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate
or cleanse those discharges that pollute waters of the state, including
Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.
(2) A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of
established residential neighborhoods that: (a) Includes an inventory
and analysis of existing and projected housing needs that identifies
the number of housing units necessary to manage projected growth; (b)
includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory
provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of
housing, including single-family residences; (c) identifies sufficient
land for housing, including, but not limited to, government-assisted
housing, housing for low-income families, manufactured housing,
multifamily housing, and group homes and foster care facilities; and
(d) makes adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all
economic segments of the community.
(3) A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An
inventory of existing capital facilities owned by public entities,
showing the locations and capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a
forecast of the future needs for such capital facilities; (c) the
proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new capital
facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital
facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies
sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to
reassess the land use element if probable funding falls short of
meeting existing needs and to ensure that the land use element, capital
facilities plan element, and financing plan within the capital
facilities plan element are coordinated and consistent. Park and
recreation facilities shall be included in the capital facilities plan
element.
(4) A utilities element consisting of the general location,
proposed location, and capacity of all existing and proposed utilities,
including, but not limited to, electrical lines, telecommunication
lines, and natural gas lines.
(5) Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element
including lands that are not designated for urban growth, agriculture,
forest, or mineral resources. The following provisions shall apply to
the rural element:
(a) Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because
circumstances vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of
rural densities and uses, a county may consider local circumstances,
but shall develop a written record explaining how the rural element
harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the
requirements of this chapter.
(b) Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural
development, forestry, and agriculture in rural areas. The rural
element shall provide for a variety of rural densities, uses, essential
public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to serve the
permitted densities and uses. To achieve a variety of rural densities
and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density transfer, design
guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative techniques
that will accommodate appropriate rural densities and uses that are not
characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural
character.
(c) Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall
include measures that apply to rural development and protect the rural
character of the area, as established by the county, by:
(i) Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;
(ii) Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the
surrounding rural area;
(iii) Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development in the rural area;
(iv) Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and
surface water and groundwater resources; and
(v) Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural,
forest, and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
(d) Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to
the requirements of this subsection and except as otherwise
specifically provided in this subsection (5)(d), the rural element may
allow for limited areas of more intensive rural development, including
necessary public facilities and public services to serve the limited
area as follows:
(i) Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or
redevelopment of existing commercial, industrial, residential, or
mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline development,
villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads developments.
(A) A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use
area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this
subsection, but shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and
(iii) of this subsection.
(B) Any development or redevelopment other than an industrial area
or an industrial use within a mixed-use area or an industrial area
under this subsection (5)(d)(i) must be principally designed to serve
the existing and projected rural population.
(C) Any development or redevelopment in terms of building size,
scale, use, or intensity shall be consistent with the character of the
existing areas. Development and redevelopment may include changes in
use from vacant land or a previously existing use so long as the new
use conforms to the requirements of this subsection (5);
(ii) The intensification of development on lots containing, or new
development of, small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including
commercial facilities to serve those recreational or tourist uses, that
rely on a rural location and setting, but that do not include new
residential development. A small-scale recreation or tourist use is
not required to be principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population. Public services and public facilities
shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or tourist
use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;
(iii) The intensification of development on lots containing
isolated nonresidential uses or new development of isolated cottage
industries and isolated small-scale businesses that are not principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population and
nonresidential uses, but do provide job opportunities for rural
residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion of small-scale
businesses as long as those small-scale businesses conform with the
rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(15). Rural counties may also allow new
small-scale businesses to utilize a site previously occupied by an
existing business as long as the new small-scale business conforms to
the rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(15). Public services and public facilities
shall be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated
nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that does not
permit low-density sprawl;
(iv) A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the
existing areas or uses of more intensive rural development, as
appropriate, authorized under this subsection. Lands included in such
existing areas or uses shall not extend beyond the logical outer
boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing a new pattern of
low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary
delineated predominately by the built environment, but that may also
include undeveloped lands if limited as provided in this subsection.
The county shall establish the logical outer boundary of an area of
more intensive rural development. In establishing the logical outer
boundary, the county shall address (A) the need to preserve the
character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities, (B)
physical boundaries, such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and
land forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular
boundaries, and (D) the ability to provide public facilities and public
services in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;
(v) For purposes of (d) of this subsection, an existing area or
existing use is one that was in existence:
(A) On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to
plan under all of the provisions of this chapter;
(B) On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW
36.70A.040(2), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions
of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2); or
(C) On the date the office of financial management certifies the
county's population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that
is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040(5).
(e) Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit
in the rural area a major industrial development or a master planned
resort unless otherwise specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and
36.70A.365.
(6) A transportation element that implements, and is consistent
with, the land use element.
(a) The transportation element shall include the following
subelements:
(i) Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;
(ii) Estimated traffic impacts to state-owned transportation
facilities resulting from land use assumptions to assist the department
of transportation in monitoring the performance of state facilities, to
plan improvements for the facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation facilities;
(iii) Facilities and services needs, including:
(A) An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation
facilities and services, including transit alignments and general
aviation airport facilities, to define existing capital facilities and
travel levels as a basis for future planning. This inventory must
include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or
county's jurisdictional boundaries;
(B) Level of service standards for all locally owned arterials and
transit routes to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system.
These standards should be regionally coordinated;
(C) For state-owned transportation facilities, level of service
standards for highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW,
to gauge the performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting
level of service standards for state highways in the local
comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the system, to
evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination between
the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit program and
the office of financial management's ten-year investment program. The
concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply to
transportation facilities and services of statewide significance except
for counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the
mainland are state highways or ferry routes. In these island counties,
state highways and ferry route capacity must be a factor in meeting the
concurrency requirements in (b) of this subsection;
(D) Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance
locally owned transportation facilities or services that are below an
established level of service standard;
(E) Forecasts of traffic for at least ten years based on the
adopted land use plan to provide information on the location, timing,
and capacity needs of future growth;
(F) Identification of state and local system needs to meet current
and future demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation
facilities must be consistent with the long-range statewide
((multimodal)) transportation plan required under ((chapter 47.06 RCW))
section 2 of this act;
(iv) Finance, including:
(A) An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against
probable funding resources;
(B) A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the
comprehensive plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the
basis for the six-year street, road, or transit program required by RCW
35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795
for public transportation systems. The multiyear financing plan should
be coordinated with the ten-year investment program developed by the
office of financial management as required by RCW 47.05.030;
(C) If probable funding falls short of meeting identified needs, a
discussion of how additional funding will be raised, or how land use
assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that level of service
standards will be met;
(v) Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment
of the impacts of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on
the transportation systems of adjacent jurisdictions;
(vi) Demand-management strategies;
(vii) Pedestrian and bicycle component to include collaborative
efforts to identify and designate planned improvements for pedestrian
and bicycle facilities and corridors that address and encourage
enhanced community access and promote healthy lifestyles.
(b) After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions
required to plan or who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local
jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances which prohibit
development approval if the development causes the level of service on
a locally owned transportation facility to decline below the standards
adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan, unless
transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of
development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies
may include increased public transportation service, ride sharing
programs, demand management, and other transportation systems
management strategies. For the purposes of this subsection (6),
"concurrent with the development" means that improvements or strategies
are in place at the time of development, or that a financial commitment
is in place to complete the improvements or strategies within six
years.
(c) The transportation element described in this subsection (6),
the six-year plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121
for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems, and
the ten-year investment program required by RCW 47.05.030 for the
state, must be consistent.
(7) An economic development element establishing local goals,
policies, objectives, and provisions for economic growth and vitality
and a high quality of life. The element shall include: (a) A summary
of the local economy such as population, employment, payroll, sectors,
businesses, sales, and other information as appropriate; (b) a summary
of the strengths and weaknesses of the local economy defined as the
commercial and industrial sectors and supporting factors such as land
use, transportation, utilities, education, workforce, housing, and
natural/cultural resources; and (c) an identification of policies,
programs, and projects to foster economic growth and development and to
address future needs. A city that has chosen to be a residential
community is exempt from the economic development element requirement
of this subsection.
(8) A park and recreation element that implements, and is
consistent with, the capital facilities plan element as it relates to
park and recreation facilities. The element shall include: (a)
Estimates of park and recreation demand for at least a ten-year period;
(b) an evaluation of facilities and service needs; and (c) an
evaluation of intergovernmental coordination opportunities to provide
regional approaches for meeting park and recreational demand.
(9) It is the intent that new or amended elements required after
January 1, 2002, be adopted concurrent with the scheduled update
provided in RCW 36.70A.130. Requirements to incorporate any such new
or amended elements shall be null and void until funds sufficient to
cover applicable local government costs are appropriated and
distributed by the state at least two years before local government
must update comprehensive plans as required in RCW 36.70A.130.

Sec. 17 RCW 36.70A.085 and 2009 c 514 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Comprehensive plans of cities that have a marine container port
with annual operating revenues in excess of sixty million dollars
within their jurisdiction must include a container port element.
(2) Comprehensive plans of cities that include all or part of a
port district with annual operating revenues in excess of twenty
million dollars may include a marine industrial port element. Prior to
adopting a marine industrial port element under this subsection (2),
the commission of the applicable port district must adopt a resolution
in support of the proposed element.
(3) Port elements adopted under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section must be developed collaboratively between the city and the
applicable port, and must establish policies and programs that:
(a) Define and protect the core areas of port and port-related
industrial uses within the city;
(b) Provide reasonably efficient access to the core area through
freight corridors within the city limits; and
(c) Identify and resolve key land use conflicts along the edge of
the core area, and minimize and mitigate, to the extent practicable,
incompatible uses along the edge of the core area.
(4) Port elements adopted under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section must be:
(a) Completed and approved by the city according to the schedule
specified in RCW 36.70A.130; and
(b) Consistent with the economic development, transportation, and
land use elements of the city's comprehensive plan, and consistent with
the city's capital facilities plan.
(5) In adopting port elements under subsections (1) and (2) of this
section, cities and ports must: Ensure that there is consistency
between the port elements and the port comprehensive scheme required
under chapters 53.20 and 53.25 RCW; and retain sufficient planning
flexibility to secure emerging economic opportunities.
(6) In developing port elements under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, a city may utilize one or more of the following
approaches:
(a) Creation of a port overlay district that protects container
port uses;
(b) Use of industrial land banks;
(c) Use of buffers and transition zones between incompatible uses;
(d) Use of joint transportation funding agreements;
(e) Use of policies to encourage the retention of valuable
warehouse and storage facilities;
(f) Use of limitations on the location or size, or both, of
nonindustrial uses in the core area and surrounding areas; and
(g) Use of other approaches by agreement between the city and the
port.
(7) The department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce must provide matching grant funds to cities
meeting the requirements of subsection (1) of this section to support
development of the required container port element.
(8) Any planned improvements identified in port elements adopted
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section must be transmitted by
the city to the transportation commission for consideration of
inclusion in the long-range statewide transportation plan required
under ((RCW 47.01.071)) section 2 of this act.

Sec. 18 RCW 46.68.170 and 2011 c 367 s 715 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created in the motor vehicle fund the RV account.
All moneys hereafter deposited in said account shall be used by the
department of transportation for the construction, maintenance, and
operation of recreational vehicle sanitary disposal systems at safety
rest areas ((in accordance with the department's highway system plan as
prescribed in chapter 47.06 RCW)). During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013
fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer from the RV account to the
motor vehicle fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the RV account to accomplish the purposes identified in this section.

Sec. 19 RCW 47.60.290 and 2007 c 512 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall annually review fares and pricing policies
applicable to the operation of the Washington state ferries.
(2) Beginning in 2008, the department shall develop fare and
pricing policy proposals that must:
(a) Recognize that each travel shed is unique, and might not have
the same farebox recovery rate and the same pricing policies;
(b) Use data from the current survey conducted under RCW
((47.60.286)) 47.01.075 (as recodified by this act);
(c) Be developed with input from affected ferry users by public
hearing and by review with the affected ferry advisory committees, in
addition to the data gathered from the survey conducted ((in RCW
47.60.286)) under RCW 47.01.075 (as recodified by this act);
(d) Generate the amount of revenue required by the biennial
transportation budget;
(e) Consider the impacts on users, capacity, and local communities;
and
(f) Keep fare schedules as simple as possible.
(3) While developing fare and pricing policy proposals, the
department must consider the following:
(a) Options for using pricing to level vehicle peak demand; and
(b) Options for using pricing to increase off-peak ridership.

Sec. 20 RCW 47.60.327 and 2007 c 512 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall develop, and the commission shall review,
operational strategies to ensure that existing assets are fully
utilized and to guide future investment decisions. These operational
strategies must, at a minimum:
(a) Recognize that each travel shed is unique and might not have
the same operational strategies;
(b) Use data from the current survey conducted under RCW
((47.60.286)) 47.01.075 (as recodified by this act);
(c) Be consistent with vehicle level of service standards;
(d) Choose the most efficient balance of capital and operating
investments by using a life-cycle cost analysis; and
(e) Use methods of collecting fares that maximize efficiency and
achieve revenue management control.
(2) After the commission reviews recommendations by the department,
the commission and department shall make joint recommendations to the
legislature for the improvement of operational strategies.
(3) In developing operational strategies, the following, at a
minimum, must be considered:
(a) The feasibility of using reservation systems;
(b) Methods of shifting vehicular traffic to other modes of
transportation;
(c) Methods of improving on-dock operations to maximize efficiency
and minimize operating and capital costs;
(d) A cost-benefit analysis of remote holding versus over-water
holding;
(e) Methods of reorganizing holding areas and minimizing on-dock
employee parking to maximize the dock size available for customer
vehicles;
(f) Schedule modifications;
(g) Efficiencies in exit queuing and metering;
(h) Interoperability with other transportation services;
(i) Options for leveling vehicle peak demand; and
(j) Options for increasing off-peak ridership.
(4) Operational strategies must be reevaluated periodically and, at
a minimum, before developing a new capital plan.

Sec. 21 RCW 47.76.210 and 1995 c 380 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Washington state department of transportation shall implement
a state freight rail program that supports the freight rail service
objectives identified in the ((state's multimodal)) long-range
statewide transportation plan required under ((chapter 47.06 RCW))
section 2 of this act. The support may be in the form of projects and
strategies that support branch lines and light-density lines, provide
access to ports, maintain adequate mainline capacity, and preserve or
restore rail corridors and infrastructure.

Sec. 22 RCW 47.79.020 and 1993 c 381 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that there is substantial public benefit to
establishing a high-speed ground transportation program in this state.
The program shall implement the recommendations of the high-speed
ground transportation steering committee report dated October 15, 1992.
The program shall be administered by the department of transportation
in close cooperation with the utilities and transportation commission
and affected cities and counties.
The high-speed ground transportation program shall have the
following goals:
(1) Implement high-speed ground transportation service offering top
speeds over 150 m.p.h. between Everett and Portland, Oregon by 2020.
This would be accomplished by meeting the intermediate objectives of a
maximum travel time between downtown Portland and downtown Seattle of
two hours and thirty minutes by the year 2000 and maximum travel time
of two hours by the year 2010;
(2) Implement high-speed ground transportation service offering top
speeds over 150 m.p.h. between Everett and Vancouver, B.C. by 2025;
(3) Implement high-speed ground transportation service offering top
speeds over 150 m.p.h. between Seattle and Spokane by 2030.
The department of transportation shall, subject to legislative
appropriation, implement such projects as necessary to achieve these
goals in accordance with the implementation plans identified in RCW
47.79.030 ((and 47.79.040)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 47.06.020 (Role of department) and 2007 c 516 s 9 & 1993 c
446 s 2;
(2) RCW 47.06.040 (Statewide multimodal transportation plan) and
2002 c 189 s 4, 1998 c 199 s 1, 1994 c 258 s 5, & 1993 c 446 s 4;
(3) RCW 47.06.043 (Technical workers -- Skill enhancement) and 2003
c 363 s 204;
(4) RCW 47.06.045 (Freight mobility plan) and 1998 c 175 s 10;
(5) RCW 47.06.050 (State-owned facilities component) and 2007 c 516
s 10, 2002 c 5 s 413, & 1993 c 446 s 5;
(6) RCW 47.06.060 (Aviation plan) and 1993 c 446 s 6;
(7) RCW 47.06.070 (Marine ports and navigation plan) and 1993 c 446
s 7;
(8) RCW 47.06.080 (Freight rail plan) and 1993 c 446 s 8;
(9) RCW 47.06.090 (Intercity passenger rail plan) and 2002 c 5 s
414 & 1993 c 446 s 9;
(10) RCW 47.06.100 (Bicycle transportation and pedestrian walkways
plan) and 1993 c 446 s 10;
(11) RCW 47.06.110 (Public transportation plan) and 2005 c 319 s
124, 1996 c 186 s 512, 1995 c 399 s 120, & 1993 c 446 s 11;
(12) RCW 47.06.120 (High capacity transportation planning and
regional transportation planning -- Role of department) and 1993 c 446 s
12;
(13) RCW 47.01.141 (Biennial report) and 1987 c 505 s 49, 1984 c 7
s 75, 1977 c 75 s 68, & 1973 2nd ex.s. c 12 s 1;
(14) RCW 47.60.286 (Ferry user data survey) and 2007 c 512 s 4;
(15) RCW 47.76.220 (State rail plan -- Contents) and 1995 c 380 s 3,
1993 c 224 s 2, 1985 c 432 s 1, & 1983 c 303 s 5;
(16) RCW 47.79.040 (Rail passenger plan) and 1993 c 381 s 4; and
(17) RCW 47.80.070 (Statewide consistency) and 1994 c 158 s 5.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 (1) RCW 47.01.051, 47.01.061, 47.01.071,
47.01.075, 47.01.420, and 47.01.425 are each recodified as sections in
a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.
(2) RCW 47.04.280 is recodified as a new section in chapter 47.06
RCW.

--- END ---