BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that portions of state
highways may at times be better served by the merger of local fire
districts serving the applicable stretch of highway. In certain areas
of the state, portions of state highways are located within fire
district boundaries that, due to the location of the district's nearest
fire station, are not conducive to quick emergency response times
supporting that portion of highway. This may result in liability
burdens on the part of those responsible for managing that stretch of
state highway. In these circumstances, an adjacent fire district often
has a fire station located closer to the affected portion of state
highway that would provide quicker and more efficient emergency
response services. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that
the existing mechanism for merging fire districts be streamlined in
order to more efficiently facilitate a partial merger of fire districts
such that affected portions of state highways can be better served with
quicker emergency response times by the merger district.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.48.031 and 1981 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever the chief or another officer of the state patrol
determines on the basis of a traffic investigation that an emergency
exists or less than safe road conditions exist due to human-caused or
natural disasters or extreme weather conditions upon any state highway,
or any part thereof, state patrol officers may determine and declare
closures and temporarily reroute traffic from any such affected
highway. The emergency or less than safe road conditions may also
exist due to a fire on a portion of state highway being served by a
merged fire district established under the conditions identified in RCW
52.06.090(2).
(2) Any alteration of vehicular traffic on any state highway due to
closure in emergency conditions is effective until such alteration has
been approved or altered by the secretary of transportation or other
department of transportation authorities in their local respective
jurisdictions.
(3) All state highway closures by officers of the state patrol
shall be immediately reported to the secretary of transportation and to
other authorities in their local jurisdictions.

Sec. 3 RCW 52.06.090 and 1989 c 63 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this
section, a part of one district may be transferred and merged with an
adjacent district if the area can be better served by the ((merged))
merger district. To effect such a merger, a petition, signed by a
majority of the commissioners of the merging district or signed by not
less than fifteen percent of the qualified electors residing in the
area to be merged, shall be filed with the commissioners of the merging
district, if signed by electors, or with the commissioners of the
merger district if signed by commissioners of the merging district. If
the commissioners of the merging district approve the petition, the
petition shall be presented to the commissioners of the merger
district. If the commissioners of the merger district approve the
petition, an election shall be called in the area to be merged.
(b) In the event that either board of fire district commissioners
does not approve the petition, the petition may be approved by the
boundary review board of the county or the county legislative authority
of the county in which the area to be merged is situated, and may
approve the merger if it decides the area can be better served by a
merger. If the part of the merging district that is proposed to merge
with the merger district is located in more than one county, the
approval must be by the boundary review board or county legislative
authority of each county. If there is an affirmative decision, an
election shall be called in the area to be merged.
(c) A majority of the votes cast is necessary to approve the
transfer.
(2) The transfer and merger of part of one district to an adjacent
district may also occur and does not require an election or approval by
a boundary review board or county legislative authority if:
(a) The area to be merged:
(i) Includes portions of a state highway;
(ii) Can be better served by the merger district with quicker
emergency response times, as determined by the commissioners of the
merger district in (c) of this subsection; and
(iii) Has an assessed value of less than one-half of one percent of
the total assessed value of the merging district;
(b) The merging district does not own a fire station located within
the area to be merged; and
(c) A resolution is adopted by a majority of the commissioners of
the merger district (i) finding that the merger district can provide
quicker emergency response times to the proposed area to be merged and
that the merger is in the public interest, and (ii) declaring the
portion of the district merged in the same manner and to the same
effect as if it had been authorized by an election. However, the
commissioners of the merger district must consult with the
commissioners of the merging district regarding the merger at least
thirty days prior to adoption of the resolution.

--- END ---