BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of transportation and the local authorities
shall prohibit all commercial motor vehicles, as defined in RCW
46.25.010, from utilizing express lanes during peak traffic hours. A
violation of this prohibition constitutes a traffic offense.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Express lanes" means highway lanes that are reversible, used
to relieve congestion from the transportation system, and established
and operated by the department of transportation;
(b) "Peak traffic hours" means Monday through Friday from 6:00 a.m.
to 10:00 a.m. and 3:00 p.m. to 7:00 p.m.

--- END ---