BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71A.10.020 and 2010 c 94 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this title, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Community residential support services," or "community support
services," and "in-home services" means one or more of the services
listed in RCW 71A.12.040.
(2) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(3) "Developmental disability" means a disability attributable to
intellectual disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism, or another
neurological or other condition of an individual found by the secretary
to be closely related to an intellectual disability or to require
treatment similar to that required for individuals with intellectual
disabilities, which disability originates before the individual attains
age eighteen, which has continued or can be expected to continue
indefinitely, and which constitutes a substantial limitation to the
individual. By January 1, 1989, the department shall promulgate rules
which define neurological or other conditions in a way that is not
limited to intelligence quotient scores as the sole determinant of
these conditions, and notify the legislature of this action.
(4) "Eligible person" means a person who has been found by the
secretary under RCW 71A.16.040 to be eligible for services.
(5) "Habilitative services" means those services provided by
program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life
skills and to raise their levels of physical, mental, social, and
vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education,
training for employment, and therapy.
(6) "Legal representative" means a parent of a person who is under
eighteen years of age, a person's legal guardian, a person's limited
guardian when the subject matter is within the scope of the limited
guardianship, a person's attorney-at-law, a person's attorney-in-fact,
or any other person who is authorized by law to act for another person.
(7) "Notice" or "notification" of an action of the secretary means
notice in compliance with RCW 71A.10.060.
(8) "Residential habilitation center" means a state-operated
facility for persons twenty-one years of age and older with
developmental disabilities governed by chapter 71A.20 RCW.
(9) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services
or the secretary's designee.
(10) "Service" or "services" means services provided by state or
local government to carry out this title.
(11) "Vacancy" means an opening at a residential habilitation
center, which when filled, would not require the center to exceed its
biennially budgeted capacity.

Sec. 2 RCW 71A.10.030 and 1988 c 176 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The existence of developmental disabilities does not affect the
civil rights of the person with the developmental disability except as
otherwise provided by law.
(2) The secretary's determination under RCW 71A.16.040 that a
person is eligible for services under this title shall not deprive the
person of any civil rights or privileges. The secretary's
determination alone shall not constitute cause to declare the person to
be legally incompetent.
(((3) This title shall not be construed to deprive the parent or
parents of any parental rights with relation to a child residing in a
residential habilitation center, except as provided in this title for
the orderly operation of such residential habilitation centers.))

Sec. 3 RCW 71A.10.050 and 1989 c 175 s 138 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An applicant or recipient or former recipient of a
developmental disabilities service under this title from the department
of social and health services has the right to appeal the following
department actions:
(a) A denial of an application for eligibility under RCW
71A.16.040;
(b) An unreasonable delay in acting on an application for
eligibility, for a service, or for an alternative service under RCW
71A.18.040;
(c) A denial, reduction, or termination of a service;
(d) A claim that the person owes a debt to the state for an
overpayment;
(e) A disagreement with an action of the secretary under RCW
71A.10.060 or 71A.10.070;
(f) A decision to return a resident of ((an [a])) a residential
habilitation center to the community; and
(g) A decision to change a person's placement from one category of
residential services to a different category of residential services.
The adjudicative proceeding is governed by the Administrative
Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) This subsection applies only to an adjudicative proceeding in
which the department action appealed is a decision to return a resident
of a residential habilitation center to the community. The resident or
his or her representative may appeal on the basis of whether the
specific placement decision is in the best interests of the resident.
When the resident or his or her representative files an application for
an adjudicative proceeding under this section the department has the
burden of proving that the specific placement decision is in the best
interests of the resident.
(3) When the department takes any action described in subsection
(1) of this section it shall give notice as provided by RCW 71A.10.060.
The notice must include a statement advising the recipient of the right
to an adjudicative proceeding and the time limits for filing an
application for an adjudicative proceeding. Notice of a decision to
return a resident of a residential habilitation center to the community
under RCW 71A.20.080 must also include a statement advising the
recipient of the right to file a petition for judicial review of an
adverse adjudicative order as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 71A.12.020 and 1988 c 176 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To the extent that state, federal, or other funds designated
for services to persons with developmental disabilities are available,
and consistent with this title, the secretary shall provide every
eligible person with habilitative services suited to the person's
needs, regardless of age or degree of developmental disability.
(2) The secretary shall provide persons who receive services with
the opportunity for integration with nonhandicapped and less
handicapped persons to the greatest extent possible.
(3) The secretary shall establish minimum standards for
habilitative services. Consumers, advocates, service providers,
appropriate professionals, and local government agencies shall be
involved in the development of the standards.

Sec. 5 RCW 71A.20.010 and 1988 c 176 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter covers the operation of residential habilitation
centers. The selection of persons twenty-one years of age and older to
be served at the centers is governed by chapters 71A.16 and 71A.18 RCW.
The purposes of this chapter are: To provide for those ((children and
adults)) individuals who are exceptional in their needs for care,
treatment, and education by reason of developmental disabilities,
residential care designed to develop their individual capacities to
their optimum; to provide for admittance, withdrawal and discharge from
state residential habilitation centers upon application; and to insure
a comprehensive program for the education, guidance, care, treatment,
and rehabilitation of all persons admitted to residential habilitation
centers.

Sec. 6 RCW 71A.20.020 and 1994 c 215 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The following)) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated
by the legislature, residential habilitation centers are ((permanently
established)) authorized to provide services to persons with
developmental disabilities((: Lakeland Village, located at Medical
Lake, Spokane county; Rainier School, located at Buckley, Pierce
county; Yakima Valley School, located at Selah, Yakima county; Fircrest
School, located at Seattle, King county; and Frances Haddon Morgan
Children's Center, located at Bremerton, Kitsap county)) based upon
admissions criteria established by the department.

Sec. 7 RCW 71A.20.080 and 1989 c 175 s 143 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever in the judgment of the secretary, the treatment and
training of any resident of a residential habilitation center has
progressed to the point that it is deemed advisable to return such
resident to the community, the secretary may grant placement on such
terms and conditions as the secretary may deem advisable after
consultation in the manner provided in RCW 71A.10.070. The secretary
shall give written notice of the decision to return a resident to the
community as provided in RCW 71A.10.060. The notice must include a
statement advising the recipient of the right to an adjudicative
proceeding under RCW 71A.10.050 and the time limits for filing an
application for an adjudicative proceeding. The notice must also
include a statement advising the recipient of the right to judicial
review of an adverse adjudicative order as provided in chapter 34.05
RCW.
For persons twenty-one years of age and older, a placement decision
shall not be implemented at any level during any period during which an
appeal can be taken or while an appeal is pending and undecided, unless
authorized by court order so long as the appeal is being diligently
pursued.
The department of social and health services shall periodically
evaluate at reasonable intervals the adjustment of the resident to the
specific placement to determine whether the resident should be
continued in the placement or returned to the institution or given a
different placement.

Sec. 8 RCW 71A.20.150 and 1988 c 176 s 715 are each amended to
read as follows:
Without committing the department to continued provision of
service, the secretary may admit ((a)) persons twenty-one years of age
and older who are eligible for services under this chapter to a
residential habilitation center for a period not to exceed thirty days
for observation prior to determination of needed services, where such
observation is necessary to determine the extent and necessity of
services to be provided.

Sec. 9 RCW 71A.20.170 and 2008 c 265 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The developmental disabilities community trust account is
created in the state treasury. All net proceeds from the use of excess
property identified in the 2002 joint legislative audit and review
committee capital study or other studies of ((the)) division of
developmental disabilities residential habilitation centers ((at
Lakeland Village, Yakima Valley school, Francis Haddon Morgan Center,
and Rainier school)) that would not impact current residential
habilitation center operations must be deposited into the account.
(2) Proceeds may come from the lease of the land, conservation
easements, sale of timber, or other activities short of sale of the
property.
(3) "Excess property" includes that portion of the property at
Rainier school previously under the cognizance and control of
Washington State University for use as a dairy/forage research
facility.
(4) Only investment income from the principal of the proceeds
deposited into the trust account may be spent from the account. For
purposes of this section, "investment income" includes lease payments,
rent payments, or other periodic payments deposited into the trust
account. For purposes of this section, "principal" is the actual
excess land from which proceeds are assigned to the trust account.
(5) Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account shall be used exclusively to provide
family support and/or employment/day services to eligible persons with
developmental disabilities who can be served by community-based
developmental disability services. It is the intent of the legislature
that the account should not be used to replace, supplant, or reduce
existing appropriations.
(6) The account shall be known as the Dan Thompson memorial
developmental disabilities community trust account.

Sec. 10 RCW 72.01.050 and 1992 c 7 s 51 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of social and health services shall have full
power to manage and govern ((the following)) public institutions((:
The western state hospital, the eastern state hospital, the northern
state hospital, the state training school, the state school for girls,
Lakeland Village, the Rainier school, and such other institutions)) as
authorized by law, subject only to the limitations contained in laws
relating to the management of such institutions.
(2) The secretary of corrections shall have full power to manage,
govern, and name all state correctional facilities, subject only to the
limitations contained in laws relating to the management of such
institutions.
(3) If any state correctional facility is fully or partially
destroyed by natural causes or otherwise, the secretary of corrections
may, with the approval of the governor, provide for the establishment
and operation of additional residential correctional facilities to
place those inmates displaced by such destruction. However, such
additional facilities may not be established if there are existing
residential correctional facilities to which all of the displaced
inmates can be appropriately placed. The establishment and operation
of any additional facility shall be on a temporary basis, and the
facility may not be operated beyond July 1 of the year following the
year in which it was partially or fully destroyed.

Sec. 11 RCW 72.05.010 and 1985 c 378 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
The purposes of RCW 72.05.010 through 72.05.210 are: To provide
((for every child)) individuals with behavior problems, ((mentally and
physically handicapped persons)) mental and physical disabilities, and
hearing and ((visually impaired children)) visual impairments, within
the purview of RCW 72.05.010 through 72.05.210, as now or hereafter
amended, such care, guidance and instruction, control and treatment as
will best serve the welfare of the ((child or person)) individual and
society; to insure nonpolitical and qualified operation, supervision,
management, and control of ((the Green Hill school, the Maple Lane
school, the Naselle Youth Camp, the Mission Creek Youth Camp, Echo
Glen, the Cascadia Diagnostic Center, Lakeland Village, Rainier school,
the Yakima Valley school, Interlake school, Fircrest school, the
Francis Haddon Morgan Center, the Child Study and Treatment Center and
Secondary School of Western State Hospital, and like)) residential
state schools, camps, and centers ((hereafter established, and to place
them under)) operated by the department of social and health services
except where specified otherwise; and to provide for the persons
committed or admitted to those schools that type of care, instruction,
and treatment most likely to accomplish their rehabilitation and
restoration to normal citizenship.

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.190.020 and 1990 c 33 s 171 are each amended to
read as follows:
The term "residential school" as used in RCW 28A.190.020 through
28A.190.060, 72.01.200, 72.05.010, and 72.05.130, each as now or
hereafter amended, shall mean ((Green Hill school, Maple Lane school,
Naselle Youth Camp, Cedar Creek Youth Camp, Mission Creek Youth Camp,
Echo Glen, Lakeland Village, Rainier school, Yakima Valley school,
Interlake school, Fircrest school, Francis Haddon Morgan Center, the
Child Study and Treatment Center and Secondary School of Western State
Hospital, and such other)) schools, camps, and centers as are now or
hereafter established by the department of social and health services
for the diagnosis, confinement, and rehabilitation of juveniles
committed by the courts or for the care and treatment of persons who
are exceptional in their needs by reason of mental and/or physical
deficiency: PROVIDED, That the term shall not include the state
schools for the deaf and blind or adult correctional institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 71A.20.070 (Educational programs) and 1990 c 33 s 590 &
1988 c 176 s 707; and
(2) RCW 28B.30.810 (Dairy/forage and agricultural research
facility -- Rainier school farm -- Revolving fund -- Lease of herd, lands,
authorized) and 1988 c 57 s 1 & 1981 c 238 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---