BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the key to
Washington's economic prosperity over the past twenty years has been a
thriving employment sector for workers who have high levels of
education. The legislature finds that by 2018, sixty-seven percent of
all jobs in Washington will require some postsecondary education - the
fifth highest in the nation - and that between 2011 and 2018, the
number of Washington jobs requiring postsecondary education will
increase by two hundred fifty-nine thousand. The legislature finds
that while Washington enterprises that rely on highly educated workers
have been able to fill positions from within the state and by
attracting workers from other states or nations, businesses located in
states that fail to produce sufficient numbers of degreed workers will
be at a competitive disadvantage, since these employers will incur the
added expense of recruiting heavily in other states and countries to
find their skilled workforce. Citizens of Washington will not have
access to the jobs Washington firms are producing unless the state
dramatically increases postsecondary educational opportunities for
them. The legislature further finds that increasing the numbers of
Washington graduates to meet the needs of the state's citizens and
businesses demands innovative institutions and educational delivery
systems.
The legislature intends to partner with Western Governors
University, a regionally and nationally accredited nonprofit and
independent university, to establish Western Governors University -Washington. Western Governors University would offer online,
competency-based degrees and provide enhanced access to postsecondary
education for all Washington students, including dislocated workers and
placebound students. The legislature further intends that the
institution be recognized as a Washington baccalaureate degree-granting
institution that is self-supporting and does not receive state funding.
It is the intent of the legislature that the higher education
coordinating board, the state board for community and technical
colleges, and the other institutions of higher education in Washington
include the institution in policies and agreements regarding the
efficient transfer of credits and courses between institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board may:
(a) Recognize and endorse online, competency-based education as an
important component of Washington's higher education system;
(b) Work to eliminate unnecessary barriers to the delivery of
online competency-based education by Western Governors University -Washington; and
(c) Work with Western Governors University - Washington, as
appropriate, to integrate its academic programs and services into
Washington higher education policy and strategy.
(2) The board shall work with Western Governors University -Washington to create data-sharing processes to assess the institution's
performance and determine the extent to which it helps the state
achieve the goals of the current statewide strategic master plan for
higher education.
(3) The board shall adopt rules and policies to implement this
section and that require board consultation and approval before:
(a) Modifications of contractual terms or relationships between the
state and the institution of higher education; or
(b) Changes or modifications in the nonprofit status of the
institution of higher education.
(4) The board shall obtain legislative approval before allowing the
use of state need grant dollars at Western Governors University -Washington.

--- END ---