BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature finds that persons
who have been convicted and imprisoned for crimes they did not commit
have been uniquely victimized and have suffered tremendous injustice by
being stripped of their lives and liberty. A majority of those wrongly
convicted do not have legal redress to recover damages in order to
restore their lives. The legislature, therefore, intends to provide
redress for those who have been wrongly convicted in recognition of the
lost years of their lives, and the unique circumstances they face after
exoneration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 STATEMENT OF CLAIM. (1) Any person
convicted in a court in this state and subsequently imprisoned for one
or more felonies of which he or she is actually innocent may file a
claim for compensation and damages against the state.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, a person is:
(a) "Actually innocent" of a felony if he or she did not commit any
of the acts in the charging documents;
(b) "Wrongly convicted" if he or she was charged, convicted, and
imprisoned for one or more felonies of which he or she is actually
innocent.
(3)(a) If the person entitled to file a claim under subsection (1)
of this section is incapacitated and incapable of filing the claim, or
if he or she is a minor, or is a nonresident of the state, the claim
may be filed on behalf of that person by any relative, attorney, or
agent acting as the person's representative.
(b) If the person entitled to file a claim under subsection (1) of
this section is deceased, the claim may be filed on behalf of his or
her estate by the person's surviving spouse or domestic partner,
attorney, or agent acting as the person's personal representative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 VENUE AND SERVICE OF PROCESS. (1) All
claims of wrongful conviction and imprisonment shall be filed in
superior court. The venue for such actions shall be governed by RCW
4.92.010.
(2) Service of the summons and complaint shall be governed by RCW
4.92.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 PRESENTATION OF CLAIM. (1) In order to file
an actionable claim for wrongful conviction and imprisonment, the
claimant must establish by documentary evidence that:
(a) The claimant has been convicted of one or more felonies in
state court and subsequently sentenced to a term of imprisonment for
the conviction or convictions, and has served all or part of the
sentence;
(b)(i) The claimant is not currently incarcerated for any offense;
and
(ii) During the period of confinement for which the claimant is
seeking compensation, the claimant was not serving a term of
imprisonment or a concurrent sentence for any crime other than the
felony or felonies for which the claimant was sentenced and which are
grounds for the compensation claim;
(c)(i) The claimant has been pardoned on grounds consistent with
innocence for the felony or felonies for which the claimant was
sentenced and which are grounds for the compensation claim; or
(ii) The claimant's judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated
and the accusatory instrument dismissed on the basis of significant new
information or, if a new trial was ordered following the presentation
of significant new information, either the claimant was found not
guilty at the new trial or the claimant was not retried and the
accusatory instrument dismissed; and
(d) The claim is not time-barred by the provisions of section 9 of
this act.
(2) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, the claim shall state facts in sufficient detail for the
finder of fact to determine that:
(a) The claimant did not commit any of the acts in the charging
documents; and
(b) In light of all the evidence whether or not admissible at
trial, the claimant did not commit or suborn perjury, or fabricate
evidence to cause or bring about the conviction.
(3) The claimant shall verify the claim unless he or she is
incapacitated or deceased, in which case the person filing on behalf of
the claimant shall verify the claim.
(4) The office of the county prosecuting attorney responsible for
charging and prosecuting the felony or felonies for which the claimant
was sentenced and which are grounds for the complaint is not a party to
the action, but may submit briefs to the court related to a claim for
compensation under this section.
(5)(a) If the court finds after reading the claim that the claimant
does not meet the filing criteria set forth in section 2 of this act,
it shall dismiss the claim, either on its own motion or on the motion
of the state.
(b) If the court dismisses the claim, the court shall set forth the
reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions of
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RIGHT OF APPEAL. Any party is entitled to
the rights of appeal afforded parties in a civil action following a
decision on such motions. In the case of dismissal of a claim, review
of the superior court action shall be de novo.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 JUDGMENT AND AWARD. (1) In order to obtain
a judgment in his or her favor, the claimant must show by clear and
convincing evidence that:
(a) The claimant was convicted of one or more felonies in state
court and subsequently sentenced to a term of imprisonment, and has
served all or any part of the sentence;
(b) The claimant is not currently incarcerated for any offense;
(c)(i) The claimant has been pardoned on grounds consistent with
innocence for the felony or felonies for which the claimant was
sentenced and which are the grounds for the compensation claim; or
(ii) The claimant's judgment of conviction was reversed or vacated
and the accusatory instrument dismissed on the basis of significant new
information or, if a new trial was ordered following the presentation
of significant new information, either the claimant was found not
guilty at the new trial or the claimant was not retried and the
accusatory instrument dismissed;
(d) The claimant did not commit any of the acts in the charging
documents; and
(e) In light of all the evidence whether or not admissible at
trial, the claimant did not commit or suborn perjury, or fabricate
evidence to cause or bring about his or her conviction.
(2) Any pardon or proclamation issued to the claimant by the
governor shall be admissible as evidence when it is certified by the
officer having lawful custody of the pardon or proclamation, with the
seal of the office affixed, or with the official certificate of such
officer.
(3) In exercising its discretion regarding the weight and
admissibility of evidence, the court shall give due consideration to
difficulties of proof caused by the passage of time, the death or
unavailability of witnesses, the destruction of evidence, or other
factors not caused by the parties.
(4) If the state concedes that the claimant was wrongly convicted,
the court shall award compensation as provided in subsection (5)(a)
through (d) of this section.
(5) If the jury or, in the case where the right to a jury is
waived, the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the
claimant was wrongly convicted, the court shall award the following
compensation and damages to the claimant:
(a) Compensation, as adjusted for partial years served and to
account for inflation from the effective date of this section, in an
amount up to twenty thousand dollars for each year of actual
confinement including time spent awaiting trial and time spent on death
row.
(b) The court may direct that a portion of the amount awarded in
(a) of this subsection be for child support payments owed by the
claimant that became due, and interest on child support arrearages that
accrued while the claimant was in custody on the felony or felonies
which are grounds for the compensation claim. Such funds shall be paid
on the person's behalf in a lump sum payment to the department of
social and health services for disbursement under the child support
order;
(c) The court may direct that a portion of the amount awarded in
(a) of this subsection be for economic damages for lost wages.
(d) The court may award reasonable attorneys' fees for successfully
bringing the wrongful conviction claim. The attorneys' fees shall be
calculated at ten percent of the damage award plus expenses. However,
attorneys' fees shall not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars. These
fees shall not be deducted from the compensation due to the claimant
and counsel shall not be entitled to receive additional fees from the
client. The court may not award any attorneys' fees to the claimant if
the claimant fails to prove he or she was wrongly convicted.
(6) The amount awarded in subsection (5)(a) of this section shall
not include any punitive damages.
(7) The award shall not be offset by any expenses incurred by the
state or any political subdivision of the state including, but not
limited to, expenses incurred to secure the claimant's custody, or to
feed, clothe, or provide medical services for the claimant. The court
shall not offset against the award the value of any services or
reduction in fees for services to be provided to the claimant as part
of the damages awarded to the claimant pursuant to this section.
(8) Except attorneys' fees under subsection (5)(d) of this section,
compensation awarded under this section shall not be considered
"income" for tax purposes.
(9)(a) Upon finding that the claimant was wrongly convicted, the
court shall seal the claimant's record of conviction.
(b) Upon request of the claimant, the court may order the
claimant's record of conviction vacated if the record has not already
been vacated, expunged, or destroyed under court rules. The
requirements for vacating records under RCW 9.94A.640 shall not apply.
(10) Upon request of the claimant, the court shall refer the
claimant to the department of corrections, the department of social and
health services, or the employment security department, whichever is
appropriate, for access to reentry services, if available, including
but not limited to the community-based transition programs and long-term support programs for education, mentoring, life skills training,
assessment, job skills development, and mental health and substance
abuse treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 NOTICE. (1) On or after the effective date
of this section, when a court grants judicial relief, such as reversal
and vacation of a person's conviction, consistent with the criteria
established in section 4(1)(c)(ii) of this act, the court shall provide
to the person at the time the relief is granted a copy of this chapter.
(2) The clemency and pardons board or the indeterminate sentence
review board, whichever is applicable, upon issuance of a pardon by the
governor on grounds consistent with innocence on or after the effective
date of this section, shall provide a copy of this chapter to the
individual pardoned.
(3) If an individual entitled to receive the information required
under this section shows that he or she was not provided with the
information, he or she shall have an additional twelve months, beyond
the statute of limitations under section 9 of this act, to bring a
claim under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 LEGAL REMEDIES NOT BARRED. (1) The
provisions of this chapter shall not preclude any other legal remedy
available to the claimant to seek redress for the wrongful conviction
and imprisonment.
(2) If the claimant pursues a separate claim for tortious conduct
pursuant to the wrongful conviction, the related arrest, or subsequent
incarceration, the statute of limitations under this chapter is tolled
pending resolution of that claim, and the tort award shall offset any
compensation awarded under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS. Except as provided
in section 7(3) of this act, an action for compensation under this
chapter must be commenced within three years after either the grant of
a pardon or the grant of judicial relief and satisfaction of other
conditions described in section 5 of this act; provided, however, that
any action by the state challenging or appealing the grant of judicial
relief shall toll the three-year period. Any persons meeting the
criteria set forth in section 2 of this act who was wrongly convicted
before the effective date of this section may commence an action under
this chapter within three years after the effective date of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
When a court refers a person to the department under section 6 of
this act as part of the person's award in a wrongful conviction claim,
the department shall provide reasonable access to existing reentry
programs and services. Nothing in this section requires the department
to establish new reentry programs or services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of
this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision
to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 CODIFICATION DIRECTION. Sections 1 through
9 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 4 RCW.

--- END ---