BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.380 and 2010 c 128 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to agriculture and livestock is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Business-related information under RCW 15.86.110;
(2) Information provided under RCW 15.54.362;
(3) Production or sales records required to determine assessment
levels and actual assessment payments to commodity boards and
commissions formed under chapters 15.24, 15.26, 15.28, 15.44, 15.65,
15.66, 15.74, 15.88, 15.115, 15.100, 15.89, and 16.67 RCW or required
by the department of agriculture to administer these chapters or the
department's programs;
(4) Consignment information contained on phytosanitary certificates
issued by the department of agriculture under chapters 15.13, 15.49,
and 15.17 RCW or federal phytosanitary certificates issued under 7
C.F.R. 353 through cooperative agreements with the animal and plant
health inspection service, United States department of agriculture, or
on applications for phytosanitary certification required by the
department of agriculture. However, information about the production,
interstate trade, and export of patented or trademarked fruit must be
provided upon request to the holder of the patent or trademark to
verify export volumes, but not for other commercial purposes;
(5) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
persons (a) to the department of agriculture for the purpose of
conducting a referendum for the potential establishment of a commodity
board or commission; or (b) to the department of agriculture or
commodity boards or commissions formed under chapter 15.24, 15.28,
15.44, 15.65, 15.66, 15.74, 15.88, 15.115, 15.100, 15.89, or 16.67 RCW
with respect to domestic or export marketing activities or individual
producer's production information. However, information about the
production, interstate trade, and export of patented or trademarked
fruit must be provided upon request to the holder of the patent or
trademark to verify production, interstate trade, and export volumes,
but not for other commercial purposes;
(6) Information obtained regarding the purchases, sales, or
production of an individual American ginseng grower or dealer, except
for providing reports to the United States fish and wildlife service
under RCW 15.19.080;
(7) Information collected regarding packers and shippers of fruits
and vegetables for the issuance of certificates of compliance under RCW
15.17.140(2) and 15.17.143. However, information about the production,
interstate trade, and export of patented or trademarked fruit must be
provided upon request to the holder of the patent or trademark to
verify production, interstate trade, and export volumes, but not for
other commercial purposes;
(8) Financial statements obtained under RCW 16.65.030(1)(d) for the
purposes of determining whether or not the applicant meets the minimum
net worth requirements to construct or operate a public livestock
market;
(9) Information submitted by an individual or business for the
purpose of participating in a state or national animal identification
system. Disclosure to local, state, and federal officials is not
public disclosure. This exemption does not affect the disclosure of
information used in reportable animal health investigations under
chapter 16.36 RCW once they are complete; and
(10) Results of testing for animal diseases not required to be
reported under chapter 16.36 RCW that is done at the request of the
animal owner or his or her designee that can be identified to a
particular business or individual.

--- END ---