BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.10.100 and 1995 c 305 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Retirement of a member for service shall be made by the retirement
board as follows:
(1) Any judge who, on August 9, 1971, or within one year
thereafter, shall have completed as a judge the years of actual service
required under chapter 2.12 RCW and who shall elect to become a member
of this system, shall in all respects be deemed qualified to retire
under this retirement system upon the member's written request.
(2) Any member who has completed fifteen or more years of service
may be retired upon the member's written request but shall not be
eligible to receive a retirement allowance until the member attains the
age of sixty years.
(3) ((Any member who attains the age of seventy-five years shall be
retired at the end of the calendar year in which the member attains
such age.
(4))) Any judge who involuntarily leaves service or who is
appointed to a position as a federal judge or federal magistrate at any
time after having served an aggregate of twelve years shall be eligible
to a partial retirement allowance computed according to RCW 2.10.110
and shall receive this allowance upon the attainment of the age of
sixty years and fifteen years after the beginning of the member's
judicial service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 3.74.030 (Mandatory retirement for
district judges) and 1984 c 258 s 56 & 1969 ex.s. c 6 s 1 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2012, if
the proposed amendment to Article IV, section 3(a) of the state
Constitution (Senate Joint Resolution No. .... (S-0615/11), eliminating
the mandatory retirement age for judges) is validly submitted to and is
approved and ratified by the voters at the next general election. If
the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void
in its entirety.

--- END ---