BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.54.240 and 1990 c 280 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of health shall adopt rules as to which types of
cancer shall be reported, who shall report, and the form and timing of
the reports. A patient's usual occupation or, if the patient is
retired, the primary occupation of the patient before retirement must
be reported.
(2) Every health care facility and independent clinical laboratory,
and those physicians or others providing health care who diagnose or
treat any patient with cancer who is not hospitalized within one month
of diagnosis, will provide the contractor with the information required
under subsection (1) of this section. The required information may be
collected on a regional basis where such a system exists and forwarded
to the contractor in a form suitable for the purposes of RCW 70.54.230
through 70.54.270. Such reporting arrangements shall be reduced to a
written agreement between the contractor and any regional reporting
agency which shall detail the manner, form, and timeliness of the
reporting.

--- END ---