BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The liquor control board shall establish
a pilot project to allow spirits sampling in state liquor stores as
defined in RCW 66.16.010 and contract stores as defined in RCW
66.04.010(11) for the purpose of promoting the sponsor's products. For
purposes of this section, "sponsors" means: A domestic distiller
licensed under RCW 66.24.140 or an accredited representative of a
distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor
licensed under RCW 66.24.310.
(a) The pilot project shall consist of thirty locations with at
least six samplings to be conducted at each location between September
1, 2011, and September 1, 2012. However, no state liquor store or
contract store may hold more than one spirits sampling per week during
the project period.
(b) The pilot project locations shall be determined by the board.
Before the board determines which state liquor stores or contract
stores will be eligible to participate in the sampling pilot, it shall
give:
(i) Due consideration to the location of the state liquor store or
contract store with respect to the proximity of places of worship,
schools, and public institutions;
(ii) Due consideration to motor vehicle accident data in the
proximity of the state liquor store or contract store; and
(iii) Written notice by certified mail of the proposed spirits
sampling to places of worship, schools, and public institutions within
five hundred feet of the liquor store proposed to offer spirits
sampling.
(c) Sampling must be conducted under the following conditions:
(i) Samples may be provided free of charge;
(ii) Only persons twenty-one years of age or over may sample
spirits;
(iii) Each sample must be one-quarter ounce or less, with no more
than one ounce of samples provided per person per day;
(iv) Only sponsors may serve samples;
(v) Any person involved in the serving of such samples must have
completed a mandatory alcohol server training program;
(vi) No person who is apparently intoxicated may sample spirits;
(vii) The product provided for sampling must be available for sale
at the state liquor store or contract store where the sampling occurs
at the time of the sampling; and
(viii) Customers must remain on the state liquor store or contract
store premise while consuming samples.
(d) State liquor stores and contract stores may advertise a
sampling event only within the store, on a store web site, in store
newsletters and flyers, and via electronic mail and mail to customers
who have requested notice of events. Advertising under this subsection
may not be targeted to or appeal principally to youth.
(e) The liquor control board may prohibit sampling at a pilot
project location that is within the boundaries of an alcohol impact
area recognized by resolution of the board if the board finds that the
sampling activities at the location are having an adverse effect on the
reduction of chronic public inebriation in the area.
(f) All other criteria needed to establish and monitor the pilot
project shall be determined by the board.
(g) The board shall report on the pilot project to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2012. The board's report
shall include the results of a survey of liquor store managers and
contract liquor store managers.
(2) The liquor control board may adopt rules to implement this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.08.050 and 2005 c 151 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, subject to the provisions of this title and the rules,
shall:
(1) Determine the localities within which state liquor stores shall
be established throughout the state, and the number and situation of
the stores within each locality;
(2) Appoint in cities and towns and other communities, in which no
state liquor store is located, contract liquor stores. In addition,
the board may appoint, in its discretion, a manufacturer that also
manufactures liquor products other than wine under a license under this
title, as a contract liquor store for the purpose of sale of liquor
products of its own manufacture on the licensed premises only. Such
contract liquor stores shall be authorized to sell liquor under the
guidelines provided by law, rule, or contract, and such contract liquor
stores shall be subject to such additional rules and regulations
consistent with this title as the board may require. Sampling on
contract store premises is permitted under this act;
(3) Establish all necessary warehouses for the storing and
bottling, diluting and rectifying of stocks of liquors for the purposes
of this title;
(4) Provide for the leasing for periods not to exceed ten years of
all premises required for the conduct of the business; and for
remodeling the same, and the procuring of their furnishings, fixtures,
and supplies; and for obtaining options of renewal of such leases by
the lessee. The terms of such leases in all other respects shall be
subject to the direction of the board;
(5) Determine the nature, form and capacity of all packages to be
used for containing liquor kept for sale under this title;
(6) Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and
documents in the name of the board, under such regulations as the board
may fix;
(7) Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations
whatsoever relating to the business of the board;
(8) Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the
board, and to determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such
employee;
(9) Perform services for the state lottery commission to such
extent, and for such compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon
between the board and the commission;
(10) Accept and deposit into the general fund-local account and
disburse, subject to appropriation, federal grants or other funds or
donations from any source for the purpose of improving public awareness
of the health risks associated with alcohol consumption by youth and
the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington state. The board's
alcohol awareness program shall cooperate with federal and state
agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an active
public beverage alcohol awareness program;
(11) Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the
foregoing or not, to carry out the provisions of this title, and shall
have full power to do each and every act necessary to the conduct of
its business, including all buying, selling, preparation and approval
of forms, and every other function of the business whatsoever, subject
only to audit by the state auditor: PROVIDED, That the board shall
have no authority to regulate the content of spoken language on
licensed premises where wine and other liquors are served and where
there is not a clear and present danger of disorderly conduct being
provoked by such language.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.16.070 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
No employee in a state liquor store shall open or consume, or allow
to be opened or consumed any liquor on the store premises, except for
the purposes of conducting on-premise spirits sampling pursuant to the
provisions of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.28.040 and 2009 c 373 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as permitted by the board under RCW 66.20.010, no domestic
brewery, microbrewery, distributor, distiller, domestic winery,
importer, rectifier, certificate of approval holder, or other
manufacturer of liquor shall, within the state of Washington, give to
any person any liquor; but nothing in this section nor in RCW 66.28.010
shall prevent a domestic brewery, microbrewery, distributor, domestic
winery, distiller, certificate of approval holder, or importer from
furnishing samples of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to authorized
licensees for the purpose of negotiating a sale, in accordance with
regulations adopted by the liquor control board, provided that the
samples are subject to taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210,
and in the case of spirituous liquor, any product used for samples must
be purchased at retail from the board; nothing in this section shall
prevent the furnishing of samples of liquor to the board for the
purpose of negotiating the sale of liquor to the state liquor control
board; nothing in this section shall prevent a domestic brewery,
microbrewery, domestic winery, distillery, certificate of approval
holder, or distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or spirituous liquor
for instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150; nothing in this section
shall prevent a domestic winery, certificate of approval holder, or
distributor from furnishing wine without charge, subject to the taxes
imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a not-for-profit group organized and
operated solely for the purpose of enology or the study of viticulture
which has been in existence for at least six months and that uses wine
so furnished solely for such educational purposes or a domestic winery,
or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from furnishing wine
without charge or a domestic brewery, or an out-of-state certificate of
approval holder, from furnishing beer without charge, subject to the
taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, or a domestic distiller
licensed under RCW 66.24.140 or an accredited representative of a
distiller, manufacturer, importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor
licensed under RCW 66.24.310, from furnishing spirits without charge,
to a nonprofit charitable corporation or association exempt from
taxation under section 501(c)(3) or (6) of the internal revenue code of
1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or (6)) for use consistent with the
purpose or purposes entitling it to such exemption; nothing in this
section shall prevent a domestic brewery or microbrewery from serving
beer without charge, on the brewery premises; nothing in this section
shall prevent donations of wine for the purposes of RCW 66.12.180;
nothing in this section shall prevent a domestic winery from serving
wine without charge, on the winery premises; ((and)) nothing in this
section shall prevent a craft distillery from serving spirits without
charge, on the distillery premises subject to RCW 66.24.145; and
nothing in this section prohibits spirits sampling under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act expires December 1, 2012.

--- END ---