BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS. The legislature finds that:
(1) The ability to respond to emergency situations by many of
Washington state's police and sheriff jurisdictions has not kept up
with the state's needs, particularly in urban regions;
(2) Providing a public safety system requires a shared partnership
and responsibility among the federal, state, local, and regional
governments and the private sector;
(3) There are efficiencies to be gained by regional public safety
service delivery while retaining local control; and
(4) Timely development of significant projects can best be achieved
through enhanced funding options for regional public safety service
agencies, using already existing taxing authority to address police
service needs and new authority to address critical police projects and
services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the governing body of a regional public safety
authority.
(2) "Regional public safety authority" or "authority" means a
municipal corporation, an independent taxing authority within the
meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a
taxing district within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution, that has been created by a vote of the people under
this chapter to implement a regional public safety authority plan. The
district may include more than one city, town, port district, or Indian
tribe, if the legislative authority of each participating jurisdiction
has agreed to the inclusion as provided in an interlocal agreement
adopted pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW.
(3) "Regional public safety authority planning committee" or
"planning committee" means the advisory committee created under section
3 of this act to create and propose to jurisdictions a regional public
safety authority plan to design, finance, and develop police service
projects.
(4) "Regional public safety authority plan" or "plan" means a plan
to develop and finance a public safety authority project or projects,
including, but not limited to, specific capital projects, police
service operations pursuant to section 4(3)(b) of this act, and
preservation and maintenance of existing or future facilities.
(5) "Public safety jurisdiction" means a city, town, port district,
or Indian tribe.
(6) "Regular property taxes" has the same meaning as in RCW
84.04.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 PLANNING COMMITTEE--FORMATION--POWERS.
Regional public safety authority planning committees are advisory
entities that are created, convened, and empowered as follows:
(1) Any two or more adjacent public safety jurisdictions, or any
single jurisdiction wishing to create such a public safety authority,
may create a regional public safety authority and convene a regional
public safety authority planning committee. No public safety
jurisdiction may participate in more than one authority.
(2) Each governing body of the public safety jurisdictions
participating in planning under this chapter shall appoint three
elected officials to the authority planning committee. In the case
where a single agency wishes to create a public safety authority, the
entire council, board, or other policy-making body shall serve as the
planning authority. Individuals participating in planning under this
chapter may be reimbursed for travel and incidental expenses at the
discretion of their respective governing body.
(3) The planning committee shall conduct its affairs and formulate
a regional public safety authority plan as provided under section 4 of
this act.
(4) At its first meeting, a regional public safety authority
planning committee may elect officers and provide for the adoption of
rules and other operating procedures.
(5) The planning committee may dissolve itself at any time by a
majority vote of the total membership of the planning committee. Any
participating public safety jurisdiction may withdraw upon thirty
calendar days' written notice to the other jurisdictions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 PLANNING COMMITTEE--FORMULATION OF SERVICE
PLAN. (1) A regional public safety authority planning committee shall
adopt a regional public safety authority plan providing for the design,
financing, and development of police services. The planning committee
may consider the following factors in formulating its plan:
(a) Land use planning criteria; and
(b) The input of cities and counties located within, or partially
within, a participating public safety jurisdiction.
(2) The planning committee may coordinate its activities with
neighboring cities, towns, and other local governments that engage in
public safety planning.
(3) The planning committee shall:
(a) Create opportunities for public input in the development of the
plan;
(b) Adopt a plan proposing the creation of a regional public safety
authority and recommending design, financing, and development of police
service facilities and operations, including maintenance and
preservation of facilities or systems; and
(c) In the plan, recommend sources of revenue authorized by section
5 of this act, identify the portions of the plan that may be amended by
the board of the authority without voter approval, consistent with
section 5 of this act, and recommend a financing plan to fund selected
police services and projects.
(4) Once adopted, the plan must be forwarded to the participating
public safety jurisdictions' governing bodies to initiate the election
process under section 6 of this act.
(5) If the ballot measure is not approved, the planning committee
may redefine the selected regional public safety authority projects,
financing plan, and the ballot measure. The public safety
jurisdictions' governing bodies may approve the new plan and ballot
measure, and may then submit the revised proposition to the voters at
a subsequent election or a special election. If a ballot measure is
not approved by the voters by the third vote, the planning committee is
dissolved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 SERVICE PLAN--TAXES AND BENEFIT CHARGES.
(1) A regional public safety authority planning committee may, as part
of a regional public safety authority plan, recommend the imposition of
some or all of the following revenue sources, which a regional public
safety authority may impose upon approval of the voters as provided in
this chapter:
(a) Benefit charges under sections 16 through 25 of this act;
(b) Property taxes under sections 13 through 15 of this act and RCW
84.52.044, 84.09.030, 84.52.010, 84.52.052, and 84.52.069; or
(c) Both (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(2) The authority may impose taxes and benefit charges as set forth
in the regional public safety authority plan upon creation of the
authority, or as provided for in this chapter after creation of the
authority. If the plan authorizes the authority to impose benefit
charges or sixty percent voter approved taxes, the plan and creation of
the authority must be approved by an affirmative vote of sixty percent
of the voters within the boundaries of the authority voting on a ballot
proposition as set forth in section 6 of this act. However, if the
plan provides for alternative sources of revenue that become effective
if the plan and creation of the authority is approved only by a
majority vote, then the plan with alternative sources of revenue and
creation of the authority may be approved by an affirmative vote of the
majority of those voters. If the plan does not authorize the authority
to impose benefit charges or sixty percent voter approved taxes, the
plan and creation of the authority must be approved by an affirmative
vote of the majority of the voters within the boundaries of the
authority voting on a ballot proposition as set forth in section 6 of
this act. Except as provided in this section, all other voter approval
requirements under law for the levying of property taxes or the
imposition of benefit charges apply. Revenues from these taxes and
benefit charges may be used only to implement the plan as set forth in
this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 SERVICE PLAN--SUBMISSION TO VOTERS. The
governing body or bodies of one or more public safety jurisdictions,
upon receipt of the regional public safety authority plan under section
4 of this act, may certify the plan to the ballot, including
identification of the revenue options specified to fund the plan. The
governing bodies of the public safety jurisdictions may draft a ballot
title, give notice as required by law for ballot measures, and perform
other duties as required to put the plan before the voters of the
proposed authority for their approval or rejection as a single ballot
measure that both approves formation of the authority and approves the
plan. Authorities may negotiate interlocal agreements necessary to
implement the plan. The electorate is the voters voting within the
boundaries of the proposed regional public safety authority. A simple
majority of the total persons voting on the single ballot measure to
approve the plan and establish the authority is required for approval.
However, if the plan authorizes the authority to impose benefit charges
or sixty percent voter approved taxes, then the percentage of total
persons voting on the single ballot measure to approve the plan and
establish the authority is the same as in section 5 of this act. The
authority must act in accordance with the general election laws of the
state. The authority is liable for its proportionate share of the
costs when the elections are held under RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 PUBLIC SAFETY AUTHORITY--FORMATION--CHALLENGES. If the voters approve the plan, including creation of a
regional public safety authority and imposition of taxes and benefit
charges, if any, the authority is formed on the next January 1st or
July 1st, whichever occurs first. The appropriate county election
officials shall, within fifteen days of the final certification of the
election results, publish a notice in a newspaper or newspapers of
general circulation in the authority declaring the authority formed.
A party challenging the procedure or the formation of a voter-approved
authority must file the challenge in writing by serving the prosecuting
attorney of each county within, or partially within, the regional
public safety authority and the attorney general within thirty days
after the final certification of the election. Failure to challenge
within that time forever bars further challenge of the authority's
valid formation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 ORGANIZATION AND COMPOSITION OF GOVERNING
BOARD. (1) The board shall adopt rules for the conduct of business.
The board shall adopt bylaws to govern authority affairs, which may
include:
(a) The time and place of regular meetings;
(b) Rules for calling special meetings;
(c) The method of keeping records of proceedings and official acts;
(d) Procedures for the safekeeping and disbursement of funds; and
(e) Any other provisions the board finds necessary to include.
(2) The governing board shall be determined by the plan and consist
solely of elected officials.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 POWERS OF GOVERNING BOARD. The governing
board of the authority is responsible for the execution of the voter-approved plan. Participating jurisdictions shall review the plan every
ten years. The board may:
(1) Levy taxes and impose benefit charges as authorized in the plan
and approved by authority voters;
(2) Enter into agreements with federal, state, local, and regional
entities and departments as necessary to accomplish authority purposes
and protect the authority's investments;
(3) Accept gifts, grants, or other contributions of funds that will
support the purposes and programs of the authority;
(4) Monitor and audit the progress and execution of police service
projects to protect the investment of the public and annually make
public its findings;
(5) Pay for services and enter into leases and contracts, including
professional service contracts;
(6) Hire, manage, and terminate employees; and
(7) Exercise powers and perform duties as the board determines
necessary to carry out the purposes, functions, and projects of the
authority in accordance with this chapter, unless provided otherwise in
the regional public safety authority plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 TRANSFER OF RESPONSIBILITIES AND EMPLOYEES
TO AUTHORITY--CIVIL SERVICE SYSTEM. (1) Except as otherwise provided
in the regional public safety authority plan, all powers, duties, and
functions of a participating jurisdiction pertaining to police services
shall be transferred to the regional public safety authority on its
creation date.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in the regional public safety
authority plan, and on the creation date of the regional public safety
authority, all reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the participating
jurisdiction pertaining to police services powers, functions, and
duties shall be delivered to the regional public safety authority; all
real property and personal property including cabinets, furniture,
office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed
by the participating jurisdiction in carrying out the police services
powers, functions, and duties shall be transferred to the regional
public safety authority; and all funds, credits, or other assets held
by the participating jurisdiction in connection with the police
services powers, functions, and duties shall be transferred and
credited to the regional public safety authority.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in the regional public safety
authority plan, any appropriations made to the participating
jurisdiction for carrying out the police services powers, functions,
and duties shall be transferred and credited to the regional public
safety authority.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in the regional public safety
authority plan, whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
governing body of the participating jurisdiction shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in the regional public safety
authority plan, all rules and all pending business before the
participating jurisdiction pertaining to the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the regional
public safety authority, and all existing contracts and obligations
shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the regional
public safety authority.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the participating jurisdiction shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before creation of the regional public safety authority.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers, the treasurer for the authority shall certify the
apportionments.
(6)(a) Subject to (c) of this subsection, all police employees of
the participating jurisdiction are transferred to the jurisdiction of
the regional public safety authority on its creation date. Upon
transfer, unless an agreement for different terms of transfer is
reached between the collective bargaining representatives of the
transferring employees and the participating jurisdiction, an employee
is entitled to the employee rights, benefits, and privileges to which
he or she would have been entitled as an employee of a participating
jurisdiction, including rights to:
(i) Compensation at least equal to the level at the time of
transfer;
(ii) Retirement, vacation, sick leave, and any other accrued
benefit;
(iii) Promotion and service time accrual; and
(iv) The length or terms of probationary periods, including no
requirement for an additional probationary period if one had been
completed before the transfer date.
(b) If any or all of the participating jurisdictions provide for
civil service in their police departments, the collective bargaining
representatives of the transferring employees and the participating
jurisdictions must negotiate regarding the establishment of a civil
service system within the authority. This subsection does not apply if
none of the participating jurisdictions provide for civil service.
(c) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified as provided by law.
(7) This section does not apply to a public safety jurisdiction
with regard to police services it provides to a participating
jurisdiction by contract or interlocal agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 WITHDRAWAL, REANNEXATION OF TERRITORY. (1)
As provided in this section, a regional public safety authority may
withdraw areas from its boundaries or reannex into the authority areas
that previously had been withdrawn from the authority under this
section.
(2)(a) The withdrawal of an area is authorized upon: (i) Adoption
of a resolution by the board approving the withdrawal and finding that,
in the opinion of the board, inclusion of this area within the regional
public safety authority will result in a reduction of the authority's
tax levy rate under the provisions of RCW 84.52.010; or (ii) adoption
of a resolution by the city or town council approving the withdrawal,
if the area is located within the city or town, or adoption of a
resolution by the governing body of the jurisdiction within which the
area is located approving the withdrawal, if the area is located
outside of a city or town.
(b) A withdrawal under this section is effective at the end of the
day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the
resolution under (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection is adopted, but for
purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the
boundaries shall be established immediately upon the adoption of the
resolution.
(c) The withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of an authority
does not exempt any property therein from taxation for the purpose of
paying the costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the authority
existing at the time of withdrawal.
(3)(a) An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a
regional public safety authority under this section may be reannexed
into the authority upon: (i) Adoption of a resolution by the board
proposing the reannexation; and (ii) adoption of a resolution by the
city or town council approving the reannexation, if the area is located
within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the governing
body of the jurisdiction within which the area is located approving the
reannexation, if the area is located outside of a city or town.
(b) A reannexation under this section shall be effective at the end
of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the
adoption of the resolution under (a)(ii) of this subsection occurs, but
for purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the
boundaries shall be established immediately upon the adoption of the
resolution.
(c)(i) Referendum action on the proposed reannexation under this
section may be taken by the voters of the area proposed to be reannexed
if a petition calling for a referendum is filed with the city or town
council within a thirty-day period after the adoption of the resolution
under (a)(ii) of this subsection, which petition has been signed by
registered voters of the area proposed to be reannexed equal in number
to ten percent of the total number of the registered voters residing in
that area.
(ii) If a valid petition signed by the requisite number of
registered voters has been so filed, the effect of the resolutions
shall be held in abeyance and a ballot proposition to authorize the
reannexation shall be submitted to the voters of the area at the next
special election date specified in RCW 29A.04.330 that occurs forty-five or more days after the petitions have been validated. Approval of
the ballot proposition authorizing the reannexation by a simple
majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 DEBT--INTERLOCAL CONTRACTS--GENERAL
OBLIGATION BONDS. (1) An authority may incur general indebtedness for
authority purposes, issue bonds, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness not to exceed an amount, together with any outstanding
nonvoter approved general obligation debt, equal to three-fourths of
one percent of the value of the taxable property within the authority.
The maximum term of the obligations may not exceed thirty years. The
obligations may pledge benefit charges and may pledge payments to an
authority from the state, the federal government, or any public safety
jurisdiction under an interlocal contract. The interlocal contracts
pledging revenues and taxes are binding for a term not to exceed thirty
years, and taxes or other revenue pledged by an interlocal contract may
not be eliminated or modified if it would impair the pledge of the
contract.
(2) An authority may also issue general obligation bonds for
capital purposes not to exceed an amount, together with any outstanding
general obligation debt, equal to one and one-half percent of the value
of the taxable property within the authority. The authority may
provide for the retirement of the bonds by excess property tax levies.
The voters of the authority must approve a proposition authorizing the
bonds and levies by an affirmative vote of three-fifths of those voting
on the proposition at an election. At the election, the total number
of persons voting must constitute not less than forty percent of the
voters in the authority who voted at the last preceding general state
election. The maximum term of the bonds may not exceed twenty-five
years. Elections shall be held as provided in RCW 39.36.050.
(3) Obligations of an authority shall be issued and sold in
accordance with chapters 39.46 and 39.50 RCW, as applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 LEVY OF TAXES--LEVIES AUTHORIZED BY SPECIAL
ELECTION--INDEBTEDNESS--DEFINITION. (1) To carry out the purposes for
which a regional public safety authority is created, as authorized in
the plan and approved by the voters, the governing board of an
authority may annually levy the following taxes:
(a) An ad valorem tax on all taxable property located within the
authority not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value;
(b) An ad valorem tax on all property located within the authority
not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value and
which will not cause the combined levies to exceed the constitutional
or statutory limitations. This levy, or any portion of this levy, may
also be made when dollar rates of other taxing units are released by
agreement with the other taxing units from their authorized levies; and
(c) An ad valorem tax on all taxable property located within the
authority not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value if the authority has at least one full-time, paid employee, or
contracts with another municipal corporation for the services of at
least one full-time, paid employee. This levy may be made only if it
will not affect dollar rates which other taxing districts may lawfully
claim nor cause the combined levies to exceed the constitutional or
statutory limitations or both.
(2) Levies in excess of the amounts provided in subsection (1) of
this section or in excess of the aggregate dollar rate limitations or
both may be made for any authority purpose when so authorized at a
special election under RCW 84.52.052. Any such tax when levied must be
certified to the proper county officials for the collection of the tax
as for other general taxes. The taxes when collected shall be placed
in the appropriate authority fund or funds as provided by law, and must
be paid out on warrants of the auditor of the county in which all, or
the largest portion of, the authority is located, upon authorization of
the governing board of the authority.
(3) Authorities may provide for the retirement of general
indebtedness by excess property tax levies as set forth in section 12
of this act.
(4) For purposes of this chapter, the term "value of the taxable
property" has the same meaning as in RCW 39.36.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 LEVY OF TAXES--TO BE MADE BY COUNTY OR
COUNTIES WHERE AUTHORITY IS LOCATED. At the time of making general tax
levies in each year, the county legislative authority or authorities of
the county or counties in which a regional public safety authority is
located shall make the required levies for authority purposes against
the real and personal property in the authority in accordance with the
equalized valuations of the property for general tax purposes and as a
part of the general taxes. The tax levies are part of the general tax
roll and must be collected as a part of the general taxes against the
property in the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 COLLECTION OF TAXES. It is the duty of the
county treasurer of the county in which the regional public safety
authority created under this chapter is located to collect taxes
authorized and levied under this chapter. However, when a regional
public safety authority is located in more than one county, the county
treasurer of each county in which the authority is located shall
collect the regional public safety authority's taxes that are imposed
on property located within the county and transfer these funds to the
treasurer of the county in which the majority of the authority lies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 BENEFIT CHARGES. (1) The governing board
of a regional public safety authority may by resolution, as authorized
in the plan and approved by the voters, for authority purposes
authorized by law, fix and impose a benefit charge on personal property
and improvements to real property which are located within the
authority on the date specified and which have received or will receive
the benefits provided by the authority, to be paid by the owners of the
properties. A benefit charge does not apply to personal property and
improvements to real property owned or used by any recognized religious
denomination or religious organization as, or including, a sanctuary or
for purposes related to the bona fide religious ministries of the
denomination or religious organization, including schools and
educational facilities used for kindergarten, primary, or secondary
educational purposes or for institutions of higher education and all
grounds and buildings related thereto. However, a benefit charge does
apply to personal property and improvements to real property owned or
used by any recognized religious denomination or religious organization
for business operations, profit-making enterprises, or activities not
including use of a sanctuary or related to kindergarten, primary, or
secondary educational purposes or for institutions of higher education.
The aggregate amount of these benefit charges in any one year may not
exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of the operating budget for the
year in which the benefit charge is to be collected. It is the duty of
the county legislative authority or authorities of the county or
counties in which the regional public safety authority is located to
make any necessary adjustments to assure compliance with this
limitation and to immediately notify the governing board of an
authority of any changes thereof.
(2) A benefit charge imposed must be reasonably proportioned to the
measurable benefits to property resulting from the services afforded by
the authority. It is acceptable to apportion the benefit charge to the
values of the properties as found by the county assessor. Any other
method that reasonably apportions the benefit charges to the actual
benefits resulting from the degree of protection or the need of the
properties for specialized services, may be specified in the resolution
and is subject to contest on the grounds of unreasonable or capricious
action or action in excess of the measurable benefits to the property
resulting from services afforded by the authority. The governing board
of an authority may determine that certain properties or types or
classes of properties are not receiving measurable benefits based on
criteria they establish by resolution.
(3) For administrative purposes, the benefit charge imposed on any
individual property may be compiled into a single charge, provided that
the authority, upon request of the property owner, provide an itemized
list of charges for each measurable benefit included in the charge.
(4) For the purposes of this section and sections 17 through 25 of
this act, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Personal property" includes every form of tangible personal
property including, but not limited to, all goods, chattels, stock in
trade, estates, or crops.
(b) "Personal property" does not include any personal property used
for farming, field crops, farm equipment, or livestock.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 BENEFIT CHARGES--EXEMPTIONS. All personal
property not assessed and subjected to ad valorem taxation under Title
84 RCW, all property under contract or for which the regional public
safety authority is receiving payment for as authorized by law, all
property subject to chapter 54.28 RCW, and all property that is subject
to a contract for services with an authority, is exempt from the
benefit charge imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 BENEFIT CHARGES--RESOLUTION--COUNTY
ASSESSOR'S DUTIES. (1) The resolution establishing benefit charges as
specified in section 16 of this act must specify, by legal geographical
areas or other specific designations, the charge to apply to each
property by location, type, or other designation, or other information
that is necessary to the proper computation of the benefit charge to be
charged to each property owner subject to the resolution.
(2) The county assessor of each county in which the regional public
safety authority is located shall determine and identify the personal
properties and improvements to real property that are subject to a
benefit charge in each authority and shall furnish and deliver to the
county treasurer of that county a listing of the properties with
information describing the location, legal description, and address of
the person to whom the statement of benefit charges is to be mailed,
the name of the owner, and the value of the property and improvements,
together with the benefit charge to apply to each.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 BENEFIT CHARGES--ADMINISTRATION AND
COLLECTION BY COUNTY TREASURER. Each regional public safety authority
shall contract, prior to the imposition of a benefit charge, for the
administration and collection of the benefit charge by each county
treasurer, who shall deduct a percentage, as provided by contract to
reimburse the county for expenses incurred by the county assessor and
county treasurer in the administration of the resolution and this
chapter. The county treasurer shall make distributions each year, as
the charges are collected, in the amount of the benefit charges imposed
on behalf of each authority, less the deduction provided for in the
contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 BENEFIT CHARGES--SUBMISSION TO VOTERS--RENEWAL. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter to
the contrary, any benefit charge authorized by this chapter is not
effective unless a proposition to impose the benefit charge is approved
by a sixty percent majority of the voters of the regional public safety
authority voting at a general election or at a special election called
by the authority for that purpose, held within the authority. A ballot
measure that contains an authorization to impose benefit charges and
that is approved by the voters pursuant to section 6 of this act meets
the proposition approval requirement of this section. An election held
under this section must be held not more than twelve months prior to
the date on which the first charge is to be assessed. A benefit charge
approved at an election expires in ten years or fewer as authorized by
the voters, unless subsequently reapproved by the voters.
(2) The ballot must be submitted so as to enable the voters
favoring the authorization of a regional public safety authority
benefit charge to vote "Yes" and those opposed to vote "No." The
ballot question is as follows:

"Shall . . . . . . the regional public safety authority
composed of (insert the participating jurisdictions) . . . . .
be authorized to impose benefit charges each year for . . . .
(insert number of years not to exceed ten) years, not to exceed
an amount equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and
be prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under
section 13(1)(c) of this act?

YES NO
□ □"

(3) Authorities renewing the benefit charge may elect to use the
following alternative ballot:

"Shall . . . . . the regional public safety authority composed
of (insert the participating jurisdictions) . . . . . . be
authorized to continue voter-authorized benefit charges each
year for . . . . (insert number of years not to exceed ten)
years, not to exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of its
operating budget, and be prohibited from imposing an additional
property tax under section 13(1)(c) of this act?

YES NO
□ □"

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 BENEFIT CHARGES--ESTABLISHMENT--PUBLIC
HEARINGS--NOTICE TO PROPERTY OWNERS. (1) Not fewer than ten days nor
more than six months before the election at which the proposition to
impose the benefit charge is submitted as provided in this chapter, the
governing board of the regional public safety authority shall hold a
public hearing specifically setting forth its proposal to impose
benefit charges for the support of its legally authorized activities
that will maintain or improve the services afforded in the authority.
A report of the public hearing shall be filed with the county treasurer
of each county in which the property is located and be available for
public inspection.
(2) Prior to November 15th of each year the governing board of the
authority shall hold a public hearing to review and establish the
regional public safety authority benefit charges for the subsequent
year.
(3) All resolutions imposing or changing the benefit charges must
be filed with the county treasurer or treasurers of each county in
which the property is located, together with the record of each public
hearing, before November 30th immediately preceding the year in which
the benefit charges are to be collected on behalf of the authority.
(4) After the benefit charges have been established, the owners of
the property subject to the charge must be notified of the amount of
the charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 BENEFIT CHARGES--LIMITATION ON IMPOSITION
OF PROPERTY TAX. A regional public safety authority that imposes a
benefit charge under this chapter shall not impose all or part of the
property tax authorized under section 13(1)(c) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 BENEFIT CHARGES--COMPLAINTS--REVIEW BOARD.
After notice has been given to the property owners of the amount of the
charge, the governing board of a regional public safety authority
imposing a benefit charge under this chapter shall form a review board
for at least a two-week period and shall, upon complaint in writing of
an aggrieved party owning property in the authority, reduce the charge
of a person who, in their opinion, has been charged too large a sum, to
a sum or amount as they believe to be the true, fair, and just amount.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 BENEFIT CHARGES--MODEL RESOLUTION--ASSISTANCE BY WASHINGTON ASSOCIATION OF SHERIFFS AND POLICE CHIEFS.
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, as soon as
practicable, shall draft a model resolution to impose the regional
public safety authority benefit charge authorized by this chapter and
may provide assistance to authorities in the establishment of a program
to develop benefit charges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 BENEFIT CHARGES--ADDITIONAL EXEMPTION. A
person who is receiving the exemption contained in RCW 84.36.381
through 84.36.389 is exempt from any legal obligation to pay a portion
of the benefit charge imposed under this chapter as follows:
(1) A person who meets the income limitation contained in RCW
84.36.381(5)(a) and does not meet the income limitation contained in
RCW 84.36.381(5)(b) (i) or (ii) is exempt from twenty-five percent of
the charge;
(2) A person who meets the income limitation contained in RCW
84.36.381(5)(b)(i) is exempt from fifty percent of the charge; and
(3) A person who meets the income limitation contained in RCW
84.36.381(5)(b)(ii) shall be exempt from seventy-five percent of the
charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 CIVIL SERVICE--WHEN AUTHORIZED OR REQUIRED.
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a regional public safety
authority may, by resolution of its board, provide for civil service
for its employees in the same manner, with the same powers, and with
the same force and effect as provided by chapter 41.08 RCW for cities,
towns, and municipalities, including restrictions against the discharge
of an employee because of residence outside the limits of the regional
public safety authority.
(2) If an agreement is reached to provide for civil service under
section 10(6) of this act, the regional public safety authority shall
establish such a system as is required by the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 ANNEXATION OF TERRITORY. Territory that is
annexed to a participating jurisdiction is annexed to the authority as
of the effective date of the annexation. The statutes regarding
transfer of assets and employees do not apply to the participating
jurisdictions in the annexation.

Sec. 28 RCW 57.90.010 and 2004 c 129 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Water-sewer, park and recreation, metropolitan park, county rural
library, cemetery, flood control, mosquito control, diking and
drainage, irrigation or reclamation, weed, health, or fire protection
districts, and any air pollution control authority ((or)), regional
fire protection service authority, or regional public safety authority,
hereinafter referred to as "special districts," which are located
wholly or in part within a county with a population of two hundred ten
thousand or more may be disincorporated when the district has not
actively carried out any of the special purposes or functions for which
it was formed within the preceding consecutive five-year period.

Sec. 29 RCW 84.09.030 and 2008 c 86 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (1), for the
purposes of property taxation and the levy of property taxes, the
boundaries of counties, cities, and all other taxing districts shall be
the established official boundaries of such districts existing on the
first day of August of the year in which the property tax levy is made.
(b) The boundaries for a newly incorporated port district ((or)),
regional fire protection service authority, or regional public safety
authority shall be established on the first day of October if the
boundaries of the newly incorporated port district ((or)), regional
fire protection service authority, or regional public safety authority
are coterminous with the boundaries of another taxing district or
districts, as they existed on the first day of August of that year.
(2) In any case where any instrument setting forth the official
boundaries of any newly established taxing district, or setting forth
any change in the boundaries, is required by law to be filed in the
office of the county auditor or other county official, the instrument
shall be filed in triplicate. The officer with whom the instrument is
filed shall transmit two copies of the instrument to the county
assessor.
(3) No property tax levy shall be made for any taxing district
whose boundaries are not established as of the dates provided in this
section.

Sec. 30 RCW 84.52.010 and 2009 c 551 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and
purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on
any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of
these sections, the assessor shall recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(1) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy shall take precedence over all other levies and
shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130,
84.34.230, 84.52.069, 84.52.105, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120,
84.52.125, 84.52.135, and 84.52.140, the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then
these levies shall be reduced as follows:
(a) The levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.140 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(b) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a fire
protection district that is protected under RCW 84.52.125 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(c) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(d) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(e) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(f) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; and
(g) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or eliminated.
(2) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(a) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(b) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(c) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire
protection service authorities, regional public safety authorities,
library districts, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, and the
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for
public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or
eliminated;
(d) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 ((and)),
regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b)
and (c), and regional public safety authorities under section 13(1) (b)
and (c) of this act shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
and
(f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection
service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), regional public safety
authorities under section 13(1)(a) of this act, library districts,
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 A new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a city or town is a participating public safety jurisdiction
in a regional public safety authority, the regular levies of the city
or town shall not exceed the applicable rates provided in RCW
27.12.390, 52.04.081, and 84.52.043(1) less the aggregate rates of any
regular levies made by the authority under RCW 52.26.140(1).
(2) If a port district is a participating public safety
jurisdiction in a regional public safety authority, the regular levy of
the port district under RCW 53.36.020 shall not exceed forty-five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value of taxable property in the
district less the aggregate rates of any regular levies imposed by the
authority under RCW 52.26.140(1).
(3) For purposes of this section, "participating public safety
jurisdiction" means a city, town, Indian tribe, or port district that
is represented on the governing board of a regional public safety
authority.

Sec. 32 RCW 84.52.052 and 2004 c 129 s 22 are each amended to
read as follows:
The limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and RCW
84.52.043 shall not prevent the levy of additional taxes by any taxing
district, except school districts and fire protection districts, in
which a larger levy is necessary in order to prevent the impairment of
the obligation of contracts. As used in this section, the term "taxing
district" means any county, metropolitan park district, park and
recreation service area, park and recreation district, water-sewer
district, solid waste disposal district, public facilities district,
flood control zone district, county rail district, service district,
public hospital district, road district, rural county library district,
island library district, rural partial-county library district,
intercounty rural library district, cemetery district, city, town,
transportation benefit district, emergency medical service district
with a population density of less than one thousand per square mile,
cultural arts, stadium, and convention district, ferry district, city
transportation authority, ((or)) regional fire protection service
authority, or regional public safety authority.
Any such taxing district may levy taxes at a rate in excess of the
rate specified in RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056 and 84.52.043, or
84.55.010 through 84.55.050, when authorized so to do by the voters of
such taxing district in the manner set forth in Article VII, section
2(a) of the Constitution of this state at a special or general election
to be held in the year in which the levy is made.
A special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by the
county legislative authority, or council, board of commissioners, or
other governing body of any such taxing district, by giving notice
thereof by publication in the manner provided by law for giving notices
of general elections, at which special election the proposition
authorizing such excess levy shall be submitted in such form as to
enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote "yes" and those
opposed thereto to vote "no."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 Sections 1 through 27 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

--- END ---