BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
There shall be a license to allow a VIP airport lounge operator to
sell or otherwise provide spirits, wine, and beer solely for
consumption on the premises of a VIP airport lounge. The license
described in this section allows the VIP airport lounge operator to
purchase spirits from the board, and to purchase beer and wine at
retail outlets, or from the manufacturer or a distributor. No licensee
may serve liquor from a bar where patrons may sit to be served, but may
only serve liquor from a service bar, as approved by the board. The
annual fee for this license shall be two thousand dollars.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.04.010 and 2009 c 373 s 1 and 2009 c 271 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
In this title, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated
oxide of ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the
fermentation or distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or
other substances including all dilutions and mixtures of this
substance. The term "alcohol" does not include alcohol in the
possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described
in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel
for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements
of husbandry.
(2) "Authorized representative" means a person who:
(a) Is required to have a federal basic permit issued pursuant to
the federal alcohol administration act, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 204;
(b) Has its business located in the United States outside of the
state of Washington;
(c) Acquires ownership of beer or wine for transportation into and
resale in the state of Washington; and which beer or wine is produced
by a brewery or winery in the United States outside of the state of
Washington; and
(d) Is appointed by the brewery or winery referenced in (c) of this
subsection as its authorized representative for marketing and selling
its products within the United States in accordance with a written
agreement between the authorized representative and such brewery or
winery pursuant to this title.
(3) "Beer" means any malt beverage, flavored malt beverage, or malt
liquor as these terms are defined in this chapter.
(4) "Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a domestic
brewery, microbrewery, beer certificate of approval holder, or beer
importers, or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to
this title, or who represents such brewer or brewery as agent.
(5) "Beer importer" means a person or business within Washington
who purchases beer from a beer certificate of approval holder or who
acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside of the United
States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.
(6) "Board" means the liquor control board, constituted under this
title.
(7) "Brewer" or "brewery" means any person engaged in the business
of manufacturing beer and malt liquor. Brewer includes a brand owner
of malt beverages who holds a brewer's notice with the federal bureau
of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location outside the state and
whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed in-state
brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a domestic
brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to licensed
beer distributors, and exporting beer from the state.
(8) "Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated or
unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent, educational,
athletic or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.
(9) "Confection" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other
natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits,
nuts, dairy products, or flavorings, in the form of bars, drops, or
pieces.
(10) "Consume" includes the putting of liquor to any use, whether
by drinking or otherwise.
(11) "Contract liquor store" means a business that sells liquor on
behalf of the board through a contract with a contract liquor store
manager.
(12) "Craft distillery" means a distillery that pays the reduced
licensing fee under RCW 66.24.140.
(13) "Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and regularly
licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within the state
pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.
(14) "Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of
distilling spirits.
(15) "Domestic brewery" means a place where beer and malt liquor
are manufactured or produced by a brewer within the state.
(16) "Domestic winery" means a place where wines are manufactured
or produced within the state of Washington.
(17) "Drug store" means a place whose principal business is, the
sale of drugs, medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and maintains
a regular prescription department and employs a registered pharmacist
during all hours the drug store is open.
(18) "Druggist" means any person who holds a valid certificate and
is a registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly engaged in
carrying on the business of pharmaceutical chemistry pursuant to
chapter 18.64 RCW.
(19) "Employee" means any person employed by the board.
(20) "Flavored malt beverage" means:
(a) A malt beverage containing six percent or less alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than forty-nine
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content; or
(b) A malt beverage containing more than six percent alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than one and one-half
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content.
(21) "Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'
(22) "Hotel" means buildings, structures, and grounds, having
facilities for preparing, cooking, and serving food, that are kept,
used, maintained, advertised, or held out to the public to be a place
where food is served and sleeping accommodations are offered for pay to
transient guests, in which twenty or more rooms are used for the
sleeping accommodation of such transient guests. The buildings,
structures, and grounds must be located on adjacent property either
owned or leased by the same person or persons.
(23) "Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits from a
distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such spirituous
liquor into the state for sale to the board or for export.
(24) "Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.
(25) "Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein defined
(alcohol, spirits, wine and beer), and all fermented, spirituous,
vinous, or malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed liquor, a
part of which is fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt liquor, or
otherwise intoxicating; and every liquid or solid or semisolid or other
substance, patented or not, containing alcohol, spirits, wine or beer,
and all drinks or drinkable liquids and all preparations or mixtures
capable of human consumption, and any liquid, semisolid, solid, or
other substance, which contains more than one percent of alcohol by
weight shall be conclusively deemed to be intoxicating. Liquor does
not include confections or food products that contain one percent or
less of alcohol by weight.
(26) "Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage such as
beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the alcoholic
fermentation of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or pure extract
of hops and pure barley malt or other wholesome grain or cereal in pure
water containing not more than eight percent of alcohol by weight, and
not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume. For the
purposes of this title, any such beverage containing more than eight
percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as "strong beer."
(27) "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the preparation of
liquor for sale, in any form whatsoever.
(28) "Nightclub" means an establishment that provides entertainment
and has as its primary source of revenue (a) the sale of alcohol for
consumption on the premises, (b) cover charges, or (c) both, and has an
occupancy load of one hundred or more.
(29) "Package" means any container or receptacle used for holding
liquor.
(30) "Passenger vessel" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or
other floating craft of any kind carrying passengers for compensation.
(31) "Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor under this
title.
(32) "Person" means an individual, copartnership, association, or
corporation.
(33) "Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and regularly
licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within the state
pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW.
(34) "Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a physician and
given by him to a patient for the obtaining of liquor pursuant to this
title for medicinal purposes.
(35) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of incorporated
cities and towns; state or county or township highways or roads;
buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance halls and
grounds adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments where beer may
be sold under this title, soft drink establishments, public buildings,
public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and dining rooms of hotels,
restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling stations which are
open to and are generally used by the public and to which the public is
permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains, stages, and
other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and the depots and
waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are open to
unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned bathing
beaches, parks, and/or playgrounds; and all other places of like or
similar nature to which the general public has unrestricted right of
access, and which are generally used by the public.
(36) "Regulations" means regulations made by the board under the
powers conferred by this title.
(37) "Restaurant" means any establishment provided with special
space and accommodations where, in consideration of payment, food,
without lodgings, is habitually furnished to the public, not including
drug stores and soda fountains.
(38) "Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and traffic; and
also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by any means
whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as beer or
by any name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed liquor or
of wine, by any person to any person; and also include a sale or
selling within the state to a foreign consignee or his agent in the
state. "Sale" and "sell" shall not include the giving, at no charge,
of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person not licensed by the board
to a person not licensed by the board, for personal use only. "Sale"
and "sell" also does not include a raffle authorized under RCW
9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That the nonprofit organization conducting the
raffle has obtained the appropriate permit from the board.
(39) "Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped with
apparatus for the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed or
otherwise.
(40) "Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol obtained
by distillation, except flavored malt beverages, but including wines
exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume.
(41) "Store" means a state liquor store established under this
title.
(42) "Tavern" means any establishment with special space and
accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on the
premises, of beer, as herein defined.
(43)(a) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by
fermentation of fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other
agricultural product containing sugar, to which any saccharine
substances may have been added before, during or after fermentation,
and containing not more than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume,
including sweet wines fortified with wine spirits, such as port,
sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four percent of
alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol
by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more
than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by
the manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage
containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume
when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as
"fortified wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (i)
Wines that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years
or more; and (ii) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol
by volume solely as a result of the natural fermentation process and
that have not been produced with the addition of wine spirits, brandy,
or alcohol.
(b) This subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any
wine be labeled with the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."
(44) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from a
domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, or wine importer,
or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of the
United States, for the purpose of selling the same not in violation of
this title, or who represents such vintner or winery as agent.
(45) "Wine importer" means a person or business within Washington
who purchases wine from a wine certificate of approval holder or who
acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of the United
States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.
(46) "Winery" means a business conducted by any person for the
manufacture of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.
(47) "VIP airport lounge" means an establishment within an
international airport located beyond security checkpoints that provides
a special space to sit, relax, read, work, and enjoy beverages where
access is controlled by the VIP airport lounge operator and is
generally limited to the following classifications of persons:
(a) Airline passengers of any age whose admission is based on a
first-class, executive, or business class ticket;
(b) Airline passengers of any age who are qualified members or
allowed guests of certain frequent flyer or other loyalty incentive
programs maintained by airlines that have agreements describing the
conditions for access to the VIP airport lounge;
(c) Airline passengers of any age who are qualified members or
allowed guests of certain enhanced amenities programs maintained by
companies that have agreements describing the conditions for access to
the VIP airport lounge;
(d) Airport and airline employees, government officials, foreign
dignitaries, and other attendees of functions held by the airport
authority or airlines related to the promotion of business objectives
such as increasing international air traffic and enhancing foreign
trade where access to the VIP airport lounge will be controlled by the
VIP airport lounge operator; and
(e) Airline passengers of any age or airline employees whose
admission is based on a pass issued or permission given by the airline
for access to the VIP airport lounge.
(48) "VIP airport lounge operator" means an airline, port district,
or other entity operating a VIP airport lounge that: Is accountable
for compliance with the alcohol beverage control act under Title 66
RCW; holds the license under chapter 66.24 RCW issued to the VIP
airport lounge; and provides a point of contact for addressing any
licensing and enforcement by the board.
(49) "Service bar" means a fixed or portable table, counter, cart,
or similar work station primarily used to prepare, mix, serve, and sell
alcohol that is picked up by employees or customers. Customers may not
be seated or allowed to consume food or alcohol at a service bar.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.24.440 and 2009 c 271 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each spirits, beer, and wine restaurant, spirits, beer, and wine
private club, hotel, spirits, beer, and wine nightclub, ((and)) sports
entertainment facility licensee, and VIP airport lounge licensee shall
be entitled to purchase any spirituous liquor items salable under such
license from the board at a discount of not less than fifteen percent
from the retail price fixed by the board, together with all taxes.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.20.310 and 2010 c 141 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) There shall be an alcohol server permit, known as a class 12
permit, for a manager or bartender selling or mixing alcohol, spirits,
wines, or beer for consumption at an on-premises licensed facility.
(b) There shall be an alcohol server permit, known as a class 13
permit, for a person who only serves alcohol, spirits, wines, or beer
for consumption at an on-premises licensed facility.
(c) As provided by rule by the board, a class 13 permit holder may
be allowed to act as a bartender without holding a class 12 permit.
(2)(a) Effective January 1, 1997, except as provided in (d) of this
subsection, every alcohol server employed, under contract or otherwise,
at a retail licensed premise shall be issued a class 12 or class 13
permit.
(b) Every class 12 and class 13 permit issued shall be issued in
the name of the applicant and no other person may use the permit of
another permit holder. The holder shall present the permit upon
request to inspection by a representative of the board or a peace
officer. The class 12 or class 13 permit shall be valid for employment
at any retail licensed premises described in (a) of this subsection.
(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, no licensee
holding a license as authorized by RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350,
66.24.400, 66.24.425, 66.24.450, 66.24.570, ((and)) 66.24.600, and
section 1 of this act may employ or accept the services of any person
without the person first having a valid class 12 or class 13 permit.
(d) Within sixty days of initial employment, every person whose
duties include the compounding, sale, service, or handling of liquor
shall have a class 12 or class 13 permit.
(e) No person may perform duties that include the sale or service
of alcoholic beverages on a retail licensed premises without possessing
a valid alcohol server permit.
(3) A permit issued by a training entity under this section is
valid for employment at any retail licensed premises described in
subsection (2)(a) of this section for a period of five years unless
suspended by the board.
(4) The board may suspend or revoke an existing permit if any of
the following occur:
(a) The applicant or permittee has been convicted of violating any
of the state or local intoxicating liquor laws of this state or has
been convicted at any time of a felony; or
(b) The permittee has performed or permitted any act that
constitutes a violation of this title or of any rule of the board.
(5) The suspension or revocation of a permit under this section
does not relieve a licensee from responsibility for any act of the
employee or agent while employed upon the retail licensed premises.
The board may, as appropriate, revoke or suspend either the permit of
the employee who committed the violation or the license of the licensee
upon whose premises the violation occurred, or both the permit and the
license.
(6)(a) After January 1, 1997, it is a violation of this title for
any retail licensee or agent of a retail licensee as described in
subsection (2)(a) of this section to employ in the sale or service of
alcoholic beverages, any person who does not have a valid alcohol
server permit or whose permit has been revoked, suspended, or denied.
(b) It is a violation of this title for a person whose alcohol
server permit has been denied, suspended, or revoked to accept
employment in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages.
(7) Grocery stores licensed under RCW 66.24.360, the primary
commercial activity of which is the sale of grocery products and for
which the sale and service of beer and wine for on-premises consumption
with food is incidental to the primary business, and employees of such
establishments, are exempt from RCW 66.20.300 through 66.20.350, except
for employees whose duties include serving during tasting activities
under RCW 66.24.363.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.20.300 and 2010 c 141 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 66.20.310 through 66.20.350.
(1) "Alcohol" has the same meaning as "liquor" in RCW 66.04.010.
(2) "Alcohol server" means any person who as part of his or her
employment participates in the sale or service of alcoholic beverages
for on-premise consumption at a retail licensed premise as a regular
requirement of his or her employment, and includes those persons
eighteen years of age or older permitted by the liquor laws of this
state to serve alcoholic beverages with meals.
(3) "Board" means the Washington state liquor control board.
(4) "Training entity" means any liquor licensee associations,
independent contractors, private persons, and private or public
schools, that have been certified by the board.
(5) "Retail licensed premises" means any:
(a) Premises licensed to sell alcohol by the glass or by the drink,
or in original containers primarily for consumption on the premises as
authorized by RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, 66.24.400,
66.24.425, 66.24.450, and 66.24.570, and section 1 of this act;
(b) Distillery licensed pursuant to RCW 66.24.140 that is
authorized to serve samples of its own production;
(c) Facility established by a domestic winery for serving and
selling wine pursuant to RCW 66.24.170(4); and
(d) Grocery store licensed under RCW 66.24.360, but only with
respect to employees whose duties include serving during tasting
activities under RCW 66.24.363.

Sec. 6 RCW 66.08.180 and 2009 c 271 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as provided in RCW 66.24.290(1), moneys in the liquor
revolving fund shall be distributed by the board at least once every
three months in accordance with RCW 66.08.190, 66.08.200 and
66.08.210((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the board shall reserve from
distribution such amount not exceeding five hundred thousand dollars as
may be necessary for the proper administration of this title.
(1) All license fees, penalties, and forfeitures derived under
chapter 13, Laws of 1935 from spirits, beer, and wine restaurant;
spirits, beer, and wine private club; hotel; spirits, beer, and wine
nightclub; spirits, beer, and wine VIP airport lounge; and sports
entertainment facility licenses shall every three months be disbursed
by the board as follows:
(a) Three hundred thousand dollars per biennium, to the death
investigations account for the state toxicology program pursuant to RCW
68.50.107; and
(b) Of the remaining funds:
(i) 6.06 percent to the University of Washington and 4.04 percent
to Washington State University for alcoholism and drug abuse research
and for the dissemination of such research; and
(ii) 89.9 percent to the general fund to be used by the department
of social and health services solely to carry out the purposes of RCW
70.96A.050;
(2) The first fifty-five dollars per license fee provided in RCW
66.24.320 and 66.24.330 up to a maximum of one hundred fifty thousand
dollars annually shall be disbursed every three months by the board to
the general fund to be used for juvenile alcohol and drug prevention
programs for kindergarten through third grade to be administered by the
superintendent of public instruction;
(3) Twenty percent of the remaining total amount derived from
license fees pursuant to RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, and
66.24.360, shall be transferred to the general fund to be used by the
department of social and health services solely to carry out the
purposes of RCW 70.96A.050; and
(4) One-fourth cent per liter of the tax imposed by RCW 66.24.210
shall every three months be disbursed by the board to Washington State
University solely for wine and wine grape research, extension programs
related to wine and wine grape research, and resident instruction in
both wine grape production and the processing aspects of the wine
industry in accordance with RCW 28B.30.068. The director of financial
management shall prescribe suitable accounting procedures to ensure
that the funds transferred to the general fund to be used by the
department of social and health services and appropriated are
separately accounted for.

Sec. 7 RCW 66.08.220 and 2009 c 271 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall set aside in a separate account in the liquor
revolving fund an amount equal to ten percent of its gross sales of
liquor to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine
private club; spirits, beer, and wine nightclub; hotel; spirits, beer,
and wine VIP airport lounge; and sports entertainment facility
licensees collected from these licensees pursuant to the provisions of
RCW 82.08.150, less the fifteen percent discount provided for in RCW
66.24.440; and the moneys in said separate account shall be distributed
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 66.08.190, 66.08.200 and
66.08.210. No election unit in which the sale of liquor under spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club;
spirits, beer, and wine nightclub; and sports entertainment facility
licenses is unlawful shall be entitled to share in the distribution of
moneys from such separate account.

Sec. 8 RCW 68.50.107 and 2009 c 271 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be established in conjunction with the chief of the
Washington state patrol and under the authority of the state forensic
investigations council a state toxicological laboratory under the
direction of the state toxicologist whose duty it will be to perform
all necessary toxicologic procedures requested by all coroners, medical
examiners, and prosecuting attorneys. The state forensic
investigations council, after consulting with the chief of the
Washington state patrol and director of the bureau of forensic
laboratory services, shall appoint a toxicologist as state
toxicologist, who shall report to the director of the bureau of
forensic laboratory services and the office of the chief of the
Washington state patrol. Toxicological services shall be funded by
disbursement from the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits,
beer, and wine private club; spirits, beer, and wine nightclub;
spirits, beer, and wine VIP airport lounge; and sports entertainment
facility license fees as provided in RCW 66.08.180 and by appropriation
from the death investigations account as provided in RCW 43.79.445.

--- END ---