BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.08.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 196 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
A district may apply to the United States for permission to
establish, operate, and maintain foreign trade zones: (1) Within the
district; and (2) on property adjacent to but outside the district if
the property is beyond the boundaries of any existing foreign trade
zone grantee and is not currently designated as a foreign trade zone:
PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall be construed to prevent such zones
from being operated and financed by a private corporation(s) on behalf
of such district acting as zone sponsor: PROVIDED FURTHER, That when
the money so raised is to be used exclusively for the purpose of
acquiring land for sites and constructing warehouses, storage plants,
and other facilities to be constructed within the zone for use in the
operation and maintenance of the zones, the district may contract
indebtedness and issue general bonds therefor in an amount, in addition
to the three-fourths of one percent hereinafter fixed, of one percent
of the value of the taxable property in the district, as the term
"value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, such
additional indebtedness only to be incurred with the assent of three-fifths of the voters of the district voting thereon.

--- END ---