BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.09.060 and 2007 c 480 s 11 and 2007 c 106 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall prescribe the form and contents of the
notification and application. The forest practices rules shall specify
by whom and under what conditions the notification and application
shall be signed or otherwise certified as acceptable. Activities
conducted by the department or a contractor under the direction of the
department under the provisions of RCW 76.04.660, shall be exempt from
the landowner signature requirement on any forest practice application
required to be filed. The application or notification shall be
delivered in person to the department, sent by first-class mail to the
department or electronically filed in a form defined by the department.
The form for electronic filing shall be readily convertible to a paper
copy, which shall be available to the public pursuant to chapter 42.56
RCW. The information required may include, but is not limited to:
(a) Name and address of the forest landowner, timber owner, and
operator;
(b) Description of the proposed forest practice or practices to be
conducted;
(c) Legal description and tax parcel identification numbers of the
land on which the forest practices are to be conducted;
(d) Planimetric and topographic maps showing location and size of
all lakes and streams and other public waters in and immediately
adjacent to the operating area and showing all existing and proposed
roads and major tractor roads;
(e) Description of the silvicultural, harvesting, or other forest
practice methods to be used, including the type of equipment to be used
and materials to be applied;
(f) Proposed plan for reforestation and for any revegetation
necessary to reduce erosion potential from roadsides and yarding roads,
as required by the forest practices rules;
(g) Soil, geological, and hydrological data with respect to forest
practices;
(h) The expected dates of commencement and completion of all forest
practices specified in the application;
(i) Provisions for continuing maintenance of roads and other
construction or other measures necessary to afford protection to public
resources;
(j) An affirmation that the statements contained in the
notification or application are true; and
(k) All necessary application or notification fees.
(2) Long range plans may be submitted to the department for review
and consultation.
(3) The application for a forest practice or the notification of a
forest practice is subject to the reforestation requirement of RCW
76.09.070.
(a) If the application states that any land will be or is intended
to be converted:
(i) The reforestation requirements of this chapter and of the
forest practices rules shall not apply if the land is in fact converted
unless applicable alternatives or limitations are provided in forest
practices rules issued under RCW 76.09.070;
(ii) Completion of such forest practice operations shall be deemed
conversion of the lands to another use for purposes of chapters 84.33
and 84.34 RCW unless the conversion is to a use permitted under a
current use tax agreement permitted under chapter 84.34 RCW;
(iii) The forest practices described in the application are subject
to applicable county, city, town, and regional governmental authority
permitted under RCW 76.09.240 as well as the forest practices rules.
(b) Except as provided elsewhere in this section, if the landowner
harvests without an approved application or notification or the
landowner does not state that any land covered by the application or
notification will be or is intended to be converted, and the department
or the county, city, town, or regional governmental entity becomes
aware of conversion activities to a use other than commercial timber
operations, as that term is defined in RCW 76.09.020, then the
department shall send to the department of ecology and the appropriate
county, city, town, and regional governmental entities the following
documents:
(i) A notice of a conversion to nonforestry use;
(ii) A copy of the applicable forest practices application or
notification, if any; and
(iii) Copies of any applicable outstanding final orders or
decisions issued by the department related to the forest practices
application or notification.
(c) Failure to comply with the reforestation requirements contained
in any final order or decision shall constitute a removal of
designation under the provisions of RCW 84.33.140, and a change of use
under the provisions of RCW 84.34.080, and, if applicable, shall
subject such lands to the payments and/or penalties resulting from such
removals or changes.
(d) Conversion to a use other than commercial forest product
operations within six years after approval of the forest practices
application or notification without the consent of the county, city, or
town shall constitute a violation of each of the county, municipal
city, town, and regional authorities to which the forest practice
operations would have been subject if the application had stated an
intent to convert.
(e) Land that is the subject of a notice of conversion to a
nonforestry use produced by the department and sent to the department
of ecology and a local government under this subsection is subject to
the development prohibition and conditions provided in RCW 76.09.460.
(f) Landowners who have not stated an intent to convert the land
covered by an application or notification and who decide to convert the
land to a nonforestry use within six years of receiving an approved
application or notification must do so in a manner consistent with RCW
76.09.470.
(g) The application or notification must include a statement
requiring an acknowledgment by the forest landowner of his or her
intent with respect to conversion and acknowledging that he or she is
familiar with the effects of this subsection.
(4) Whenever an approved application authorizes a forest practice
which, because of soil condition, proximity to a water course or other
unusual factor, has a potential for causing material damage to a public
resource, as determined by the department, the applicant shall, when
requested on the approved application, notify the department two days
before the commencement of actual operations.
(5) Before the operator commences any forest practice in a manner
or to an extent significantly different from that described in a
previously approved application or notification, there shall be
submitted to the department a new application or notification form in
the manner set forth in this section.
(6) Except as provided in RCW 76.09.350(4), the notification to or
the approval given by the department to an application to conduct a
forest practice shall be effective for a term of ((two)) five years
from the date of approval or notification and ((shall not be renewed
unless)) is eligible for renewal for a second, five-year period if the
harvest has not been completed after the initial five-year period.
Nothing in this section precludes the applicant from applying for a new
application ((is filed and approved)) or a new notification ((has been
filed)) after the renewal period has lapsed. At the option of the
applicant, an application or notification may be submitted to cover a
single forest practice or a number of forest practices within
reasonable geographic or political boundaries as specified by the
department. An application or notification that covers more than one
forest practice may have an effective term of more than ((two)) five
years. The board shall adopt rules that establish standards and
procedures for approving an application or notification that has an
effective term of more than ((two)) five years. Such rules shall
include extended time periods for application or notification approval
or disapproval. On an approved application with a term of more than
((two)) five years, the applicant shall inform the department before
commencing operations.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no prior
application or notification shall be required for any emergency forest
practice necessitated by fire, flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other
emergency as defined by the board, but the operator shall submit an
application or notification, whichever is applicable, to the department
within forty-eight hours after commencement of such practice or as
required by local regulations.
(8) Forest practices applications or notifications are not required
for forest practices conducted to control exotic forest insect or
disease outbreaks, when conducted by or under the direction of the
department of agriculture in carrying out an order of the governor or
director of the department of agriculture to implement pest control
measures as authorized under chapter 17.24 RCW, and are not required
when conducted by or under the direction of the department in carrying
out emergency measures under a forest health emergency declaration by
the commissioner of public lands as provided in RCW 76.06.130.
(a) For the purposes of this subsection, exotic forest insect or
disease has the same meaning as defined in RCW 76.06.020.
(b) In order to minimize adverse impacts to public resources,
control measures must be based on integrated pest management, as
defined in RCW 17.15.010, and must follow forest practices rules
relating to road construction and maintenance, timber harvest, and
forest chemicals, to the extent possible without compromising control
objectives.
(c) Agencies conducting or directing control efforts must provide
advance notice to the appropriate regulatory staff of the department of
the operations that would be subject to exemption from forest practices
application or notification requirements.
(d) When the appropriate regulatory staff of the department are
notified under (c) of this subsection, they must consult with the
landowner, interested agencies, and affected tribes, and assist the
notifying agencies in the development of integrated pest management
plans that comply with forest practices rules as required under (b) of
this subsection.
(e) Nothing under this subsection relieves agencies conducting or
directing control efforts from requirements of the federal clean water
act as administered by the department of ecology under RCW 90.48.260.
(f) Forest lands where trees have been cut as part of an exotic
forest insect or disease control effort under this subsection are
subject to reforestation requirements under RCW 76.09.070.
(g) The exemption from obtaining approved forest practices
applications or notifications does not apply to forest practices
conducted after the governor, the director of the department of
agriculture, or the commissioner of public lands have declared that an
emergency no longer exists because control objectives have been met,
that there is no longer an imminent threat, or that there is no longer
a good likelihood of control.

--- END ---