BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.32.520 and 2009 c 226 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as specified in subsection (3) of this section, upon
receipt of proper proofs of death of any member before retirement or
before the first installment of his or her retirement allowance shall
become due his or her accumulated contributions, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
and/or other benefits payable upon his or her death shall be paid to
his or her estate or to such persons, trust, or organization as he or
she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed
with the department. If a member fails to file a new beneficiary
designation subsequent to marriage, divorce, or reestablishment of
membership following termination by withdrawal, lapsation, or
retirement, payment of his or her accumulated contributions, less any
amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated
contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
and/or other benefits upon death before retirement shall be made to the
surviving spouse, if any; otherwise, to his or her estate. If a member
had established ten or more years of Washington membership service
credit or was eligible for retirement, the beneficiary or the surviving
spouse if otherwise eligible may elect, in lieu of a cash refund of the
member's accumulated contributions, the following survivor benefit plan
actuarially reduced, except under subsection (4) of this section, by
the amount of any lump sum benefit identified as owing to an obligee
upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order
filed under RCW 41.50.670:
(a) A widow or widower, without a child or children under eighteen
years of age, may elect a monthly payment of fifty dollars to become
effective at age fifty, provided the member had fifteen or more years
of Washington membership service credit. A benefit paid under this
subsection (1)(a) shall terminate at the marriage of the beneficiary.
(b) The beneficiary, if a surviving spouse or a dependent (as that
term is used in computing the dependent exemption for federal internal
revenue purposes) may elect to receive a joint and one hundred percent
retirement allowance under RCW 41.32.530.
(i) In the case of a dependent child the allowance shall continue
until attainment of majority or so long as the department judges that
the circumstances which created his or her dependent status continue to
exist. In any case, if at the time dependent status ceases, an amount
equal to the amount of accumulated contributions of the deceased member
has not been paid to the beneficiary, the remainder shall then be paid
in a lump sum to the beneficiary.
(ii) If at the time of death, the member was not then qualified for
a service retirement allowance, the benefit shall be based upon the
actuarial equivalent of the sum necessary to pay the accrued regular
retirement allowance commencing when the deceased member would have
first qualified for a service retirement allowance.
(c) A beneficiary who qualifies for survivor benefits under (b) of
this subsection and who is the beneficiary of a member who was eligible
for retirement may choose the following survivor benefit plan in lieu
of the allowance provided in (b) of this subsection. The qualified
beneficiary may irrevocably elect to withdraw all or a part of the
member's accumulated contributions, other than any amount paid under
RCW 41.50.165(2), and receive a reduction in the allowance provided
under (b) of this subsection of the actuarially determined amount of
monthly annuity that would have been purchased by the contributions.
(2) If no qualified beneficiary survives a member, at his or her
death his or her accumulated contributions, less any amount identified
as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions
pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to
his or her estate, or his or her dependents may qualify for survivor
benefits under benefit plan (1)(b) or (1)(c) in lieu of a cash refund
of the members accumulated contributions in the following order: Widow
or widower, guardian of a dependent child or children under age
eighteen, or dependent parent or parents.
(3) If a member dies within sixty days following application for
disability retirement under RCW 41.32.550, the beneficiary named in the
application may elect to receive the benefit provided by:
(a) This section; or
(b) RCW 41.32.550, according to the option chosen under RCW
41.32.530 in the disability application.
(4) The retirement allowance of a member who is killed in the
course of employment, as determined by the director of the department
of labor and industries, or the retirement allowance of a member who
has left the employ of an employer due to service in the national guard
or military reserves and dies while honorably serving in the national
guard or military reserves during a period of war as defined in RCW
41.04.005, is not subject to an actuarial reduction. The member's
retirement allowance is computed under RCW 41.32.480.

--- END ---