BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.32.020 and 1982 c 226 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board of county commissioners of each county shall divide their
county into three commissioner districts so that each district shall
comprise as nearly as possible one-third of the population of the
county: PROVIDED, That the territory comprised in any voting precincts
of such districts shall remain compact, and shall not be divided by the
lines of said districts.
However, the commissioners of any county composed entirely of
islands and with a population of less than thirty-five thousand may
divide their county into three commissioner districts without regard to
population, except that if any single island is included in more than
one district, the districts on such island shall comprise, as nearly as
possible, equal populations.
The lines of the districts shall not be changed ((oftener)) more
than once in four years and only when a full board of commissioners is
present. The lines of the districts shall not be changed during the
period beginning thirty days before the first day of the period allowed
under RCW 29A.24.081 for the filing of a declaration of candidacy by
mail and ending the day after the county canvassing board certifies the
general election results under RCW 29A.60.190. The districts shall be
designated as districts numbered one, two, and three.

--- END ---