BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.09.360 and 2006 c 212 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this chapter, any city,
county, or other political subdivision of this state, or any state
agency, may regulate the operation of nonhighway vehicles on public
lands, waters, and other properties under its jurisdiction, and on
streets, roads, or highways within its boundaries by adopting
regulations or ordinances of its governing body, provided such
regulations are not less stringent than the provisions of this chapter.
However, the legislative body of a city with a population of ((less))
fewer than three thousand persons, or the legislative body of a county
with a population of no more than five thousand persons, may, by
ordinance, designate a street, road, or highway within its boundaries
to be suitable for use by off-road vehicles. The legislative body of
a county with a population of more than five thousand persons may, by
ordinance, designate a road or highway within its boundaries to be
suitable for use by off-road vehicles if the road or highway is a
direct connection between a city with a population of ((less)) fewer
than three thousand persons and an off-road vehicle recreation
facility.

--- END ---