BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
MISCELLANEOUS TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS AND CLARIFICATIONS
Sec. 101 RCW 82.04.290 and 2008 c 81 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal
to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.
(2)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in any business
activity other than or in addition to an activity taxed explicitly
under another section in this chapter or subsection (1) or (3) of this
section; as to such persons the amount of tax on account of such
activities shall be equal to the gross income of the business
multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.
(b) This subsection (2) includes, among others, and without
limiting the scope hereof (whether or not title to materials used in
the performance of such business passes to another by accession,
confusion or other than by outright sale), persons engaged in the
business of rendering any type of service which does not constitute a
"sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The value of advertising,
demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials furnished to an
agent by his principal or supplier to be used for informational,
educational and promotional purposes shall not be considered a part of
the agent's remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to
taxation under this section.
(3)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of performing aerospace product development for
others, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by a rate of 0.9 percent.
(b) "Aerospace product development" has the meaning as provided in
RCW 82.04.4461.

Sec. 102 RCW 82.04.645 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 110 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to amounts received by a financial
institution from an affiliated person if the amounts are received from
transactions that are required to be at arm's length under sections 23A
or 23B of the federal reserve act as existing on June 1, 2010, or such
subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule,
consistent with the purposes of this section. For purposes of this
subsection, "financial institution" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.080.
(2) As used in this section, "affiliated" means under common
control. "((Common)) Control" means the possession, directly or
indirectly, of more than fifty percent of the power to direct or cause
the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether
through the ownership of voting shares, by contract, or otherwise.

Sec. 103 RCW 82.08.0297 and 1998 c 79 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to
sales of eligible foods ((which)) that are purchased with ((coupons
issued under the food stamp act of 1977 or food stamp or coupon
benefits transferred electronically)) benefits under the supplemental
nutrition assistance program or successor program, notwithstanding
anything to the contrary in RCW 82.08.0293.
(2) When a purchase of eligible foods is made with a combination of
((coupons issued under the food stamp act of 1977 or food stamp or
coupon benefits transferred electronically)) benefits under the
supplemental nutrition assistance program or successor program and
cash, check, or similar payment, the cash, check, or similar payment
((shall)) must be applied first to food products exempt from tax under
RCW 82.08.0293 whenever possible.
(3) As used in this section((,)):
(a) "Eligible foods" ((shall have the same meaning as that
established under federal law for purposes of the food stamp act of
1977)) means foods that are eligible for purchase with benefits under
the supplemental nutrition assistance program or successor program.
(b) "Supplemental nutrition assistance program" refers to a food
assistance program that is administered, at the federal level, by the
United States department of agriculture, and was formerly known as the
food stamp program.

Sec. 104 RCW 82.12.0297 and 1998 c 79 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter ((shall)) do not apply with
respect to the use of eligible foods ((which)) that are purchased with
((coupons issued under the food stamp act of 1977 or food stamp or
coupon benefits transferred electronically)) benefits under the
supplemental nutrition assistance program or successor program,
notwithstanding anything to the contrary in RCW 82.12.0293.
((As used in this section, "eligible foods" shall have the same
meaning as that established under federal law for purposes of the food
stamp act of 1977.)) (2) The definitions in RCW 82.08.0297 apply to
this section.

Sec. 105 RCW 84.36.381 and 2010 c 106 s 306 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person is exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a
portion of the amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and
payable in the year following the year in which a claim is filed, and
thereafter, in accordance with the following:
(1) The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence
which was occupied by the person claiming the exemption as a principal
place of residence as of the time of filing. However, any person who
sells, transfers, or is displaced from his or her residence may
transfer his or her exemption status to a replacement residence, but no
claimant may receive an exemption on more than one residence in any
year. Moreover, confinement of the person to a hospital, nursing home,
boarding home, or adult family home does not disqualify the claim of
exemption if:
(a) The residence is temporarily unoccupied;
(b) The residence is occupied by a spouse or a domestic partner
and/or a person financially dependent on the claimant for support; or
(c) The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home,
hospital, boarding home, or adult family home costs;
(2) The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time
of filing, in fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the
residence on which the property taxes have been imposed or if the
person claiming the exemption lives in a cooperative housing
association, corporation, or partnership, such person must own a share
therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in which he
or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or state registered domestic partnership or owned
by cotenants is deemed to be owned by each spouse or each domestic
partner or each cotenant, and any lease for life is deemed a life
estate;
(3)(a) The person claiming the exemption must be (((a))):
(i) Sixty-one years of age or older on December 31st of the year in
which the exemption claim is filed, or must have been, at the time of
filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason of
disability((,)); or
(((b))) (ii) A veteran of the armed forces of the United States
((with one hundred percent service-connected disability as provided in
42 U.S.C. Sec. 423 (d)(1)(A) as amended prior to January 1, 2005, or
such subsequent date as the department may provide by rule consistent
with the purpose of this section)) entitled to and receiving
compensation from the United States department of veterans affairs at
a total disability rating for a service-connected disability.
(b) However, any surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of
a person who was receiving an exemption at the time of the person's
death will qualify if the surviving spouse or surviving domestic
partner is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the
requirements of this section;
(4) The amount that the person is exempt from an obligation to pay
is calculated on the basis of combined disposable income, as defined in
RCW 84.36.383. If the person claiming the exemption was retired for
two months or more of the assessment year, the combined disposable
income of such person must be calculated by multiplying the average
monthly combined disposable income of such person during the months
such person was retired by twelve. If the income of the person
claiming exemption is reduced for two or more months of the assessment
year by reason of the death of the person's spouse or the person's
domestic partner, or when other substantial changes occur in disposable
income that are likely to continue for an indefinite period of time,
the combined disposable income of such person must be calculated by
multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of such
person after such occurrences by twelve. If it is necessary to
estimate income to comply with this subsection, the assessor may
require confirming documentation of such income prior to May 31 of the
year following application;
(5)(a) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty-five thousand dollars or less is
exempt from all excess property taxes; and
(b)(i) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has
a combined disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less but
greater than twenty-five thousand dollars is exempt from all regular
property taxes on the greater of fifty thousand dollars or thirty-five
percent of the valuation of his or her residence, but not to exceed
seventy thousand dollars of the valuation of his or her residence; or
(ii) A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a
combined disposable income of twenty-five thousand dollars or less is
exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater of sixty thousand
dollars or sixty percent of the valuation of his or her residence;
(6)(a) For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and
has a combined disposable income of thirty-five thousand dollars or
less, the valuation of the residence is the assessed value of the
residence on the later of January 1, 1995, or January 1st of the
assessment year the person first qualifies under this section. If the
person subsequently fails to qualify under this section only for one
year because of high income, this same valuation must be used upon
requalification. If the person fails to qualify for more than one year
in succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any other
reason, the valuation upon requalification is the assessed value on
January 1st of the assessment year in which the person requalifies. If
the person transfers the exemption under this section to a different
residence, the valuation of the different residence is the assessed
value of the different residence on January 1st of the assessment year
in which the person transfers the exemption.
(b) In no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater
than the true and fair value of the residence on January 1st of the
assessment year.
(c) This subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to
the property in the year in which the improvements are made.
Subsequent improvements to the property must be added to the value
otherwise determined under this subsection at their true and fair value
in the year in which they are made.

Sec. 106 RCW 84.36.385 and 2010 c 106 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A claim for exemption under RCW 84.36.381 as now or hereafter
amended, may be made and filed at any time during the year for
exemption from taxes payable the following year and thereafter and
solely upon forms as prescribed and furnished by the department of
revenue. However, an exemption from tax under RCW 84.36.381 continues
for no more than six years unless a renewal application is filed as
provided in subsection (3) of this section. ((The county assessor may
also require, by written notice, a renewal application following an
amendment of the income requirements set forth in RCW 84.36.381.
Renewal applications must be on forms prescribed and furnished by the
department of revenue.))
(2) A person granted an exemption under RCW 84.36.381 must inform
the county assessor of any change in status affecting the person's
entitlement to the exemption on forms prescribed and furnished by the
department of revenue.
(3) Each person exempt from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 in 1993 and
thereafter, must file with the county assessor a renewal application
not later than December 31 of the year the assessor notifies such
person of the requirement to file the renewal application. Renewal
applications must be on forms prescribed and furnished by the
department of revenue.
(4) ((Beginning in 1992 and in each of the three succeeding
years,)) At least once every six years, the county assessor must notify
((approximately one-fourth of)) those persons ((exempt)) receiving an
exemption from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 ((in the current year who have
not filed a renewal application within the previous four years,)) of
the requirement to file a renewal application. The county assessor may
also require a renewal application following an amendment of the income
requirements set forth in RCW 84.36.381.
(5) If the assessor finds that the applicant does not meet the
qualifications as set forth in RCW 84.36.381, as now or hereafter
amended, the claim or exemption must be denied but such denial is
subject to appeal under the provisions of RCW 84.48.010 and in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. If the applicant had
received exemption in prior years based on erroneous information, the
taxes must be collected subject to penalties as provided in RCW
84.40.130 for a period of not to exceed five years.
(6) The department and each local assessor is hereby directed to
publicize the qualifications and manner of making claims under RCW
84.36.381 through 84.36.389, through communications media, including
such paid advertisements or notices as it deems appropriate. Notice of
the qualifications, method of making applications, the penalties for
not reporting a change in status, and availability of further
information must be included on or with property tax statements and
revaluation notices for all residential property including mobile
homes, except rental properties.

Sec. 107 RCW 82.14.049 and 2008 c 264 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of any county may impose a sales and
use tax, in addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030, upon
retail car rentals within the county that are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of tax ((shall be)) is
one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or rental
value of the vehicle in the case of a use tax. Proceeds of the tax
((shall)) may not be used to subsidize any professional sports team and
((shall)) must be used solely for the following purposes:
(((1))) (a) Acquiring, constructing, maintaining, or operating
public sports stadium facilities;
(((2))) (b) Engineering, planning, financial, legal, or
professional services incidental to public sports stadium facilities;
(((3))) (c) Youth or amateur sport activities or facilities; or
(((4))) (d) Debt or refinancing debt issued for the purposes of
subsection (1) of this section.
((At least seventy-five percent of the tax imposed under this
section shall be used for the purposes of subsections (1), (2), and (4)
of this section.)) (2) In a county of one million or more, at least
seventy-five percent of the tax imposed under this section ((shall))
must be used to retire the debt on the stadium under RCW
67.28.180(2)(b)(ii), until that debt is fully retired.

PART II
UPDATING STATUTORY REFERENCES
Sec. 201 RCW 35.102.150 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 519 are each
amended to read as follows:
Notwithstanding RCW 35.102.130, a city that imposes a business and
occupation tax must allocate a person's gross income from the
activities of printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals, or
magazines, to the principal place in this state from which the
taxpayer's business is directed or managed. As used in this section,
the activities of printing, and of publishing newspapers, periodicals,
or magazines are those activities to which the tax rates in RCW
82.04.260(13) and 82.04.280(1)(a) apply.

Sec. 202 RCW 82.04.050 and 2010 c 112 s 14, 2010 c 111 s 201, and
2010 c 106 s 202 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of
tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who:
(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; or
(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065; or
(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that
is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any
activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of
this subsection following such use.
(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to
persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280
(1)((, (2), and (7))) (a), (b), and (g), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor
and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities,
and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made
for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere
leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure
upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys
the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person
performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of
performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property
is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the
original owner;
(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel,
rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of
any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the
renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the
occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more
constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license
to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is
presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging
for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital
goods for consumers;
(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of
this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and
services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons
in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or
"retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be
resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; and
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services.
(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property to consumers.
(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone
service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as
those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer
software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end
user. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a), the sale of prewritten
computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an
enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to
activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use.
There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten
computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by
the vendor or by the purchaser.
The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made
for:
(i) Custom software; or
(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.
(b)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the
right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession
of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party,
regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per
user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.
(ii)(A) The service described in (b)(i) of this subsection (6)
includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software to
perform data processing.
(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(b)(ii), "data processing"
means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the
required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to
usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image
processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing,
claim processing, and similar activities.
(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an
extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection,
"extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to
perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no
additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property,
labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or
repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of
specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an
agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in
this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and
the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the
tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of
this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.010.
(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of
digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:
(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right
of permanent use;
(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of
use that is less than permanent;
(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make
continued payment as a condition of the sale; and
(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale.
(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital
automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services
provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital
goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a
separate charge is made for such services.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or
for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent
use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the
seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the
transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the
occurrence of a condition subsequent.
(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible
personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate
period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is
necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed.
For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than
maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.
(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or
the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or
improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.
(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning
up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste
and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and
development.
(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for
labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements
providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway
equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the
labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency,
as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.
(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service
described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a
"sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.

Sec. 203 RCW 82.04.460 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 108 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person
earning apportionable income taxable under this chapter and also
taxable in another state((,)) must, for the purpose of computing tax
liability under this chapter, apportion to this state, in accordance
with RCW 82.04.462, that portion of the person's apportionable income
derived from business activities performed within this state.
(2) The department must by rule provide a method of apportioning
the apportionable income of financial institutions, where such
apportionable income is taxable under RCW 82.04.290. The rule adopted
by the department must, to the extent feasible, be consistent with the
multistate tax commission's recommended formula for the apportionment
and allocation of net income of financial institutions as existing on
June 1, 2010, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section,
except that:
(a) The department's rule must provide for a single factor
apportionment method based on the receipts factor; and
(b) The definition of "financial institution" contained in appendix
A to the multistate tax commission's recommended formula for the
apportionment and allocation of net income of financial institutions is
advisory only.
(3) The department may by rule provide a method or methods of
apportioning or allocating gross income derived from sales of
telecommunications service and competitive telephone service taxed
under this chapter, if the gross proceeds of sales subject to tax under
this chapter do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's
income attributable to this state. The rule must provide for an
equitable and constitutionally permissible division of the tax base.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "Apportionable income" means gross income of the business
generated from engaging in apportionable activities, including income
received from apportionable activities performed outside this state if
the income would be taxable under this chapter if received from
activities in this state, less the exemptions and deductions allowable
under this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, "apportionable
activities" means only those activities taxed under:
(i) RCW 82.04.255;
(ii) RCW 82.04.260 (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), and (12);
(iii) RCW 82.04.280(((5))) (1)(e);
(iv) RCW 82.04.285;
(v) RCW 82.04.286;
(vi) RCW 82.04.290;
(vii) RCW 82.04.2907;
(viii) RCW 82.04.2908;
(ix) RCW 82.04.263, but only to the extent of any activity that
would be taxable under any of the provisions enumerated under (a)(i)
through (viii) of this subsection (4) if the tax classification in RCW
82.04.263 did not exist; and
(x) RCW 82.04.260(13) and 82.04.280(1)(a), but only with respect to
advertising.
(b)(i) "Taxable in another state" means that the taxpayer is
subject to a business activities tax by another state on its income
received from engaging in apportionable activities; or the taxpayer is
not subject to a business activities tax by another state on its income
received from engaging in apportionable activities, but any other state
has jurisdiction to subject the taxpayer to a business activities tax
on such income under the substantial nexus standards in RCW
82.04.067(1).
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (4)(b), "business activities
tax" and "state" have the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.462.

Sec. 204 RCW 82.08.806 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 516 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales, to a
printer or publisher, of computer equipment, including repair parts and
replacement parts for such equipment, when the computer equipment is
used primarily in the printing or publishing of any printed material,
or to sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
computer equipment. This exemption applies only to computer equipment
not otherwise exempt under RCW 82.08.02565.
(2) A person taking the exemption under this section must keep
records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. This exemption is available only when the purchaser provides
the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner
prescribed by the department. The seller must retain a copy of the
certificate for the seller's files.
(3) The definitions in this subsection (3) apply throughout this
section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Computer" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(b) "Computer equipment" means a computer and the associated
physical components that constitute a computer system, including
monitors, keyboards, printers, modems, scanners, pointing devices, and
other computer peripheral equipment, cables, servers, and routers.
"Computer equipment" also includes digital cameras and computer
software.
(c) "Computer software" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.04.215.
(d) "Primarily" means greater than fifty percent as measured by
time.
(e) "Printer or publisher" means a person, as defined in RCW
82.04.030, who is subject to tax under RCW 82.04.260(13) or
82.04.280(1)(a).
(4) "Computer equipment" does not include computer equipment that
is used primarily for administrative purposes including but not limited
to payroll processing, accounting, customer service, telemarketing, and
collection. If computer equipment is used simultaneously for
administrative and nonadministrative purposes, the administrative use
must be disregarded during the period of simultaneous use for purposes
of determining whether the computer equipment is used primarily for
administrative purposes.

Sec. 205 RCW 82.08.820 and 2006 c 354 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
on:
(a) Material-handling and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment; or
(b) Construction of a warehouse or grain elevator, including
materials, and including service and labor costs,
are eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount
of the remittance is computed under subsection (3) of this section and
is based on the state share of sales tax.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.820:
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;
(b) "Cold storage warehouse" has the meaning provided in RCW
82.74.010;
(c) "Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator that did not exist before the construction began.
"Construction" includes expansion if the expansion adds at least
twenty-five thousand square feet of additional space to an existing
cold storage warehouse, at least two hundred thousand square feet of
additional space to an existing warehouse other than a cold storage
warehouse, or additional storage capacity of at least one million
bushels to an existing grain elevator. "Construction" does not include
renovation, remodeling, or repair;
(d) "Department" means the department of revenue;
(e) "Distribution center" means a warehouse that is used
exclusively by a retailer solely for the storage and distribution of
finished goods to retail outlets of the retailer. "Distribution
center" does not include a warehouse at which retail sales occur;
(f) "Finished goods" means tangible personal property intended for
sale by a retailer or wholesaler. "Finished goods" does not include
agricultural products stored by wholesalers, third-party warehouses, or
retailers if the storage takes place on the land of the person who
produced the agricultural product. "Finished goods" does not include
logs, minerals, petroleum, gas, or other extracted products stored as
raw materials or in bulk;
(g) "Grain elevator" means a structure used for storage and
handling of grain in bulk;
(h) "Material-handling equipment and racking equipment" means
equipment in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used to
handle, store, organize, convey, package, or repackage finished goods.
The term includes tangible personal property with a useful life of one
year or more that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment,
including repair and replacement parts. The term does not include
equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like space,
within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used for
nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes but is
not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners, pick-up-and-place units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; mechanized
systems, including containers that are an integral part of the system,
whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
automated handling, storage, and retrieval systems, including computers
that control them, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal
property; and forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used
to lift or move tangible personal property and that cannot be operated
legally on roads and streets. "Racking equipment" includes, but is not
limited to, conveying systems, chutes, shelves, racks, bins, drawers,
pallets, and other containers and storage devices that form a necessary
part of the storage system;
(i) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;
(j) "Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;
(k) "Square footage" means the product of the two horizontal
dimensions of each floor of a specific warehouse. The entire footprint
of the warehouse shall be measured in calculating the square footage,
including space that juts out from the building profile such as loading
docks. "Square footage" does not mean the aggregate of the square
footage of more than one warehouse at a location or the aggregate of
the square footage of warehouses at more than one location;
(l) "Third-party warehouser" means a person taxable under RCW
82.04.280(((4))) (1)(d);
(m) "Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in which
finished goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may have
more than one storage room and more than one floor. Office space,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other space within the warehouse and
necessary for the operation of the warehouse are considered part of the
warehouse as are loading docks and other such space attached to the
building and used for handling of finished goods. Landscaping and
parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A storage yard
is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and
(n) "Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at wholesale" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property, but
"wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales exempt under RCW
82.04.330.
(3)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to the department for remittance
of all or part of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. For grain
elevators with bushel capacity of one million but less than two
million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred thousand or
more, other than cold storage warehouses, and for grain elevators with
bushel capacity of two million or more, the remittance is equal to one
hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying construction,
materials, service, and labor, and fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment,
and labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing,
cleaning, altering, or improving the equipment. For cold storage
warehouses with square footage of twenty-five thousand or more, the
remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid
for qualifying construction, materials, service, and labor, and one
hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment;
location and size of warehouses and grain elevators; and construction
invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications during the
previous quarter.
(4) Warehouses, grain elevators, and material-handling equipment
and racking equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has
been or is being received under chapter 82.60, 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or
RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any remittance
under this section. Warehouses and grain elevators upon which
construction was initiated before May 20, 1997, are not eligible for a
remittance under this section.
(5) The lessor or owner of a warehouse or grain elevator is not
eligible for a remittance under this section unless the underlying
ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and the material-handling
equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively in the same person,
or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the remittance to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.

Sec. 206 RCW 82.08.820 and 2006 c 354 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate
warehouses or grain elevators and retailers who own or operate
distribution centers, and who have paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
on:
(a) Material-handling and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment; or
(b) Construction of a warehouse or grain elevator, including
materials, and including service and labor costs,
are eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount
of the remittance is computed under subsection (3) of this section and
is based on the state share of sales tax.
(2) For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.820:
(a) "Agricultural products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;
(b) "Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse or
grain elevator that did not exist before the construction began.
"Construction" includes expansion if the expansion adds at least two
hundred thousand square feet of additional space to an existing
warehouse or additional storage capacity of at least one million
bushels to an existing grain elevator. "Construction" does not include
renovation, remodeling, or repair;
(c) "Department" means the department of revenue;
(d) "Distribution center" means a warehouse that is used
exclusively by a retailer solely for the storage and distribution of
finished goods to retail outlets of the retailer. "Distribution
center" does not include a warehouse at which retail sales occur;
(e) "Finished goods" means tangible personal property intended for
sale by a retailer or wholesaler. "Finished goods" does not include
agricultural products stored by wholesalers, third-party warehouses, or
retailers if the storage takes place on the land of the person who
produced the agricultural product. "Finished goods" does not include
logs, minerals, petroleum, gas, or other extracted products stored as
raw materials or in bulk;
(f) "Grain elevator" means a structure used for storage and
handling of grain in bulk;
(g) "Material-handling equipment and racking equipment" means
equipment in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used to
handle, store, organize, convey, package, or repackage finished goods.
The term includes tangible personal property with a useful life of one
year or more that becomes an ingredient or component of the equipment,
including repair and replacement parts. The term does not include
equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms, and other like space,
within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used for
nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes but is
not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners, pick-up-and-place units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots; mechanized
systems, including containers that are an integral part of the system,
whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
automated handling, storage, and retrieval systems, including computers
that control them, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal
property; and forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used
to lift or move tangible personal property and that cannot be operated
legally on roads and streets. "Racking equipment" includes, but is not
limited to, conveying systems, chutes, shelves, racks, bins, drawers,
pallets, and other containers and storage devices that form a necessary
part of the storage system;
(h) "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;
(i) "Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;
(j) "Square footage" means the product of the two horizontal
dimensions of each floor of a specific warehouse. The entire footprint
of the warehouse shall be measured in calculating the square footage,
including space that juts out from the building profile such as loading
docks. "Square footage" does not mean the aggregate of the square
footage of more than one warehouse at a location or the aggregate of
the square footage of warehouses at more than one location;
(k) "Third-party warehouser" means a person taxable under RCW
82.04.280(((4))) (1)(d);
(l) "Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in which
finished goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may have
more than one storage room and more than one floor. Office space,
lunchrooms, restrooms, and other space within the warehouse and
necessary for the operation of the warehouse are considered part of the
warehouse as are loading docks and other such space attached to the
building and used for handling of finished goods. Landscaping and
parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A storage yard
is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and
(m) "Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at wholesale" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property, but
"wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales exempt under RCW
82.04.330.
(3)(a) A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of
a remittance under this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW
82.08.020. The buyer may then apply to the department for remittance
of all or part of the tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. For grain
elevators with bushel capacity of one million but less than two
million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred thousand or
more and for grain elevators with bushel capacity of two million or
more, the remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of
tax paid for qualifying construction, materials, service, and labor,
and fifty percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment.
(b) The department shall determine eligibility under this section
based on information provided by the buyer and through audit and other
administrative records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an
information sheet, in a form and manner as required by the department
by rule, specifying the amount of exempted tax claimed and the
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is
claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable the
department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents
describing the material-handling equipment and racking equipment;
location and size of warehouses and grain elevators; and construction
invoices and documents.
(c) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted
amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications during the
previous quarter.
(4) Warehouses, grain elevators, and material-handling equipment
and racking equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has
been or is being received under chapter 82.60, 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or
RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 are not eligible for any remittance
under this section. Warehouses and grain elevators upon which
construction was initiated before May 20, 1997, are not eligible for a
remittance under this section.
(5) The lessor or owner of a warehouse or grain elevator is not
eligible for a remittance under this section unless the underlying
ownership of the warehouse or grain elevator and the material-handling
equipment and racking equipment vests exclusively in the same person,
or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the economic
benefit of the remittance to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.

Sec. 207 RCW 82.32.665 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 204 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is hereby created a joint tax avoidance review committee
which is a bipartisan committee consisting of three members of the
senate, two from the majority caucus and one from the minority caucus,
and three members of the house of representatives, two from the
majority caucus and one from the minority caucus. The senate members
of the committee must be appointed by the majority leader of the
senate, and the house members of the committee must be appointed by the
speaker of the house. The appointing authorities must also appoint one
alternate member from each of the two largest caucuses of each
legislative chamber.
(1)(a) Members and alternates must be appointed as soon as possible
after May 1, 2010, and their terms continue until such persons no
longer wish to serve on the committee or no longer serve in the
legislature, whichever occurs first.
(b) A vacancy must be filled by the appointment of a legislator
from the same legislative chamber and caucus as the original
appointment. The appropriate appointing authority must make the
appointment within thirty days of the vacancy occurring. Former
committee members and alternates may be reappointed to the committee.
(2) The committee must choose its chair and vice-chair from among
its membership. The committee meets at the call of the chair. The
chair of the committee must cause all meeting notices and committee
documents to be sent to the committee members and alternates.
(3) Staff support for the committee must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(4) The committee must:
(a) Generally monitor the department's implementation of Part II,
chapter 23, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess., providing timely advice to the
department in any rule making undertaken pursuant to the authority
granted under RCW 82.32.655;
(b) Seek input from stakeholders and other legislators as the
committee may determine is desirable and useful in the furtherance of
its mission herein described;
(c) Review other cases, identified by the department, of tax
avoidance transactions not described in RCW 82.32.655 that may
represent examples of arrangements that circumvent the policies of this
state and thus unfairly avoid taxes;
(d) Consider the need for an explicit statutory construction
standard to provide direction to the courts on the interpretation of
Part II, chapter 23, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.; and
(e) Provide a report to the fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and senate by December 31, 2010, which must include:
(i) Recommended legislation on any matters that the committee deems
advisable, including amendments to RCW 82.32.090, 82.32.655, and
82.32.660; and
(ii) Recommendations for future legislative oversight of the
department's implementation of RCW 82.32.090, 82.32.655, and 82.32.660.
(5) For the purposes of this section, the disclosure of otherwise
confidential tax information to the members of the committee is deemed
to fall within the exception provided by RCW 82.32.330(3)(((d))) (e).
(6) This section expires July 1, 2011.

Sec. 208 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that out-of-state businesses that do not
have a physical presence in Washington earn significant income from
Washington residents from providing services or collecting royalties on
the use of intangible property in this state. The legislature further
finds that these businesses receive significant benefits and
opportunities provided by the state, such as: Laws providing
protection of business interests or regulating consumer credit; access
to courts and judicial process to enforce business rights, including
debt collection and intellectual property rights; an orderly and
regulated marketplace; and police and fire protection and a
transportation system benefiting in-state agents and other
representatives of out-of-state businesses. Therefore, the legislature
intends to extend the state's business and occupation tax to these
companies to ensure that they pay their fair share of the cost of
services that this state renders and the infrastructure it provides.
(2)(a) The legislature also finds that the current cost
apportionment method in RCW 82.04.460(1) for apportioning most service
income has been difficult for both taxpayers and the department to
apply due in large part (i) to the difficulty in assigning certain
costs of doing business inside or outside of this state, and (ii) to
its dissimilarity with the apportionment methods used in other states
for their business activity taxes.
(b) The legislature further finds that there is a trend among
states to adopt a single factor apportionment formula based on sales.
The legislature recognizes that adoption of a sales factor only
apportionment method has the advantages of simplifying apportionment
and making Washington a more attractive place for businesses to expand
their property and payroll. For these reasons, the legislature adopts
single factor sales apportionment for purposes of apportioning royalty
income and certain service income for state business and occupation tax
purposes.
(c) Nothing in this act may be construed, however, to authorize
apportionment of the gross income or value of products taxable under
the following business and occupation tax classifications: Retailing,
wholesaling, manufacturing, processing for hire, extracting, extracting
for hire, printing, government contracting, public road construction,
the classifications in RCW 82.04.280 (((2), (4), (6), and (7))) (1)(b),
(d), (f), and (g), and any other activity not specifically included in
the definition of apportionable activities in RCW 82.04.460.
(d) Nothing in this part is intended to modify the nexus and
apportionment requirements for local gross receipts business and
occupation taxes.

PART III
MERGING MULTIPLE AMENDMENTS TO STATUTES FROM 2010 LEGISLATION
Sec. 301 RCW 82.04.2909 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 2 s 1 and 2010 c 114
s 108 are each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person who is an aluminum smelter engaging within
this state in the business of manufacturing aluminum; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case
of manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured, or in
the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.
(2) Upon every person who is an aluminum smelter engaging within
this state in the business of making sales at wholesale of aluminum
manufactured by that person, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business is equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the
aluminum multiplied by the rate of .2904 percent.
(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2017.

Sec. 302 RCW 82.04.4481 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 and 2010 c 114
s 118 are each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is
allowed for all property taxes paid during the calendar year on
property owned by a direct service industrial customer and reasonably
necessary for the purposes of an aluminum smelter.
(2) A person claiming the credit under this section is subject to
all the requirements of chapter 82.32 RCW. A credit earned during one
calendar year may be carried over to be credited against taxes incurred
in the subsequent calendar year, but may not be carried over a second
year. Credits carried over must be applied to tax liability before new
credits. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.
(3) Credits may not be claimed under this section for property
taxes levied for collection in 2017 and thereafter.
(4) A person claiming the credit provided in this section must file
a complete annual report with the department under RCW 82.32.534.

Sec. 303 RCW 82.08.805 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 2 s 3 and 2010 c 114
s 122 are each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) A person who has paid tax under RCW 82.08.020 for personal
property used at an aluminum smelter, tangible personal property that
will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of buildings or
other structures at an aluminum smelter, or for labor and services
rendered with respect to such buildings, structures, or personal
property, is eligible for an exemption from the state share of the tax
in the form of a credit, as provided in this section. A person
claiming an exemption must pay the tax and may then take a credit equal
to the state share of retail sales tax paid under RCW 82.08.020. The
person must submit information, in a form and manner prescribed by the
department, specifying the amount of qualifying purchases or
acquisitions for which the exemption is claimed and the amount of
exempted tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "aluminum smelter" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.217.
(3) A person claiming the tax preference provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(4) Credits may not be claimed under this section for taxable
events occurring on or after January 1, 2017.

Sec. 304 RCW 82.12.022 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 2 s 5 and 2010 c 114
s 127 are each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) A use tax is levied on every person in this state for the
privilege of using natural gas or manufactured gas within this state as
a consumer.
(2) The tax must be levied and collected in an amount equal to the
value of the article used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in
effect for the public utility tax on gas distribution businesses under
RCW 82.16.020. The "value of the article used" does not include any
amounts that are paid for the hire or use of a gas distribution
business as defined in RCW 82.16.010(2) in transporting the gas subject
to tax under this subsection if those amounts are subject to tax under
that chapter.
(3) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of
natural or manufactured gas delivered to the consumer by other means
than through a pipeline.
(4) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of
natural or manufactured gas if the person who sold the gas to the
consumer has paid a tax under RCW 82.16.020 with respect to the gas for
which exemption is sought under this subsection.
(5)(a) The tax levied in this section does not apply to the use of
natural or manufactured gas by an aluminum smelter as that term is
defined in RCW 82.04.217 before January 1, 2017.
(b) A person claiming the exemption provided in this subsection (5)
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(6) There is a credit against the tax levied under this section in
an amount equal to any tax paid by:
(a) The person who sold the gas to the consumer when that tax is a
gross receipts tax similar to that imposed pursuant to RCW 82.16.020 by
another state with respect to the gas for which a credit is sought
under this subsection; or
(b) The person consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to
the tax imposed by this section was paid to another state with respect
to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection.
(7) The use tax imposed in this section must be paid by the
consumer to the department.
(8) There is imposed a reporting requirement on the person who
delivered the gas to the consumer to make a quarterly report to the
department. Such report must contain the volume of gas delivered, name
of the consumer to whom delivered, and such other information as the
department may require by rule.
(9) The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the
administration and enforcement of sections 1 through 6, chapter 384,
Laws of 1989.

Sec. 305 RCW 82.12.805 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 2 s 4 and 2010 c 114
s 128 are each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) A person who is subject to tax under RCW 82.12.020 for personal
property used at an aluminum smelter, or for tangible personal property
that will be incorporated as an ingredient or component of buildings or
other structures at an aluminum smelter, or for labor and services
rendered with respect to such buildings, structures, or personal
property, is eligible for an exemption from the state share of the tax
in the form of a credit, as provided in this section. The amount of
the credit equals the state share of use tax computed to be due under
RCW 82.12.020. The person must submit information, in a form and
manner prescribed by the department, specifying the amount of
qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which the exemption is claimed
and the amount of exempted tax.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "aluminum smelter" has the
same meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.217.
(3) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this section
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(4) Credits may not be claimed under this section for taxable
events occurring on or after January 1, 2017.

Sec. 306 RCW 82.32.590 and 2010 c 137 s 1 and 2010 c 114 s 135
are each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) If the department finds that the failure of a taxpayer to file
an annual survey under RCW 82.32.585 or annual report under RCW
82.32.534 by the due date was the result of circumstances beyond the
control of the taxpayer, the department must extend the time for filing
the survey or report. The extension is for a period of thirty days
from the date the department issues its written notification to the
taxpayer that it qualifies for an extension under this section. The
department may grant additional extensions as it deems proper.
(2) In making a determination whether the failure of a taxpayer to
file an annual survey or annual report by the due date was the result
of circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer, the department
must be guided by rules adopted by the department for the waiver or
cancellation of penalties when the underpayment or untimely payment of
any tax was due to circumstances beyond the control of the taxpayer.
(3)(a) Subject to the conditions in this subsection (3), a taxpayer
who fails to file an annual report or annual survey required under
subsection (1) of this section by the due date of the report or survey
is entitled to an extension of the due date. A request for an
extension under this subsection (3) must be made in writing to the
department.
(b) To qualify for an extension under this subsection (3), a
taxpayer must have filed all annual reports and surveys, if any, due in
prior years under subsection (1) of this section by their respective
due dates, beginning with annual reports and surveys due in calendar
year 2010.
(c) An extension under this subsection (3) is for ninety days from
the original due date of the annual report or survey.
(d) No taxpayer may be granted more than one ninety-day extension
under this subsection (3).

PART IV
COMBINING TWO SUBPOENA STATUTES INTO A SINGLE SUBPOENA STATUTE
Sec. 401 RCW 82.32.117 and 2010 c 22 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department or its duly authorized agent may apply for and
obtain a superior court order approving and authorizing a subpoena in
advance of its issuance. The application may be made in the county
where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or the county where
the subpoenaed records or documents are located, or in Thurston county.
The application must:
(a) State that an order is sought pursuant to this subsection;
(b) Adequately specify the records, documents, or testimony; and
(c) Declare under oath that an investigation is being conducted for
a lawfully authorized purpose related to an investigation within the
department's authority and that the subpoenaed documents or testimony
are reasonably related to an investigation within the department's
authority.
(2) Where the application under this subsection is made to the
satisfaction of the court, the court must issue an order approving the
subpoena. An order under this subsection constitutes authority of law
for the agency to subpoena the records or testimony.
(3) The department or its duly authorized agent may seek approval
and a court may issue an order under this subsection without prior
notice to any person, including the person to whom the subpoena is
directed and the person who is the subject of an investigation.
(4) This section does not preclude the use of other legally
authorized means of obtaining records, nor preclude the assertion of
any legally recognized privileges.
(5) The department may not disclose any return or tax information,
as defined in RCW 82.32.330, obtained in response to a subpoena issued
under this section, except as authorized in RCW 82.32.330.
(6) A third party may not be held civilly liable for any harm
resulting from that person's compliance with a subpoena issued under
the authority of this section.
(7) The entire court file of any proceeding instituted under this
section must be sealed and is not open to public inspection by any
person except upon order of the court as authorized by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 RCW 82.32.115 (Records in possession of a
third party -- Subpoenas) and 2009 c 309 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 The repeal in section 402 of this act does
not affect any existing right acquired or liability or obligation
incurred under the statute repealed or under any rule or order adopted
under that statute nor does it affect any proceedings instituted under
it.

Sec. 404 RCW 82.32.330 and 2010 c 112 s 13 and 2010 c 106 s 104
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner
whatever a return or tax information;
(b) "Return" means a tax or information return or claim for refund
required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of this state
which is filed with the department of revenue by, on behalf of, or with
respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are supplemental to,
or part of, the return so filed;
(c) "Tax information" means (i) a taxpayer's identity, (ii) the
nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's income, payments, receipts,
deductions, exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax
liability deficiencies, overassessments, or tax payments, whether taken
from the taxpayer's books and records or any other source, (iii)
whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be examined or
subject to other investigation or processing, (iv) a part of a written
determination that is not designated as a precedent and disclosed
pursuant to RCW 82.32.410, or a background file document relating to a
written determination, and (v) other data received by, recorded by,
prepared by, furnished to, or collected by the department of revenue
with respect to the determination of the existence, or possible
existence, of liability, or the amount thereof, of a person under the
laws of this state for a tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or
other imposition, or offense. However, data, material, or documents
that do not disclose information related to a specific or identifiable
taxpayer do not constitute tax information under this section. Except
as provided by RCW 82.32.410, nothing in this chapter requires any
person possessing data, material, or documents made confidential and
privileged by this section to delete information from such data,
material, or documents so as to permit its disclosure;
(d) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department,
division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency;
(e) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address,
telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or
any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer; and
(f) "Department" means the department of revenue or its officer,
agent, employee, or representative.
(2) Returns and tax information are confidential and privileged,
and except as authorized by this section, neither the department of
revenue nor any other person may disclose any return or tax
information.
(3) This section does not prohibit the department of revenue from:
(a) Disclosing such return or tax information in a civil or
criminal judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:
(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if
the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under this title or
chapter 83.100 RCW is a party in the proceeding;
(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such return or tax
information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in
the proceeding; or
(iii) Brought by the department under RCW 18.27.040 or 19.28.071;
(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the
director prescribes by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW,
such return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such taxpayer or
to such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in a request
for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person, at the
taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a request
for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such other
person. However, tax information not received from the taxpayer must
not be so disclosed if the director determines that such disclosure
would compromise any investigation or litigation by any federal, state,
or local government agency in connection with the civil or criminal
liability of the taxpayer or another person, or that such disclosure
would identify a confidential informant, or that such disclosure is
contrary to any agreement entered into by the department that provides
for the reciprocal exchange of information with other government
agencies which agreement requires confidentiality with respect to such
information unless such information is required to be disclosed to the
taxpayer by the order of any court;
(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer against whom a warrant under
RCW 82.32.210 has been either issued or filed and remains outstanding
for a period of at least ten working days. The department is not
required to disclose any information under this subsection if a
taxpayer has entered a deferred payment arrangement with the department
for the payment of a warrant that has not been filed and is making
payments upon such deficiency that will fully satisfy the indebtedness
within twelve months;
(d) Publishing statistics so classified as to prevent the
identification of particular returns or reports or items thereof;
(e) Disclosing such return or tax information, for official
purposes only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state
agency, or to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing
with matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of
industry or the professions;
(f) Permitting the department of revenue's records to be audited
and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and
employees;
(g) Disclosing any such return or tax information to a peace
officer as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for
official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a
search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure
is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace officer or
county prosecuting attorney who receives the return or tax information
may disclose that return or tax information only for use in the
investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court
proceeding for which the return or tax information originally was
sought;
(h) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the proper
officer of the internal revenue service of the United States, the
Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the
proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or
county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United
States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or
city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially
similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;
(i) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the United
States department of justice, including the bureau of alcohol, tobacco,
firearms and explosives, the department of defense, the immigration and
customs enforcement and the customs and border protection agencies of
the United States department of homeland security, the United States
coast guard, the alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau of the United
States department of treasury, and the United States department of
transportation, or any authorized representative of these federal
agencies, for official purposes;
(j) Publishing or otherwise disclosing the text of a written
determination designated by the director as a precedent pursuant to RCW
82.32.410;
(k) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other tax
information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business address, mailing
address, revenue tax registration numbers, reseller permit numbers and
the expiration date and status of such permits, North American industry
classification system or standard industrial classification code of a
taxpayer, and the dates of opening and closing of business. This
subsection may not be construed as giving authority to the department
to give, sell, or provide access to any list of taxpayers for any
commercial purpose;
(l) Disclosing such return or tax information that is also
maintained by another Washington state or local governmental agency as
a public record available for inspection and copying under the
provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW or is a document maintained by a court
of record and is not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;
(m) Disclosing such return or tax information to the United States
department of agriculture for the limited purpose of investigating food
stamp fraud by retailers;
(n) Disclosing to a financial institution, escrow company, or title
company, in connection with specific real property that is the subject
of a real estate transaction, current amounts due the department for a
filed tax warrant, judgment, or lien against the real property;
(o) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted
liability as a successor under RCW 82.32.140 return or tax information
pertaining to the specific business of the taxpayer to which the person
has succeeded;
(p) Disclosing real estate excise tax affidavit forms filed under
RCW 82.45.150 in the possession of the department, including real
estate excise tax affidavit forms for transactions exempt or otherwise
not subject to tax;
(q) Disclosing to local taxing jurisdictions the identity of
sellers granted relief under RCW 82.32.430(5)(b)(i) and the period for
which relief is granted;
(r) Disclosing such return or tax information to the court in
respect to the department's application for a subpoena under RCW
((82.32.115)) 82.32.117;
(s) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted
liability under RCW 83.100.120 return or tax information pertaining to
that person's liability for tax under chapter 83.100 RCW;
(t) Disclosing such return or tax information to the streamlined
sales tax governing board, member states of the streamlined sales tax
governing board, or authorized representatives of such board or states,
for the limited purposes of:
(i) Conducting on behalf of member states sales and use tax audits
of taxpayers; or
(ii) Auditing certified service providers or certified automated
systems providers; or
(u) Disclosing any such return or tax information when the
disclosure is specifically authorized under any other section of the
Revised Code of Washington.
(4)(a) The department may disclose return or taxpayer information
to a person under investigation or during any court or administrative
proceeding against a person under investigation as provided in this
subsection (4). The disclosure must be in connection with the
department's official duties relating to an audit, collection activity,
or a civil or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only
when the person under investigation and the person in possession of
data, materials, or documents are parties to the return or tax
information to be disclosed. The department may disclose return or tax
information such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, resale or
exemption certificates, or checks. However, the department may not
disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt journals, check
registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general journals,
financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax returns, state
tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar data, materials,
or documents.
(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4), the department must, through written
correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials,
or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence must clearly identify
the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The department may
not disclose any tax return or tax information under this subsection
(4) until the time period allowed in (c) of this subsection has expired
or until the court has ruled on any challenge brought under (c) of this
subsection.
(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents
to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of
the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition
the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for
injunctive relief. The court must limit or deny the request of the
department if the court determines that:
(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are
cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source
that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;
(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought
would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs
of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the
petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or
(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure
contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the
petitioner.
(d) The department must reimburse reasonable expenses for the
production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person in
possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed.
(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may
indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a
disclosure of tax return or tax information under this section.
(5) Service of a subpoena issued under RCW ((82.32.115)) 82.32.117
does not constitute a disclosure of return or tax information under
this section. Notwithstanding anything else to the contrary in this
section, a person served with a subpoena under RCW ((82.32.115))
82.32.117 may disclose the existence or content of the subpoena to that
person's legal counsel.
(6) Any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information
in the course of his or her employment with the department of revenue
and any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information as
provided under subsection (3) (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), or (m) of this
section, who discloses any such return or tax information to another
person not entitled to knowledge of such return or tax information
under the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If
the person guilty of such violation is an officer or employee of the
state, such person must forfeit such office or employment and is
incapable of holding any public office or employment in this state for
a period of two years thereafter.

PART V
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 Section 206 of this act takes effect July
1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 Section 205 of this act expires July 1,
2012.

--- END ---