BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a maximum
sentence by a court in the state of Washington for a gross misdemeanor
can, under federal law, result in the automatic deportation of a person
who has lawfully immigrated to the United States, is a victim of
domestic violence or a political refugee, even when all or part of the
sentence to total confinement is suspended. The legislature further
finds that this is a disproportionate outcome, when compared to a
person who has been convicted of certain felonies which, under the
state's determinate sentencing law, must be sentenced to less than one
year and, hence, either have no impact on that person's residency
status or will provide that person an opportunity to be heard in
immigration proceedings where the court will determine whether
deportation is appropriate. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to cure this inequity by reducing the maximum sentence for
a gross misdemeanor by one day.

Sec. 2 RCW 3.50.440 and 2003 c 53 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
Every person convicted by the municipal court of a violation of the
criminal provisions of an ordinance for which no punishment is
specifically prescribed in the ordinance is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than five
thousand dollars or imprisonment in the city jail for ((a period not to
exceed one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both such
fine and imprisonment.

Sec. 3 RCW 7.21.040 and 2009 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 7.21.050, a punitive
sanction for contempt of court may be imposed only pursuant to this
section.
(2)(a) An action to impose a punitive sanction for contempt of
court shall be commenced by a complaint or information filed by the
prosecuting attorney or city attorney charging a person with contempt
of court and reciting the punitive sanction sought to be imposed.
(b) If there is probable cause to believe that a contempt has been
committed, the prosecuting attorney or city attorney may file the
information or complaint on his or her own initiative or at the request
of a person aggrieved by the contempt.
(c) A request that the prosecuting attorney or the city attorney
commence an action under this section may be made by a judge presiding
in an action or proceeding to which a contempt relates. If required
for the administration of justice, the judge making the request may
appoint a special counsel to prosecute an action to impose a punitive
sanction for contempt of court.
A judge making a request pursuant to this subsection shall be
disqualified from presiding at the trial.
(d) If the alleged contempt involves disrespect to or criticism of
a judge, that judge is disqualified from presiding at the trial of the
contempt unless the person charged consents to the judge presiding at
the trial.
(3) The court may hold a hearing on a motion for a remedial
sanction jointly with a trial on an information or complaint seeking a
punitive sanction.
(4) A punitive sanction may be imposed for past conduct that was a
contempt of court even though similar present conduct is a continuing
contempt of court.
(5) If the defendant is found guilty of contempt of court under
this section, the court may impose for each separate contempt of court
a fine of not more than five thousand dollars or imprisonment for ((not
more than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.16.010 and 1992 c 7 s 3 are each amended to read as
follows:
Every person who shall willfully deface, obliterate, remove, or
alter any mark or brand placed by or with the authority of the owner
thereof on any shingle bolt, log or stick of timber, or on any horse,
mare, gelding, mule, cow, steer, bull, sheep, goat or hog, shall be
punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more
than five years, or by imprisonment in the county jail for ((not more
than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by a fine of
not more than one thousand dollars, or by both fine and imprisonment.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.16.020 and 1992 c 7 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
Every person who, in any county, places upon any property, any
brand or mark in the likeness or similitude of another brand or mark
filed with the county auditor of such county by the owner thereof as a
brand or mark for the designation or identification of a like kind of
property, is:
(1) If done with intent to confuse or commingle such property with,
or to appropriate to his or her own use, the property of such other
owner, guilty of a felony, ((and be punished)) punishable by
imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than five
years, or by imprisonment in the county jail for ((not more than one
year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by a fine of not more
than one thousand dollars, or by both fine and imprisonment; or
(2) If done without such intent, guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.45.070 and 1992 c 7 s 10 are each amended to read as
follows:
Every person who shall obtain any money or property from another or
shall obtain the signature of another to any writing the false making
of which would be forgery, by color or aid of any false or fraudulent
sale of property or pretended sale of property by auction, or by any of
the practices known as mock auction, shall be punished by imprisonment
in a state correctional facility for not more than five years or in the
county jail for ((not more than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, or by
both fine and imprisonment.
Every person who shall buy or sell or pretend to buy or sell any
goods, wares or merchandise, exposed to sale by auction, if an actual
sale, purchase and change of ownership therein does not thereupon take
place, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 7 RCW 9.46.198 and 1999 c 143 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person who works as an employee or agent or in a similar
capacity for another person in connection with the operation of an
activity for which a license is required under this chapter or by
commission rule without having obtained the applicable license required
by the commission under RCW 9.46.070(17) shall be guilty of a gross
misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be punished by ((not more than
one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days in the county jail or a
fine of not more than five thousand dollars, or both.

Sec. 8 RCW 9.68.060 and 2003 c 53 s 41 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When it appears that material which may be deemed erotic is
being sold, distributed, or exhibited in this state, the prosecuting
attorney of the county in which the sale, distribution, or exhibition
is taking place may apply to the superior court for a hearing to
determine the character of the material with respect to whether it is
erotic material.
(2) Notice of the hearing shall immediately be served upon the
dealer, distributor, or exhibitor selling or otherwise distributing or
exhibiting the alleged erotic material. The superior court shall hold
a hearing not later than five days from the service of notice to
determine whether the subject matter is erotic material within the
meaning of RCW 9.68.050.
(3) If the superior court rules that the subject material is erotic
material, then, following such adjudication:
(a) If the subject material is written or printed, or is a sound
recording, the court shall issue an order requiring that an "adults
only" label be placed on the publication or sound recording, if such
publication or sound recording is going to continue to be distributed.
Whenever the superior court orders a publication or sound recording to
have an "adults only" label placed thereon, such label shall be
impressed on the front cover of all copies of such erotic publication
or sound recording sold or otherwise distributed in the state of
Washington. Such labels shall be in forty-eight point bold face type
located in a conspicuous place on the front cover of the publication or
sound recording. All dealers and distributors are hereby prohibited
from displaying erotic publications or sound recordings in their store
windows, on outside newsstands on public thoroughfares, or in any other
manner so as to make an erotic publication or the contents of an erotic
sound recording readily accessible to minors.
(b) If the subject material is a motion picture, the court shall
issue an order requiring that such motion picture shall be labeled
"adults only". The exhibitor shall prominently display a sign saying
"adults only" at the place of exhibition, and any advertising of the
motion picture shall contain a statement that it is for adults only.
Such exhibitor shall also display a sign at the place where admission
tickets are sold stating that it is unlawful for minors to misrepresent
their age.
(4) Failure to comply with a court order issued under the
provisions of this section shall subject the dealer, distributor, or
exhibitor to contempt proceedings.
(5) Any person who, after the court determines material to be
erotic, sells, distributes, or exhibits the erotic material to a minor
shall be guilty of violating RCW 9.68.050 through 9.68.120, such
violation to carry the following penalties:
(a) For the first offense a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall
be fined not more than five hundred dollars, or imprisoned in the
county jail not more than six months;
(b) For the second offense a gross misdemeanor and upon conviction
shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars, or imprisoned ((not
more than one year)) for up to three hundred sixty-four days;
(c) For all subsequent offenses a class B felony and upon
conviction shall be fined not more than five thousand dollars, or
imprisoned not less than one year.

Sec. 9 RCW 9.82.030 and 1992 c 7 s 16 are each amended to read as
follows:
Every person having knowledge of the commission of treason, who
conceals the same, and does not, as soon as may be, disclose such
treason to the governor or a justice of the supreme court or a judge of
either the court of appeals or the superior court, shall be guilty of
misprision of treason and punished by a fine of not more than one
thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in a state correctional facility
for not more than five years or in a county jail for ((not more than
one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days.

Sec. 10 RCW 9.92.020 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 47 s 6 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every person convicted of a gross misdemeanor for which no
punishment is prescribed in any statute in force at the time of
conviction and sentence, shall be punished by imprisonment in the
county jail for a maximum term fixed by the court of ((not more than
one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by a fine in an
amount fixed by the court of not more than five thousand dollars, or by
both such imprisonment and fine.

Sec. 11 RCW 9.94A.190 and 2010 c 224 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A sentence that includes a term or terms of confinement
totaling ((more than)) one year or more shall be served in a facility
or institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the state, or
in home detention pursuant to RCW 9.94A.6551. Except as provided in
subsection (3) or (5) of this section, a sentence of ((not more than
one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days of confinement shall be
served in a facility operated, licensed, or utilized under contract, by
the county, or if home detention or work crew has been ordered by the
court, in the residence of either the offender or a member of the
offender's immediate family.
(2) If a county uses a state partial confinement facility for the
partial confinement of a person sentenced to confinement for ((not more
than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, the county shall
reimburse the state for the use of the facility as provided in this
subsection. The office of financial management shall set the rate of
reimbursement based upon the average per diem cost per offender in the
facility. The office of financial management shall determine to what
extent, if any, reimbursement shall be reduced or eliminated because of
funds provided by the legislature to the department for the purpose of
covering the cost of county use of state partial confinement
facilities. The office of financial management shall reestablish
reimbursement rates each even-numbered year.
(3) A person who is sentenced for a felony to a term of not more
than ((one year)) three hundred sixty-four days, and who is committed
or returned to incarceration in a state facility on another felony
conviction, either under the indeterminate sentencing laws, chapter
9.95 RCW, or under this chapter shall serve all terms of confinement,
including a sentence of not more than ((one year)) three hundred sixty-four days, in a facility or institution operated, or utilized under
contract, by the state, consistent with the provisions of RCW
9.94A.589.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a sentence
imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.660 which has a standard sentence range
of over one year, regardless of length, shall be served in a facility
or institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the state.
(5) Sentences imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.507 shall be served in
a facility or institution operated, or utilized under contract, by the
state.

Sec. 12 RCW 9A.20.020 and 1982 c 192 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Felony. Every person convicted of a classified felony shall be
punished as follows:
(a) For a class A felony, by imprisonment in a state correctional
institution for a maximum term fixed by the court of not less than
twenty years, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more
than fifty thousand dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine;
(b) For a class B felony, by imprisonment in a state correctional
institution for a maximum term of not more than ten years, or by a fine
in an amount fixed by the court of not more than twenty thousand
dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine;
(c) For a class C felony, by imprisonment in a state correctional
institution for a maximum term of not more than five years, or by a
fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than ten thousand
dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine.
(2) Gross Misdemeanor. Every person convicted of a gross
misdemeanor defined in Title 9A RCW shall be punished by imprisonment
in the county jail for a maximum term fixed by the court of ((not more
than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by a fine in an
amount fixed by the court of not more than five thousand dollars, or by
both such imprisonment and fine.
(3) Misdemeanor. Every person convicted of a misdemeanor defined
in Title 9A RCW shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail
for a maximum term fixed by the court of not more than ninety days, or
by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than one thousand
dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine.
(4) This section applies to only those crimes committed prior to
July 1, 1984.

Sec. 13 RCW 9A.20.021 and 2003 c 288 s 7 and 2003 c 53 s 63 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Felony. Unless a different maximum sentence for a classified
felony is specifically established by a statute of this state, no
person convicted of a classified felony shall be punished by
confinement or fine exceeding the following:
(a) For a class A felony, by confinement in a state correctional
institution for a term of life imprisonment, or by a fine in an amount
fixed by the court of fifty thousand dollars, or by both such
confinement and fine;
(b) For a class B felony, by confinement in a state correctional
institution for a term of ten years, or by a fine in an amount fixed by
the court of twenty thousand dollars, or by both such confinement and
fine;
(c) For a class C felony, by confinement in a state correctional
institution for five years, or by a fine in an amount fixed by the
court of ten thousand dollars, or by both such confinement and fine.
(2) Gross misdemeanor. Every person convicted of a gross
misdemeanor defined in Title 9A RCW shall be punished by imprisonment
in the county jail for a maximum term fixed by the court of ((not more
than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by a fine in an
amount fixed by the court of not more than five thousand dollars, or by
both such imprisonment and fine.
(3) Misdemeanor. Every person convicted of a misdemeanor defined
in Title 9A RCW shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail
for a maximum term fixed by the court of not more than ninety days, or
by a fine in an amount fixed by the court of not more than one thousand
dollars, or by both such imprisonment and fine.
(4) This section applies to only those crimes committed on or after
July 1, 1984.

Sec. 14 RCW 10.88.300 and 2010 c 8 s 1073 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any officer who shall deliver to the agent for extradition of the
demanding state a person in his or her custody under the governor's
warrant, in wilful disobedience to RCW 10.88.290, shall be guilty of a
gross misdemeanor and, on conviction, shall be imprisoned in the county
jail for ((not more than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four
days, or be fined not more than one thousand dollars, or both.

Sec. 15 RCW 14.20.020 and 2003 c 53 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person to act as an aircraft dealer
without a currently valid aircraft dealer's license issued under this
chapter.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person
acting as an aircraft dealer without a currently issued aircraft
dealer's license is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by
either a fine of not more than one thousand dollars or by imprisonment
for not more than ninety days, or both.
(b) A person convicted on a second or subsequent conviction within
a five-year period is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall be
punished by either a fine of not more than five thousand dollars or by
imprisonment for ((not more than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.
(3) In addition to, or in lieu of, the penalties provided in this
section, or as a condition to the suspension of a sentence that may be
imposed under this section, the court in its discretion may prohibit
the violator from acting as an aircraft dealer within the state for
such a period as it may determine but not to exceed one year.
Violation of the duly imposed prohibition of the court may be treated
as a separate offense under this section or as contempt of court.
(4) Any person applying for an aircraft dealer's license shall do
so at the office of the secretary on a form provided for that purpose
by the secretary.

Sec. 16 RCW 15.80.640 and 2010 c 8 s 6113 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person who shall mark, stamp, or write any false weight ticket,
scale ticket, or weight certificate, knowing it to be false, and any
person who influences, or attempts to wrongfully influence any licensed
public weighmaster or weigher in the performance of his or her official
duties shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and upon conviction
thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred
dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment of not
less than thirty days nor more than ((one year)) three hundred sixty-four days in the county jail, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Sec. 17 RCW 19.25.020 and 2003 c 53 s 143 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person commits an offense if the person:
(a) Knowingly reproduces for sale or causes to be transferred any
recording with intent to sell it or cause it to be sold or use it or
cause it to be used for commercial advantage or private financial gain
without the consent of the owner;
(b) Transports within this state, for commercial advantage or
private financial gain, a recording with the knowledge that the sounds
have been reproduced or transferred without the consent of the owner;
or
(c) Advertises, offers for sale, sells, or rents, or causes the
sale, resale, or rental of or possesses for one or more of these
purposes any recording that the person knows has been reproduced or
transferred without the consent of the owner.
(2)(a) An offense under this section is a class B felony punishable
by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars,
imprisonment for not more than ten years, or both if:
(i) The offense involves at least one thousand unauthorized
recordings during a one hundred eighty-day period; or
(ii) The defendant has been previously convicted under this
section.
(b) An offense under this section is a class C felony punishable by
a fine of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars,
imprisonment for not more than five years, or both, if the offense
involves more than one hundred but less than one thousand unauthorized
recordings during a one hundred eighty-day period.
(c) Any other offense under this section is a gross misdemeanor
punishable by a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars,
imprisonment for ((not more than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.
(3) This section does not affect the rights and remedies of a party
in private litigation.
(4) This section applies only to recordings that were initially
fixed before February 15, 1972.

Sec. 18 RCW 19.25.030 and 2003 c 53 s 144 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person commits an offense if the person:
(a) For commercial advantage or private financial gain advertises,
offers for sale, sells, rents, transports, causes the sale, resale,
rental, or transportation of or possesses for one or more of these
purposes a recording of a live performance with the knowledge that the
live performance has been recorded or fixed without the consent of the
owner; or
(b) With the intent to sell for commercial advantage or private
financial gain records or fixes or causes to be recorded or fixed on a
recording a live performance with the knowledge that the live
performance has been recorded or fixed without the consent of the
owner.
(2)(a) An offense under this section is a class B felony punishable
by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars,
imprisonment for not more than ten years, or both, if:
(i) The offense involves at least one thousand unauthorized
recordings embodying sound or at least one hundred unauthorized
audiovisual recordings during a one hundred eighty-day period; or
(ii) The defendant has been previously convicted under this
section.
(b) An offense under this section is a class C felony punishable by
a fine of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars,
imprisonment for not more than five years, or both, if the offense
involves more than one hundred but less than one thousand unauthorized
recordings embodying sound or more than ten but less than one hundred
unauthorized audiovisual recordings during a one hundred eighty-day
period.
(c) Any other offense under this section is a gross misdemeanor
punishable by a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars,
imprisonment for ((not more than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.
(3) In the absence of a written agreement or law to the contrary,
the performer or performers of a live performance are presumed to own
the rights to record or fix those sounds.
(4) For the purposes of this section, a person who is authorized to
maintain custody and control over business records that reflect whether
or not the owner of the live performance consented to having the live
performance recorded or fixed is a competent witness in a proceeding
regarding the issue of consent.
(5) This section does not affect the rights and remedies of a party
in private litigation.

Sec. 19 RCW 19.25.040 and 2003 c 53 s 145 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of failure to disclose the origin of a
recording when, for commercial advantage or private financial gain, the
person knowingly advertises, or offers for sale, resale, or rent, or
sells or resells, or rents, leases, or lends, or possesses for any of
these purposes, any recording which does not contain the true name and
address of the manufacturer in a prominent place on the cover, jacket,
or label of the recording.
(2)(a) An offense under this section is a class B felony punishable
by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars,
imprisonment for not more than ten years, or both, if:
(i) The offense involves at least one hundred unauthorized
recordings during a one hundred eighty-day period; or
(ii) The defendant has been previously convicted under this
section.
(b) An offense under this section is a class C felony punishable by
a fine of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars,
imprisonment for not more than five years, or both, if the offense
involves more than ten but less than one hundred unauthorized
recordings during a one hundred eighty-day period.
(c) Any other offense under this section is a gross misdemeanor
punishable by a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars,
imprisonment for ((not more than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.
(3) This section does not affect the rights and remedies of a party
in private litigation.

Sec. 20 RCW 19.112.060 and 2006 c 338 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Any person who knowingly violates any provision of this
chapter or rules adopted under it is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon
conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand
dollars or imprisonment for ((not more than one year)) up to three
hundred sixty-four days, or both.
(b) The director shall assess a civil penalty ranging from one
hundred dollars to ten thousand dollars per occurrence, giving due
consideration to the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the
gravity of the violation, and the history of previous violations.
Civil penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited into
the motor vehicle fund.
(2) The penalties in subsection (1)(a) of this section do not apply
to violations of RCW 19.112.110 and 19.112.120.

Sec. 21 RCW 19.182.130 and 1993 c 476 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person who knowingly and willfully obtains information on a
consumer from a consumer reporting agency under false pretenses is
subject to a fine of up to five thousand dollars or imprisonment for
((up to one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.

Sec. 22 RCW 19.182.140 and 1993 c 476 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
An officer or employee of a consumer reporting agency who knowingly
and willfully provides information concerning an individual from the
agency's files to a person not authorized to receive that information
is subject to a fine of up to five thousand dollars or imprisonment for
((up to one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.

Sec. 23 RCW 28C.10.140 and 1986 c 299 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any entity or any owner, officer, agent, or employee of such entity
who wilfully violates RCW 28C.10.060 or 28C.10.090 is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not to
exceed one thousand dollars or by imprisonment in the county jail for
((not to exceed one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by
both such fine and imprisonment.
Each day on which a violation occurs constitutes a separate
violation. The criminal sanctions may be imposed by a court of
competent jurisdiction in an action brought by the attorney general of
this state.

Sec. 24 RCW 35.20.030 and 2005 c 282 s 41 are each amended to
read as follows:
The municipal court shall have jurisdiction to try violations of
all city ordinances and all other actions brought to enforce or recover
license penalties or forfeitures declared or given by any such
ordinances. It is empowered to forfeit cash bail or bail bonds and
issue execution thereon, to hear and determine all causes, civil or
criminal, arising under such ordinances, and to pronounce judgment in
accordance therewith: PROVIDED, That for a violation of the criminal
provisions of an ordinance no greater punishment shall be imposed than
a fine of five thousand dollars or imprisonment in the city jail ((not
to exceed one year)) for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both
such fine and imprisonment, but the punishment for any criminal
ordinance shall be the same as the punishment provided in state law for
the same crime. All civil and criminal proceedings in municipal court,
and judgments rendered therein, shall be subject to review in the
superior court by writ of review or on appeal: PROVIDED, That an
appeal from the court's determination or order in a traffic infraction
proceeding may be taken only in accordance with RCW 46.63.090(5).
Costs in civil and criminal cases may be taxed as provided in district
courts. A municipal court participating in the program established by
the administrative office of the courts pursuant to RCW 2.56.160 shall
have jurisdiction to take recognizance, approve bail, and arraign
defendants held within its jurisdiction on warrants issued by any court
of limited jurisdiction participating in the program.

Sec. 25 RCW 35.22.280 and 2009 c 549 s 2046 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any city of the first class shall have power:
(1) To provide for general and special elections, for questions to
be voted upon, and for the election of officers;
(2) To provide for levying and collecting taxes on real and
personal property for its corporate uses and purposes, and to provide
for the payment of the debts and expenses of the corporation;
(3) To control the finances and property of the corporation, and to
acquire, by purchase or otherwise, such lands and other property as may
be necessary for any part of the corporate uses provided for by its
charter, and to dispose of any such property as the interests of the
corporation may, from time to time, require;
(4) To borrow money for corporate purposes on the credit of the
corporation, and to issue negotiable bonds therefor, on such conditions
and in such manner as shall be prescribed in its charter; but no city
shall, in any manner or for any purpose, become indebted to an amount
in the aggregate to exceed the limitation of indebtedness prescribed by
chapter 39.36 RCW as now or hereafter amended;
(5) To issue bonds in place of or to supply means to meet maturing
bonds or other indebtedness, or for the consolidation or funding of the
same;
(6) To purchase or appropriate private property within or without
its corporate limits, for its corporate uses, upon making just
compensation to the owners thereof, and to institute and maintain such
proceedings as may be authorized by the general laws of the state for
the appropriation of private property for public use;
(7) To lay out, establish, open, alter, widen, extend, grade, pave,
plank, establish grades, or otherwise improve streets, alleys, avenues,
sidewalks, wharves, parks, and other public grounds, and to regulate
and control the use thereof, and to vacate the same, and to authorize
or prohibit the use of electricity at, in, or upon any of said streets,
or for other purposes, and to prescribe the terms and conditions upon
which the same may be so used, and to regulate the use thereof;
(8) To change the grade of any street, highway, or alley within its
corporate limits, and to provide for the payment of damages to any
abutting owner or owners who shall have built or made other
improvements upon such street, highway, or alley at any point opposite
to the point where such change shall be made with reference to the
grade of such street, highway, or alley as the same existed prior to
such change;
(9) To authorize or prohibit the locating and constructing of any
railroad or street railroad in any street, alley, or public place in
such city, and to prescribe the terms and conditions upon which any
such railroad or street railroad shall be located or constructed; to
provide for the alteration, change of grade, or removal thereof; to
regulate the moving and operation of railroad and street railroad
trains, cars, and locomotives within the corporate limits of said city;
and to provide by ordinance for the protection of all persons and
property against injury in the use of such railroads or street
railroads;
(10) To provide for making local improvements, and to levy and
collect special assessments on property benefited thereby, and for
paying for the same or any portion thereof;
(11) To acquire, by purchase or otherwise, lands for public parks
within or without the limits of such city, and to improve the same.
When the language of any instrument by which any property is so
acquired limits the use of said property to park purposes and contains
a reservation of interest in favor of the grantor or any other person,
and where it is found that the property so acquired is not needed for
park purposes and that an exchange thereof for other property to be
dedicated for park purposes is in the public interest, the city may,
with the consent of the grantor or such other person, his or her heirs,
successors, or assigns, exchange such property for other property to be
dedicated for park purposes, and may make, execute, and deliver proper
conveyances to effect the exchange. In any case where, owing to death
or lapse of time, there is neither donor, heir, successor, or assignee
to give consent, this consent may be executed by the city and filed for
record with an affidavit setting forth all efforts made to locate
people entitled to give such consent together with the facts which
establish that no consent by such persons is attainable. Title to
property so conveyed by the city shall vest in the grantee free and
clear of any trust in favor of the public arising out of any prior
dedication for park purposes, but the right of the public shall be
transferred and preserved with like force and effect to the property
received by the city in such exchange;
(12) To construct and keep in repair bridges, viaducts, and
tunnels, and to regulate the use thereof;
(13) To determine what work shall be done or improvements made at
the expense, in whole or in part, of the owners of the adjoining
contiguous, or proximate property, or others specially benefited
thereby; and to provide for the manner of making and collecting
assessments therefor;
(14) To provide for erecting, purchasing, or otherwise acquiring
waterworks, within or without the corporate limits of said city, to
supply said city and its inhabitants with water, or authorize the
construction of same by others when deemed for the best interests of
such city and its inhabitants, and to regulate and control the use and
price of the water so supplied;
(15) To provide for lighting the streets and all public places, and
for furnishing the inhabitants thereof with gas or other lights, and to
erect, or otherwise acquire, and to maintain the same, or to authorize
the erection and maintenance of such works as may be necessary and
convenient therefor, and to regulate and control the use thereof;
(16) To establish and regulate markets, and to provide for the
weighing, measuring, and inspection of all articles of food and drink
offered for sale thereat, or at any other place within its limits, by
proper penalties, and to enforce the keeping of proper legal weights
and measures by all vendors in such city, and to provide for the
inspection thereof. Whenever the words "public markets" are used in
this chapter, and the public market is managed in whole or in part by
a public corporation created by a city, the words shall be construed to
include all real or personal property located in a district or area
designated by a city as a public market and traditionally devoted to
providing farmers, crafts vendors and other merchants with retail space
to market their wares to the public. Property located in such a
district or area need not be exclusively or primarily used for such
traditional public market retail activities and may include property
used for other public purposes including, but not limited to, the
provision of human services and low-income or moderate-income housing;
(17) To erect and establish hospitals and pesthouses, and to
control and regulate the same;
(18) To provide for establishing and maintaining reform schools for
juvenile offenders;
(19) To provide for the establishment and maintenance of public
libraries, and to appropriate, annually, such percent of all moneys
collected for fines, penalties, and licenses as shall be prescribed by
its charter, for the support of a city library, which shall, under such
regulations as shall be prescribed by ordinance, be open for use by the
public;
(20) To regulate the burial of the dead, and to establish and
regulate cemeteries within or without the corporate limits, and to
acquire land therefor by purchase or otherwise; to cause cemeteries to
be removed beyond the limits of the corporation, and to prohibit their
establishment within two miles of the boundaries thereof;
(21) To direct the location and construction of all buildings in
which any trade or occupation offensive to the senses or deleterious to
public health or safety shall be carried on, and to regulate the
management thereof; and to prohibit the erection or maintenance of such
buildings or structures, or the carrying on of such trade or occupation
within the limits of such corporation, or within the distance of two
miles beyond the boundaries thereof;
(22) To provide for the prevention and extinguishment of fires and
to regulate or prohibit the transportation, keeping, or storage of all
combustible or explosive materials within its corporate limits, and to
regulate and restrain the use of fireworks;
(23) To establish fire limits and to make all such regulations for
the erection and maintenance of buildings or other structures within
its corporate limits as the safety of persons or property may require,
and to cause all such buildings and places as may from any cause be in
a dangerous state to be put in safe condition;
(24) To regulate the manner in which stone, brick, and other
buildings, party walls, and partition fences shall be constructed and
maintained;
(25) To deepen, widen, dock, cover, wall, alter, or change the
channels of waterways and courses, and to provide for the construction
and maintenance of all such works as may be required for the
accommodation of commerce, including canals, slips, public landing
places, wharves, docks, and levees, and to control and regulate the use
thereof;
(26) To control, regulate, or prohibit the anchorage, moorage, and
landing of all watercrafts and their cargoes within the jurisdiction of
the corporation;
(27) To fix the rates of wharfage and dockage, and to provide for
the collection thereof, and to provide for the imposition and
collection of such harbor fees as may be consistent with the laws of
the United States;
(28) To license, regulate, control, or restrain wharf boats, tugs,
and other boats used about the harbor or within such jurisdiction;
(29) To require the owners of public halls or other buildings to
provide suitable means of exit; to provide for the prevention and
abatement of nuisances, for the cleaning and purification of
watercourses and canals, for the drainage and filling up of ponds on
private property within its limits, when the same shall be offensive to
the senses or dangerous to health; to regulate and control, and to
prevent and punish, the defilement or pollution of all streams running
through or into its corporate limits, and for the distance of five
miles beyond its corporate limits, and on any stream or lake from which
the water supply of said city is taken, for a distance of five miles
beyond its source of supply; to provide for the cleaning of areas,
vaults, and other places within its corporate limits which may be so
kept as to become offensive to the senses or dangerous to health, and
to make all such quarantine or other regulations as may be necessary
for the preservation of the public health, and to remove all persons
afflicted with any infectious or contagious disease to some suitable
place to be provided for that purpose;
(30) To declare what shall be a nuisance, and to abate the same,
and to impose fines upon parties who may create, continue, or suffer
nuisances to exist;
(31) To regulate the selling or giving away of intoxicating, malt,
vinous, mixed, or fermented liquors as authorized by the general laws
of the state: PROVIDED, That no license shall be granted to any person
or persons who shall not first comply with the general laws of the
state in force at the time the same is granted;
(32) To grant licenses for any lawful purpose, and to fix by
ordinance the amount to be paid therefor, and to provide for revoking
the same. However, no license shall be granted to continue for longer
than one year from the date thereof. A city may not require a business
to be licensed based solely upon registration under or compliance with
the streamlined sales and use tax agreement;
(33) To regulate the carrying on within its corporate limits of all
occupations which are of such a nature as to affect the public health
or the good order of said city, or to disturb the public peace, and
which are not prohibited by law, and to provide for the punishment of
all persons violating such regulations, and of all persons who
knowingly permit the same to be violated in any building or upon any
premises owned or controlled by them;
(34) To restrain and provide for the punishment of vagrants,
mendicants, prostitutes, and other disorderly persons;
(35) To provide for the punishment of all disorderly conduct, and
of all practices dangerous to public health or safety, and to make all
regulations necessary for the preservation of public morality, health,
peace, and good order within its limits, and to provide for the arrest,
trial, and punishment of all persons charged with violating any of the
ordinances of said city. The punishment shall not exceed a fine of
five thousand dollars or imprisonment in the city jail for ((one year))
three hundred sixty-four days, or both such fine and imprisonment. The
punishment for any criminal ordinance shall be the same as the
punishment provided in state law for the same crime. Such cities
alternatively may provide that violations of ordinances constitute a
civil violation subject to monetary penalties, but no act which is a
state crime may be made a civil violation;
(36) To project or extend its streets over and across any tidelands
within its corporate limits, and along or across the harbor areas of
such city, in such manner as will best promote the interests of
commerce;
(37) To provide in their respective charters for a method to
propose and adopt amendments thereto.

Sec. 26 RCW 35.23.440 and 2009 c 549 s 2053 are each amended to
read as follows:
The city council of each second-class city shall have power and
authority:
(1) Ordinances: To make and pass all ordinances, orders, and
resolutions not repugnant to the Constitution of the United States or
the state of Washington, or the provisions of this title, necessary for
the municipal government and management of the affairs of the city, for
the execution of the powers vested in said body corporate, and for the
carrying into effect of the provisions of this title.
(2) License of shows: To fix and collect a license tax, for the
purposes of revenue and regulation, on theatres, melodeons, balls,
concerts, dances, theatrical, circus, or other performances, and all
performances where an admission fee is charged, or which may be held in
any house or place where wines or liquors are sold to the
participators; also all shows, billiard tables, pool tables, bowling
alleys, exhibitions, or amusements.
(3) Hotels, etc., licenses: To fix and collect a license tax for
the purposes of revenue and regulation on and to regulate all taverns,
hotels, restaurants, banks, brokers, manufactories, livery stables,
express companies and persons engaged in transmitting letters or
packages, railroad, stage, and steamboat companies or owners, whose
principal place of business is in such city, or who have an agency
therein.
(4) Peddlers', etc., licenses: To license, for the purposes of
revenue and regulation, tax, prohibit, suppress, and regulate all
raffles, hawkers, peddlers, pawnbrokers, refreshment or coffee stands,
booths, or sheds; and to regulate as authorized by state law all
tippling houses, dram shops, saloons, bars, and barrooms.
(5) Dance houses: To prohibit or suppress, or to license and
regulate all dance houses, fandango houses, or any exhibition or show
of any animal or animals.
(6) License vehicles: To license for the purposes of revenue and
regulation, and to tax hackney coaches, cabs, omnibuses, drays, market
wagons, and all other vehicles used for hire, and to regulate their
stands, and to fix the rates to be charged for the transportation of
persons, baggage, and property.
(7) Hotel runners: To license or suppress runners for steamboats,
taverns, or hotels.
(8) License generally: To fix and collect a license tax for the
purposes of revenue and regulation, upon all occupations and trades,
and all and every kind of business authorized by law not heretofore
specified. However, on any business, trade, or calling not provided by
law to be licensed for state and county purposes, the amount of license
shall be fixed at the discretion of the city council, as they may deem
the interests and good order of the city may require. A city may not
require a business to be licensed based solely upon registration under
or compliance with the streamlined sales and use tax agreement.
(9) Riots: To prevent and restrain any riot or riotous
assemblages, disturbance of the peace, or disorderly conduct in any
place, house, or street in the city.
(10) Nuisances: To declare what shall be deemed nuisances; to
prevent, remove, and abate nuisances at the expense of the parties
creating, causing, or committing or maintaining the same, and to levy
a special assessment on the land or premises whereon the nuisance is
situated to defray the cost or to reimburse the city for the cost of
abating the same.
(11) Stock pound: To establish, maintain, and regulate a common
pound for estrays, and to appoint a poundkeeper, who shall be paid out
of the fines and fees imposed and collected of the owners of any
animals impounded, and from no other source; to prevent and regulate
the running at large of any and all domestic animals within the city
limits or any parts thereof, and to regulate or prevent the keeping of
such animals within any part of the city.
(12) Control of certain trades: To control and regulate
slaughterhouses, washhouses, laundries, tanneries, forges, and
offensive trades, and to provide for their exclusion or removal from
the city limits, or from any part thereof.
(13) Street cleaning: To provide, by regulation, for the
prevention and summary removal of all filth and garbage in streets,
sloughs, alleys, back yards, or public grounds of such city, or
elsewhere therein.
(14) Gambling, etc.: To prohibit and suppress all gaming and all
gambling or disorderly houses, and houses of ill fame, and all immoral
and indecent amusements, exhibitions, and shows.
(15) Markets: To establish and regulate markets and market places.
(16) Speed of railroad cars: To fix and regulate the speed at
which any railroad cars, streetcars, automobiles, or other vehicles may
run within the city limits, or any portion thereof.
(17) City commons: To provide for and regulate the commons of the
city.
(18) Fast driving: To regulate or prohibit fast driving or riding
in any portion of the city.
(19) Combustibles: To regulate or prohibit the loading or storage
of gunpowder and combustible or explosive materials in the city, or
transporting the same through its streets or over its waters.
(20) Property: To have, purchase, hold, use, and enjoy property of
every name or kind whatsoever, and to sell, lease, transfer, mortgage,
convey, control, or improve the same; to build, erect, or construct
houses, buildings, or structures of any kind needful for the use or
purposes of such city.
(21) Fire department: To establish, continue, regulate, and
maintain a fire department for such city, to change or reorganize the
same, and to disband any company or companies of the said department;
also, to discontinue and disband said fire department, and to create,
organize, establish, and maintain a paid fire department for such city.
(22) Water supply: To adopt, enter into, and carry out means for
securing a supply of water for the use of such city or its inhabitants,
or for irrigation purposes therein.
(23) Overflow of water: To prevent the overflow of the city or to
secure its drainage, and to assess the cost thereof to the property
benefited.
(24) House numbers: To provide for the numbering of houses.
(25) Health board: To establish a board of health; to prevent the
introduction and spread of disease; to establish a city infirmary and
to provide for the indigent sick; and to provide and enforce
regulations for the protection of health, cleanliness, peace, and good
order of the city; to establish and maintain hospitals within or
without the city limits; to control and regulate interments and to
prohibit them within the city limits.
(26) Harbors and wharves: To build, alter, improve, keep in
repair, and control the waterfront; to erect, regulate, and repair
wharves, and to fix the rate of wharfage and transit of wharf, and levy
dues upon vessels and commodities; and to provide for the regulation of
berths, landing, stationing, and removing steamboats, sail vessels,
rafts, barges, and all other watercraft; to fix the rate of speed at
which steamboats and other steam watercraft may run along the
waterfront of the city; to build bridges so as not to interfere with
navigation; to provide for the removal of obstructions to the
navigation of any channel or watercourses or channels.
(27) License of steamers: To license steamers, boats, and vessels
used in any watercourse in the city, and to fix and collect a license
tax thereon.
(28) Ferry licenses: To license ferries and toll bridges under the
law regulating the granting of such license.
(29) Penalty for violation of ordinances: To provide that
violations of ordinances with the punishment for any offense not
exceeding a fine of five thousand dollars or imprisonment for ((more
than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both fine and
imprisonment, but the punishment for any criminal ordinance shall be
the same as the punishment provided in state law for the same crime.
Alternatively, such a city may provide that a violation of an ordinance
constitutes a civil violation subject to monetary penalties or to
determine and impose fines for forfeitures and penalties, but no act
which is a state crime may be made a civil violation. A violation of
an order, regulation, or ordinance relating to traffic including
parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses is a traffic
infraction, except that violation of an order, regulation, or ordinance
equivalent to those provisions of Title 46 RCW set forth in RCW
46.63.020 remains a misdemeanor.
(30) Police department: To create and establish a city police; to
prescribe their duties and their compensation; and to provide for the
regulation and government of the same.
(31) Examine official accounts: To examine, either in open session
or by committee, the accounts or doings of all officers or other
persons having the care, management, or disposition of moneys,
property, or business of the city.
(32) Contracts: To make all appropriations, contracts, or
agreements for the use or benefit of the city and in the city's name.
(33) Streets and sidewalks: To provide by ordinance for the
opening, laying out, altering, extending, repairing, grading, paving,
planking, graveling, macadamizing, or otherwise improving of public
streets, avenues, and other public ways, or any portion of any thereof;
and for the construction, regulation, and repair of sidewalks and other
street improvements, all at the expense of the property to be benefited
thereby, without any recourse, in any event, upon the city for any
portion of the expense of such work, or any delinquency of the property
holders or owners, and to provide for the forced sale thereof for such
purposes; to establish a uniform grade for streets, avenues, sidewalks,
and squares, and to enforce the observance thereof.
(34) Waterways: To clear, cleanse, alter, straighten, widen, fill
up, or close any waterway, drain, or sewer, or any watercourse in such
city when not declared by law to be navigable, and to assess the
expense thereof, in whole or in part, to the property specially
benefited.
(35) Sewerage: To adopt, provide for, establish, and maintain a
general system of sewerage, draining, or both, and the regulation
thereof; to provide funds by local assessments on the property
benefited for the purpose aforesaid and to determine the manner, terms,
and place of connection with main or central lines of pipes, sewers, or
drains established, and compel compliance with and conformity to such
general system of sewerage or drainage, or both, and the regulations of
said council thereto relating, by the infliction of suitable penalties
and forfeitures against persons and property, or either, for
nonconformity to, or failure to comply with the provisions of such
system and regulations or either.
(36) Buildings and parks: To provide for all public buildings,
public parks, or squares, necessary or proper for the use of the city.
(37) Franchises: To permit the use of the streets for railroad or
other public service purposes.
(38) Payment of judgments: To order paid any final judgment
against such city, but none of its lands or property of any kind or
nature, taxes, revenue, franchise, or rights, or interest, shall be
attached, levied upon, or sold in or under any process whatsoever.
(39) Weighing of fuel: To regulate the sale of coal and wood in
such city, and may appoint a measurer of wood and weigher of coal for
the city, and define his or her duties, and may prescribe his or her
term of office, and the fees he or she shall receive for his or her
services: PROVIDED, That such fees shall in all cases be paid by the
parties requiring such service.
(40) Hospitals, etc.: To erect and establish hospitals and
pesthouses and to control and regulate the same.
(41) Waterworks: To provide for the erection, purchase, or
otherwise acquiring of waterworks within or without the corporate
limits of the city to supply such city and its inhabitants with water,
and to regulate and control the use and price of the water so supplied.
(42) City lights: To provide for lighting the streets and all
public places of the city and for furnishing the inhabitants of the
city with gas, electric, or other light, and for the ownership,
purchase or acquisition, construction, or maintenance of such works as
may be necessary or convenient therefor: PROVIDED, That no purchase of
any such water plant or light plant shall be made without first
submitting the question of such purchase to the electors of the city.
(43) Parks: To acquire by purchase or otherwise land for public
parks, within or without the limits of the city, and to improve the
same.
(44) Bridges: To construct and keep in repair bridges, and to
regulate the use thereof.
(45) Power of eminent domain: In the name of and for the use and
benefit of the city, to exercise the right of eminent domain, and to
condemn lands and property for the purposes of streets, alleys, parks,
public grounds, waterworks, or for any other municipal purpose and to
acquire by purchase or otherwise such lands and property as may be
deemed necessary for any of the corporate uses provided for by this
title, as the interests of the city may from time to time require.
(46) To provide for the assessment of taxes: To provide for the
assessment, levying, and collecting of taxes on real and personal
property for the corporate uses and purposes of the city and to provide
for the payment of the debts and expenses of the corporation.
(47) Local improvements: To provide for making local improvements,
and to levy and collect special assessments on the property benefited
thereby and for paying the same or any portion thereof; to determine
what work shall be done or improvements made, at the expense, in whole
or in part, of the adjoining, contiguous, or proximate property, and to
provide for the manner of making and collecting assessments therefor.
(48) Cemeteries: To regulate the burial of the dead and to
establish and regulate cemeteries, within or without the corporate
limits, and to acquire lands therefor by purchase or otherwise.
(49) Fire limits: To establish fire limits with proper regulations
and to make all needful regulations for the erection and maintenance of
buildings or other structures within the corporate limits as safety of
persons or property may require, and to cause all such buildings and
places as may from any cause be in a dangerous state to be put in a
safe condition; to regulate the manner in which stone, brick, and other
buildings, party walls, and partition fences shall be constructed and
maintained.
(50) Safety and sanitary measures: To require the owners of public
halls, theaters, hotels, and other buildings to provide suitable means
of exit and proper fire escapes; to provide for the cleaning and
purification of watercourses and canals and for the draining and
filling up of ponds on private property within its limits when the same
shall be offensive to the senses or dangerous to the health, and to
charge the expense thereof to the property specially benefited, and to
regulate and control and provide for the prevention and punishment of
the defilement or pollution of all streams running in or through its
corporate limits and a distance of five miles beyond its corporate
limits, and of any stream or lake from which the water supply of the
city is or may be taken and for a distance of five miles beyond its
source of supply, and to make all quarantine and other regulations as
may be necessary for the preservation of the public health and to
remove all persons afflicted with any contagious disease to some
suitable place to be provided for that purpose.
(51) To regulate liquor traffic: To regulate the selling or giving
away of intoxicating, spirituous, malt, vinous, mixed, or fermented
liquors as authorized by the general laws of the state.
(52) To establish streets on tidelands: To project or extend or
establish streets over and across any tidelands within the limits of
such city.
(53) To provide for the general welfare.

Sec. 27 RCW 43.06.240 and 1969 ex.s. c 186 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
After the proclamation of a state of emergency pursuant to RCW
43.06.010, every person who:
(1) Wilfully causes public inconvenience, annoyance, or alarm, or
recklessly creates a risk thereof, by:
(a) engaging in fighting or in violent, tumultuous, or threatening
behavior; or
(b) making an unreasonable noise or an offensively coarse
utterance, gesture, or display, or addressing abusive language to any
person present; or
(c) dispersing any lawful procession or meeting of persons, not
being a peace officer of this state and without lawful authority; or
(d) creating a hazardous or physically offensive condition which
serves no legitimate purpose; or
(2) Engages with at least one other person in a course of conduct
as defined in subsection (1) of this section which is likely to cause
substantial harm or serious inconvenience, annoyance, or alarm, and
refuses or knowingly fails to obey an order to disperse made by a peace
officer shall be guilty of disorderly conduct and be punished by
imprisonment in the county jail for ((not more than one year)) up to
three hundred sixty-four days or fined not more than one thousand
dollars or by both fine and imprisonment.

Sec. 28 RCW 43.22.290 and 1965 c 8 s 43.22.290 are each amended
to read as follows:
Every owner, operator, or manager of a factory, workshop, mill,
mine, or other establishment where labor is employed, shall make to the
department, upon blanks furnished by it, such reports and returns as
the department may require, for the purpose of compiling such labor
statistics as are authorized by this chapter, and the owner or business
manager shall make such reports and returns within the time prescribed
therefor by the director, and shall certify to the correctness thereof.
In the reports of the department no use shall be made of the names
of individuals, firms, or corporations supplying the information called
for by this section, such information being deemed confidential, and
not for the purpose of disclosing personal affairs, and any officer,
agent, or employee of the department violating this provision shall be
fined a sum not exceeding five hundred dollars, or be imprisoned for
((not more than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days.

Sec. 29 RCW 43.63A.485 and 1993 c 124 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who violates any of the provisions of the National
Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (800
Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C. Secs. 5401-5426) applicable to RCW ((43.63A.465))
43.22A.030, 43.63A.470, 43.63A.475, and 43.63A.480 or any rules adopted
under RCW ((43.63A.465)) 43.22A.030, 43.63A.470, 43.63A.475, and
43.63A.480 is liable to the state of Washington for a civil penalty of
not to exceed one thousand dollars for each such violation. Each
violation of the provisions of the National Manufactured Housing
Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C.
Secs. 5401-5426) applicable to RCW ((43.63A.465)) 43.22A.030,
43.63A.470, 43.63A.475, and 43.63A.480 or any rules adopted under RCW
((43.63A.465)) 43.22A.030, 43.63A.470, 43.63A.475, and 43.63A.480,
shall constitute a separate violation with respect to each manufactured
home or with respect to each failure or refusal to allow or perform an
act required thereby, except that the maximum civil penalty may not
exceed one million dollars for any related series of violations
occurring within one year from the date of the first violation.
(2) An individual or a director, officer, or agent of a corporation
who knowingly and willfully violates any of the provisions of RCW
((43.63A.465)) 43.22A.030, 43.63A.470, 43.63A.475, and 43.63A.480 or
any rules adopted under RCW ((43.63A.465)) 43.22A.030, 43.63A.470,
43.63A.475, and 43.63A.480, in a manner that threatens the health or
safety of any purchaser, shall be fined not more than one thousand
dollars or imprisoned ((not more than one year)) up to three hundred
sixty-four days, or both.
(3) Any legal fees, court costs, expert witness fees, and staff
costs expended by the state in successfully pursuing violators of RCW
((43.63A.465)) 43.22A.030, 43.63A.470, 43.63A.475, and 43.63A.480 shall
be reimbursed in full by the violators.

Sec. 30 RCW 46.12.640 and 2005 c 274 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may review the activities of a person who
receives vehicle record information to ensure compliance with the
limitations imposed on the use of the information. The department
shall suspend or revoke for up to five years the privilege of obtaining
vehicle record information of a person found to be in violation of
chapter 42.56 RCW, this chapter, or a disclosure agreement executed
with the department.
(2) In addition to the penalty in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The unauthorized disclosure of information from a department
vehicle record; or
(b) The use of a false representation to obtain information from
the department's vehicle records; or
(c) The use of information obtained from the department vehicle
records for a purpose other than what is stated in the request for
information or in the disclosure agreement executed with the
department; or
(d) The sale or other distribution of any vehicle owner name or
address to another person not disclosed in the request or disclosure
agreement
is a gross misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed ten thousand
dollars, or by imprisonment in a county jail ((not to exceed one year))
for up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by both such fine and
imprisonment for each violation.

Sec. 31 RCW 46.16A.030 and 2010 c 270 s 1, 2010 c 217 s 5, and
2010 c 161 s 403 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Vehicles must be registered as required by this chapter and
must display license plates or decals assigned by the department.
(2) It is unlawful for a person to operate any vehicle on a public
highway of this state without having in full force and effect a current
and proper vehicle registration and displaying license plates on the
vehicle.
(3) Vehicle license plates or registration certificates, whether
original issues or duplicates, may not be issued or furnished by the
department until the applicant makes satisfactory application for a
certificate of title or presents satisfactory evidence that a
certificate of title covering the vehicle has been previously issued.
(4) Failure to make initial registration before operating a vehicle
on the public highways of this state is a traffic infraction. A person
committing this infraction must pay a fine of five hundred twenty-nine
dollars, which may not be suspended, deferred, or reduced. This fine
is in addition to any delinquent taxes and fees that must be deposited
and distributed in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were
properly paid in a timely fashion. The five hundred twenty-nine dollar
fine must be deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created
in the state treasury in RCW 46.68.250.
(5) Failure to renew an expired registration before operating a
vehicle on the public highways of this state is a traffic infraction.
(6) It is a gross misdemeanor for a resident, as identified in RCW
46.16A.140, to register a vehicle in another state, evading the payment
of any tax or vehicle license fee imposed in connection with
registration. It is punishable, in lieu of the fine in subsection (4)
of this section, as follows:
(a) For a first offense:
(i) Up to ((one year)) three hundred sixty-four days in the county
jail;
(ii) Payment of a fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars plus any
applicable assessments, which may not be suspended, deferred, or
reduced. The fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars must be
deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state
treasury in RCW 46.68.250;
(iii) A fine of one thousand dollars to be deposited into the
vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW
46.68.250, which may not be suspended, deferred, or reduced; and
(iv) The delinquent taxes and fees, which must be deposited and
distributed in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly
paid in a timely fashion, and which may not be suspended, deferred, or
reduced;
(b) For a second or subsequent offense:
(i) Up to ((one year)) three hundred sixty-four days in the county
jail;
(ii) Payment of a fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars plus any
applicable assessments, which may not be suspended, deferred, or
reduced. The fine of five hundred twenty-nine dollars must be
deposited into the vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state
treasury in RCW 46.68.250;
(iii) A fine of five thousand dollars to be deposited into the
vehicle licensing fraud account created in the state treasury in RCW
46.68.250, which may not be suspended, deferred, or reduced; and
(iv) The amount of delinquent taxes and fees, which must be
deposited and distributed in the same manner as if the taxes and fees
were properly paid in a timely fashion, and which may not be suspended,
deferred, or reduced.
(7) A vehicle with an expired registration of more than forty-five
days parked on a public street may be impounded by a police officer
under RCW 46.55.113(2).

Sec. 32 RCW 46.19.010 and 2010 c 161 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A natural person who has a disability that meets one of the
following criteria may apply for special parking privileges:
(a) Cannot walk two hundred feet without stopping to rest;
(b) Is severely limited in ability to walk due to arthritic,
neurological, or orthopedic condition;
(c) Has such a severe disability that the person cannot walk
without the use of or assistance from a brace, cane, another person,
prosthetic device, wheelchair, or other assistive device;
(d) Uses portable oxygen;
(e) Is restricted by lung disease to an extent that forced
expiratory respiratory volume, when measured by spirometry, is less
than one liter per second or the arterial oxygen tension is less than
sixty mm/hg on room air at rest;
(f) Impairment by cardiovascular disease or cardiac condition to
the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified as
class III or IV under standards accepted by the American heart
association;
(g) Has a disability resulting from an acute sensitivity to
automobile emissions that limits or impairs the ability to walk. The
personal physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or
physician assistant of the applicant shall document that the disability
is comparable in severity to the others listed in this subsection;
(h) Has limited mobility and has no vision or whose vision with
corrective lenses is so limited that the person requires alternative
methods or skills to do efficiently those things that are ordinarily
done with sight by persons with normal vision;
(i) Has an eye condition of a progressive nature that may lead to
blindness; or
(j) Is restricted by a form of porphyria to the extent that the
applicant would significantly benefit from a decrease in exposure to
light.
(2) The disability must be determined by either:
(a) A licensed physician;
(b) An advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW; or
(c) A physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A or 18.57A
RCW.
(3) The application for special parking privileges for persons with
disabilities must contain:
(a) The following statement immediately below the physician's,
advanced registered nurse practitioner's, or physician assistant's
signature: "A parking permit for a person with disabilities may be
issued only for a medical necessity that severely affects mobility or
involves acute sensitivity to light (RCW 46.19.010). Knowingly
providing false information on this application is a gross misdemeanor.
The penalty is ((up to one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days
in jail and a fine of up to $5,000 or both"; and
(b) Other information as required by the department.
(4) A natural person who has a disability described in subsection
(1) of this section and is expected to improve within six months may be
issued a temporary placard for a period not to exceed six months. If
the disability exists after six months, a new temporary placard must be
issued upon receipt of a new application with certification from the
person's physician. Special license plates for persons with
disabilities may not be issued to a person with a temporary disability.
(5) A natural person who qualifies for special parking privileges
under this section must receive an identification card showing the name
and date of birth of the person to whom the parking privilege has been
issued and the serial number of the placard.
(6) A natural person who qualifies for permanent special parking
privileges under this section may receive one of the following:
(a) Up to two parking placards;
(b) One set of special license plates for persons with disabilities
if the person with the disability is the registered owner of the
vehicle on which the license plates will be displayed;
(c) One parking placard and one set of special license plates for
persons with disabilities if the person with the disability is the
registered owner of the vehicle on which the license plates will be
displayed; or
(d) One special parking year tab for persons with disabilities and
one parking placard.
(7) Parking placards and identification cards described in this
section must be issued free of charge.
(8) The parking placard and identification card must be immediately
returned to the department upon the placard holder's death.

Sec. 33 RCW 46.37.650 and 2003 c 33 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if he or she knew or
reasonably should have known that an air bag he or she installs or
reinstalls in a vehicle for compensation, or distributes as an auto
part, is a previously deployed air bag that is part of an inflatable
restraint system.
(2) A person found guilty under subsection (1) of this section
shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars or
by confinement in the county jail for ((not more than one year)) up to
three hundred sixty-four days, or both.

Sec. 34 RCW 46.61.500 and 1990 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who drives any vehicle in willful or wanton
disregard for the safety of persons or property is guilty of reckless
driving. Violation of the provisions of this section is a gross
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment ((of not more than one year))
for up to three hundred sixty-four days and by a fine of not more than
five thousand dollars.
(2) The license or permit to drive or any nonresident privilege of
any person convicted of reckless driving shall be suspended by the
department for not less than thirty days.

Sec. 35 RCW 46.61.5055 and 2010 c 269 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than ((one
year)) three hundred sixty-four days. Twenty-four consecutive hours of
the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would
impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or
deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or
deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(a)(i), the court may
order not less than fifteen days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county
or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine
the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the
court may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than ((one
year)) three hundred sixty-four days. Two consecutive days of the
imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds
that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based.
In lieu of the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under
this subsection (1)(b)(i), the court may order not less than thirty
days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of
electronic home monitoring. The county or municipality in which the
penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to include an
alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the amount
of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as
follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than
((one year)) three hundred sixty-four days and sixty days of electronic
home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the electronic
monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and sixty days of electronic
home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds
that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the
court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based;
and
(ii) By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than
((one year)) three hundred sixty-four days and ninety days of
electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is
being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol
detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. Forty-five days of imprisonment and ninety days of
electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the
court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or
deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or
deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor
more than five thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the
fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(3) Except as provided in RCW 46.61.502(6) or 46.61.504(6), a
person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
and who has two or three prior offenses within seven years shall be
punished as follows:
(a) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less
than 0.15, or for whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to
take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than
((one year)) three hundred sixty-four days and one hundred twenty days
of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of
the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the
penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also
require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an
alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol
the offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic
home monitoring. Ninety days of imprisonment and one hundred twenty
days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum
sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or
mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is
suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for
granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than
five thousand dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent; or
(b) In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at
least 0.15, or for whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result
indicating the person's alcohol concentration:
(i) By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor
more than ((one year)) three hundred sixty-four days and one hundred
fifty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for
the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality
where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court
may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device
include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount
of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment
and one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of
this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the
offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and
(ii) By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars
nor more than five thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars
of the fine may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds the
offender to be indigent.
(4) A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 shall be punished under chapter 9.94A RCW if: (a) The person
has four or more prior offenses within ten years; or (b) the person has
ever previously been convicted of: (i) A violation of RCW 46.61.520
committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(ii) a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug; or (iii) an out-of-state offense
comparable to the offense specified in (b)(i) or (ii) of this
subsection.
(5)(a) The court shall require any person convicted of a violation
of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance to apply
for an ignition interlock driver's license from the department and to
have a functioning ignition interlock device installed on all motor
vehicles operated by the person.
(b) The installation of an ignition interlock device is not
necessary on vehicles owned, leased, or rented by a person's employer
and on those vehicles whose care and/or maintenance is the temporary
responsibility of the employer, and driven at the direction of a
person's employer as a requirement of employment during working hours.
The person must provide the department with a declaration pursuant to
RCW 9A.72.085 from his or her employer stating that the person's
employment requires the person to operate a vehicle owned by the
employer or other persons during working hours.
(c) An ignition interlock device imposed under this section shall
be calibrated to prevent a motor vehicle from being started when the
breath sample provided has an alcohol concentration of 0.025 or more.
(d) The court may waive the requirement that a person apply for an
ignition interlock driver's license if the court makes a specific
finding in writing that:
(i) The person lives out-of-state and the devices are not
reasonably available in the person's local area;
(ii) The person does not operate a vehicle; or
(iii) The person is not eligible to receive an ignition interlock
driver's license under RCW 46.20.385 because the person is not a
resident of Washington, is a habitual traffic offender, has already
applied for or is already in possession of an ignition interlock
driver's license, has never had a driver's license, has been certified
under chapter 74.20A RCW as noncompliant with a child support order, or
is subject to any other condition or circumstance that makes the person
ineligible to obtain an ignition interlock driver's license.
(e) If a court finds that a person is not eligible to receive an
ignition interlock driver's license under this section, the court is
not required to make any further subsequent inquiry or determination as
to the person's eligibility.
(f) If the court orders that a person refrain from consuming any
alcohol and requires the person to apply for an ignition interlock
driver's license, and the person states that he or she does not operate
a motor vehicle or the person is ineligible to obtain an ignition
interlock driver's license, the court shall order the person to submit
to alcohol monitoring through an alcohol detection breathalyzer device,
transdermal sensor device, or other technology designed to detect
alcohol in a person's system. The person shall pay for the cost of the
monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost.
(g) The period of time for which ignition interlock use or alcohol
monitoring is required will be as follows:
(i) For a person who has not previously been restricted under this
section, a period of one year;
(ii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (g)(i)
of this subsection, a period of five years;
(iii) For a person who has previously been restricted under (g)(ii)
of this subsection, a period of ten years.
(6) If a person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 committed the offense while a passenger under the age of
sixteen was in the vehicle, the court shall:
(a) In any case in which the installation and use of an interlock
or other device is not mandatory under RCW 46.20.720 or other law,
order the use of such a device for not less than sixty days following
the restoration of the person's license, permit, or nonresident driving
privileges; and
(b) In any case in which the installation and use of such a device
is otherwise mandatory, order the use of such a device for an
additional sixty days.
(7) In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the
limits allowed by this section, the court shall particularly consider
the following:
(a) Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was
responsible for injury or damage to another or another's property; and
(b) Whether at the time of the offense the person was driving or in
physical control of a vehicle with one or more passengers.
(8) An offender punishable under this section is subject to the
alcohol assessment and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.
(9) The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person
convicted of driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:
(a) If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if
for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
suspended or denied by the department for ninety days;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for three years;
(b) If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15:
(i) Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for one year;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for nine hundred days; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven
years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years; or
(c) If by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered
under RCW 46.20.308, there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:
(i) Where there have been no prior offenses within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for two years;
(ii) Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be
revoked or denied by the department for three years; or
(iii) Where there have been two or more previous offenses within
seven years, be revoked or denied by the department for four years.
The department shall grant credit on a day-for-day basis for any
portion of a suspension, revocation, or denial already served under
this subsection for a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under
RCW 46.20.3101 arising out of the same incident.
For purposes of this subsection (9), the department shall refer to
the driver's record maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the
existence of prior offenses.
(10) After expiration of any period of suspension, revocation, or
denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive
required by this section, the department shall place the offender's
driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.
(11)(a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail
sentence required by this section, whenever the court imposes ((less
than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days in jail, the court
shall also suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a
period not exceeding five years. The court shall impose conditions of
probation that include: (i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this
state without a valid license to drive and proof of financial
responsibility for the future; (ii) not driving a motor vehicle within
this state while having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more within
two hours after driving; and (iii) not refusing to submit to a test of
his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol concentration upon
request of a law enforcement officer who has reasonable grounds to
believe the person was driving or was in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor. The court may impose conditions of probation that
include nonrepetition, installation of an ignition interlock device on
the probationer's motor vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment, supervised
probation, or other conditions that may be appropriate. The sentence
may be imposed in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of
probation during the suspension period.
(b) For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under
(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, the court shall order the
convicted person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be
suspended or deferred.
(c) For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory
condition of probation imposed under this subsection, the license,
permit, or privilege to drive of the person shall be suspended by the
court for thirty days or, if such license, permit, or privilege to
drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the time the finding
of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or denial
then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall
notify the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any
extension of a suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this
subsection.
(12) A court may waive the electronic home monitoring requirements
of this chapter when:
(a) The offender does not have a dwelling, telephone service, or
any other necessity to operate an electronic home monitoring system;
(b) The offender does not reside in the state of Washington; or
(c) The court determines that there is reason to believe that the
offender would violate the conditions of the electronic home monitoring
penalty.
Whenever the mandatory minimum term of electronic home monitoring
is waived, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the
waiver and the facts upon which the waiver is based, and shall impose
an alternative sentence with similar punitive consequences. The
alternative sentence may include, but is not limited to, additional
jail time, work crew, or work camp.
Whenever the combination of jail time and electronic home
monitoring or alternative sentence would exceed three hundred ((sixty-five)) sixty-four days, the offender shall serve the jail portion of
the sentence first, and the electronic home monitoring or alternative
portion of the sentence shall be reduced so that the combination does
not exceed three hundred ((sixty-five)) sixty-four days.
(13) An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or
not a mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an
extraordinary medical placement by the jail administrator subject to
the standards and limitations set forth in RCW 9.94A.728(3).
(14) For purposes of this section and RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504:
(a) A "prior offense" means any of the following:
(i) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(ii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent
local ordinance;
(iii) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(iv) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;
(v) A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or
9A.36.050 or an equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the
result of a charge that was originally filed as a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW
46.61.520 or 46.61.522;
(vi) An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have
been a violation of (a)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this
subsection if committed in this state;
(vii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an
equivalent local ordinance; or
(viii) A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a
prosecution for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local
ordinance, if the charge under which the deferred prosecution was
granted was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or
46.61.522;
If a deferred prosecution is revoked based on a subsequent
conviction for an offense listed in this subsection (14)(a), the
subsequent conviction shall not be treated as a prior offense of the
revoked deferred prosecution for the purposes of sentencing;
(b) "Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years before or after the arrest for the current
offense; and
(c) "Within ten years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within ten years before or after the arrest for the current
offense.

Sec. 36 RCW 46.70.021 and 2003 c 53 s 249 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person, firm, or association to act as
a vehicle dealer or vehicle manufacturer, to engage in business as
such, serve in the capacity of such, advertise himself, herself, or
themselves as such, solicit sales as such, or distribute or transfer
vehicles for resale in this state, without first obtaining and holding
a current license as provided in this chapter, unless the title of the
vehicle is in the name of the seller.
(2) It is unlawful for any person other than a licensed vehicle
dealer to display a vehicle for sale unless the registered owner or
legal owner is the displayer or holds a notarized power of attorney.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person or
firm engaged in buying and offering for sale, or buying and selling
five or more vehicles in a twelve-month period, or in any other way
engaged in dealer activity without holding a vehicle dealer license, is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor, and upon conviction subject to a fine of
up to five thousand dollars for each violation and up to ((one year))
three hundred sixty-four days in jail.
(b) A second offense is a class C felony punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(4) A violation of this section is also a per se violation of
chapter 19.86 RCW and is considered a deceptive practice.
(5) The department of licensing, the Washington state patrol, the
attorney general's office, and the department of revenue shall
cooperate in the enforcement of this section.
(6) A distributor, factory branch, or factory representative shall
not be required to have a vehicle manufacturer license so long as the
vehicle manufacturer so represented is properly licensed pursuant to
this chapter.
(7) Nothing in this chapter prohibits financial institutions from
cooperating with vehicle dealers licensed under this chapter in dealer
sales or leases. However, financial institutions shall not broker
vehicles and cooperation is limited to organizing, promoting, and
financing of such dealer sales or leases.

Sec. 37 RCW 48.01.080 and 2003 c 250 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in this code, any person violating any
provision of this code is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and will, upon
conviction, be fined not less than ten dollars nor more than one
thousand dollars, or imprisoned for not more than ((one year)) three
hundred sixty-four days, or both, in addition to any other penalty or
forfeiture provided herein or otherwise by law.

Sec. 38 RCW 48.31.105 and 2003 c 53 s 272 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An officer, manager, director, trustee, owner, employee, or
agent of an insurer or other person with authority over or in charge of
a segment of the insurer's affairs shall cooperate with the
commissioner in a proceeding under this chapter or an investigation
preliminary to the proceeding. The term "person" as used in this
section includes a person who exercises control directly or indirectly
over activities of the insurer through a holding company or other
affiliate of the insurer. "To cooperate" as used in this section
includes the following:
(a) To reply promptly in writing to an inquiry from the
commissioner requesting such a reply; and
(b) To make available to the commissioner books, accounts,
documents, or other records or information or property of or pertaining
to the insurer and in his or her possession, custody, or control.
(2) A person may not obstruct or interfere with the commissioner in
the conduct of a delinquency proceeding or an investigation preliminary
or incidental thereto.
(3) This section does not abridge existing legal rights, including
the right to resist a petition for liquidation or other delinquency
proceedings, or other orders.
(4) A person included within subsection (1) of this section who
fails to cooperate with the commissioner, or a person who obstructs or
interferes with the commissioner in the conduct of a delinquency
proceeding or an investigation preliminary or incidental thereto, or
who violates an order the commissioner issued validly under this
chapter may:
(a) Be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and sentenced to pay a fine
not exceeding ten thousand dollars or to undergo imprisonment for a
term of not more than ((one year)) three hundred sixty-four days, or
both; or
(b) After a hearing, be subject to the imposition by the
commissioner of a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars and
be subject further to the revocation or suspension of insurance
licenses issued by the commissioner.

Sec. 39 RCW 48.36A.360 and 1987 c 366 s 36 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person who wilfully makes a false or fraudulent statement
in or relating to an application for membership or for the purpose of
obtaining money from or a benefit in any society, shall upon conviction
be fined not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred
dollars or imprisonment in the county jail not less than thirty days
nor more than ((one year)) three hundred sixty-four days, or both.
(2) Any person who wilfully makes a false or fraudulent statement
in any verified report or declaration under oath required or authorized
by this chapter, or of any material fact or thing contained in a sworn
statement concerning the death or disability of an insured for the
purpose of procuring payment of a benefit named in the certificate,
shall be guilty of false swearing and shall be subject to the penalties
under RCW 9A.72.040.
(3) Any person who solicits membership for, or in any manner
assists in procuring membership in, any society not licensed to do
business in this state shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon
conviction be fined not less than fifty dollars nor more than two
hundred dollars.
(4) Any person guilty of a wilful violation of, or neglect or
refusal to comply with, the provisions of this chapter for which a
penalty is not otherwise prescribed, shall upon conviction, be subject
to a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars.

Sec. 40 RCW 49.17.190 and 2010 c 8 s 12016 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person who gives advance notice of any inspection to be
conducted under the authority of this chapter, without the consent of
the director or his or her authorized representative, shall, upon
conviction be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and be punished by a fine
of not more than one thousand dollars or by imprisonment for not more
than six months, or by both.
(2) Whoever knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or
certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other
document filed or required to be maintained pursuant to this chapter
shall, upon conviction be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and be punished
by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars, or by imprisonment for
not more than six months or by both.
(3) Any employer who wilfully and knowingly violates the
requirements of RCW 49.17.060, any safety or health standard
promulgated under this chapter, any existing rule or regulation
governing the safety or health conditions of employment and adopted by
the director, or any order issued granting a variance under RCW
49.17.080 or 49.17.090 and that violation caused death to any employee
shall, upon conviction be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and be punished
by a fine of not more than one hundred thousand dollars or by
imprisonment for not more than six months or by both; except, that if
the conviction is for a violation committed after a first conviction of
such person, punishment shall be a fine of not more than two hundred
thousand dollars or by imprisonment for not more than ((one year))
three hundred sixty-four days, or by both.
(4) Any employer who has been issued an order immediately
restraining a condition, practice, method, process, or means in the
work place, pursuant to RCW 49.17.130 or 49.17.170, and who
nevertheless continues such condition, practice, method, process, or
means, or who continues to use a machine or equipment or part thereof
to which a notice prohibiting such use has been attached, shall be
guilty of a gross misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished by
a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars or by imprisonment for not
more than six months, or by both.
(5) Any employer who shall knowingly remove, displace, damage, or
destroy, or cause to be removed, displaced, damaged, or destroyed any
safety device or safeguard required to be present and maintained by any
safety or health standard, rule, or order promulgated pursuant to this
chapter, or pursuant to the authority vested in the director under RCW
43.22.050 shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and be
punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars or by
imprisonment for not more than ninety days, or by both.
(6) Whenever the director has reasonable cause to believe that any
provision of this section defining a crime has been violated by an
employer, the director shall cause a record of such alleged violation
to be prepared, a copy of which shall be referred to the prosecuting
attorney of the county wherein such alleged violation occurred, and the
prosecuting attorney of such county shall in writing advise the
director of the disposition he or she shall make of the alleged
violation.

Sec. 41 RCW 49.24.060 and 1937 c 131 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Violation of or noncompliance with any provision of this article by
any employer, manager, superintendent, foreman or other person having
direction or control of such work shall be a gross misdemeanor
punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred and fifty dollars or
by imprisonment for ((not more than one year)) up to three hundred
sixty-four days or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Sec. 42 RCW 49.44.010 and 1899 c 23 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person in this state who shall wilfully and maliciously, send
or deliver, or make or cause to be made, for the purpose of being
delivered or sent or part with the possession of any paper, letter or
writing, with or without name signed thereto, or signed with a
fictitious name, or with any letter, mark or other designation, or
publish or cause to be published any statement for the purpose of
preventing any other person from obtaining employment in this state or
elsewhere, and every person who shall wilfully and maliciously
"blacklist" or cause to be "blacklisted" any person or persons, by
writing, printing or publishing, or causing the same to be done, the
name, or mark, or designation representing the name of any person in
any paper, pamphlet, circular or book, together with any statement
concerning persons so named, or publish or cause to be published that
any person is a member of any secret organization, for the purpose of
preventing such person from securing employment, or who shall wilfully
and maliciously make or issue any statement or paper that will tend to
influence or prejudice the mind of any employer against the person of
such person seeking employment, or any person who shall do any of the
things mentioned in this section for the purpose of causing the
discharge of any person employed by any railroad or other company,
corporation, individual or individuals, shall, on conviction thereof,
be adjudged guilty of misdemeanor and punished by a fine of not less
than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, or by
imprisonment in the county jail for not less than ninety days nor more
than ((one year)) three hundred sixty-four days, or by both such fine
and imprisonment.

Sec. 43 RCW 50.36.010 and 2003 c 53 s 279 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly give any false
information or withhold any material information required under the
provisions of this title.
(2) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this title
which violation is declared to be unlawful, and for which no contrary
provision is made, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by
a fine of not less than twenty dollars nor more than two hundred and
fifty dollars or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than
ninety days.
(3) Any person who in connection with any compromise or offer of
compromise willfully conceals from any officer or employee of the state
any property belonging to an employing unit which is liable for
contributions, interest, or penalties, or receives, destroys,
mutilates, or falsifies any book, document, or record, or makes under
oath any false statement relating to the financial condition of the
employing unit which is liable for contributions, is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor and shall upon conviction thereof be fined not more than
five thousand dollars or be imprisoned for ((not more than one year))
up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.
(4) The penalty prescribed in this section shall not be deemed
exclusive, but any act which shall constitute a crime under any law of
this state may be the basis of prosecution under such law
notwithstanding that it may also be the basis for prosecution under
this section.

Sec. 44 RCW 50.36.020 and 2003 c 53 s 280 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person required under this title to collect, account for
and pay over any contributions imposed by this title, who willfully
fails to collect or truthfully account for and pay over such
contributions, and any person who willfully attempts in any manner to
evade or defeat any contributions imposed by this title or the payment
thereof, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall, in addition to
other penalties provided by law, upon conviction thereof, be fined not
more than five thousand dollars, or imprisoned for ((not more than one
year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both, together with the
costs of prosecution.
(2) The term "person" as used in this section includes an officer
or individual in the employment of a corporation, or a member or
individual in the employment of a partnership, who as such officer,
individual or member is under a duty to perform the act in respect of
which the violation occurs. A corporation may likewise be prosecuted
under this section and may be subjected to fine and payment of costs of
prosecution as prescribed herein for a person.

Sec. 45 RCW 63.29.340 and 1996 c 149 s 11 and 1996 c 45 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A person who fails to pay or deliver property within the time
prescribed by this chapter shall be required to pay to the department
interest at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2) from the date
the property should have been paid or delivered until the property is
paid or delivered, unless the department finds that the failure to pay
or deliver the property within the time prescribed by this chapter was
the result of circumstances beyond the person's control sufficient for
waiver or cancellation of interest under RCW 82.32.105.
(2) A person who willfully fails to render any report, to pay or
deliver property, or to perform other duties required under this
chapter shall pay a civil penalty of one hundred dollars for each day
the report is withheld or the duty is not performed, but not more than
five thousand dollars, plus one hundred percent of the value of the
property which should have been reported, paid or delivered.
(3) A person who willfully refuses after written demand by the
department to pay or deliver property to the department as required
under this chapter or who enters into a contract to avoid the duties of
this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and upon conviction may
be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars or
imprisonment for ((not more than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.

Sec. 46 RCW 66.44.120 and 2005 c 151 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No person other than an employee of the board shall keep or
have in his or her possession any official seal prescribed under this
title, unless the same is attached to a package which has been
purchased from a liquor store or contract liquor store; nor shall any
person keep or have in his or her possession any design in imitation of
any official seal prescribed under this title, or calculated to deceive
by its resemblance thereto, or any paper upon which any design in
imitation thereof, or calculated to deceive as aforesaid, is stamped,
engraved, lithographed, printed, or otherwise marked.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, every person
who willfully violates this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor
and shall be liable on conviction thereof for a first offense to
imprisonment in the county jail for a period of not less than three
months nor more than six months, without the option of the payment of
a fine, and for a second offense, to imprisonment in the county jail
for not less than six months nor more than ((one year)) three hundred
sixty-four days, without the option of the payment of a fine.
(b) A third or subsequent offense is a class C felony, punishable
by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not less than one
year nor more than two years.

Sec. 47 RCW 66.44.180 and 2003 c 53 s 300 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every person guilty of a violation of this title for which no
penalty has been specifically provided:
(a) For a first offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by
a fine of not more than five hundred dollars, or by imprisonment for
not more than two months, or both;
(b) For a second offense, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor
punishable by imprisonment for not more than six months; and
(c) For a third or subsequent offense, is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for ((not more than one year))
up to three hundred sixty-four days.
(2) If the offender convicted of an offense referred to in this
section is a corporation, it shall for a first offense be liable to a
penalty of not more than five thousand dollars, and for a second or
subsequent offense to a penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars,
or to forfeiture of its corporate license, or both.
(3) Every district judge and municipal judge shall have concurrent
jurisdiction with superior court judges of the state of Washington of
all violations of the provisions of this title and may impose any
punishment provided therefor.

Sec. 48 RCW 68.50.050 and 1917 c 90 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person, not authorized by the coroner or his or her deputies,
who removes the body of a deceased person not claimed by a relative or
friend, or who came to their death by reason of violence or from
unnatural causes or where there shall exist reasonable grounds for the
belief that such death has been caused by unlawful means at the hands
of another, to any undertaking rooms or elsewhere, or any person who
directs, aids or abets such taking, and any person who in any way
conceals the body of a deceased person for the purpose of taking the
same to any undertaking rooms or elsewhere, shall in each of said cases
be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be
punished by fine of not more than one thousand dollars, or by
imprisonment in the county jail for ((not more than one year)) up to
three hundred sixty-four days or by both fine and imprisonment in the
discretion of the court.

Sec. 49 RCW 70.94.430 and 2003 c 53 s 355 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of
chapter 70.94 or 70.120 RCW, or any ordinance, resolution, or
regulation in force pursuant thereto is guilty of a gross misdemeanor
and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more
than ten thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for
((not more than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by
both for each separate violation.
(2) Any person who negligently releases into the ambient air any
substance listed by the department of ecology as a hazardous air
pollutant, other than in compliance with the terms of an applicable
permit or emission limit, and who at the time negligently places
another person in imminent danger of death or substantial bodily harm
is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be
punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars, or by
imprisonment for ((not more than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or both.
(3) Any person who knowingly releases into the ambient air any
substance listed by the department of ecology as a hazardous air
pollutant, other than in compliance with the terms of an applicable
permit or emission limit, and who knows at the time that he or she
thereby places another person in imminent danger of death or
substantial bodily harm, is guilty of a class C felony and shall, upon
conviction, be punished by a fine of not less than fifty thousand
dollars, or by imprisonment for not more than five years, or both.
(4) Any person who knowingly fails to disclose a potential conflict
of interest under RCW 70.94.100 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor, and
upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than
five thousand dollars.

Sec. 50 RCW 70.95J.060 and 1992 c 174 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person who willfully violates, without sufficient cause, any of
the provisions of this chapter, or a permit or order issued pursuant to
this chapter, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. Willful violation of
this chapter, or a permit or order issued pursuant to this chapter is
a gross misdemeanor punishable by a fine of up to ten thousand dollars
and costs of prosecution, or by imprisonment for ((up to one year)) up
to three hundred sixty-four days, or by both. Each day of violation
may be deemed a separate violation.

Sec. 51 RCW 70.105.090 and 1984 c 237 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 70.105.080,
any person who violates any provisions of this chapter, or of the rules
implementing this chapter, and any person who knowingly aids or abets
another in conducting any violation of any provisions of this chapter,
or of the rules implementing this chapter, shall be guilty of a gross
misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of
not less than one hundred dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars,
and/or by imprisonment in the county jail for ((not more than one
year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, for each separate
violation. Each and every such violation shall be a separate and
distinct offense. In case of continuing violation, every day's
continuance shall be a separate and distinct offense.

Sec. 52 RCW 70.138.070 and 1987 c 528 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person found guilty of wilfully violating, without sufficient
cause, any of the provisions of this chapter, or permit or order issued
pursuant to this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and upon
conviction shall be punished by a fine of up to ten thousand dollars
and costs of prosecution, or by imprisonment for ((up to one year)) up
to three hundred sixty-four days, or by both. Each day of violation
may be deemed a separate violation.

Sec. 53 RCW 74.08.331 and 2003 c 53 s 368 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person who by means of a willfully false statement, or
representation, or impersonation, or a willful failure to reveal any
material fact, condition, or circumstance affecting eligibility or need
for assistance, including medical care, surplus commodities, and food
stamps or food stamp benefits transferred electronically, as required
by law, or a willful failure to promptly notify the county office in
writing as required by law or any change in status in respect to
resources, or income, or need, or family composition, money
contribution and other support, from whatever source derived, including
unemployment insurance, or any other change in circumstances affecting
the person's eligibility or need for assistance, or other fraudulent
device, obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids or abets any person to
obtain any public assistance to which the person is not entitled or
greater public assistance than that to which he or she is justly
entitled is guilty of theft in the first degree under RCW 9A.56.030 and
upon conviction thereof shall be punished by imprisonment in a state
correctional facility for not more than fifteen years.
(2) Any person who by means of a willfully false statement or
representation or by impersonation or other fraudulent device aids or
abets in buying, selling, or in any other way disposing of the real
property of a recipient of public assistance without the consent of the
secretary is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof
shall be punished by imprisonment for ((not more than one year)) up to
three hundred sixty-four days in the county jail or a fine of not to
exceed one thousand dollars or by both.

Sec. 54 RCW 74.09.270 and 1979 ex.s. c 152 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Any person having any patient trust funds in his or her
possession, custody, or control, who, knowing that he or she is
violating any statute, regulation, or agreement, deliberately fails to
deposit, transfer, or maintain said funds in a separate, designated,
trust bank account as required by such statute, regulation, or
agreement shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall be punished
by imprisonment for ((not more than one year)) up to three hundred
sixty-four days in the county jail, or by a fine of not more than ten
thousand dollars or as authorized by RCW 9A.20.030, or by both such
fine and imprisonment.
(2) "Patient trust funds" are funds received by any health care
facility which belong to patients and are required by any state or
federal statute, regulation, or by agreement to be kept in a separate
trust bank account for the benefit of such patients.
(3) This section shall not be construed to prevent a prosecution
for theft.

Sec. 55 RCW 76.09.190 and 1974 ex.s. c 137 s 19 are each amended
to read as follows:
In addition to the penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 76.09.170, any
person who conducts any forest practice or knowingly aids or abets
another in conducting any forest practice in violation of any
provisions of RCW 76.09.010 through 76.09.280 or 90.48.420, or of the
regulations implementing RCW 76.09.010 through 76.09.280 or 90.48.420,
shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof
shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor
more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment for ((a term of not
more than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days or by both
fine and imprisonment for each separate violation. Each day upon which
such violation occurs shall constitute a separate violation.

Sec. 56 RCW 76.48.151 and 2009 c 245 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 76.48.141, a person who violates a
provision of this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable
by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, imprisonment in the
county jail for ((a term not to exceed one year)) up to three hundred
sixty-four days, or by both a fine and imprisonment.
(2) In any prosecution for a violation of this chapter's
requirements to obtain or possess a specialized forest products permit,
true copy, bill of lading, authorization, or sales invoice, it is an
affirmative defense, if established by the defendant by a preponderance
of the evidence, that:
(a) The specialized forest products were harvested from the
defendant's own land; or
(b) The specialized forest products were harvested with the
permission of the landowner.

Sec. 57 RCW 82.36.400 and 2003 c 53 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to commit any of the
following acts:
(a) To display, or cause to permit to be displayed, or to have in
possession, any motor vehicle fuel license knowing the same to be
fictitious or to have been suspended, canceled, revoked or altered;
(b) To lend to, or knowingly permit the use of, by one not entitled
thereto, any motor vehicle fuel license issued to the person lending it
or permitting it to be used;
(c) To display or to represent as one's own any motor vehicle fuel
license not issued to the person displaying the same;
(d) To use a false or fictitious name or give a false or fictitious
address in any application or form required under the provisions of
this chapter, or otherwise commit a fraud in any application, record,
or report;
(e) To refuse to permit the director, or any agent appointed by him
or her in writing, to examine his or her books, records, papers,
storage tanks, or other equipment pertaining to the use or sale and
delivery of motor vehicle fuels within the state.
(2) Except as otherwise provided, any person violating any of the
provisions of this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall,
upon conviction thereof, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than
five hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars and costs of
prosecution, or imprisonment for ((not more than one year)) up to three
hundred sixty-four days, or both.

Sec. 58 RCW 88.08.050 and 2003 c 53 s 416 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every person who shall willfully break, injure, deface, or destroy
any lighthouse station, post, platform, step, lamp, or other structure
pertaining to such lighthouse station, or shall extinguish or tamper
with any light erected by the United States upon or along the navigable
waters of this state to aid in the navigation thereof, in case no
punishment is provided therefor by the laws of the United States, shall
be punished:
(1) As a class B felony punishable by imprisonment in a state
correctional facility for not more than ten years whenever such act may
endanger the safety of any vessel navigating such waters, or jeopardize
the safety of any person or property in or upon such vessel.
(2) In all other cases by imprisonment in the county jail for ((not
more than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by a fine
of not more than one thousand dollars, or by both.

Sec. 59 RCW 88.46.080 and 2003 c 53 s 417 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, it shall
be unlawful for the owner or operator to knowingly and intentionally
operate in this state or on the waters of this state a covered vessel
without an approved contingency plan or an approved prevention plan as
required by this chapter, or financial responsibility in compliance
with chapter 88.40 RCW and the federal oil pollution act of 1990.
(2)(a) The first conviction under this section is a gross
misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(b) A second or subsequent conviction is a class C felony under
chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(3) It shall not be unlawful for the owner or operator to operate
a covered vessel if:
(a) The covered vessel is not required to have a contingency plan,
spill prevention plan, or financial responsibility;
(b) All required plans have been submitted to the department as
required by this chapter and rules adopted by the department and the
department is reviewing the plan and has not denied approval; or
(c) The covered vessel has entered state waters after the United
States coast guard has determined that the vessel is in distress.
(4) A person may rely on a copy of the statement issued by the
department pursuant to RCW 88.46.060 as evidence that a vessel has an
approved contingency plan and the statement issued pursuant to RCW
88.46.040 that a vessel has an approved prevention plan.
(5) Any person found guilty of willfully violating any of the
provisions of this chapter, or any final written orders or directive of
the director or a court in pursuance thereof is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor, as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW, and upon conviction
thereof shall be punished by a fine of up to ten thousand dollars and
costs of prosecution, or by imprisonment in the county jail for ((not
more than one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by both
such fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court. Each day
upon which a willful violation of the provisions of this chapter occurs
may be deemed a separate and additional violation.

Sec. 60 RCW 90.46.260 and 2009 c 456 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person found guilty of willfully violating any of the
provisions of this chapter, or any final written orders or directive of
the lead agency or a court in pursuance thereof, is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of
up to ten thousand dollars and costs of prosecution, or by imprisonment
in the county jail for ((not more than one year)) up to three hundred
sixty-four days, or both, in the discretion of the court. Each day
upon which a willful violation of the provisions of this chapter occurs
may be deemed a separate and additional violation.

Sec. 61 RCW 90.48.140 and 2003 c 53 s 419 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person found guilty of willfully violating any of the
provisions of this chapter or chapter 90.56 RCW, or any final written
orders or directive of the department or a court in pursuance thereof
is guilty of a gross misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be
punished by a fine of up to ten thousand dollars and costs of
prosecution, or by imprisonment in the county jail for ((not more than
one year)) up to three hundred sixty-four days, or by both such fine
and imprisonment in the discretion of the court. Each day upon which
a willful violation of the provisions of this chapter or chapter 90.56
RCW occurs may be deemed a separate and additional violation.

--- END ---