BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
section 2 of this act.
(1) "Transfer" means the sale, gift, conveyance, assignment,
inheritance, or other transfer of an ownership interest in real
property located in this state.
(2) "Transfer fee" means a fee or charge payable upon the transfer
of an interest in real property or payable for the right to make or
accept the transfer, regardless of whether the fee or charge is a fixed
amount or is determined as a percentage of the value of the property,
the purchase price, or other consideration given for the transfer. The
following is not a transfer fee:
(a) Any consideration payable by the grantee to the grantor for the
interest in real property being transferred, including any subsequent
additional consideration for the property payable by the grantee based
upon any subsequent appreciation, development, or sale of the property
that, once paid, shall not bind successors in title to the property;
(b) Any commission payable to a licensed real estate broker for the
transfer of real property pursuant to an agreement between the broker
and the transferor or transferee, including any subsequent additional
commission for the transfer payable by the transferor or the transferee
based upon any subsequent additional commission payable by the
transferor based upon any subsequent appreciation, development, or sale
of the property;
(c) Any interest, charges, fees, or other amounts payable by a
borrower to a lender pursuant to a loan secured by a mortgage against
real property, including any fee payable to the lender for consenting
to an assumption of the loan or a transfer of the real property subject
to the mortgage, any fees or charges payable to the lender for estoppel
letters or certificates, and any other consideration allowed by law and
payable to the lender in connection with the loan;
(d) Any rent, reimbursement, charge, fee, or other amount payable
by a lessee to a lessor under a lease, including any fee payable to the
lessor for consenting to an assignment, subletting, encumbrance, or
transfer of the lease;
(e) Any consideration payable to the holder of an option to
purchase an interest in real property or the holder of a right of first
refusal or first offer to purchase an interest in real property for
waiving, releasing, or not exercising the option or right upon the
transfer of the property to another person;
(f) Any tax, fee, charge, assessment, fine, or other amount payable
to or imposed by a governmental authority;
(g) Any fee charged that is a typical real estate closing cost,
including closing or escrow fees, settlement fees, attorney fees, or
title insurance premiums and fees;
(h) Any reasonable fee charged for the preparation of statements of
unpaid assessments or resale certificates or statements of unpaid
assessments;
(i) Any reasonable fee payable by the original transferee to a unit
owners' association, or owners' association, as long as no portion of
the fee is required to be passed through to a third party designated or
identifiable by description in the document or another document
referenced therein; and
(j) Any fee payable as part of a conservation or preservation
agreement.
(3) "Transfer fee covenant" means a declaration or covenant
purporting to affect real property that requires or purports to require
the payment of a transfer fee to the declarant or other person
specified in the declaration or covenant or to their successors or
assigns, upon a subsequent transfer of an interest in the real
property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 64.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any transfer fee covenant or any lien that is filed to enforce
a transfer fee covenant or purports to secure payment of a transfer fee
does not run with the title to real property and is not binding on or
enforceable at law or in equity against any subsequent owner,
purchaser, or mortgagee of any interest in real property as an
equitable servitude or otherwise.
(2) A person who records a transfer fee covenant, files a lien that
purports to secure payment of a transfer fee, or enters into an
agreement imposing a private transfer fee obligation is liable for:
(a) Any and all damages resulting from the imposition of the
transfer fee obligation on the transfer of an interest in the real
property, including the amount of any transfer fee paid by a party to
the transfer; and
(b) All attorney fees, expenses, and costs incurred by a party to
the transfer or mortgagee of the real property to recover the transfer
fee paid or in connection with an action to quiet title or register the
title or a proceeding subsequent to initial registration. If an agent
acts on behalf of a principal to file or secure a private transfer fee
obligation, liability is assessed to the principal, but not to the
agent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2011.

--- END ---