BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 53.12.260 and 2007 c 469 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each commissioner of a port district shall receive ninety
dollars, as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial
management in subsection (4) of this section, per day or portion
thereof spent (a) in actual attendance at official meetings of the port
district commission, or (b) in performance of other official services
or duties on behalf of the district. The total per diem compensation
of a port commissioner shall not exceed eight thousand six hundred
forty dollars in a year, as adjusted for inflation by the office of
financial management in subsection (4) of this section, or ten thousand
eight hundred dollars in any year, as adjusted for inflation by the
office of financial management in subsection (4) of this section, for
a port district with gross operating income of twenty-five million or
more in the preceding calendar year.
(2) Port commissioners shall receive additional compensation as
follows: (a) Each commissioner of a port district with gross operating
revenues of twenty-five million dollars or more in the preceding
calendar year shall receive a salary of five hundred dollars per month,
as adjusted for inflation by the office of financial management in
subsection (4) of this section; and (b) each commissioner of a port
district with gross operating revenues of from one million dollars to
less than twenty-five million dollars in the preceding calendar year
shall receive a salary of two hundred dollars per month, as adjusted
for inflation by the office of financial management in subsection (4)
of this section.
(3) In lieu of the compensation specified in this section, a port
commission may set compensation to be paid to commissioners.
(4) For any commissioner who has not elected to become a member of
public employees retirement system before May 1, 1975, the compensation
provided pursuant to this section shall not be considered salary for
purposes of the provisions of any retirement system created pursuant to
the general laws of this state nor shall attendance at such meetings or
other service on behalf of the district constitute service as defined
in RCW 41.40.010(((9))) (37): PROVIDED, That in the case of a port
district when commissioners are receiving compensation and contributing
to the public employees retirement system, these benefits shall
continue in full force and effect notwithstanding the provisions of RCW
53.12.260 and 53.12.265.
The dollar thresholds for salaries and per diem compensation
established in this section must be adjusted for inflation by the
office of financial management every five years, beginning July 1,
2008, based upon changes in the consumer price index during that time
period. "Consumer price index" means, for any calendar year, that
year's annual average consumer price index, for Washington state, for
wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor and statistics, United States department of labor. If the bureau
of labor and statistics develops more than one consumer price index for
areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of
people, covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state,
and including all items shall be used for the adjustments for inflation
in this section. The office of financial management must calculate the
new dollar threshold and transmit it to the office of the code reviser
for publication in the Washington State Register at least one month
before the new dollar threshold is to take effect.
A person holding office as commissioner for two or more special
purpose districts shall receive only that per diem compensation
authorized for one of his or her commissioner positions as compensation
for attending an official meeting or conducting official services or
duties while representing more than one of his or her districts.
However, such commissioner may receive additional per diem compensation
if approved by resolution of all boards of the affected commissions.

--- END ---