BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.613 and 2010 c 8 s 9073 are each amended to read
as follows:
The provisions of RCW 46.37.530 and 46.61.610 through 46.61.612
((may be)) are temporarily suspended ((by the chief of the Washington
state patrol, or his or her designee,)) with respect to the operation
of motorcycles ((within their respective jurisdictions in connection
with a parade or public demonstration)) on a closed road during a
parade or public demonstration that has been permitted by a local
jurisdiction.

--- END ---