BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.52.080 and 1979 ex.s. c 244 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal trespass in the second degree if
he or she knowingly:
(a) Enters or remains unlawfully in or upon premises of another
under circumstances not constituting criminal trespass in the first
degree; or
(b) Skis in an area or on a ski trail, owned or controlled by a ski
area operator, that is closed to the public and that has signs posted
indicating the closure.
(2) Criminal trespass in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

--- END ---