BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71.34.375 and 2003 c 107 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The)) An evaluation and treatment facility, facility
operating as an evaluation and treatment facility under this chapter
pursuant to a single-bed certification, and any mental health
professional employed or contracted by such a facility who has contact
with the parent or guardian of a minor child as part of his or her
professional duties is required to promptly provide written and verbal
notice of all statutorily available treatment options contained in this
chapter to every parent or guardian of a minor child when the parent or
guardian seeks to have his or her minor child treated at an evaluation
and treatment facility. The notice need not be given more than once if
written and verbal notice has already been provided and documented by
the facility.
(2) The notice must contain the following information and the
provision of notice must be documented by the evaluation and treatment
facility and accompanied by a signed acknowledgment of receipt by the
parent or guardian:
(a) All current statutorily available treatment options including
but not limited to those provided in this chapter; and
(b) The procedures to be followed to utilize the treatment options
described in this chapter.
(3) The department shall produce, and make available, the written
notification that must include, at a minimum, the information contained
in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Failure to comply with notice provisions under this section is
presumed to be unprofessional conduct under RCW 18.130.180 (4) and (7).

Sec. 2 RCW 71.34.700 and 1985 c 354 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
If a minor, thirteen years or older, is brought to an evaluation
and treatment facility or hospital emergency room for immediate mental
health services, the professional person in charge of the facility
shall evaluate the minor's mental condition, determine whether the
minor suffers from a mental disorder, and whether the minor is in need
of immediate inpatient treatment. If it is determined that the minor
suffers from a mental disorder, inpatient treatment is required, and
the minor is unwilling to consent to voluntary admission, ((and)) the
professional person must give written and verbal notice to any parent
or guardian of the child who seeks to have his or her child treated of
all statutorily available treatment options as provided in RCW
71.34.375. If the professional person believes that the minor meets
the criteria for initial detention set forth herein, the facility may
detain or arrange for the detention of the minor for up to twelve hours
in order to enable a ((county-))designated mental health professional
to evaluate the minor and commence initial detention proceedings under
the provisions of this chapter.

--- END ---