BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.180 and 1980 c 96 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the board of directors of a school district provides access to
the campus and the student information directory to persons or groups
which make students aware of occupational or educational options, the
board shall provide access ((on the same basis)) to official recruiting
representatives of the military forces of the state and the United
States for the purpose of informing students of educational and career
opportunities available in the military, which must be equal to and no
less than access provided to other postsecondary occupational or
educational representatives. As used in this section, "access"
includes, but is not limited to, the number of days provided and the
type of presentation space.

--- END ---