BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.160.010 and 1990 c 33 s 132 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The operation of each local school district's student
transportation program is declared to be the responsibility of the
respective board of directors, and each board of directors shall
determine such matters as which individual students shall be
transported in accordance with subsection (2) of this section and what
routes shall be most efficiently utilized. State moneys allocated to
local districts for student transportation shall be spent only for
student transportation activities, but need not be spent by the local
district in the same manner as calculated and allocated by the state.
(2) A school district is authorized to provide for the
transportation of students ((enrolled in the school or schools of the
district both in the case of students who reside within the boundaries
of the district and of students who reside outside the boundaries of
the district)). However, if a student attends a school outside his or
her attendance area as designated by the school district, either within
the boundaries of the district or outside the boundaries of the
district, the school district shall charge the student an amount
sufficient to reimburse the district for any extra mileage traveled,
except where transportation is required to meet the following:
(a) If the student to be transported is a child with a disability
under RCW 28A.155.020 and is traveling to or from the school or agency
where special education services are provided; or
(b) Applicable federal law.
(3) When children are transported from one school district to
another the board of directors of the respective districts may enter
into a written contract providing for a division of the cost of such
transportation between the districts.
(4) School districts may use school buses and drivers hired by the
district or commercial chartered bus service for the transportation of
school children and the school employees necessary for their
supervision to and from any school activities within or without the
school district during or after school hours and whether or not a
required school activity, so long as the school board has officially
designated it as a school activity. For any extra-curricular uses, the
school board shall charge an amount sufficient to reimburse the
district for its cost.
(5) In addition to the right to contract for the use of buses
provided in RCW 28A.160.080 and 28A.160.090, any school district may
contract to furnish the use of school buses of that district to other
users who are engaged in conducting an educational or recreational
program supported wholly or in part by tax funds or programs for
elderly persons at times when those buses are not needed by that
district and under such terms as will fully reimburse such school
district for all costs related or incident thereto: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That no such use of school district buses shall be permitted except
where other public or private transportation certificated or licensed
by the Washington utilities and transportation commission is not
reasonably available to the user: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no user shall
be required to accept any charter bus for services which the user
believes might place the health or safety of the children or elderly
persons in jeopardy.
(6)(a) Whenever any persons are transported by the school district
in its own motor vehicles and by its own employees, the board may
provide insurance to protect the district against loss, whether by
reason of theft, fire or property damage to the motor vehicle or by
reason of liability of the district to persons from the operation of
such motor vehicle.
(b) The board may provide insurance by contract purchase for
payment of hospital and medical expenses for the benefit of persons
injured while they are on, getting on, or getting off any vehicles
enumerated herein without respect to any fault or liability on the part
of the school district or operator. This insurance may be provided
without cost to the persons notwithstanding the provisions of RCW
28A.400.350.
(c) If the transportation of children or elderly persons is
arranged for by contract of the district with some person, the board
may require such contractor to procure such insurance as the board
deems advisable.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.225.270 and 2008 c 192 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each school district in the state shall adopt and implement a
policy allowing intradistrict enrollment options no later than June 30,
1990. Each district shall establish its own policy establishing
standards on how the intradistrict enrollment options will be
implemented. The policy shall include that the district may permit
students enrolled in a school outside their attendance area as
designated by the school district to ride a school bus or other student
transportation vehicle to and from school, and that the district shall
charge each student an amount sufficient to reimburse the district for
any extra mileage traveled, except where transportation is required to
meet the following:
(a) If the student to be transported is a child with a disability
under RCW 28A.155.020 and is traveling to or from the school or agency
where special education services are provided; or
(b) Applicable federal law.
(2) A district shall permit the children of full-time certificated
and classified school employees to enroll at:
(a) The school to which the employee is assigned;
(b) A school forming the district's K through 12 continuum which
includes the school to which the employee is assigned; or
(c) A school in the district that provides early intervention
services pursuant to RCW 28A.155.065 or preschool services pursuant to
RCW 28A.155.070, if the student is eligible for such services.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "full-time employees" means
employees who are employed for the full number of hours and days for
their job description.

--- END ---