BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 TITLE OF ACT--DECLARATION OF PURPOSE. (1)
This act shall be known as the joint municipal utility services act.
(2) It is the purpose of this act to improve the ability of local
government utilities to plan, finance, construct, acquire, maintain,
operate, and provide facilities and utility services to the public, and
to reduce costs and improve the benefits, efficiency, and quality of
utility services.
(3) This act is intended to facilitate joint municipal utility
services and is not intended to expand the types of services provided
by local governments or their utilities. Further, nothing in this act
is intended to alter the regulatory powers of cities, counties, or
other local governments or state agencies that exercise such powers.
Further, nothing in this act may be construed to alter the underlying
authority of the units of local government that enter into agreements
under this act or to diminish in any way the authority of local
governments to enter into agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW or other
applicable law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Agreement" means a joint municipal utility services agreement,
among members, that forms an authority, as more fully described in this
chapter.
(2) "Authority" means a joint municipal utility services authority
formed under this chapter.
(3) "Board of directors" or "board" means the board of directors of
an authority.
(4) "Member" means a city, town, county, water-sewer district,
public utility district, other special purpose district, municipal
corporation, or other unit of local government of this or another state
that provides utility services, and any Indian tribe recognized as such
by the United States government, that is a party to an agreement
forming an authority.
(5) "Utility services," for purposes of this chapter, means any or
all of the following functions: The provision of retail or wholesale
water supply and water conservation services; the provision of
wastewater, sewage, or septage collection, handling, treatment,
transmission, or disposal services; the provision of point and nonpoint
water pollution monitoring programs; the provision for the generation,
production, storage, distribution, use, or management of reclaimed
water; and the management and handling of storm water, surface water,
drainage, and flood waters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 FORMATION OF JOINT MUNICIPAL UTILITY
SERVICES AUTHORITIES--CHARACTERISTICS--SUBSTANTIVE POWERS. (1) An
authority may be formed by two or more members pursuant to this chapter
by execution of a joint municipal utility services agreement that
materially complies with the requirements of section 5 of this act.
Except as otherwise provided in section 8 of this act, at the time of
execution of an agreement each member must be providing the type of
utility service or services that will be provided by the authority.
The agreement must be approved by the legislative authority of each of
the members. The agreement must be filed with the Washington state
secretary of state, who must provide a certificate of filing with
respect to any authority. An authority shall be deemed to have been
formed as of the date of that filing. The formation and activities of
an authority, and the admission or withdrawal of members, are not
subject to review by any boundary review board. Any amendments to an
agreement must be filed with the Washington state secretary of state,
and will become effective on the date of filing.
(2) An authority is a municipal corporation. Subject to section
4(3) of this act, the provisions of a joint municipal utility services
agreement, and any limitations imposed pursuant to section 5 of this
act: (a) An authority may perform or provide any or all of the utility
service or services that all of its members, other than tribal
government members, perform or provide under applicable law; and (b) in
performing or providing those utility services, an authority may
exercise any or all of the powers described in section 4(1) of this
act.
(3) An authority shall be entitled to all the immunities and
exemptions that are available to local governmental entities under
applicable law, including without limitation the provisions of chapter
4.96 RCW. Notwithstanding this subsection (3), if all of an
authority's members are the same type of Washington local government
entity, then the immunities and exemptions available to that type of
entity shall govern.
(4) Nothing in this chapter shall diminish a member's powers in
connection with its provision or management of utility services, or its
taxing power with respect to those services, nor does this chapter
diminish in any way the authority of local governments to enter into
agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW or other applicable law.
(5) Nothing in this chapter shall impair or diminish a valid water
right, including rights established under state law and rights
established under federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 CORPORATE POWERS OF JOINT MUNICIPAL UTILITY
SERVICES AUTHORITIES. (1) For the purpose of performing or providing
utility services, and subject to subsection (3) of this section and
section 5 of this act, an authority has and is entitled to exercise the
following powers:
(a) To sue and be sued, complain and defend, in its corporate name;
(b) To have a corporate seal which may be altered at pleasure, and
to use the same by causing it, or a facsimile thereof, to be impressed
or affixed or in any other manner reproduced;
(c) To purchase, take, receive, take by lease, condemn, receive by
grant, or otherwise acquire, and to own, hold, improve, use, operate,
maintain, add to, extend, and fully control the use of and otherwise
deal in and with, real or personal property or property rights,
including without limitation water and water rights, or other assets,
or any interest therein, wherever situated;
(d) To sell, convey, lease out, exchange, transfer, surplus, and
otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property and assets;
(e) To incur liabilities for any of its utility services purposes,
to borrow money at such rates of interest as the authority may
determine, to issue its bonds, notes, and other obligations, and to
pledge any or all of its revenues to the repayment of bonds, notes, and
other obligations;
(f) To enter into contracts for any of its utility services
purposes with any individual or entity, both public and private, and to
enter into intergovernmental agreements with its members and with other
public agencies;
(g) To be eligible to apply for and to receive state, federal, and
private grants, loans, and assistance that any of its members are
eligible to receive in connection with the development, design,
acquisition, construction, maintenance, and/or operation of facilities
and programs for utility services;
(h) To adopt and alter rules, polices, and guidelines, not
inconsistent with this chapter or with other laws of this state, for
the administration and regulation of the affairs and assets of the
authority;
(i) To obtain insurance, to self-insure, and to participate in pool
insurance programs;
(j) To indemnify any officer, director, employee, volunteer, or
former officer, employee, or volunteer, or any member, for acts,
errors, or omissions performed in the exercise of their duties in the
manner approved by the board;
(k) To employ such persons, as public employees, that the board
determines are needed to carry out the authority's purposes and to fix
wages, salaries, and benefits, and to establish any bond requirements
for those employees;
(l) To provide for and pay pensions and participate in pension
plans and other benefit plans for any or all of its officers or
employees, as public employees;
(m) To determine and impose fees, rates, and charges for utility
services;
(n) Subject to section 5(20) of this act, to have a lien for
delinquent and unpaid rates and charges for retail connections and
retail utility service to the public, together with recording fees and
penalties (not exceeding eight percent) determined by the board,
including interest (at a rate determined by the board) on such rates,
charges, fees, and penalties, against the premises to which such
service has been furnished or is available, which lien shall be
superior to all other liens and encumbrances except general taxes and
local and special assessments;
(o) To make expenditures to promote and advertise its programs,
educate its members, customers, and the general public, and provide and
support conservation and other practices in connection with providing
utility services;
(p) With the consent of the member within whose geographic
boundaries an authority is so acting, to compel all property owners
within an area served by a wastewater collection system owned or
operated by an authority to connect their private drain and sewer
systems with that system, or to participate in and follow the
requirements of an inspection and maintenance program for on-site
systems, and to pay associated rates and charges, under such terms and
conditions, and such penalties, as the board shall prescribe by
resolution;
(q) With the consent of the member within whose geographic or
service area boundaries an authority is so acting, to create local
improvement districts or utility local improvement districts, to impose
and collect assessments and to issue bonds and notes, all consistent
with the statutes governing local improvement districts or utility
local improvement districts applicable to the member that has provided
such consent. Notwithstanding this subsection (1)(q), the guaranty
fund provisions of chapter 35.54 RCW shall not apply to a local
improvement district created by an authority;
(r) To receive contributions or other transfers of real and
personal property and property rights, money, other assets, and
franchise rights, wherever situated, from its members or from any other
person;
(s) To prepare and submit plans relating to utility services on
behalf of itself or its members;
(t) To terminate its operations, wind up its affairs, dissolve, and
provide for the handling and distribution of its assets and liabilities
in a manner consistent with the applicable agreement;
(u) To transfer its assets, rights, obligations, and liabilities to
a successor entity, including without limitation a successor authority
or municipal corporation;
(v) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, section 5 of this
act, and applicable law, to have and exercise any other corporate
powers capable of being exercised by any of its members in providing
utility services;
(2) An authority, as a municipal corporation, is subject to the
public records act (chapter 42.56 RCW), the open public meetings act
(chapter 42.30 RCW), and the code of ethics for municipal officers
(chapter 42.23 RCW), and an authority is subject to audit by the state
auditor under chapter 43.09 RCW.
(3) In the exercise of its powers in connection with performing or
providing utility services, an authority is subject to the following:
(a) An authority has no power to levy taxes.
(b) An authority has the power of eminent domain as necessary to
perform or provide utility services, but only if all of its members,
other than tribal government members, have powers of eminent domain.
Further, an authority may exercise the power of eminent domain only
pursuant to the provisions of Washington law, in the manner and subject
to the statutory limitations applicable to one or more of its
Washington local government members. If all of its members are the
same type of Washington governmental entity, then the statute governing
the exercise of eminent domain by that type of entity shall govern. An
authority may not exercise the power of eminent domain with respect to
property owned by a city, town, county, special purpose district,
authority, or other unit of local government, but may acquire or use
such property under mutually agreed upon terms and conditions.
(c) An authority may pledge its revenues in connection with its
obligations, and may acquire property or property rights through and
subject to the terms of a conditional sales contract, a real estate
contract, or a financing contract under chapter 39.94 RCW, or other
federal or state financing program. However, an authority must not in
any other manner mortgage or provide security interests in its real or
personal property or property rights. As a local governmental entity
without taxing power, an authority may not issue general obligation
bonds. However, an authority may pledge its full faith and credit to
the payment of amounts due pursuant to a financing contract under
chapter 39.94 RCW or other federal or state financing program.
(d) In order for an authority to provide a particular utility
service in a geographical area, one or more of its members must have
authority, under applicable law, to provide that utility service in
that geographical area.
(e) As a separate municipal corporation, an authority's obligations
and liabilities are its own and are not obligations or liabilities of
its members except to the extent and in the manner established under
the provisions of an agreement or otherwise expressly provided by
contract.
(f) Upon its dissolution, after provision is made for an
authority's liabilities, remaining assets must be distributed to a
successor entity, or to one or more of the members, or to another
public body of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 ELEMENTS OF JOINT MUNICIPAL UTILITY SERVICES
AGREEMENTS. A joint municipal utility services agreement that forms
and governs an authority must include the elements described in this
section, together with such other provisions an authority's members
deem appropriate. However, the failure of an agreement to include each
and every one of the elements described in this section shall not
render the agreement invalid. An agreement must:
(1) Identify the members, together with conditions upon which
additional members that are providing utility services may join the
authority, the conditions upon which members may or must withdraw,
including provisions for handling of relevant assets and liabilities
upon a withdrawal, and the effect of boundary adjustments of the
authority and boundary adjustments between or among members;
(2) State the name of the authority;
(3) Describe the utility services that the authority will provide;
(4) Specify how the number of directors of the authority's board
will be determined, and how those directors will be appointed. Each
director on the board of an authority must be an elected official of a
member. Except as limited by an agreement, an authority's board may
exercise the authority's powers;
(5) Describe how votes of the members represented on the
authority's board are to be weighted, and set forth any limitations on
the exercise of powers of the authority's board, which may include, by
way of example, requirements that certain decisions be made by a
supermajority of members represented on an authority's board, based on
the number of members and/or some other factor or factors, and that
certain decisions be ratified by the legislative authorities of the
members;
(6) Describe how the agreement is to be amended;
(7) Describe how the authority's rules may be adopted and amended;
(8) Specify the circumstances under which the authority may be
dissolved, and how it may terminate its operations, wind up its
affairs, and provide for the handling, assumption, and/or distribution
of its assets and liabilities;
(9) List any legally authorized substantive or corporate powers
that the authority will not exercise;
(10) Specify under which personnel laws the authority will operate,
which may be the personnel laws applicable to any one of its Washington
local government members;
(11) Specify under which public works and procurement laws the
authority will operate, which may be the public works and procurement
laws applicable to any one of its Washington local government members;
(12) Consistent with section 4(3)(b) of this act, specify under
which Washington eminent domain laws any condemnations by the authority
will be subject;
(13) Specify how the treasurer of the authority will be appointed,
which may be an officer or employee of the authority, the treasurer or
chief finance officer of any Washington local government member, or the
treasurer of any Washington county in which any member of the authority
is located. However, if the total number of utility customers of all
of the members of an authority does not exceed two thousand five
hundred, the treasurer of an authority must be either the treasurer of
any member or the treasurer of a county in which any member of the
authority is located;
(14) Specify under which Washington state statute or statutes
surplus property of the authority will be disposed;
(15) Describe how the authority's budgets will be prepared and
adopted;
(16) Describe how any assets of members that are transferred to or
managed by the authority will be accounted for;
(17) Generally describe the financial obligations of members to the
authority;
(18) Describe how rates and charges imposed by the authority, if
any, will be determined. An agreement may specify a specific
Washington state statute applicable to one or all of its members for
the purpose of governing rate-setting criteria applicable to retail
customers, if any;
(19) Specify the Washington state statute or statutes under which
bonds, notes, and other obligations of the authority will be issued for
the purpose of performing or providing utility services, which must be
a bond issuance statute applicable to one or more of its members other
than a tribal member. If all of its members are the same type of
Washington governmental entity, then a Washington state statute or
statutes governing the issuance of bonds, notes, and other obligations
issued by that type of entity shall govern;
(20) Specify under which Washington state statute or statutes any
liens of an authority shall be exercised, which must be statutes
applicable to the type or types of utility service for which the lien
shall apply. Further, if all of its members are the same type of
Washington governmental entity, then the statute or statutes governing
that type of entity shall govern;
(21) Include any other provisions deemed necessary and appropriate
by the members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 AUTHORITY OF MEMBERS TO ASSIST AUTHORITY AND
TO TRANSFER FUNDS, PROPERTY, AND OTHER ASSETS. For the purpose of
assisting the authority in providing utility services, the members of
an authority are authorized, with or without payment or other
consideration and without submitting the matter to the electors of
those members, to lease, convey, transfer, assign, or otherwise make
available to an authority any money, real or personal property or
property rights, other assets including licenses, water rights (subject
to applicable law), other property (whether held by a member's utility
or by a member's general government), or franchises or rights
thereunder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 TAX EXEMPTIONS AND PREFERENCES. (1) As a
municipal corporation, the property of an authority is exempt from
taxation.
(2) An authority is entitled to all of the exemptions from or
preferences with respect to taxes that are available to any or all of
its members, other than a tribal member, in connection with the
provision or management of utility services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 CONVERSION OF EXISTING ENTITIES INTO
AUTHORITIES. (1) Any intergovernmental entity formed under chapter
39.34 RCW or other applicable law may become a joint municipal utility
services authority and be entitled to all the powers and privileges
available under this chapter, if: (a) The public agencies that are
parties to an existing interlocal agreement would otherwise be eligible
to form an authority to provide the relevant utility services; (b) the
public agencies that are parties to the existing interlocal agreement
amend, restate, or replace that interlocal agreement so that it
materially complies with the requirements of section 5 of this act; (c)
the amended, restated, or replacement agreement is filed with the
Washington state secretary of state consistent with section 3 of this
act; and (d) the amended, restated, or replacement agreement expressly
provides that all rights and obligations of the entity formerly
existing under chapter 39.34 RCW or other applicable law shall
thereafter be the obligations of the new authority created under this
chapter. Upon compliance with those requirements, the new authority
shall be a successor of the former intergovernmental entity for all
purposes, and all rights and obligations of the former entity shall
transfer to the new authority. Those obligations shall be treated as
having been incurred, entered into, or issued by the new authority, and
those obligations shall remain in full force and effect and shall
continue to be enforceable in accordance with their terms.
(2) If an interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW or other
applicable law relating to utility services includes among its original
participants a city or county that does not itself provide or no longer
provides utility services, that city or county may continue as a party
to the amended, restated, or replacement agreement and shall be treated
as a member for all purposes under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 POWERS CONFERRED BY CHAPTER ARE
SUPPLEMENTAL. The powers and authority conferred by this chapter shall
be construed as in addition and supplemental to powers or authority
conferred by any other law, and nothing contained in this chapter shall
be construed as limiting any other powers or authority of any member or
any other entity formed under chapter 39.34 RCW or other applicable
law.

Sec. 10 RCW 4.96.010 and 2001 c 119 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All local governmental entities, whether acting in a
governmental or proprietary capacity, shall be liable for damages
arising out of their tortious conduct, or the tortious conduct of their
past or present officers, employees, or volunteers while performing or
in good faith purporting to perform their official duties, to the same
extent as if they were a private person or corporation. Filing a claim
for damages within the time allowed by law shall be a condition
precedent to the commencement of any action claiming damages. The laws
specifying the content for such claims shall be liberally construed so
that substantial compliance therewith will be deemed satisfactory.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, for the purposes
of this chapter, "local governmental entity" means a county, city,
town, special district, municipal corporation as defined in RCW
39.50.010, quasi-municipal corporation, any joint municipal utility
services authority, any entity created by public agencies under RCW
39.34.030, or public hospital.
(3) For the purposes of this chapter, "volunteer" is defined
according to RCW 51.12.035.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to any payments between, or any
transfer of assets to or from, a joint municipal utility services
authority created under chapter 39.--- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 17 of this act) and any of its members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to any sales, or
transfers made, to or from a joint municipal utility services authority
formed under chapter 39.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 17
of this act) and any of its members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.12.020 shall not apply to any sales, or
uses by, or transfers made, to or from a joint municipal utility
services authority formed under chapter 39.--- RCW (the new chapter
created in section 17 of this act) and any of its members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW
to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to any payments between, or any
transfer of assets to or from, a joint municipal utility services
authority created under chapter 39.--- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 17 of this act) and any of its members.

Sec. 15 RCW 86.09.720 and 2003 c 327 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the authority provided in this chapter, flood
control districts may participate in and expend revenue on cooperative
watershed management arrangements and actions, including ((watershed
management partnerships under RCW 39.34.210)) without limitation those
under chapter 39.34 RCW, under chapter 39.--- RCW (the new chapter
created in section 17 of this act), and under other intergovernmental
agreements authorized by law, for purposes of water supply, water
quality, and water resource and habitat protection and management.

Sec. 16 RCW 86.15.035 and 2003 c 327 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the authority provided in this chapter, flood
control zone districts may participate in and expend revenue on
cooperative watershed management arrangements and actions, including
((watershed management partnerships under RCW 39.34.210)) without
limitation those under chapter 39.34 RCW, under chapter 39.--- RCW (the
new chapter created in section 17 of this act), and under other
intergovernmental agreements authorized by law, for purposes of water
supply, water quality, and water resource and habitat protection and
management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 CODIFICATION. Sections 1 through 9 of this
act constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

--- END ---