BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The state treasurer shall transfer one
hundred forty million ninety-eight thousand dollars or as much as is
available from the budget stabilization account to the state general
fund for fiscal year 2012.
(2) The state treasurer shall transfer one hundred forty-nine
million four hundred eighty-four thousand dollars or as much as is
available from the budget stabilization account to the state general
fund for fiscal year 2013.

--- END ---