BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that it has both
refined and added to the role of the office of regulatory assistance
and that the office of regulatory assistance:
(a) Complies with legislative intent where the statutes have been
in place long enough to measure such compliance;
(b) Has improved in its documentation demonstrating that it meets
established goals and targets; and
(c) Does not substantially duplicate services offered by other
agencies or the private sector.
(2) The legislature also finds that continuing the office of
regulatory assistance would contribute to its ongoing efforts to make
permitting processes easier to navigate.
(3) Therefore, pursuant to the October 2010 recommendation of the
joint legislative audit and review committee, the legislature intends
to repeal the sunset of the office of regulatory assistance and
continue the office without a termination date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.131.401 (Office of regulatory assistance -- Termination)
and 2007 c 231 s 6, 2007 c 94 s 15, 2003 c 71 s 5, & 2002 c 153 s 13;
and
(2) RCW 43.131.402 (Office of regulatory assistance -- Repeal) and
2010 c 162 s 7.

--- END ---