BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Both federal and Washington courts have
recognized on many occasions that the commitment process in chapter
71.09 RCW is a civil process. Nevertheless, Washington has continued
to provide extra constitutional rights in chapter 71.09 RCW more
associated with criminal law processes. The legislature is convinced
that these processes have at times led to a focus on litigation rather
than treatment.
(2) The legislature intends to retain the high bar of reasonable
doubt for a person's original commitment, but eliminate the requirement
for a unanimous jury verdict normally reserved for criminal trials.
The legislature finds that once it is established that a person is a
sexually violent predator, a subsequent trial on the issue of whether
the person continues to meet the sexually violent predator definition
should not be held unless there is sufficient evidence that
demonstrates a change in the person's condition since his or her last
civil commitment trial proceeding. The legislature is also convinced
that the clear and convincing evidence standard of proof used in other
civil commitment proceedings in Washington should be equally applicable
here.

Sec. 2 RCW 71.09.040 and 2009 c 409 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of a petition under RCW 71.09.030, the judge
shall determine whether probable cause exists to believe that the
person named in the petition is a sexually violent predator. If such
determination is made the judge shall direct that the person be taken
into custody.
(2)(a) Within seventy-two hours after a person is taken into
custody pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the court shall
provide the person with notice of, and an opportunity to appear in
person at, a hearing to contest probable cause as to whether the person
is a sexually violent predator.
(b) In order to assist the person at the hearing, within twenty-four hours of service of the petition, the prosecuting agency shall
provide to the person or his or her counsel a copy of all materials
provided to the prosecuting agency by the referring agency pursuant to
RCW 71.09.025, or obtained by the prosecuting agency pursuant to RCW
71.09.025(1) (c) and (d).
(c) At ((this)) the hearing, the court shall (((a))) (i) verify the
person's identity, and (((b))) (ii) determine whether probable cause
exists to believe that the person is a sexually violent predator. ((At
the probable cause hearing,))
(d) The state may rely upon the petition and certification for
determination of probable cause filed pursuant to RCW 71.09.030. The
state may supplement this with additional documentary evidence or live
testimony.
(e) The person may be held in total confinement at the county jail
until the trial court renders a decision after the conclusion of the
seventy-two hour probable cause hearing. The county shall be entitled
to reimbursement for the cost of housing and transporting the person
pursuant to rules adopted by the ((secretary)) department.
(3) At the probable cause hearing, the person shall have the
following rights in addition to the rights previously specified: (a)
To be represented by counsel; (b) to present evidence on his or her
behalf; (c) to cross-examine witnesses who testify against him or her;
and (d) to view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file.
The court must permit a witness called by either party to testify by
telephone. ((Because this))
(4) The probable cause hearing is a special proceeding((,)) and
therefore discovery pursuant to RCW 71.09.070 or the civil rules shall
not occur until after the hearing has been held and the court has
issued its decision.
(((4))) (5)(a) If the probable cause determination is made, the
judge shall direct that the person be transferred to an appropriate
facility for an evaluation as to whether the person is a sexually
violent predator. The evaluation shall be conducted by a person deemed
to be professionally qualified, pursuant to rules developed by the
department, to conduct such an examination ((pursuant to rules
developed by the department of social and health services)).
(b) The judge shall require the person to complete any or all of
the following procedures or tests if requested by the evaluator: (i)
A clinical interview; (ii) psychological testing; (iii) plethysmograph
testing; and (iv) polygraph testing. The judge may order the person to
complete any other procedures and tests relevant to the evaluation.
(c) The evaluation shall be completed regardless of whether a
previous evaluation was performed before filing the petition for civil
commitment.
(d) The evaluation shall be conducted pursuant to rules developed
by the department of social and health services. In adopting ((such))
rules pursuant to this section, the department ((of social and health
services)) shall consult with the department of health and the
department of corrections.
(e) In no event shall the person be released from confinement prior
to trial. ((A witness called by either party shall be permitted to
testify by telephone.))

Sec. 3 RCW 71.09.060 and 2009 c 409 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The court or jury shall determine whether, beyond a
reasonable doubt, the person is a sexually violent predator.
(b) When the determination is made by a jury, a verdict is reached
when ten of twelve jurors agree.
(2)(a) In determining whether or not the person would be likely to
engage in predatory acts of sexual violence if not confined in a secure
facility, the fact finder may consider only placement conditions and
voluntary treatment options that would exist for the person if
unconditionally released from detention on the sexually violent
predator petition. The community protection program under RCW
71A.12.230 may not be considered as a placement condition or treatment
option available to the person if unconditionally released from
detention on a sexually violent predator petition. ((When the
determination is made by a jury, the verdict must be unanimous.))
(b) If, on the date that the petition is filed, the person was
living in the community after release from custody, the state must also
prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the person had committed a recent
overt act. If the state alleges that the prior sexually violent
offense that forms the basis for the petition for commitment was an act
that was sexually motivated as provided in RCW 71.09.020(((15)))
(17)(c), the state must prove beyond a reasonable doubt that the
alleged sexually violent act was sexually motivated as defined in RCW
9.94A.030.
(3)(a) If the court or jury determines that the person is a
sexually violent predator, the person shall be committed to the custody
of the department of social and health services for placement in a
secure facility operated by the department of social and health
services for control, care, and treatment until such time as: (((a)))
(i) The person's condition has so changed that the person no longer
meets the definition of a sexually violent predator; or (((b))) (ii)
conditional release to a less restrictive alternative as set forth in
RCW 71.09.092 is in the best interest of the person and conditions can
be imposed that would adequately protect the community.
(b) If the court or ((unanimous)) jury decides that the state has
not met its burden of proving that the person is a sexually violent
predator, the court shall direct the person's release.
(c) If the jury is unable to reach a ((unanimous)) verdict, the
court shall declare a mistrial and set a retrial within forty-five days
of the date of the mistrial unless the prosecuting agency earlier moves
to dismiss the petition. The retrial may be continued upon the request
of either party accompanied by a showing of good cause, or by the court
on its own motion in the due administration of justice provided that
the respondent will not be substantially prejudiced. In no event may
the person be released from confinement prior to retrial or dismissal
of the case.
(((2))) (4)(a) If the person charged with a sexually violent
offense has been found incompetent to stand trial, and is about to be
or has been released pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4), and his or her
commitment is sought pursuant to ((subsection (1) of)) this section,
the court shall first hear evidence and determine whether the person
did commit the act or acts charged if the court did not enter a finding
prior to dismissal under RCW 10.77.086(4) that the person committed the
act or acts charged.
(b) The hearing on this issue must comply with all the procedures
specified in this section. In addition, the rules of evidence
applicable in criminal cases shall apply, and all constitutional rights
available to defendants at criminal trials, other than the right not to
be tried while incompetent, shall apply.
(c) After hearing evidence ((on this issue)), the court shall make
specific findings on whether the person did commit the act or acts
charged, the extent to which the person's incompetence or developmental
disability affected the outcome of the hearing, including its effect on
the person's ability to consult with and assist counsel and to testify
on his or her own behalf, the extent to which the evidence could be
reconstructed without the assistance of the person, and the strength of
the prosecution's case.
(d) If((, after the conclusion of the hearing on this issue,)) the
court finds, beyond a reasonable doubt, that the person did commit the
act or acts charged, it shall enter a final order, appealable by the
person((,)) on that issue, and may proceed to consider whether the
person should be committed pursuant to this section.
(((3))) (5) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the state
shall comply with RCW 10.77.220 while confining the person. During all
court proceedings where the person is present, the person shall be
detained in a secure facility. If the proceedings last more than one
day, the person may be held in the county jail for the duration of the
proceedings, except the person may be returned to the department's
custody on weekends and court holidays if the court deems such a
transfer feasible. The county shall be entitled to reimbursement for
the cost of housing and transporting the person pursuant to rules
adopted by the secretary. The department shall not place the person,
even temporarily, in a facility on the grounds of any state mental
facility or regional habilitation center because these institutions are
insufficiently secure for this population.
(((4))) (6) A court has jurisdiction to order a less restrictive
alternative placement only after a hearing ordered pursuant to RCW
71.09.090 following initial commitment under this section and in accord
with the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.09.070 and 2001 c 286 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each person committed under this chapter shall have a current
examination of his or her mental condition made by the department ((of
social and health services)) at least once every year. ((The annual
report shall))
(2) The examination shall include an in-person interview of the
committed person by the evaluator.
(3) The evaluator shall prepare a report that includes
consideration of whether:
(a) The committed person currently meets the definition of a
sexually violent predator ((and whether));
(b) Conditional release to a less restrictive alternative is in the
best interest of the person and;
(c) Conditions can be imposed that would adequately protect the
community.
(4) The department ((of social and health services)) shall file
((this periodic)) the report with the court that committed the person
under this chapter. The report shall be in the form of a declaration
or certification in compliance with the requirements of RCW 9A.72.085
and shall be prepared by a professionally qualified person as defined
by rules adopted by the secretary. A copy of the report shall be
served on the prosecuting agency involved in the initial commitment and
upon the committed person and his or her counsel.
(5) Provided that the committed person participated in the most
recent interview and evaluation completed by the department, the
committed person may retain, or if he or she is indigent and so
requests, the court may appoint a qualified expert or a professional
person to examine him or her, and such expert or professional person
shall have access to all records concerning the person.
(6) The committed person shall provide proof of compliance with
this section to the court when requesting appointment of an expert or
professional person.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.09.090 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 28 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) If the secretary determines that the person's condition has so
changed that either: (a) The person no longer meets the definition of
a sexually violent predator; or (b) conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative is in the best interest of the person and
conditions can be imposed that adequately protect the community, the
secretary shall authorize the person to petition the court for
conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or unconditional
discharge. The petition shall be filed with the court and served upon
the prosecuting agency responsible for the initial commitment. The
court, upon receipt of the petition for conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge, shall within forty-five days order a hearing.
(2)(a) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit the person
from otherwise petitioning the court for conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative or unconditional discharge without the
secretary's approval. The secretary shall provide the committed person
with an annual written notice of the person's right to petition the
court for conditional release to a less restrictive alternative or
unconditional discharge over the secretary's objection. The notice
shall contain a waiver of rights. The secretary shall file the notice
and waiver form and the ((annual)) report prepared pursuant to RCW
71.09.070 with the court. If the person does not affirmatively waive
the right to petition, the court shall set a show cause hearing to
determine whether probable cause exists to warrant a hearing on whether
the person's condition has so changed that: (i) He or she no longer
meets the definition of a sexually violent predator; or (ii)
conditional release to a proposed less restrictive alternative would be
in the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that
would adequately protect the community.
(b) The committed person shall have a right to have an attorney
represent him or her at the show cause hearing, which may be conducted
solely on the basis of affidavits or declarations, but the person is
not entitled to be present at the show cause hearing. At the show
cause hearing, the prosecuting ((attorney or attorney general)) agency
shall present prima facie evidence establishing that the committed
person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent predator
and that a less restrictive alternative is not in the best interest of
the person and conditions cannot be imposed that adequately protect the
community. In making this showing, the ((state)) prosecuting agency
may rely exclusively upon the ((annual)) report prepared pursuant to
RCW 71.09.070. ((The committed person may present responsive
affidavits or declarations to which the state may reply.))
(c) If the prosecuting agency meets its foregoing prima facie
burden, the committed person shall then bear the burden to show, by a
preponderance of the evidence, that his or her condition has so changed
since entry of the most recent commitment order that he or she no
longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator, or that a
proposed less restrictive alternative is in his or her best interest
and includes conditions that can be imposed that adequately protect the
community. The prosecuting agency may reply. Absent a finding of good
cause by the trial court, only documentary evidence may be submitted to
the court at the show cause hearing. The court shall not consider
release to a less restrictive alternative unless a proposal meeting the
conditions of RCW 71.09.092 is presented to the court at the show cause
hearing.
(d) If the court at the show cause hearing determines that either:
(i) The ((state)) prosecuting agency has failed to present prima facie
evidence that the committed person continues to meet the definition of
a sexually violent predator and that no proposed less restrictive
alternative is in the best interest of the person and conditions cannot
be imposed that would adequately protect the community; or (ii)
((probable cause exists to believe)) there is a preponderance of
evidence that the person's condition has so changed that: (A) The
person no longer meets the definition of a sexually violent predator;
or (B) release to a proposed less restrictive alternative would be in
the best interest of the person and conditions can be imposed that
would adequately protect the community, then the court shall set a
hearing on either or both issues.
(((d))) (e) If the court has not previously considered the issue of
release to a less restrictive alternative, either through a trial on
the merits or through the procedures set forth in RCW 71.09.094(1), the
court shall consider whether release to a less restrictive alternative
would be in the best interests of the person and conditions can be
imposed that would adequately protect the community, without
considering whether the person's condition has changed. ((The court
may not find probable cause for a trial addressing less restrictive
alternatives unless a proposed less restrictive alternative placement
meeting the conditions of RCW 71.09.092 is presented to the court at
the show cause hearing.))
(3)(a) At the hearing resulting from subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the committed person shall be entitled to be present and to
the benefit of all constitutional protections that were afforded to the
person at the initial commitment proceeding. The prosecuting agency
shall represent the state and shall have a right to a jury trial and to
have the committed person evaluated by experts chosen by the state.
The department is responsible for the cost of one expert or
professional person to conduct an evaluation on the prosecuting
agency's behalf. The committed person shall also have the right to a
jury trial and the right to have experts evaluate him or her on his or
her behalf and the court shall appoint an expert if the person is
indigent and requests an appointment. Evaluations pursuant to this
section shall be subject to all requirements specified in RCW
71.09.040.
(b) Whenever any person is subjected to an evaluation under (a) of
this subsection, the department is responsible for the cost of one
expert or professional person conducting an evaluation on the person's
behalf. When the person wishes to be evaluated by a qualified expert
or professional person of his or her own choice, such expert or
professional person must be permitted to have reasonable access to the
person for the purpose of such evaluation, as well as to all relevant
medical and psychological records and reports. In the case of a person
who is indigent, the court shall, upon the person's request, assist the
person in obtaining an expert or professional person to perform an
evaluation or participate in the hearing on the person's behalf.
Nothing in this chapter precludes the person from paying for additional
expert services at his or her own expense.
(c) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be
unconditionally discharged, the burden of proof shall be upon the
((state)) prosecuting agency to prove ((beyond a reasonable doubt)) by
clear and convincing evidence that the committed person's condition
remains such that the person continues to meet the definition of a
sexually violent predator. Evidence of the prior commitment trial and
disposition is admissible. The recommitment proceeding shall otherwise
proceed as set forth in RCW 71.09.050 and 71.09.060.
(d) If the issue at the hearing is whether the person should be
conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative, the burden of
proof at the hearing shall be upon the ((state)) prosecuting agency to
prove ((beyond a reasonable doubt)) by clear and convincing evidence
that conditional release to any proposed less restrictive alternative
either:
(i) Is not in the best interest of the committed person; or
(ii) Does not include conditions that would adequately protect the
community. ((Evidence of the prior commitment trial and disposition is
admissible.))
(e) Evidence of the prior commitment trial and disposition is
admissible in any proceeding under this subsection. The proceeding
shall otherwise proceed as set forth in RCW 71.09.050 and 71.09.060.
(4)(a) ((Probable cause)) Sufficient evidence exists to believe
that a person's condition has "so changed," under subsection (2) of
this section, only when evidence exists, since the person's last
commitment trial, or less restrictive alternative revocation
proceeding, of a substantial change in the person's physical or mental
condition such that the person either no longer meets the definition of
a sexually violent predator or that a conditional release to a less
restrictive alternative is in the person's best interest and conditions
can be imposed to adequately protect the community.
(b) A new trial proceeding under subsection (3) of this section may
be ordered, or a trial proceeding may be held, only when there is
current evidence from a licensed professional of one of the following
and the evidence presents a change in condition since the person's last
commitment trial proceeding:
(i) An identified physiological change to the person, such as
paralysis, stroke, or dementia, that renders the committed person
unable to commit a sexually violent act and this change is permanent;
or
(ii) A change in the person's mental condition brought about
through positive response to continuing participation in treatment
which indicates that the person meets the standard for conditional
release to a less restrictive alternative or that the person would be
safe to be at large if unconditionally released from commitment.
(c) For purposes of this section, a change in a single demographic
factor, without more, does not establish ((probable cause)) sufficient
evidence for a new trial proceeding under subsection (3) of this
section. As used in this section, a single demographic factor
includes, but is not limited to, a change in the chronological age,
marital status, or gender of the committed person.
(5) The jurisdiction of the court over a person civilly committed
pursuant to this chapter continues until such time as the person is
unconditionally discharged.

Sec. 6 RCW 71.09.094 and 2001 c 286 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the conclusion of the evidence in a hearing held pursuant
to RCW 71.09.090 or through summary judgment proceedings prior to such
a hearing, if the court finds that there is no legally sufficient
evidentiary basis for a reasonable jury to find that the conditions set
forth in RCW 71.09.092 have been met, the court shall grant a motion by
the state for a judgment as a matter of law on the issue of conditional
release to a less restrictive alternative.
(2) Whenever the issue of conditional release to a proposed less
restrictive alternative is submitted to the jury, the court shall
instruct the jury to return a verdict in substantially the following
form: Has the state proved ((beyond a reasonable doubt)) by clear and
convincing evidence that either: (a) The proposed less restrictive
alternative is not in the best interests of respondent; or (b) the
proposed less restrictive alternative does not include conditions that
would adequately protect the community? Answer: Yes or No.
(3) Whenever the issue of unconditional release is submitted to the
jury, the court shall instruct the jury to return a verdict in
substantially the following form: Has the state proved by clear and
convincing evidence that the committed person's condition remains such
that the person continues to meet the definition of a sexually violent
predator? Answer: Yes or No.

Sec. 7 RCW 71.09.098 and 2009 c 409 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any service provider submitting reports pursuant to RCW
71.09.096(6), the supervising community corrections officer, the
prosecuting agency, or the secretary's designee may petition the court
for an immediate hearing for the purpose of revoking or modifying the
terms of the person's conditional release to a less restrictive
alternative if the petitioner believes the released person: (a)
Violated or is in violation of the terms and conditions of the court's
conditional release order; or (b) is in need of additional care,
monitoring, supervision, or treatment.
(2) The community corrections officer or the secretary's designee
may restrict the person's movement in the community until the petition
is determined by the court. The person may be taken into custody if:
(a) The supervising community corrections officer, the secretary's
designee, or a law enforcement officer reasonably believes the person
has violated or is in violation of the court's conditional release
order; or
(b) The supervising community corrections officer or the
secretary's designee reasonably believes that the person is in need of
additional care, monitoring, supervision, or treatment because the
person presents a danger to himself or herself or others if his or her
conditional release under the conditions imposed by the court's release
order continues.
(3)(a) Persons taken into custody pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section shall:
(i) Not be released until such time as a hearing is held to
determine whether to revoke or modify the person's conditional release
order and the court has issued its decision; and
(ii) Be held in the county jail, at a secure community transition
facility, or at the total confinement facility, at the discretion of
the secretary's designee.
(b) The court shall be notified before the close of the next
judicial day that the person has been taken into custody and shall
promptly schedule a hearing.
(4) Before any hearing to revoke or modify the person's conditional
release order, both the prosecuting agency and the released person
shall have the right to request an immediate ((mental examination))
evaluation of the released person. If the conditionally released
person is indigent, the court shall, upon request, assist him or her in
obtaining a qualified expert or professional person to conduct the
((examination)) evaluation. Evaluations pursuant to this section shall
be subject to all requirements specified in RCW 71.09.040.
(5) At any hearing to revoke or modify the conditional release
order:
(a) The prosecuting agency shall represent the state, including
determining whether to proceed with revocation or modification of the
conditional release order;
(b) Hearsay evidence is admissible if the court finds that it is
otherwise reliable; and
(c) The state shall bear the burden of proving by a preponderance
of the evidence that the person has violated or is in violation of the
court's conditional release order or that the person is in need of
additional care, monitoring, supervision, or treatment.
(6)(a) If the court determines that the state has met its burden
referenced in subsection (5)(c) of this section, and the issue before
the court is revocation of the court's conditional release order, the
court shall consider the evidence presented by the parties and the
following factors relevant to whether continuing the person's
conditional release is in the person's best interests or adequate to
protect the community:
(i) The nature of the condition that was violated by the person or
that the person was in violation of in the context of the person's
criminal history and underlying mental conditions;
(ii) The degree to which the violation was intentional or grossly
negligent;
(iii) The ability and willingness of the released person to
strictly comply with the conditional release order;
(iv) The degree of progress made by the person in community-based
treatment; and
(v) The risk to the public or particular persons if the conditional
release continues under the conditional release order that was
violated.
(b) Any factor alone, or in combination, shall support the court's
determination to revoke the conditional release order.
(7) If the court determines the state has met its burden referenced
in subsection (5)(c) of this section, and the issue before the court is
modification of the court's conditional release order, the court shall
modify the conditional release order by adding conditions if the court
determines that the person is in need of additional care, monitoring,
supervision, or treatment. The court has authority to modify its
conditional release order by substituting a new treatment provider,
requiring new housing for the person, or imposing such additional
supervision conditions as the court deems appropriate.
(8) A person whose conditional release has been revoked shall be
remanded to the custody of the secretary for control, care, and
treatment in a total confinement facility as designated in RCW
71.09.060(1). The person is thereafter eligible for conditional
release only in accord with the provisions of RCW 71.09.090 and related
statutes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to
serve the remedial purposes of the chapter, including protection of the
public from sexually violent predators and the provision of treatment
for sexually violent predators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act applies to all individuals
currently committed or awaiting commitment under chapter 71.09 RCW
either on, before, or after the effective date of this section, whether
confined in a secure facility or on conditional release.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---