BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that fire
sprinkler systems in private residences may prevent catastrophic losses
of life and property, but that financial, technical, and other issues
often discourage property owners from installing these protective
systems.
It is the intent of the legislature to eradicate barriers that
prevent the voluntary installation of sprinkler systems in private
residences by promoting education regarding the effectiveness of
residential fire sprinklers, and by providing financial and regulatory
incentives to homeowners, builders, and water purveyors for voluntarily
installing the systems. It is the further intent of the legislature to
fully preserve the rulings of Fisk v. City of Kirkland, 164 Wn.2d 891,
194 P.3d 984 (2008); Stiefel v. City of Kent, 132 Wn.App. 523, 132 P.3d
1111 (2006), and similar cases.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.160.050 and 2008 c 155 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) All certificate of competency holders that desire to
continue in the fire protection sprinkler business shall annually,
prior to January 1st, secure from the state director of fire protection
a renewal certificate of competency upon payment of the fee as
prescribed by the state director of fire protection. Application for
renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by the state director of fire
protection and the certificate holder shall furnish the information
required by the director.
(b) Failure of any certificate of competency holder to secure his
or her renewal certificate of competency within sixty days after the
due date shall constitute sufficient cause for the state director of
fire protection to suspend the certificate of competency.
(c) The state director of fire protection may, upon the receipt of
payment of all delinquent fees including a late charge, restore a
certificate of competency that has been suspended for failure to pay
the renewal fee.
(d) A certificate of competency holder may voluntarily surrender
his or her certificate of competency to the state director of fire
protection and be relieved of the annual renewal fee. After
surrendering the certificate of competency, he or she shall not be
known as a certificate of competency holder and shall desist from the
practice thereof. Within two years from the time of surrender of the
certificate of competency, he or she may again qualify for a
certificate of competency, without examination, by the payment of the
required fee. If two or more years have elapsed, he or she shall
return to the status of a new applicant.
(2)(a) All licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractors
desiring to continue to be licensed shall annually, prior to January
1st, secure from the state director of fire protection a renewal
license upon payment of the fee as prescribed by the state director of
fire protection. Application for renewal shall be upon a form
prescribed by the state director of fire protection and the license
holder shall furnish the information required by the director.
(b) Failure of any license holder to secure his or her renewal
license within sixty days after the due date shall constitute
sufficient cause for the state director of fire protection to suspend
the license.
(c) The state director of fire protection may, upon the receipt of
payment of all delinquent fees including a late charge, restore a
license that has been suspended for failure to pay the renewal fee.
(3) The initial certificate of competency or license fee shall be
prorated based upon the portion of the year such certificate of
competency or license is in effect, prior to renewal on January 1st.
(4) The fire protection contractor license fund is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from license and
certificate fees and charges or from the money generated by the rules
and regulations promulgated under this chapter shall be deposited into
the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only for purposes
authorized under this chapter and standards for fire protection and its
enforcement, with respect to all hospitals as required by RCW
70.41.080((, and)); for providing assistance in identifying fire
sprinkler system components that have been subject to either a recall
or voluntary replacement program by a manufacturer of fire sprinkler
products, a nationally recognized testing laboratory, or the federal
consumer product safety commission; and for use in developing and
publishing educational materials related to the effectiveness of
residential fire sprinklers. Assistance shall include, but is not
limited to, aiding in the identification of recalled components,
information sharing strategies aimed at ensuring the consumer is made
aware of recalls and voluntary replacement programs, and providing
training and assistance to local fire authorities, the fire sprinkler
industry, and the public. Only the state director of fire protection
or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund.
The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.02.100 and 1992 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person required to pay a fee pursuant to RCW 43.21C.060 for
system improvements shall not be required to pay an impact fee under
RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 for those same system improvements.
(2) A person installing a residential fire sprinkler system in a
single-family home shall not be required to pay the fire operations
portion of the impact fee. The exempted fire operations impact fee
shall not include the proportionate share related to the delivery of
emergency medical services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.119A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A public water system is not liable for damages resulting from
shutting off water to a residential home with an installed fire
sprinkler system if the shut off is due to: (a) Routine maintenance;
(b) nonpayment by the customer; or (c) water system emergencies.
(2) This section does not impose any duty or liability on public
water systems that do not already exist under current law.

--- END ---