BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.63A.510 and 1993 c 461 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department ((shall)) may work with ((the departments of
natural resources, transportation, social and health services,
corrections, and general administration)) state and local governmental
entities to identify and catalog surplus or underutilized((, state-owned land and property)) real property owned by these governmental
entities suitable for the development of affordable housing for
extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income
households. The state and local governmental entities subject to the
requirements of this section are the departments of natural resources,
((transportation,)) social and health services, corrections, ((and))
general administration ((shall provide)), public lands except for state
forest lands, the state parks and recreation commission, counties,
cities, towns, regional transit agencies, and water-sewer districts.
These governmental entities must maintain an inventory of surplus or
underutilized real property that is owned or administered by each
((agency)) governmental entity and is available for lease or sale.
((The inventories shall be provided to the department by November 1,
1993, with inventory revisions provided each November 1 thereafter.))
Each inventory must contain descriptive information about each property
that includes, if known, the contact information for the property and
the location, approximate size, sale or lease price and terms, and
current zoning classification of the property. Each inventory must be
updated at least once a year, and printed and electronic copies of each
inventory must be provided upon request. Each annual inventory must
also include any surplus properties that have been sold for affordable
housing. Counties with a population of less than one hundred thousand
and cities and towns with a population of less than ten thousand are
not required to maintain an inventory as required under this section.
(2) ((Upon written request, the department shall provide a copy of
the inventory of state-owned and publicly owned lands and buildings to
parties interested in developing the sites for affordable housing.
(3))) Surplus property for sale by the governmental entities
subject to the requirements of this section, and which is suitable for
the development of affordable housing, must be offered for at least the
first one hundred eighty days after its availability for sale
exclusively to eligible organizations, for the purpose of developing
affordable housing.
(3) Eligible organizations have the right to obtain these surplus
properties through purchase, lease, exchange, or donation, under
reasonable option and conveyance conditions, in return for a recorded
covenant to provide affordable housing for at least forty years or a
loan note in the name of a governmental entity for homeownership
programs.
(4) A governmental entity that sells real property to an eligible
organization under this section may do so at a price that is less than
fair market value, provided that the housing developed on the property
is occupied primarily by individuals or households who are extremely
low-income, very low-income, or low-income.
(5) Governmental entities subject to this section have the sole
authority to determine: (a) Whether or not property is surplus; (b)
whether or not the property is suitable for the development of
affordable housing; and (c) what constitutes reasonable option and
conveyance conditions for the purchase, lease, exchange, or donation of
the property.
(6) Each governmental entity subject to the requirements of this
section must develop the criteria and procedures necessary for
inventorying surplus property and offering it for sale, lease,
exchange, or donation for affordable housing. Each governmental entity
must (a) enter into a recorded covenant with the purchaser of the
surplus property or a loan note in the name of the jurisdiction, to
ensure that the property will meet the required income restrictions,
and (b) monitor compliance with the covenant or loan note.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) "Affordable housing" means residential housing that is rented
or ((owned by)) sold to a person who qualifies as ((a)) an extremely
low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income household
or who is from a special needs population((, and whose monthly housing
costs, including utilities other than telephone, do not exceed thirty
percent of the household's monthly income)).
(b) "Very low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is at or below fifty
percent of the county area median income((, adjusted for household
size,)) for the county where the affordable housing is located,
adjusted for household size.
(c) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is more than fifty
percent but is at or below eighty percent of the county area median
income where the affordable housing is located, adjusted for household
size.
(d) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is more than eighty
percent but is at or below one hundred fifteen percent of the county
area median income where the affordable housing is located, adjusted
for household size.
(e) "Eligible organization" means any city, town, or county
government, local housing authority, public development authority,
community renewal agency, regional support network established under
chapter 71.24 RCW, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based
organization, federally recognized Indian tribe in the state of
Washington, or regional or statewide nonprofit housing assistance
organization, including such entities materially participating as a
general partner or managing members of a partnership, limited liability
company, or equivalent organization.
(f) "Extremely low-income household" means a single person, family,
or unrelated persons living together whose income is at or below thirty
percent of the county area median income where the affordable housing
is located, adjusted for household size.
(g) "Primarily" means fifty-one percent or more.
(h) "Real property" means land, buildings, or buildings and land.
(8) In addition to the requirements of this section, counties,
cities, and towns may sell surplus property at a discount for
affordable housing that may be part of mixed-income or mixed-use
developments, provided that the affordable housing complies with the
guidelines for amounts of affordable housing, income levels, affordable
rents, affordable sales prices, and minimum terms of affordability
under RCW 36.70A.540 for affordable housing incentive programs.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.20A.037 and 1995 c 399 s 65 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, the department shall
identify and catalog real property that is no longer required for
department purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable
housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, and moderate-income
households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory ((shall)) must
include the location, approximate size, sale or lease price and terms,
and current zoning classification of the property. ((The department
shall provide a copy of the inventory to the department of community,
trade, and economic development by November 1, 1993, and every November
1 thereafter.
(2) By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994, the department
shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer
available for the development of affordable housing. The department
shall include an updated listing of real property that has become
available since the last update. As used in this section, "real
property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.)) Each
inventory must be updated at least once a year, and printed and
electronic copies of each inventory must be provided upon request.
Each annual inventory must also include any surplus properties that
have been sold for affordable housing.
(2) In selling, leasing, transferring, or otherwise disposing of
surplus or underutilized property, the department shall give priority
to selling the property to an eligible organization as defined in RCW
43.63A.510 for the development of affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households,
consistent with RCW 43.63A.510. The department may sell, lease, or
exchange the property for less than fair market value if the affordable
housing to be developed on the property is to be occupied primarily by
extremely low-income, very low-income, or low-income households as
provided in RCW 43.63A.510.

Sec. 3 RCW 72.09.055 and 1995 c 399 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, the department shall
identify and catalog real property that is no longer required for
department purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable
housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and
moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory
((shall)) must include the location, approximate size, sale or lease
price and terms, and current zoning classification of the property.
((The department shall provide a copy of the inventory to the
department of community, trade, and economic development by November 1,
1993, and every November 1 thereafter.
(2) By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994, the department
shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer
available for the development of affordable housing. The department
shall include an updated listing of real property that has become
available since the last update. As used in this section, "real
property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.)) Each
inventory must be updated at least once a year, and printed and
electronic copies of each inventory must be provided upon request.
Each annual inventory must also include any surplus properties that
have been sold for affordable housing.
(2) In selling, leasing, transferring, or otherwise disposing of
surplus or underutilized property, the department shall give priority
to selling the property to an eligible organization as defined in RCW
43.63A.510 for the development of affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households,
consistent with RCW 43.63A.510. The department may sell, lease, or
exchange the property for less than fair market value if the affordable
housing to be developed on the property is to be occupied primarily by
extremely low-income, very low-income, or low-income households as
provided in RCW 43.63A.510.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.19.19201 and 1995 c 399 s 64 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, the department of general
administration shall identify and catalog real property that is no
longer required for department purposes and is suitable for the
development of affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW
43.63A.510. The inventory ((shall)) must include the location,
approximate size, sale or lease price and terms, and current zoning
classification of the property. ((The department of general
administration shall provide a copy of the inventory to the department
of community, trade, and economic development by November 1, 1993, and
every November 1 thereafter.
(2) By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994, the department
of general administration shall purge the inventory of real property of
sites that are no longer available for the development of affordable
housing. The department shall include an updated listing of real
property that has become available since the last update. As used in
this section, "real property" means buildings, land, or buildings and
land.)) Each inventory must be updated at least once a year, and
printed and electronic copies of each inventory must be provided upon
request. Each annual inventory must also include any surplus
properties that have been sold for affordable housing.
(2) In selling, leasing, transferring, or otherwise disposing of
surplus or underutilized property, the department shall give priority
to selling the property to an eligible organization as defined in RCW
43.63A.510 for the development of affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households,
consistent with RCW 43.63A.510. The department may sell, lease, or
exchange the property for less than fair market value if the affordable
housing to be developed on the property is to be occupied primarily by
extremely low-income, very low-income, or low-income households as
provided in RCW 43.63A.510.

Sec. 5 RCW 79A.05.170 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 23 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) In selling, leasing, transferring, or otherwise disposing of
surplus or underutilized real property, the commission shall give
priority to selling the property to an eligible organization as defined
in RCW 43.63A.510 for the development of affordable housing for
extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income
households, consistent with RCW 43.63A.510. The commission may sell,
lease, or exchange the property for less than fair market value if the
affordable housing to be developed on the property is to be occupied
primarily by extremely low-income, very low-income, or low-income
households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.
(2) Except for those lands subject to RCW 43.63A.510, any lands
owned by the ((state parks and recreation)) commission, which are
determined to be surplus to the needs of the state for development for
state park purposes and which the commission proposes to deed to a
local government or other entity, shall be accompanied by a clause
requiring that if the land is not used for outdoor recreation purposes,
ownership of the land shall revert to the ((state parks and
recreation)) commission.
(((2) The state parks and recreation commission,)) (a) In cases
where land subject to such a reversionary clause is proposed for use or
disposal for purposes other than recreation, the commission shall
require that, if the land is surplus to the needs of the commission for
park purposes at the time the commission becomes aware of its proposed
use for nonrecreation purposes, the holder of the land or property
shall reimburse the commission for the release of the reversionary
interest in the land. The reimbursement shall be in the amount of the
fair market value of the reversionary interest as determined by a
qualified appraiser agreeable to the commission. Appraisal costs shall
be borne by the local entity which holds title to the land.
(((3))) (b) Any funds generated under a reimbursement under this
section shall be deposited in the parkland acquisition account which is
hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in this account are to be
used solely for the purchase or acquisition of property for use as
state park property by the commission, as directed by the legislature;
all such funds shall be subject to legislative appropriation.
(3) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, the commission shall
identify and catalog real property that is no longer required for
commission purposes and is suitable for the development of affordable
housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and
moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510. The inventory
must include the location, approximate size, sale or lease price and
terms, and current zoning classification of the property. Each
inventory must be updated at least once a year, and printed and
electronic copies of each inventory must be provided upon request.
Each annual inventory must also include any surplus properties that
have been sold for affordable housing.

Sec. 6 RCW 79A.05.175 and 2007 c 145 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except for those lands subject to RCW 43.63A.510 and 79A.05.170(1),
whenever the commission finds that any land under its control cannot
advantageously be used for park purposes, it is authorized to dispose
of such land by the method provided in this section or by the method
provided in RCW 79A.05.170. If such lands are school or other grant
lands, control thereof shall be relinquished by resolution of the
commission to the proper state officials. If such lands were acquired
under restrictive conveyances by which the state may hold them only so
long as they are used for park purposes, they may be returned to the
donor or grantors by the commission. All other such lands may be
either sold by the commission to the highest bidder or exchanged for
other lands of equal value by the commission, and all conveyance
documents shall be executed by the governor. All such exchanges shall
be accompanied by a transfer fee, to be set by the commission and paid
by the other party to the transfer; such fee shall be paid into the
parkland acquisition account established under RCW 79A.05.170. The
commission may accept sealed bids, electronic bids, or oral bids at
auction. Bids on all sales shall be solicited at least twenty days in
advance of the sale date by an advertisement appearing at least once a
week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county in which the land to be sold is located. If the commission
feels that no bid received adequately reflects the fair value of the
land to be sold, it may reject all bids, and may call for new bids.
All proceeds derived from the sale of such park property shall be paid
into the park land acquisition account. All land considered for
exchange shall be evaluated by the commission to determine its
adaptability to park usage. The equal value of all lands exchanged
shall first be determined by the appraisals to the satisfaction of the
commission. No sale or exchange of state park lands shall be made
without the unanimous consent of the commission.

Sec. 7 RCW 36.34.137 and 1993 c 461 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, every county shall identify
and catalog real property owned by the county that is no longer
required for its purposes and is suitable for the development of
affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
The inventory ((shall)) must include the location, approximate size,
sale or lease price and terms, and current zoning classification of the
property. ((Every county shall provide a copy of the inventory to the
department of community development by November 1, 1993, with inventory
revisions each November 1 thereafter.
(2) By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994, every county
shall purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer
available for the development of affordable housing. The inventory
revision shall include an updated listing of real property that has
become available since the last update. As used in this section, "real
property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.)) Each
inventory must be updated at least once a year, and printed and
electronic copies of each inventory must be provided upon request.
Each annual inventory must also include any surplus properties that
have been sold for affordable housing.
(2) In addition to the requirements of this section, counties may
sell surplus property at a discount for affordable housing that may be
part of mixed-income or mixed-use developments, provided that the
affordable housing complies with the guidelines for amounts of
affordable housing, income levels, affordable rents, affordable sales
prices, and minimum terms of affordability under RCW 36.70A.540 for
affordable housing incentive programs.

Sec. 8 RCW 35.21.687 and 1995 c 399 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, every city and town,
including every code city operating under Title 35A RCW, shall identify
and catalog real property owned by the city or town that is no longer
required for its purposes and is suitable for the development of
affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
The inventory ((shall)) must include the location, approximate size,
sale or lease price and terms, and current zoning classification of the
property. ((Every city and town shall provide a copy of the inventory
to the department of community, trade, and economic development by
November 1, 1993, with inventory revisions each November 1 thereafter.
(2) By November 1 of each year, beginning in 1994, every city and
town, including every code city operating under Title 35A RCW, shall
purge the inventory of real property of sites that are no longer
available for the development of affordable housing. The inventory
revision shall also contain a list of real property that has become
available since the last update. As used in this section, "real
property" means buildings, land, or buildings and land.)) Each
inventory must be updated at least once a year, and printed and
electronic copies of each inventory must be provided upon request.
Each annual inventory must also include any surplus properties that
have been sold for affordable housing.
(2) In addition to the requirements of this section, cities and
towns may sell surplus property at a discount for affordable housing
that may be part of mixed-income or mixed-use developments, provided
that the affordable housing complies with the guidelines for amounts of
affordable housing, income levels, affordable rents, affordable sales
prices, and minimum terms of affordability under RCW 36.70A.540 for
affordable housing incentive programs.

Sec. 9 RCW 79.11.005 and 2003 c 334 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to RCW 43.63A.510, the department is authorized to sell
any real property not designated or acquired as state forest lands, but
acquired by the state, either in the name of the forest board, the
forestry board, or the division of forestry, for administrative sites,
lien foreclosures, or other purposes whenever it shall determine that
the lands are no longer or not necessary for public use.
(2) In selling, leasing, transferring, or otherwise disposing of
surplus or underutilized real property, the department shall give
priority to selling the property to an eligible organization as defined
in RCW 43.63A.510 for the development of affordable housing for
extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income
households, consistent with RCW 43.63A.510. The department may sell,
lease, or exchange the property for less than fair market value if the
affordable housing to be developed on the property is to be occupied
primarily by extremely low-income, very low-income, or low-income
households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.
(3) Except as otherwise provided under RCW 43.63A.510, the sale may
be made after public notice to the highest bidder for such a price as
approved by the governor, but not less than the fair market value of
the real property, plus the value of improvements thereon. Any
instruments necessary to convey title must be executed by the governor
in a form approved by the attorney general.
(((3))) (4) All amounts received from the sale must be credited to
the fund of the department of government that is responsible for the
acquisition and maintenance of the property sold.
(5) In accordance with RCW 43.63A.510, the department shall
identify and catalog real property owned by the state that is no longer
required for its purposes and is suitable for the development of
affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
The inventory must include the location, approximate size, sale or
lease price and terms, and current zoning classification of the
property. Each inventory must be updated at least once a year, and
printed and electronic copies of each inventory must be provided upon
request. Each annual inventory must also include any surplus
properties that have been sold for affordable housing.

Sec. 10 RCW 57.08.016 and 1999 c 153 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be no private sale of real property where the
appraised value exceeds the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars.
Subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section, no real
property of the district shall be sold for less than ninety percent of
the value thereof as established by a written appraisal made not more
than six months prior to the date of sale by three disinterested real
estate brokers licensed under the laws of the state or professionally
designated real estate appraisers as defined in RCW 74.46.020. The
appraisal shall be signed by the appraisers and filed with the
secretary of the board of commissioners of the district, who shall keep
it at the office of the district open to public inspection. Any notice
of intention to sell real property of the district shall recite the
appraised value thereof.
(2) Subject to RCW 43.63A.510, if no purchasers can be obtained for
the property at ninety percent or more of its appraised value after one
hundred twenty days of offering the property for sale, the board of
commissioners of the district may adopt a resolution stating that the
district has been unable to sell the property at the ninety percent
amount. The district then may sell the property at the highest price
it can obtain at public auction. A notice of intention to sell at
public auction shall be published once a week for two consecutive weeks
in a newspaper of general circulation in the district. The notice
shall describe the property, state the time and place at which it will
be offered for sale and the terms of sale, and shall call for bids, fix
the conditions thereof, and reserve the right to reject any and all
bids for good cause.
(3) In selling, leasing, transferring, or otherwise disposing of
surplus or underutilized property, a district shall give priority to
selling the property to an eligible organization for the development of
affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households, consistent with RCW 43.63A.510.
A district may sell, lease, or exchange the property for less than fair
market value if the affordable housing to be developed on the property
is to be occupied primarily by extremely low-income, very low-income,
or low-income households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510.
(4) A district shall identify and catalog real property that is no
longer required for district purposes and is suitable for the
development of affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW
43.63A.510. The inventory must include the location, approximate size,
sale or lease price and terms, and current zoning classification of the
property. Each inventory must be updated at least once a year, and
printed and electronic copies of each inventory must be provided upon
request. Each annual inventory must also include any surplus
properties that have been sold for affordable housing.

Sec. 11 RCW 81.112.080 and 1992 c 101 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
An authority shall have the following powers in addition to the
general powers granted by this chapter:
(1) To carry out the planning processes set forth in RCW
81.104.100;
(2) To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift, or grant and to
lease, construct, add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate,
and regulate the use of high capacity transportation facilities and
properties within authority boundaries including surface, underground,
or overhead railways, tramways, busways, buses, bus sets, entrained and
linked buses, ferries, or other means of local transportation except
taxis, and including escalators, moving sidewalks, personal rapid
transit systems or other people-moving systems, passenger terminal and
parking facilities and properties, and such other facilities and
properties as may be necessary for passenger, vehicular, and vessel
access to and from such people-moving systems, terminal and parking
facilities and properties, together with all lands, rights-of-way,
property, equipment, and accessories necessary for such high capacity
transportation systems. When developing specifications for high
capacity transportation system operating equipment, an authority shall
take into account efforts to establish or sustain a domestic
manufacturing capacity for such equipment. The right of eminent domain
shall be exercised by an authority in the same manner and by the same
procedure as or may be provided by law for cities of the first class,
except insofar as such laws may be inconsistent with the provisions of
this chapter. Public transportation facilities and properties which
are owned by any city, county, county transportation authority, public
transportation benefit area, or metropolitan municipal corporation may
be acquired or used by an authority only with the consent of the agency
owning such facilities. Such agencies are hereby authorized to convey
or lease such facilities to an authority or to contract for their joint
use on such terms as may be fixed by agreement between the agency and
the authority.
The facilities and properties of an authority whose vehicles will
operate primarily within the rights-of-way of public streets, roads, or
highways, may be acquired, developed, and operated without the corridor
and design hearings that are required by RCW 35.58.273 for mass transit
facilities operating on a separate right-of-way;
(3) To dispose of any real or personal property acquired in
connection with any authority function and that is no longer required
for the purposes of the authority, in the same manner as provided for
cities of the first class. When an authority determines that a
facility or any part thereof that has been acquired from any public
agency without compensation is no longer required for authority
purposes, but is required by the agency from which it was acquired, the
authority shall by resolution transfer it to such agency;
(4) In selling, leasing, transferring, or otherwise disposing of
surplus or underutilized property, to give priority to selling the
property to an eligible organization for the development of affordable
housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, or
moderate-income households, consistent with RCW 43.63A.510. An
authority may sell, lease, or exchange the property for less than fair
market value if the affordable housing to be developed on the property
is to be occupied primarily by extremely low-income, very low-income,
or low-income households as provided in RCW 43.63A.510;
(5) To identify and catalog real property that is no longer
required for authority purposes and is suitable for the development of
affordable housing for extremely low-income, very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510.
The inventory must include the location, approximate size, sale or
lease price and terms, and current zoning classification of the
property. Each inventory must be updated at least once a year, and
printed and electronic copies of each inventory must be provided upon
request. Each annual inventory must also include any surplus
properties that have been sold for affordable housing;
(6) To fix rates, tolls, fares, and charges for the use of such
facilities and to establish various routes and classes of service.
Fares or charges may be adjusted or eliminated for any distinguishable
class of users.

--- END ---