BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The intrastate building safety mutual
aid system is established to provide for mutual assistance among member
jurisdictions in the case of a building safety emergency or to
participate in training and exercises.
(2) Unless otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,
the following governmental entities are member jurisdictions of the
intrastate building safety mutual aid system:
(a) Counties;
(b) Cities and towns;
(c) Tribal governmental entities that declare an intention, in
writing, to participate as a member jurisdiction in the intrastate
building safety mutual aid system; and
(d) Other governmental entities with responsibilities of ensuring
building safety.
(3) Nothing in this section precludes a governmental entity
participating in the intrastate building safety mutual aid system from
entering into other mutual aid agreements otherwise permitted by law.
(4) Mutual assistance may include immediate responses to a building
safety emergency, effort to mitigate or prevent further damages, or
recovery activities.
(5) Nothing in this section is intended to interfere with other
mutual aid systems established by law. Existing mutual aid systems
including fire and law enforcement mobilization systems established by
RCW 43.43.960 through 43.43.975 are unaffected by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A member jurisdiction may request assistance
from other member jurisdictions to respond to, mitigate, or recover
from a building safety emergency, or for participation of other member
jurisdictions in authorized drills or exercises, subject to the
following provisions:
(1) A member jurisdiction requesting assistance under the
intrastate building safety mutual aid system must (a) be experiencing
a building safety emergency as defined in section 9 of this act or (b)
anticipate undertaking drills or exercises.
(2) The chief executive officer of a requesting member
jurisdiction, or his or her authorized designee, must request
assistance under the intrastate building safety mutual aid system
directly from the chief executive officer of another member
jurisdiction.
(3) A verbal request for assistance must be confirmed by a written
request as soon as practicable.
(4) A responding member jurisdiction may withhold requested
resources for any reason.
(5) Emergency responders from a responding member jurisdiction are
under the general command of the responding member jurisdiction and the
operational control of the requesting member jurisdiction. All
emergency intrastate building safety mutual aid system responders shall
work within the infrastructure of any established incident command
system as defined in RCW 38.52.010.
(6) Resources from a responding member jurisdiction are under the
command of the responding member jurisdiction and the operational
control of the requesting member jurisdiction.
(7) Response under this agreement is voluntary. Unless otherwise
provided by this section, a requesting member jurisdiction shall
reimburse responding member jurisdictions for the true and full value
of assistance provided pursuant to the intrastate building safety
mutual aid system. Requests for reimbursement must be made within
thirty days in accordance with procedures and rates developed by the
intrastate building safety mutual aid oversight committee.
(8) If not otherwise prohibited, a responding member jurisdiction
may donate requested emergency responder assistance and resources to a
requesting member jurisdiction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 An emergency responder holding a license,
certificate, or other permit issued by a responding member jurisdiction
evidencing qualification in a professional, mechanical, or other skill
shall be deemed to be licensed, certified, or permitted in the
requesting member jurisdiction, subject to any limitations and
conditions the chief executive of the requesting member jurisdiction
may prescribe.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 An employee of a responding member
jurisdiction that dies or sustains an injury in the course of his or
her employment, while providing assistance under the intrastate
building safety mutual aid system, is eligible to receive the benefits
that would otherwise be available for injuries sustained or death in
the course of employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A responding member jurisdiction may
designate, in writing, persons to serve as temporary emergency
responders for the purposes of deploying such persons under the
intrastate building safety mutual aid system. A designation as a
temporary emergency responder does not grant any right to wages,
salary, pensions, health benefits, seniority or other benefits.
(2) The intrastate building safety mutual aid oversight committee
will develop guidelines and procedures detailing this temporary
designation process.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) A member jurisdiction that has a
disagreement with another member jurisdiction regarding reimbursement
for assistance under the provisions of this chapter may send a written
request to the other member jurisdiction to resolve the matter within
thirty days.
(2) If the dispute is not resolved within thirty days of the
receipt of the written request, either party may request arbitration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) For purposes of tort liability or
immunity, an emergency responder of a responding member jurisdiction is
considered an agent of the requesting member jurisdiction.
(2) A responding member jurisdiction rendering aid under this
system is not liable for the acts or omissions in good faith of the
responding member jurisdiction's emergency responders or resources.
(3) For purposes of this section, good faith does not include
willful misconduct, gross negligence, or recklessness.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The intrastate building safety mutual aid
system does not provide rights or privileges to any person responding
for any reason if a member jurisdiction has not requested or authorized
that person to respond to the building safety emergency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout the
chapter.
(1) "Building safety emergency" means a situation that temporarily
renders a building safety department incapable of providing building
safety services and includes, but is not limited to, declared states of
emergency, declared disasters, and other situations that temporarily
impair the jurisdictions ability to provide building safety operations.
(2) "Chief executive officer" means the county executive in those
charter counties with an elective office of county executive, however
designated, and, in the case of other counties, the county legislative
authority. In the case of cities and towns, it means the mayor in
those cities and towns with mayor-council or commission forms of
government, where the mayor is directly elected, and it means the city
manager in those cities and towns with council manager forms of
government. Cities and towns may also designate a chief executive
officer for the purposes of this chapter by ordinance.
(3) "Command" means the ultimate authority over emergency
responders and resources, held by the responding member jurisdiction.
(4) "Emergency responder" means a person with skills,
qualifications, training, knowledge, and experience to respond in the
case of a declared emergency, as defined by law, including expertise in
such areas as law enforcement, firefighting, emergency medical
services, medicine, nursing, public health, emergency management,
public works, building safety specialized equipment operations skills,
or other skills needed to provide aid in a state of emergency.
(5) "Operational control" means the subset of command, granted by
the responding member jurisdiction to the requesting member
jurisdiction for the duration of the deployment of emergency responders
or resources, under the intrastate building safety mutual aid system.
Operational control includes the day-to-day direction and operation of
emergency responders or resources while deployed under the intrastate
building safety mutual aid system, but does not include discipline,
promotion, hiring, and firing of emergency responders, nor ownership
nor disposition of resources.
(6) "Requesting member jurisdiction" means a member jurisdiction
that requests assistance from another member jurisdiction under the
process established by the intrastate building safety mutual aid
system.
(7) "Resources" includes supplies, materials, equipment,
facilities, energy, services, information, or systems used to prevent,
mitigate, respond to, or recover from any incident resulting in a
deployment under this chapter.
(8) "Responding member jurisdiction" means a member jurisdiction
that has or intends to provide emergency responders and/or resources to
a requesting member jurisdiction under the process established by the
intrastate building safety mutual aid system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The intrastate building safety mutual aid
oversight committee is created. It shall be a committee of the
Washington association of building officials. The committee will be
representative of building safety agencies and disciplines as well as
local political subdivisions.
(1) The president of the Washington association of building
officials will appoint members of the committee from interested
applicants.
(2) The chair of the Washington association of building officials
emergency management committee or designee will chair the committee.
(3) The committee will hold, at a minimum, annual meetings.
(4) The committee will be responsible for developing and updating
comprehensive guidelines and procedures implementing the intrastate
building safety mutual aid system. The guidelines and procedures shall
include, at a minimum, the following: Projected or anticipated costs,
checklists for requesting and providing assistance, recordkeeping for
all member jurisdictions, rates and reimbursement procedures, and other
necessary implementation instructions and forms.
(5) The committee will review the progress and status of the
intrastate building safety mutual aid system and draft necessary
guidelines, policies, and procedures to correct any deficiencies in the
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 10 and 13 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 24 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---