BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that small alternative
energy resource facilities provide various benefits to local
communities such as: Reducing emissions of air, soil, and water
pollutants; creating local jobs; securing a diversified energy supply;
and contributing to the development of a clean, sustainable energy
industry. The legislature finds that the implementation of state
policies that support the development of small alternative energy
resource facilities may be hindered by the lack of appropriate local
ordinances to permit the siting of these facilities.
The legislature finds that the energy facility site evaluation
council maintains the necessary expertise to evaluate proposed energy
projects, balancing the demand for new energy facilities with
protection of environmental quality and safety of energy facilities.
The legislature intends to ensure that small alternative energy
resource facilities are sited in a timely manner in local jurisdictions
where there are no existing ordinances to permit these facilities,
where applicable ordinances have not been updated in over ten years, or
where ordinances have been adopted that impede the timely permitting of
these facilities.
Additionally, it is the intent of the legislature to encourage
local governments to enter into interlocal agreements with the energy
facility site evaluation council for the purpose of authorizing the
council to issue permits for small alternative energy resource
facilities that are proposed within the geographic jurisdiction of a
local government, if the local government determines that it would be
more cost-effective for the council to permit these facilities.
The legislature finds that it may be more cost-effective in some
cases for the state to provide a centralized small renewable energy
resource facility permitting agency than for each county and
municipality to maintain individual permitting staff.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.50.020 and 2010 c 152 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Alternative energy resource" includes energy facilities of the
following types: (a) Wind; (b) solar energy; (c) geothermal energy;
(d) landfill gas; (e) wave or tidal action; or (f) biomass energy based
on solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field residues, or
dedicated energy crops that do not include wood pieces that have been
treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic.
(2) "Applicant" means any person who makes application for a site
certification pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(3) "Application" means any request for approval of a particular
site or sites filed in accordance with the procedures established
pursuant to this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires.
(4) "Associated facilities" means storage, transmission, handling,
or other related and supporting facilities connecting an energy plant
with the existing energy supply, processing, or distribution system,
including, but not limited to, communications, controls, mobilizing or
maintenance equipment, instrumentation, and other types of ancillary
transmission equipment, off-line storage or venting required for
efficient operation or safety of the transmission system and overhead,
and surface or subsurface lines of physical access for the inspection,
maintenance, and safe operations of the transmission facility and new
transmission lines constructed to operate at nominal voltages of at
least 115,000 volts to connect a thermal power plant or alternative
energy facilities to the northwest power grid. However, common carrier
railroads or motor vehicles shall not be included.
(5) "Biofuel" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 43.325.010.
(6) "Certification" means a binding agreement between an applicant
and the state which shall embody compliance to the siting guidelines,
in effect as of the date of certification, which have been adopted
pursuant to RCW 80.50.040 as now or hereafter amended as conditions to
be met prior to or concurrent with the construction or operation of any
energy facility.
(7) "Construction" means on-site improvements, excluding
exploratory work, which cost in excess of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars.
(8) "Council" means the energy facility site evaluation council
created by RCW 80.50.030.
(9) "Counsel for the environment" means an assistant attorney
general or a special assistant attorney general who shall represent the
public in accordance with RCW 80.50.080.
(10) "Electrical transmission facilities" means electrical power
lines and related equipment.
(11) "Energy facility" means an energy plant or transmission
facilities: PROVIDED, That the following are excluded from the
provisions of this chapter:
(a) Facilities for the extraction, conversion, transmission or
storage of water, other than water specifically consumed or discharged
by energy production or conversion for energy purposes; and
(b) Facilities operated by and for the armed services for military
purposes or by other federal authority for the national defense.
(12) "Energy plant" means the following facilities together with
their associated facilities:
(a) Any nuclear power facility where the primary purpose is to
produce and sell electricity;
(b) Any nonnuclear stationary thermal power plant with generating
capacity of three hundred fifty thousand kilowatts or more, measured
using maximum continuous electric generating capacity, less minimum
auxiliary load, at average ambient temperature and pressure, and
floating thermal power plants of one hundred thousand kilowatts or more
suspended on the surface of water by means of a barge, vessel, or other
floating platform;
(c) Facilities which will have the capacity to receive liquefied
natural gas in the equivalent of more than one hundred million standard
cubic feet of natural gas per day, which has been transported over
marine waters;
(d) Facilities which will have the capacity to receive more than an
average of fifty thousand barrels per day of crude or refined petroleum
or liquefied petroleum gas which has been or will be transported over
marine waters, except that the provisions of this chapter shall not
apply to storage facilities unless occasioned by such new facility
construction;
(e) Any underground reservoir for receipt and storage of natural
gas as defined in RCW 80.40.010 capable of delivering an average of
more than one hundred million standard cubic feet of natural gas per
day; ((and))
(f) Facilities capable of processing more than twenty-five thousand
barrels per day of petroleum or biofuel into refined products except
where such biofuel production is undertaken at existing industrial
facilities.
(13) "Independent consultants" means those persons who have no
financial interest in the applicant's proposals and who are retained by
the council to evaluate the applicant's proposals, supporting studies,
or to conduct additional studies.
(14) "Land use plan" means a comprehensive plan or land use element
thereof adopted by a unit of local government pursuant to chapter
35.63, 35A.63, 36.70, or 36.70A RCW, or as otherwise designated by
chapter 325, Laws of 2007.
(15) "Person" means an individual, partnership, joint venture,
private or public corporation, association, firm, public service
company, political subdivision, municipal corporation, government
agency, public utility district, or any other entity, public or
private, however organized.
(16) "Preapplicant" means a person considering applying for a site
certificate agreement for any transmission facility.
(17) "Preapplication process" means the process which is initiated
by written correspondence from the preapplicant to the council, and
includes the process adopted by the council for consulting with the
preapplicant and with cities, towns, and counties prior to accepting
applications for all transmission facilities.
(18) "Secretary" means the secretary of the United States
department of energy.
(19) "Site" means any proposed or approved location of an energy
facility, alternative energy resource, or electrical transmission
facility.
(20) "Thermal power plant" means, for the purpose of certification,
any electrical generating facility using any fuel for distribution of
electricity by electric utilities.
(21) "Transmission facility" means any of the following together
with their associated facilities:
(a) Crude or refined petroleum or liquid petroleum product
transmission pipeline of the following dimensions: A pipeline larger
than six inches minimum inside diameter between valves for the
transmission of these products with a total length of at least fifteen
miles;
(b) Natural gas, synthetic fuel gas, or liquefied petroleum gas
transmission pipeline of the following dimensions: A pipeline larger
than fourteen inches minimum inside diameter between valves, for the
transmission of these products, with a total length of at least fifteen
miles for the purpose of delivering gas to a distribution facility,
except an interstate natural gas pipeline regulated by the United
States federal power commission.
(22) "Zoning ordinance" means an ordinance of a unit of local
government regulating the use of land and adopted pursuant to chapter
35.63, 35A.63, 36.70, or 36.70A RCW or Article XI of the state
Constitution, or as otherwise designated by chapter 325, Laws of 2007.
(23) "Small alternative energy resource facility" means: (a) A
wind facility with a generating capacity of not more than five
megawatts; and (b) any facility that meets the definition of a "net
metering system" under RCW 80.60.010, except facilities that use
biomass as a fuel.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.50.040 and 2001 c 214 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The council shall have the following powers:
(1) To adopt, ((promulgate,)) amend, or rescind suitable rules and
regulations, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, to carry out the provisions
of this chapter, and the policies and practices of the council in
connection therewith;
(2) To develop and apply environmental and ecological guidelines in
relation to the type, design, location, construction, and operational
conditions of certification of energy facilities subject to this
chapter;
(3) To establish rules of practice for the conduct of public
hearings pursuant to the provisions of the administrative procedure
act, as found in chapter 34.05 RCW;
(4) To prescribe the form, content, and necessary supporting
documentation for site certification;
(5) To receive applications for energy facility locations and to
investigate the sufficiency thereof;
(6) To make and contract, when applicable, for independent studies
of sites proposed by the applicant;
(7) To conduct hearings on the proposed location of the energy
facilities;
(8) To prepare written reports to the governor which shall include:
(a) A statement indicating whether the application is in compliance
with the council's guidelines, (b) criteria specific to the site and
transmission line routing, (c) a council recommendation as to the
disposition of the application, and (d) a draft certification agreement
when the council recommends approval of the application;
(9) To prescribe the means for monitoring of the effects arising
from the construction and the operation of energy facilities to
((assure)) ensure continued compliance with terms of certification
and/or permits issued by the council pursuant to chapter 90.48 RCW or
subsection (12) of this section: PROVIDED, That any on-site inspection
required by the council shall be performed by other state and local
agencies pursuant to interagency agreement: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
council may retain authority for determining compliance relative to
monitoring or may delegate authority for ensuring compliance with the
terms of the certificate and/or permits to other state or local
agencies;
(10) To integrate its site evaluation activity with activities of
federal agencies having jurisdiction in such matters to avoid
unnecessary duplication;
(11) To present state concerns and interests to other states,
regional organizations, and the federal government on the location,
construction, and operation of any energy facility which may affect the
environment, health, or safety of the citizens of the state of
Washington;
(12) To issue permits in compliance with applicable provisions of
the federally approved state implementation plan adopted in accordance
with the federal clean air act, as now existing or hereafter amended,
for the new construction, reconstruction, or enlargement or operation
of energy facilities: PROVIDED, That such permits shall become
effective only if the governor approves an application for
certification and executes a certification agreement pursuant to this
chapter: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That all such permits be conditioned
upon compliance with all provisions of the federally approved state
implementation plan which apply to energy facilities covered within the
provisions of this chapter; ((and))
(13) To serve as an interagency coordinating body for energy-related issues; and
(14) To issue site permits as provided under section 8 of this act,
for the construction, reconstruction, or enlargement of small
alternative energy resource facilities.

Sec. 4 RCW 80.50.060 and 2007 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction of
energy facilities which includes the new construction of energy
facilities and the reconstruction or enlargement of existing energy
facilities where the net increase in physical capacity or dimensions
resulting from such reconstruction or enlargement meets or exceeds
those capacities or dimensions set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (((7) and
(15))) (12) and (21). No construction of such energy facilities may be
undertaken, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, after July
15, 1977, without first obtaining certification in the manner provided
in this chapter.
(2) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction,
reconstruction, or enlargement of a new or existing energy facility
that exclusively uses alternative energy resources and chooses to
receive certification under this chapter, regardless of the generating
capacity of the project.
(3) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction,
reconstruction, or enlargement of a small alternative energy resource
facility that chooses to receive a site permit under this chapter.
(4)(a) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction,
reconstruction, or modification of electrical transmission facilities
when:
(i) The facilities are located in a national interest electric
transmission corridor as specified in RCW 80.50.045;
(ii) An applicant chooses to receive certification under this
chapter, and the facilities are: (A) Of a nominal voltage of at least
one hundred fifteen thousand volts and are located in a completely new
corridor, except for the terminus of the new facility or
interconnection of the new facility with the existing grid, and the
corridor is not otherwise used for electrical transmission facilities;
and (B) located in more than one jurisdiction that has promulgated land
use plans or zoning ordinances; or
(iii) An applicant chooses to receive certification under this
chapter, and the facilities are: (A) Of a nominal voltage in excess of
one hundred fifteen thousand volts; and (B) located outside an
electrical transmission corridor identified in (a)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection (((3))) (4).
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "modify" means a
significant change to an electrical transmission facility and does not
include the following: (i) Minor improvements such as the replacement
of existing transmission line facilities or supporting structures with
equivalent facilities or structures; (ii) the relocation of existing
electrical transmission line facilities; (iii) the conversion of
existing overhead lines to underground; or (iv) the placing of new or
additional conductors, supporting structures, insulators, or their
accessories on or replacement of supporting structures already built.
(((4))) (5) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to
normal maintenance and repairs which do not increase the capacity or
dimensions beyond those set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (((7) and (15)))
(12) and (21).
(((5))) (6) Applications for certification of energy facilities
made prior to July 15, 1977, shall continue to be governed by the
applicable provisions of law in effect on the day immediately preceding
July 15, 1977, with the exceptions of RCW 80.50.190 and 80.50.071 which
shall apply to such prior applications and to site certifications
prospectively from July 15, 1977.
(((6))) (7) Applications for certification shall be upon forms
prescribed by the council and shall be supported by such information
and technical studies as the council may require.

Sec. 5 RCW 80.50.071 and 2010 c 152 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The council shall receive all applications for energy facility
site certification. Except as provided under sections 8 and 9 of this
act, each applicant shall pay such reasonable costs as are actually and
necessarily incurred by the council in processing an application.
(a) Each applicant shall, at the time of application submission,
deposit fifty thousand dollars, or such greater amount as may be
specified by the council after consultation with the applicant. Costs
that may be charged against the deposit include, but are not limited
to, independent consultants' costs, councilmember's wages, employee
benefits, costs of a hearing examiner, costs of a court reporter, staff
salaries, wages and employee benefits, goods and services, travel
expenses, and miscellaneous direct expenses as arise directly from
processing an application.
(b) The council may commission its own independent consultant study
to measure the consequences of the proposed energy facility on the
environment or any matter that it deems essential to an adequate
appraisal of the site. The council shall provide an estimate of the
cost of the study to the applicant and consider applicant comments.
(c) The council shall submit to each applicant a statement of such
expenditures made during the preceding calendar quarter which shall be
in sufficient detail to explain such expenditures. The applicant shall
pay the state treasurer the amount of such statement to restore the
total amount on deposit to the originally established level: PROVIDED,
That such applicant may, at the request of the council, increase the
amount of funds on deposit to cover anticipated expenses during peak
periods of application processing. Any funds remaining unexpended at
the conclusion of application processing shall be refunded to the
applicant, or at the applicant's option, credited against required
deposits of certificate holders.
(2) Each certificate holder shall pay such reasonable costs as are
actually and necessarily incurred by the council for inspection and
determination of compliance by the certificate holder with the terms of
the certification relative to monitoring the effects of construction,
operation, and site restoration of the facility.
(a) Each certificate holder, within thirty days of execution of the
site certification agreement, shall have on deposit fifty thousand
dollars, or such greater amount as may be specified by the council
after consultation with the certificate holder. Costs that may be
charged against the deposit include, but are not limited to, those
specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section as arise from inspection
and determination of compliance by the certificate holder with the
terms of the certification.
(b) The council shall submit to each certificate holder a statement
of such expenditures actually made during the preceding calendar
quarter which shall be in sufficient detail to explain such
expenditures. The certificate holder shall pay the state treasurer the
amount of such statement to restore the total amount on deposit to the
originally established level: PROVIDED, That if the actual
expenditures for inspection and determination of compliance in the
preceding calendar quarter have exceeded the amount of funds on
deposit, such excess costs shall be paid by the certificate holder.
(3) If an applicant or certificate holder fails to provide the
initial deposit, or if subsequently required payments are not received
within thirty days following receipt of the statement from the council,
the council may (a) in the case of the applicant, suspend processing of
the application until payment is received; or (b) in the case of a
certificate holder, suspend the certification.
(4) All payments required of the applicant or certificate holder
under this section are to be made to the state treasurer who shall make
payments as instructed by the council from the funds submitted. All
such funds shall be subject to state auditing procedures. Any
unexpended portions thereof shall be returned to the applicant or
certificate holder.

Sec. 6 RCW 80.50.090 and 2006 c 205 s 3 and 2006 c 196 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The council shall conduct an informational public hearing in
the county of the proposed site as soon as practicable but not later
than sixty days after receipt of an application for site certification.
However, the place of such public hearing shall be as close as
practical to the proposed site.
(2) Subsequent to the informational public hearing, the council
shall conduct a public hearing to determine whether or not the proposed
site is consistent and in compliance with city, county, or regional
land use plans or zoning ordinances. If it is determined that the
proposed site does conform with existing land use plans or zoning
ordinances in effect as of the date of the application, the city,
county, or regional planning authority shall not thereafter change such
land use plans or zoning ordinances so as to affect the proposed site.
(3) Prior to the issuance of a council recommendation to the
governor under RCW 80.50.100 a public hearing, conducted as an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act, shall be held. At such public hearing any person shall
be entitled to be heard in support of or in opposition to the
application for certification.
(4) Additional public hearings shall be held as deemed appropriate
by the council in the exercise of its functions under this chapter.
(5) This section does not apply to sections 8 and 9 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 80.50.100 and 1989 c 175 s 174 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The council shall report to the governor its recommendations as
to the approval or rejection of an application for certification within
twelve months of receipt by the council of such an application, or such
later time as is mutually agreed by the council and the applicant. If
the council recommends approval of an application for certification, it
shall also submit a draft certification agreement with the report. The
council shall include conditions in the draft certification agreement
to implement the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited
to, conditions to protect state or local governmental or community
interests affected by the construction or operation of the energy
facility, and conditions designed to recognize the purpose of laws or
ordinances, or rules or regulations promulgated thereunder, that are
preempted or superseded pursuant to RCW 80.50.110 as now or hereafter
amended.
(2)(a) Within sixty days of receipt of the council's report the
governor shall take one of the following actions:
(((a))) (i) Approve the application and execute the draft
certification agreement; or
(((b))) (ii) Reject the application; or
(((c))) (iii) Direct the council to reconsider certain aspects of
the draft certification agreement.
(b) The council shall reconsider such aspects of the draft
certification agreement by reviewing the existing record of the
application or, as necessary, by reopening the adjudicative proceeding
for the purposes of receiving additional evidence. Such
reconsideration shall be conducted expeditiously. The council shall
resubmit the draft certification to the governor incorporating any
amendments deemed necessary upon reconsideration. Within sixty days of
receipt of such draft certification agreement, the governor shall
either approve the application and execute the certification agreement
or reject the application. The certification agreement shall be
binding upon execution by the governor and the applicant.
(3) The rejection of an application for certification by the
governor shall be final as to that application but shall not preclude
submission of a subsequent application for the same site on the basis
of changed conditions or new information.
(4) This section does not apply to sections 8 and 9 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 80.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may apply to the council for a site permit for a small
alternative energy resource facility if the facility is located in a
county or municipality that has not adopted ordinances for the
permitting of small alternative energy resource facilities.
(2) The application for a site permit under this section must be
submitted to the council in the form and manner as may be determined by
the council.
(3) In consultation with the municipal research council, the
Washington state association of counties, and the association of
Washington cities, the council shall adopt a streamlined site
permitting process and siting standards for small alternative energy
resource facilities by December 31, 2012. The process and standards
shall be substantially similar to existing ordinances or model
ordinances, except interconnection requirements as provided in RCW
80.60.040 must be incorporated in any siting standard.
(4) The council may delegate authority to council staff to issue a
site permit for small alternative energy resource facilities.
(5) The council may charge a fee that covers the costs incurred by
the council in reviewing a small alternative energy resource facility
site permit and of any compliance inspection costs delegated to local
governments. The council must develop and charge a fee that provides
the lowest possible cost to the applicant.
(6) A site permit issued by the council under this section has the
same preemptory effect as a certification under this chapter and is
considered a final decision for the purposes of RCW 80.50.140.
(7) This section does not preclude an applicant from obtaining
certification under any other provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 80.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The council and any local government in the state may enter into,
and are encouraged to enter into, an interlocal agreement as provided
under chapter 39.34 RCW for the purpose of authorizing the council to
issue permits for small alternative energy resource facilities within
the geographic jurisdiction of the local government. The council may
serve as the permitting authority for a local government if the local
government determines that it would be more cost-effective for the
council to permit small alternative energy resource facilities within
their jurisdiction. Such an agreement supersedes the provisions
provided under section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---