BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.41.190 and 2009 c 575 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any
pharmacist filling a prescription under a state purchased health care
program as defined in RCW 41.05.011(2) shall substitute, where
identified, a preferred drug for any nonpreferred drug in a given
therapeutic class, unless the endorsing practitioner has indicated on
the prescription that the nonpreferred drug must be dispensed as
written, or the prescription is for a refill of an antipsychotic,
atypical antipsychotic, antidepressant, antiepileptic, chemotherapy,
antiretroviral, or immunosuppressive drug, or for the refill of a
immunomodulator/antiviral treatment for hepatitis C for which an
established, fixed duration of therapy is prescribed for at least
twenty-four weeks but no more than forty-eight weeks, in which case the
pharmacist shall dispense the prescribed nonpreferred drug.
(b) When a substitution is made under (a) of this subsection, the
dispensing pharmacist shall notify the prescribing practitioner of the
specific drug and dose dispensed.
(2)(a) A state purchased health care program may impose limited
restrictions on an endorsing practitioner's authority to write a
prescription to dispense as written only under the following
circumstances:
(i) There is statistical or clear data demonstrating the endorsing
practitioner's frequency of prescribing dispensed as written for
nonpreferred drugs varies significantly from the prescribing patterns
of his or her peers;
(ii) The medical director of a state purchased health program has:
(A) Presented the endorsing practitioner with data that indicates the
endorsing practitioner's prescribing patterns vary significantly from
his or her peers, (B) provided the endorsing practitioner an
opportunity to explain the variation in his or her prescribing patterns
to those of his or her peers, and (C) if the variation in prescribing
patterns cannot be explained, provided the endorsing practitioner
sufficient time to change his or her prescribing patterns to align with
those of his or her peers; and
(iii) The restrictions imposed under (a) of this subsection (2)
must be limited to the extent possible to reduce variation in
prescribing patterns and shall remain in effect only until such time as
the endorsing practitioner can demonstrate a reduction in variation in
line with his or her peers.
(b) A state purchased health care program may immediately designate
an available, less expensive, equally effective generic product in a
previously reviewed drug class as a preferred drug, without first
submitting the product to review by the pharmacy and therapeutics
committee established pursuant to RCW 70.14.050.
(c) For a patient's first course of treatment within a therapeutic
class of drugs, a state purchased health care program may impose
limited restrictions on endorsing practitioners' authority to write a
prescription to dispense as written, only under the following
circumstances:
(i) There is a less expensive, equally effective therapeutic
alternative generic product available to treat the condition;
(ii) The drug use review board established under WAC 388-530-4000
reviews and provides recommendations as to the appropriateness of the
limitation;
(iii) Notwithstanding the limitation set forth in (c)(ii) of this
subsection (2), the endorsing practitioner shall have an opportunity to
request as medically necessary, that the brand name drug be prescribed
as the first course of treatment;
(iv) The state purchased health care program may provide, where
available, prescription, emergency room, diagnosis, and hospitalization
history with the endorsing practitioner; and
(v) Specifically for antipsychotic restrictions, the state
purchased health care program shall effectively guide good practice
without interfering with the timeliness of clinical decision making.
Department of social and health services prior authorization programs
must provide for responses within twenty-four hours and at least a
seventy-two hour emergency supply of the requested drug.
(d) If, within a therapeutic class, there is an equally effective
therapeutic alternative over-the-counter drug available, a state
purchased health care program may designate the over-the-counter drug
as the preferred drug.
(e) A state purchased health care program may impose limited
restrictions on endorsing practitioners' authority to prescribe
pharmaceuticals to be dispensed as written for a purpose outside the
scope of their approved labels only under the following circumstances:
(i) There is a less expensive, equally effective on-label product
available to treat the condition;
(ii) The drug use review board established under WAC 388-530-4000
reviews and provides recommendations as to the appropriateness of the
limitation; and
(iii) Notwithstanding the limitation set forth in (e)(ii) of this
subsection (2), the endorsing practitioner shall have an opportunity to
request as medically necessary, that the drug be prescribed for a
covered off-label purpose.
(f) The provisions of this subsection related to the definition of
medically necessary, prior authorization procedures and patient appeal
rights shall be implemented in a manner consistent with applicable
federal and state law.
(g) Prescriptions for atypical antipsychotic medications are exempt
from subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Notwithstanding the limitations in subsection (2) of this
section, for refills for an antipsychotic, atypical antipsychotic,
antidepressant, antiepileptic, chemotherapy, antiretroviral, or
immunosuppressive drug, or for the refill of an immunomodulator
antiviral treatment for hepatitis C for which an established, fixed
duration of therapy is prescribed for at least twenty-four weeks by no
more than forty-eight weeks, the pharmacist shall dispense the
prescribed nonpreferred drug.

--- END ---