BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
Washington conservation corps, the veterans conservation corps, and
other state and nonprofit service corps contribute significantly to the
priorities of state government to protect natural resources, including
Puget Sound, while providing meaningful work experience for the state's
youth, veterans, unemployed, and under-employed workforces.
(2) The legislature further finds that the long-term health of the
economy of Washington depends on the sustainable management of its
natural resources and that the livelihoods and revenues produced by
Washington's forests, agricultural lands, estuaries, waterways, and
watersheds would be enhanced by targeted, streamlined, and prioritized
investments in clean water and habitat restoration.
(3) The legislature further finds that it is important to stretch
limited public resources to advance the state's natural resource
management priorities. Transformation of natural resource management
and service delivery, including the creation of strategic partnerships
among agencies and nongovernmental partners, will increase the
efficiency and effectiveness of the expenditure of federal, state, and
local funds for clean water and habitat rehabilitation projects.
(4) The legislature further finds that there are efficiencies to be
gained by streamlining how the various conservation corps are
administered, managed, funded, and deployed by the natural resources
agencies. There are further efficiencies to be gained through
coordinating the conservation corps with other state service corps
programs, recruitment activities, and through public-private
partnerships.
(5) The legislature further finds that the state should seek to
expand the conservation corps in all areas of the state, deploying the
corps to work on projects that advance established priorities
including, but not limited to, the cleanup and rehabilitation of the
Puget Sound ecosystem, oil spill response and cleanup, salmon recovery,
and the reduction of wildfire and forest health hazards statewide.
(6) The legislature further finds that individuals with
developmental disabilities would benefit from experiencing a meaningful
work experience, and learning the value of labor and of membership in
a productive society. As such, the legislature urges state agencies
that are participating in the Washington conservation corps program to
consider for enrollment in the program individuals with developmental
disabilities, as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.
(7)(a) Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to maintain
the conservation corps statewide, to collaborate with the veterans
conservation corps, to establish the Puget Sound corps, to streamline
how government administers and manages the state's conservation corps
to more efficiently expend the state's resources toward priority
outcomes, including the recovery of the Puget Sound ecosystem to health
by 2020, to increase opportunities for meaningful work experience, and
to authorize public-private partnerships as a key element of corps
activities.
(b) It is also the intent of the legislature to integrate into the
Puget Sound corps the therapeutic and reintegration intent of the
veterans conservation corps for veterans involved in the Puget Sound
corps.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.220.020 and 1999 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington conservation corps is ((hereby)) created((, to
be implemented by)). The ((following state departments: The employment
security department, the)) department of ecology((, the department of
fish and wildlife, the department of natural resources, and the state
parks and recreation commission)) must administer the corps as a
partnership with the departments of natural resources and fish and
wildlife, the state parks and recreation commission, and when
appropriate, other agencies and nonprofit organizations to advance the
program goals outlined in section 5 of this act.
(2) The Puget Sound corps is created as a distinct program within
the Washington conservation corps focused on the implementation of the
specific program goals outlined in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 It is the intent of this act to centralize
the administration of the Washington conservation corps, which was
previously administered by the departments of ecology, natural
resources, and fish and wildlife and the state parks and recreation
commission, into the department of ecology. This act is prospective
only, and any grant awards or conservation corps crew or individual
placements finalized by other agencies or partners prior to the
effective date of this section remain unaffected by this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.220.040 and 1999 c 280 s 3 and 1999 c 151 s 1301
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Public lands" means any lands or waters, or interests therein,
owned or administered by any agency or instrumentality of the state,
federal, or local government.
(2) "Corps" means the Washington conservation corps, including the
Puget Sound corps.
(3) "Corps member" means an individual enrolled in the Washington
conservation corps.
(4) "Corps member leaders" or "specialists" means members of the
corps who serve in leadership or training capacities or who provide
specialized services other than or in addition to the types of work and
services that are performed by the corps members in general.
(5) "Crew supervisor" means temporary, project, or permanent state
employees who supervise corps members and coordinate work project
design and completion.
(6) (("Distressed area" has the meaning as defined in RCW
43.168.020.)) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(7) "Agency administrative costs" means indirect expenses such as
personnel, payroll, contract administration, fiscal services, and other
overhead costs.
(8) "Program support costs" include, but are not limited to,
program planning, development of reports, job and career training,
uniforms and equipment, and standard office space and utilities.
Program support costs do not include direct scheduling and supervision
of corps members.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.220 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The corps shall be organized and managed to complete projects
with fee-for-service work crews that meet goals associated with the
protection, promotion, enhancement, or rehabilitation of the following:
(a) Public lands;
(b) State natural resources;
(c) Water quality;
(d) Watershed health;
(e) Fish and wildlife;
(f) Habitat;
(g) Outdoor recreation;
(h) Forest health;
(i) Wildfire risk reduction; and
(j) State historic sites.
(2) In addition to the project goals outlined in subsection (1) of
this section, the Puget Sound corps shall seek to deploy corps members
with the specific goal of participating in the recovery of the Puget
Sound ecosystem. The resources of the Puget Sound corps must be
prioritized, when practicable, to focus on the following when located
within the Puget Sound basin:
(a) Projects identified in, or consistent with, the action agenda
developed by the Puget Sound partnership in chapter 90.71 RCW;
(b) Projects located on public lands;
(c) Habitat enhancement and rehabilitation projects; and
(d) Education and stewardship projects.
(3) Both the corps and the Puget Sound corps shall give preference
to projects that satisfy the goals identified in this section and that:
(a) Will provide long-term benefits to the public;
(b) Will provide productive training and work experiences to the
corps members involved;
(c) Expands or integrates training programs or career development
opportunities for corps members;
(d) May result in payments to the state for services performed; and
(e) Can be promptly completed.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.220.060 and 1999 c 280 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Each state department identified in RCW 43.220.020)) The
department shall have the following powers and duties ((to carry out
its functions relative to)) as necessary to administer the Washington
conservation corps:
(a) Recruiting and employing staff, corps members, corps member
leaders, and specialists consistent with RCW 43.220.070;
(b) Serving as the corps' central application recipient for grants
from federal service projects and service organizations;
(c) Executing agreements for furnishing the services of the corps
to carry out conservation corps programs to any federal, state, or
local public agency, any local organization as specified in this
chapter ((in concern)) that operates consistent with the overall
objectives of the conservation corps;
(((c))) (d) Applying for and accepting grants or contributions of
funds from ((any private source)) the federal government, other public
sources, or private funding sources for conservation corps projects
and, when possible, other projects specifically targeted at Puget Sound
recovery that can be accomplished with fee-for-service labor from the
Puget Sound corps. Application priority must be given to funding
sources only available to state agencies;
(((d) Determining a preference for those projects which will
provide long-term benefits to the public, will provide productive
training and work experiences to the members involved, will be labor-intensive, may result in payments to the state for services performed,
and can be promptly completed; and
(e) Entering into agreements with community colleges within the
state's community and technical college system and other educational
institutions or independent nonprofit agencies to provide special
education in basic skills, including reading, writing, and mathematics
for those conservation corps members who may benefit by participation
in such classes. Classes shall be scheduled after corps working hours.
Participation by members is not mandatory but shall be strongly
encouraged. The participation shall be a primary factor in determining
whether the opportunity for corps membership beyond one year shall be
offered. Instruction related to the specific role of the department in
resource conservation shall also be offered, either in a classroom
setting or as is otherwise appropriate)) (e) Establishing consistent
work standards and placement and evaluation procedures of corps
programs; and
(f) Selecting, reviewing, approving, and evaluating the success of
corps projects.
(2) The department may partner with any other state agencies, local
institutions, nonprofit organizations, or nonprofit service corps
organizations in the administration of the corps. However, when
partnering with the Washington department of veterans affairs,
participation criteria and other administrative decisions affecting
participants in the veterans conservation corps created under chapter
43.60A RCW are to be determined by the Washington department of
veterans affairs. Other state agencies may maintain a coordinator for
the purposes of partnering with the department and the corps.
(3) If deemed practicable, the department shall work with the state
board for community and technical colleges created in RCW 28B.50.050 to
align the conservation corps program with optional career pathways for
participants that may provide instruction in basic skills in addition
to the appropriate technical training.
(4) The assignment of corps members shall not result in the
displacement of currently employed workers, including partial
displacement such as reduction in hours of nonovertime work, wages, or
other employment benefits. ((Supervising)) Agencies that participate
in the program may not terminate, lay-off, or reduce the working hours
of any employee for the purpose of using a corps member with available
funds. In circumstances where substantial efficiencies or a public
purpose may result, ((supervising)) participating agencies may use
corps members to carry out essential agency work or contractual
functions without displacing current employees.
(((3))) (5) Facilities, supplies, motor vehicles, instruments, and
tools of ((the supervising agency)) participating agencies shall be
made available for use by the conservation corps to the extent that
such use does not conflict with the normal duties of the agency. The
agency may purchase, rent, or otherwise acquire other necessary tools,
facilities, supplies, and instruments.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.220.070 and 1999 c 280 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, conservation
corps members ((shall)) must be unemployed or underemployed residents
of the state between eighteen and twenty-five years of age at the time
of enrollment who are citizens or lawful permanent residents of the
United States.
(b) The age requirements may be waived for corps leaders ((and)),
veterans, specialists with special leadership or occupational skills((;
such members shall be given special responsibility for providing
leadership, character development, and sense of community
responsibility to the corps members, groups, and work crews to which
they are assigned. The upper age requirement may be waived for
residents who have)), and participants with a sensory or mental
handicap. ((Special effort shall be made to recruit minority and
disadvantaged youth who meet selection criteria of the conservation
corps. Preference shall be given to youths residing in areas, both
urban and rural, in which there exists substantial unemployment
exceeding the state average unemployment rate.
(2) The legislature finds that people with developmental
disabilities would benefit from experiencing a meaningful work
experience, and learning the value of labor and of membership in a
productive society.
The legislature urges state agencies that are participating in the
Washington conservation corps program to consider for enrollment in the
program people who have developmental disabilities, as defined in RCW
71A.10.020.
If an agency chooses to enroll people with developmental
disabilities in its Washington conservation corps program, the agency
may apply to the United States department of labor, employment
standards administration for a special subminimum wage certificate in
order to be allowed to pay enrollees with developmental disabilities
according to their individual levels of productivity))
(2) The recruitment of conservation corps members is the primary
responsibility of the department. However, to the degree practicable,
recruitment activities must be coordinated with the following entities:
(a) The department of natural resources;
(b) The department of fish and wildlife;
(c) The state parks and recreation commission;
(d) The Washington department of veterans affairs;
(e) The employment security department;
(f) Community and technical colleges; and
(g) Any other interested postsecondary educational institutions.
(3) Recruitment efforts must be targeted to, but not limited to,
residents of the state who meet the participation eligibility
requirements provided in this section and are either:
(a) A student enrolled at a community or technical college, private
career college, or a four-year college or university;
(b) A minority or disadvantaged youth residing in an urban or rural
area of the state; or
(c) Military veterans.
(((3))) (4) Corps members shall not be considered state employees.
Other provisions of law relating to civil service, hours of work, rate
of compensation, sick leave, unemployment compensation, state
retirement plans, and vacation leave do not apply to the Washington
conservation corps except for the crew supervisors, who shall be
project employees, and the administrative and supervisory personnel.
(((4) Enrollment shall be for a period of six months which may be
extended for additional six-month periods by mutual agreement of the
corps and the corps member, not to exceed two years. Corps members
shall be reimbursed at the minimum wage rate established by state or
federal law, whichever is higher, which may be increased by up to five
percent for each additional six-month period worked: PROVIDED, That if
agencies elect to run a residential program, the appropriate costs for
room and board shall be deducted from the corps member's paycheck as
provided in chapter 43.220 RCW.
(5))) (5) Except as otherwise provided in this section,
participation as a corps member is for an initial period of three
months. The enrollment period may be extended for additional three-month periods by mutual agreement of the department and the corps
member, not to exceed two years.
(6)(a) Corps members are to be available at all times for emergency
response services coordinated through the department ((of community,
trade, and economic development)) or other public agency. Duties may
include sandbagging and flood cleanup, oil spill response, wildfire
suppression, search and rescue, and other functions in response to
emergencies.
(b) Corps members may be assigned to longer-term specialized crews
not subject to the temporal limitations of service otherwise imposed by
this section when longer-term commitments satisfy the specialized needs
of the department, an agency partner, or other service contractee.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.220.170 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 40 s 17 are each
amended to read as follows:
The services of corps members ((placed with agencies listed in RCW
43.220.020)) are exempt from unemployment compensation coverage under
RCW 50.44.040(((5))) (4) and the enrollees shall be so advised by the
department.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.220.231 and 1999 c 280 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An amount not to exceed five percent of the funds available for
the Washington conservation corps may be expended on agency
administrative costs. ((Agency administrative costs are indirect
expenses such as personnel, payroll, contract administration, fiscal
services, and other overhead costs.))
(2) An amount not to exceed twenty percent of the funds available
for the Washington conservation corps may be expended for costs
included in subsection (1) of this section and program support costs.
((Program support costs include, but are not limited to, program
planning, development of reports, job and career training, uniforms and
equipment, and standard office space and utilities. Program support
costs do not include direct scheduling and supervision of corps
members.))
(3) A minimum of eighty percent of the funds available for the
Washington conservation corps shall be expended for corps member
salaries and benefits and for direct supervision of corps members.
(4) Consistent with any fund source requirements, any state agency
using federal funds to sponsor fee-for-service Washington conservation
corps crews must contract with the Washington department of veterans
affairs for at least five percent of the federal funding to sponsor
veteran conservation corps crews operating under RCW 43.60A.150. This
requirement applies statewide.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.220.250 and 1985 c 230 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
A nonprofit corporation which contracts with ((an agency listed in
RCW 43.220.020)) the department to provide a specific service,
appropriate for the administration of this chapter which the ((agency))
department cannot otherwise provide, may be reimbursed at the
discretion of the ((agency)) department for the reasonable costs the
((agency)) department would absorb for providing those services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.220
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The director of the department of ecology and the commissioner
of public lands shall jointly host an annual meeting with other corps
program participants to serve as a forum for the partner agencies to
provide guidance and feedback concerning the management and function of
the corps.
(2) At a minimum, representatives of the following must be invited
to participate at the annual meeting: The department of fish and
wildlife; the state parks and recreation commission; the Puget Sound
partnership; the department of veterans affairs; the employment
security department; the Washington commission for national and
community service; conservation districts; the state conservation
commission; the salmon recovery funding board; the recreation and
conservation office; the department of commerce; the department of
health; or any similar successor organizations and any appropriate
nonprofit organizations, including those engaged in service corps
projects.
(3) Annual meeting participants shall, at a minimum:
(a) Review the conservation corps projects completed in the
previous year, including an analysis of successes and opportunities for
improvement; and
(b) Establish a work plan for the coming year, including the
setting of annual priorities or criteria consistent with this chapter
to guide crew development and the development of plans to pursue
funding from various sources to expand the conservation corps.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
under the subchapter heading "Part 5 Powers and Duties--General" to
read as follows:
The department shall cooperate, when appropriate, as a partner in
the Washington conservation corps established in chapter 43.220 RCW.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.60A.152 and 2007 c 451 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) The department shall collaborate with the ((state
agencies)) department of ecology and the department of natural
resources and any of its partnering agencies in implementing the
Washington conservation corps, created in chapter 43.220 RCW, to
maximize the utilization of both conservation corps programs. These
agencies shall work together to identify stewardship and maintenance
projects on ((agency-managed)) public lands that are suitable for work
by veterans conservation corps enrollees. The department may expend
funds appropriated to the veterans conservation corps program to defray
the costs of education, training, and certification associated with the
enrollees participating in such projects.
(((2) By September 30, 2007, the department, in conjunction with
the state agencies identified in subsection (1) of this section, shall
provide to the office of financial management and to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives a report that:
(a) Identifies projects on state agency-managed lands that are
currently planned for veterans conservation corps enrollee
participation;
(b) Identifies additional projects on state agency-managed lands
that are suitable for veterans conservation corps enrollee
participation and for which funding is currently in place for such
participation; and
(c) Identifies additional projects on state agency-managed lands
for which project implementation has been funded or is included in the
agency's multibiennial stewardship plans, and that are suitable for
veterans conservation corps enrollee participation in the event that
additional funding is provided to the department for associated
training, education, and certification.))

Sec. 14 RCW 79A.05.545 and 1999 c 249 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
The commission shall cooperate ((in implementing and operating
the)), when appropriate, as a partner in the Washington conservation
corps ((as required by)) established in chapter 43.220 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall cooperate, when appropriate, as a partner in
the Washington conservation corps established in chapter 43.220 RCW.

Sec. 16 RCW 77.85.130 and 2007 c 341 s 36 and 2007 c 257 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The salmon recovery funding board shall develop procedures and
criteria for allocation of funds for salmon habitat projects and salmon
recovery activities on a statewide basis to address the highest
priorities for salmon habitat protection and restoration. To the
extent practicable the board shall adopt an annual allocation of
funding. The allocation should address both protection and restoration
of habitat, and should recognize the varying needs in each area of the
state on an equitable basis. The board has the discretion to partially
fund, or to fund in phases, salmon habitat projects. The board may
annually establish a maximum amount of funding available for any
individual project, subject to available funding. No projects required
solely as a mitigation or a condition of permitting are eligible for
funding.
(2)(a) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and
activities the board shall give preference to projects that:
(i) Are based upon the limiting factors analysis identified under
RCW 77.85.060;
(ii) Provide a greater benefit to salmon recovery based upon the
stock status information contained in the department of fish and
wildlife salmonid stock inventory (SASSI), the salmon and steelhead
habitat inventory and assessment project (SSHIAP), and any comparable
science-based assessment when available;
(iii) Will benefit listed species and other fish species;
(iv) Will preserve high quality salmonid habitat;
(v) Are included in a regional or watershed-based salmon recovery
plan that accords the project, action, or area a high priority for
funding;
(vi) Are, except as provided in RCW 77.85.240, sponsored by an
entity that is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010; and
(vii) Are projects referenced in the action agenda developed by the
Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.
(b) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and
activities the board shall also give consideration to projects that:
(i) Are the most cost-effective;
(ii) Have the greatest matched or in-kind funding;
(iii) Will be implemented by a sponsor with a successful record of
project implementation;
(iv) Involve members of the Washington conservation corps
established in chapter 43.220 RCW or the veterans conservation corps
established in RCW 43.60A.150; and
(v) Are part of a regionwide list developed by lead entities.
(3) The board may reject, but not add, projects from a habitat
project list submitted by a lead entity for funding.
(4) The board shall establish criteria for determining when block
grants may be made to a lead entity. The board may provide block
grants to the lead entity to implement habitat project lists developed
under RCW 77.85.050, subject to available funding. The board shall
determine an equitable minimum amount of project funds for each
recovery region, and shall distribute the remainder of funds on a
competitive basis. The board may also provide block grants to the lead
entity or regional recovery organization to assist in carrying out
functions described under this chapter. Block grants must be expended
consistent with the priorities established for the board in subsection
(2) of this section. Lead entities or regional recovery organizations
receiving block grants under this subsection shall provide an annual
report to the board summarizing how funds were expended for activities
consistent with this chapter, including the types of projects funded,
project outcomes, monitoring results, and administrative costs.
(5) The board may waive or modify portions of the allocation
procedures and standards adopted under this section in the award of
grants or loans to conform to legislative appropriations directing an
alternative award procedure or when the funds to be awarded are from
federal or other sources requiring other allocation procedures or
standards as a condition of the board's receipt of the funds. The
board shall develop an integrated process to manage the allocation of
funding from federal and state sources to minimize delays in the award
of funding while recognizing the differences in state and legislative
appropriation timing.
(6) The board may award a grant or loan for a salmon recovery
project on private or public land when the landowner has a legal
obligation under local, state, or federal law to perform the project,
when expedited action provides a clear benefit to salmon recovery, and
there will be harm to salmon recovery if the project is delayed. For
purposes of this subsection, a legal obligation does not include a
project required solely as a mitigation or a condition of permitting.
(7) Property acquired or improved by a project sponsor may be
conveyed to a federal agency if: (a) The agency agrees to comply with
all terms of the grant or loan to which the project sponsor was
obligated; or (b) the board approves: (i) Changes in the terms of the
grant or loan, and the revision or removal of binding deed of right
instruments; and (ii) a memorandum of understanding or similar document
ensuring that the facility or property will retain, to the extent
feasible, adequate habitat protections; and (c) the appropriate
legislative authority of the county or city with jurisdiction over the
project area approves the transfer and provides notification to the
board.
(8) Any project sponsor receiving funding from the salmon recovery
funding board that is not subject to disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW
must, as a mandatory contractual prerequisite to receiving the funding,
agree to disclose any information in regards to the expenditure of that
funding as if the project sponsor was subject to the requirements of
chapter 42.56 RCW.
(9) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the
project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the
Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.220.010 (Legislative declaration) and 1983 1st ex.s. c
40 s 2;
(2) RCW 43.220.030 (Program goals) and 1999 c 280 s 2, 1987 c 367
s 1, & 1983 1st ex.s. c 40 s 3;
(3) RCW 43.220.080 (Selection of corps members -- Development of
corps program) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 40 s 8;
(4) RCW 43.220.090 (Conservation corps established in department of
ecology -- Work project areas) and 1994 c 264 s 33 & 1983 1st ex.s. c 40
s 9;
(5) RCW 43.220.120 (Conservation corps established in department of
fish and wildlife -- Work project areas) and 1999 c 280 s 6, 1994 c 264
s 34, 1988 c 36 s 24, & 1983 1st ex.s. c 40 s 12;
(6) RCW 43.220.130 (Conservation corps established in department of
natural resources -- Work project areas) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 40 s 13;
(7) RCW 43.220.160 (Conservation corps established in state parks
and recreation commission -- Work project areas) and 1999 c 249 s 702 &
1983 1st ex.s. c 40 s 16;
(8) RCW 43.220.180 (Identification of historic properties and sites
in need of rehabilitation or renovation -- Use of corps members) and 1983
1st ex.s. c 40 s 18;
(9) RCW 43.220.190 (Duties of agencies) and 1999 c 151 s 1302, 1987
c 367 s 3, & 1983 1st ex.s. c 40 s 20;
(10) RCW 43.220.210 (Selection, review, approval, and evaluation of
projects -- Recruitment, job training and placement services) and 1999 c
151 s 1303, 1987 c 367 s 4, & 1985 c 230 s 1;
(11) RCW 79A.05.500 (Declaration of purpose) and 2000 c 11 s 42,
1969 ex.s. c 96 s 1, & 1965 c 8 s 43.51.500;
(12) RCW 79A.05.505 (Youth development and conservation division
established -- Supervisory personnel) and 1999 c 249 s 1201 & 1965 c 8 s
43.51.510;
(13) RCW 79A.05.510 (Composition of youth corps -- Qualifications,
conditions, period of enrollment, etc) and 1975 c 7 s 1, 1969 ex.s. c
96 s 3, & 1965 c 8 s 43.51.530;
(14) RCW 79A.05.515 (Compensation -- Quarters -- Hospital services,
etc) and 1999 c 249 s 1202, 1982 c 70 s 1, 1975 c 7 s 2, & 1965 c 8 s
43.51.540;
(15) RCW 79A.05.520 (Laws relating to hours, conditions of
employment, civil service, etc., not applicable) and 2000 c 11 s 43 &
1965 c 8 s 43.51.550;
(16) RCW 79A.05.525 (Expenditures, gifts, government surplus
materials) and 1965 c 8 s 43.51.560;
(17) RCW 79A.05.530 (Agreements with private persons to enroll
additional people -- Commercial activities prohibited -- Authorized
closures of area) and 1975 c 7 s 3, 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 85, & 1965
c 8 s 43.51.570;
(18) RCW 79A.05.535 (Agreements with and acceptance of grants from
federal government authorized) and 2000 c 11 s 44 & 1965 ex.s. c 48 s
1; and
(19) RCW 79A.05.540 (Agreements with and acceptance of grants from
federal government authorized -- Length of enrollment and compensation in
accordance with federal standards authorized) and 2000 c 11 s 45 & 1965
ex.s. c 48 s 2.

--- END ---