BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that access to capital
is vitally important for the health, security, and well-being of all
individuals and businesses in the state. The lack of accessible
capital, as currently experienced due to the economic downturn, is
exacerbating the economic hardships faced by working families and
businesses.
The legislature further finds that it can best direct economic
development policy initiatives, build a strong and resilient economy,
and use the people's collective resources for their own benefit in an
efficient manner with an investment trust at its disposal.
The mission of the Washington investment trust is to: Promote
agriculture, education, community development, economic development,
housing, and industry in Washington state by building a resource to
help stabilize and grow Washington's economy; use the resources of the
people of Washington state within the state; support the common good
and public benefit of Washington state; and leverage Washington's
financial capital and resources. It may work in partnership with
financial institutions, community-based organizations, economic
development groups, guaranty agencies, and other stakeholder groups.
Transparency, accountability, and accuracy of financial reporting and
compliance with all applicable laws and rules are crucial to sound
fiscal management of the institution to meet its long-term objectives.
It is the intent of the legislature that all state funds be
deposited in the Washington investment trust and be guaranteed by the
state and used to promote the common good and public benefit of all the
people and their businesses within Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1)(a) The investment trust blue ribbon
founding task force is established, with members as provided in this
subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(iii) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives jointly shall appoint members representing a small
sized state-chartered bank, a medium sized state-chartered bank, a
federally chartered bank, local governments, and four citizens with a
background in financial issues.
(iv) The director, the treasurer, and the governor, or their
designees, shall be members of the task force.
(b) The task force shall choose its chair from among its
membership. The legislative members of the task force shall convene
the initial meeting of the task force within thirty days after the
effective date of this section.
(2) The task force shall create an implementation plan for the
trust and review and make recommendations on the following issues:
(a) A strategic five-year plan aligned with the mission of the
trust;
(b) Capital requirements of the trust;
(c) Sound underwriting practices for the trust;
(d) Standards to ensure that loans result in the outcomes described
in the approved loan applications;
(e) Content and other requirements for quarterly reports submitted
by the trust to the commission;
(f) Transition of state banking functions to the trust;
(g) A timeline for depositing state moneys into the trust;
(h) Cash management and banking needs of the state;
(i) Transparency requirements for trust operations;
(j) Ethics and conflict of interest requirements for the
commission, the board, and officers and employees of the trust;
(k) Additional necessary legislation; and
(l) Initial capitalization options for the trust.
(3) Staff support for the task force must be provided by the senate
committee services and the house of representatives office of program
research.
(4) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) The expenses of the task force must be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives. Task force expenditures are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house of representatives executive rules committee, or their
successor committees.
(6) The task force shall report its findings, recommendations, and
implementation plan to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2011.
(7) The task force may contract with additional persons who have
specific technical expertise if the expertise is necessary to carry out
the mandates of the review and development of the implementation plan.
The task force may accept gifts, grants, loans, or other aid from
public or private entities to contract with additional persons.
(8) The task force, where appropriate, may consult with individuals
from the public and private sector or ask the individuals to establish
an advisory committee. Members of such an advisory committee are not
entitled to expense reimbursement.
(9) The department and the treasurer shall cooperate with the task
force and provide information as the chair may reasonably request.
(10) This section expires June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the advisory board of the Washington investment
trust.
(2) "Commission" means the investment trust commission.
(3) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(4) "Director" means the director of the department of financial
institutions.
(5) "State-chartered bank" means any corporation organized under
the laws of this state that is engaged in banking, other than a trust
company, savings association, or a mutual savings bank. It does not
include the Washington investment trust.
(6) "State moneys" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.85.200.
(7) "Treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of Washington.
(8) "Trust" means the Washington investment trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The Washington investment trust is created.
The purposes of the trust are to:
(1) Support the economic development of Washington by increasing
access to capital for businesses and farms within Washington;
(2) Provide financing for housing development, public works
infrastructure, educational infrastructure, student loans, and
community quality of life projects;
(3) Provide stability to the local financial sector;
(4) Reduce the costs paid by the state of Washington for banking
services;
(5) Lend capital to banks, credit unions, and nonprofit community
development financial institutions to assist in meeting their goals of
increasing access to capital and providing banking services; and
(6) Return earnings, beyond those necessary for continued sound
operation of the trust as determined by the commission, to the state
general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The governor, the lieutenant governor,
and the treasurer comprise the commission.
(2) The commission may adopt rules regarding the:
(a) Objectives of the trust;
(b) Criteria for evaluating and approving loans;
(c) Individual and aggregate lending limits for one borrower; and
(d) Eligibility for borrowing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The commission shall commence trust
operations, according to the implementation plan developed by the task
force under section 4 of this act, by January 1, 2013. The trust must
be fully operational by July 1, 2013.
(2) The treasurer shall deposit all state moneys in the trust by
June 30, 2015. All income earned by the trust on state moneys that are
deposited in or invested with the trust must be credited to and become
a part of the revenues and income of the trust.
(3) The trust shall return earnings, beyond those necessary for
continued sound operation of the trust as determined by the commission,
to the state general fund on an annual basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The commission shall appoint a president and
other officers who have relevant experience in the banking sector for
the positions for which they are appointed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The trust may make loans that are in the
public interest and according to sound banking practices, subject to
the limitations in this chapter and any rules adopted by the
commission. The trust may charge the same terms for a loan or
extension of credit as a state-chartered bank under RCW 30.04.025 and
exercise any other power or authority permissible to a state-chartered
bank under RCW 30.08.140. The trust may invest state moneys in any
manner that ensures appropriate cash management. The trust may not
make a loan to any board member, the president, or any officer of the
trust and must follow applicable ethical requirements in rules adopted
by the commission.
(2) The trust may purchase, guarantee, or hold loans made by other
financial institutions that are in the public interest and according to
sound banking practices.
(3) For financial institutions that make the trust a reserve
depositary, the trust may perform the functions and render the services
of a clearinghouse, including all facilities for providing domestic and
foreign exchange, and may rediscount paper, on such terms as the
commission shall determine.
(4) The trust may receive deposits from any source and deposit its
funds in any trust or other financial institution.
(5) The trust may establish lending programs to support public
purposes, including those that:
(a) Improve access to credit for Washington businesses and farms;
(b) Promote sustainable agriculture, renewable energy,
conservation, energy efficiency, sustainable mining, industry and
manufacturing, tourism, public transportation, and community
involvement;
(c) Provide resources for infrastructure development;
(d) Finance affordable housing and support personal home mortgages
and default protection;
(e) Expand student loans, educational infrastructure, and
individual development accounts; and
(f) Finance job creation programs, including green economy jobs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1)(a) The advisory board is established,
with fifteen members as provided in this subsection.
(i) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate.
(ii) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives.
(iii) The governor shall appoint, subject to senate confirmation,
eleven nonlegislative members. These members must include
representatives of the state's financial, agricultural, housing,
economic development, infrastructure, labor, and education sectors.
(b) The board shall choose its chair from among its membership.
(2)(a) The term of the legislative members is three years.
(b) The term of the nonlegislative members is three years. Five of
the initial board members must be appointed to serve an initial term of
three years, three must be appointed to serve an initial term of two
years, and the three remaining members must be appointed to serve an
initial term of one year. All subsequent terms are three years. To
ensure that the board can continue to act, a member whose term expires
shall continue to serve until his or her replacement is appointed. In
the case of any vacancy on the board for any reason, the governor shall
appoint a new member to serve out the term of the person whose position
has become vacant. A board member may be removed for cause by the
governor.
(3) Legislative members of the task force must be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative
members, except those representing an employer or organization, are
entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The board must meet regularly to review the trust's finances
and its members shall participate in committees created by the
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The trust must maintain capital adequacy
and other standard indicators of safety and soundness monitored by the
department. The director may examine the trust in the same manner as
a state-chartered financial institution under RCW 30.04.060. The trust
must pay the director for the reasonable costs of examinations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The trust shall submit quarterly
reports, in the manner established by the task force under section 4 of
this act, to the commission.
(2) The commission shall make a report to the legislature on the
affairs of the trust by December 1st of each year. The report must
include any recommendations for legislative action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 All deposits in the trust are guaranteed by
the state. The trust is exempt from payment of all fees and taxes
levied by the state or any of its subdivisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The trust may accept deposits of public
funds, but is exempt from the requirements of chapter 39.58 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The total compensation of any trust
employee may not exceed ten times the average salary of all other
employees or one thousand percent of the federal poverty level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) Under RCW 42.56.270 and 42.56.400,
certain trust business records, records of the commission, and records
of the department relating to the trust are exempt from public
disclosure.
(2) Financial and commercial information and records submitted to
either the department or the commission for the purpose of
administering this chapter may be shared between the department and the
treasurer. These records may also be used in any suit or
administrative hearing involving any provision of this chapter.
(3) This section does not prohibit:
(a) The issuance of general statements based on the reports of
persons subject to this chapter as long as the statements do not
identify the information furnished by any person; or
(b) The publication by the director or the commission of the name
of any person violating this chapter and a statement of the manner of
the violation of that person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 39.58 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington investment trust established in section 4 of this
act may accept deposits of public funds, but is not a public depositary
and is not subject to the requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 17 RCW 42.56.270 and 2009 c 394 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, 43.---
(the new chapter created in section 19 of this act), and 43.168 RCW, or
during application for economic development loans or program services
provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce pursuant to RCW 43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce or the office of the governor in connection with
the siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that
person's business and until a siting decision is made, identifying
information of any person supplying information under this subsection
and the locations being considered for siting, relocation, or expansion
of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce based on information as described in
(a)(i) of this subsection, any work product is not exempt from
disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))
commerce from a person connected with siting, recruitment, expansion,
retention, or relocation of that person's business, information
described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be available to the public
under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information;
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business; and
(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained
by the University of Washington, other than information the university
is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information
relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to
result in private loss to the providers of this information.

Sec. 18 RCW 42.56.400 and 2010 c 172 s 2 and 2010 c 97 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The following information relating to insurance and financial
institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals
that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed
with the board under RCW 7.68.110;
(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW;
(3) The names and individual identification data of either all
owners or all insureds, or both, received by the insurance commissioner
under chapter 48.102 RCW;
(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;
(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535,
48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600
through 48.46.625;
(6) Examination reports and information obtained by the department
of financial institutions from banks under RCW 30.04.075, from savings
banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW
33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from the Washington
investment trust under chapter 43.--- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 19 of this act), from check cashers and sellers under RCW
31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and investment advisers under
RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential and privileged information;
(7) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW
48.110.040(3);
(8) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and
privileged;
(9) Confidential proprietary and trade secret information provided
to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050 and
48.31C.070;
(10) Data filed under RCW 48.140.020, 48.140.030, 48.140.050, and
7.70.140 that, alone or in combination with any other data, may reveal
the identity of a claimant, health care provider, health care facility,
insuring entity, or self-insurer involved in a particular claim or a
collection of claims. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).
(b) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(6).
(c) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(7).
(d) "Insuring entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(8).
(e) "Self-insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(11);
(11) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.135.060;
(12) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.060;
(13) Confidential and privileged documents obtained or produced by
the insurance commissioner and identified in RCW 48.37.080;
(14) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.140;
(15) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.17.595;
(16) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.102.051(1) and 48.102.140 (3) and (7)(a)(ii);
(17) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner in the commissioner's capacity as receiver under RCW
48.31.025 and 48.99.017, which are records under the jurisdiction and
control of the receivership court. The commissioner is not required to
search for, log, produce, or otherwise comply with the public records
act for any records that the commissioner obtains under chapters 48.31
and 48.99 RCW in the commissioner's capacity as a receiver, except as
directed by the receivership court; and
(18) Data, information, and documents provided by a carrier
pursuant to section 1, chapter 172, Laws of 2010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Sections 3 through 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Sections 4 through 18 of this act take
effect December 1, 2011.

--- END ---