BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.520.020 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 113 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a fund known as the federal forest revolving
account. The state treasurer, who shall be custodian of the revolving
account, shall deposit into the revolving account the funds for each
county received by the state in accordance with Title 16, section 500,
United States Code. The state treasurer shall distribute these moneys
to the counties according to the determined proportional area. The
county legislative authority shall expend fifty percent of the money
for the benefit of the public roads and other public purposes as
authorized by federal statute or public schools of such county and not
otherwise. Disbursements by the counties of the remaining fifty
percent of the money shall be as authorized by the superintendent of
public instruction, or the superintendent's designee, and shall occur
in the manner provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) No later than thirty days following receipt of the funds from
the federal government, the superintendent of public instruction shall
apportion moneys distributed to counties for schools to public school
districts in the respective counties in proportion to the number of
resident full-time equivalent students enrolled in each public school
district to the number of resident full-time equivalent students
enrolled in public schools in the county. In apportioning these funds,
the superintendent of public instruction shall utilize the October
enrollment count.
(3) If the amount received by any public school district pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section is less than the basic education
allocation to which the district would otherwise be entitled, the
superintendent of public instruction shall apportion to the district,
in the manner provided by RCW 28A.510.250, an amount which shall be the
difference between the amount received pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section and the basic education allocation to which the district
would otherwise be entitled.
(4) All federal forest funds shall be expended in accordance with
the requirements of Title 16, section 500, United States Code, as now
existing or hereafter amended.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules no
later than June 30, 2011, regarding the definition of resident for
purposes of this chapter, and the rules shall consider and address the
impact of alternative learning experience students on federal funds
distribution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect September 1, 2011.

--- END ---