BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.34.215 and 2009 c 504 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As limited in subsection (3) of this section, a watershed
management partnership formed or qualified under the authority of RCW
39.34.200 and 39.34.210, including the separate legal entity
established by such a partnership under RCW 39.34.030(3)(b) to conduct
the cooperative undertaking of the partnership under the same statutory
authority, may exercise the power of eminent domain as provided in
chapter 8.12 RCW.
(2) The eminent domain authority granted under subsection (1) of
this section may be exercised only for those utility purposes for which
the watershed partnership was formed and is limited solely to providing
water services to its customers.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section applies only to a watershed
management partnership that:
(a) Was formed or qualified before July 1, 2006, under the
authority of RCW 39.34.200 and 39.34.210;
(b) Is not engaged in planning or in implementing a plan for a
water resource inventory area under the terms of chapter 90.82 RCW;
(c) Is composed entirely of cities and water-sewer districts
authorized to exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner
provided by chapter 8.12 RCW; and
(d) Is governed by a board of directors consisting entirely of
elected officials from the cities and water-sewer districts that
constitute the watershed management partnership.
(4) A watershed management partnership exercising authority under
this section shall:
(a) Comply with the notice requirements of RCW 8.25.290; and
(b) Provide notice to the city, town, or county with jurisdiction
over the subject property by certified mail thirty days prior to the
partnership board authorizing condemnation((; and
(c) With any city that is not a member of the watershed management
partnership and that has water or sewer service areas within one-half
mile of Lake Tapps or water or sewer service areas within five miles
upstream from Lake Tapps along the White river, enter into an
interlocal agreement to allow eminent domain within that city prior to
exercising eminent domain authority under this section.
(5) The legislature is currently unaware of any information
suggesting that the expected use by the watershed management
partnership of the Lake Tapps water supply will have a significantly
adverse effect on surrounding communities. However, if the watershed
management partnership's Lake Tapps water supply operations result in
a negative impact to the water supplies of a city that is not a member
of the watershed management partnership and the city has water or sewer
service areas within one-half mile of Lake Tapps or water or sewer
service areas within five miles upstream from Lake Tapps along the
White river, the city claiming a negative impact under this subsection
must notify the watershed management partnership of their claim and
give the partnership at least sixty days to resolve the claimed impact.
If the watershed management partnership fails to resolve the claimed
negative impact or disputes that the negative impact exists, the city
claiming the negative impact under this subsection may pursue existing
legal remedies in accordance with state and federal law. If a court
determines that a negative impact has occurred as provided under this
subsection, the watershed management partnership shall implement a
remedy acceptable to the claiming city. If the affected city or cities
and the watershed management partnership cannot agree on the terms
required under this subsection, the court shall establish the terms for
the remedy required under this subsection)).

--- END ---