BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The criminal justice training commission shall ensure that
issues related to motorcycle profiling are addressed in basic law
enforcement training and offered to in-service law enforcement officers
in conjunction with existing training regarding profiling.
(2) Local law enforcement agencies shall add a statement condemning
motorcycle profiling to existing policies regarding profiling.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "motorcycle profiling" means
the illegal use of the fact that a person rides a motorcycle or wears
motorcycle-related paraphernalia as a factor in deciding to stop and
question, take enforcement action, arrest, or search a person or
vehicle with or without a legal basis under the United States
Constitution or Washington state Constitution.

--- END ---