BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a consolidation
of fish and wildlife enforcement officers into the Washington state
patrol would be beneficial to the citizens of the state by providing
many opportunities to increase state government efficiency and improve
the protection and conservation of the state's fish and wildlife
resources. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to transfer
fish and wildlife enforcement authorities, duties, and enforcement
personnel from the department of fish and wildlife to the Washington
state patrol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On July 1, 2012, the Washington state patrol assumes the
authority and responsibility to enforce the provisions of Title 77 RCW
and the rules adopted thereunder.
(2) On July 1, 2012, all fish and wildlife officers and other
personnel directly engaged in the enforcement of Title 77 RCW and the
rules adopted thereunder are transferred to and become employees of the
Washington state patrol.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All fish and wildlife officers and other personnel directly
engaged in the enforcement of this title and the rules adopted under
this title are employed, supervised, and controlled by the chief of the
Washington state patrol, who shall be the chief official charged with
enforcement of this title.
(2) All references to the director or the department in this title
mean the chief of the Washington state patrol or the Washington state
patrol when referring to the law enforcement functions transferred
under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of fish and
wildlife pertaining to fish and wildlife officers and personnel
directly engaged in the enforcement of Title 77 RCW and rules adopted
thereunder are transferred to the Washington state patrol. All
references to the director or the department of fish and wildlife in
the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the chief of
the Washington state patrol or the Washington state patrol when
referring to the functions transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of fish
and wildlife pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the Washington state
patrol. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and
other tangible property employed by the department of fish and wildlife
in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
made available to the Washington state patrol. All funds, credits, or
other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be assigned to the Washington state patrol.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of fish and wildlife
for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall,
on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to
the Washington state patrol.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of fish and wildlife engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the Washington state patrol. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are assigned to the Washington state patrol to perform their usual
duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights,
subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance
with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
fish and wildlife pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the Washington state
patrol. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full
force and shall be performed by the Washington state patrol.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of fish and wildlife shall not affect the validity of
any act performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The chief of the Washington state patrol
must:
(a) Establish a transition plan for the orderly implementation of
this act, including: Identifying the fish and wildlife enforcement
program personnel to be transferred; addressing personnel issues
relating to the transfer; and facilitating the transfer of property and
equipment, records, contracts, and funding from the department of fish
and wildlife to the Washington state patrol. The chief of the
Washington state patrol must consult with the department of fish and
wildlife, department of personnel, office of financial management, and
representatives of fish and wildlife officers and Washington state
patrol officers in developing the transition plan; and
(b) Present recommendations to the legislature, in the form of
draft legislation, regarding any statutory changes necessary to
implement this act.
(2) The transition plan and recommendations required by subsection
(1) of this section must be presented to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by November 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 through 4 of this act take effect
July 1, 2012.

--- END ---