BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.20.780 and 2007 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of transportation shall develop a process for
awarding competitively bid highway construction contracts for projects
over ((ten)) five million dollars that may be constructed using a
design- build procedure. As used in this section and RCW 47.20.785,
"design- build procedure" means a method of contracting under which the
department of transportation contracts with another party for the party
to both design and build the structures, facilities, and other items
specified in the contract.
The process developed by the department must, at a minimum, include
the scope of services required under the design-build procedure,
contractor prequalification requirements, criteria for evaluating
technical information and project costs, contractor selection criteria,
and issue resolution procedures.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.20.785 and 2006 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of transportation may use the design-build
procedure for public works projects over ten million dollars where:
(a) The construction activities are highly specialized and a
design-build approach is critical in developing the construction
methodology; or
(b) The projects selected provide opportunity for greater
innovation and efficiencies between the designer and the builder; or
(c) Significant savings in project delivery time would be realized.
(2) ((To test the applicability of the design-build procedure on
smaller projects and specialty projects, the department may conduct up
to five pilot projects on projects that cost between two and ten
million dollars. The department shall evaluate these pilot projects
with respect to cost, time to complete, efficiencies gained, if any,
and other pertinent information to facilitate analysis regarding the
further use of the design-build process on projects of this size.))
Each biennium, the department shall report to the legislature on:
(a) Any design-build process improvements that enabled the
department to deliver projects more efficiently; and
(b) The performance of its design-build processes with respect to
keeping projects within scope, schedule, and budget.

--- END ---