BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the motor
vehicle fuel tax is the primary source of funding for the state's
transportation system. As the state's fleet changes from motor
vehicles powered by traditional sources, such as gasoline and diesel,
to those powered by electricity, the ability of the state to fund the
maintenance and preservation of the transportation system is
compromised. In order to mitigate the impacts of the diminishing motor
vehicle fuel tax, and to create a system where each driver pays for a
fair portion of his or her use of the road, an additional fee is
imposed on electric vehicles.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Before accepting an application for an annual vehicle
registration renewal for an electric vehicle that uses propulsion units
powered solely by electricity, the department, county auditor or other
agent, or subagent appointed by the director must require the applicant
to pay a one hundred dollar fee in addition to any other fees and taxes
required by law. The one hundred dollar fee is due only at the time of
annual registration renewal.
(2) This section only applies to:
(a) A vehicle that is designed to have the capability to drive at
a speed of more than thirty-five miles per hour; and
(b) An annual vehicle registration renewal that is due on or after
February 1, 2013.
(3)(a) The fee under this section is imposed to provide funds to
mitigate the impact of vehicles on state roads and highways, and is
separate and distinct from other vehicle license fees. Proceeds from
the fee must be used for highway purposes, and must be deposited in the
motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070, subject to (b) of this
subsection.
(b) If in any year the amount of proceeds from the fee collected
under this section exceeds one million dollars, the excess amount over
one million dollars must be deposited as follows:
(i) Seventy percent to the motor vehicle fund created in RCW
46.68.070;
(ii) Fifteen percent to the transportation improvement account
created in RCW 47.26.084; and
(iii) Fifteen percent to the rural arterial trust account created
in RCW 36.79.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 2 of this act expires on the
effective date of legislation enacted by the legislature that imposes
a vehicle miles traveled fee or tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department of licensing must provide
written notice of the expiration date of section 2 of this act to
affected parties, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the
secretary of the senate, the office of the code reviser, and others as
deemed appropriate by the department.

--- END ---