BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.405 and 1987 c 397 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever the secretary of transportation shall determine, upon the
basis of an engineering and traffic investigation which must be
completed within sixty days, that any maximum speed hereinbefore set
forth is greater than is reasonable or safe with respect to a state
highway under the conditions found to exist at any intersection or upon
any other part of the state highway system or at state ferry terminals,
or that a general reduction of any maximum speed set forth in RCW
46.61.400 is necessary in order to comply with a national maximum speed
limit, the secretary may determine and declare a reasonable and safe
lower maximum limit or a lower maximum limit which will comply with a
national maximum speed limit, for any state highway, the entire state
highway system, or any portion thereof, which shall be effective when
appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected. Public safety,
and input provided by the applicable local jurisdictions impacted by
the existing and proposed speed limits, shall be accorded paramount
weight in any engineering and traffic investigation conducted under
this section. The secretary may also fix and regulate the speed of
vehicles on any state highway within the maximum speed limit allowed by
this chapter for special occasions including, but not limited to, local
parades and other special events. Any such maximum speed limit may be
declared to be effective at all times or at such times as are indicated
upon the said signs; and differing limits may be established for
different times of day, different types of vehicles, varying weather
conditions, and other factors bearing on safe speeds, which shall be
effective (((a) [(1)])) (1) when posted upon appropriate fixed or
variable signs or (((b) [(2)])) (2) if a maximum limit is established
for auto stages which is lower than the limit for automobiles, the auto
stage speed limit shall become effective thirty days after written
notice thereof is mailed in the manner provided in subsection (4) of
RCW 46.61.410, as now or hereafter amended.

--- END ---