BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
FINDINGS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 FINDINGS. (1) Recognizing that
uncoordinated and poorly planned growth poses a threat to the
environment, sustainable economic development, and the health, safety,
and high quality of life enjoyed by residents of this state, the
legislature passed the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW. The
planning goals adopted through the growth management act encourage
development in urban areas where public facilities and services exist
or can be provided efficiently, conservation of productive forest and
agricultural lands, and a reduction of sprawl.
(2) Under RCW 36.70A.090 and 43.362.005 the legislature has
encouraged:
(a) The use of innovative land use management techniques, including
the transfer of development rights, to meet growth management goals;
and
(b) The creation of a regional transfer of development rights
marketplace in the central Puget Sound to assist in conserving
agricultural and forest land, as well as other lands of state or
regional priority.
(3) The legislature finds that:
(a) Local governments are in need of additional resources to
provide public infrastructure to meet the needs of a growing
population, and that public infrastructure is fundamental to community
health, safety, and economic vitality. Investment in public
infrastructure in growing urban areas supports growth management goals,
encourages the redevelopment of underutilized or blighted urban areas,
stimulates business activity and helps create jobs, lowers the cost of
housing, promotes efficient land use, and improves residents' quality
of life;
(b) Transferring development rights from agricultural and forest
lands to urban areas where public facilities and services exist or can
be provided efficiently and cost-effectively will ensure vibrant,
economically viable communities. Directing growth to communities where
people can live close to where they work or have access to
transportation choices will also advance state goals regarding climate
change by reducing vehicle miles traveled and by reducing fuel
consumption and emissions that contribute to climate change. Directing
growth to these communities will further help avoid the impacts of
storm water runoff to Puget Sound by avoiding impervious surfaces
associated with development in watershed uplands;
(c) A transfer of development rights marketplace is particularly
appropriate for conserving agricultural and forest land of long-term
commercial significance. Transferring the development rights from
these lands of statewide importance to cities will help achieve a
specific goal of the growth management act by keeping them in farming
and forestry, thereby helping ensure these remain viable industries in
counties experiencing population growth. Transferring growth from
agricultural and forest land of long-term commercial significance will
also reduce costs to the counties that otherwise would be responsible
for the provision of infrastructure and services for development on
these lands, which are generally further from existing infrastructure
and services; and
(d) The state and its residents benefit from investment in public
infrastructure that is associated with urban growth facilitated by the
transfer of development from agricultural and forest lands of long-term
commercial significance. These activities advance multiple state
growth management goals and benefit the state and local economies. It
is in the public interest to enable local governments to finance such
infrastructure investments and to incentivize development right
transfers in the central Puget Sound through this chapter.

PART II
DEFINITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Assessed value" means the valuation of taxable real property
as placed on the last completed assessment roll.
(2) "Eligible county" means any county that borders Puget Sound,
that has a population of six hundred thousand or more, and that has an
established program for transfer of development rights.
(3) "Employment" means total employment in a county or city, as
applicable, estimated by the office of financial management.
(4) "Exchange rate" means an increment of development beyond what
base zoning allows that is assigned to a development right by a
sponsoring city for use in a receiving area.
(5) "Local infrastructure project area" means the geographic area
identified by a sponsoring city under section 601 of this act.
(6) "Local infrastructure project financing" means the use of local
property tax allocation revenue distributed to the sponsoring city to
pay or finance public improvement costs within the local infrastructure
project area in accordance with section 701 of this act.
(7) "Local property tax allocation revenue" means those tax
revenues derived from the receipt of regular property taxes levied on
the property tax allocation revenue value and used for local
infrastructure project financing.
(8) "Participating taxing district" means a taxing district that:
(a) Has a local infrastructure project area wholly or partially
within the taxing district's geographic boundaries; and
(b) Levies, or has levied on behalf of the taxing district, regular
property taxes as defined in this section.
(9) "Population" means the population of a city or county, as
applicable, estimated by the office of financial management.
(10) "Property tax allocation revenue base value" means the
assessed value of real property located within a local infrastructure
project area, less the property tax allocation revenue value.
(11)(a)(i) "Property tax allocation revenue value" means an amount
equal to the sponsoring city ratio multiplied by seventy-five percent
of any increase in the assessed value of real property in a local
infrastructure project area resulting from:
(A) The placement of new construction, improvements to property, or
both, on the assessment roll, where the new construction and
improvements are initiated after the local infrastructure project area
is created by the sponsoring city;
(B) The cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when the cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as provided in RCW
84.14.020, and the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements are initiated after the local
infrastructure project area is created by the sponsoring city;
(C) The cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when the cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW as
provided in RCW 84.26.070, and the rehabilitation is initiated after
the local infrastructure project area is created by the sponsoring
city.
(ii) Increases in the assessed value of real property resulting
from (a)(i)(A) through (C) of this subsection are included in the
property tax allocation revenue value in the initial year. These same
amounts are also included in the property tax allocation revenue value
in subsequent years unless the property becomes exempt from property
taxation.
(b) "Property tax allocation revenue value" includes an amount
equal to the sponsoring city ratio multiplied by seventy-five percent
of any increase in the assessed value of new construction consisting of
an entire building in the years following the initial year, unless the
building becomes exempt from property taxation.
(c) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "property tax
allocation revenue value" does not include any increase in the assessed
value of real property after the initial year.
(d) There is no property tax allocation revenue value if the
assessed value of real property in a local infrastructure project area
has not increased as a result of any of the reasons specified in
(a)(i)(A) through (C) of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, "initial year" means:
(i) For new construction and improvements to property added to the
assessment roll, the year during which the new construction and
improvements are initially placed on the assessment roll;
(ii) For the cost of new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements, when the cost is treated as new
construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW, the year when the cost
is treated as new construction for purposes of levying taxes for
collection in the following year; and
(iii) For the cost of rehabilitation of historic property, when the
cost is treated as new construction for purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW,
the year when such cost is treated as new construction for purposes of
levying taxes for collection in the following year.
(12)(a) "Public improvements" means:
(i) Infrastructure improvements within the local infrastructure
project area that include:
(A) Street, road, bridge, and rail construction and maintenance;
(B) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;
(C) Sidewalks, streetlights, landscaping, and streetscaping;
(D) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(E) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority and other
facilities that support transit-oriented development;
(F) Park facilities, recreational areas, bicycle paths, and
environmental remediation;
(G) Storm water and drainage management systems;
(H) Electric, gas, fiber, and other utility infrastructures; and
(ii) Expenditures for facilities and improvements that support
affordable housing as defined in RCW 43.185A.010;
(iii) Providing maintenance and security for common or public areas
in the local infrastructure project area; or
(iv) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW
35.21.395.
(b) Public improvements do not include the acquisition by a
sponsoring city of transferable development rights.
(13) "Real property" has the same meaning as in RCW 84.04.090 and
also includes any privately owned improvements located on publicly
owned land that are subject to property taxation.
(14)(a) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as
defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (i) Regular property taxes levied by
public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making
required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness;
(ii) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of
common schools under RCW 84.52.065; and (iii) regular property taxes
authorized by RCW 84.55.050 that are limited to a specific purpose.
(b) "Regular property taxes" do not include excess property tax
levies that are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior
taxing districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.
(15) "Receiving areas," for purposes of this chapter, are those
designated lands within local infrastructure project areas in which
transferable development rights from sending areas may be used.
(16) "Receiving city" means any incorporated city with population
plus employment equal to twenty-two thousand five hundred or greater
within an eligible county.
(17) "Receiving city allocated share" means the total number of
transferable development rights from agricultural and forest land of
long-term commercial significance and rural zoned lands designated
under section 303 of this act within the eligible counties allocated to
a receiving city under section 305 (1) and (2) of this act.
(18) "Sending areas" means those lands within an eligible county
that meet conservation criteria as described in sections 301 and 303 of
this act.
(19) "Sponsoring city" means a receiving city that accepts all or
a portion of its receiving city allocated share, adopts a plan for
development of infrastructure within one or more proposed local
infrastructure project areas in accordance with section 401 of this
act, and creates one or more local infrastructure project areas, as
specified in section 305(4) of this act.
(20) "Sponsoring city allocated share" means the total number of
transferable development rights a sponsoring city agrees to accept,
under section 305(4) of this act, from agricultural and forest land of
long-term commercial significance and rural zoned lands designated
under section 303 of this act within the eligible counties, plus the
total number of transferable development rights transferred to the
sponsoring city from another receiving city under section 305(5) of
this act.
(21) "Sponsoring city ratio" means the ratio of the sponsoring city
specified portion to the sponsoring city allocated share.
(22) "Sponsoring city specified portion" means the portion of a
sponsoring city allocated share which may be used within one or more
local infrastructure project areas, as set forth in the sponsoring
city's plan for development of infrastructure under section 401 of this
act.
(23) "Taxing district" means a city or county that levies, or has
levied on behalf of the city or county, regular property taxes upon
real property located within a local infrastructure project area.
(24) "Transfer of development rights" includes methods for
protecting land from development by voluntarily removing the
development rights from a sending area and transferring them to one or
more receiving areas for the purpose of increasing development density
or intensity.
(25) "Transferable development rights" means a right to develop one
or more residential units in a sending area that can be sold and
transferred.

PART III
SENDING AREAS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 DESIGNATION OF SENDING AREAS--INCLUSION OF
AGRICULTURAL AND FOREST LAND OF LONG-TERM COMMERCIAL SIGNIFICANCE. An
eligible county must designate all agricultural and forest land of
long-term commercial significance within its jurisdiction as sending
areas for conservation under the eligible county's program for transfer
of development rights. The development rights from all such
agricultural and forest land of long-term commercial significance
within the eligible counties must be available for transfer to
receiving cities under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS FROM AGRICULTURAL AND
FOREST LAND OF LONG-TERM COMMERCIAL SIGNIFICANCE. (1) An eligible
county must calculate the number of development rights from
agricultural and forest land of long-term commercial significance that
are eligible for transfer to receiving areas. An eligible county must
determine transferable development rights for allocation purposes in
this program by:
(a) Base zoning in effect as of January 1, 2011; or
(b) An allocation other than base zoning as reflected by an
eligible county's transfer of development rights program or an
interlocal agreement with a receiving city in effect as of January 1,
2011.
(2) The number of transferable development rights includes the
development rights from agricultural and forest lands of long-term
commercial significance that have been previously issued under the
eligible county's program for transfer of development rights, but that
have not as yet been utilized to increase density or intensity in a
development as of January 1, 2011.
(3) The number of transferable development rights does not include
development rights from agricultural and forest lands of long-term
commercial significance that have previously been removed or
extinguished, such as through an existing conservation easement, except
when consistent with subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 DESIGNATION OF SENDING AREAS--INCLUSION OF
RURAL ZONED LANDS UNDER CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. (1) Subject to the
requirements of this section, an eligible county may designate a
portion of its rural zoned lands as sending areas for conservation
under the eligible county's program for transfer of development rights
available for transfer to receiving cities under this chapter.
(2) An eligible county may designate rural zoned lands as available
for transfer to receiving cities under this chapter only if, and at
such time as, fifty percent or more of the total acreage of land
classified as agricultural and forest land of long-term commercial
significance in the county, as of January 1, 2011, has been protected
through either a permanent conservation easement, ownership in fee by
the county for land protection or conservation purposes, or ownership
in fee by a nongovernmental land conservation organization.
(3) To be designated as available for transfer to receiving cities
under this chapter, rural zoned lands must either:
(a) Be identified by the county as top conservation priorities
because they:
(i) Provide ecological effectiveness in achieving water resource
inventory area goals;
(ii) Provide contiguous habitat protection, are adjacent to already
protected habitat areas, or improve ecological function;
(iii) Are of sufficient size and location in the landscape to yield
strategic growth management benefits;
(iv) Provide improved access for regional recreational opportunity;
(v) Prevent forest fragmentation or are appropriate for forest
management;
(vi) Provide flood protection or reduce flood risk; or
(vii) Have other attributes that meet natural resource preservation
program priorities; or
(b) Be identified by the state or in regional conservation plans as
highly important to the water quality of Puget Sound.
(4) The portion of rural zoned lands in an eligible county
designated as sending areas for conservation under the eligible
county's program for transfer of development rights available for
transfer to receiving cities under this chapter must not exceed one
thousand five hundred development rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 DETERMINATION OF TOTAL NUMBER OF
TRANSFERABLE DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS FOR AGRICULTURAL AND FOREST LAND OF
LONG-TERM COMMERCIAL SIGNIFICANCE AND DESIGNATED RURAL ZONED LANDS. On
or before September 1, 2011, each eligible county must report to the
Puget Sound regional council the total number of transferable
development rights from agricultural and forest land of long-term
commercial significance and designated rural zoned lands within the
eligible county that may be available for allocation to receiving
cities under this chapter, as determined under sections 302 and 303 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 ALLOCATION AMONG LOCAL GOVERNMENTS OF
TRANSFERABLE DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS FROM AGRICULTURAL AND FOREST LAND OF
LONG-TERM COMMERCIAL SIGNIFICANCE AND DESIGNATED RURAL ZONED LANDS.
(1) The Puget Sound regional council must allocate among receiving
cities the total number of development rights reported by eligible
counties under section 304 of this act. Each receiving city allocated
share must be determined by the Puget Sound regional council, in
consultation with eligible counties and receiving cities, based on
growth targets, determined by established growth management processes,
and other relevant factors as determined by the Puget Sound regional
council in conjunction with the counties and receiving cities.
(2) The Puget Sound regional council must report to each receiving
city its receiving city allocated share on or before March 1, 2012.
(3) The Puget Sound regional council must report each receiving
city allocated share to the department of commerce on or before March
1, 2012.
(4) A receiving city may become a sponsoring city by accepting all
or a portion of its receiving city allocated share, adopting a plan in
accordance with section 401 of this act, and creating one or more local
infrastructure project areas to pay or finance costs of public
improvements.
(5) A receiving city may, by interlocal agreement, transfer all or
a portion of its receiving city allocated share to another sponsoring
city. The transferred portion of the receiving city allocated share
must be included in the other sponsoring city allocated share.

PART IV
RECEIVING AREAS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 DEVELOPMENT PLAN FOR INFRASTRUCTURE. (1)
Before adopting an ordinance or resolution creating one or more local
infrastructure project areas, a sponsoring city must adopt a plan for
development of public infrastructure within one or more proposed local
infrastructure project areas sufficient to utilize, on an aggregate
basis, a sponsoring city specified portion that is equal to or greater
than twenty percent of the sponsoring city allocated share.
(2) The plan must be developed in consultation with the county
where the local infrastructure project area to be created is located,
be consistent with any transfer of development rights policies or
development regulations adopted by the sponsoring city under section
402 of this act, specify the public improvements to be financed using
local infrastructure project financing under section 601 of this act,
estimate the number of any transferable development rights that will be
used within the local infrastructure project area or areas and estimate
the cost of the public improvements.
(3) A plan adopted under this section may be revised from time to
time by the sponsoring city, in consultation with the county where the
local infrastructure project area or areas are located, to increase the
sponsoring city specified portion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 PROGRAM FOR TRANSFER OF DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS
INTO RECEIVING AREAS--REQUIREMENTS. (1) Before adopting an ordinance
or resolution creating one or more local infrastructure project areas,
a sponsoring city must:
(a) Adopt transfer of development rights policies or implement
development regulations as required by subsection (2) of this section;
or
(b) Make a finding that the sponsoring city will:
(i) Receive its sponsoring city specified portion within one or
more local infrastructure project areas; or
(ii) Purchase its sponsoring city specified portion should the
sponsoring city not be able to receive its sponsoring city specified
portion within one or more local infrastructure project areas such that
purchased development rights can be held in reserve by the sponsoring
city and used in future development.
(2) Any adoption of transfer of development rights policies or
implementation of development regulations must:
(a) Comply with chapter 36.70A RCW;
(b) Designate a receiving area or areas;
(c) Adopt incentives consistent with subsection (4) of this section
for developers purchasing transferable development rights;
(d) Establish an exchange rate consistent with subsection (5) of
this section; and
(e) Require that the sale of a transferable development right from
agricultural or forest land of long-term commercial significance or
designated rural zoned lands under section 303 of this act be evidenced
by its permanent removal from the sending site, such as through a
conservation easement on the sending site.
(3) Any adoption of transfer of development rights policies or
implementation of development regulations must not be based upon a
downzone within one or more receiving areas solely to create a market
for the transferable development rights.
(4) Developer incentives should be designed to:
(a) Achieve the densities or intensities reasonably likely to
result from absorption of the sponsoring city specified portion
identified in the plan under section 401 of this act;
(b) Include streamlined permitting strategies such as by-right
permitting; and
(c) Include streamlined environmental review strategies such as
development and substantial environmental review of a subarea plan for
a receiving area that benefits projects that use transferable
development rights, with adoption as appropriate under RCW 43.21C.420
of optional elements of their comprehensive plan and optional
development regulations that apply within the receiving area, adoption
as appropriate of a categorical exemption for infill under RCW
43.21C.229 for a receiving area, and adoption as appropriate of a
planned action under RCW 43.21C.031 for the receiving area.
(5) Each sponsoring city may determine, at its option, what
developer incentives to adopt within its jurisdiction.
(6) Exchange rates should be designed to:
(a) Create a marketplace in which transferable development rights
are priced at a level at which sending site landowners are willing to
sell and developers are willing to buy transferable development rights;
(b) Achieve the densities or intensities anticipated by the plan
adopted under section 401 of this act;
(c) Provide for translation to commodities in addition to
residential density, such as building height, commercial floor area,
parking ratio, impervious surface, parkland and open space, setbacks,
and floor area ratio; and
(d) Allow for appropriate exemptions from other land use or
building requirements.
(7) A sponsoring city must designate all agricultural and forest
land of long-term commercial significance and designated rural zoned
lands under section 303 of this act within the eligible counties as
available sending areas.
(8) A sponsoring city, in accordance with its existing
comprehensive planning and development regulation authority under
chapter 36.70A RCW, and in accordance with RCW 36.70A.080, may elect to
adopt an optional comprehensive plan element and optional development
regulations that apply within one or more local infrastructure project
areas under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 DEVELOPMENT RIGHTS AVAILABLE FOR TRANSFER
TO RECEIVING CITIES. Only development rights from agricultural and
forest land of long-term commercial significance within the eligible
counties as determined under section 302 of this act, and rural-zoned
lands with the eligible counties designated under section 303 of this
act, may be available for transfer to receiving cities in accordance
with this chapter.

PART V
QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE PERFORMANCE MEASURES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE PERFORMANCE
MEASURES--REPORTING. The eligible counties, in collaboration with
sponsoring cities, must provide a report to the department of commerce
by March 1st of every other year. The report must contain the
following information:
(1) The number of sponsoring cities that have adopted transfer of
development rights policies and regulations incorporating transfer of
development rights under this chapter, and have an interlocal agreement
or have adopted the department of commerce transfer of development
rights interlocal terms and conditions rule;
(2) The number of transfer of development rights transactions under
this chapter using different types of transfer of development rights
mechanisms;
(3) The number of acres under conservation easement under this
chapter, broken out by agricultural land, forest land, and rural lands;
(4) The number of transferable development rights transferred from
sending areas under this chapter;
(5) The number of transferable development rights transferred from
a county into a sponsoring city under this chapter;
(6) Sponsoring city development under this chapter using
transferable development rights, including:
(a) The number of total new residential units;
(b) The number of residential units created in receiving areas
using transferable development rights transferred from sending areas;
(c) The amount of additional commercial floor area;
(d) The amount of additional building height;
(e) The number of required structured parking spaces reduced, if
transferable development rights are specifically converted into reduced
structured parking space requirements;
(f) The number of additional parking spaces allowed, if
transferable development rights are specifically converted into
additional receiving area parking spaces; and
(g) The amount of additional impervious surface allowed, if
transferable development rights are specifically converted into
receiving area impervious surfaces;
(7) The amount of the local property tax allocation revenues, if
any, received in the preceding calendar year by the sponsoring city;
(8) A list of public improvements paid or financed with local
infrastructure project financing;
(9) The names of any businesses locating within local
infrastructure project areas as a result of the public improvements
undertaken by the sponsoring local government and paid or financed in
whole or in part with local infrastructure project financing;
(10) The total number of permanent jobs created in the local
infrastructure project area as a result of the public improvements
undertaken by the sponsoring local government and paid or financed in
whole or in part with local infrastructure project financing;
(11) The average wages and benefits received by all employees of
businesses locating within the local infrastructure project area as a
result of the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local
government and paid or financed in whole or in part with local
infrastructure project financing; and
(12) The date when any indebtedness issued for local infrastructure
project financing is expected to be retired.

PART VI
ESTABLISHMENT OF LOCAL INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECT AREAS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 CREATING A LOCAL INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECT
AREA. (1) Before adopting an ordinance or resolution creating one or
more local infrastructure project areas, a sponsoring city must:
(a) Provide notice to the county assessor, county treasurer, and
county executive within the proposed local infrastructure project area
of the sponsoring city's intent to create one or more local
infrastructure project areas. This notice must be provided at least
one hundred eighty days in advance of the public hearing as required by
(b) of this subsection;
(b) Hold a public hearing on the proposed formation of the local
infrastructure project area.
(2) A sponsoring city may create one or more local infrastructure
project areas by ordinance or resolution that:
(a) Describes the proposed public improvements, identified in the
plan under section 401 of this act, to be financed in each local
infrastructure project area;
(b) Describes the boundaries of each local infrastructure project
area, subject to the limitations in section 602 of this act; and
(c) Provides the date when the use of local property tax allocation
revenues will commence and a list of the participating taxing
districts.
(3) The sponsoring city must deliver a certified copy of the
adopted ordinance or resolution to the county assessor, county
treasurer, and each other participating taxing district within which
the local infrastructure project area is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 LIMITATIONS ON LOCAL INFRASTRUCTURE
PROJECT AREAS. The designation of any local infrastructure project
area is subject to the following limitations:
(1) A local infrastructure project area is limited to contiguous
tracts, lots, pieces, or parcels of land without the creation of
islands of territory not included in the local infrastructure project
area;
(2) The public improvements to be financed with local
infrastructure project financing must be located in the local
infrastructure project area and must, in the determination of the
sponsoring city, further the intent of this chapter;
(3) Local infrastructure project areas created by a sponsoring city
may not comprise an area containing more than twenty-five percent of
the total assessed value of taxable property within the sponsoring city
at the time the local infrastructure project areas are created;
(4) The boundaries of each local infrastructure project area may
not overlap and may not be changed during the time period that local
infrastructure project financing is used within the local
infrastructure project area, as provided under this chapter; and
(5) All local infrastructure project areas created by the
sponsoring city must comprise, in the aggregate, an area that the
sponsoring city determines (a) is sufficient to use the sponsoring city
specified portion, unless the sponsoring city satisfies its sponsoring
city allocated share under section 402(1)(b)(ii) of this act, and (b)
is no larger than reasonably necessary to use the sponsoring city
specified portion in projected future developments.

PART VII
LOCAL INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECT FINANCING
USE OF PROPERTY TAX REVENUES TO PAY OR FINANCE
COSTS OF PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 ALLOCATION OF PROPERTY TAX REVENUES. (1)
Commencing in the second calendar year following the creation of a
local infrastructure project area by a sponsoring city, the county
treasurer must distribute receipts from regular taxes imposed on real
property located in the local infrastructure project area as follows:
(a) Each participating taxing district and the sponsoring city must
receive that portion of its regular property taxes produced by the rate
of tax levied by or for the taxing district on the property tax
allocation revenue base value for that local infrastructure project
area in the taxing district; and
(b) The sponsoring city must receive an additional portion of the
regular property taxes levied by it and by or for each participating
taxing district upon the property tax allocation revenue value within
the local infrastructure project area. However, if there is no
property tax allocation revenue value, the sponsoring city may not
receive any additional regular property taxes under this subsection
(1)(b). The sponsoring city may agree to receive less than the full
amount of the additional portion of regular property taxes under this
subsection (1)(b) as long as bond debt service, reserve, and other bond
covenant requirements are satisfied, in which case the balance of these
tax receipts must be allocated to the participating taxing districts
that levied regular property taxes, or have regular property taxes
levied for them, in the local infrastructure project area for
collection that year in proportion to their regular tax levy rates for
collection that year. The sponsoring city may request that the
treasurer transfer this additional portion of the property taxes to its
designated agent.
(2)(a) The portion of the tax receipts distributed to the
sponsoring city or its agent under subsection (1)(b) of this section
may only be expended to pay or finance public improvement costs within
the local infrastructure project area, except as provided in (b) of
this subsection (2).
(b) A city may also expend such receipts to pay or finance costs of
affordable housing as defined in RCW 43.185A.010, or facilities and
improvements that support affordable housing, and at least five percent
of the tax receipts distributed to the sponsoring city or its agent
under subsection (1)(b) of this section must be set aside and reserved
or expended within the local infrastructure project area for such
affordable housing purposes.
(3) The county assessor must determine the property tax allocation
revenue value and property tax allocation revenue base value. This
section does not authorize revaluations of real property by the
assessor for property taxation that are not made in accordance with the
assessor's revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW or under other
authorized revaluation procedures.
(4)(a) The distribution of local property tax allocation revenue to
the sponsoring city must cease on the date that is the earlier of:
(i) The date when local property tax allocation revenues are no
longer used or obligated to pay the costs of the public improvements;
or
(ii) The final termination date as determined under (b) of this
subsection (4).
(b) The final termination date is determined as follows:
(i) Except as provided otherwise in (b) of this subsection (4), if
the sponsoring city certifies to the county treasurer that the local
property tax threshold level 1 is met, the final termination date is
ten years after the date of the first distribution of local property
tax allocation revenues under subsection (1) of this section;
(ii) If the sponsoring city certifies to the county treasurer that
the local property tax threshold level 2 is met at least six months
prior to the final termination date under (b)(i) of this subsection
(4), the final termination date is fifteen years after the date of the
first distribution of local property tax allocation revenues under
subsection (1) of this section;
(iii) If the sponsoring city certifies to the county treasurer that
the local property tax threshold level 3 is met at least six months
prior to the final termination date under (b)(ii) of this subsection
(4), the final termination date is twenty years after the date of the
first distribution of local property tax allocation revenues under
subsection (1) of this section;
(iv) If the sponsoring city certifies to the county treasurer that
the local property tax threshold level 4 is met at least six months
prior to the final termination date under (b)(iii) of this subsection
(4), the final termination date is twenty-five years after the date of
the first distribution of local property tax allocation revenues under
subsection (1) of this section.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) The "local property tax threshold level 1" is met when the
sponsoring city has either:
(i) Issued building permits for development within the local
infrastructure project area that, on an aggregate basis, uses at least
twenty-five percent of the sponsoring city specified portion; or
(ii) Acquired transferable development rights equal to at least
twenty-five percent of the sponsoring city specified portion for use in
the local infrastructure project area or for extinguishment.
(b) The "local property tax threshold level 2" is met when the
sponsoring city has either:
(i) Issued building permits for development within the local
infrastructure project area that, on an aggregate basis, uses at least
fifty percent of the sponsoring city specified portion; or
(ii) Acquired transferable development rights equal to at least
fifty percent of the sponsoring city specified portion for use in the
local infrastructure project area or for extinguishment.
(c) The "local property tax threshold level 3" is met when the
sponsoring city has either:
(i) Issued building permits for development within the local
infrastructure project area that, on an aggregate basis, uses at least
seventy-five percent of the sponsoring city specified portion; or
(ii) Acquired transferable development rights equal to at least
seventy-five percent of the sponsoring city specified portion for use
in the local infrastructure project area or for extinguishment.
(d) The "local property tax threshold level 4" is met when the
sponsoring city has either:
(i) Issued building permits for development within the local
infrastructure project area that, on an aggregate basis, uses at least
one hundred percent of the sponsoring city specified portion; or
(ii) Acquired transferable development rights equal to at least one
hundred percent of the sponsoring city specified portion for use in the
local infrastructure project area or for extinguishment.
(6) Any excess local property tax allocation revenues, and earnings
on the revenues, remaining at the time the distribution of local
property tax allocation revenue terminates must be returned to the
county treasurer and distributed to the participating taxing districts
that imposed regular property taxes, or had regular property taxes
imposed for it, in the local infrastructure project area for collection
that year, in proportion to the rates of their regular property tax
levies for collection that year.
(7) The allocation and expenditure of local property tax allocation
revenues as provided in this chapter of that portion of the sponsoring
city's and each participating taxing district's regular property taxes
levied upon the property tax allocation revenue value within that local
infrastructure project area is declared to be a public purpose of and
benefit to the sponsoring city and each participating taxing district.
(8) The distribution of local property tax allocation revenues
under this section may not affect or be deemed to affect the rate of
taxes levied by or within any sponsoring city and participating taxing
district or the consistency of any such levies with the uniformity
requirement of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution.

PART VIII
GROWTH MANAGEMENT ACT
COMPREHENSIVE PLAN OPTIONAL ELEMENTS
Sec. 801 RCW 36.70A.080 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A comprehensive plan may include additional elements, items, or
studies dealing with other subjects relating to the physical
development within its jurisdiction, including, but not limited to:
(a) Conservation;
(b) Solar energy; and
(c) Recreation.
(2) A comprehensive plan may include, where appropriate, subarea
plans, each of which is consistent with the comprehensive plan.
(3)(a) Cities that qualify as a receiving city may adopt a
comprehensive plan element and associated development regulations that
apply within receiving areas under chapter 39.--- RCW (the new chapter
created in section 903 of this act).
(b) For purposes of this subsection, the terms "receiving city" and
"receiving area" have the same meanings as provided in section 201 of
this act.

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 901 ADMINISTRATION BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
COMMERCE. The department of commerce may adopt any rules under chapter
34.05 RCW it considers necessary for the administration of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 Sections 101 through 701 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

--- END ---