BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.74.120 and 1988 c 198 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
All persons engaged in keeping or storing and all persons having in
their possession explosives on August 11, 1969, shall within sixty days
thereafter, and all persons engaging in keeping or storing explosives
or coming into possession thereof after August 11, 1969, shall before
engaging in the keeping or storing of explosives or taking possession
thereof, make an application in writing subscribed to by such person or
((his)) the person's agent, to the department of labor and industries
stating:
(1) The location of the magazine, if any, if then existing, or in
case of a new magazine, the proposed location of such magazine;
(2) The kind of explosives that are kept or stored or possessed or
intended to be kept or stored or possessed and the maximum quantity
that is intended to be kept or stored or possessed thereat;
(3) The distance that such magazine is located or intended to be
located from other magazines, inhabited buildings, explosives
manufacturing buildings, railroads, highways and public utility
transmission systems;
(4) The name and address of the applicant;
(5) The reason for desiring to store or possess explosives;
(6) The citizenship of the applicant if the applicant is an
individual;
(7) If the applicant is a partnership, the names and addresses of
the partners and their citizenship;
(8) If the applicant is an association or corporation, the names
and addresses of the officers and directors thereof and their
citizenship;
(9) And such other pertinent information as the director of the
department of labor and industries shall require to effectuate the
purpose of this chapter.
The department of labor and industries shall, as soon as may be
after receiving such application, cause an inspection to be made of the
magazine, if then constructed, and, in the case of a new magazine, as
soon as may be after same is found to be constructed in accordance with
the specification provided in RCW 70.74.025, such department shall
determine the amount of explosives that may be kept and stored in such
magazine by reference to the quantity and distance tables specified in
or adopted under this chapter and shall issue a license to the person
applying therefor if the applicant demonstrates that either the
applicant or the officers, agents, or employees of the applicant are
sufficiently experienced in the handling of explosives and possess
suitable storage facilities therefor, and that the applicant meets the
qualifications for a license under RCW 70.74.360. Said license shall
set forth the maximum quantity of explosives that may be had, kept or
stored by said person. Such license shall be valid until canceled for
one or more of the causes hereinafter provided. Whenever by reason of
change in the physical conditions surrounding said magazine at the time
of the issuance of the license therefor, such as:
(a) The erection of buildings nearer said magazine;
(b) The construction of railroads nearer said magazine;
(c) The opening for public travel of highways nearer said magazine;
or
(d) The construction of public utilities transmission systems near
said magazine; then the amounts of explosives which may be lawfully
had, kept or stored in said magazine must be reduced to conform to such
changed conditions in accordance with the quantity and distance table
notwithstanding the license, and the department of labor and industries
shall modify or cancel such license in accordance with the changed
conditions. Whenever any person to whom a license has been issued,
keeps or stores in the magazine or has in his or her possession, any
quantity of explosives in excess of the maximum amount set forth in
said license, or whenever any person fails for thirty days to pay the
((annual)) license fee hereinafter provided after the same becomes due,
the department is authorized to cancel such license. Whenever a
license is canceled by the department for any cause herein specified,
the department shall notify the person to whom such license is issued
of the fact of such cancellation and shall in said notice direct the
removal of all explosives stored in said magazine within ten days from
the giving of said notice, or, if the cause of cancellation be the
failure to pay the ((annual)) license fee, or the fact that explosives
are kept for an unlawful purpose, the department of labor and
industries shall order such person to dispossess himself or herself of
said explosives within ten days from the giving of said notice.
Failure to remove the explosives stored in said magazine or to
dispossess oneself of the explosives as herein provided within the time
specified in said notice shall constitute a violation of this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.74.137 and 2008 c 285 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person applying for a purchaser's license, or renewal
thereof, shall pay ((an annual)) a license fee of twenty-five dollars.
The director of labor and industries may adjust the amount of the
license fee to reflect the administrative costs of the department. The
fee shall not exceed one hundred dollars.
Said license fee shall accompany the application and shall be
transmitted by the department to the state treasurer: PROVIDED, That
if the applicant is denied a purchaser's license the license fee shall
be returned to said applicant by registered mail.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.74.140 and 2008 c 285 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person engaging in the business of keeping or storing of
explosives shall pay ((an annual)) a license fee for each magazine
maintained, to be graduated by the department of labor and industries
according to the quantity kept or stored therein, of fifty dollars.
The director of labor and industries may adjust the amount of the
license fee to reflect the administrative costs of the department. The
fee shall not exceed four hundred dollars.
Said license fee shall accompany the application and shall be
transmitted by the department to the state treasurer.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.74.142 and 2008 c 285 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person applying for a user's license, or renewal thereof,
under this chapter shall pay ((an annual)) a license fee of fifty
dollars. The director of labor and industries may adjust the amount of
the license fee to reflect the administrative costs of the department.
The fee shall not exceed two hundred dollars.
Said license fee shall accompany the application, and be
transmitted by the department to the state treasurer: PROVIDED, That
if the applicant is denied a user's license the license fee shall be
returned to said applicant by registered mail.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.74.144 and 2008 c 285 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person engaged in the business of manufacturing explosives
shall pay ((an annual)) a license fee of fifty dollars. The director
of labor and industries may adjust the amount of the license fee to
reflect the administrative costs of the department. The fee shall not
exceed two hundred dollars.
Businesses licensed to manufacture explosives are not required to
have a dealer's license, but must comply with all of the dealer
requirements of this chapter when they sell explosives.
The license fee shall accompany the application and shall be
transmitted by the department to the state treasurer.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.74.146 and 2008 c 285 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person engaged in the business of selling explosives shall
pay ((an annual)) a license fee of fifty dollars. The director of
labor and industries may adjust the amount of the license fee to
reflect the administrative costs of the department. The fee shall not
exceed two hundred dollars.
Businesses licensed to sell explosives must comply with all of the
dealer requirements of this chapter.
The license fee shall accompany the application and shall be
transmitted by the department to the state treasurer.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.74.150 and 1931 c 111 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of labor and industries shall make, or cause to be
made, at least one inspection ((during)) every three years, of each
licensed explosives plant or magazine.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.74.360 and 2009 c 39 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director of labor and industries shall require, as a
condition precedent to the original issuance and upon renewal every
three years thereafter of any explosive license, fingerprinting and
criminal history record information checks of every applicant. In the
case of a corporation, fingerprinting and criminal history record
information checks shall be required for the management officials
directly responsible for the operations where explosives are used ((if
such persons have not previously had their fingerprints recorded with
the department of labor and industries)). In the case of a
partnership, fingerprinting and criminal history record information
checks shall be required of all general partners. Fingerprinting is
not required if a person has had their fingerprints recorded with the
department of labor and industries and the department is satisfied that
those fingerprints are accurate and reliable for identification
purposes. Such fingerprints as are required by the department of labor
and industries shall be submitted on forms provided by the department
to the identification section of the Washington state patrol and to the
identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order
that these agencies may search their records for prior convictions of
the individuals fingerprinted. The Washington state patrol shall
provide to the director of labor and industries such criminal record
information as the director may request. The applicant shall give full
cooperation to the department of labor and industries and shall assist
the department of labor and industries in all aspects of the
fingerprinting and criminal history record information check. The
applicant shall be required to pay the current federal and state fee
for fingerprint-based criminal history background checks.
(2) The director of labor and industries shall not issue a license
to manufacture, purchase, store, use, or deal with explosives to:
(a) Any person under twenty-one years of age;
(b) Any person whose license is suspended or whose license has been
revoked, except as provided in RCW 70.74.370;
(c) Any person who has been convicted in this state or elsewhere of
a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, perjury, false swearing,
or bomb threats or a crime involving a schedule I or II controlled
substance, or any other drug or alcohol related offense, unless such
other drug or alcohol related offense does not reflect a drug or
alcohol dependency. However, the director of labor and industries may
issue a license if the person suffering a drug or alcohol related
dependency is participating in or has completed an alcohol or drug
recovery program acceptable to the department of labor and industries
and has established control of their alcohol or drug dependency. The
director of labor and industries shall require the applicant to provide
proof of such participation and control; or
(d) Any person who has previously been adjudged to be mentally ill
or insane, or to be incompetent due to any mental disability or disease
and who has not at the time of application been restored to competency.
(3) The director of labor and industries may establish reasonable
licensing fees for the manufacture, dealing, purchase, use, and storage
of explosives.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.74.380 and 1988 c 198 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
((With the exception of storage licenses for permanent facilities,
every)) A license issued under the authority of this chapter shall
expire after ((one)) three years from the date issued unless suspended
or revoked. The director of labor and industries may ((extend)) limit
the duration of storage licenses for ((permanent)) temporary facilities
to ((two years provided)) one year if the location, distances, and use
of the facilities ((remain unchanged)) can be changed. The fee for the
((two-year)) one-year storage license shall be ((twice)) one-third the
((annual)) normal fee.

--- END ---