BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.20.360 and 2006 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The holder of a license to manufacture ((wine issued by this state
or another state may ship its)), produce, blend, supply, furnish,
import, wholesale, distribute, or retail wine to a person who is ((a
resident of)) in Washington and is twenty-one years of age or older for
that person's personal use and not for resale.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.20.365 and 2006 c 49 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Before wine may be shipped by a ((domestic winery or an
out-of-state winery to a person who is a resident of Washington, the
winery)) licensee to a person who is in Washington, the licensee must:
(1) Obtain a wine shipper's permit under procedures prescribed by
the board by rule and pay a fee established by the board, if ((the
winery is)) located outside the state; or
(2) Be licensed ((as a domestic winery)) by the board and have paid
the annual license fee.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.20.370 and 2006 c 49 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An applicant for a wine shipper's permit under RCW 66.20.365
must:
(a) ((Operate a winery located in the United States;
(b))) Provide the board a copy of its valid license ((to
manufacture wine issued by another)) if located outside the state;
(c) Certify that it holds all state and federal licenses and
permits necessary to operate ((a winery)) its licensed business; and
(d) Register with the department of revenue under RCW 82.32.030.
(2) Holders of a winery certificate of approval under RCW
66.24.206(1)(a) are deemed to hold a wine shipper's permit without
further application or fee, if the holder meets all requirements for a
wine shipper's permit. A ((winery)) certificate of approval holder who
wants to ship wine under its wine shipper's permit privilege must
notify the liquor control board in a manner determined by the board
before ((shipping any wine to a Washington consumer)) commencing
shipment of wine to consumers in Washington.
(3) Holders of a wine shipper's permit must:
(a) Pay the tax under RCW 66.24.210 for sales of wine to Washington
state residents; and
(b) Collect and remit to the department of revenue all applicable
state and local sales and use taxes imposed by or under the authority
of chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on all sales of wine delivered
to buyers in this state, regardless of whether the permit holder has a
physical presence in this state.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.20.375 and 2006 c 49 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A ((domestic winery or a wine shipper's permit holder))
licensee shipping wine to consumers in Washington must clearly label
all wine cases or outside shipping packages of such wine ((sent into or
out of this state under chapter 49, Laws of 2006)) to indicate that the
package cannot be delivered to a person under twenty-one years of age
or to an intoxicated person.
(2) A ((domestic winery or a wine shipper's permit holder))
licensee shipping wine to consumers in Washington must ensure that the
private carrier used to deliver wine (a) obtains the signature of the
person who receives the wine upon delivery, (b) verifies the age of the
recipient, and (c) verifies that the recipient does not appear
intoxicated at the time of delivery.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.20.380 and 2006 c 49 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) A ((wine shipper's permit holder and a domestic winery))
licensee shipping wine to consumers in Washington must report to the
board, ((on or before the twentieth day of each month,)) all shipments
of wine made ((during the preceding calendar month)) directly to
Washington consumers ((under a wine shipper's permit or a domestic
winery license in effect for all or any portion of the preceding
year)). All reports will be on forms prescribed by the board, filed
annually, except that for licensees shipping less than ten thousand
cases annually to consumers in Washington, the board may specify lesser
intervals, not more frequent than monthly.
(((2) A wine shipper's permit holder, a winery certificate of
approval holder, or domestic winery who advertises or offers wine for
direct shipment to customers within this state must clearly and
conspicuously display the permit or license number in its
advertising.))

Sec. 6 RCW 66.20.385 and 2006 c 49 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
A fee for a wine shipper's permit may be established by the board.
The initial annual fee may not exceed one hundred dollars, and annual
renewal fees thereafter may not exceed fifty dollars. Application
procedures must permit application by electronic means and fashioned so
as to efficiently issue permits upon determination that the applicant
is duly licensed and is not in violation of any provision of RCW
66.20.360, 66.20.365, 66.20.370, 66.20.375, 66.20.380, 66.20.385,
66.30.390, or 66.24.210.

Sec. 7 RCW 66.20.390 and 2006 c 49 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Holders of a wine shipper's permit are deemed to have consented
to the jurisdiction of Washington concerning enforcement of ((chapter
49, Laws of 2006)) RCW 66.20.360, 66.20.365, 66.20.370, 66.20.375,
66.20.380, 66.20.385, 66.30.390, and 66.24.210 and all laws, rules, and
regulations related to the shipment of wine from wine manufacturers
directly to consumers.
(2)(((a))) A permit issued under ((chapter 49, Laws of 2006 to a
wine manufacturer located outside this state)) RCW 66.20.360,
66.20.365, 66.20.370, 66.20.375, 66.20.380, 66.20.385, and 66.30.390 to
a licensee who fails to comply with the provisions of ((chapter 49,
Laws of 2006 shall)) RCW 66.20.360, 66.20.365, 66.20.370, 66.20.375,
66.20.380, 66.20.385, 66.30.390, and 66.24.210 must be suspended or
revoked.
(((b) The privilege to ship wine directly to Washington consumers
under a domestic winery license shall be suspended or revoked if the
domestic winery fails to comply with the provisions of chapter 49, Laws
of 2006.))

Sec. 8 RCW 66.24.210 and 2009 c 479 s 42 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is ((hereby)) imposed upon all wines except cider sold to
wine distributors and the Washington state liquor control board, within
the state a tax at the rate of twenty and one-fourth cents per liter.
Any domestic winery or certificate of approval holder acting as a
distributor of its own production ((shall)) must pay taxes imposed by
this section. There is ((hereby)) imposed on all cider sold to wine
distributors and the Washington state liquor control board within the
state a tax at the rate of three and fifty-nine one-hundredths cents
per liter. However, wine sold or shipped in bulk from one winery to
another winery shall not be subject to such tax.
(a) The tax provided for in this section ((shall)) must be
collected by direct payments based on wine purchased by wine
distributors.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, every
person purchasing wine under the provisions of this section ((shall))
must on or before the twentieth day of each month report to the board
all purchases during the preceding calendar month in such manner and
upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board, and with such report
((shall)) must pay the tax due from the purchases covered by such
report unless the same has previously been paid. Any such purchaser of
wine whose applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth
day following the month of purchase will be assessed a penalty at the
rate of two percent a month or fraction thereof. The board may require
that every such person ((shall)) execute to and file with the board a
bond to be approved by the board, in such amount as the board may fix,
securing the payment of the tax. If any such person fails to pay the
tax when due, the board may forthwith suspend or cancel the license
until all taxes are paid.
(c) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase wine from a
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement or a
domestic winery ((shall)) must make monthly reports to the liquor
control board on wine purchased during the preceding calendar month in
the manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section. All revenues collected during any month from this additional
tax ((shall)) must be transferred to the state general fund by the
twenty-fifth day of the following month.
(3) An additional tax is imposed on wines subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section, at the rate of one-fourth of one cent
per liter for wine sold after June 30, 1987. After June 30, 1996, such
additional tax does not apply to cider. An additional tax of five one-hundredths of one cent per liter is imposed on cider sold after June
30, 1996. All revenues collected under this subsection (3) ((shall))
must be disbursed quarterly to the Washington wine commission for use
in carrying out the purposes of chapter 15.88 RCW.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all wine subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to twenty-three and forty-four one-hundredths cents per liter on fortified wine
as defined in RCW 66.04.010 when bottled or packaged by the
manufacturer, one cent per liter on all other wine except cider, and
eighteen one-hundredths of one cent per liter on cider. All revenues
collected during any month from this additional tax ((shall)) must be
deposited in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month.
(5)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all cider subject to tax
under subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to
two and four one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June
30, 1996, and before July 1, 1997, and is equal to four and seven one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1997.
(b) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (5) ((shall)) must be deposited in the state general
fund.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "cider" means table wine that
contains not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and
not more than seven percent of alcohol by volume and is made from the
normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe apples or
pears. "Cider" includes, but is not limited to, flavored, sparkling,
or carbonated cider and cider made from condensed apple or pear must.
(7) ((For the purposes of this section, out-of-state wineries
shall)) Licensees, other than retailers licensed by the board, selling
and shipping wine to consumers in Washington must pay taxes under this
section on such wine ((sold and shipped directly to Washington state
residents)) in a manner consistent with the requirements of a wine
distributor under subsections (1) through (4) of this section((, except
wineries shall be responsible for the tax and not the resident
purchaser)). The consumer in Washington is not be responsible for the
tax.

--- END ---