BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 APPLICATION OF CHAPTER. The provisions of
this chapter apply only to craft wineries, as defined in section 2 of
this act, that are currently registered as such with the board, which
must register applicants that elect in writing to be so classified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. (1) The following definitions
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Craft wine" means the product fermented at a craft winery and
regulated as wine by the federal tax and trade bureau under Title 27
C.F.R.
(b) "Craft winery" means the holder of a domestic winery license or
certificate of approval and of a federal basic permit as a bonded
winery or bonded wine cellar that did not produce more than twenty-five
thousand gallons of wine in the most recent year for which it reported
production under Title 27 C.F.R.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, wine
fermented at a craft winery, except as otherwise expressly provided in
this chapter, is not "wine" or "liquor" for the purposes of any other
chapter of this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 CRAFT WINERY LICENSE--QUALIFICATIONS AND
REQUIREMENTS--FEE. (1) There shall be a license to be issued to any
craft winery; the fee for such license may not be greater than the
existing fee provided in RCW 66.24.170(1) for domestic wineries.
(2) A craft winery licensed under this section may do all things
necessary or convenient for the manufacture, distribution, and sale of
craft wine that are not expressly forbidden to craft wineries under
this chapter or contrary to law other than the provisions of this
title, including without limitation sale of craft wine at wholesale and
retail to any purchaser entitled to purchase craft wine or wine.
(3) Craft wine is deemed wine for the purposes of RCW 66.12.020,
66.12.180, 66.20.300, 66.20.310, 66.20.320, 66.20.330, 66.20.340,
66.20.350, 66.24.185, 66.24.210, 66.24.215, and 66.28.110 and chapters
66.16, 66.32, 66.36, and 66.44 RCW.
(4) Holders of licenses or permits to deal in wine pursuant to
other chapters of this title may deal in craft wine in the same manner
as wine, including without limitation exercise of retail license
privileges, importer license privileges, wine distributor license
privileges, and conduct of retail and wholesale licensed businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 TRADE CREDIT. Craft wineries may not extend
credit on the purchase of craft wine by Washington retail licensees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 REPORTING. A registered craft winery must
make reports to the board at intervals provided by the board pursuant
to the regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 66 RCW.

--- END ---