BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of fish and wildlife must
conduct a biological status update of the Mazama pocket gopher to
determine if protection or management of the species is still warranted
by the state.
(2) By December 1, 2012, and within existing resources, the
department of fish and wildlife shall issue a report of findings and
recommendations to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
house of representatives and senate. The report must be based on the
best available science and include:
(a) Data on whether the population of Mazama pocket gophers are in
danger of failing, declining, or are vulnerable due to disease,
predation, exploitation, or habitat loss or change;
(b) An analysis of the historic, current, and future population
trends of the Mazama pocket gopher;
(c) Historic and current habitat trends of the Mazama pocket
gopher;
(d) Population demographics and their relationship to long-term
sustainability of the Mazama pocket gopher; and
(e) Historic and current species management activities of the
Mazama pocket gopher.
(3) By December 1, 2012, and within existing resources, the
department of fish and wildlife shall write a recovery plan for the
Mazama pocket gopher if protection or management of the species is
warranted.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2013.

--- END ---