BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, and the
department of natural resources issue thousands of permits each year at
a substantial commitment of government time and resources. The
legislature recognizes the importance of the permitting process to
protect the environment of Washington.
(2) The legislature further finds that many permit applicants and
potential permit applicants find the current permitting system complex,
and may have to expend significant resources to adequately navigate the
process.
(3) The legislature further finds that by making examples of
quality permit applications and issued permits readily available, the
department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, and the
department of natural resources could: Simplify the permit application
process for applicants and potential applicants; help permit applicants
and potential permit applicants complete permit applications in a more
efficient and effective manner; and help the departments process permit
applications in a more efficient and effective manner by improving the
quality of the applications received.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 31, 2011, the department must make examples of
complete, high quality permit applications and the resulting issued
permits readily available to the public on its internet site, as well
as the internet site of the office of regulatory assistance established
in RCW 43.42.010.
(2) The department must maximize assistance to the public and
interested parties by seeking to make readily available examples from
project types that generate significant permitting activity or frequent
questions. These examples may include, but are not limited to,
complete, high quality permit applications and the resulting issued
permits for permits utilizing a joint aquatic resources permit
application form, construction storm water general permits, and state
environmental policy act environmental checklists.
(3) The department must regularly review and update the examples
required to be made available on the internet under subsection (2) of
this section.
(4) The department must obtain the written permission of a permit
applicant or permittee before making publicly available that applicant
or permittee's application or permit and must work cooperatively with
the permit applicant or permittee to ensure that no personal or
propriety information is made available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 31, 2011, the department must make examples of
complete, high quality permit applications and the resulting issued
permits readily available to the public on its internet site, as well
as the internet site of the office of regulatory assistance established
in RCW 43.42.010.
(2) The department must maximize assistance to the public and
interested parties by seeking to make readily available examples from
project types that generate significant permitting activity or frequent
questions. These examples may include, but are not limited to,
complete, high quality permit applications and the resulting issued
permits for hydraulic project approvals or other permits utilizing a
joint aquatic resources permit application form.
(3) The department must regularly review and update the examples
required to be made available on the internet under subsection (2) of
this section.
(4) The department must obtain the written permission of a permit
applicant or permittee before making publicly available that applicant
or permittee's application or permit and must work cooperatively with
the permit applicant or permittee to ensure that no personal or
propriety information is made available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 31, 2011, the department must make examples of
complete, high quality permit applications and the resulting issued
permits readily available to the public on its internet site, as well
as the internet site of the office of regulatory assistance established
in RCW 43.42.010.
(2) The department must maximize assistance to the public and
interested parties by seeking to make readily available examples from
project types that generate significant permitting activity or frequent
questions. These examples may include, but are not limited to,
complete, high quality permit applications and the resulting issued
permits for forest practices permits and aquatic use authorizations.
(3) The department must regularly review and update the examples
required to be made available on the internet under subsection (2) of
this section.
(4) The department must obtain the written permission of a permit
applicant or permittee before making publicly available that applicant
or permittee's application or permit and must work cooperatively with
the permit applicant or permittee to ensure that no personal or
propriety information is made available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1)(a) A permitting work group is
established to monitor and provide policy guidance to the department of
ecology, department of fish and wildlife, and department of natural
resources as the departments implement sections 2 through 4 of this
act. The work group may also explore the potential for development of
other resources or processes that could promote a more efficient and
effective permit process. The work group consists of:
(i) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate;
(ii) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(iii) The director of the department of ecology or the director's
designee;
(iv) The director of the department of fish and wildlife or the
director's designee;
(v) The commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's
designee; and
(vi) The director of the office of regulatory assistance or the
director's designee.
(b) The permitting work group shall choose bipartisan cochairs from
among its legislative membership. The legislators shall convene the
initial meeting of the permitting work group.
(2) The permitting work group shall use legislative facilities and
staff support must be provided by senate committee services and the
house of representatives office of program research.
(3) Legislative members of the permitting work group shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120.
Legislative expenses of the permitting work group shall be paid jointly
by the senate and the house of representatives, and such expenses are
subject to approval by the senate facilities and operations committee
and the house executive rules committee, or their successor committees.
(4) The department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife,
and the department of natural resources must work cooperatively with
the permitting work group and provide relevant information in response
to requests from the permitting work group.
(5) The permitting work group must meet at least twice in 2011 and
at least four times in 2012.
(6) By December 1, 2012, the permitting work group shall submit a
summary of the implementation of sections 2 through 4 of this act, its
work, and any recommendations to the appropriate committees of the
legislature.
(7) This section expires December 31, 2012.

--- END ---