BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 64.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To avoid damaging the use or value of private property, prior
to enacting or adopting any ordinance, regulation, or rule which may
damage the use or value of private property, an agency must consider
and document:
(a) The private property that will be affected by the action;
(b) The existence and extent of any legitimate governmental purpose
for the action;
(c) The existence and extent of any nexus or link between any
legitimate government interest and the action;
(d) The extent to which the regulation's restrictions are
proportional to any impact of a particular property on any legitimate
government interest, in light of the impact of other properties on the
same governmental interests;
(e) The extent to which the action deprives property owners of
economically viable uses of the property;
(f) The extent to which the action derogates or takes away a
fundamental attribute of property ownership, including, but not limited
to, the right to exclude others, to possess, to beneficial use, to
enjoyment, or to dispose of property;
(g) The extent to which the action enhances or creates a publicly
owned right in property;
(h) Estimated compensation that may need to be paid under this act;
and
(i) Alternative means which are less restrictive on private
property and which may accomplish the legitimate governmental purpose
for the regulation, including, but not limited to, voluntary
conservation or cooperative programs with willing property owners, or
other nonregulatory actions.
(2) For purposes of this act, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Private property" includes all real and personal property
interests protected by the fifth amendment to the United States
Constitution or Article I, section 16 of the state Constitution owned
by a nongovernmental entity, including, but not limited to, any
interest in land, buildings, crops, livestock, and mineral and water
rights.
(b) "Damaging the use or value" means to prohibit or restrict the
use of private property to obtain benefit to the public the cost of
which in all fairness and justice should be borne by the public as a
whole, and includes, but is not limited to:
(i) Prohibiting or restricting any use or size, scope, or intensity
of any use legally existing or permitted as of the effective date of
this section;
(ii) Prohibiting the continued operation, maintenance, replacement,
or repair of existing tidegates, bulkheads, revetments, or other
infrastructure reasonably necessary for the protection of the use or
value of private property;
(iii) Prohibiting or restricting operations and maintenance of
structures necessary for the operation of irrigation facilities,
including, but not limited to, diversions, operation structures,
canals, drainage ditches, flumes, or delivery systems;
(iv) Prohibiting actions by a private property owner reasonably
necessary to prevent or mitigate harm from fire, flooding, erosion, or
other natural disasters or conditions that would impair the use or
value of private property;
(v) Requiring a portion of property to be left in its natural state
or without beneficial use to its owner, unless necessary to prevent
immediate harm to human health and safety; or
(vi) Prohibiting maintenance or removal of trees or vegetation.
(c)(i) "Damaging the use or value" does not include restrictions
that apply equally to all property subject to the agency's
jurisdiction, including:
(A) Restricting the use of property when necessary to prevent an
immediate threat to human health and safety;
(B) Requiring compliance with structural standards for buildings in
building or fire codes to prevent harm from earthquakes, flooding,
fire, or other natural disasters;
(C) Limiting the location or operation of sex offender housing or
adult entertainment;
(D) Requiring adherence to chemical use restrictions required by
the United States environmental protection agency;
(E) Requiring compliance with worker health and safety laws or
regulations;
(F) Requiring compliance with wage and hour laws;
(G) Requiring compliance with dairy nutrient management
restrictions or regulations in chapter 90.64 RCW; or
(H) Requiring compliance with local ordinances establishing
setbacks from property lines, provided the setbacks were established
prior to the effective date of this section.
(ii) This subsection (2)(c) must be construed narrowly to
effectuate the purposes of this act.
(d) "Compensation" means remuneration equal to the amount the fair
market value of the affected property has been decreased by the
application or enforcement of the ordinance, regulation, or rule. To
the extent any action requires any portion of property to be left in
its natural state or without beneficial use by its owner,
"compensation" means the fair market value of that portion of property
required to be left in its natural state or without beneficial use.
"Compensation" also includes any costs and attorneys' fees reasonably
incurred by the property owner in seeking to enforce this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 64.40 RCW
to read as follows:
An agency that decides to enforce or apply any ordinance,
regulation, or rule to private property that would result in damaging
the use or value of private property must first pay the property owner
compensation as defined in section 1 of this act. This section may not
be construed to limit agencies' ability to waive, or issue variances
from, other legal requirements. An agency that chooses not to take
action which will damage the use or value of private property is not
liable for paying remuneration under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 64.40 RCW
to read as follows:
An agency may not charge any fee for considering whether to waive
or grant a variance from an ordinance, regulation, or rule in order to
avoid responsibility for paying compensation as provided in section 2
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
Development regulations adopted under this chapter may not prohibit
uses legally existing on any parcel prior to their adoption. Nothing
in this chapter may be construed to authorize an interference with the
duties in chapter 64.40 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The provisions of this act are to be
liberally construed to effectuate the intent, policies, and purpose of
this act to protect private property owners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act does not diminish any other remedy
provided under the United States Constitution or state Constitution, or
federal or state law, and this act does not modify or replace such a
remedy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act may be known and cited as the
property fairness act.

--- END ---