BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Whereas colleges and universities need
additional flexibility to deal with budget reductions, the legislature
intends with this college efficiency and savings act to remove barriers
that create unnecessary paperwork, bureaucracy, and inefficiencies, in
order to reduce costs to the taxpayers.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.03.220 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 142 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any part-time board, commission, council, committee, or other
similar group which is established by the executive, legislative, or
judicial branch to participate in state government and which functions
primarily in an advisory, coordinating, or planning capacity shall be
identified as a class one group.
(2) Absent any other provision of law to the contrary, no money
beyond the customary reimbursement or allowance for expenses may be
paid by or through the state to members of class one groups for
attendance at meetings of such groups.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, no person
designated as a member of a class one board, commission, council,
committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence,
lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the
state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010. Class one groups, when feasible, shall use an
alternative means of conducting a meeting that does not require travel
while still maximizing member and public participation and may use a
meeting format that requires members to be physically present at one
location only when necessary or required by law. Meetings that require
a member's physical presence at one location must be held in state
facilities whenever possible((, and)). Meetings conducted using
private facilities must be approved by the director of the office of
financial management, except that meetings of class one groups
affiliated with institutions of higher education do not require such
approval.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class one groups
that are funded by sources other than the state general fund are
encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with
conducting the business of the group including use of other meeting
formats that do not require travel.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.03.230 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 143 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any agricultural commodity board or commission established
pursuant to Title 15 or 16 RCW shall be identified as a class two group
for purposes of compensation.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of a
class two group is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not to
exceed one hundred dollars for each day during which the member attends
an official meeting of the group or performs statutorily prescribed
duties approved by the chairperson of the group. A person shall not
receive compensation for a day of service under this section if the
person (a) occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time in
nature, in any agency of the federal government, Washington state
government, or Washington state local government; and (b) receives any
compensation from such government for working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is authorized under the law dealing in particular with the specific
group to which the member belongs or dealing in particular with the
members of that specific group.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, no person
designated as a member of a class two board, commission, council,
committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence,
lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the
state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010. Class two groups, when feasible, shall use an
alternative means of conducting a meeting that does not require travel
while still maximizing member and public participation and may use a
meeting format that requires members to be physically present at one
location only when necessary or required by law. Meetings that require
a member's physical presence at one location must be held in state
facilities whenever possible((, and)). Meetings conducted using
private facilities must be approved by the director of the office of
financial management, except that meetings of class two groups
affiliated with institutions of higher education do not require such
approval.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class two groups
that are funded by sources other than the state general fund are
encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with
conducting the business of the group including use of other meeting
formats that do not require travel.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.03.240 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 144 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any part-time, statutory board, commission, council, committee,
or other similar group which has rule-making authority, performs quasi
judicial functions, has responsibility for the administration or policy
direction of a state agency or program, or performs regulatory or
licensing functions with respect to a specific profession, occupation,
business, or industry shall be identified as a class three group for
purposes of compensation.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of a
class three group is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not
to exceed fifty dollars for each day during which the member attends an
official meeting of the group or performs statutorily prescribed duties
approved by the chairperson of the group. A person shall not receive
compensation for a day of service under this section if the person (a)
occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time in nature, in any
agency of the federal government, Washington state government, or
Washington state local government; and (b) receives any compensation
from such government for working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is authorized under the law dealing in particular with the specific
group to which the member belongs or dealing in particular with the
members of that specific group.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, no person
designated as a member of a class three board, commission, council,
committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence,
lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the
state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010. Class three groups, when feasible, shall use
an alternative means of conducting a meeting that does not require
travel while still maximizing member and public participation and may
use a meeting format that requires members to be physically present at
one location only when necessary or required by law. Meetings that
require a member's physical presence at one location must be held in
state facilities whenever possible((, and)). Meetings conducted using
private facilities must be approved by the director of the office of
financial management, except that meetings of class three groups
affiliated with institutions of higher education do not require such
approval.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class three
groups that are funded by sources other than the state general fund are
encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with
conducting the business of the group including use of other meeting
formats that do not require travel.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.03.250 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 145 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A part-time, statutory board, commission, council, committee,
or other similar group shall be identified as a class four group for
purposes of compensation if the group:
(a) Has rule-making authority, performs quasi-judicial functions,
or has responsibility for the administration or policy direction of a
state agency or program;
(b) Has duties that are deemed by the legislature to be of
overriding sensitivity and importance to the public welfare and the
operation of state government; and
(c) Requires service from its members representing a significant
demand on their time that is normally in excess of one hundred hours of
meeting time per year.
(2) Each member of a class four group is eligible to receive
compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars for each
day during which the member attends an official meeting of the group or
performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the chairperson of
the group. A person shall not receive compensation for a day of
service under this section if the person (a) occupies a position,
normally regarded as full-time in nature, in any agency of the federal
government, Washington state government, or Washington state local
government; and (b) receives any compensation from such government for
working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is authorized under the law dealing in particular with the specific
group to which the member belongs or dealing in particular with the
members of that specific group.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class four
groups, when feasible, shall use an alternative means of conducting a
meeting that does not require travel while still maximizing member and
public participation and may use a meeting format that requires members
to be physically present at one location only when necessary or
required by law. Meetings that require a member's physical presence at
one location must be held in state facilities whenever possible((,
and)). Meetings conducted using private facilities must be approved by
the director of the office of financial management, except that
meetings of class four groups affiliated with institutions of higher
education do not require such approval.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.03.265 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 146 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any part-time commission that has rule-making authority,
performs quasi-judicial functions, has responsibility for the policy
direction of a health profession credentialing program, and performs
regulatory and licensing functions with respect to a health care
profession licensed under Title 18 RCW shall be identified as a class
five group for purposes of compensation.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of a
class five group is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not
to exceed two hundred fifty dollars for each day during which the
member attends an official meeting of the group or performs statutorily
prescribed duties approved by the chairperson of the group. A person
shall not receive compensation for a day of service under this section
if the person (a) occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time
in nature, in any agency of the federal government, Washington state
government, or Washington state local government; and (b) receives any
compensation from such government for working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is necessarily incurred in the course of authorized business consistent
with the responsibilities of the commission established by law.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, no person
designated as a member of a class five board, commission, council,
committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence,
lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the
state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010. Class five groups, when feasible, shall use
an alternative means of conducting a meeting that does not require
travel while still maximizing member and public participation and may
use a meeting format that requires members to be physically present at
one location only when necessary or required by law. Meetings that
require a member's physical presence at one location must be held in
state facilities whenever possible((, and)). Meetings conducted using
private facilities must be approved by the director of the office of
financial management, except that meetings of class five groups
affiliated with institutions of higher education do not require such
approval.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class five
groups that are funded by sources other than the state general fund are
encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with
conducting the business of the group including use of other meeting
formats that do not require travel.

Sec. 7 2010 c 3 s 602 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) From the effective date of this section until July 1, 2011,
state agencies of the legislative, executive, and judicial branches
shall not enter into any contracts or other agreements entered into for
the acquisition of personal services not related to an emergency or
other catastrophic event that requires government action to protect
life or public safety.
(2) This section does not apply to personal services contracts or
other agreements for the acquisition of personal services where the
costs are funded exclusively from private or federal grants, where the
costs are for tax and fee collection, where the costs are for revenue
generation and auditing activities, where the costs are for the review
and research conducted by the joint transportation committee pursuant
to RCW 44.04.300, where the costs are necessary to receive or maintain
federal funds by the state, or((, in)) to institutions of higher
education((, where the costs are not funded from state funds or
tuition)). This section also does not apply where costs are related to
hearing officers, where costs are related to real estate appraisals or
habitat assessments, where costs are related to carrying out a court
order, or where costs are related to information technology contracts
related to an information services board approved information
technology project, or where costs are related to judicial information
system technology projects.
(3) Exceptions to this section may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010.

Sec. 8 2010 c 3 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) From the effective date of this section until July 1, 2011,
state agencies of the legislative, executive, and judicial branches
shall not enter into any contracts or other agreements for the
acquisition of any item of equipment the cost of which exceeds five
thousand dollars and is not related to an emergency or other
catastrophic event that requires government action to protect life or
public safety.
(2) This section does not apply to the unemployment insurance
program of the employment security department, to costs that are for
tax and fee collection, for revenue generation and audit activities, or
for receiving or maintaining federal funds by the state, or((, in)) to
institutions of higher education((, to costs not funded from state
funds or tuition)). This section also does not apply to costs that are
funded exclusively from private or federal grants, or for equipment
necessary to complete a project funded in the omnibus capital or
transportation appropriation acts, or the operational divisions of the
department of information services, or cost related to the
continuation, renewal, or establishment of maintenance for existing
computer software licensing and existing computer hardware, or for
costs related to the judicial information system.
(3) Exceptions to this section may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010.

Sec. 9 2010 c 3 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) State agencies of the legislative, executive, and judicial
branches shall not make expenditures for the cost or reimbursement of
out-of-state travel or out-of-state training by state employees where
the travel or training is not related to an emergency or other
catastrophic event that requires government action to protect life or
public safety, or direct service delivery, and the travel or training
occurs after the effective date of this section and before July 1,
2011.
(2) This section does not apply to travel expenditures when the
costs are funded exclusively from private or federal grants. This
section does not apply to the unemployment insurance program of the
employment security department, to costs that are for tax and fee
collection, for revenue generation and audit activities, or for
receiving or maintaining federal funds by the state, or((, in)) to
institutions of higher education((, to costs not funded from state
funds or tuition)). This section also does not apply to costs related
to carrying out a court order or to costs to travel by air into
Washington state from any airport located in a contiguous state of
which the largest city is part of a metropolitan statistical area with
a city located in Washington state, or to motor vehicle and parking
costs for single day travel to a contiguous state or British Columbia,
Canada.
(3) Exceptions to this section may be granted under section 605 of
this act.

Sec. 10 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 901 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
(1) From the effective date of this section until July 1, 2011,
state agencies of the legislative, executive, and judicial branches
shall not establish new staff positions or fill vacant existing staff
positions except as specifically authorized by this section.
(2) The following activities of state agencies are exempt from
subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Direct custody, supervision, and patient care in corrections,
juvenile rehabilitation, institutional care of veterans, the mentally
ill, developmentally disabled, state hospitals, the special commitment
center, and the schools for the blind and the deaf;
(b) Direct protective services to children and other vulnerable
populations in the department of social and health services;
(c) Washington state patrol investigative services and field
enforcement;
(d) Hazardous materials response and emergency cleanup;
(e) Emergency public health and patient safety response and the
public health laboratory;
(f) Military operations and emergency management within the
military department;
(g) Firefighting;
(h) Enforcement officers in the department of fish and wildlife,
the liquor control board, the gambling commission, and the department
of natural resources;
(i) Park rangers at the parks and recreation commission;
(j) Seasonal employment by natural resources agencies to the extent
that employment levels do not exceed the prior fiscal year;
(k) Seasonal employment in the department of transportation
maintenance programs to the extent that employment levels do not exceed
the prior fiscal year;
(l) Employees hired on a seasonal basis by the department of
agriculture for inspection and certification of agricultural products
and for insect detection;
(m) Activities directly related to tax and fee collection, revenue
generation, auditing, and recovery;
(n) In institutions of higher education, ((any positions directly
related to academic programs, as well as positions not funded from
state funds or tuition, positions that are filled by enrolled students
at their own institution as student workers, positions in campus police
and security, positions related to emergency management and response,
and positions related to student health care and counseling)) all
positions;
(o) Operations of the state lottery and liquor control board
business enterprises;
(p) The unemployment insurance program of the employment security
department; and
(q) Activities that are necessary to receive or maintain federal
funds by the state.
(3) The exemptions specified in subsection (2) of this section do
not require the establishment of new staff positions or the filling of
vacant staff positions in the activities specified.
(4) Exceptions to this section may be granted under section 605 of
this act.
(5) Also exempted from this section are positions related to
facility realignments in the department of corrections, positions
related to the transfer of programs between state agencies assumed in
this act, and disability determination staff funded solely by federal
funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act may be known and cited as the
college efficiency and savings act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---