BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that, as of 2011, the
challenges posed by low subsidies for child care providers persist. As
a result, the availability of quality child care in the state continues
to suffer. The legislature further finds that while state child care
subsidy programs assist eligible families with children pay child care
costs, the amount of the current subsidy does not cover the costs of
caring for children and that a structure to provide for regular subsidy
increases should be put in place.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, "child care subsidy" means a payment
from the state through a child care subsidy program established
pursuant to RCW 74.12.340, 74.08A.340, 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through
98.17, or any successor program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On July 1, 2014, the child care subsidy rates paid to all child
care centers shall be increased by five percent if the director of the
office of financial management has certified that this increase is
economically feasible for the state.
(2) Beginning with the 2015-2017 biennium and every two years
thereafter, the rates of child care subsidies paid to all child care
centers shall be adjusted for inflation if the director of the office
of financial management has certified that this increase is
economically feasible for the state. The adjustment made under this
subsection must be made using one of the following indices, whichever
produces the greatest increase to the subsidy rate for that biennium:
(a) The consumer price index, which for the purposes of this
section, means, for any calendar year, the consumer price index for the
Seattle, Washington, area as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics
of the United States department of labor; or
(b) The implicit price deflator for personal consumption
expenditures for the United States as published for the most recent
twelve-month period by the bureau of economic analysis of the United
States department of commerce.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.12.010 and 1999 c 120 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of the administration of temporary assistance
for needy families, the term "dependent child" means any child in need
under the age of eighteen years who is living with a relative as
specified under federal temporary assistance for needy families program
requirements, in a place of residence maintained by one or more of such
relatives as his, her, or their home((s)). The term a "dependent
child" shall, notwithstanding the foregoing, also include a child who
would meet such requirements except for his or her removal from the
home of a relative specified above as a result of a judicial
determination that continuation therein would be contrary to the
welfare of such child, for whose placement and care the state
department of social and health services or the county office is
responsible, and who has been placed in a licensed or approved child
care institution or foster home as a result of such determination and
who: (((1))) (a) Was receiving an aid to families with dependent
children grant for the month in which court proceedings leading to such
determination were initiated; or (((2))) (b) would have received aid to
families with dependent children for such month if application had been
made therefor; or (((3))) (c) in the case of a child who had been
living with a specified relative within six months prior to the month
in which such proceedings were initiated, would have received aid to
families with dependent children for such month if in such month he or
she had been living with such a relative and application had been made
therefor, as authorized by the social security act.
(2) "Child care subsidy" means a payment from the state through a
child care subsidy program established pursuant to RCW 74.12.340,
74.08A.340, 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through 98.17, or any successor
program.
(3) "Temporary assistance for needy families" means money payments,
services, and remedial care with respect to a dependent child or
dependent children and the needy parent or relative with whom the child
lives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 74.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On July 1, 2014, the child care subsidy rates paid to all child
care centers shall be increased by five percent if the director of the
office of financial management has certified that this increase is
economically feasible for the state.
(2) Beginning with the 2015-2017 biennium and every two years
thereafter, the rates of child care subsidies paid to all child care
centers shall be adjusted for inflation if the director of the office
of financial management has certified that this increase is
economically feasible for the state. The adjustment made under this
subsection must be made using one of the following indices, whichever
produces the greatest increase to the subsidy rate for that biennium:
(a) The consumer price index, which for the purposes of this
section, means, for any calendar year, the consumer price index for the
Seattle, Washington, area as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics
of the United States department of labor; or
(b) The implicit price deflator for personal consumption
expenditures for the United States as published for the most recent
twelve-month period by the bureau of economic analysis of the United
States department of commerce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall review the subsidy rates currently paid to
child care centers whose average daily population includes more than
fifty percent of children for whom the center receives a state
subsidized rate. No later than December 1, 2011, the department shall
make a recommendation to the appropriate legislative committees whether
the subsidy rates to these child care centers should be increased, and
if so, by how much and for what reasons. In developing its
recommendation, the department must consider the results of the state's
voluntary quality improvement rating system pilot communities and
potential impacts a variable subsidy rate structure would have on the
quality of child care in the state. If the department recommends that
subsidy rates for these centers should not be raised, then it shall
detail the reasons for its conclusion.

--- END ---