BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
encourage counties to conduct an inquest into the causes and
circumstances of any death within the state of Washington involving a
member of any law enforcement agency while in the performance of his or
her duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) The county prosecuting attorney shall inform the county
executive, or in those counties where an elected county executive does
not exist, the county coroner or medical examiner, whenever an
investigation into a death involving a member of any law enforcement
agency in the county is complete and shall also make a recommendation
as to whether an inquest is advised under this section.
(b) The county executive, coroner, or medical examiner shall
determine whether or not an inquest should be conducted.
(c)(i) When determining whether an inquest shall be conducted, the
county executive, coroner, or medical examiner shall consider whether
a decision to prosecute has been made; whether the death was the result
of a condition existing prior to and/or apart from the police
involvement; whether the deceased was in custody at the time of the
death; whether the family of the deceased desire an inquest; and any
other factor that touches on the connection between the manner of death
and the actions of law enforcement.
(ii) If an inquest is to be held, the county executive, coroner, or
medical examiner shall request that the county superior court or the
district court conduct the inquest. If the superior court or the
district court, as applicable, accepts the responsibility, the inquest
shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures provided in
subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) An inquest shall be held in a trial courtroom selected by
the judge designated to conduct the inquest. The inquest shall be an
open public hearing.
(b) The participating parties shall be:
(i) The family of the deceased, who may have an attorney present.
(ii) The person or persons involved in the death, if known, who may
have an attorney present.
(iii) The employing government department or departments who may be
represented by its/their statutory attorney or lawfully appointed
designee.
(iv) The prosecuting attorney or designee whose role shall be to
assist the court.
(c)(i) The court shall maintain the traditional judicial role of
presiding over the inquest.
(ii) The court shall determine the scope of the issues to be
inquired into at the inquest, after consultation with the participating
parties.
(iii) The court shall determine who shall be called as witnesses,
after consultation with the participating parties.
(d)(i) Discoverable material shall be exchanged among the judge,
the prosecuting attorney, the attorney representing the person involved
in the death, the attorney representing the family of the deceased, and
the attorneys for the participating parties.
(ii) Discovery materials are to be used solely by the attorneys for
participation in the inquest. Discovery materials include the police
investigative file of the incident that resulted in the death. They
also include the report of the medical examiner, crime laboratory
reports, and the names, addresses, and summaries and/or copies of
statements of any witnesses obtained by any party.
(iii) In the event confidential materials in the possession of any
person or agency are sought for use in the inquest, the court, upon a
prima facie showing of necessity, relevancy, and lack of an alternative
source for the materials, shall examine the materials in camera. The
legal representative of the person or agency in possession of the
materials shall have the right to participate in all proceedings which
concern these materials.
(iv) Following an in camera review, the judge may order discovery
of the materials if he or she finds that the interest sought to be
protected by the claim of confidentiality is clearly outweighed by the
interest of the requesting party in using the materials in the inquest.
(v) Protective orders may be used to limit discovery, and the court
may order the return of all discretionarily ordered discovery.
(e)(i) The inquest shall commence within ninety days after
designation of the inquest judge. The commencement date should not be
extended unless the inquest judge finds good cause warranting
extension.
(ii) One or more mandatory preinquest conferences shall be held at
which all the participating parties shall be represented. The
participating parties shall submit proposed voir dire questions, jury
instructions and interrogatories, witness lists, and proposed narrative
statements of background facts, and advise the judge of any other
matters relating to the timely and efficient scheduling and
administration of the inquest.
(iii) The judge shall prepare a preinquest order that schedules the
date and length of the inquest, and decides any voir dire issues, the
narrative statement of background facts, if the judge elects to make a
statement under (i)(ii) of this subsection, jury instructions and
interrogatories, which may be revised during the course of the inquest
as appropriate, the scope of the inquest, and any other matters
relating to the timely and efficient scheduling and administration of
the inquest.
(f)(i) Inquest jurors shall be selected from the regular superior
court juror pool.
(ii) Voir dire shall be by the judge with questions submitted by
the participating attorneys. There shall be no set limit to the number
of jurors who may be excused by the judge.
(iii) Inquest jurors shall be allowed to submit questions in
writing to the judge, who shall review such questions in camera with
the participating parties. The judge shall determine whether or not
the questions will be submitted to the witness and the manner of
submission.
(g) The inquest proceedings shall be recorded, either
electronically or by a court reporter.
(h) Electronic media participation, television cameras, and tape
recorders shall be permitted only in accordance with code of judicial
conduct 3. The Washington bench-bar-press principles and guidelines
shall apply to inquests to the extent applicable.
(i)(i) There shall be no opening statements or closing arguments by
counsel. The judge's introduction shall include an instruction in
substantially the following form:
"You have been empaneled as members of a coroner's jury in this
inquest. This is not a trial. The purpose of the inquest is to
provide a public inquiry into the causes and circumstances surrounding
the death of [decedent]. It is not the purpose of this inquest to
determine the criminal or civil liability of any person or agency.
Your role will be to hear the evidence and answer questions according
to instructions given to you at the close of the proceedings.
The prosecuting attorney's role is solely to assist the court in
presenting the evidence. This court has determined who will be called
as witnesses and the issues which you will be asked to consider."
(ii) To focus the proceeding on the issues to be inquired into at
the inquest, the judge's introduction may also include a narrative
statement of background facts.
(j) The rules of evidence, as amended, shall apply at inquests.
The judge shall not comment on the evidence.
(k) Witnesses shall be excluded from the courtroom upon request
from any participating attorney, except any law enforcement officer or
person whose actions are being reviewed, and at least one
representative of the family of the deceased shall be allowed to remain
in the courtroom during the entire proceeding.
(l)(i) The prosecuting attorney shall ordinarily conduct the
initial examination of each witness, provided that the judge may
determine that another attorney for a participating party may conduct
the initial examination of a witness.
(ii) The attorney for the participating parties shall be allowed
follow-up questions within the scope of the inquest.
(iii) The attorneys for the parties shall rotate the initial
opportunity for follow-up questions.
The attorney representing the person involved in the death shall
have the prerogative of first asking follow-up questions of such
person, when desired. The attorney representing the family of the
deceased shall have the prerogative of first asking follow-up questions
of the family, when desired.
(m) Interrogatories to the jury must deal with questions of fact.
They must not deal with questions of law, policy, or recommendations.
The purpose of the interrogatories is to give the jury an opportunity
to judge credibility and determine the significant factual issues
involved in the inquest. To this end, it is expected that the jury
will decide what actions occurred and, where appropriate, what the
actors thought or knew. Interrogatories shall not answer whether any
person or agency is civilly or criminally liable.
(n) The jury shall be given written instructions by the judge. The
jury shall be told to indicate the number of yes/no findings for each
interrogatory.
(o) At the conclusion of the inquest, the judge shall promptly
transmit the jury's findings and its responses to interrogatories to
the county executive or county legislative authority in those counties
where no county executive exists.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.24.020 and 2009 c 549 s 4032 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Any)) (1) A coroner, in his or her discretion, may hold an
inquest if the coroner suspects that the death of a person was
unnatural, or violent, or resulted from unlawful means, or from
suspicious circumstances, or was of such a nature as to indicate the
possibility of death by the hand of the deceased or through the
instrumentality of some other person: PROVIDED, That, except under
suspicious circumstances, no inquest shall be held following a traffic
death.
(2) An inquest may be held pursuant to section 2 of this act by a
county to investigate the causes and circumstances of any death within
the county involving a member of a law enforcement agency while in the
performance of his or her duties. Any inquest conducted under this
subsection shall be conducted by the county executive, or in those
counties in which an elected county executive does not exist, by the
county coroner or medical examiner.
(3) The coroner, county executive, or medical examiner in the
county where an inquest is to be convened pursuant to this chapter
shall notify the superior court to provide persons to serve as a jury
of inquest to hear all the evidence concerning the death and to inquire
into and render a true verdict on the cause of death. Jurors shall be
selected and summoned in the same manner and shall have the same
qualifications as specified in chapter 2.36 RCW. The prosecuting
attorney having jurisdiction shall be notified in advance of any such
inquest to be held, and at his or her discretion may be present at and
assist the coroner, county executive, or medical examiner in the
conduct of the same. The coroner, county executive, or medical
examiner may adjourn the inquest from time to time as he or she may
deem necessary.
The costs of inquests shall be borne by the county in which the
inquest is held.

--- END ---