BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds and declares that:
(a) The rate of home foreclosures continues to rise to
unprecedented levels, both for prime and subprime loans, and a new wave
of foreclosures has occurred due to rising unemployment, job loss, and
higher adjustable loan payments;
(b) Prolonged foreclosures contribute to the decline in the state's
housing market, loss of property values, and other loss of revenue to
the state;
(c) In recent years, the legislature has enacted procedures to help
encourage and strengthen the communication between homeowners and
lenders and to assist homeowners in navigating through the foreclosure
process; however, Washington's nonjudicial foreclosure process does not
have a mechanism for homeowners to readily access a neutral third party
to assist them in a fair and timely way; and
(d) Several jurisdictions across the nation have foreclosure
mediation programs that provide a cost-effective process for the
homeowner and lender, with the assistance of a trained mediator, to
reach a mutually acceptable resolution that avoids foreclosure.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to:
(a) Encourage homeowners to utilize the skills and professional
judgment of housing counselors as early as possible in the foreclosure
process;
(b) Create a framework for homeowners and beneficiaries to
communicate with each other to reach a resolution and avoid foreclosure
whenever possible; and
(c) Provide a process for mediation when a housing counselor or
attorney determines that mediation is appropriate. For mediation to be
effective, the parties should attend the mediation (in person,
telephonically, through an agent, or otherwise), provide the necessary
documentation in a timely manner, willingly share information, actively
present, discuss, and explore options to avoid foreclosure, negotiate
willingly and cooperatively, maintain a professional and cooperative
demeanor, cooperate with the mediator, and keep any agreements made in
mediation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act may be known and cited as the
foreclosure fairness act.

Sec. 3 RCW 61.24.005 and 2009 c 292 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affiliate of beneficiary" means any entity which controls, is
controlled by, or is under common control with a beneficiary.
(2) "Beneficiary" means the holder of the instrument or document
evidencing the obligations secured by the deed of trust, excluding
persons holding the same as security for a different obligation.
(3) "Borrower" means a person or a general partner in a
partnership, including a joint venture, that is liable for all or part
of the obligations secured by the deed of trust under the instrument or
other document that is the principal evidence of such obligations, or
the person's successors if they are liable for those obligations under
a written agreement with the beneficiary.
(4) "Commercial loan" means a loan that is not made primarily for
personal, family, or household purposes.
(5) "Department" means the department of commerce or its designee.
(6) "Fair value" means the value of the property encumbered by a
deed of trust that is sold pursuant to a trustee's sale. This value
shall be determined by the court or other appropriate adjudicator by
reference to the most probable price, as of the date of the trustee's
sale, which would be paid in cash or other immediately available funds,
after deduction of prior liens and encumbrances with interest to the
date of the trustee's sale, for which the property would sell on such
date after reasonable exposure in the market under conditions requisite
to a fair sale, with the buyer and seller each acting prudently,
knowledgeably, and for self-interest, and assuming that neither is
under duress.
(((6))) (7) "Grantor" means a person, or its successors, who
executes a deed of trust to encumber the person's interest in property
as security for the performance of all or part of the borrower's
obligations.
(((7))) (8) "Guarantor" means any person and its successors who is
not a borrower and who guarantees any of the obligations secured by a
deed of trust in any written agreement other than the deed of trust.
(((8))) (9) "Housing counselor" means a housing counselor that has
been approved by the United States department of housing and urban
development or approved by the Washington state housing finance
commission.
(10) "Owner-occupied" means property that is the principal
residence of the borrower.
(((9))) (11) "Person" means any natural person, or legal or
governmental entity.
(((10))) (12) "Record" and "recorded" includes the appropriate
registration proceedings, in the instance of registered land.
(((11))) (13) "Residential real property" means property consisting
solely of a single-family residence, a residential condominium unit, or
a residential cooperative unit.
(((12))) (14) "Tenant-occupied property" means property consisting
solely of residential real property that is the principal residence of
a tenant subject to chapter 59.18 RCW or other building with four or
fewer residential units that is the principal residence of a tenant
subject to chapter 59.18 RCW.
(((13))) (15) "Trustee" means the person designated as the trustee
in the deed of trust or appointed under RCW 61.24.010(2).
(((14))) (16) "Trustee's sale" means a nonjudicial sale under a
deed of trust undertaken pursuant to this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 61.24.030 and 2009 c 292 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be requisite to a trustee's sale:
(1) That the deed of trust contains a power of sale;
(2) That the deed of trust contains a statement that the real
property conveyed is not used principally for agricultural purposes;
provided, if the statement is false on the date the deed of trust was
granted or amended to include that statement, and false on the date of
the trustee's sale, then the deed of trust must be foreclosed
judicially. Real property is used for agricultural purposes if it is
used in an operation that produces crops, livestock, or aquatic goods;
(3) That a default has occurred in the obligation secured or a
covenant of the grantor, which by the terms of the deed of trust makes
operative the power to sell;
(4) That no action commenced by the beneficiary of the deed of
trust is now pending to seek satisfaction of an obligation secured by
the deed of trust in any court by reason of the grantor's default on
the obligation secured: PROVIDED, That (a) the seeking of the
appointment of a receiver shall not constitute an action for purposes
of this chapter; and (b) if a receiver is appointed, the grantor shall
be entitled to any rents or profits derived from property subject to a
homestead as defined in RCW 6.13.010. If the deed of trust was granted
to secure a commercial loan, this subsection shall not apply to actions
brought to enforce any other lien or security interest granted to
secure the obligation secured by the deed of trust being foreclosed;
(5) That the deed of trust has been recorded in each county in
which the land or some part thereof is situated;
(6) That prior to the date of the notice of trustee's sale and
continuing thereafter through the date of the trustee's sale, the
trustee must maintain a street address in this state where personal
service of process may be made, and the trustee must maintain a
physical presence and have telephone service at such address;
(7)(a) That, for residential real property, before the notice of
trustee's sale is recorded, transmitted, or served, the trustee shall
have proof that the beneficiary is the owner of any promissory note or
other obligation secured by the deed of trust. A declaration by the
beneficiary made under the penalty of perjury stating that the
beneficiary is the actual holder of the promissory note or other
obligation secured by the deed of trust shall be sufficient proof as
required under this subsection.
(b) Unless the trustee has violated his or her duty under RCW
61.24.010(4), the trustee is entitled to rely on the beneficiary's
declaration as evidence of proof required under this subsection.
(c) This subsection (7) does not apply to association beneficiaries
subject to chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.38 RCW; ((and))
(8) That at least thirty days before notice of sale shall be
recorded, transmitted or served, written notice of default shall be
transmitted by the beneficiary or trustee to the borrower and grantor
at their last known addresses by both first-class and either registered
or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the beneficiary or
trustee shall cause to be posted in a conspicuous place on the
premises, a copy of the notice, or personally served on the borrower
and grantor. This notice shall contain the following information:
(a) A description of the property which is then subject to the deed
of trust;
(b) A statement identifying each county in which the deed of trust
is recorded and the document number given to the deed of trust upon
recording by each county auditor or recording officer;
(c) A statement that the beneficiary has declared the borrower or
grantor to be in default, and a concise statement of the default
alleged;
(d) An itemized account of the amount or amounts in arrears if the
default alleged is failure to make payments;
(e) An itemized account of all other specific charges, costs, or
fees that the borrower, grantor, or any guarantor is or may be obliged
to pay to reinstate the deed of trust before the recording of the
notice of sale;
(f) A statement showing the total of (d) and (e) of this
subsection, designated clearly and conspicuously as the amount
necessary to reinstate the note and deed of trust before the recording
of the notice of sale;
(g) A statement that failure to cure the alleged default within
thirty days of the date of mailing of the notice, or if personally
served, within thirty days of the date of personal service thereof, may
lead to recordation, transmittal, and publication of a notice of sale,
and that the property described in (a) of this subsection may be sold
at public auction at a date no less than one hundred twenty days in the
future;
(h) A statement that the effect of the recordation, transmittal,
and publication of a notice of sale will be to (i) increase the costs
and fees and (ii) publicize the default and advertise the grantor's
property for sale;
(i) A statement that the effect of the sale of the grantor's
property by the trustee will be to deprive the grantor of all their
interest in the property described in (a) of this subsection;
(j) A statement that the borrower, grantor, and any guarantor has
recourse to the courts pursuant to RCW 61.24.130 to contest the alleged
default on any proper ground;
(k) In the event the property secured by the deed of trust is
owner-occupied residential real property, a statement, prominently set
out at the beginning of the notice, which shall state as follows:
"You should take care to protect your interest in your home. This
notice of default (your failure to pay) is the first step in a process
that could result in you losing your home. You should carefully review
your options. For example:
Can you pay and stop the foreclosure process?
Do you dispute the failure to pay?
Can you sell your property to preserve your equity?
Are you able to refinance this loan or obligation with a new loan
or obligation from another lender with payments, terms, and fees that
are more affordable?
Do you qualify for any government or private homeowner assistance
programs?
Do you know if filing for bankruptcy is an option? What are the
pros and cons of doing so?
Do not ignore this notice; because if you do nothing, you could
lose your home at a foreclosure sale. (No foreclosure sale can be held
any sooner than ninety days after a notice of sale is issued and a
notice of sale cannot be issued until thirty days after this notice.)
Also, if you do nothing to pay what you owe, be careful of people who
claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses
that watch for the notices of sale in order to unfairly profit as a
result of borrowers' distress.
You may feel you need help understanding what to do. There are a
number of professional resources available, including home loan
counselors and attorneys, who may assist you. Many legal services are
lower-cost or even free, depending on your ability to pay. If you
desire legal help in understanding your options or handling this
default, you may obtain a referral (at no charge) by contacting the
county bar association in the county where your home is located. These
legal referral services also provide information about lower-cost or
free legal services for those who qualify. You may contact the
Department of Financial Institutions or the statewide civil legal aid
hotline for possible assistance or referrals"; and
(l) In the event the property secured by the deed of trust is
residential real property, the name and address of the owner of any
promissory notes or other obligations secured by the deed of trust and
the name, address, and telephone number of a party acting as a servicer
of the obligations secured by the deed of trust((.")); and
(9) That, for owner-occupied residential real property, before the
notice of the trustee's sale is recorded, transmitted, or served, the
beneficiary has complied with RCW 61.24.031 and, if applicable, section
7 of this act.

Sec. 5 RCW 61.24.031 and 2009 c 292 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent may not issue a
notice of default under RCW 61.24.030(8) until ((thirty)) ninety days
after initial contact with the borrower is made as required under (b)
of this subsection or ((thirty)) ninety days after satisfying the due
diligence requirements as described in subsection (((5))) (4) of this
section.
(b) A beneficiary or authorized agent shall make initial contact
with the borrower by letter to provide the borrower with information
required under (c) of this subsection and by telephone ((in order to
assess the borrower's financial ability to pay the debt secured by the
deed of trust and explore options for the borrower to avoid
foreclosure)) as required under subsection (4) of this section. The
letter required under this subsection must be mailed in accordance with
subsection (((5))) (4)(a) of this section and must include the
information described in (c) of this subsection and subsection (((5)(a)
and)) (4)(e) (i) through (iv) of this section.
(c) ((During the initial contact, the beneficiary or authorized
agent shall advise the borrower that he or she has the right to request
a subsequent meeting and, if requested, the beneficiary or authorized
agent shall schedule the meeting to occur within fourteen days of the
request. The)) The letter required under this subsection shall
include:
(i) A paragraph printed in no less than twelve point font and
bolded that reads: "You should contact a housing counselor or attorney
as soon as possible. Failure to contact a housing counselor or
attorney within one hundred twenty days from the date you receive this
letter may result in your losing certain opportunities, such as meeting
with your lender or participating in mediation. A housing counselor or
attorney can help you work with your lender to avoid foreclosure.";
(ii) The toll-free telephone number from the United States
department of housing and urban development to find a department-approved housing counseling agency, the toll-free numbers for the
department of financial institutions, and the statewide civil legal aid
hotline for assistance and referrals to other housing counselors and
attorneys;
(iii) A paragraph stating that a housing counselor may be available
at little or no cost to the borrower and that whether or not the
borrower contacts a housing counselor or attorney, the borrower has the
right to request a meeting with the beneficiary; and
(iv) A paragraph stating that in the next sixty days the borrower
has an opportunity to meet with his or her beneficiary in an attempt to
resolve the foreclosure and that, after ninety days from the date of
the letter, a notice of default may be issued, which starts the
foreclosure process.
(d) If a meeting is requested by the borrower or the borrower's
housing counselor or attorney, the beneficiary or authorized agent
shall schedule the meeting to occur before the notice of default is
issued. An assessment of the borrower's financial ability to ((repay
the debt)) modify or restructure the loan obligation and a discussion
of options ((may)) must occur during the ((initial contact or at a
subsequent)) meeting scheduled for that purpose. ((At the initial
contact, the borrower must be provided the toll-free telephone number
made available by the department to find a department-certified housing
counseling agency and the toll-free numbers for the department of
financial institutions and the statewide civil legal aid hotline for
possible assistance and referrals.
(d) Any meeting under this section may occur telephonically.))
(e) The meeting scheduled to assess the borrower's financial
ability to modify or restructure the loan obligation and discuss
options to avoid foreclosure must be in person, unless the requirement
to meet in person is waived in writing by the borrower or the
borrower's representative. A person who is authorized to modify the
loan obligation or reach an alternative resolution to foreclosure on
behalf of the beneficiary may participate by telephone or video
conference, so long as a representative of the beneficiary is at the
meeting in person.
(2) A notice of default issued under RCW 61.24.030(8) must include
a declaration, as provided in subsection (((9))) (8) of this section,
from the beneficiary or authorized agent that it has contacted the
borrower as provided in subsection (1)(((b))) of this section, it has
tried with due diligence to contact the borrower under subsection
(((5))) (4) of this section, or the borrower has surrendered the
property to the trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent. Unless the
trustee has violated his or her duty under RCW 61.24.010(4), the
trustee is entitled to rely on the declaration as evidence that the
requirements of this section have been satisfied, and the trustee is
not liable for the beneficiary's or its authorized agent's failure to
comply with the requirements of this section.
(3) ((A beneficiary's or authorized agent's loss mitigation
personnel may participate by telephone during any contact required
under this section.
(4) Within fourteen days)) (a) If, after the initial contact under
subsection (1) of this section, ((if)) a borrower has designated a
((department-certified)) housing counseling agency, housing counselor,
or attorney((, or other advisor)) to discuss with the beneficiary or
authorized agent, on the borrower's behalf, options for the borrower to
avoid foreclosure, the borrower shall inform the beneficiary or
authorized agent and provide the contact information to the beneficiary
or authorized agent. The beneficiary or authorized agent shall contact
the designated representative for the borrower ((for the discussion
within fourteen days after the representative is designated by the
borrower)) to meet.
(b) The beneficiary or authorized agent and the borrower's
representative shall attempt to reach a resolution for the borrower
within the ninety days from the time the initial contact is sent and
the notice of default is issued. A resolution may include, but is not
limited to, a loan modification, an agreement to conduct a short sale,
or a deed in lieu of foreclosure transaction, or some other workout
plan. Any ((deed of trust)) modification or workout plan offered at
the meeting with the borrower's designated representative by the
beneficiary or authorized agent is subject to approval by the borrower.
(((5))) (4) A notice of default may be issued under RCW
61.24.030(8) if a beneficiary or authorized agent has not contacted a
borrower as required under subsection (1)(b) of this section and the
failure to contact the borrower occurred despite the due diligence of
the beneficiary or authorized agent. Due diligence requires the
following:
(a) A beneficiary or authorized agent shall first attempt to
contact a borrower by sending a first-class letter to the address in
the beneficiary's records for sending account statements to the
borrower and to the address of the property encumbered by the deed of
trust. The letter must include the ((toll-free telephone number made
available by the department to find a department-certified housing
counseling agency, and the following information:
"You may contact the Department of Financial Institutions, the
Washington State Bar Association, or the statewide civil legal aid
hotline for possible assistance or referrals.")) information required
in subsection (1)(c) of this section.
(b)(i) After the letter has been sent, the beneficiary or
authorized agent shall attempt to contact the borrower by telephone at
least three times at different hours and on different days. Telephone
calls must be made to the primary and secondary telephone numbers on
file with the beneficiary or authorized agent.
(ii) A beneficiary or authorized agent may attempt to contact a
borrower using an automated system to dial borrowers if the telephone
call, when answered, is connected to a live representative of the
beneficiary or authorized agent.
(iii) A beneficiary or authorized agent satisfies the telephone
contact requirements of this subsection (((5))) (4)(b) if the
beneficiary or authorized agent determines, after attempting contact
under this subsection (((5))) (4)(b), that the borrower's primary
telephone number and secondary telephone number or numbers on file, if
any, have been disconnected or are not good contact numbers for the
borrower.
(c) If the borrower does not respond within ((fourteen)) thirty
days after the telephone call requirements of (b) of this subsection
have been satisfied, the beneficiary or authorized agent shall send a
certified letter, with return receipt requested, to the borrower at the
address in the beneficiary's records for sending account statements to
the borrower and to the address of the property encumbered by the deed
of trust. The letter must include the information described in (e)(i)
through (iv) of this subsection.
(d) The beneficiary or authorized agent shall provide a means for
the borrower to contact the beneficiary or authorized agent in a timely
manner, including a toll-free telephone number or charge-free
equivalent that will provide access to a live representative during
business hours.
(e) The beneficiary or authorized agent shall post a link on the
home page of the beneficiary's or authorized agent's internet web site,
if any, to the following information:
(i) Options that may be available to borrowers who are unable to
afford their mortgage payments and who wish to avoid foreclosure, and
instructions to borrowers advising them on steps to take to explore
those options;
(ii) A list of financial documents borrowers should collect and be
prepared to present to the beneficiary or authorized agent when
discussing options for avoiding foreclosure;
(iii) A toll-free telephone number or charge-free equivalent for
borrowers who wish to discuss options for avoiding foreclosure with
their beneficiary or authorized agent; and
(iv) The toll-free telephone number or charge-free equivalent made
available by the department to find a department-((certified)) approved
housing counseling agency.
(((6))) (5) Subsections (1) and (((5))) (4) of this section do not
apply if any of the following occurs:
(a) The borrower has surrendered the property as evidenced by
either a letter confirming the surrender or delivery of the keys to the
property to the trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent; or
(b) The borrower has filed for bankruptcy, and the bankruptcy stay
remains in place, or the borrower has filed for bankruptcy and the
bankruptcy court has granted relief from the bankruptcy stay allowing
enforcement of the deed of trust.
(((7))) (6)(a) This section applies only to deeds of trust ((made
from January 1, 2003, to December 31, 2007, inclusive,)) that are
recorded against owner-occupied residential real property. This
section does not apply to deeds of trust: (i) Securing a commercial
loan; (ii) securing obligations of a grantor who is not the borrower or
a guarantor; or (iii) securing a purchaser's obligations under a
seller-financed sale.
(b) This section does not apply to association beneficiaries
subject to chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.38 RCW.
(((8))) (7) As used in this section:
(a) "Department" means the United States department of housing and
urban development.
(b) "Seller-financed sale" means a residential real property
transaction where the seller finances all or part of the purchase
price, and that financed amount is secured by a deed of trust against
the subject residential real property.
(((9))) (8) The form of declaration to be provided by the
beneficiary or authorized agent as required under subsection (2) of
this section must be in substantially the following form:

"FORECLOSURE LOSS MITIGATION FORM

Please select applicable option(s) below.

The undersigned beneficiary or authorized agent for the beneficiary
hereby represents and declares under the penalty of perjury that [check
the applicable box and fill in any blanks so that the trustee can
insert, on the beneficiary's behalf, the applicable declaration in the
notice of default required under chapter 61.24 RCW]:
(1) [ ] The beneficiary or beneficiary's authorized agent has
contacted the borrower under, and has complied with, RCW 61.24.031
(contact provision to "assess the borrower's financial ability to pay
the debt secured by the deed of trust and explore options for the
borrower to avoid foreclosure") and the borrower did not request a
meeting.
(2) [ ] The beneficiary or beneficiary's authorized agent has
contacted the borrower as required under RCW 61.24.031 and the borrower
or the borrower's designated representative requested a meeting. A
meeting was held in compliance with RCW 61.24.031.
(3) [ ] The beneficiary or beneficiary's authorized agent has
exercised due diligence to contact the borrower as required in RCW
61.24.031(((5) and, after waiting fourteen days after the requirements
in RCW 61.24.031 were satisfied, the beneficiary or the beneficiary's
authorized agent sent to the borrower(s), by certified mail, return
receipt requested, the letter required under RCW 61.24.031)) (4).
(((3))) (4) [ ] The borrower has surrendered the secured property
as evidenced by either a letter confirming the surrender or by delivery
of the keys to the secured property to the beneficiary, the
beneficiary's authorized agent or to the trustee.
(((4))) (5) [ ] Under RCW 61.24.031, the beneficiary or the
beneficiary's authorized agent has verified information that, on or
before the date of this declaration, the borrower(s) has filed for
bankruptcy, and the bankruptcy stay remains in place, or the borrower
has filed for bankruptcy and the bankruptcy court has granted relief
from the bankruptcy stay allowing the enforcement of the deed of
trust."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A housing counselor who is contacted by a borrower under RCW
61.24.031 has a duty to act in good faith to attempt to reach a
resolution with the beneficiary on behalf of the borrower within the
ninety days provided from the date the beneficiary initiates contact
with the borrower and the date the notice of default is issued. A
resolution may include, but is not limited to, modification of the
loan, an agreement to conduct a short sale, a deed in lieu of
foreclosure transaction, or some other workout plan.
(b) Nothing in RCW 61.24.031 or this section precludes a meeting or
negotiations between the housing counselor, borrower, and beneficiary
at any time, including after the issuance of the notice of default.
(c) A borrower who is contacted under RCW 61.24.031 may seek the
assistance of a housing counselor or attorney at any time.
(2) Housing counselors have a duty to act in good faith to assist
borrowers by:
(a) Preparing the borrower for meetings with the beneficiary;
(b) Advising the borrower about what documents the borrower must
have to seek a loan modification or other resolution;
(c) Informing the borrower about the alternatives to foreclosure,
including loan modifications or other possible resolutions; and
(d) Providing other guidance, advice, and education as the housing
counselor considers necessary.
(3) A housing counselor or attorney assisting a borrower may refer
the borrower to a mediation program, pursuant to section 7 of this act,
if:
(a) The housing counselor or attorney determines that mediation is
appropriate based on the individual circumstances; and
(b) A notice of sale on the deed of trust has not been recorded.
(4) A referral to mediation by a housing counselor or attorney does
not preclude a trustee issuing a notice of default if the requirements
of RCW 61.24.031 have been met.
(5) Housing counselors providing assistance to borrowers under RCW
61.24.031 are not liable for civil damages resulting from any acts or
omissions in providing assistance, unless the acts or omissions
constitute gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The mediation program established in this section applies only
to borrowers who have been referred to mediation by a housing counselor
or attorney. This section does not preclude mediation required by a
court or other provision of law.
(2)(a) A housing counselor or attorney referring a borrower to
mediation shall send a notice to the borrower and the department,
stating that mediation is appropriate.
(b) No later than sixty days after the effective date of this
section, the department must create the notice form to be used by
housing counselors and attorneys to refer borrowers to mediation under
this section.
(3) Within ten days of receiving the notice, the department shall:
(a) Send a notice to the beneficiary, the borrower, the housing
counselor or attorney who referred the borrower, and the trustee
stating that the parties have been referred to mediation; and
(b) Select a mediator and notify the parties of the selection.
(4)(a) Within forty-five days of receiving the referral from the
department, the mediator shall convene a mediation session in the
county where the borrower resides, unless the parties agree on another
location. The parties may agree in writing to extend the time in which
to schedule the mediation session. If the parties agree to extend the
time, the beneficiary shall notify the trustee of the extension and the
date the mediator is expected to issue a report.
(b) Prior to scheduling a mediation session, the mediator shall
require that both parties sign a waiver stating that neither party may
call the mediator as a live witness in any litigation pertaining to a
foreclosure action between the parties. However, the mediator's
certification may be deemed admissible evidence, subject to court
rules, in any litigation pertaining to a foreclosure action between the
parties.
(5)(a) The mediator may schedule phone conferences, consultations
with the parties individually, and other communications to ensure that
the parties have all the necessary information to engage in a
productive mediation.
(b) The mediator must send written notice of the time, date, and
location of the mediation session to the borrower, the beneficiary, and
the department at least fifteen days prior to the mediation session.
At a minimum, the notice must contain:
(i) A statement that the borrower may be represented in the
mediation session by an attorney or other advocate;
(ii) A statement that a person with authority to agree to a
resolution, including a proposed settlement, loan modification, or
dismissal or continuation of the foreclosure proceeding, must be
present either in person or on the telephone or video conference during
the mediation session;
(iii) A complete list of documents, calculations, or information
that the parties must provide to the mediator and the deadlines for
providing the documents, calculations, or information; and
(iv) A statement that the parties have a duty to meet in good faith
and that failure to mediate in good faith may impair the beneficiary's
ability to foreclose on the property or the borrower's ability to
modify the loan.
(6) The borrower, the beneficiary or authorized agent, and the
mediator must meet in person for the mediation session. However, a
person with authority to agree to a resolution on behalf of the
beneficiary may be present over the telephone or video conference
during the mediation session.
(7) The participants in mediation must address the issues of
foreclosure that may enable the borrower and the beneficiary to reach
a resolution, including but not limited to reinstatement, modification
of the loan, restructuring of the debt, or some other workout plan. To
assist the parties in addressing issues of foreclosure, the mediator
must require the participants to consider the following:
(a) The borrower's current and future economic circumstances,
including the borrower's current and future income, debts, and
obligations for the previous sixty days or greater time period as
determined by the mediator;
(b) The net present value of receiving payments pursuant to a
modified mortgage loan as compared to the anticipated net recovery
following foreclosure;
(c) Any affordable loan modification calculation and net present
value calculation when required under any federal mortgage relief
program, including the home affordable modification program (HAMP) as
applicable to government-sponsored enterprise and nongovernment-sponsored enterprise loans and any HAMP-related modification program
applicable to loans insured by the federal housing administration, the
veterans administration, and the rural housing service. If such a
calculation is not required, then the beneficiary must use the current
calculations, assumptions, and forms that are established by the
federal deposit insurance corporation and published in the federal
deposit insurance corporation loan modification program guide; and
(d) Any other loss mitigation guidelines applicable to loans
insured by the federal housing administration, the veterans
administration, and the rural housing service.
(8) A violation of the duty to meet in good faith as required under
this section includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Failure to timely participate in mediation without good cause;
(b) Failure of the beneficiary to provide the following
documentation to the borrower and mediator at least ten days before the
mediation or pursuant to the mediator's instructions:
(i) An accurate statement containing the balance of the loan;
(ii) Copies of the note and deed of trust;
(iii) A copy of the declaration required by RCW 61.24.030(7)(a)
stating that the entity claiming to be the beneficiary is the owner of
any promissory note or obligation secured by the deed of trust,
including proof that the entity seeking to foreclose is the current
assignee of the deed of trust. The proof may be provided by an
affidavit;
(iv) The best estimate of any arrearage and an itemized statement
of the arrearages;
(v) An itemized list of fees and charges outstanding;
(vi) The payment history and schedule for the preceding twelve
months, or since default, whichever is longer, including a breakdown of
all fees and charges claimed;
(vii) All borrower-related and mortgage-related input data used in
any net present value analysis;
(viii) An explanation regarding any denial for a loan modification,
forbearance, or other alternative to foreclosure in sufficient detail
for the mediator to explain to the borrower why the decision was made;
(ix) The most recently available appraisal or other broker price
opinion most recently relied upon by the beneficiary; and
(x) The portion or excerpt of the pooling and servicing agreement
that prohibits the beneficiary from implementing a modification, if the
beneficiary claims it cannot implement a modification due solely to
limitations in a pooling and servicing agreement, and documentation or
a statement detailing the efforts of the beneficiary to obtain a waiver
of the pooling and servicing agreement provisions;
(c) Failure of the borrower to provide accurate and complete
documentation to the beneficiary and mediator, at least ten days before
the mediation or pursuant to the mediator's instruction, showing the
borrower's current and future income, debts and obligations, and tax
returns for the past two years;
(d) Failure of either party to pay the respective portion of the
mediation fee in advance of the mediation as required under this
section, or for the payment to be rejected or returned for insufficient
funds;
(e) Failure of a party to designate representatives with adequate
authority to fully settle, compromise, or otherwise reach resolution
with the borrower in mediation; and
(f) A request by a beneficiary that the borrower waive future
claims he or she may have in connection with the deed of trust, as a
condition of agreeing to a modification, except for rescission claims
under the federal truth in lending act. Nothing in this section
precludes a beneficiary from requesting that a borrower dismiss with
prejudice any pending claims against the beneficiary, its agents, loan
servicer, or trustee, arising from the underlying deed of trust, as a
condition of modification.
(9) Within seven business days after the conclusion of the
mediation session, the mediator must send a written certification to
the department and the trustee and send copies to the parties of:
(a) The date, time, and location of the mediation session;
(b) The names of all persons materially participating in person and
by telephone or video conference, at the mediation session;
(c) Whether a resolution was reached by the parties, including
whether the default was cured by reinstatement, modification, or
restructuring of the debt, or some other alternative to foreclosure was
agreed upon by the parties;
(d) Whether the parties participated in the mediation in good
faith; and
(e) A description of the net present value test used, along with a
copy of the inputs, including the result of the net present value test
expressed in a dollar amount.
(10) If the parties are unable to reach any agreement and the
mediator certifies that the parties acted in good faith, the
beneficiary may proceed with the foreclosure.
(11)(a) The mediator's certification that the beneficiary failed to
act in good faith in mediation constitutes a defense to the nonjudicial
foreclosure action that was the basis for initiating the mediation. In
any action to enjoin the foreclosure, the beneficiary shall be entitled
to rebut the allegation that it failed to act in good faith. The
mediator's certification that the beneficiary failed to act in good
faith during mediation does not constitute a defense to a judicial
foreclosure or a future nonjudicial foreclosure action if a
modification of the loan is agreed upon and the borrower subsequently
defaults.
(b) If an agreement was not reached and the mediator's
certification shows that the net present value of the modified loan
exceeds the anticipated net recovery at foreclosure by more than five
percent, that showing in the certification shall constitute a basis for
the borrower to enjoin the foreclosure.
(12) The mediator's certification that the borrower failed to act
in good faith in mediation authorizes the beneficiary to proceed with
the foreclosure.
(13) A trustee may not record the notice of sale until the trustee
receives the report stating that the mediation has been completed. If
the trustee does not receive the report, the trustee may record the
notice of sale after ten days from the date the report to the trustee
was due.
(14) A mediator may charge reasonable fees as authorized by this
subsection and by the department. Unless the fee is waived or the
parties agree otherwise, a foreclosure mediator's fee may not exceed
four hundred dollars for a mediation session lasting between one hour
and three hours. For a mediation session exceeding three hours, the
foreclosure mediator may charge a reasonable fee, as authorized by the
department. The mediator must provide an estimated fee before the
mediation, and payment of the mediator's fee must be divided equally
between the beneficiary and the borrower. The beneficiary and the
borrower must tender the loan mediator's fee seven calendar days before
the commencement of the mediation and pursuant to the mediator's
instructions.
(15) Beginning December 1, 2012, and every year thereafter, the
department shall report annually to the legislature on:
(a) The performance of the program, including the numbers of
borrowers who are referred to mediation by a housing counselor or
attorney;
(b) The results of the mediation program, including the numbers of
loans restructured or modified, the change in the borrower's monthly
payment for principal and interest, the number of principal write-downs
and interest rate reductions, and, to the extent practical, the number
of borrowers who default within a year of restructuring or
modification; and
(c) Any recommendations for changes to the statutes regarding the
mediation program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Section 7 of this act applies only to deeds of trust that are
recorded against owner-occupied residential real property. The
property must have been owner-occupied as of the date of the initial
contact under RCW 61.24.031 was made.
(2) A borrower under a deed of trust on owner-occupied residential
real property who has received a notice of default on or before the
effective date this section may be referred to mediation under section
7 of this act by a housing counselor or attorney.
(3) Section 7 of this act does not apply to deeds of trust:
(a) Securing a commercial loan;
(b) Securing obligations of a grantor who is not the borrower or a
guarantor; or
(c) Securing a purchaser's obligations under a seller-financed
sale.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of section 7 of this act, the department must
maintain a list of approved foreclosure mediators. The department may
approve the following persons to serve as foreclosure mediators under
this section:
(a) Attorneys who are active members of the Washington state bar
association;
(b) Employees of United States department of housing and urban
development-approved housing counseling agencies;
(c) Employees or volunteers of dispute resolution centers under
chapter 7.75 RCW;
(d) Retired judges of Washington courts;
(e) Other statewide organizations that provide mediation services;
and
(f) Any other persons authorized by the department.
(2) The department may establish a required training program for
foreclosure mediators and may require mediators to acquire training
before being approved. The mediators must be familiar with relevant
aspects of the law, have knowledge of community-based resources and
mortgage assistance programs, and refer borrowers to these programs
where appropriate.
(3) The department may remove any mediator from the approved list
of mediators.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
The foreclosure fairness account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts received under this section, except nine
percent retained by the department of commerce for the implementation
and operation of the foreclosure mediation program under this chapter,
must be deposited into the account. Except as otherwise provided in
this section, the administrative expenses for the account may not
exceed three percent of the remaining funds, and expenditures from the
account must be used for implementation and operation of the
foreclosure fairness act as follows: Of the remaining: (1) Up to six
percent to the office of the attorney general to be used by the
consumer protection division to enforce this chapter; (2) up to two
percent to the office of civil legal aid to be used for the purpose of
contracting with qualified legal aid programs for legal representation
of homeowners in matters relating to foreclosure. Funds provided under
this subsection (2) must be used to supplement, not supplant, other
federal, state, and local funds; and (3) up to eighty percent to be
used by the Washington state housing finance commission for the
purposes of providing housing counselors for borrowers. Of this
amount, up to four hundred thousand dollars may be used in fiscal year
2012 and up to two hundred thousand dollars in fiscal year 2013 by the
department of financial institutions to conduct homeowner prepurchase
and postpurchase outreach and education programs as defined in RCW
43.320.150. Only the director of the department of commerce or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but
an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning October 1, 2011, and every quarter thereafter, every
beneficiary issuing notices of default on owner-occupied residential
real property under this chapter must:
(a) Report to the department the number of owner-occupied
residential real properties for which the beneficiary has issued a
notice of default during the previous quarter; and
(b) Remit the amount required under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) For each owner-occupied residential real property for which a
notice of default has been issued, the beneficiary issuing the notice
of default shall remit two hundred fifty dollars to the department to
be deposited, as provided under section 10 of this act, into the
foreclosure fairness account. The two hundred fifty dollar payment is
required per property and not per notice of default. The beneficiary
shall remit the total amount required in a lump sum each quarter.
(3) No later than thirty days after the effective date of this
section, the beneficiaries required to report and remit to the
department under this section shall determine the number of owner-occupied residential real properties for which notices of default were
issued during the three months prior to the effective date of this
section. The beneficiary shall remit to the department a one-time sum
of two hundred fifty dollars multiplied by the number of properties.
The department shall deposit the funds into the foreclosure fairness
account as provided under section 10 of this act.
(4) Any beneficiary that certifies under penalty of perjury that it
has issued fewer than two hundred fifty notices of default in the
preceding year may provide annual, rather than quarterly, figures and
make an annual payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
Any duty that servicers may have to maximize net present value
under their pooling and servicing agreements is owed to all parties in
a deed of trust pool, not to any particular parties, and a servicer
acts in the best interests of all parties if it agrees to or implements
a modification or workout plan when both of the following apply:
(1) The deed of trust is in payment default, or payment default is
reasonably imminent; and
(2) Anticipated recovery under a modification or workout plan
exceeds by five percent or more the anticipated recovery through
foreclosure on a net present value basis.

Sec. 13 RCW 61.24.135 and 2008 c 153 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW, for any person, acting alone or in
concert with others, to offer, or offer to accept or accept from
another, any consideration of any type not to bid, or to reduce a bid,
at a sale of property conducted pursuant to a power of sale in a deed
of trust. The trustee may decline to complete a sale or deliver the
trustee's deed and refund the purchase price, if it appears that the
bidding has been collusive or defective, or that the sale might have
been void. However, it is not an unfair or deceptive act or practice
for any person, including a trustee, to state that a property subject
to a recorded notice of trustee's sale or subject to a sale conducted
pursuant to this chapter is being sold in an "as-is" condition, or for
the beneficiary to arrange to provide financing for a particular bidder
or to reach any good faith agreement with the borrower, grantor, any
guarantor, or any junior lienholder.
(2) It is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an
unfair method of competition in violation of the consumer protection
act, chapter 19.86 RCW, for any person to violate the duty of good
faith under section 7 of this act or for any entity to fail to comply
with the requirements of section 10 of this act.

Sec. 14 RCW 82.45.030 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 503 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) As used in this chapter, the term "selling price" means the
true and fair value of the property conveyed. If property has been
conveyed in an arm's length transaction between unrelated persons for
a valuable consideration, a rebuttable presumption exists that the
selling price is equal to the total consideration paid or contracted to
be paid to the transferor, or to another for the transferor's benefit.
(2) If the sale is a transfer of a controlling interest in an
entity with an interest in real property located in this state, the
selling price shall be the true and fair value of the real property
owned by the entity and located in this state. If the true and fair
value of the real property located in this state cannot reasonably be
determined, the selling price shall be determined according to
subsection (4) of this section.
When a transfer or conveyance is made by deed in lieu of
foreclosure to satisfy a deed of trust, total consideration shall not
include the amount of any relocation assistance provided to the
transferor.
(3) As used in this section, "total consideration paid or
contracted to be paid" includes money or anything of value, paid or
delivered or contracted to be paid or delivered in return for the sale,
and shall include the amount of any lien, mortgage, contract
indebtedness, or other incumbrance, either given to secure the purchase
price, or any part thereof, or remaining unpaid on such property at the
time of sale.
Total consideration shall not include the amount of any outstanding
lien or incumbrance in favor of the United States, the state, or a
municipal corporation for taxes, special benefits, or improvements.
(4) If the total consideration for the sale cannot be ascertained
or the true and fair value of the property to be valued at the time of
the sale cannot reasonably be determined, the market value assessment
for the property maintained on the county property tax rolls at the
time of the sale shall be used as the selling price.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 2009 c 292 s 13 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---