BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the high level of
authority and the corresponding high level of responsibility that the
department of labor and industries has in setting workers' compensation
rates for employers. By setting rates for employers with virtually no
legislative oversight, the department's taxing authority is significant
and its impact is broad. The legislature finds that this taxing power
necessarily comes with a responsibility to the public not only to set
rates that are fair and sustainable, but also to provide a transparent
process that allows adequate time for employers to review information
about the funds and plan for potential rate changes. The 2011 rates
were not set in an adequately transparent and deliberative process, and
the legislature finds it necessary to set standards for the minimum
level of information to be provided and the time frame for doing so in
order to afford sufficient notice to employers about potential tax
increases.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.16.035 and 2005 c 410 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall classify all occupations or industries in
accordance with their degree of hazard and fix therefor basic rates of
premium which shall be:
(a) The lowest necessary to maintain actuarial solvency of the
accident and medical aid funds in accordance with recognized insurance
principles; and
(b) Designed to attempt to limit fluctuations in premium rates.
(2) The department shall formulate and adopt rules governing the
method of premium calculation and collection and providing for a rating
system consistent with recognized principles of workers' compensation
insurance which shall be designed to stimulate and encourage accident
prevention and to facilitate collection. The department must annually
adjust rates to become effective on January 1 of each year. In order
to provide enough time for public notice and input, the department must
annually provide the workers' compensation advisory committee with an
analysis of the status and health of the funds and indicated premium
rates for the following calendar year by the end of September. The
department may ((annually, or)) also at such other times as it deems
necessary to achieve the objectives under this section, readjust rates
in accordance with the rating system to become effective on such dates
as the department may designate.
(3)(a) After the first report is issued by the state auditor under
RCW 51.44.115, the workers' compensation advisory committee shall
review the report and, as the committee deems appropriate, may make
recommendations to the department concerning:
(i) The level or levels of a contingency reserve that are
appropriate to maintain actuarial solvency of the accident and medical
aid funds, limit premium rate fluctuations, and account for economic
conditions; and
(ii) When surplus funds exist in the trust funds, the circumstances
under which the department should give premium dividends, or similar
measures, or temporarily reduce rates below the rates fixed under
subsection (1) of this section, including any recommendations regarding
notifications that should be given before taking the action.
(b) Following subsequent reports issued by the state auditor under
RCW 51.44.115, the workers' compensation advisory committee may, as it
deems appropriate, update its recommendations to the department on the
matters covered under (a) of this subsection.
(4) In providing a retrospective rating plan under RCW 51.18.010,
the department may consider each individual retrospective rating group
as a single employing entity for purposes of dividends or premium
discounts.

--- END ---