BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Notwithstanding RCW 51.04.060 or any other provision of this
title, the parties to a claim for benefits may enter into a voluntary
settlement agreement at any time as provided in this section with
respect to one or more claims for benefits under this title. All
voluntary settlement agreements must be approved by the board of
industrial insurance appeals. The voluntary settlement agreement may:
(i) Bind the parties with regard to any or all aspects of a claim
including, but not limited to, allowance or rejection of a claim,
monetary payment, vocational services, claim closure, and claim
reopening under RCW 51.32.160; and
(ii) Not subject any employer who is not a signatory to the
agreement to any responsibility or burden under any claim.
(b) For purposes of this section, "parties" means:
(i) For a self-insured claim, the worker and the employer; and
(ii) For a state fund claim, the worker, the employer, and the
department. If the employer participates in a retrospective rating
plan under chapter 51.18 RCW, the retrospective rating group, through
its administrator, is also a party.
(c) A voluntary settlement agreement entered into under this
section must be signed by the parties or their representatives and must
clearly state that the parties understand and agree to the terms of the
voluntary settlement agreement. Unless one of the parties revokes
consent to the agreement, as provided in subsection (3) of this
section, the voluntary settlement agreement becomes final and binding
thirty days after approval of the agreement by the board of industrial
insurance appeals.
(d) A voluntary settlement agreement that has become final and
binding as provided in this section is binding on the department and on
all parties to the agreement as to its terms and the injuries and
occupational diseases to which the voluntary settlement applies. A
voluntary settlement agreement that has become final and binding is not
subject to appeal.
(2)(a) If a worker is not represented by an attorney at the time of
signing a voluntary settlement agreement, the parties must forward a
copy of the signed settlement agreement to the board with a request for
a conference with a settlement officer. Unless one of the parties
requests a later date, the settlement officer must convene a conference
within fourteen days after receipt of the request for the limited
purpose of receiving the voluntary settlement agreement of the parties,
explaining to the worker the benefits generally available under this
title, and explaining that a voluntary settlement agreement may alter
the benefits payable on a claim. In no event may a settlement officer
render legal advice to any party.
(b) Before approving the settlement agreement, the settlement
officer shall ensure that the worker has an adequate understanding of
the settlement proposal and its consequences to the worker.
(c) The settlement officer may reject a settlement agreement only
if the officer finds the parties have not entered into the agreement
knowingly and willingly. Within seven days after the conference, the
settlement officer shall issue an order allowing or rejecting the
voluntary settlement agreement. There is no appeal from the settlement
officer's decision.
(d) If the settlement officer issues an order allowing the
voluntary settlement agreement, the order must be submitted to the
board.
(3) If a worker is represented by an attorney at the time of
signing a voluntary settlement agreement, the parties may submit the
agreement directly to the board without the conference described in
this section.
(4) Upon receiving the voluntary settlement agreement, the board
shall approve the agreement within thirty working days of receipt
unless it finds that the parties have not entered into the agreement
knowingly and willingly. If the board approves the agreement, it shall
provide notice to the department of the binding terms of the agreement
and provide for placement of the agreement in the applicable claim
files.
(5) A party may revoke consent to the voluntary settlement
agreement by providing written notice to the other parties and the
board within thirty days after the date the agreement is approved by
the board.
(6) To the extent the worker is found to be entitled to temporary
total disability or permanent total disability benefits while a
voluntary settlement agreement is being negotiated, or during the
revocation period of an agreement, the benefits must be paid until the
agreement becomes final.
(7) If the parties have provided in a voluntary settlement
agreement that a claim is not subject to reopening under RCW 51.32.160,
any application to reopen the claim must be denied.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must maintain copies of all voluntary settlement
agreements entered into between the parties and develop processes under
RCW 51.28.070 to furnish copies of such agreements to any party
contemplating any subsequent voluntary settlement agreement with the
worker on any claim. The department shall also furnish claims
histories that include all prior permanent disability awards received
by the worker on any claims by body part and category or percentage
rating, as applicable. Copies of such agreements and claims histories
shall be furnished within ten working days of a written request. An
employer may not consider a prior settlement agreement or claims
history when making a decision about hiring or the terms or conditions
of employment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW
to read as follows:
If a worker has received a prior award of, or entered into a
voluntary settlement for, total or partial permanent disability
benefits, it shall be conclusively presumed that the medical condition
causing the prior permanent disability exists and is disabling at the
time of any subsequent industrial injury or occupational disease.
Except in the case of total permanent disability, the accumulation of
all permanent disability awards issued with respect to any one part of
the body in favor of the worker may not exceed one hundred percent over
the worker's lifetime. When entering into a voluntary settlement
agreement under this chapter, the department or self-insured employer
may exclude amounts paid to settle claims for prior portions of a
worker's permanent total or partial disability.

--- END ---