BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 27.53.030 and 2008 c 275 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Archaeology" means systematic, scientific study of man's past
through material remains.
(2) "Archaeological object" means an object that comprises the
physical evidence of an indigenous and subsequent culture including
material remains of past human life including monuments, symbols,
tools, facilities, and technological by-products.
(3) "Archaeological site" means a geographic locality in
Washington, including but not limited to, submerged and submersible
lands and the bed of the sea within the state's jurisdiction, that
contains archaeological objects.
(4) "Department" means the department of archaeology and historic
preservation, created in chapter 43.334 RCW.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department of archaeology
and historic preservation, created in chapter 43.334 RCW.
(6) "Historic" means peoples and cultures who are known through
written documents in their own or other languages. As applied to
underwater archaeological resources, the term historic shall include
only those properties which are listed in or eligible for listing in
the Washington State Register of Historic Places (RCW 27.34.220) or the
National Register of Historic Places as defined in the National
Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101, Public Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C. Sec. 470) as now or hereafter amended.
(7) "Prehistoric" means peoples and cultures who are unknown
through contemporaneous written documents in any language.
(8) "Professional archaeologist" means a person with qualifications
meeting the federal secretary of the interior's standards for a
professional archaeologist. Archaeologists not meeting this standard
may be conditionally employed by working under the supervision of a
professional archaeologist for a period of four years provided the
employee is pursuing qualifications necessary to meet the federal
secretary of the interior's standards for a professional archaeologist.
During this four-year period, the professional archaeologist is
responsible for all findings. The four-year period is not subject to
renewal.
(9) "Amateur society" means any organization composed primarily of
persons who are not professional archaeologists, whose primary interest
is in the archaeological resources of the state, and which has been
certified in writing by two professional archaeologists.
(10) "Historic archaeological resources" means those properties
which are listed in or eligible for listing in the Washington State
Register of Historic Places (RCW 27.34.220) or the National Register of
Historic Places as defined in the National Historic Preservation Act of
1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101, Public Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 470) as now or hereafter amended.
(11) "Field investigation" means an on-site inspection by a
professional archaeologist or by an individual under the direct
supervision of a professional archaeologist employing archaeological
inspection techniques for both the surface and subsurface
identification of archaeological resources and artifacts resulting in
a professional archaeological report detailing the results of such
inspection.

Sec. 2 RCW 27.53.070 and 2005 c 333 s 21 and 2005 c 274 s 243 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
It is the declared intention of the legislature that field
investigations on privately owned lands should be discouraged except
when conducted by professional archaeologists in accordance with both
the provisions and spirit of this chapter ((and)). Persons having
knowledge of the location of archaeological sites or resources are
encouraged to communicate such information to the department. Such
information shall not constitute a public record which requires
disclosure pursuant to the exception authorized in chapter 42.56 RCW to
avoid site depredation.

--- END ---