BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.090 and 2009 c 428 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Public records shall be available for inspection and copying
during the customary office hours of the agency, the office of the
secretary of the senate, and the office of the chief clerk of the house
of representatives for a minimum of thirty hours per week, except weeks
that include state legal holidays, unless the person making the request
and the agency, the office of the secretary of the senate, or the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives or its
representative agree on a different time. Customary business hours
must be posted on the agency or office's web site and made known by
other means designed to provide the public with notice.
(2)(a) Cities, towns, and special purpose districts that
customarily do not maintain office hours for a minimum of thirty hours
per week are not required to do so and must post on the agency
headquarters location or web site directions on how to contact agency
personnel to inspect or copy public records.
(b)(i) Contacting agency personnel includes any contact that
results in agency personnel actually knowing that a request to inspect
or copy public records is being made; or
(ii) Proof that delivery of a properly addressed certified letter,
return receipt requested, was attempted, whether the agency accepts the
letter or not.
(c) The agency must include and respond promptly to the request to
inspect or copy public records in the business conducted at its next
regularly scheduled meeting subsequent to contact of agency personnel.
(d) The agency must respond within the time requirements of RCW
42.56.520 with the time of receipt of the request being the date of the
agency's next regularly scheduled meeting.

--- END ---