BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.21B RCW
to read as follows:
A party to an action before the pollution control hearings board
may request of the governor an expedited appeal. The governor may
grant the requesting party an expedited appeal at the governor's
discretion, if an expedited appeal would best serve the public
interest. In an expedited appeal, the pollution control hearings board
must conduct all proceedings and issue a written decision within thirty
days of the governor granting the request. The pollution control
hearings board may adopt rules for practices and procedures to
implement this section under RCW 43.21B.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW
to read as follows:
A party to an action before the hearings board may request of the
governor an expedited appeal. The governor may grant the requesting
party an expedited appeal at the governor's discretion, if an expedited
appeal would best serve the public interest. In an expedited appeal,
the hearings board must conduct all proceedings and issue a written
decision within thirty days of the governor granting the request. The
hearings board may adopt rules for practices and procedures to
implement this section under RCW 90.58.175.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---