BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.35D.030 and 2005 c 12 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All major facility projects of public agencies receiving any
funding in a state capital budget, or projects financed through a
financing contract as defined in RCW 39.94.020, must be designed,
constructed, and certified to at least the LEED silver standard. This
subsection applies to major facility projects that have not entered the
design phase prior to July 24, 2005, and to the extent appropriate LEED
silver standards exist for that type of building or facility.
(2) All major facility projects of any entity other than a public
agency or public school district receiving any funding in a state
capital budget must be designed, constructed, and certified to at least
the LEED silver standard. This subsection applies to major facility
projects that have not entered the grant application process prior to
July 24, 2005, and to the extent appropriate LEED silver standards
exist for that type of building or facility.
(3)(a) Public agencies, under this section, shall monitor and
document ongoing operating savings resulting from major facility
projects designed, constructed, and certified as required under this
section.
(b) Public agencies, under this section, shall report annually to
the department on major facility projects and operating savings.
(4) The department shall consolidate the reports required in
subsection (3) of this section into one report and report to the
governor and legislature by September 1st of each even-numbered year
beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016. In its report, the department
shall also report on the implementation of this chapter, including
reasons why the LEED standard was not used as required by RCW
39.35D.020(5)(b). The department shall make recommendations regarding
the ongoing implementation of this chapter, including a discussion of
incentives and disincentives related to implementing this chapter.
(5) For the purposes of determining compliance with the requirement
for a project to be designed, constructed, and certified to at least
the LEED silver standard, the department must credit one additional
point for a project that uses wood products with a credible third-party
sustainable forest certification or from forests regulated under
chapter 76.09 RCW, the Washington forest practices act. For projects
that qualify for this additional point, and for which an additional
point would have resulted in formal certification under the LEED silver
standard, the project must be deemed to meet the standard under this
section.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.35D.040 and 2006 c 263 s 331 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All major facility projects of public school districts
receiving any funding in a state capital budget must be designed and
constructed to at least the LEED silver standard or the Washington
sustainable school design protocol. To the extent appropriate LEED
silver or Washington sustainable school design protocol standards exist
for the type of building or facility, this subsection applies to major
facility projects that have not received project approval from the
superintendent of public instruction prior to: (a) July 1, 2006, for
volunteering school districts; (b) July 1, 2007, for class one school
districts; and (c) July 1, 2008, for class two school districts.
(2) Public school districts under this section shall: (a) Monitor
and document appropriate operating benefits and savings resulting from
major facility projects designed and constructed as required under this
section for a minimum of five years following local board acceptance of
a project receiving state funding; and (b) report annually to the
superintendent of public instruction. The form and content of each
report must be mutually developed by the office of the superintendent
of public instruction in consultation with school districts.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall consolidate the
reports required in subsection (2) of this section into one report and
report to the governor and legislature by September 1st of each even-numbered year beginning in 2006 and ending in 2016. In its report, the
superintendent of public instruction shall also report on the
implementation of this chapter, including reasons why the LEED standard
or Washington sustainable school design protocol was not used as
required by RCW 39.35D.020(5)(b). The superintendent of public
instruction shall make recommendations regarding the ongoing
implementation of this chapter, including a discussion of incentives
and disincentives related to implementing this chapter.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and
issue guidelines for administering this chapter for public school
districts. The purpose of the guidelines is to define a procedure and
method for employing and verifying compliance with the LEED silver
standard or the Washington sustainable school design protocol.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall utilize the
school facilities advisory board as a high-performance buildings
advisory committee comprised of affected public schools, the
superintendent of public instruction, the department, and others at the
superintendent of public instruction's discretion to provide advice on
implementing this chapter. Among other duties, the advisory committee
shall make recommendations regarding an education and training process
and an ongoing evaluation or feedback process to help the
superintendent of public instruction implement this chapter.
(6) For projects that comply with this section by meeting the LEED
silver standard, the superintendent of public instruction must credit
one additional point for a project that uses wood products with a
credible third-party sustainable forest certification or from forests
regulated under chapter 76.09 RCW, the Washington forest practices act.
For projects that qualify for this additional point, and for which an
additional point would have resulted in formal certification under the
LEED silver standard, the project must be deemed to meet the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---