BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.30 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the
secretary determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.34 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the
secretary determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.55 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the
secretary determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.57A RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training and experience requirements of this chapter unless the board
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.64A RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training and experience requirements of this chapter unless the board
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.71A RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the
commission determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.73 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the
secretary determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 18.74 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training and experience requirements of this chapter unless the board
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 18.84 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the
secretary determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 18.88A
RCW to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the
commission determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 18.89 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the
secretary determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 18.135
RCW to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the
secretary determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 18.215
RCW to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the
secretary determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 18.260
RCW to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the
commission determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

--- END ---