BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.08 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the board
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.11 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.16 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.39 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the board
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.43 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the board
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 18.85 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 18.96 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the board
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 18.140 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 18.145 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 18.165
RCW to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 18.170
RCW to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 18.185
RCW to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 18.210
RCW to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 18.220
RCW to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the board
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 18.280
RCW to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 18.300
RCW to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 19.105
RCW to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 42.44 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 46.82 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 64.36 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 67.08 RCW
to read as follows:
An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the
training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the director
determines that the military training or experience is not
substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

--- END ---