BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 61.24.030 and 2009 c 292 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be requisite to a trustee's sale:
(1) That the deed of trust contains a power of sale;
(2) That the deed of trust contains a statement that the real
property conveyed is not used principally for agricultural purposes;
provided, if the statement is false on the date the deed of trust was
granted or amended to include that statement, and false on the date of
the trustee's sale, then the deed of trust must be foreclosed
judicially. Real property is used for agricultural purposes if it is
used in an operation that produces crops, livestock, or aquatic goods;
(3) That a default has occurred in the obligation secured, any
forbearance agreement, or a covenant of the grantor, which by the terms
of the deed of trust makes operative the power to sell;
(4) That no action commenced by the beneficiary of the deed of
trust is now pending to seek satisfaction of an obligation secured by
the deed of trust in any court by reason of the grantor's default on
the obligation secured: PROVIDED, That (a) the seeking of the
appointment of a receiver shall not constitute an action for purposes
of this chapter; and (b) if a receiver is appointed, the grantor shall
be entitled to any rents or profits derived from property subject to a
homestead as defined in RCW 6.13.010. If the deed of trust was granted
to secure a commercial loan, this subsection shall not apply to actions
brought to enforce any other lien or security interest granted to
secure the obligation secured by the deed of trust being foreclosed;
(5) That the deed of trust, and all assignments, has been recorded
in each county in which the land or some part thereof is situated;
(6) That prior to the date of the notice of trustee's sale and
continuing thereafter through the date of the trustee's sale, the
trustee must maintain a street address in this state where personal
service of process may be made, and the trustee must maintain a
physical presence and have telephone service at such address. If the
trustee's office is outside the county where the trustee's sale is
scheduled, the notices required under this chapter must also contain an
e-mail address and fax number for service of process purposes;
(7)(a) That, for residential real property, before the notice of
trustee's sale is recorded, transmitted, or served, the trustee shall
have proof that the beneficiary is the owner of any promissory note or
other obligation secured by the deed of trust. A declaration by the
beneficiary made under the penalty of perjury stating that the
beneficiary is the actual holder of the promissory note or other
obligation secured by the deed of trust shall be sufficient proof as
required under this subsection.
(b) Unless the trustee has violated his or her duty under RCW
61.24.010(4), the trustee is entitled to rely on the beneficiary's
declaration as evidence of proof required under this subsection.
(c) This subsection (7) does not apply to association beneficiaries
subject to chapter 64.32, 64.34, or 64.38 RCW; and
(8) That at least thirty days before notice of sale shall be
recorded, transmitted or served, written notice of default shall be
transmitted by the beneficiary or trustee to the borrower and grantor
at their last known addresses by both first-class and either registered
or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the beneficiary or
trustee shall cause to be posted in a conspicuous place on the
premises, a copy of the notice, or personally served on the borrower
and grantor. This notice shall contain the following information:
(a) A description of the property which is then subject to the deed
of trust;
(b) A statement identifying each county in which the deed of trust
is recorded and the document number given to the deed of trust upon
recording by each county auditor or recording officer;
(c) A statement that the beneficiary has declared the borrower or
grantor to be in default, and a concise statement of the default
alleged;
(d) An itemized account of the amount or amounts in arrears if the
default alleged is failure to make payments;
(e) An itemized account of all other specific charges, costs, or
fees that the borrower, grantor, or any guarantor is or may be obliged
to pay to reinstate the deed of trust before the recording of the
notice of sale;
(f) A statement showing the total of (d) and (e) of this
subsection, designated clearly and conspicuously as the amount
necessary to reinstate the note and deed of trust before the recording
of the notice of sale;
(g) A statement that failure to cure the alleged default within
thirty days of the date of mailing of the notice, or if personally
served, within thirty days of the date of personal service thereof, may
lead to recordation, transmittal, and publication of a notice of sale,
and that the property described in (a) of this subsection may be sold
at public auction at a date no less than one hundred twenty days in the
future;
(h) A statement that the effect of the recordation, transmittal,
and publication of a notice of sale will be to (i) increase the costs
and fees and (ii) publicize the default and advertise the grantor's
property for sale;
(i) A statement that the effect of the sale of the grantor's
property by the trustee will be to deprive the grantor of all their
interest in the property described in (a) of this subsection;
(j) A statement that the borrower, grantor, and any guarantor has
recourse to the courts pursuant to RCW 61.24.130 to contest the alleged
default on any proper ground;
(k) In the event the property secured by the deed of trust is
owner-occupied residential real property, a statement, prominently set
out at the beginning of the notice, which shall state as follows:
"You should take care to protect your interest in your home. This
notice of default (your failure to pay) is the first step in a process
that could result in you losing your home. You should carefully review
your options. For example:
Can you pay and stop the foreclosure process?
Do you dispute the failure to pay?
Can you sell your property to preserve your equity?
Are you able to refinance this loan or obligation with a new loan
or obligation from another lender with payments, terms, and fees that
are more affordable?
Do you qualify for any government or private homeowner assistance
programs?
Do you know if filing for bankruptcy is an option? What are the
pros and cons of doing so?
Do not ignore this notice; because if you do nothing, you could
lose your home at a foreclosure sale. (No foreclosure sale can be held
any sooner than ninety days after a notice of sale is issued and a
notice of sale cannot be issued until thirty days after this notice.)
Also, if you do nothing to pay what you owe, be careful of people who
claim they can help you. There are many individuals and businesses
that watch for the notices of sale in order to unfairly profit as a
result of borrowers' distress.
You may feel you need help understanding what to do. There are a
number of professional resources available, including home loan
counselors and attorneys, who may assist you. Many legal services are
lower-cost or even free, depending on your ability to pay. If you
desire legal help in understanding your options or handling this
default, you may obtain a referral (at no charge) by contacting the
county bar association in the county where your home is located. These
legal referral services also provide information about lower-cost or
free legal services for those who qualify. You may contact the
Department of Financial Institutions or the statewide civil legal aid
hotline for possible assistance or referrals."; ((and))
(l) In the event the property secured by the deed of trust is
residential real property, the name and address of the owner of any
promissory notes or other obligations secured by the deed of trust and
the name, address, and telephone number of a party acting as a servicer
of the obligations secured by the deed of trust; and
(m) A fax number and e-mail address for service of process purposes
if the trustee's office is not in the county where the trustee's sale
is scheduled.(("))

Sec. 2 RCW 61.24.050 and 1998 c 295 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
When delivered to the purchaser, the trustee's deed shall convey
all of the right, title, and interest in the real and personal property
sold at the trustee's sale which the grantor had or had the power to
convey at the time of the execution of the deed of trust, and such as
the grantor may have thereafter acquired. If the trustee accepts a
bid, then the trustee's sale is final as of the date and time of such
acceptance if the trustee's deed is recorded within fifteen days
thereafter. After a trustee's sale, no person shall have any right, by
statute or otherwise, to redeem the property sold at the trustee's
sale. However, a court may vacate a void trustee's sale or a trustee's
sale procured by fraud.

Sec. 3 RCW 61.24.127 and 2009 c 292 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The failure of the borrower or grantor to bring a civil action
to enjoin a properly conducted foreclosure sale under this chapter may
not be deemed a waiver of a claim for damages asserting:
(a) Common law fraud or misrepresentation;
(b) A violation of Title 19 RCW; or
(c) Failure of the trustee to materially comply with the provisions
of this chapter.
(2) The nonwaived claims listed under subsection (1) of this
section are subject to the following limitations:
(a) The claim must be asserted or brought within two years from the
date of the foreclosure sale or within the applicable statute of
limitations for such claim, whichever expires earlier;
(b) The claim may not seek any remedy at law or in equity other
than monetary damages;
(c) The claim may not affect in any way the validity or finality of
the foreclosure sale or a subsequent transfer of the property;
(d) A borrower or grantor who files such a claim is prohibited from
recording a lis pendens or any other document purporting to create a
similar effect, related to the real property foreclosed upon;
(e) The claim may not operate in any way to encumber or cloud the
title to the property that was subject to the foreclosure sale, except
to the extent that a judgment on the claim in favor of the borrower or
grantor may, consistent with RCW 4.56.190, become a judgment lien on
real property then owned by the judgment debtor; and
(f) The relief that may be granted for judgment upon the claim is
limited to actual damages. However, if the borrower or grantor brings
in the same civil action a claim for violation of chapter 19.86 RCW,
arising out of the same alleged facts, relief under chapter 19.86 RCW
is limited to actual damages, treble damages as provided for in RCW
19.86.090, and the costs of suit, including a reasonable attorney's
fee.
(((4) [(3)])) (3) This section applies only to foreclosures of
owner-occupied residential real property.
(((5) [(4)])) (4) This section does not apply to the foreclosure of
a deed of trust used to secure a commercial loan.

Sec. 4 RCW 61.24.130 and 2008 c 153 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prejudice the right of
the borrower, grantor, any guarantor, or any person who has an interest
in, lien, or claim of lien against the property or some part thereof,
to restrain, on any proper legal or equitable ground, a trustee's sale.
The court shall require as a condition of granting the restraining
order or injunction that the applicant pay to the clerk of the court
the sums that would be due on the obligation secured by the deed of
trust if the deed of trust was not being foreclosed:
(a) In the case of default in making the periodic payment of
principal, interest, and reserves, such sums shall be the periodic
payment of principal, interest, and reserves paid to the clerk of the
court every thirty days.
(b) In the case of default in making payment of an obligation then
fully payable by its terms, such sums shall be the amount of interest
accruing monthly on said obligation at the nondefault rate, paid to the
clerk of the court every thirty days.
In the case of default in performance of any nonmonetary obligation
secured by the deed of trust, the court shall impose such conditions as
it deems just.
In addition, the court may condition granting the restraining order
or injunction upon the giving of security by the applicant, in such
form and amount as the court deems proper, for the payment of such
costs and damages, including attorneys' fees, as may be later found by
the court to have been incurred or suffered by any party by reason of
the restraining order or injunction. The court may consider, upon
proper showing, the grantor's equity in the property in determining the
amount of said security.
(2) No court may grant a restraining order or injunction to
restrain a trustee's sale unless the person seeking the restraint gives
((five days)) reasonable notice to the trustee of the time when, place
where, and the judge before whom the application for the restraining
order or injunction is to be made. This notice shall include copies of
all pleadings and related documents to be given to the judge. No judge
may act upon such application unless it is accompanied by proof,
evidenced by return of a sheriff, the sheriff's deputy, or by any
person eighteen years of age or over who is competent to be a witness,
that the notice has been served on the trustee.
(3) If the restraining order or injunction is dissolved after the
date of the trustee's sale set forth in the notice as provided in RCW
61.24.040(1)(f), the court granting such restraining order or
injunction, or before whom the order or injunction is returnable,
shall, at the request of the trustee, set a new sale date which shall
be not less than forty-five days from the date of the order dissolving
the restraining order. The trustee shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements of RCW 61.24.040(1) (a) through
(f) at least thirty days before the new sale date; and
(b) Cause a copy of the notice of trustee's sale as provided in RCW
61.24.040(1)(f) to be published in a legal newspaper in each county in
which the property or any part thereof is situated once between the
thirty-fifth and twenty-eighth day before the sale and once between the
fourteenth and seventh day before the sale.
(4) If a trustee's sale has been stayed as a result of the filing
of a petition in federal bankruptcy court and an order is entered in
federal bankruptcy court granting relief from the stay or closing or
dismissing the case, or discharging the debtor with the effect of
removing the stay, the trustee may set a new sale date which shall not
be less than forty-five days after the date of the bankruptcy court's
order. The trustee shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements of RCW 61.24.040(1) (a) through
(f) at least thirty days before the new sale date; and
(b) Cause a copy of the notice of trustee's sale as provided in RCW
61.24.040(1)(f) to be published in a legal newspaper in each county in
which the property or any part thereof is situated, once between the
thirty-fifth and twenty-eighth day before the sale and once between the
fourteenth and seventh day before the sale.
(5) ((Subsections (3) and (4) of this section are permissive only
and do not prohibit the trustee from proceeding with a trustee's sale
following termination of any injunction or stay on any date to which
such sale has been properly continued in accordance with RCW
61.24.040(6).
(6))) The issuance of a restraining order or injunction shall not
prohibit the trustee from continuing the sale as provided in RCW
61.24.040(6).
(6) If the property is owner-occupied, the court shall not impose
a bond that exceeds a five hundred dollar cost to the borrower.

Sec. 5 RCW 61.24.135 and 2008 c 153 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW, for any person, acting alone or in
concert with others, to offer, or offer to accept or accept from
another, any consideration of any type not to bid, or to reduce a bid,
at a sale of property conducted pursuant to a power of sale in a deed
of trust or fail to comply with this chapter. The trustee may decline
to complete a sale or deliver the trustee's deed and refund the
purchase price, if it appears that the bidding has been collusive or
defective, or that the sale might have been void. However, it is not
an unfair or deceptive act or practice for any person, including a
trustee, to state that a property subject to a recorded notice of
trustee's sale or subject to a sale conducted pursuant to this chapter
is being sold in an "as-is" condition, or for the beneficiary to
arrange to provide financing for a particular bidder or to reach any
good faith agreement with the borrower, grantor, any guarantor, or any
junior lienholder.

--- END ---