BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.45.014 and 2005 c 258 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The primary mission of the higher education branch campuses
created under this chapter remains to expand access to baccalaureate
and ((master's level)) graduate education in underserved urban areas of
the state in collaboration with community and technical colleges. The
top priority for each of the campuses is to expand courses and degree
programs for transfer and graduate students. New degree programs
should be driven by the educational needs and demands of students and
the community, as well as the economic development needs of local
businesses and employers.
(2) Branch campuses shall collaborate with the community and
technical colleges in their region to develop articulation agreements,
dual admissions policies, and other partnerships to ensure that branch
campuses serve as innovative models of a two plus two educational
system. Other possibilities for collaboration include but are not
limited to joint development of curricula and degree programs,
colocation of instruction, and arrangements to share faculty.
(3) In communities where a private postsecondary institution is
located, representatives of the private institution may be invited to
participate in the conversation about meeting the baccalaureate and
((master's level)) graduate needs in underserved urban areas of the
state.
(4) However, the legislature recognizes there are alternative
models for achieving this primary mission. Some campuses may have
additional missions in response to regional needs and demands. At
selected branch campuses, an innovative combination of instruction and
research targeted to support regional economic development may be
appropriate to meet the region's needs for both access and economic
viability. Other campuses should focus on becoming models of a two
plus two educational system through continuous improvement of
partnerships and agreements with community and technical colleges.
Still other campuses may be best suited to transition to a four-year
university or be removed from designation as a branch campus entirely.
(5) The legislature recognizes that size, mix of degree programs,
and proportion of lower versus upper division and graduate enrollments
are factors that affect costs at branch campuses. However over time,
the legislature intends that branch campuses be funded more similarly
to regional universities.
(6) ((In consultation with)) Subject to approval by the higher
education coordinating board, ((a branch campus may propose legislation
to authorize practice-oriented or professional doctoral programs if:
(a) Unique research facilities and equipment are located near the
campus; or (b) the campus can clearly demonstrate student and employer
demand in the region that is linked to regional economic development))
in accordance with RCW 28B.76.230, research universities are authorized
to develop doctoral degree programs at their branch campuses.
(7) ((It is not the legislature's intent to have each campus chart
its own future path without legislative guidance. Instead, the
legislature intends to consider carefully the mission and model of
education that best suits each campus and best meets the needs of
students, the community, and the region.)) The higher education
coordinating board shall monitor and evaluate ((the addition of lower
division students to)) growth of the branch campuses and periodically
report and make recommendations to the higher education committees of
the legislature to ensure the campuses continue to follow the
priorities established under this chapter.

--- END ---