BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.131.409 (Manufacturing innovation and modernization
extension service program -- Termination) and 2008 c 315 s 7; and
(2) RCW 43.131.410 (Manufacturing innovation and modernization
extension service program -- Repeal) and 2008 c 315 s 8.

--- END ---