BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.160.060 and 2008 c 327 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board is authorized to make direct loans to political
subdivisions of the state and to federally recognized Indian tribes for
the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions and federally
recognized Indian tribes in financing the cost of public facilities,
including development of land and improvements for public facilities,
project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility, and marketing studies and plans; project
design, site planning, and analysis; project debt and revenue impact
analysis; as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration,
expansion, or improvement of the facilities. The board may make direct
loans to rural counties for carrying out an analysis of industrial
sites to identify where high priority infrastructure developments are
warranted. A grant may also be authorized for purposes designated in
this chapter, but only when, and to the extent that, a loan is not
reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the political
subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe and the finding by
the board that financial circumstances require grant assistance to
enable the project to move forward. However, no more than twenty-five
percent of all financial assistance approved by the board in any
biennium may consist of grants to political subdivisions and federally
recognized Indian tribes.
(2) Application for funds ((shall)) must be made in the form and
manner as the board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board
((shall)) must conform to the following requirements:
(((1))) (a) The board ((shall)) may not provide financial
assistance:
(((a))) (i) For a project the primary purpose of which is to
facilitate or promote a retail shopping development or expansion.
(((b))) (ii) For any project that evidence exists would result in
a development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any
other community in the state.
(((c))) (iii) For a project the primary purpose of which is to
facilitate or promote gambling.
(((d))) (iv) For a project located outside the jurisdiction of the
applicant political subdivision or federally recognized Indian tribe.
(((2))) (b) The board ((shall)) may only provide financial
assistance:
(((a))) (i) For a project demonstrating convincing evidence that a
specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will
occur only if the public facility improvement is made that:
(((i))) (A) Results in the creation of significant private sector
jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by
the board and is consistent with the state comprehensive economic
development plan developed by the Washington economic development
commission pursuant to chapter 43.162 RCW, once the plan is adopted;
and
(((ii))) (B) Will improve the opportunities for the successful
maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial
plants or will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities;
(((b))) (iii) For a project that cannot meet the requirement of
(a)(i) of this subsection (2) but is a project that:
(((i))) (A) Results in the creation of significant private sector
jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by
the board and is consistent with the state comprehensive economic
development plan developed by the Washington economic development
commission pursuant to chapter 43.162 RCW, once the plan is adopted;
(((ii))) (B) Is part of a local economic development plan
consistent with applicable state planning requirements;
(((iii))) (C) Can demonstrate project feasibility using standard
economic principles; and
(((iv))) (D) Is located in a rural community as defined by the
board, or a rural county;
(((c))) (iv) For site-specific plans, studies, and analyses that
address environmental impacts, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility, marketing, project engineering, design, site
planning, and project debt and revenue impacts, as grants not to exceed
fifty thousand dollars.
(((3))) (c) The board ((shall)) must develop guidelines for local
participation and allowable match and activities.
(((4))) (d) An application must demonstrate local match and local
participation, in accordance with guidelines developed by the board.
(((5))) (e) An application must be approved by the political
subdivision and supported by the local associate development
organization or local workforce development council or approved by the
governing body of the federally recognized Indian tribe.
(((6))) (f) The board may allow de minimis general system
improvements to be funded if they are critically linked to the
viability of the project.
(((7))) (g) An application must demonstrate convincing evidence
that the median hourly wage of the private sector jobs created after
the project is completed will exceed the countywide median hourly wage.
(((8))) (h) The board ((shall)) must prioritize each proposed
project according to:
(((a))) (i) The relative benefits provided to the community by the
jobs the project would create, not just the total number of jobs it
would create after the project is completed, but also giving
consideration to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs
would be located;
(((b))) (ii) The rate of return of the state's investment,
including, but not limited to, the leveraging of private sector
investment, anticipated job creation and retention, and expected
increases in state and local tax revenues associated with the project;
(((c))) (iii) Whether the proposed project offers a health
insurance plan for employees that includes an option for dependents of
employees;
(((d))) (iv) Whether the public facility investment will increase
existing capacity necessary to accommodate projected population and
employment growth in a manner that supports infill and redevelopment of
existing urban or industrial areas that are served by adequate public
facilities. Projects should maximize the use of existing
infrastructure and provide for adequate funding of necessary
transportation improvements; and
(((e))) (v) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to
guidelines regarding its permitting process for those applying for
development permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of
2007.
(((9))) (i) A responsible official of the political subdivision or
the federally recognized Indian tribe ((shall)) must be present during
board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.
(3) Before any financial assistance application is approved, the
political subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking
the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is
available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from
the community economic revitalization board.

--- END ---