BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
In carrying out its responsibilities under RCW 43.330.060 and
43.330.080, the department shall establish protocols to be followed by
associate development organizations and department staff for the
recruitment and retention of businesses. The protocols must specify
the circumstances under which an associate development organization is
required to notify the department of its business recruitment and
retention efforts and when the department must notify the associate
development organization of its business recruitment and retention
efforts. The protocols established may not require the release of
proprietary information or the disclosure of information that a client
company has requested remain confidential. Compliance with the
protocols must be required of associate development organizations by
the department in its contracts with them.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.330.080 and 2009 c 151 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department ((shall)) must contract with county-designated
associate development organizations to increase the support for and
coordination of community and economic development services in
communities or regional areas. The organizations contracted within
each community or regional area ((shall)) must work closely with the
department to carry out state-identified economic development
priorities and be broadly representative of community and economic
interests. The organization ((shall)) must be capable of identifying
key economic and community development problems, developing appropriate
solutions, and mobilizing broad support for recommended initiatives.
The contracting organization shall work with and include local
governments, local chambers of commerce, workforce development
councils, port districts, labor groups, institutions of higher
education, community action programs, and other appropriate private,
public, or nonprofit community and economic development groups. The
scope of services delivered under these contracts ((shall)) must
include two broad areas of work:
(1) Direct assistance, including business planning, to companies
who need support to stay in business, expand, or relocate to Washington
from out of state or other countries. Assistance includes:
(a) Working with the appropriate partners, including but not
limited to, local governments, workforce development councils, port
districts, community and technical colleges and higher education
institutions, export assistance providers, the Washington manufacturing
services, the Washington state quality award council, small business
assistance programs, and other federal, state, and local programs to
facilitate the alignment of planning efforts and the seamless delivery
of business support services in the county;
(b) Providing information on state and local permitting processes,
tax issues, and other essential information for operating, expanding,
or locating a business in Washington;
(c) Marketing Washington and local areas as excellent locations to
expand or relocate a business and positioning Washington as a globally
competitive place to grow business, which may include developing and
executing regional plans to attract companies from out of state;
(d) Working with businesses on site location and selection
assistance;
(e) Providing business retention and expansion services, including
business outreach and monitoring efforts to identify and address
challenges and opportunities faced by businesses; and
(f) Participating in economic development system-wide discussions
regarding gaps in business start-up assistance in Washington; and
(2) Support for regional economic research and regional planning
efforts to implement target industry sector strategies and other
economic development strategies, including cluster-based strategies,
that support increased living standards and increase foreign direct
investment throughout Washington. Activities include:
(a) Participation in regional planning efforts with workforce
development councils involving coordinated strategies around workforce
development and economic development policies and programs.
Coordinated planning efforts ((shall)) must include, but not be limited
to, assistance to industry clusters in the region;
(b) Participation between the contracting organization and the
state board for community and technical colleges as created in RCW
28B.50.050, and any community and technical colleges in providing for
the coordination of the job skills training program and the customized
training program within its region;
(c) Collecting and reporting data as specified by the contract with
the department for statewide systemic analysis. The department
((shall)) must consult with the Washington state economic development
commission in the establishment of such uniform data as is needed to
conduct a statewide systemic analysis of the state's economic
development programs and expenditures. In cooperation with other
local, regional, and state planning efforts, contracting organizations
may provide insight into the needs of target industry clusters,
business expansion plans, early detection of potential relocations or
layoffs, training needs, and other appropriate economic information;
(d) In conjunction with other governmental jurisdictions and
institutions, participate in the development of a countywide economic
development plan, consistent with the state comprehensive plan for
economic development developed by the Washington state economic
development commission.
In carrying out the provisions of subsection (1)(d) and (e) of this
section, the contracting organizations must comply with the business
recruitment and retention protocols established by the department under
section 1 of this act.

--- END ---