BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.10.100 and 1995 c 305 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Retirement of a member for service shall be made by the retirement
board as follows:
(1) Any judge who, on August 9, 1971 or within one year thereafter,
shall have completed as a judge the years of actual service required
under chapter 2.12 RCW and who shall elect to become a member of this
system, shall in all respects be deemed qualified to retire under this
retirement system upon the member's written request.
(2) Any member who has completed fifteen or more years of service
may be retired upon the member's written request but shall not be
eligible to receive a retirement allowance until the member attains the
age of sixty years.
(3) Any member who attains the age of seventy-five years shall be
retired at either (a) the end of the calendar year in which the member
attains such age; or (b) the expiration of the member's term of office
after attaining such age.
(4) Any judge who involuntarily leaves service or who is appointed
to a position as a federal judge or federal magistrate at any time
after having served an aggregate of twelve years shall be eligible to
a partial retirement allowance computed according to RCW 2.10.110 and
shall receive this allowance upon the attainment of the age of sixty
years and fifteen years after the beginning of the member's judicial
service.

--- END ---