BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.67.020 and 2009 c 296 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
(1) The Washington customized employment training program is hereby
created to provide training assistance to employers locating or
expanding in the state.
(2)(a) Application to receive funding under this program ((shall))
must be made to the board in a form and manner as specified by the
board. Successful applicants ((shall)) must receive a training
allowance from the board to cover the costs of training at a qualified
training institution. Employers may not receive an allowance for
training costs which exceed the maximum annual training cost per
employee, as established by the board, and are not eligible to receive
an allowance or allowances of over five hundred thousand dollars per
calendar year.
(b) Allowances ((shall)) must be granted for applicants who meet
the following criteria:
(i) The employer must have entered into an agreement with a
qualified training institution to engage in customized training and the
employer must agree to: (A) Upon completion of the training, make a
payment to the employment training finance account created in RCW
28B.67.030 in an amount equal to one-quarter of the amount of the
training allowance; and (B) over the subsequent eighteen months, make
monthly or quarterly payments, as specified in the agreement, to the
employment training finance account created in RCW 28B.67.030 in an
amount equal to three-quarters of the amount of the training allowance.
During calendar years 2009 and 2010, participants may delay payments
due under this section for up to eighteen months. The payments into
the employment training finance account provided for in this section do
not constitute payment to the institution.
(ii) When hiring, the employer must make good faith efforts, as
determined by the board, to hire from trainees in the participant's
training program. The agreement with the qualified training
institution provided for in (b)(i) of this subsection shall specify
terms for reimbursement or additional payment to the employment
training finance account by the employer if the participant does not,
when hiring, make good faith efforts to hire from trainees in the
participant's training program.
(iii) The training allowance may not be used to train workers who
have been hired as a result of a strike or lockout.
(c) Preference ((shall)) must be given to employers with fewer than
fifty employees.
(d) Preference ((shall)) must be given to training that leads to
transferable skills that are interchangeable among different jobs,
employers, or workplaces.
(3) Qualified training institutions may enter into agreements with
four-year institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, in accordance with the interlocal cooperation act, chapter
39.34 RCW.
(4) The board and qualified training institutions may solicit and
receive gifts, grants, funds, fees, and endowments, in trust or
otherwise, from tribal, local, federal, or other governmental entities,
as well as private sources, for the purpose of providing training
allowances under chapter 112, Laws of 2006. All revenue thus solicited
and received ((shall)) must be deposited into the employment training
finance account created in RCW 28B.67.030.
(5) Qualified training institutions must make good faith efforts to
develop training programs using trainers preferred by participants.
(6) For employers who (a) have requested training under the job
skills program created under chapter 28C.04 RCW but are not able to
participate in the job skills program because the funds have all been
committed, and (b) desire to become participants in the Washington
customized employment training program, the board ((shall)) must ensure
a seamless process toward participation.
(7) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 28B.67.902 (Expiration date -- 2006 c 112
§§ 1-4 and 8) and 2006 c 112 s 11 are each repealed.

--- END ---