BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08.580 and 2002 c 252 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person receiving public assistance is prohibited from using
electronic benefit cards or cash obtained with electronic benefit
cards:
(a) For the purpose of participating in any of the activities
authorized under chapter 9.46 RCW;
(b) For the purpose of parimutuel wagering authorized under chapter
67.16 RCW; ((or))
(c) To purchase lottery tickets or shares authorized under chapter
67.70 RCW;
(d) For the purpose of participating in or purchasing any
activities located in a tattoo, body piercing, or body art shop
licensed under chapter 18.300 RCW;
(e) To purchase cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010 or tobacco
products as defined in RCW 82.26.010;
(f) To purchase any items regulated under Title 66 RCW; or
(g) For the purpose of purchasing or participating in any
activities in any location listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) On or before January 1, 2012, the businesses listed in this
subsection must disable the ability of ATM and point-of-sale machines
located on their business premises to accept the electronic benefit
card. The following businesses are required to comply with this
mandate:
(a) Taverns licensed under RCW 66.24.330;
(b) Beer/wine specialty stores licensed under RCW 66.24.371;
(c) Nightclubs licensed under RCW 66.24.600;
(d) Contract liquor stores defined under RCW 66.04.010;
(e) Bail bond agencies regulated under chapter 18.185 RCW;
(f) Gambling establishments licensed under chapter 9.46 RCW;
(g) Tattoo, body piercing, or body art shops regulated under
chapter 18.300 RCW;
(h) Adult entertainment venues with performances that contain
erotic material where minors under the age of eighteen are prohibited
under RCW 9.68A.150; and
(i) Any establishments where persons under the age of eighteen are
not permitted.
(3) Violation of subsection (1) of this section constitutes a gross
misdemeanor.
(4) Any business establishment which does not comply with the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section shall have its license
issued under chapter 19.02 RCW suspended until such time as the
establishment complies with the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section.
(a) The department shall notify, in writing, all recipients of
electronic benefit cards that any violation of subsection (1) of this
section could result in civil or criminal legal proceedings and, for
recipients, the forfeiture of all cash public assistance, and for
business establishments, the temporary suspension of their business
license.
(b) Whenever the department receives notice that a person has
violated subsection (1) of this section, the department shall notify
the person in writing that the violation could result in civil or
criminal legal proceedings and, for recipients, the forfeiture of all
cash public assistance, and for business establishments, the temporary
suspension of their business license.
(c) The department shall assign a protective payee to the person
receiving public assistance who violates subsection (1) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---