BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds the integrity of
public assistance programs can be improved by establishing uniform and
consistent procedures for determining eligibility. This finding is
supported by the feedback and suggestions of many state employees who
have themselves suggested these measures to ensure that finite
resources within public assistance programs are reserved for those
truly eligible and in most need. The legislature further finds that
public confidence in our public assistance programs will greatly
benefit from some assurance that every effort is being made to
determine eligibility before benefits are distributed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may not provide public assistance to any
applicant who has not provided:
(a) A social security number that has been verified by the
department; and
(b) Written authorization for electronic transmittal of the
applicant's most recent federal income tax return to the department to
verify financial eligibility annually. The applicant must bear the
costs of the transmittal.
(2) The department shall verify a recipient's continued eligibility
for public assistance services every six months.
(3) "Public assistance" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
74.04.005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If a portion of this act is made inoperable
due to a conflict with federal requirements, the department must seek
a waiver to exempt the state from the federal regulation or law that
prevents full implementation of this act.

--- END ---