BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this section and sections 2 through 9 of this act unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(2) "Director" means the director of the division of special
investigations within the state auditor's office.
(3) "Disclosable information" means public information that (a) is
not exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW; (b) does not
pertain to an ongoing investigation; and (c) has not previously been
disclosed in a public record.
(4) "Division" means the division of special investigations.
(5) "Fraud or abuse" means any criminal or administrative
misconduct by staff, contractors, vendors, or recipients in any program
or service administered by the department. This does not include
provider fraud as it relates to the department's administration of
funds under Title XIX of the social security act, medicaid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 There is established in the state auditor's
office a division of special investigations which shall:
(1) Conduct and supervise independent and objective investigations
relating to allegations of fraud or abuse in any program or service
administered by the department;
(2) Provide leadership and coordination in recommending policies
and procedures designed to detect and prevent fraud and abuse; and
(3) Make recommendations to the auditor and the legislature about
vulnerabilities and deficiencies relating to the detection and
prevention of fraud or abuse as may be discovered as a result of
completed investigations conducted or coordinated by the division.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The director is the head of the division and
is appointed by the auditor solely on the basis of integrity and
demonstrated ability in law enforcement management, public
administration, and conducting investigations. The director reports to
and is under the general supervision of the auditor in all matters
related to fraud and program integrity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) It is the duty and responsibility of the
director to:
(a) Conduct, supervise, and coordinate fraud and abuse
investigations and provide policy direction as it relates to program
integrity and fraud and abuse;
(b) Recommend policies for and coordinate activities carried out or
financed by the department for the purpose of preventing and detecting
fraud or abuse;
(c) Recommend policies for, and conduct, supervise, and coordinate,
relationships between the department and federal, state, and local
governmental agencies, and nongovernmental entities, with respect to:
(i) Matters relating to the prevention and detection of fraud or abuse
in programs and operations administered by the department; or (ii) the
identification of participants in the fraud or abuse; and
(d) Keep the auditor and the legislature informed concerning the
detection and prevention of fraud or abuse, and to make recommendations
for improvement of the activities.
(2) In carrying out the duties and responsibilities established in
sections 1 through 9 of this act, the director must refer all
investigations in which the director has found substantial evidence
supporting a finding of a violation of federal or state criminal law to
either the appropriate prosecuting authority or the attorney general's
office for possible criminal prosecution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The director must submit a report
summarizing the activities of the division to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives by November 30,
2012, and biennially thereafter. The report shall contain only
disclosable information, including:
(a) A description of significant fraud or abuse, and of
vulnerabilities or deficiencies relating to the prevention and
detection of fraud or abuse, discovered as a result of investigations
completed during the reporting period;
(b) A description of corrective action taken by the department
regarding fraud and abuse discovered as a result of investigations
conducted by the division of fraud investigation;
(c) Recommendations for improving the activities of the division
with respect to the vulnerabilities or deficiencies identified under
(a) of this subsection;
(d) An identification of each significant recommendation described
in the previous reports on which corrective action has or has not been
completed; and
(e) A summary of matters referred to prosecuting authorities during
the reporting period and the charges filed and convictions entered
during the reporting period that have resulted from referrals by the
division.
(2) The director must forward a draft of the report to the
secretary of the department not less than twenty days before the date
the report is to be issued.
(3) Within sixty days after the transmission of the report by the
director to the legislature, the auditor must make copies of the report
available to the public on its web site.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) In carrying out the provisions of
sections 1 through 9 of this act, the director is authorized to:
(a) Have prompt access to all individuals, records, electronic
data, reports, audits, reviews, documents, and other materials
available to the department that relate to investigations of the
division that are not otherwise prohibited from disclosure to the
director;
(b) Request information or assistance as is necessary for carrying
out the duties and responsibilities provided by sections 1 through 9 of
this act from a federal, state, or local governmental agency or unit of
a governmental agency;
(c) Issue subpoenas for witnesses, documents, information, and
other data necessary in the furtherance of an investigation conducted
by the division. The subpoenas are enforceable under RCW 34.05.588.
Prior to issuing subpoenas to a state agency, the director must first
make a reasonable request to the agency for documents and information
in possession of the agency;
(d) Administer oaths and take testimony, when appropriate in the
performance of the duties and responsibilities provided in sections 1
through 9 of this act, unless otherwise prohibited by law;
(e) To the extent and in the amount as may be provided by
appropriation, enter into contracts and other arrangements for audits,
studies, analyses, and other services with public or private agencies,
and make the payments necessary to carry out the provisions of sections
1 through 9 of this act, subject to compliance with civil service laws,
collective bargaining agreements, and other applicable law.
(2) The state auditor is authorized to:
(a) To the extent and in the amount as may be provided by
appropriation, select, appoint, and employ personnel as may be
necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 1 through 9 of this
act;
(b) To the extent and in the amount as may be provided by
appropriation, purchase or lease facilities, equipment, and supplies
necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 1 through 9 of this
act;
(c) Delegate to the director any function of the state auditor
under chapter 42.40 RCW.
(3) Whenever information or assistance requested under subsection
(1)(a) of this section is, in the judgment of the director,
unreasonably refused or not provided, the director must report the
circumstances to the auditor without delay.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) In addition to the authority granted in
RCW 43.09.165, the state auditor and the director may apply for and
obtain a superior court order approving and authorizing a subpoena in
advance of its issuance. The application may be made in the county
where the subpoenaed person resides or is found, or the county where
the subpoenaed records or documents are located, or in Thurston county.
The application must: (a) State that an order is sought pursuant to
this subsection; (b) adequately specify the records, documents, or
testimony; and (c) declare under oath that an investigation is being
conducted for a lawfully authorized purpose related to an investigation
within the state auditor's authority and that the subpoenaed documents
or testimony are reasonably related to an investigation within the
state auditor's authority.
(2) Where the application under this section is made to the
satisfaction of the court, the court must issue an order approving the
subpoena. An order under this section constitutes authority of law for
the state auditor to subpoena the records or testimony.
(3) The state auditor and the director may seek approval and a
court may issue an order under this section without prior notice to any
person, including the person to whom the subpoena is directed and the
person who is the subject of an investigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The director may receive and investigate
complaints or information from an employee of the department or a
citizen concerning the possible existence of an activity constituting
fraud and abuse.
(2) The director must not, after receipt of a complaint or
information from a complainant, disclose the identity of the
complainant without the consent of the complainant, unless the director
determines that the disclosure is unavoidable during the course of
investigation, except as otherwise provided by state law.
(3) An employee who has authority to take, direct others to take,
recommend, or approve a personnel action, must not, with respect to the
authority, take or threaten to take an action against an employee as a
reprisal for making a complaint or disclosing information to the
director, unless the complaint was made with willful disregard for its
truth or falsity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The director may enter into contracts or
interagency agreements with other state agencies to conduct
investigations into allegations of fraud and abuse in those agencies.
The requesting agency must reimburse the division of special
investigations for the cost of the investigation.
(2) The director must provide the requesting agency a report of
findings and may also file the findings with the appropriate
prosecuting attorney or the attorney general's office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of
the department of social and health services division of fraud
investigation pertaining to the investigation of fraud and abuse and
other duties set out under sections 1 through 9 of this act are
transferred to the division of special investigations of the state
auditor's office. All references to the division of fraud
investigation in the department of social and health services in the
revised code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or
the division of special investigations in the state auditor's office.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, and written material in the possession of the department of
social and health services division of fraud investigations pertaining
to the powers, functions, and duties transferred in sections 1 through
9 of this act shall be delivered to the custody of the division of
special investigations of the state auditor's office.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health
services division of fraud investigation for carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall, on the effective date of this
section, be transferred and credited to the division of special
investigations of the state auditor's office.
(c) All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and
other tangible property employed by the division of fraud
investigations within the department of social and health services in
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
made available to the division of special investigations of the state
auditor's office. All funds, credits, or other assets held in
connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
assigned to the division of special investigations of the state
auditor's office.
(d) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the department of
social and health services division of fraud investigation pertaining
to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and
acted upon by the division of special investigations of the state
auditor's office. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain
in full force and shall be performed by the division of special
investigations of the state auditor's office.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the
department of social and health services division of fraud
investigation shall not affect the validity of any act performed before
the effective date of this section.
(5)(a) Any appropriations made to the department of social and
health services for the division of fraud investigation for carrying
out the powers, functions, and duties transferred in this act shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
state auditor's office.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health
services for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred to the
state auditor's office through an interagency agreement.
(6)(a) All employees of the division of fraud investigation within
the department of social and health services engaged in performing the
powers, functions, and duties transferred in this act are transferred
to the jurisdiction of the division of special investigations in the
state auditor's office. All employees classified under chapter 41.06
RCW are assigned to the division of special investigations to perform
their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(b) Nothing in this section may be construed to alter any existing
collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective
bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the
bargaining unit has been modified by action of the public employment
relations commission as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 10 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.09 RCW.

--- END ---