BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.12.260 and 1997 c 59 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Temporary assistance for needy families grants shall be made to
persons specified in RCW 74.12.010 as amended or such others as the
federal department of health, education and welfare shall recognize for
the sole purposes of giving benefits to the children whose needs are
included in the grant paid to such persons. The recipient of each
temporary assistance for needy families grant shall be and hereby is
required to present reasonable proof to the department of social and
health services as often as may be required by the department that all
funds received in the form of a temporary assistance for needy families
grant for the children represented in the grant are being spent for the
benefit of the children.
(2) The temporary assistance for needy families grant shall be
dispensed as an electronic voucher benefit using the electronic benefit
transfer system as specified in RCW 74.08A.020 to ensure that the grant
is being spent for the benefit of the children. The electronic voucher
benefit shall consist of the full grant amount and shall limit all
purchases, transactions, and payments to such items and purposes to be
defined by the department in rule as having a clear benefit to the
children.
(3) The portion of the temporary assistance for needy families
grant that can be withdrawn as cash shall be limited by the vendor to
no greater than fifty dollars per month. The remainder of the grant
amount may only be accessed through the electronic voucher benefit.
(4) For any purchase or payment that cannot be made by using the
electronic voucher benefit, a recipient of the temporary assistance for
needy families grant may request from the department that a direct
payment be issued on a regular or one-time basis to any landlord,
utility company, or other approved entity. The department may deduct
an amount from the grant to cover the administrative cost of issuing a
direct payment.
(5) The department shall require the electronic benefit transfer
system vendor to fully implement the electronic voucher benefit by a
date no later than July 1, 2012.
(6) On an annual basis, the department shall provide complete and
comprehensive transaction detail from the electronic benefit transfer
system to the state auditor for purposes of an audit using a
statistically significant sample of the temporary assistance for needy
families caseload to determine whether the requirements of this section
are being met.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.08A.020 and 1997 c 58 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
((By October 2002,)) (1) The department shall develop and implement
an electronic benefit transfer system to be used for the delivery of
public assistance benefits, including without limitation, food
assistance.
(2) By July 1, 2012, the electronic benefit transfer system shall
be capable of delivering an electronic voucher benefit consistent with
the provisions of RCW 74.12.260.
(3) The department shall comply with P.L. 104-193, and shall
cooperate with relevant federal agencies in the design and
implementation of the electronic benefit transfer system.

--- END ---