BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that approximately two
hundred thirty-one million dollars in general fund state dollars will
be spent in the working connections child care program during the 2011-2013 biennium. Maintaining integrity in this program is of the utmost
importance in ensuring that finite state resources are being used in an
appropriate manner. The legislature further finds that thirty-two
percent of overpayments made in public assistance programs during
fiscal year 2009 were in the working connections child care program
requiring extensive state employee resources to recoup these
overpayments. The legislature believes that a number of overpayments
can be avoided in the future with the use of a regularly scheduled
audit program for a certain percentage of the working connections child
care providers.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.135 and 2010 c 273 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and implement policies in the
working connections child care program to promote stability and quality
of care for children from low-income households. Policies for the
expenditure of funds constituting the working connections child care
program must be consistent with the outcome measures defined in RCW
74.08A.410 and the standards established in this section intended to
promote continuity of care for children.
(2) Beginning in fiscal year 2011, for families with children
enrolled in an early childhood education and assistance program, a head
start program, or an early head start program, authorizations for the
working connections child care subsidy shall be effective for twelve
months unless a change in circumstances necessitates reauthorization
sooner than twelve months.
(3) The department, in consultation with the department of social
and health services, shall report to the legislature by September 1,
2011, with:
(a) An analysis of the impact of the twelve-month authorization
period on the stability of child care, program costs, and
administrative savings; and
(b) Recommendations for expanding the application of the twelve-month authorization period to additional populations of children in
care.
(4) Within existing resources, the department, with the assistance
of the department of social and health services, shall annually conduct
an audit of the attendance and financial records of thirty percent of
the licensed and certified child care providers and fifty percent of
the in-home and relative child care providers receiving a working
connections child care subsidy. The providers to be audited must be
selected on a random basis. The first audit period must conclude no
later than December 1, 2011. The department shall annually report to
the appropriate committees of the legislature the results of the audits
conducted during the reporting period.

--- END ---