BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning August 1, 2011, all persons renewing or applying for
their driver's license, driver's instruction permit, agricultural
driving permit, identicard, or any other form of state issued
identification shall be required to show proof of his or her United
States citizenship or his or her lawful presence within the United
States. A renewal shall not be granted to any individual who does not
provide proof of his or her United States citizenship or his or her
lawful presence in the United States. A person shall not be required
to provide proof of citizenship under this subsection, so long as the
department has a record of the person's status as a United States
citizen, in compliance with subsection (3) of this section.
(2) A person may prove his or her citizenship by providing a valid,
unexpired United States passport or passport card, a certified copy of
a birth certificate, a consular report of birth abroad issued by the
United States department of state, a certificate of naturalization
issued by the department of homeland security, or a certificate of
citizenship.
(3) The department shall maintain records of an applicant's status
as a United States citizen or as a noncitizen, including the type of
document provided and the expiration of the applicant's authorization
to lawfully be within the United States. The department shall make
such records available to the secretary of state and state and local
criminal justice agencies.

--- END ---