BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.12.060 and 2009 c 172 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall adopt rules as may be
necessary or appropriate for effecting the provisions of this chapter,
and not in conflict with this chapter, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the state higher education
administrative procedure act. Such rules shall include provisions
designed to make employment under the work-study program reasonably
available, to the extent of available funds, to all eligible needy
students in eligible postsecondary institutions. The rules shall
include:
(1) Providing work under the state work-study program that will not
result in the displacement of employed workers or impair existing
contracts for services;
(2) Furnishing work only to a student who:
(a) Is capable, in the opinion of the eligible institution, of
maintaining good standing in such course of study while employed under
the program covered by the agreement; ((and))
(b) Has been accepted for enrollment as at least a half-time
student at the eligible institution or, in the case of a student
already enrolled in and attending the eligible institution, is in good
standing and in at least half-time attendance there either as an
undergraduate, graduate or professional student; ((and))
(c) Is not pursuing a degree in theology; and
(d) Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States;
(3) Placing priority on providing:
(a) Work opportunities for students who are residents of the state
of Washington as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013, particularly
former foster youth as defined in RCW 28B.92.060;
(b) Job placements in fields related to each student's academic or
vocational pursuits, with an emphasis on off-campus job placements
whenever appropriate; and
(c) Off-campus community service placements;
(4) To the extent practicable, limiting the proportion of state
subsidy expended upon nonresident students to fifteen percent, or such
less amount as specified in the biennial appropriations act;
(5) Provisions to assure that in the state institutions of higher
education, utilization of this work-study program:
(a) Shall only supplement and not supplant classified positions
under jurisdiction of chapter 41.06 RCW;
(b) That all positions established which are comparable shall be
identified to a job classification under the director of personnel's
classification plan and shall receive equal compensation;
(c) Shall not take place in any manner that would replace
classified positions reduced due to lack of funds or work; and
(d) That work study positions shall only be established at entry
level positions of the classified service unless the overall scope and
responsibilities of the position indicate a higher level; and
(6) Provisions to encourage job placements in high employer demand
occupations that meet Washington's economic development goals,
including those in international trade and international relations.
The board shall permit appropriate job placements in other states and
other countries.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.272 and 2007 c 277 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To be eligible for participation in the opportunity grant
program established in RCW 28B.50.271, a student must:
(a) Be a Washington resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012
enrolled in an opportunity grant-eligible program of study;
(b) Be a citizen or permanent resident of the United States;
(c) Have a family income that is at or below two hundred percent of
the federal poverty level using the most current guidelines available
from the United States department of health and human services, and be
determined to have financial need based on the free application for
federal student aid; and
(((c))) (d) Meet such additional selection criteria as the college
board shall establish in order to operate the program within
appropriated funding levels.
(2) Upon enrolling, the student must provide evidence of commitment
to complete the program. The student must make satisfactory progress
and maintain a cumulative 2.0 grade point average for continued
eligibility. If a student's cumulative grade point average falls below
2.0, the student may petition the institution of higher education of
attendance. The qualified institution of higher education has the
authority to establish a probationary period until such time as the
student's grade point average reaches required standards.
(3) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, public
qualified institutions of higher education shall receive an enhancement
of one thousand five hundred dollars for each full-time equivalent
student enrolled in the opportunity grant program whose income is below
two hundred percent of the federal poverty level. The funds shall be
used for individualized support services which may include, but are not
limited to, college and career advising, tutoring, emergency child
care, and emergency transportation. The qualified institution of
higher education is expected to help students access all financial
resources and support services available to them through alternative
sources.
(4) The college board shall be accountable for student retention
and completion of opportunity grant-eligible programs of study. It
shall set annual performance measures and targets and monitor the
performance at all qualified institutions of higher education. The
college board must reduce funding at institutions of higher education
that do not meet targets for two consecutive years, based on criteria
developed by the college board.
(5) The college board and higher education coordinating board shall
work together to ensure that students participating in the opportunity
grant program are informed of all other state and federal financial aid
to which they may be entitled while receiving an opportunity grant.
(6) The college board and higher education coordinating board shall
document the amount of opportunity grant assistance and the types and
amounts of other sources of financial aid received by participating
students. Annually, they shall produce a summary of the data.
(7) The college board shall:
(a) Begin developing the program no later than August 1, 2007, with
student enrollment to begin no later than January 14, 2008; and
(b) Submit a progress report to the legislature by December 1,
2008.
(8) The college board may, in implementing the opportunity grant
program, accept, use, and expend or dispose of contributions of money,
services, and property. All such moneys received by the college board
for the program must be deposited in an account at a depository
approved by the state treasurer. Only the college board or a duly
authorized representative thereof may authorize expenditures from this
account. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue
control, the account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required to permit expenditure of moneys in the
account.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.76.660 and 2005 c 518 s 917 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Recipients of the Washington scholars award or the Washington
scholars-alternate award under RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 who
choose to attend an independent college or university in this state, as
defined in subsection (((4))) (5) of this section, and recipients of
the award named after June 30, 1994, who choose to attend a public
college or university in the state may receive grants under this
section if moneys are available. The higher education coordinating
board shall distribute grants to eligible students under this section
from moneys appropriated for this purpose. The individual grants shall
not exceed, on a yearly basis, the yearly, full-time, resident,
undergraduate tuition and service and activities fees in effect at the
state-funded research universities. Grants to recipients attending an
independent institution shall be contingent upon the institution
matching on at least a dollar-for-dollar basis, either with actual
money or by a waiver of fees, the amount of the grant received by the
student from the state. The higher education coordinating board shall
establish procedures, by rule, to disburse the awards as direct grants
to the students.
(2) The higher education coordinating board shall establish rules
that provide for the annual awarding of grants, if moneys are
available, to three Washington scholars per legislative district except
for fiscal year 2007 when no more than two scholars per district shall
be selected; and, if not used by an original recipient, to the
Washington scholars-alternate from the same legislative district.
Beginning with scholars selected in the year 2000, if the
recipients of grants fail to demonstrate in a timely manner that they
will enroll in a Washington institution of higher education in the fall
term of the academic year following the award of the grant or are
deemed by the higher education coordinating board to have withdrawn
from college during the first academic year following the award, then
the grant shall be considered relinquished. The higher education
coordinating board may then award any remaining grant amounts to the
Washington scholars-alternate from the same legislative district if the
grants are awarded within one calendar year of the recipient being
named a Washington scholars-alternate. Washington scholars-alternates
named as recipients of the grant must also demonstrate in a timely
manner that they will enroll in a Washington institution of higher
education during the next available term, as determined by the higher
education coordinating board. The board may accept appeals and grant
waivers to the enrollment requirements of this section based on
exceptional mitigating circumstances of individual grant recipients.
To maintain eligibility for the grants, recipients must maintain a
minimum grade point average at the college or university equivalent to
3.30. Students shall be eligible to receive a maximum of twelve
quarters or eight semesters of grants for undergraduate study and may
transfer among in-state public and independent colleges and
universities during that period and continue to receive the grant as
provided under RCW 28B.76.665. If the student's cumulative grade point
average falls below 3.30 during the first three quarters or two
semesters, that student may petition the higher education coordinating
board which shall have the authority to establish a probationary period
until such time as the student's grade point average meets required
standards.
(3) No grant shall be awarded to any student who is pursuing a
degree in theology.
(4) No grant shall be awarded to any student who is not a citizen
or permanent resident of the United States.
(5) As used in this section, "independent college or university"
means a private, nonprofit educational institution, the main campus of
which is permanently situated in the state, open to residents of the
state, providing programs of education beyond the high school level
leading at least to the baccalaureate degree, and accredited by the
northwest association of schools and colleges as of June 9, 1988, and
other institutions as may be developed that are approved by the higher
education coordinating board as meeting equivalent standards as those
institutions accredited under this section.
(((5))) (6) As used in this section, "public college or university"
means an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.76.670 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 7 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence
under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.550, who receive the award after
June 30, 1994, may receive a grant, if funds are available. The grant
shall be used to attend a postsecondary institution located in the
state of Washington. Recipients may attend an institution of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, or an independent college or
university, or a licensed private vocational school. The higher
education coordinating board shall distribute grants to eligible
students under this section from moneys appropriated for this purpose.
The individual grants shall not exceed, on a yearly basis, the yearly,
full-time, resident, undergraduate tuition and service and activities
fees in effect at the state-funded research universities. In
consultation with the workforce training and education coordinating
board, the higher education coordinating board shall establish
procedures, by rule, to disburse the awards as direct grants to the
students.
(2) To qualify for the grant, recipients shall enter the
postsecondary institution within three years of high school graduation
and maintain a minimum grade point average at the institution
equivalent to 3.00, or, at a technical college, an above average
rating. Students shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years
of grants for undergraduate study and may transfer among in-state
eligible postsecondary institutions during that period and continue to
receive the grant.
(3) No grant may be awarded to any student who is pursuing a degree
in theology.
(4) No grant may be awarded to any student who is not a citizen or
permanent resident of the United States.
(5) As used in this section, "independent college or university"
means a private, nonprofit educational institution, the main campus of
which is permanently situated in the state, open to residents of the
state, providing programs of education beyond the high school level
leading at least to the baccalaureate degree, and accredited by the
Northwest association of schools and colleges as of June 9, 1988, and
other institutions as may be developed that are approved by the higher
education coordinating board as meeting equivalent standards as those
institutions accredited under this section.
(((5))) (6) As used in this section, "licensed private vocational
school" means a private postsecondary institution, located in the
state, licensed by the workforce training and education coordinating
board under chapter 28C.10 RCW, and offering postsecondary education in
order to prepare persons for a vocation or profession, as defined in
RCW 28C.10.020(7).

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.92.080 and 2009 c 238 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except for opportunity internship graduates whose eligibility is
provided under RCW 28B.92.084, for a student to be eligible for a state
need grant a student must:
(1) Be a "needy student" or "disadvantaged student" as determined
by the board in accordance with RCW 28B.92.030 (((3) and (4))) (2) and
(5);
(2) Have been domiciled within the state of Washington for at least
one year;
(3) Be a citizen or permanent resident of the United States;
(4) Be enrolled or accepted for enrollment on at least a half-time
basis at an institution of higher education in Washington as defined in
RCW 28B.92.030(((1))) (4);
(((4))) (5) Until June 30, 2011, to the extent funds are
specifically appropriated for this purpose, and subject to any terms
and conditions specified in the omnibus appropriations act, be enrolled
or accepted for enrollment for at least three quarter credits or the
equivalent semester credits at an institution of higher education in
Washington as defined in RCW 28B.92.030(((1))) (4); and
(((5))) (6) Have complied with all the rules adopted by the board
for the administration of this chapter.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.101.020 and 2004 c 275 s 67 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this chapter, "placebound" means unable to
complete a college program because of family or employment commitments,
health concerns, monetary inability, or other similar factors.
(2) To be eligible for an educational opportunity grant, applicants
must be placebound residents of the state of Washington as defined in
RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (d), who: (a) Are citizens or permanent
residents of the United States; (b) are needy students as defined in
RCW 28B.92.030(3); and (((b))) (c) have completed the associate of arts
or associate of science degree or the equivalent. A placebound
resident is one who may be influenced by the receipt of an enhanced
student financial aid award to complete a baccalaureate degree at an
eligible institution. An eligible placebound applicant is further
defined as a person who would be unable to complete a baccalaureate
course of study but for receipt of an educational opportunity grant.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.102.020 and 2004 c 58 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Conditional scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in
whole or in part if the recipient renders service as a teacher in an
approved education program in this state.
(2) "Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a
college or university in the state of Washington that is accredited by
an accrediting association recognized as such by rule of the higher
education coordinating board.
(3) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(4) "Eligible student" means a student who is registered for at
least six credit hours or the equivalent, demonstrates high academic
achievement, is a resident student as defined by RCW 28B.15.012 and
28B.15.013, is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States,
and has a declared intention to complete an approved preparation
program leading to initial teacher certification or required for
earning an additional endorsement, and commits to teaching service in
the state of Washington.
(5) "Public school" means an elementary school, a middle school,
junior high school, or high school within the public school system
referred to in Article IX of the state Constitution.
(6) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means to render
service as a teacher in an approved education program in the state of
Washington in lieu of monetary repayment.
(7) "Satisfied" means paid-in-full.
(8) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received a
conditional scholarship or loan repayment under this chapter.
(9) "Loan repayment" means a federal student loan that is repaid in
whole or in part if the recipient renders service as a teacher in an
approved education program in Washington state.
(10) "Approved education program" means an education program in the
state of Washington for knowledge and skills generally learned in
preschool through twelfth grade. Approved education programs may
include but are not limited to:
(a) K-12 schools under Title 28A RCW; or
(b) Other K-12 educational sites in the state of Washington as
designated by the board.
(11) "Equalization fee" means the additional amount added to the
principal of a loan under this chapter to equate the debt to that which
the student would have incurred if the loan had been received through
the federal subsidized Stafford student loan program.
(12) "Teacher shortage area" means a shortage of elementary or
secondary school teachers in a specific subject area, discipline,
classification, or geographic area as defined by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.105.030 and 2007 c 214 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An eligible student is a student who:
(a) Is eligible for resident tuition and fee rates as defined in
RCW 28B.15.012 and is a citizen or permanent resident of the United
States;
(b) Achieved level four on the mathematics or science portion of
the tenth grade Washington assessment of student learning or achieved
a score in the math section of the SAT or the math section of the ACT
that is above the ninety-fifth percentile;
(c) Has a family income at or below one hundred twenty-five percent
of the state median family income at the time the student applies for
a GET ready for math and science scholarship and for up to the two
previous years;
(d) Has declared an intention to complete a qualified program or
qualified major or has entered a qualified program or declared a
qualified major at an institution of higher education;
(e) Has declared an intention to work in a mathematics, science, or
related field in Washington for at least three years immediately
following completion of a bachelor's degree or higher degree.
(2) An eligible recipient is an eligible student who:
(a) Has been awarded a scholarship in accordance with the selection
criteria and process established by the board and the program
administrator;
(b) Enrolls at an institution of higher education within one year
of graduating from high school;
(c) Maintains satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the
institution of higher education where the student is enrolled;
(d) Takes at least one college-level mathematics or science course
each term since enrolling in an institution of higher education; and
(e) Enters a qualified program or qualified major no later than the
end of the first term in which the student has junior level standing.

Sec. 9 RCW 28B.115.020 and 1991 c 332 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "Department" means the state department of health.
(3) "Eligible education and training programs" means education and
training programs approved by the department that lead to eligibility
for a credential as a credentialed health care professional.
(4) "Eligible expenses" means reasonable expenses associated with
the costs of acquiring an education such as tuition, books, equipment,
fees, room and board, and other expenses determined by the board.
(5) "Eligible student" means a student who has been accepted into
an eligible education or training program, is a United States citizen
or permanent resident, and has a declared intention to serve in a
health professional shortage area upon completion of the education or
training program.
(6) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means to render
health care services in a health professional shortage area in the
state of Washington in lieu of monetary repayment.
(7) "Health professional shortage areas" means those areas where
credentialed health care professionals are in short supply as a result
of geographic maldistribution or as the result of a short supply of
credentialed health care professionals in specialty health care areas
and where vacancies exist in serious numbers that jeopardize patient
care and pose a threat to the public health and safety. The department
shall determine health professional shortage areas as provided for in
RCW 28B.115.070, or until June 1, 1992, as provided for in RCW
28B.115.060. In making health professional shortage area designations
in the state the department may be guided by applicable federal
standards for "health manpower shortage areas," and "medically
underserved areas," and "medically underserved populations."
(8) "Credentialed health care profession" means a health care
profession regulated by a disciplining authority in the state of
Washington under RCW 18.130.040 or by the state board of pharmacy under
chapter 18.64 RCW and designated by the department in RCW 28B.115.070,
or until June 1, 1992, as established in RCW 28B.115.060 as a
profession having shortages of credentialed health care professionals
in the state.
(9) "Credentialed health care professional" means a person
regulated by a disciplining authority in the state of Washington to
practice a health care profession under RCW 18.130.040 or by the state
board of pharmacy under chapter 18.64 RCW.
(10) "Loan repayment" means a loan that is paid in full or in part
if the participant renders health care services in a health
professional shortage area as defined by the department.
(11) "Nonshortage rural area" means a nonurban area of the state of
Washington that has not been designated as a rural physician shortage
area. The department shall identify the nonshortage rural areas of the
state.
(12) "Participant" means a credentialed health care professional
who has received a loan repayment award and has commenced practice as
a credentialed health care provider in a designated health professional
shortage area or an eligible student who has received a scholarship
under this program.
(13) "Program" means the health professional loan repayment and
scholarship program.
(14) "Required service obligation" means an obligation by the
participant to provide health care services in a health professional
shortage area for a period to be established as provided for in this
chapter.
(15) "Rural physician shortage area" means rural geographic areas
where primary care physicians are in short supply as a result of
geographic maldistributions and where their limited numbers jeopardize
patient care and pose a threat to public health and safety. The
department shall designate rural physician shortage areas.
(16) "Satisfied" means paid-in-full.
(17) "Scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in whole or in
part if the recipient renders health care services in a health
professional shortage area.
(18) "Sponsoring community" means a rural hospital or hospitals as
authorized in chapter 70.41 RCW, a rural health care facility or
facilities as authorized in chapter 70.175 RCW, or a city or county
government or governments.

Sec. 10 RCW 28B.116.010 and 2005 c 215 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Institution of higher education" means a college or university
in the state of Washington that is accredited by an accrediting
association recognized as such by rule of the higher education
coordinating board.
(2) "Eligible student" means a student who:
(a) Is between the ages of sixteen and twenty-three;
(b) Has been in foster care in the state of Washington for a
minimum of six months since his or her fourteenth birthday;
(c) Is a financially needy student, as defined in RCW 28B.92.030;
(d) Is a resident student, as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2);
(e) Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States;
(f) Has entered or will enter an institution of higher education in
Washington state within three years of high school graduation or having
successfully completed his or her GED;
(((f))) (g) Is not pursuing a degree in theology; and
(((g))) (h) Makes satisfactory progress towards the completion of
a degree or certificate program.
(3) "Cost of attendance" means the cost associated with the
attendance of the institution of higher education as determined by the
higher education coordinating board, including but not limited to
tuition, room, board, and books.

Sec. 11 RCW 28B.117.030 and 2007 c 314 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The higher education coordinating board shall design and, to
the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, implement, a
program of supplemental scholarship and student assistance for students
who have emancipated from the state foster care system after having
spent at least one year in care.
(2) The board shall convene and consult with an advisory committee
to assist with program design and implementation. The committee shall
include but not be limited to former foster care youth and their
advocates; representatives from the state board for community and
technical colleges, and from public and private agencies that assist
current and former foster care recipients in their transition to
adulthood; and student support specialists from public and private
colleges and universities.
(3) To the extent that sufficient funds have been appropriated for
this purpose, a student is eligible for assistance under this section
if he or she:
(a) Emancipated from foster care on or after January 1, 2007, after
having spent at least one year in foster care subsequent to his or her
sixteenth birthday;
(b) Is a resident student, as defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2);
(c) Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States;
(d) Is enrolled with or will enroll on at least a half-time basis
with an institution of higher education in Washington state by the age
of twenty-one;
(((d))) (e) Is making satisfactory academic progress toward the
completion of a degree or certificate program, if receiving
supplemental scholarship assistance;
(((e))) (f) Has not earned a bachelor's or professional degree; and
(((f))) (g) Is not pursuing a degree in theology.
(4) A passport to college scholarship under this section:
(a) Shall not exceed resident undergraduate tuition and fees at the
highest-priced public institution of higher education in the state; and
(b) Shall not exceed the student's financial need, less a
reasonable self-help amount defined by the board, when combined with
all other public and private grant, scholarship, and waiver assistance
the student receives.
(5) An eligible student may receive a passport to college
scholarship under this section for a maximum of five years after the
student first enrolls with an institution of higher education or until
the student turns age twenty-six, whichever occurs first. If a student
turns age twenty-six during an academic year, and would otherwise be
eligible for a scholarship under this section, the student shall
continue to be eligible for a scholarship for the remainder of the
academic year.
(6) The higher education coordinating board, in consultation with
and with assistance from the state board for community and technical
colleges, shall perform an annual analysis to verify that those
institutions of higher education at which students have received a
scholarship under this section have awarded the student all available
need-based and merit-based grant and scholarship aid for which the
student qualifies.
(7) In designing and implementing the passport to college student
support program under this section, the board, in consultation with and
with assistance from the state board for community and technical
colleges, shall ensure that a participating college or university:
(a) Has a viable plan for identifying students eligible for
assistance under this section, for tracking and enhancing their
academic progress, for addressing their unique needs for assistance
during school vacations and academic interims, and for linking them to
appropriate sources of assistance in their transition to adulthood;
(b) Receives financial and other incentives for achieving
measurable progress in the recruitment, retention, and graduation of
eligible students.

Sec. 12 RCW 28B.118.010 and 2008 c 321 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall design the Washington
college bound scholarship program in accordance with this section.
(1) "Eligible students" are those students who qualify for free or
reduced-price lunches. If a student qualifies in the seventh grade,
the student remains eligible even if the student does not receive free
or reduced-price lunches thereafter.
(2) Eligible students shall be notified of their eligibility for
the Washington college bound scholarship program beginning in their
seventh grade year. Students shall also be notified of the
requirements for award of the scholarship.
(3) To be eligible for a Washington college bound scholarship, a
student must sign a pledge during seventh or eighth grade that includes
a commitment to graduate from high school with at least a C average and
with no felony convictions. Students who were in the eighth grade
during the 2007-08 school year may sign the pledge during the 2008-09
school year. The pledge must be witnessed by a parent or guardian and
forwarded to the higher education coordinating board by mail or
electronically, as indicated on the pledge form.
(4)(a) Scholarships shall be awarded to eligible students
graduating from public high schools, approved private high schools
under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or who received home-based instruction under
chapter 28A.200 RCW.
(b) To receive the Washington college bound scholarship, a student
must graduate with at least a "C" average from a public high school or
an approved private high school under chapter 28A.195 RCW in Washington
or have received home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, must
have no felony convictions, ((and)) must be a resident student as
defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (d), and must be a citizen or
permanent resident of the United States.
(5) A student's family income will be assessed upon graduation
before awarding the scholarship.
(6) If at graduation from high school the student's family income
does not exceed sixty-five percent of the state median family income,
scholarship award amounts shall be as provided in this section.
(a) For students attending two or four-year institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the value of the award shall be
(i) the difference between the student's tuition and required fees,
less the value of any state-funded grant, scholarship, or waiver
assistance the student receives; (ii) plus five hundred dollars for
books and materials.
(b) For students attending private four-year institutions of higher
education in Washington, the award amount shall be the representative
average of awards granted to students in public research universities
in Washington.
(c) For students attending private vocational schools in
Washington, the award amount shall be the representative average of
awards granted to students in public community and technical colleges
in Washington.
(7) Recipients may receive no more than four full-time years' worth
of scholarship awards.
(8) Institutions of higher education shall award the student all
need-based and merit-based financial aid for which the student would
otherwise qualify. The Washington college bound scholarship is
intended to replace unmet need, loans, and, at the student's option,
work-study award before any other grants or scholarships are reduced.
(9) The first scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating
in 2012.
(10) The state of Washington retains legal ownership of tuition
units awarded as scholarships under this chapter until the tuition
units are redeemed. These tuition units shall remain separately held
from any tuition units owned under chapter 28B.95 RCW by a Washington
college bound scholarship recipient.
(11) The scholarship award must be used within five years of
receipt. Any unused scholarship tuition units revert to the Washington
college bound scholarship account.
(12) Should the recipient terminate his or her enrollment for any
reason during the academic year, the unused portion of the scholarship
tuition units shall revert to the Washington college bound scholarship
account.

Sec. 13 RCW 28B.119.010 and 2004 c 275 s 60 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall design the Washington
promise scholarship program based on the following parameters:
(1) Scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating from
public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW,
students participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter
28A.200 RCW, and persons twenty-one years of age or younger receiving
a GED certificate, who meet both an academic and a financial
eligibility criteria.
(a) Academic eligibility criteria shall be defined as follows:
(i) Beginning with the graduating class of 2002, students
graduating from public and approved private high schools under chapter
28A.195 RCW must be in the top fifteen percent of their graduating
class, as identified by each respective high school at the completion
of the first term of the student's senior year; or
(ii) Students graduating from public high schools, approved private
high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, students participating in home-
based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW, and persons
twenty-one years of age or younger receiving a GED certificate, must
equal or exceed a cumulative scholastic assessment test I score of
twelve hundred on their first attempt or must equal or exceed a
composite American college test score of twenty-seven on their first
attempt.
(b) To meet the financial eligibility criteria, a student's family
income shall not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent of the state
median family income adjusted for family size, as determined by the
higher education coordinating board for each graduating class.
Students not meeting the eligibility requirements for the first year of
scholarship benefits may reapply for the second year of benefits, but
must still meet the income standard set by the board for the student's
graduating class.
(2) Promise scholarships are not intended to supplant any grant,
scholarship, or tax program related to postsecondary education. If the
board finds that promise scholarships supplant or reduce any grant,
scholarship, or tax program for categories of students, then the board
shall adjust the financial eligibility criteria or the amount of
scholarship to the level necessary to avoid supplanting.
(3) Within available funds, each qualifying student shall receive
two consecutive annual awards, the value of each not to exceed the
full-time annual resident tuition rates charged by Washington's
community colleges. The higher education coordinating board shall
award scholarships to as many students as possible from among those
qualifying under this section.
(4) By October 15th of each year, the board shall determine the
award amount of the scholarships, after taking into consideration the
availability of funds.
(5) The scholarships may only be used for undergraduate coursework
at accredited institutions of higher education in the state of
Washington.
(6) The scholarships may be used for undergraduate coursework at
Oregon institutions of higher education that are part of the border
county higher education opportunity project in RCW 28B.76.685 when
those institutions offer programs not available at accredited
institutions of higher education in Washington state.
(7) The scholarships may be used for college-related expenses,
including but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books, and
materials.
(8) The scholarships may not be awarded to any student who is
pursuing a degree in theology.
(9) The scholarships may not be awarded to any student who is not
a citizen or permanent resident of the United States.
(10) The higher education coordinating board may establish
satisfactory progress standards for the continued receipt of the
promise scholarship.
(((10))) (11) The higher education coordinating board shall
establish the time frame within which the student must use the
scholarship.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Section 6 of this act expires August 1,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Section 11 of this act expires June 30,
2013.

--- END ---