BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Public funds shall not be used by the state or local
governments, or any political subdivision or agency thereof, to pay or
otherwise reimburse, either directly or indirectly, any person, agency,
organization, or facility for the performance of any induced abortion.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply under the
following circumstances:
(a) Where the abortion is necessary to prevent the death of either
the pregnant woman or her unborn child under circumstances where every
reasonable effort is made to preserve the life of each;
(b) Where, on the basis of a physician's reasonable, good-faith
clinical judgment, a medical emergency exists that so complicates the
medical condition of a pregnant woman or her unborn child as to
necessitate the immediate abortion of her pregnancy for which a delay
will create serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of
a major bodily function of the pregnant woman or her unborn child under
circumstances where every reasonable effort is made to preserve the
life and health of each;
(c) Where the pregnancy is a result of any offense involving sexual
intercourse as defined in RCW 9A.44.010 and where the offense has been
reported to a law enforcement agency within seven days from the time
the offense occurred; or
(d) Where it is otherwise required by federal law as determined to
be binding on the state of Washington by a court of competent
jurisdiction.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.02.100 and 1992 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as
follows:
The sovereign people hereby declare that every individual possesses
a fundamental right of privacy with respect to personal reproductive
decisions.
Accordingly, it is the public policy of the state of Washington
that:
(1) Every individual has the fundamental right to choose or refuse
birth control;
(2) Every woman has the fundamental right to choose or refuse to
have an abortion, except as specifically limited by RCW 9.02.100
through 9.02.170 and 9.02.900 through 9.02.902;
(3) Except as specifically permitted by RCW 9.02.100 through
9.02.170 and 9.02.900 through 9.02.902, the state shall not deny or
interfere with a woman's fundamental right to choose or refuse to have
an abortion; and
(4) Except under section 1 of this act, the state shall not
discriminate against the exercise of these rights in the regulation or
provision of benefits, facilities, services, or information.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.02.110 and 1992 c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as
follows:
Except under section 1 of this act, the state may not deny or
interfere with a woman's right to choose to have an abortion prior to
viability of the fetus, or to protect her life or health.
A physician may terminate and a health care provider may assist a
physician in terminating a pregnancy as permitted by this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.02.140 and 1992 c 1 s 5 are each amended to read as
follows:
Except under section 1 of this act, any regulation promulgated by
the state relating to abortion shall be valid only if:
(1) The regulation is medically necessary to protect the life or
health of the woman terminating her pregnancy((,)); and
(2) The regulation is consistent with established medical
practice((, and
(3) Of the available alternatives, the regulation imposes the least
restrictions on the woman's right to have an abortion as defined by RCW
9.02.100 through 9.02.170 and 9.02.900 through 9.02.902)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 9.02.160 (State-provided benefits) and
1992 c 1 s 7 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---