BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.68.090 and 2009 c 470 s 718 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of transportation may make available its
engineering and other technical services, with or without charge, to
any municipality or person desiring them in connection with the
planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or
operation of airports or air navigation facilities.
(2)(a) The department may render financial assistance by grant or
loan, or both, to the following entities out of appropriations made by
the legislature for the following purposes:
(i) Any municipality or municipalities acting jointly in the
planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or
operation of an airport owned or controlled, or to be owned or
controlled by such municipality or municipalities((, or to));
(ii) Any Indian tribe recognized as such by the federal government
or such tribes acting jointly in the planning, acquisition,
construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of an airport,
owned or controlled, or to be owned or controlled by such tribe or
tribes, and to be held available for the general use of the public((,
out of appropriations made by the legislature for such purposes)); or
(iii) Any person or persons acting jointly in the planning,
acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of an
airport, owned or controlled, or to be owned or controlled by such
person or persons, and to be held available for the general use of the
public.
(b) Such financial assistance may be furnished in connection with
federal or other financial aid for the same purposes: PROVIDED, That
no grant or loan, or both, shall be in excess of two hundred fifty
thousand dollars, or five hundred thousand dollars during the 2009-2011
fiscal biennium, for any one project: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no grant
or loan, or both, shall be granted unless the municipality or
municipalities acting jointly, ((or)) the tribe or tribes acting
jointly, or the person or persons acting jointly shall from their own
funds match any funds made available by the department upon such ratio
as the department may prescribe.
(c) The department must establish, by rule, criteria for
administering financial assistance to any entity.
(3) The department is authorized to act as agent of any
municipality or municipalities acting jointly ((or)), any tribe or
tribes acting jointly, or any person or persons acting jointly upon the
request of such municipality or municipalities, ((or such)) tribe or
tribes, or person or persons in accepting, receiving, receipting for,
and disbursing federal moneys, and other moneys public or private, made
available to finance, in whole or in part, the planning, acquisition,
construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of an airport or
air navigation facility; and if requested by such municipality or
municipalities, ((or)) tribe or tribes, or person or persons, may act
as its or their agent in contracting for and supervising such planning,
acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation; and
all municipalities ((and)), tribes, and persons are authorized to
designate the department as their agent for the foregoing purposes.
The department, as principal on behalf of the state, and any
municipality on its own behalf, may enter into any contracts, with each
other or with the United States or with any person, which may be
required in connection with a grant or loan of federal moneys for
airport or air navigation facility purposes. All federal moneys
accepted under this section shall be accepted and transferred or
expended by the department upon such terms and conditions as are
prescribed by the United States. All moneys received by the department
pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the state treasury, and,
unless otherwise prescribed by the authority from which such moneys
were received, shall be kept in separate funds designated according to
the purposes for which the moneys were made available, and held by the
state in trust for such purposes. All such moneys are hereby
appropriated for the purposes for which the same were made available,
to be disbursed or expended in accordance with the terms and conditions
upon which they were made available: PROVIDED, That any landing fee or
charge imposed by any Indian tribe or tribes for the privilege of use
of an airport facility planned, acquired, constructed, improved,
maintained, or operated with financial assistance from the department
pursuant to this section must apply equally to tribal and nontribal
members: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the event any municipality or
municipalities ((or)), Indian tribe or tribes, or person or persons, or
any distributor of aircraft fuel as defined by RCW 82.42.020 which
operates in any airport facility which has received financial
assistance pursuant to this section, fails to collect the aircraft fuel
excise tax as specified in chapter 82.42 RCW, all funds or value of
technical assistance given or paid to such municipality or
municipalities ((or)), Indian tribe or tribes, or person or persons
under the provisions of this section shall revert to the department,
and shall be due and payable to the department immediately.

--- END ---