BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 80.01 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the duty of the counsel for the environment, as defined
in RCW 80.50.080, to represent and appear for the public and its
interest in protecting the quality of the environment in all actions
and proceedings involving any gas or electrical company. The expenses
of the counsel for the environment incurred under this section are
considered expenses of operation of the commission and must be paid
from the public service revolving fund established by RCW 80.01.080.
(2) This section does not limit the ability of other parties to
intervene in all actions and proceedings involving any gas or
electrical company.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.04.250 and 1991 c 122 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall have power upon complaint or upon its own
motion to ascertain and determine the fair value for rate making
purposes of the property of any public service company used and useful
for service in this state and shall exercise such power whenever it
shall deem such valuation or determination necessary or proper under
any of the provisions of this title.
(2) In determining what property is used and useful for providing
electric, gas, or water service, the commission may include the
reasonable costs of construction work in progress to the extent that
the commission finds that inclusion is in the public interest.
(3) In reviewing a resource acquisition of capacity or energy by an
electrical or gas company, the commission shall consider, among other
factors, the company's need for capacity and energy, the availability
and cost of other generators in the market at the time of acquisition,
the environmental costs and benefits of the acquisition, and the
overall impact of the selected generator on the company's portfolio.
The commission shall consider state laws and policies when considering
the environmental costs and benefits of an acquisition.
(4) The commission shall have the power to make revaluations of the
property of any public service company from time to time.
(5) The commission shall, before any hearing is had, notify the
complainants and the public service company concerned of the time and
place of such hearing by giving at least thirty days' written notice
thereof, specifying that at the time and place designated a hearing
will be held for the purpose of ascertaining the value of the company's
property, used and useful as aforesaid, which notice shall be
sufficient to authorize the commission to inquire into and pass upon
the matters designated in this section.

--- END ---