BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.36.085 and 1993 c 159 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
All fees and medical charges under this title shall conform to
regulations promulgated, and the fee schedule established by the
director and shall be paid within sixty days of receipt by the self-insured of a proper billing in the form prescribed by department rule
or sixty days after the claim is allowed by final order or judgment, if
an otherwise proper billing is received by the self-insured prior to
final adjudication of claim allowance. If a self-insured denies
payment of a bill, the self-insured must provide the medical provider
with the following information within sixty days of receipt of the
denied billing: The basis for the denial; instructions on how to
correct any billing errors, if applicable; a statement that the worker
cannot be billed for proper and necessary treatment; and information
about how to request a decision from the department concerning the
denied treatment or billing. The self-insured shall pay interest at
the rate of one percent per month, but at least one dollar per month,
whenever the payment period exceeds the applicable sixty-day period on
all proper fees and medical charges. Failure to pay all proper fees
and medical charges or to provide the information required under this
section for a denied billing within sixty days of receipt may subject
the employer to a penalty pursuant to RCW 51.48.080, which is payable
to the department. If the department has issued a final decision
concerning a denied treatment or billing the department may issue a
penalty once every three business days until payment for the treatment
or billing, including all interest and penalties, is satisfied.

--- END ---