BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.40.0301 and 1994 c 301 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Upon review of a determination by a board of equalization or
the board of tax appeals of the valuation of property for purposes of
taxation, it is presumed that the determination of the public official
charged with the duty of establishing such value is correct, but this
presumption is not a defense against any correction indicated by a
preponderance of the evidence.
(2) Upon review by any court((, or appellate body,)) of a
determination of the valuation of property for purposes of taxation, it
((shall be)) is presumed that the determination of the public official
charged with the duty of establishing such value is correct but this
presumption ((shall)) is not ((be)) a defense against any correction
indicated by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to taxes levied for
collection in 2012 and thereafter.

--- END ---