BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Within the amounts provided for the department's program
delivery management and support – program H in the 2011-2013 omnibus
transportation appropriations act, one million dollars of the motor
vehicle account--state appropriation must be held in unallotted status
by the office of financial management until the department has
completed an agency-wide, independent management, accountability, and
performance system assessment in accordance with subsection (2) of this
section.
(2) Beginning in 2012, and at least once every three years
thereafter, the department shall apply to the Washington state quality
award, or similar organization, for an independent assessment of its
quality management, accountability, and performance system. The
assessment must evaluate the effectiveness of all elements of the
department's management, accountability, and performance system,
including leadership, strategic planning, customer focus, analysis and
information, employee performance management, and process improvement.
The purpose of the assessment is to recognize best practice and
identify improvement opportunities.

--- END ---