BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that additional
flexibility is needed to address the current budget crisis in this
state. While contracting for state services is currently authorized,
the legislature recognizes that the process is cumbersome and
ultimately the collective bargaining process can interfere with the
state's ability to efficiently contract for appropriate services. The
legislature recognizes that the decision to contract for a service and
the implementation of a contract should be a management decision about
how to most efficiently deliver state services, and that these
decisions are not an appropriate topic for collective bargaining.
State agencies are encouraged to use competition to lower the cost and
improve the quality of public services, and state employees are
encouraged to compete for contracts to provide services.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.80.020 and 2010 c 283 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the matters
subject to bargaining include wages, hours, and other terms and
conditions of employment, and the negotiation of any question arising
under a collective bargaining agreement.
(2) The employer is not required to bargain over matters pertaining
to:
(a) Health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits,
except as required in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Any retirement system or retirement benefit; or
(c) Rules of the director of personnel or the Washington personnel
resources board adopted under section 203, chapter 354, Laws of 2002.
(3) Matters subject to bargaining include the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits. However,
except as provided otherwise in this subsection for institutions of
higher education, negotiations regarding the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits shall be
conducted between the employer and one coalition of all the exclusive
bargaining representatives subject to this chapter. The exclusive
bargaining representatives for employees that are subject to chapter
47.64 RCW shall bargain the dollar amount expended on behalf of each
employee for health care benefits with the employer as part of the
coalition under this subsection. Any such provision agreed to by the
employer and the coalition shall be included in all master collective
bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties. For institutions of
higher education, promotional preferences and the number of names to be
certified for vacancies shall be bargained under the provisions of RCW
41.80.010(4).
(4) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not agree to any proposal that would prevent the implementation of
approved affirmative action plans or that would be inconsistent with
the comparable worth agreement that provided the basis for the salary
changes implemented beginning with the 1983-1985 biennium to achieve
comparable worth.
(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not bargain over matters pertaining to management rights established in
RCW 41.80.040.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict
exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency
policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment
and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter,
the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a
statute is invalid and unenforceable.
(7) ((This section does not prohibit)) Bargaining that affects
contracts authorized by RCW 41.06.142 is prohibited. Any provision in
conflict with this act in any collective bargaining agreement in effect
on the effective date of this section is not effective beyond the
expiration date of the agreement.

--- END ---