BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2011-12 school year, this section authorizes
parents who choose to educate their children outside the public
education system to receive an education voucher for each child
educated outside the public education system.
(2)(a) A parent or guardian who wishes to obtain education vouchers
for his or her school-age children must apply to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by September 30th of each year.
(b) The application must show that the child has passed a national
assessment.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
issue vouchers by May 30th of the school year in which the parent
applies in the amount of three thousand five hundred dollars per
student per school year.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to
implement this section.

--- END ---