BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature declares that it is the
policy of the state that:
(1) A person shall not be required by an employer to abstain or
refrain from membership in any labor organization as a condition of
employment or continuation of employment. The right to work shall not
be denied or abridged on account of an employee's choice to bargain
collectively through a labor organization; and
(2) A person shall not be required by an employer to become or
remain a member of a labor organization as a condition of employment.
The right to work shall not be denied or abridged on account of an
employee's choice not to pay any dues, fees, or other charges of any
kind or amount, if not a member, to any labor organization, or on a
decision not to pay to any charity, political committees, or other
third party, in lieu of such payments, any amount equivalent to a pro
rata portion of dues, fees, or other charges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) A person's inherent right to work and to
bargain freely with the person's employer, individually or
collectively, for terms of the person's employment may not be denied or
infringed by law or by any organization.
(2) A contract that permits or requires the retention of part of an
employee's compensation to pay dues or assessments on the employee's
part to a labor union is void unless the employee delivers to the
employer the employee's written consent to the retention of those sums.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A person may not be denied employment
based on membership or nonmembership in a labor union.
(2) A contract is void if it requires that, to work for an
employer, employees or applicants for employment: (a) Must be or may
not be members of a labor union; or (b) must remain or may not remain
members of a labor union.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) A labor union, a labor organizer, or an
officer, member, agent, or representative of a labor union may not
collect, receive, or demand, directly or indirectly, a fee as a work
permit or as a condition for the privilege to work from a person who is
not a member of the union.
(2) A labor union that violates this section is liable for a civil
penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation. The
civil penalty may be recovered in the name of the state, acting through
an enforcement officer, in a court of competent jurisdiction.
(3)(a) A superior court has jurisdiction, on the application of the
state acting through an enforcement officer, to issue a restraining
order, a temporary or permanent injunction, or any other writ of
process appropriate to enforce this section.
(b) A proceeding under (a) of this subsection shall be instituted,
prosecuted, and tried in the same manner as another civil case of a
similar nature in the superior court.
(4)(a) A labor union officer or a labor organizer commits an
offense if the person violates this section.
(b) An offense under (a) of this subsection is a misdemeanor
punishable by: (i) A fine of not more than five hundred dollars; (ii)
confinement in the county jail for not more than sixty days; or (iii)
both the fine and confinement.
(5) The attorney general, and each prosecuting attorney, within the
attorney's respective jurisdiction, shall: (a) Prosecute all criminal
proceedings under this section; and (b) institute and maintain all
civil proceedings under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1)(a) The right of a person to work may not
be denied or abridged because of membership or nonmembership in a labor
union or other labor organization.
(b) In the exercise of the right to work, each person shall be free
from threats, force, intimidation, or coercion.
(c) A person who violates this section is liable to a person who
suffers from that violation for all resulting damages.
(2)(a) The attorney general or a prosecuting attorney may bring an
action in superior court to enjoin a violation of this section.
(b) The superior courts shall grant injunctive relief when a
violation of this section is made apparent.
(3) Not later than the second day after the receipt of notice of
institution of a cause of action under this section, a party to the
cause of action may apply to the presiding judge of the superior court
in the county within which the action is brought. The presiding judge
shall immediately assign a superior court judge from within the county
who shall hear all proceedings in the cause of action.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.52.020 and 1991 c 238 s 146 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Employee organization" means any organization which includes
as members the academic employees of a college district and which has
as one of its purposes the representation of the employees in their
employment relations with the college district.
(2) "Academic employee" means any teacher, counselor, librarian, or
department head, who is employed by any college district, whether full
or part time, with the exception of the chief administrative officer
of, and any administrator in, each college district.
(3) "Administrator" means any person employed either full or part
time by the college district and who performs administrative functions
as at least fifty percent or more of his or her assignments, and has
responsibilities to hire, dismiss, or discipline other employees.
Administrators shall not be members of the bargaining unit unless a
majority of such administrators and a majority of the bargaining unit
elect by secret ballot for such inclusion pursuant to rules as adopted
in accordance with RCW 28B.52.080.
(4) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(5) "Unfair labor practice" means any unfair labor practice listed
in RCW 28B.52.073.
(6) (("Union security provision" means a provision in a collective
bargaining agreement under which some or all employees in the
bargaining unit may be required, as a condition of continued employment
on or after the thirtieth day following the beginning of such
employment or the effective date of the provision, whichever is later,
to become a member of the exclusive bargaining representative or pay an
agency fee equal to the periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly
required as a condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the
exclusive bargaining representative.
(7))) "Exclusive bargaining representative" means any employee
organization which has:
(a) Been certified or recognized under this chapter as the
representative of the employees in an appropriate collective bargaining
unit; or
(b) Before July 26, 1987, been certified or recognized under a
predecessor statute as the representative of the employees in a
bargaining unit which continues to be appropriate under this chapter.
(((8))) (7) "Collective bargaining" and "bargaining" mean the
performance of the mutual obligation of the representatives of the
employer and the exclusive bargaining representative to meet at
reasonable times to bargain in good faith in an effort to reach
agreement with respect to wages, hours, and other terms and conditions
of employment, such as procedures related to nonretention, dismissal,
denial of tenure, and reduction in force. Prior law, practice, or
interpretation shall be neither restrictive, expansive, nor
determinative with respect to the scope of bargaining. A written
contract incorporating any agreements reached shall be executed if
requested by either party. The obligation to bargain does not compel
either party to agree to a proposal or to make a concession.
In the event of a dispute between an employer and an exclusive
bargaining representative over the matters that are terms and
conditions of employment, the commission shall decide which items are
mandatory subjects for bargaining.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.52.025 and 1987 c 314 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Employees have the right to self-organization, to form, join, or
assist employee organizations, to bargain collectively through
representatives of their own choosing, and also have the right to
refrain from any or all of these activities ((except to the extent that
employees may be required to make payments to an exclusive bargaining
representative or charitable organization under a union security
provision authorized in this chapter)).

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.52.045 and 1987 c 314 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(((1))) Upon filing with the employer the voluntary written
authorization of a bargaining unit employee under this chapter, the
employee organization which is the exclusive bargaining representative
of the bargaining unit shall have the right to have deducted from the
salary of the bargaining unit employee the periodic dues and initiation
fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or retaining
membership in the exclusive bargaining representative. Such employee
authorization shall not be irrevocable for a period of more than one
year. Such dues and fees shall be deducted from the pay of all
employees who have given authorization for such deduction, and shall be
transmitted by the employer to the employee organization or to the
depository designated by the employee organization.
(((2) A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions, but not a closed shop. If an agency shop or other union
security provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce any such
provision by deductions from the salary of bargaining unit employees
affected thereby and shall transmit such funds to the employee
organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization.
(3) An employee who is covered by a union security provision and
who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide religious
tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which such
employee is a member shall pay to a nonreligious charity or other
charitable organization an amount of money equivalent to the periodic
dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring
or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining representative.
The charity shall be agreed upon by the employee and the employee
organization to which such employee would otherwise pay the dues and
fees. The employee shall furnish written proof that such payments have
been made. If the employee and the employee organization do not reach
agreement on such matter, the commission shall designate the charitable
organization.))

Sec. 9 RCW 41.56.113 and 2010 c 296 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This subsection (1) applies only if the state makes the
payments directly to a provider.
(a) Upon the written authorization of an individual provider, a
family child care provider, an adult family home provider, or a
language access provider within the bargaining unit and after the
certification or recognition of the bargaining unit's exclusive
bargaining representative, the state as payor, but not as the employer,
shall, subject to (c) of this subsection, deduct from the payments to
an individual provider, a family child care provider, an adult family
home provider, or a language access provider the monthly amount of dues
as certified by the secretary of the exclusive bargaining
representative and shall transmit the same to the treasurer of the
exclusive bargaining representative.
(b) If the governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of
a bargaining unit of individual providers, family child care providers,
adult family home providers, or language access providers enter into a
collective bargaining agreement that((:
(i) Includes a union security provision authorized in RCW
41.56.122, the state as payor, but not as the employer, shall, subject
to (c) of this subsection, enforce the agreement by deducting from the
payments to bargaining unit members the dues required for membership in
the exclusive bargaining representative, or, for nonmembers thereof, a
fee equivalent to the dues; or
(ii))) includes requirements for deductions of payments ((other
than the deduction under (a)(i) of this subsection)), the state, as
payor, but not as the employer, shall, subject to (c) of this
subsection, make such deductions upon written authorization of the
individual provider, family child care provider, adult family home
provider, or language access provider. The requirements for deductions
of payments may not include union security provisions.
(c)(i) The initial additional costs to the state in making
deductions from the payments to individual providers, family child care
providers, adult family home providers, and language access providers
under this section shall be negotiated, agreed upon in advance, and
reimbursed to the state by the exclusive bargaining representative.
(ii) The allocation of ongoing additional costs to the state in
making deductions from the payments to individual providers, family
child care providers, adult family home providers, or language access
providers under this section shall be an appropriate subject of
collective bargaining between the exclusive bargaining representative
and the governor unless prohibited by another statute. If no
collective bargaining agreement containing a provision allocating the
ongoing additional cost is entered into between the exclusive
bargaining representative and the governor, or if the legislature does
not approve funding for the collective bargaining agreement as provided
in RCW 74.39A.300, 41.56.028, 41.56.029, or 41.56.510, as applicable,
the ongoing additional costs to the state in making deductions from the
payments to individual providers, family child care providers, adult
family home providers, or language access providers under this section
shall be negotiated, agreed upon in advance, and reimbursed to the
state by the exclusive bargaining representative.
(((d) The governor and the exclusive bargaining representative of
a bargaining unit of family child care providers may not enter into a
collective bargaining agreement that contains a union security
provision unless the agreement contains a process, to be administered
by the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit of
family child care providers, for hardship dispensation for license-
exempt family child care providers who are also temporary assistance
for needy families recipients or WorkFirst participants.))
(2) This subsection (2) applies only if the state does not make the
payments directly to a provider.
(((a))) Upon the written authorization of a language access
provider within the bargaining unit and after the certification or
recognition of the bargaining unit's exclusive bargaining
representative, the state shall require through its contracts with
third parties that:
(((i))) (a) The monthly amount of dues as certified by the
secretary of the exclusive bargaining representative be deducted from
the payments to the language access provider and transmitted to the
treasurer of the exclusive bargaining representative; and
(((ii))) (b) A record showing that dues have been deducted as
specified in (a)(((i))) of this subsection be provided to the state.
(((b) If the governor and the exclusive bargaining representative
of the bargaining unit of language access providers enter into a
collective bargaining agreement that includes a union security
provision authorized in RCW 41.56.122, the state shall enforce the
agreement by requiring through its contracts with third parties that:
(i) The monthly amount of dues required for membership in the
exclusive bargaining representative as certified by the secretary of
the exclusive bargaining representative, or, for nonmembers thereof, a
fee equivalent to the dues, be deducted from the payments to the
language access provider and transmitted to the treasurer of the
exclusive bargaining representative; and
(ii) A record showing that dues or fees have been deducted as
specified in (a)(i) of this subsection be provided to the state.))

Sec. 10 RCW 41.56.122 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 22 are each
amended to read as follows:
A collective bargaining agreement may((:
(1) Contain union security provisions: PROVIDED, That nothing in
this section shall authorize a closed shop provision: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That agreements involving union security provisions must
safeguard the right of nonassociation of public employees based on bona
fide religious tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of
which such public employee is a member. Such public employee shall pay
an amount of money equivalent to regular union dues and initiation fee
to a nonreligious charity or to another charitable organization
mutually agreed upon by the public employee affected and the bargaining
representative to which such public employee would otherwise pay the
dues and initiation fee. The public employee shall furnish written
proof that such payment has been made. If the public employee and the
bargaining representative do not reach agreement on such matter, the
commission shall designate the charitable organization. When there is
a conflict between any collective bargaining agreement reached by a
public employer and a bargaining representative on a union security
provision and any charter, ordinance, rule, or regulation adopted by
the public employer or its agents, including but not limited to, a
civil service commission, the terms of the collective bargaining
agreement shall prevail.
(2))) provide for binding arbitration of a labor dispute arising
from the application or the interpretation of the matters contained in
a collective bargaining agreement.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.59.060 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Employees shall have the right to self-organization, to form,
join, or assist employee organizations, to bargain collectively through
representatives of their own choosing, and shall also have the right to
refrain from any or all of such activities ((except to the extent that
employees may be required to pay a fee to any employee organization
under an agency shop agreement authorized in this chapter)).
(2) The exclusive bargaining representative shall have the right to
have deducted from the salary of employees, upon receipt of an
appropriate authorization form which shall not be irrevocable for a
period of more than one year, an amount equal to the fees and dues
required for membership. Such fees and dues shall be deducted monthly
from the pay of all appropriate employees by the employer and
transmitted as provided for by agreement between the employer and the
exclusive bargaining representative, unless an automatic payroll
deduction service is established pursuant to law, at which time such
fees and dues shall be transmitted as therein provided. ((If an agency
shop provision is agreed to and becomes effective pursuant to RCW
41.59.100, except as provided in that section, the agency fee equal to
the fees and dues required of membership in the exclusive bargaining
representative shall be deducted from the salary of employees in the
bargaining unit.))

Sec. 12 RCW 41.59.140 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) It shall be an unfair labor practice for an employer:
(a) To interfere with, restrain, or coerce employees in the
exercise of the rights guaranteed in RCW 41.59.060.
(b) To dominate or interfere with the formation or administration
of any employee organization or contribute financial or other support
to it: PROVIDED, That subject to rules and regulations made by the
commission pursuant to RCW 41.59.110, an employer shall not be
prohibited from permitting employees to confer with it or its
representatives or agents during working hours without loss of time or
pay;
(c) To encourage or discourage membership in any employee
organization by discrimination in regard to hire, tenure of employment
or any term or condition of employment((, but nothing contained in this
subsection shall prevent an employer from requiring, as a condition of
continued employment, payment of periodic dues and fees uniformly
required to an exclusive bargaining representative pursuant to RCW
41.59.100));
(d) To discharge or otherwise discriminate against an employee
because he has filed charges or given testimony under this chapter;
(e) To refuse to bargain collectively with the representatives of
its employees.
(2) It shall be an unfair labor practice for an employee
organization:
(a) To restrain or coerce (i) employees in the exercise of the
rights guaranteed in RCW 41.59.060: PROVIDED, That this paragraph
shall not impair the right of an employee organization to prescribe its
own rules with respect to the acquisition or retention of membership
therein; or (ii) an employer in the selection of his representatives
for the purposes of collective bargaining or the adjustment of
grievances;
(b) To cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate
against an employee in violation of subsection (1)(c) of this section;
(c) To refuse to bargain collectively with an employer, provided it
is the representative of its employees subject to RCW 41.59.090.
(3) The expressing of any views, argument, or opinion, or the
dissemination thereof to the public, whether in written, printed,
graphic, or visual form, shall not constitute or be evidence of an
unfair labor practice under any of the provisions of this chapter, if
such expression contains no threat of reprisal or force or promise of
benefit.

Sec. 13 RCW 41.76.045 and 2002 c 356 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) Upon filing with the employer the voluntary written
authorization of a bargaining unit faculty member under this chapter,
the employee organization which is the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit shall have the right to have
deducted from the salary of the bargaining unit faculty member the
periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of
acquiring or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining
representative. Such employee authorization shall not be irrevocable
for a period of more than one year. Such dues and fees shall be
deducted from the pay of all faculty members who have given
authorization for such deduction, and shall be transmitted by the
employer to the employee organization or to the depository designated
by the employee organization.
(((2) A collective bargaining agreement may include union security
provisions, but not a closed shop. If an agency shop or other union
security provision is agreed to, the employer shall enforce any such
provision by deductions from the salary of bargaining unit faculty
members affected thereby and shall transmit such funds to the employee
organization or to the depository designated by the employee
organization.
(3) A faculty member who is covered by a union security provision
and who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide religious
tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which such faculty
member is a member shall pay to a nonreligious charity or other
charitable organization an amount of money equivalent to the periodic
dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring
or retaining membership in the exclusive bargaining representative.
The charity shall be agreed upon by the faculty member and the employee
organization to which such faculty member would otherwise pay the dues
and fees. The faculty member shall furnish written proof that such
payments have been made. If the faculty member and the employee
organization do not reach agreement on such matter, the dispute shall
be submitted to the commission for determination.))

Sec. 14 RCW 41.80.050 and 2002 c 354 s 306 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as may be specifically limited by this chapter, employees
shall have the right to self-organization, to form, join, or assist
employee organizations, and to bargain collectively through
representatives of their own choosing for the purpose of collective
bargaining free from interference, restraint, or coercion. Employees
shall also have the right to refrain from any or all such activities
((except to the extent that they may be required to pay a fee to an
exclusive bargaining representative under a union security provision
authorized by this chapter)).

Sec. 15 RCW 41.80.100 and 2002 c 354 s 311 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((A collective bargaining agreement may contain a union
security provision requiring as a condition of employment the payment,
no later than the thirtieth day following the beginning of employment
or July 1, 2004, whichever is later, of an agency shop fee to the
employee organization that is the exclusive bargaining representative
for the bargaining unit in which the employee is employed. The amount
of the fee shall be equal to the amount required to become a member in
good standing of the employee organization. Each employee organization
shall establish a procedure by which any employee so requesting may pay
a representation fee no greater than the part of the membership fee
that represents a pro rata share of expenditures for purposes germane
to the collective bargaining process, to contract administration, or to
pursuing matters affecting wages, hours, and other conditions of
employment.
(2) An employee who is covered by a union security provision and
who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide religious
tenets, or teachings of a church or religious body of which the
employee is a member, shall, as a condition of employment, make
payments to the employee organization, for purposes within the program
of the employee organization as designated by the employee that would
be in harmony with his or her individual conscience. The amount of the
payments shall be equal to the periodic dues and fees uniformly
required as a condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the
employee organization minus any included monthly premiums for insurance
programs sponsored by the employee organization. The employee shall
not be a member of the employee organization but is entitled to all the
representation rights of a member of the employee organization.
(3))) Upon filing with the employer the written authorization of a
bargaining unit employee under this chapter, the employee organization
that is the exclusive bargaining representative of the bargaining unit
shall have the exclusive right to have deducted from the salary of the
employee an amount equal to the fees and dues uniformly required as a
condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the employee
organization. The fees and dues shall be deducted each pay period from
the pay of all employees who have given authorization for the deduction
and shall be transmitted by the employer as provided for by agreement
between the employer and the employee organization.
(((4))) (2) Employee organizations that before July 1, 2004, were
entitled to the benefits of this section shall continue to be entitled
to these benefits.

Sec. 16 RCW 47.64.130 and 2010 c 8 s 10021 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is an unfair labor practice for the employer or its
representatives:
(a) To interfere with, restrain, or coerce employees in the
exercise of the rights guaranteed by this chapter;
(b) To dominate or interfere with the formation or administration
of any employee organization or contribute financial or other support
to it. However, subject to rules made by the commission pursuant to
RCW 47.64.280, an employer shall not be prohibited from permitting
employees to confer with it or its representatives or agents during
working hours without loss of time or pay;
(c) To encourage or discourage membership in any employee
organization by discrimination in regard to hiring, tenure of
employment, or any term or condition of employment((, but nothing
contained in this subsection prevents an employer from requiring, as a
condition of continued employment, payment of periodic dues and fees
uniformly required to an exclusive bargaining representative pursuant
to RCW 47.64.160. However, nothing prohibits the employer from
agreeing to obtain employees by referral from a lawful hiring hall
operated by or participated in by a labor organization));
(d) To discharge or otherwise discriminate against an employee
because he or she has filed charges or given testimony under this
chapter;
(e) To refuse to bargain collectively with the representatives of
its employees.
(2) It is an unfair labor practice for an employee organization:
(a) To restrain or coerce (i) employees in the exercise of the
rights guaranteed by this chapter((. However, this subsection does not
impair the right of an employee organization to prescribe its own rules
with respect to the acquisition or retention of membership therein)),
or (ii) an employer in the selection of his or her representatives for
the purposes of collective bargaining or the adjustment of grievances.
However, this subsection (a) does not impair the right of an employee
organization to prescribe its own rules with respect to the acquisition
or retention of membership therein;
(b) To cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate
against an employee in violation of subsection (1)(c) of this section;
(c) To refuse to bargain collectively with an employer.
(3) The expression of any view, argument, or opinion, or the
dissemination thereof to the public, whether in written, printed,
graphic, or visual form, shall not constitute or be evidence of an
unfair labor practice under any of the provisions of this chapter, if
the expression contains no threat of reprisal or force or promise of
benefit.

Sec. 17 RCW 49.66.010 and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
It is the public policy of the state to expedite the settlement of
labor disputes arising in connection with health care activities, in
order that there may be no lessening, however temporary, in the quality
of the care given to patients. It is the legislative purpose by this
chapter to promote collective bargaining between health care activities
and their employees, and to protect the right of employees of health
care activities to organize and select collective bargaining units of
their own choosing.
((It is further determined that any agreements involving union
security including an all-union agreement or agency agreement must
safeguard the rights of nonassociation of employees, based on bona fide
religious tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which
such employee is a member. Such employee must pay an amount of money
equivalent to regular union dues and initiation fees and assessments,
if any, to a nonreligious charity or to another charitable organization
mutually agreed upon by the employee affected and the representative of
the labor organization to which such employee would otherwise pay dues.
The employee shall furnish written proof that this has been done. If
the employee and representative of the labor organization do not reach
agreement on the matter, the department shall designate such
organization.))

Sec. 18 RCW 49.66.050 and 2010 c 8 s 12063 are each amended to
read as follows:
It shall be an unfair labor practice and unlawful, for any employee
organization or its agent to:
(1) Restrain or coerce (a) employees in the exercise of their right
to refrain from self-organization, or (b) an employer in the selection
of its representatives for purposes of collective bargaining or the
adjustment of grievances;
(2) Cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate against
an employee in violation of RCW 49.66.040(3) or to discriminate against
an employee with respect to whom membership in such organization has
been denied or terminated on some ground other than his or her failure
to tender the periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly required as
a condition of acquiring or retaining membership;
(3) Refuse to meet and bargain in good faith with an employer,
provided it is the duly designated representative of the employer's
employees for purposes of collective bargaining;
(4) ((Require of employees covered by a union security agreement
the payment, as a condition precedent to becoming a member of such
organization, of a fee in an amount which the director finds excessive
or discriminatory under all the circumstances. In making such a
finding, the director shall consider, among other relevant factors, the
practices and customs of labor organizations in the particular
industry, and the wages currently paid to the employees affected;
(5))) Cause or attempt to cause an employer to pay or deliver or
agree to pay or deliver any money or other thing of value, in the
nature of an exaction, for services which are not performed or not to
be performed;
(((6))) (5) Enter into any contract or agreement, express or
implied, whereby an employer or other person ceases or refrains, or
agrees to cease or refrain, from handling, using, selling,
transporting, or otherwise dealing in any of the products or services
of any other employer or person, or to cease doing business with any
other employer or person, and any such contract or agreement shall be
unenforceable and void; or
(((7))) (6) Engage in, or induce or encourage any individual
employed by any employer or to engage in, an activity prohibited by RCW
49.66.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 41.56.100 (Authority and duty of employer to engage in
collective bargaining -- Limitations -- Mediation, grievance procedures
upon failure to agree) and 2010 c 235 s 801, 1989 c 45 s 1, 1975 1st
ex.s. c 296 s 21, & 1967 ex.s. c 108 s 10; and
(2) RCW 47.64.160 (Union security provisions) and 1983 c 15 s 7.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Nothing contained in this act may be
construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the
provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the
agreement has expired.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 1 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 49.36 RCW.

--- END ---