BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that its authority
over a significant portion of the state budget has eroded since state
employees began collectively bargaining with the executive branch over
wages and benefits. The legislature recognizes that it is the
responsibility of a union to advocate for the best interest of its
membership, while it is the responsibility of the legislature to
determine the best interest of the state. State employees no longer
have to make their case to the legislature for additional funding for
compensation packages and compete for the limited funding with other
priorities. The flexibility of the legislature has been limited, as
the legislature has no authority to make changes to negotiated
agreements between state employees and the executive branch. In tight
budget times it is clear that the legislature needs more flexibility to
truly prioritize spending, and must take back its authority over state
employee compensation choices. Therefore, the legislature intends to
repeal the ability of state employees and other nontraditional groups
to collectively bargain with the executive branch over compensation.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.06.022 and 2002 c 354 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, "manager" means any employee who:
(1) Formulates statewide policy or directs the work of an agency or
agency subdivision;
(2) Is responsible to administer one or more statewide policies or
programs of an agency or agency subdivision;
(3) Manages, administers, and controls a local branch office of an
agency or agency subdivision, including the physical, financial, or
personnel resources;
(4) Has substantial responsibility in personnel administration,
legislative relations, public information, or the preparation and
administration of budgets; or
(5) Functionally is above the first level of supervision and
exercises authority that is not merely routine or clerical in nature
and requires the consistent use of independent judgment.
((No employee who is a member of the Washington management service
may be included in a collective bargaining unit established under RCW
41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130.))

Sec. 3 RCW 41.06.133 and 2010 c 2 s 3 and 2010 c 1 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The director shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes
and provisions of this chapter and with the best standards of personnel
administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:
(a) The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an
employee;
(b) Training and career development;
(c) Probationary periods of six to twelve months and rejections of
probationary employees, depending on the job requirements of the class,
except that entry level state park rangers shall serve a probationary
period of twelve months;
(d) Transfers;
(e) Promotional preferences;
(f) Sick leaves and vacations;
(g) Hours of work;
(h) Layoffs when necessary and subsequent reemployment, except for
the financial basis for layoffs;
(i) The number of names to be certified for vacancies;
(j) Adoption and revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the
prevailing rates in Washington state private industries and other
governmental units. The rates in the salary schedules or plans shall
be increased if necessary to attain comparable worth under an
implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and, for institutions of higher
education and related boards, shall be competitive for positions of a
similar nature in the state or the locality in which an institution of
higher education or related board is located. Such adoption and
revision is subject to approval by the director of financial management
in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW;
(k) Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay
grade based on length of service for all employees whose standards of
performance are such as to permit them to retain job status in the
classified service. From February 18, 2009, through June 30, 2011, a
salary or wage increase shall not be granted to any exempt position
under this chapter, except that a salary or wage increase may be
granted to employees pursuant to collective bargaining agreements
negotiated under chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 47.64, or 41.76 RCW, or
negotiated by the nonprofit corporation formed under chapter 67.40 RCW,
and except that increases may be granted for positions for which the
employer has demonstrated difficulty retaining qualified employees if
the following conditions are met:
(i) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources; and
(ii) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of
client services;
Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010,
through June 30, 2011, to a position exempt under this chapter shall
submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later
than July 31, 2011, detailing the positions for which salary increases
were granted, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the
increases;
(l) Optional lump sum relocation compensation approved by the
agency director, whenever it is reasonably necessary that a person make
a domiciliary move in accepting a transfer or other employment with the
state. An agency must provide lump sum compensation within existing
resources. If the person receiving the relocation payment terminates
or causes termination with the state, for reasons other than layoff,
disability separation, or other good cause as determined by an agency
director, within one year of the date of the employment, the state is
entitled to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the person;
(m) Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing
statutes, with recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and
subsequent reemployment for veterans and their surviving spouses by
giving such eligible veterans and their surviving spouses additional
credit in computing their seniority by adding to their unbroken state
service, as defined by the director, the veteran's service in the
military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section,
"veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active military
service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who
has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability
incurred in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the
government and who, upon termination of such service, has received an
honorable discharge, a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable
record, or a release from active military service with evidence of
service other than that for which an undesirable, bad conduct, or
dishonorable discharge shall be given. However, the surviving spouse
of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of this section regardless of
the veteran's length of active military service. For the purposes of
this section, "veteran" does not include any person who has voluntarily
retired with twenty or more years of active military service and whose
military retirement pay is in excess of five hundred dollars per month.
(2) Rules adopted under this section by the director shall provide
for local administration and management by the institutions of higher
education and related boards, subject to periodic audit and review by
the director.
(3) ((Rules adopted by the director under this section may be
superseded by the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement
negotiated under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130. The
supersession of such rules shall only affect employees in the
respective collective bargaining units.
(4)))(a) The director shall require that each state agency report
annually the following data:
(i) The number of classified, Washington management service, and
exempt employees in the agency and the change compared to the previous
report;
(ii) The number of bonuses and performance-based incentives awarded
to agency staff and the base wages of such employees; and
(iii) The cost of each bonus or incentive awarded.
(b) A report that compiles the data in (a) of this subsection for
all agencies will be provided annually to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature and must be posted for the
public on the department of personnel's agency web site.
(((5))) (4) From February 15, 2010, until June 30, 2011, no
monetary performance-based awards or incentives may be granted by the
director or employers to employees covered by rules adopted under this
section. This subsection does not prohibit the payment of awards
provided for in chapter 41.60 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.06.170 and 2009 c 534 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director, in the adoption of rules governing suspensions
for cause, shall not authorize an appointing authority to suspend an
employee for more than fifteen calendar days as a single penalty or
more than thirty calendar days in any one calendar year as an
accumulation of several penalties. The director shall require that the
appointing authority give written notice to the employee not later than
one day after the suspension takes effect, stating the reasons for and
the duration thereof.
(2) Any employee who is reduced, dismissed, suspended, or demoted,
after completing his or her probationary period of service as provided
by the rules of the director, or any employee who is adversely affected
by a violation of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, or
rules adopted under it, shall have the right to appeal, either
individually or through his or her authorized representative, not later
than thirty days after the effective date of such action to the
personnel appeals board through June 30, 2005, and to the Washington
personnel resources board after June 30, 2005. The employee shall be
furnished with specified charges in writing when a reduction,
dismissal, suspension, or demotion action is taken. Such appeal shall
be in writing. Decisions of the Washington personnel resources board
on appeals filed after June 30, 2005, shall be final and not subject to
further appeal.
(3) Any employee whose position has been exempted after July 1,
1993, shall have the right to appeal, either individually or through
his or her authorized representative, not later than thirty days after
the effective date of such action to the personnel appeals board
through June 30, 2005, and to the Washington personnel resources board
after June 30, 2005. If the position being exempted is vacant, the
exclusive bargaining unit representative may act in lieu of an employee
for the purposes of appeal.
(4) An employee incumbent in a position at the time of its
allocation or reallocation, or the agency utilizing the position, may
appeal the allocation or reallocation to the personnel appeals board
through December 31, 2005, and to the Washington personnel resources
board after December 31, 2005. Notice of such appeal must be filed in
writing within thirty days of the action from which appeal is taken.
(((5) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply to any
employee who is subject to the provisions of a collective bargaining
agreement negotiated under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through
41.80.130.))

Sec. 5 RCW 41.06.340 and 2002 c 354 s 232 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((With respect to collective bargaining as authorized by RCW
41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130,)) The public employment
relations commission created by chapter 41.58 RCW shall have authority
to adopt rules, on and after June 13, 2002, relating to determination
of appropriate bargaining units within any agency. In making such
determination the commission shall consider the duties, skills, and
working conditions of the employees, the history of collective
bargaining by the employees and their bargaining representatives, the
extent of organization among the employees, and the desires of the
employees. The public employment relations commission created in
chapter 41.58 RCW shall adopt rules and make determinations relating to
the certification and decertification of exclusive bargaining
representatives.
(2) Each and every provision of RCW 41.56.140 through 41.56.160
shall be applicable to this chapter as it relates to state civil
service employees.
(((3) A collective bargaining agreement entered into under RCW
41.06.150 before July 1, 2004, covering employees subject to RCW
41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130 that expires after July 1,
2004, shall remain in full force during its duration, or until
superseded by a collective bargaining agreement entered into by the
parties under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130. However,
an agreement entered into before July 1, 2004, may not be renewed or
extended beyond July 1, 2005, or until superseded by a collective
bargaining agreement entered into under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010
through 41.80.130, whichever is later.))

Sec. 6 RCW 41.56.465 and 2007 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In making its determination, the panel shall be mindful of the
legislative purpose enumerated in RCW 41.56.430 and, as additional
standards or guidelines to aid it in reaching a decision, the panel
shall consider:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) Stipulations of the parties;
(c) The average consumer prices for goods and services, commonly
known as the cost of living;
(d) Changes in any of the circumstances under (a) through (c) of
this subsection during the pendency of the proceedings; and
(e) Such other factors, not confined to the factors under (a)
through (d) of this subsection, that are normally or traditionally
taken into consideration in the determination of wages, hours, and
conditions of employment. For those employees listed in RCW
41.56.030(((7))) (14)(a) who are employed by the governing body of a
city or town with a population of less than fifteen thousand, or a
county with a population of less than seventy thousand, consideration
must also be given to regional differences in the cost of living.
(2) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(((7))) (14) (a) through
(d), the panel shall also consider a comparison of the wages, hours,
and conditions of employment of personnel involved in the proceedings
with the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of like personnel
of like employers of similar size on the west coast of the United
States.
(3) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(((7))) (14) (e) through
(h), the panel shall also consider a comparison of the wages, hours,
and conditions of employment of personnel involved in the proceedings
with the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of like personnel
of public fire departments of similar size on the west coast of the
United States. However, when an adequate number of comparable
employers exists within the state of Washington, other west coast
employers may not be considered.
(((4) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.028:
(a) The panel shall also consider:
(i) A comparison of child care provider subsidy rates and
reimbursement programs by public entities, including counties and
municipalities, along the west coast of the United States; and
(ii) The financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement; and
(b) The panel may consider:
(i) The public's interest in reducing turnover and increasing
retention of child care providers;
(ii) The state's interest in promoting, through education and
training, a stable child care workforce to provide quality and reliable
child care from all providers throughout the state; and
(iii) In addition, for employees exempt from licensing under
chapter 74.15 RCW, the state's fiscal interest in reducing reliance
upon public benefit programs including but not limited to medical
coupons, food stamps, subsidized housing, and emergency medical
services.
(5) For employees listed in RCW 74.39A.270:
(a) The panel shall consider:
(i) A comparison of wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
publicly reimbursed personnel providing similar services to similar
clients, including clients who are elderly, frail, or have
developmental disabilities, both in the state and across the United
States; and
(ii) The financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and fringe benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement; and
(b) The panel may consider:
(i) A comparison of wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
publicly employed personnel providing similar services to similar
clients, including clients who are elderly, frail, or have
developmental disabilities, both in the state and across the United
States;
(ii) The state's interest in promoting a stable long-term care
workforce to provide quality and reliable care to vulnerable elderly
and disabled recipients;
(iii) The state's interest in ensuring access to affordable,
quality health care for all state citizens; and
(iv) The state's fiscal interest in reducing reliance upon public
benefit programs including but not limited to medical coupons, food
stamps, subsidized housing, and emergency medical services.
(6) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section may not be construed to
authorize the panel to require the employer to pay, directly or
indirectly, the increased employee contributions resulting from chapter
502, Laws of 1993 or chapter 517, Laws of 1993 as required under
chapter 41.26 RCW.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 41.80.001 (Application of chapter) and 2002 c 354 s 301;
(2) RCW 41.80.002 (Reduction in state agency operating expenses--Application of section 3, chapter 32, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.) and
2010 1st sp.s. c 32 s 4;
(3) RCW 41.80.005 (Definitions) and 2002 c 354 s 321;
(4) RCW 41.80.010 (Negotiation and ratification of collective
bargaining agreements) and 2010 c 104 s 1 & 2002 c 354 s 302;
(5) RCW 41.80.020 (Scope of bargaining) and 2010 c 283 s 16 & 2002
c 354 s 303;
(6) RCW 41.80.030 (Contents of collective bargaining agreements--Execution) and 2002 c 354 s 304;
(7) RCW 41.80.040 (Management rights -- Not subject to bargaining)
and 2002 c 354 s 305;
(8) RCW 41.80.050 (Rights of employees) and 2002 c 354 s 306;
(9) RCW 41.80.060 (Right to strike not granted) and 2002 c 354 s
307;
(10) RCW 41.80.070 (Bargaining units -- Certification) and 2002 c 354
s 308;
(11) RCW 41.80.080 (Representation -- Elections -- Rules) and 2002 c
354 s 309;
(12) RCW 41.80.090 (Failure to reach agreement -- Third party
involvement -- Expiration of agreements during negotiation) and 2002 c
354 s 310;
(13) RCW 41.80.100 (Union security -- Fees and dues -- Right of
nonassociation) and 2002 c 354 s 311;
(14) RCW 41.80.110 (Unfair labor practices enumerated) and 2002 c
354 s 312;
(15) RCW 41.80.120 (Unfair labor practice procedures -- Powers and
duties of commission) and 2002 c 354 s 313;
(16) RCW 41.80.130 (Enforcement of collective bargaining
agreements -- Arbitrators -- Subpoenas--Superior court) and 2002 c 354 s
314;
(17) RCW 41.80.140 (Office of financial management's labor
relations service account -- Created) and 2002 c 354 s 322;
(18) RCW 41.80.900 (Powers, duties, and functions pertaining to
collective bargaining -- Transferred to public employment relations
commission -- Exceptions) and 2002 c 354 s 315;
(19) RCW 41.80.901 (Transfer of assets -- Appropriations) and 2002 c
354 s 316;
(20) RCW 41.80.902 (Schedule for transfer of employees and
property) and 2002 c 354 s 317;
(21) RCW 41.80.903 (Pending business to be continued and acted
upon) and 2002 c 354 s 318;
(22) RCW 41.80.904 (Validity of actions not affected) and 2002 c
354 s 319;
(23) RCW 41.80.905 (Apportionment of funds) and 2002 c 354 s 320;
(24) RCW 41.80.907 (Short title -- 2002 c 354) and 2002 c 354 s 101;
(25) RCW 41.80.908 (Headings, captions not law -- 2002 c 354) and
2002 c 354 s 405;
(26) RCW 41.80.909 (Severability -- 2002 c 354) and 2002 c 354 s 410;
(27) RCW 41.80.910 (Effective dates -- 2002 c 354) and 2002 c 354 s
411;
(28) RCW 47.64.005 (Declaration of policy) and 1961 c 13 s
47.64.005;
(29) RCW 47.64.006 (Public policy) and 1989 c 327 s 1 & 1983 c 15
s 1;
(30) RCW 47.64.011 (Definitions) and 2006 c 164 s 1 & 1983 c 15 s
2;
(31) RCW 47.64.090 (Other party operating ferry by rent, lease, or
charter -- Passenger-only ferry service) and 2003 c 373 s 3, 2003 c 91 s
1, 2003 c 83 s 205, 1983 c 15 s 27, & 1961 c 13 s 47.64.090;
(32) RCW 47.64.120 (Scope of negotiations -- Interest on retroactive
compensation increases -- Agreement conflicts) and 2010 c 283 s 10, 2006
c 164 s 3, 1997 c 436 s 1, & 1983 c 15 s 3;
(33) RCW 47.64.130 (Unfair labor practices) and 2010 c 8 s 10021,
2006 c 164 s 4, & 1983 c 15 s 4;
(34) RCW 47.64.140 (Strikes, work stoppages, and lockouts
prohibited) and 2006 c 164 s 5, 1989 c 373 s 25, & 1983 c 15 s 5;
(35) RCW 47.64.150 (Grievance procedures) and 1983 c 15 s 6;
(36) RCW 47.64.160 (Union security provisions) and 1983 c 15 s 7;
(37) RCW 47.64.170 (Collective bargaining procedures) and 2010 c
283 s 11, 2007 c 160 s 1, 2006 c 164 s 6, & 1983 c 15 s 8;
(38) RCW 47.64.175 (Collective bargaining agreement negotiation)
and 2006 c 164 s 2;
(39) RCW 47.64.200 (Impasse procedures) and 2010 c 283 s 12, 2006
c 164 s 7, & 1983 c 15 s 11;
(40) RCW 47.64.210 (Mediation) and 2007 c 160 s 2, 2006 c 164 s 8,
& 1983 c 15 s 12;
(41) RCW 47.64.230 (Waiver of mediation) and 2007 c 160 s 3, 2006
c 164 s 11, & 1983 c 15 s 14;
(42) RCW 47.64.250 (Legal actions) and 2010 c 8 s 10022 & 1983 c 15
s 16;
(43) RCW 47.64.260 (Notice and service) and 2001 c 19 s 1 & 1983 c
15 s 17;
(44) RCW 47.64.270 (Insurance and health care) and 2010 c 283 s 13,
2006 c 164 s 17, 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 6, 1993 c 492 s 224, 1988 c 107
s 21, 1987 c 78 s 2, & 1983 c 15 s 18;
(45) RCW 47.64.280 (Marine employees' commission) and 2010 c 283 s
14, 2006 c 164 s 18, 1984 c 287 s 95, & 1983 c 15 s 19;
(46) RCW 47.64.290 (Toll bridge employees subject to civil service)
and 1984 c 48 s 2;
(47) RCW 47.64.300 (Interest arbitration -- Procedures) and 2007 c
160 s 4 & 2006 c 164 s 12;
(48) RCW 47.64.310 (Interest arbitration -- Function) and 2006 c 164
s 13;
(49) RCW 47.64.320 (Parties not bound by arbitration -- Arbitration
factors) and 2010 c 283 s 15 & 2006 c 164 s 14;
(50) RCW 47.64.330 (Collective bargaining limitations) and 2006 c
164 s 15;
(51) RCW 47.64.900 (Section captions not part of law -- 1983 c 15)
and 1983 c 15 s 29;
(52) RCW 47.64.910 (Severability -- 1983 c 15) and 1983 c 15 s 30;
(53) RCW 41.56.021 (Application of chapter to employees of
institutions of higher education -- Exceptions -- Limitations on
bargaining) and 2007 c 136 s 1;
(54) RCW 41.56.026 (Application of chapter to individual providers
under chapter 74.39A RCW) and 2002 c 3 s 12;
(55) RCW 41.56.027 (Application of chapter to passenger-only ferry
employees) and 2003 c 91 s 2;
(56) RCW 41.56.028 (Application of chapter to family child care
providers -- Governor as public employer -- Procedure -- Intent) and 2007 c
278 s 2 & 2006 c 54 s 1;
(57) RCW 41.56.029 (Application of chapter to adult family home
providers -- Governor as public employer -- Procedure -- Intent) and 2007 c
184 s 1;
(58) RCW 41.56.113 (Individual providers -- Family child care
providers -- Adult family home providers -- Language access providers--Deductions from payments for dues -- State is payor, not employer) and
2010 c 296 s 4, 2007 c 184 s 3, 2006 c 54 s 3, 2004 c 3 s 7, & 2002 c
99 s 1;
(59) RCW 41.56.203 (University of Washington -- Certain employees
enrolled in an academic program -- Scope of collective bargaining) and
2002 c 34 s 2;
(60) RCW 41.56.205 (Washington State University -- Certain employees
enrolled in an academic program -- Scope of collective bargaining) and
2008 c 203 s 2;
(61) RCW 41.56.473 (Uniformed personnel -- Application of chapter to
Washington state patrol -- Bargaining subjects) and 2005 c 438 s 1 & 1999
c 217 s 3;
(62) RCW 41.56.475 (Uniformed personnel -- Application of chapter to
Washington state patrol -- Mediation and arbitration) and 2008 c 149 s 1,
2005 c 438 s 2, 1999 c 217 s 4, 1993 c 351 s 1, 1988 c 110 s 2, & 1987
c 135 s 3;
(63) RCW 41.56.510 (Application of chapter to language access
providers -- Governor as public employer -- Procedure -- Intent) and 2010 c
296 s 2;
(64) RCW 74.39A.270 (Collective bargaining -- Circumstances in which
individual providers are considered public employees -- Exceptions) and
2007 c 361 s 7, 2007 c 278 s 3, 2006 c 106 s 1, 2004 c 3 s 1, & 2002 c
3 s 6;
(65) RCW 74.39A.300 (Funding) and 2004 c 3 s 2 & 2002 c 3 s 9; and
(66) RCW 74.39A.310 (Contract for individual home care services
providers -- Cost of increase in wages and benefits funded -- Formula) and
2007 c 361 s 8 & 2006 c 9 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Nothing contained in this act may be
construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the
provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the
agreement has expired. However, an existing collective bargaining
agreement may not be extended or renewed after the effective date of
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---