BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 72.09.100 and 2005 c 346 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the
power to provide for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove
statutory and other restrictions which have limited work programs in
the past. It is also the intent of the legislature to ensure that the
correctional industries board of directors, in developing and selecting
correctional industries work programs, does not encourage the
development of, or provide for selection of or contracting for, or the
significant expansion of, any new or existing class I correctional
industries work programs that unfairly compete with Washington
businesses. The legislature intends that the requirements relating to
fair competition in the correctional industries work programs be
liberally construed by the correctional industries board of directors
to protect Washington businesses from unfair competition. For purposes
of establishing such a comprehensive program, the legislature
recommends that the department consider adopting any or all, or any
variation of, the following classes of work programs:
(1) CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES.
(a) The employer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit organization
pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the department.
The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both the
public and private sector.
(b) The customer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed by the department to provide Washington state manufacturers
or businesses with products or services currently produced or provided
by out-of-state or foreign suppliers.
(c) The correctional industries board of directors shall review
these proposed industries, including any potential new class I
industries work program or the significant expansion of an existing
class I industries work program, before the department contracts to
provide such products or services. The review shall include the
analysis required under RCW 72.09.115 to determine if the proposed
correctional industries work program will compete with any Washington
business. An agreement for a new class I correctional industries work
program, or an agreement for a significant expansion of an existing
class I correctional industries work program, that unfairly competes
with any Washington business is prohibited.
(d) The department of corrections shall supply appropriate security
and custody services without charge to the participating firms.
(e) Inmates who work in free venture industries shall do so at
their own choice. They shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry
is located, as determined by the director of correctional industries.
If the director cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then
the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.
(f) An inmate who is employed in the class I program of
correctional industries shall not be eligible for unemployment
compensation benefits pursuant to any of the provisions of Title 50 RCW
until released on parole or discharged.
(2) CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be state-owned and operated
enterprises designed primarily to reduce the costs for goods and
services for tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations.
(b)(i) The industries selected for development within this class
shall, as much as possible, match the available pool of inmate work
skills and aptitudes with the work opportunities in the free community.
The industries shall be closely patterned after private sector
industries but with the objective of reducing public support costs
rather than making a profit.
(ii) The products and services of this industry, including
purchased products and services necessary for a complete product line,
may be sold to the following:
(A) Public agencies;
(B) Nonprofit organizations;
(C) Private contractors when the goods purchased will be ultimately
used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization;
(D) An employee and immediate family members of an employee of the
department of corrections; ((and))
(E) A person under the supervision of the department of corrections
and his or her immediate family members; and
(F) A licensed health professional for the sole purpose of
providing eyeglasses to enrollees of the state medical program at no
more than the health professional's cost of acquisition.
(iii) The correctional industries board of directors shall
authorize the type and quantity of items that may be purchased and sold
under (b)(ii)(D) and (E) of this subsection.
(iv) It is prohibited to purchase any item purchased under
(b)(ii)(D) and (E) of this subsection for the purpose of resale.
(v) Clothing manufactured by an industry in this class may be
donated to nonprofit organizations that provide clothing free of charge
to low-income persons.
(c)(i) Class II correctional industries products and services shall
be reviewed by the correctional industries board of directors before
offering such products and services for sale to private contractors.
(ii) The board of directors shall conduct a yearly marketing review
of the products and services offered under this subsection. Such
review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the
proposed products and services on the Washington state business
community. To avoid waste or spoilage and consequent loss to the
state, when there is no public sector market for such goods, by-products and surpluses of timber, agricultural, and animal husbandry
enterprises may be sold to private persons, at private sale. Surplus
by-products and surpluses of timber, agricultural and animal husbandry
enterprises that cannot be sold to public agencies or to private
persons may be donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of
surplus products shall be carried out in accordance with rules
prescribed by the secretary.
(d) Security and custody services shall be provided without charge
by the department of corrections.
(e) Inmates working in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall be paid for their work on a gratuity scale
which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature in
the locality in which the industry is located and which is approved by
the director of correctional industries.
(f) Subject to approval of the correctional industries board,
provisions of RCW 41.06.142 shall not apply to contracts with
Washington state businesses entered into by the department of
corrections through class II industries.
(3) CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department of
corrections. They shall be designed and managed to accomplish the
following objectives:
(i) Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and
experience so that the inmate will be able to qualify for better work
both within correctional industries and the free community. It is not
intended that an inmate's work within this class of industries should
be his or her final and total work experience as an inmate.
(ii) Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or work
training per week.
(iii) Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public support
costs.
(b) Class III correctional industries shall be reviewed by the
correctional industries board of directors to set policy for work
crews. The department shall present to the board of directors
quarterly detail statements showing where work crews worked, what
correctional industry class, and the hours worked. The board of
directors may review any class III program at its discretion.
(c) Supervising, management, and custody staff shall be employees
of the department.
(d) All able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are
not working in other classes of industries shall work in this class.
(e) Except for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates
in this class shall be paid for their work in accordance with an inmate
gratuity scale. The scale shall be adopted by the secretary of
corrections.
(4) CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department of
corrections. They shall be designed and managed to provide services in
the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The services shall
be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor or infirm, or
to nonprofit organizations.
(b) Class IV correctional industries shall be reviewed by the
correctional industries board of directors to set policy for work
crews. The department shall present to the board of directors
quarterly detail statements showing where work crews worked, what
correctional industry class, and the hours worked. The board of
directors may review any class IV program at its discretion. Class IV
correctional industries operated in work camps established pursuant to
RCW 72.64.050 are exempt from the requirements of this subsection
(4)(b).
(c) Inmates in this program shall reside in facilities owned by,
contracted for, or licensed by the department of corrections. A unit
of local government shall provide work supervision services without
charge to the state and shall pay the inmate's wage.
(d) The department of corrections shall reimburse participating
units of local government for liability and workers compensation
insurance costs.
(e) Inmates who work in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall receive a gratuity which shall not exceed
the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the
industry is located.
(5) CLASS V: COMMUNITY RESTITUTION PROGRAMS.
(a) Programs in this class shall be subject to supervision by the
department of corrections. The purpose of this class of industries is
to enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off all
or part of a community restitution order as ordered by the sentencing
court.
(b) Employment shall be in a community restitution program operated
by the state, local units of government, or a nonprofit agency.
(c) To the extent that funds are specifically made available for
such purposes, the department of corrections shall reimburse nonprofit
agencies for workers compensation insurance costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---