BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In the case of law enforcement officers as defined in RCW
41.26.030 or members of the Washington state patrol retirement system
under chapter 43.43 RCW who are covered under Title 51 RCW, there is a
prima facie presumption that any heart problems or stroke experienced
within twenty-four hours of the officer, while on duty, having engaged
in nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity is unusual
exertion and is an injury under RCW 51.08.100. This presumption may be
rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence. The evidence may include,
but is not limited to, use of tobacco products, physical fitness and
weight, lifestyle, hereditary factors, and exposure from other
employment or nonemployment activities.
(2) Nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activity is limited
to situations of stressful or strenuous training exercise, physical law
enforcement, fire suppression, rescue, hazardous material response,
emergency medical services, prison security, disaster relief, or other
emergency response activity.
(3) When the heart problem or stroke is an injury as defined by RCW
51.08.100, a claim must be filed as provided in RCW 51.28.050.
(4) This section does not apply to a law enforcement officer or
member of the Washington state patrol retirement system who is a
regular user of tobacco products or who has a history of tobacco use.
The department, using existing medical research, shall define in rule
the extent of tobacco use that excludes a law enforcement officer or
member of the Washington state patrol retirement system from the
provisions of this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 51.32.185 and 2007 c 490 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the case of firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030(((4)))
(16) (a), (b), and (c) who are covered under Title 51 RCW and
firefighters, including supervisors, employed on a full-time, fully
compensated basis as a firefighter of a private sector employer's fire
department that includes over fifty such firefighters, there shall
exist a prima facie presumption that: (a) Respiratory disease; (b) any
heart problems or strokes, experienced within seventy-two hours of
exposure to smoke, fumes, or toxic substances, or experienced within
twenty-four hours of strenuous physical exertion due to firefighting
activities; (c) cancer; and (d) infectious diseases are occupational
diseases under RCW 51.08.140. This presumption of occupational disease
may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence. Such evidence may
include, but is not limited to, use of tobacco products, physical
fitness and weight, lifestyle, hereditary factors, and exposure from
other employment or nonemployment activities.
(2) The presumptions established in subsection (1) of this section
shall be extended to an applicable member following termination of
service for a period of three calendar months for each year of
requisite service, but may not extend more than sixty months following
the last date of employment.
(3) The presumption established in subsection (1)(c) of this
section shall only apply to any active or former firefighter who has
cancer that develops or manifests itself after the firefighter has
served at least ten years and who was given a qualifying medical
examination upon becoming a firefighter that showed no evidence of
cancer. The presumption within subsection (1)(c) of this section shall
only apply to prostate cancer diagnosed prior to the age of fifty,
primary brain cancer, malignant melanoma, leukemia, non-Hodgkin's
lymphoma, bladder cancer, ureter cancer, colorectal cancer, multiple
myeloma, testicular cancer, and kidney cancer.
(4) The presumption established in subsection (1)(d) of this
section shall be extended to any firefighter who has contracted any of
the following infectious diseases: Human immunodeficiency
virus/acquired immunodeficiency syndrome, all strains of hepatitis,
meningococcal meningitis, or mycobacterium tuberculosis.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2003, this section does not apply to a
firefighter who develops a heart or lung condition and who is a regular
user of tobacco products or who has a history of tobacco use. The
department, using existing medical research, shall define in rule the
extent of tobacco use that shall exclude a firefighter from the
provisions of this section.
(6) For purposes of this section, "firefighting activities" means
fire suppression, fire prevention, emergency medical services, rescue
operations, hazardous materials response, aircraft rescue, and training
and other assigned duties related to emergency response.
(7)(a) When a determination involving the presumption established
in this section is appealed to the board of industrial insurance
appeals and the final decision allows the claim for benefits, the board
of industrial insurance appeals shall order that all reasonable costs
of the appeal, including attorney fees and witness fees, be paid to the
firefighter or his or her beneficiary by the opposing party.
(b) When a determination involving the presumption established in
this section is appealed to any court and the final decision allows the
claim for benefits, the court shall order that all reasonable costs of
the appeal, including attorney fees and witness fees, be paid to the
firefighter or his or her beneficiary by the opposing party.
(c) When reasonable costs of the appeal must be paid by the
department under this section in a state fund case, the costs shall be
paid from the accident fund and charged to the costs of the claim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the Brian
Walsh act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act applies retroactively to January 1,
2010.

--- END ---