BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.30.080 and 2005 c 273 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A special meeting may be called at any time by the presiding
officer of the governing body of a public agency or by a majority of
the members of the governing body by delivering written notice
personally, by mail, by fax, or by electronic mail to each member of
the governing body((; and)). Written notice shall be deemed waived in
the following circumstances:
(a) A member submits a written waiver of notice with the clerk or
secretary of the governing body at or prior to the time the meeting
convenes. A written waiver may be given by telegram, fax, or
electronic mail; or
(b) A member is actually present at the time the meeting convenes.
(2) Notice of a special meeting called under subsection (1) of this
section shall be:
(a) Delivered to each local newspaper of general circulation and
((to each)) local radio or television station ((which)) that has on
file with the governing body a written request to be notified of such
special meeting or of all special meetings;
(b) Posted on the agency's web site, if any; and
(c) Prominently displayed at the main entrance of the agency's
principal location and the meeting site if it is not held at the
agency's principal location.
Such notice must be delivered ((personally, by mail, by fax, or by
electronic mail)) or posted, as applicable, at least twenty-four hours
before the time of such meeting as specified in the notice.
(3) The call and notices required under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section shall specify the time and place of the special meeting
and the business to be transacted. Final disposition shall not be
taken on any other matter at such meetings by the governing body.
((Such written notice may be dispensed with as to any member who at or
prior to the time the meeting convenes files with the clerk or
secretary of the governing body a written waiver of notice. Such
waiver may be given by telegram, by fax, or electronic mail. Such
written notice may also be dispensed with as to any member who is
actually present at the meeting at the time it convenes.))
(4) The notices provided in this section may be dispensed with in
the event a special meeting is called to deal with an emergency
involving injury or damage to persons or property or the likelihood of
such injury or damage, when time requirements of such notice would make
notice impractical and increase the likelihood of such injury or
damage.

--- END ---