BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2008 c 8 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department ((of fish and wildlife)), in cooperation and
collaboration with the county legislative authorities of Ferry,
Stevens, Pend Oreille, Chelan, and Okanogan counties, shall recommend
rules to establish ((a three-year)) an additional five-year pilot
program, beyond the program authorized by chapter 8, Laws of 2008,
within select game management units of these counties, to pursue or
kill cougars with the aid of dogs.
(b) A pursuit season and a kill season with the aid of dogs must be
established through the ((fish and wildlife)) commission's rule-making
process, utilizing local dangerous wildlife task teams comprised of the
two collaborating authorities. The two collaborating authorities shall
also develop a more effective and accurate dangerous wildlife reporting
system to ensure a timely response.
(c) The pilot program's primary goals are to provide for public
safety, to protect property, and to assess, conserve, and manage cougar
populations.
(2) Any rules adopted by the ((fish and wildlife)) commission to
establish a pilot project allowing for the pursuit or hunting of
cougars with the aid of dogs under this section only must ensure that
all pursuits or hunts are:
(a) Designed to protect public safety or property;
(b) Reflective of the most current cougar population data;
(c) Designed to generate data that is necessary for the department
to satisfy the reporting requirements of section 3 of this act; ((and))
(d) Consistent with any applicable recommendations emerging from
research on cougar population dynamics in a multiprey environment
funded in whole or in part by the department of fish and wildlife; and
(e) Conditioned on the licensed hunter participating in the pilot
program not being permitted to exchange payment to a commercial
enterprise for the use of dogs for the purposes of hunting under the
license.
(3) The department ((of fish and wildlife)) may authorize ((three
additional seasons)) an additional five seasons, beyond the program
authorized by chapter 8, Laws of 2008, in which cougars may be pursued
or killed with dogs, subject to the other conditions of the pilot
project. The additional seasons are authorized to aid the department
in the gathering of information necessary to formulate a recommendation
to the legislature regarding whether a permanent program is warranted,
and if so, what constraints, goals, and objectives should be included
in a permanent program.
(4) This section expires July 1, 2016.

Sec. 2 2008 c 8 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:
(1) A county legislative authority may request inclusion in the
additional ((three)) five years of the cougar control pilot project
authorized by section 1 of this act after taking the following actions:
(((1))) (a) Adopting a resolution that requests inclusion in the
pilot project;
(((2))) (b) Documenting the need to participate in the pilot
project by identifying the number of cougar/human encounters and
livestock and pet depredations;
(((3))) (c) Developing and agreeing to the implementation of an
education program designed to disseminate to landowners and other
citizens information about predator exclusion techniques and devices
and other nonlethal methods of cougar management; and
(((4))) (d) Demonstrating that existing cougar depredation permits,
public safety cougar hunts, or other existing wildlife management tools
have not been sufficient to deal with cougar incidents in the county.
(2) The department shall automatically include a county
participating in the pilot program authorized by chapter 8, Laws of
2008 into the additional five-year pilot program extension authorized
in section 1 of this act under the initial terms of inclusion.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By September 1, 2015, the department
shall deliver to the legislature, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, a
progress report summarizing the pilot program authorized in section 1
of this act. The report must include information relating to how the
program has been used to assess cougar population levels and protect
public safety and property. The report may also include any
recommendations as to how the cougar management policies may be changed
in the future to achieve more effective or efficient management.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each
added to chapter 77.12 RCW.

--- END ---