BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.020 and 2007 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics,
upon all public works ((and under all public building service
maintenance contracts)) of the state or any county, municipality or
political subdivision created by its laws, shall be not less than the
prevailing rate of wage for an hour's work in the same trade or
occupation in the locality within the state where such labor is
performed. For a contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, a
contractor required to pay the prevailing rate of wage shall post in a
location readily visible to workers at the job site: PROVIDED, That on
road construction, sewer line, pipeline, transmission line, street, or
alley improvement projects for which no field office is needed or
established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of wage
statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing, concrete,
or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a copy of the
wage statement to any employee on request:
(1) A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries under RCW 39.12.040; and
(2) The address and telephone number of the industrial statistician
of the department of labor and industries where a complaint or inquiry
concerning prevailing wages may be made.
This chapter shall not apply to any public building service
maintenance contracts or to workers or other persons regularly employed
by the state, or any county, municipality, or political subdivision
created by its laws.

--- END ---