BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the legislature's intent to provide
local governments with more time to meet certain statutory
requirements. Many cities and counties in Washington are facing
revenue shortfalls, higher expenses, and more difficulty with borrowing
money as a result of the economic downturn. The effects of the
economic downturn on the budgets of local governments will be felt most
deeply from 2010 to 2012. Local governments are facing the combined
impact of decreased tax revenues, a falloff in state and federal aid,
and increased demand for social services. With the loss of tax revenue
and state and federal aid, local governments are being forced to make
significant cuts that will eliminate jobs, curtail essential services,
and increase the number of people in need. Additionally, local
governments are struggling to comply with certain statutory
requirements. Local governments want to comply with these statutory
requirements, but with budget constraints, they need more time to do
so. The legislature does not intend to remove any existing statutory
requirement, but rather modify the time under which a local government
must meet certain statutory requirements.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.130 and 2010 c 216 s 1 and 2010 c 211 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations
shall be subject to continuing review and evaluation by the county or
city that adopted them. Except as otherwise provided, a county or city
shall take legislative action to review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure the
plan and regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter
according to the deadlines in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
(b) Except as otherwise provided, a county or city not planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall take action to review and, if needed, revise
its policies and development regulations regarding critical areas and
natural resource lands adopted according to this chapter to ensure
these policies and regulations comply with the requirements of this
chapter according to the deadlines in subsections (4) and (5) of this
section. Legislative action means the adoption of a resolution or
ordinance following notice and a public hearing indicating at a
minimum, a finding that a review and evaluation has occurred and
identifying the revisions made, or that a revision was not needed and
the reasons therefor.
(c) ((The review and evaluation required by this subsection may be
combined with the review required by subsection (3) of this section.))
The review and evaluation required by this subsection shall include,
but is not limited to, consideration of critical area ordinances and,
if planning under RCW 36.70A.040, an analysis of the population
allocated to a city or county from the most recent ten-year population
forecast by the office of financial management.
(d) Any amendment of or revision to a comprehensive land use plan
shall conform to this chapter. Any amendment of or revision to
development regulations shall be consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan.
(2)(a) Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate
to the public a public participation program consistent with RCW
36.70A.035 and 36.70A.140 that identifies procedures and schedules
whereby updates, proposed amendments, or revisions of the comprehensive
plan are considered by the governing body of the county or city no more
frequently than once every year. "Updates" means to review and revise,
if needed, according to subsection (1) of this section, and the
deadlines in subsections (4) and (5) of this section or in accordance
with the provisions of subsection (6) of this section. Amendments may
be considered more frequently than once per year under the following
circumstances:
(i) The initial adoption of a subarea plan. Subarea plans adopted
under this subsection (2)(a)(i) must clarify, supplement, or implement
jurisdiction-wide comprehensive plan policies, and may only be adopted
if the cumulative impacts of the proposed plan are addressed by
appropriate environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW;
(ii) The development of an initial subarea plan for economic
development located outside of the one hundred year floodplain in a
county that has completed a state-funded pilot project that is based on
watershed characterization and local habitat assessment;
(iii) The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under
the procedures set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW;
(iv) The amendment of the capital facilities element of a
comprehensive plan that occurs concurrently with the adoption or
amendment of a county or city budget; or
(v) The adoption of comprehensive plan amendments necessary to
enact a planned action under RCW 43.21C.031(2), provided that
amendments are considered in accordance with the public participation
program established by the county or city under this subsection (2)(a)
and all persons who have requested notice of a comprehensive plan
update are given notice of the amendments and an opportunity to
comment.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all
proposals shall be considered by the governing body concurrently so the
cumulative effect of the various proposals can be ascertained.
However, after appropriate public participation a county or city may
adopt amendments or revisions to its comprehensive plan that conform
with this chapter whenever an emergency exists or to resolve an appeal
of a comprehensive plan filed with the growth management hearings board
or with the court.
(3)(a) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110 shall review, ((at least every ten years)) according to the
schedules established in subsection (5) of this section, its designated
urban growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the
incorporated and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In
conjunction with this review by the county, each city located within an
urban growth area shall review the densities permitted within its
boundaries, and the extent to which the urban growth occurring within
the county has located within each city and the unincorporated portions
of the urban growth areas.
(b) The county comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas,
and the densities permitted in the urban growth areas by the
comprehensive plans of the county and each city located within the
urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the urban growth
projected to occur in the county for the succeeding twenty-year period.
The review required by this subsection may be combined with the review
and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, counties
and cities shall take action to review and, if needed, revise their
comprehensive plans and development regulations to ensure the plan and
regulations comply with the requirements of this chapter as follows:
(a) On or before December 1, 2004, for Clallam, Clark, Jefferson,
King, Kitsap, Pierce, Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the
cities within those counties;
(b) On or before December 1, 2005, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis,
Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and Skamania counties and the cities within
those counties;
(c) On or before December 1, 2006, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas,
Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and Yakima counties and the cities within
those counties; and
(d) On or before December 1, 2007, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia,
Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan,
Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman
counties and the cities within those counties.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section,
following the review of comprehensive plans and development regulations
required by subsection (4) of this section, counties and cities shall
take action to review and, if needed, revise their comprehensive plans
and development regulations to ensure the plan and regulations comply
with the requirements of this chapter as follows:
(a) On or before ((December 1, 2014)) June 30, 2015, and every
((seven)) ten years thereafter, for ((Clallam,)) Clark, ((Jefferson,))
and King((, Kitsap, Pierce, Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom)) counties
and the cities within those counties;
(b) On or before ((December 1, 2015)) June 30, 2016, and every
((seven)) ten years thereafter, for ((Cowlitz, Island, Lewis)) Kitsap,
((Mason, San Juan, Skagit,)) Pierce, Snohomish, and ((Skamania))
Thurston counties and the cities within those counties;
(c) On or before ((December 1, 2016)) June 30, 2017, and every
((seven)) ten years thereafter, for ((Benton, Chelan, Douglas, Grant,
Kittitas)) Clallam, Island, Jefferson, Mason, San Juan, Skagit,
Spokane, and ((Yakima)) Whatcom counties and the cities within those
counties; and
(d) On or before ((December 1, 2017)) June 30, 2018, and every
((seven)) ten years thereafter, for ((Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry,
Franklin, Garfield, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan,
Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman))
Benton, Chelan, Cowlitz, Douglas, Grant, Kittitas, Lewis, Skamania, and
Yakima counties and the cities within those counties; and
(e) On or before June 30, 2019, and every ten years thereafter, for
Adams, Asotin, Columbia, Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grays Harbor,
Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens,
Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman counties and the cities within
those counties.
(6)(a) Nothing in this section precludes a county or city from
conducting the review and evaluation required by this section before
the deadlines established in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
Counties and cities may begin this process early and may be eligible
for grants from the department, subject to available funding, if they
elect to do so.
(b) A county that is subject to a deadline established in
subsection (4)(b) through (d) of this section and meets the following
criteria may comply with the requirements of this section at any time
within the thirty-six months following the deadline established in
subsection (4) of this section: The county has a population of less
than fifty thousand and has had its population increase by no more than
seventeen percent in the ten years preceding the deadline established
in subsection (4) of this section as of that date.
(c) A city that is subject to a deadline established in subsection
(4)(b) through (d) of this section and meets the following criteria may
comply with the requirements of this section at any time within the
thirty-six months following the deadline established in subsection (4)
of this section: The city has a population of no more than five
thousand and has had its population increase by the greater of either
no more than one hundred persons or no more than seventeen percent in
the ten years preceding the deadline established in subsection (4) of
this section as of that date.
(d) A county or city that is subject to a deadline established in
subsection (4)(d) of this section and that meets the criteria
established in subsection (6)(b) or (c) of this section may comply with
the requirements of subsection (4)(d) of this section at any time
within the thirty-six months after the extension provided in subsection
(6)(b) or (c) of this section.
(e) State agencies are encouraged to provide technical assistance
to the counties and cities in the review of critical area ordinances,
comprehensive plans, and development regulations.
(7)(a) The requirements imposed on counties and cities under this
section shall be considered "requirements of this chapter" under the
terms of RCW 36.70A.040(1). Only those counties and cities that meet
the following criteria may receive grants, loans, pledges, or financial
guarantees under chapter 43.155 or 70.146 RCW:
(i) Complying with the deadlines in this section;
(ii) Demonstrating substantial progress towards compliance with the
schedules in this section for development regulations that protect
critical areas; or
(iii) Complying with the extension provisions of subsection (6)(b),
(c), or (d) of this section.
(b) A county or city that is fewer than twelve months out of
compliance with the schedules in this section for development
regulations that protect critical areas is making substantial progress
towards compliance. Only those counties and cities in compliance with
the schedules in this section may receive preference for grants or
loans subject to the provisions of RCW 43.17.250.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70A.215 and 1997 c 429 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in subsection (7) of this section,
a county shall adopt, in consultation with its cities, countywide
planning policies to establish a review and evaluation program. This
program shall be in addition to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110,
36.70A.130, and 36.70A.210. In developing and implementing the review
and evaluation program required by this section, the county and its
cities shall consider information from other appropriate jurisdictions
and sources. The purpose of the review and evaluation program shall be
to:
(a) Determine whether a county and its cities are achieving urban
densities within urban growth areas by comparing growth and development
assumptions, targets, and objectives contained in the countywide
planning policies and the county and city comprehensive plans with
actual growth and development that has occurred in the county and its
cities; and
(b) Identify reasonable measures, other than adjusting urban growth
areas, that will be taken to comply with the requirements of this
chapter.
(2) The review and evaluation program shall:
(a) Encompass land uses and activities both within and outside of
urban growth areas and provide for annual collection of data on urban
and rural land uses, development, critical areas, and capital
facilities to the extent necessary to determine the quantity and type
of land suitable for development, both for residential and employment-based activities;
(b) Provide for evaluation of the data collected under (a) of this
subsection every five years as provided in subsection (3) of this
section. The first evaluation shall be completed not later than
September 1, 2002. The county and its cities may establish in the
countywide planning policies indicators, benchmarks, and other similar
criteria to use in conducting the evaluation;
(c) Provide for methods to resolve disputes among jurisdictions
relating to the countywide planning policies required by this section
and procedures to resolve inconsistencies in collection and analysis of
data; and
(d) Provide for the amendment of the countywide policies and county
and city comprehensive plans as needed to remedy an inconsistency
identified through the evaluation required by this section, or to bring
these policies into compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
(3) At a minimum, the evaluation component of the program required
by subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) Determine whether there is sufficient suitable land to
accommodate the countywide population projection established for the
county pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 and the subsequent population
allocations within the county and between the county and its cities and
the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110;
(b) Determine the actual density of housing that has been
constructed and the actual amount of land developed for commercial and
industrial uses within the urban growth area since the adoption of a
comprehensive plan under this chapter or since the last periodic
evaluation as required by subsection (1) of this section; and
(c) Based on the actual density of development as determined under
(b) of this subsection, review commercial, industrial, and housing
needs by type and density range to determine the amount of land needed
for commercial, industrial, and housing for the remaining portion of
the twenty-year planning period used in the most recently adopted
comprehensive plan.
(4) If the evaluation required by subsection (3) of this section
demonstrates an inconsistency between what has occurred since the
adoption of the countywide planning policies and the county and city
comprehensive plans and development regulations and what was envisioned
in those policies and plans and the planning goals and the requirements
of this chapter, as the inconsistency relates to the evaluation factors
specified in subsection (3) of this section, the county and its cities
shall adopt and implement measures that are reasonably likely to
increase consistency during the subsequent five-year period. If
necessary, a county, in consultation with its cities as required by RCW
36.70A.210, shall adopt amendments to countywide planning policies to
increase consistency. The county and its cities shall annually monitor
the measures adopted under this subsection to determine their effect
and may revise or rescind them as appropriate.
(5)(a) Not later than July 1, 1998, the department shall prepare a
list of methods used by counties and cities in carrying out the types
of activities required by this section. The department shall provide
this information and appropriate technical assistance to counties and
cities required to or choosing to comply with the provisions of this
section.
(b) By December 31, 2007, the department shall submit to the
appropriate committees of the legislature a report analyzing the
effectiveness of the activities described in this section in achieving
the goals envisioned by the countywide planning policies and the
comprehensive plans and development regulations of the counties and
cities.
(6) From funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose,
the department shall provide grants to counties, cities, and regional
planning organizations required under subsection (7) of this section to
conduct the review and perform the evaluation required by this section.
(7) The provisions of this section shall apply to counties, and the
cities within those counties, that were greater than one hundred fifty
thousand in population in 1995 as determined by office of financial
management population estimates and that are located west of the crest
of the Cascade mountain range. The obligations under this subsection
are subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for the
specific purpose identified in subsection (1) of this section, unless
the department received private funds for the specific purpose
identified in subsection (1) of this section. Any other county
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may carry out the review, evaluation, and
amendment programs and procedures as provided in this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.19.648 and 2009 c 459 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, effective
June 1, 2015, all state agencies and local government subdivisions of
the state, to the extent determined practicable by the rules adopted by
the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))
commerce pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to satisfy one
hundred percent of their fuel usage for operating publicly owned
vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or
biofuel.
(2) Effective June 1, 2018, all cities and counties, to the extent
determined practicable by the rules adopted by the department of
commerce pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to satisfy one
hundred percent of their fuel usage for operating publicly owned
vessels, vehicles, and construction equipment from electricity or
biofuel.
(3) In order to phase in this transition for the state, all state
agencies, to the extent determined practicable by the department of
((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce by rules
adopted pursuant to RCW 43.325.080, are required to achieve forty
percent fuel usage for operating publicly owned vessels, vehicles, and
construction equipment from electricity or biofuel by June 1, 2013.
The department of general administration, in consultation with the
department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce,
shall report to the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2013,
on what percentage of the state's fuel usage is from electricity or
biofuel.
(((3))) (4) Except for cars owned or operated by the Washington
state patrol, when tires on vehicles in the state's motor vehicle fleet
are replaced, they must be replaced with tires that have the same or
better rolling resistance as the original tires.
(((4))) (5) By December 31, 2015, the state must, to the extent
practicable, install electrical outlets capable of charging electric
vehicles in each of the state's fleet parking and maintenance
facilities.
(((5))) (6) The department of transportation's obligations under
subsection (((2))) (3) of this section are subject to the availability
of amounts appropriated for the specific purpose identified in
subsection (((2))) (3) of this section.
(((6))) (7) The department of transportation's obligations under
subsection (((4))) (5) of this section are subject to the availability
of amounts appropriated for the specific purpose identified in
subsection (((4))) (5) of this section unless the department receives
federal or private funds for the specific purpose identified in
subsection (((4))) (5) of this section.
(((7))) (8) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Battery charging station" means an electrical component
assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to
charge batteries within electric vehicles, which meet or exceed any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and
consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.
(b) "Battery exchange station" means a fully automated facility
that will enable an electric vehicle with a swappable battery to enter
a drive lane and exchange the depleted battery with a fully charged
battery through a fully automated process, which meets or exceeds any
standards, codes, and regulations set forth by chapter 19.28 RCW and
consistent with rules adopted under RCW 19.27.540.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.325.080 and 2007 c 348 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, by June
1, 2010, the department shall adopt rules to define practicability and
clarify how state agencies and local government subdivisions will be
evaluated in determining whether they have met the goals set out in RCW
43.19.648(1). At a minimum, the rules must address:
(((1))) (a) Criteria for determining how the goal in RCW
43.19.648(1) will be met by June 1, 2015;
(((2))) (b) Factors considered to determine compliance with the
goal in RCW 43.19.648(1), including but not limited to: The regional
availability of fuels; vehicle costs; differences between types of
vehicles, vessels, or equipment; the cost of program implementation;
and cost differentials in different parts of the state; and
(((3))) (c) A schedule for phased-in progress towards meeting the
goal in RCW 43.19.648(1) that may include different schedules for
different fuel applications or different quantities of biofuels.
(2) By June 1, 2015, the department shall adopt rules to define
practicability and clarify how cities and counties will be evaluated in
determining whether they have met the goals set out in RCW
43.19.648(2). At a minimum, the rules must address:
(a) Criteria for determining how the goal in RCW 43.19.648(2) will
be met by June 1, 2018;
(b) Factors considered to determine compliance with the goal in RCW
43.19.648(2), including but not limited to: The regional availability
of fuels; vehicle costs; differences between types of vehicles,
vessels, or equipment; the cost of program implementation; and cost
differentials in different parts of the state; and
(c) A schedule for phased-in progress towards meeting the goal in
RCW 43.19.648(2) that may include different schedules for different
fuel applications or different quantities of biofuels.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.68.113 and 2006 c 334 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
During the ((2003-2005)) 2013-2015 biennium, cities and towns shall
provide to the transportation commission, or its successor entity,
preservation rating information on at least seventy percent of the
total city and town arterial network. Thereafter, the preservation
rating information requirement shall increase in five percent
increments in subsequent biennia, but in no case shall it exceed eighty
percent. The rating system used by cities and towns must be based upon
the Washington state pavement rating method or an equivalent standard
approved by the department of transportation. Beginning January 1,
2007, the preservation rating information shall be submitted to the
department.

Sec. 7 RCW 82.02.050 and 1994 c 257 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature:
(a) To ensure that adequate facilities are available to serve new
growth and development;
(b) To promote orderly growth and development by establishing
standards by which counties, cities, and towns may require, by
ordinance, that new growth and development pay a proportionate share of
the cost of new facilities needed to serve new growth and development;
and
(c) To ensure that impact fees are imposed through established
procedures and criteria so that specific developments do not pay
arbitrary fees or duplicative fees for the same impact.
(2) Counties, cities, and towns that are required or choose to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 are authorized to impose impact fees on
development activity as part of the financing for public facilities,
provided that the financing for system improvements to serve new
development must provide for a balance between impact fees and other
sources of public funds and cannot rely solely on impact fees.
(3)(a) Counties, cities, and towns collecting impact fees for
residential development projects must make available to applicants for
building permits issued for a lot or unit within a subdivision, short
subdivision, site development permit, or condominium a process by which
the applicant may record a lien against title to the property that
requires payment equal to one hundred percent of the impact fee rates
in effect at the time of issuance of the building permit, less a credit
for any deposits paid if the residential development project is
designed, constructed, and certified to at least the LEED gold
standard. Liens recorded in accordance with this subsection (3) must
provide for payment through escrow of the impact fee due and owing to
be paid at the time of closing of sale of the lot or unit that is the
subject of the building permit or within twelve months of permit
issuances, whichever is earlier. Payment of such fees must be made
from seller's proceeds or otherwise paid by the seller, unless an
agreement to the contrary is reached between buyer and seller. In the
absence of an agreement to the contrary, the seller shall bear strict
liability for the payment of said fees. Escrow is not liable for
collection or payment of any such fees except as may be instructed by
the parties to the transaction.
(b) A seller, or agents of a seller, of property subject to a lien
authorized under this subsection (3) must provide written disclosure of
such lien to a purchaser or prospective purchaser pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 64.06 RCW.
(c) In the event the lot or unit is leased or rented rather than
sold, all impact fees applicable to such lot or unit must be paid in
full upon issuance of a certificate of occupancy or equivalent final
occupancy approval or within twelve months of permit issuances,
whichever is earlier.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "LEED gold standard" means the
United States green building council leadership in energy and
environmental design green building rating standard, referred to as
gold standard.
(4) The impact fees:
(a) ((Shall)) Must only be imposed for system improvements that are
reasonably related to the new development;
(b) ((Shall)) May not exceed a proportionate share of the costs of
system improvements that are reasonably related to the new development;
and
(c) ((Shall)) Must be used for system improvements that will
reasonably benefit the new development.
(((4))) (5)(a) Impact fees may be collected and spent only for the
public facilities defined in RCW 82.02.090 which are addressed by a
capital facilities plan element of a comprehensive land use plan
adopted pursuant to the provisions of RCW 36.70A.070 or the provisions
for comprehensive plan adoption contained in chapter 36.70, 35.63, or
35A.63 RCW. After the date a county, city, or town is required to
adopt its development regulations under chapter 36.70A RCW, continued
authorization to collect and expend impact fees ((shall be)) is
contingent on the county, city, or town adopting or revising a
comprehensive plan in compliance with RCW 36.70A.070, and on the
capital facilities plan identifying:
(((a))) (i) Deficiencies in public facilities serving existing
development and the means by which existing deficiencies will be
eliminated within a reasonable period of time;
(((b))) (ii) Additional demands placed on existing public
facilities by new development; and
(((c))) (iii) Additional public facility improvements required to
serve new development.
(b) If the capital facilities plan of the county, city, or town is
complete other than for the inclusion of those elements which are the
responsibility of a special district, the county, city, or town may
impose impact fees to address those public facility needs for which the
county, city, or town is responsible.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.02.070 and 2009 c 263 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Impact fee receipts shall be earmarked specifically and
retained in special interest-bearing accounts. Separate accounts shall
be established for each type of public facility for which impact fees
are collected. All interest shall be retained in the account and
expended for the purpose or purposes for which the impact fees were
imposed. Annually, each county, city, or town imposing impact fees
shall provide a report on each impact fee account showing the source
and amount of all moneys collected, earned, or received and system
improvements that were financed in whole or in part by impact fees.
(2) Impact fees for system improvements shall be expended only in
conformance with the capital facilities plan element of the
comprehensive plan.
(3)(a) Except as provided otherwise by (b) of this subsection,
impact fees shall be expended or encumbered for a permissible use
within ((six)) ten years of receipt, unless there exists an
extraordinary and compelling reason for fees to be held longer than
((six)) ten years. Such extraordinary or compelling reasons shall be
identified in written findings by the governing body of the county,
city, or town.
(b) School impact fees must be expended or encumbered for a
permissible use within ten years of receipt, unless there exists an
extraordinary and compelling reason for fees to be held longer than ten
years. Such extraordinary or compelling reasons shall be identified in
written findings by the governing body of the county, city, or town.
(4) Impact fees may be paid under protest in order to obtain a
permit or other approval of development activity.
(5) Each county, city, or town that imposes impact fees shall
provide for an administrative appeals process for the appeal of an
impact fee; the process may follow the appeal process for the
underlying development approval or the county, city, or town may
establish a separate appeals process. The impact fee may be modified
upon a determination that it is proper to do so based on principles of
fairness. The county, city, or town may provide for the resolution of
disputes regarding impact fees by arbitration.

Sec. 9 RCW 82.02.080 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 47 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The current owner of property on which an impact fee has been
paid may receive a refund of such fees if the county, city, or town
fails to expend or encumber the impact fees within ((six)) ten years of
when the fees were paid or other such period of time established
pursuant to RCW 82.02.070(3) on public facilities intended to benefit
the development activity for which the impact fees were paid. In
determining whether impact fees have been encumbered, impact fees shall
be considered encumbered on a first in, first out basis. The county,
city, or town shall notify potential claimants by first-class mail
deposited with the United States postal service at the last known
address of claimants.
The request for a refund must be submitted to the county, city, or
town governing body in writing within one year of the date the right to
claim the refund arises or the date that notice is given, whichever is
later. Any impact fees that are not expended within these time
limitations, and for which no application for a refund has been made
within this one-year period, shall be retained and expended on the
indicated capital facilities. Refunds of impact fees under this
subsection shall include interest earned on the impact fees.
(2) When a county, city, or town seeks to terminate any or all
impact fee requirements, all unexpended or unencumbered funds,
including interest earned, shall be refunded pursuant to this section.
Upon the finding that any or all fee requirements are to be terminated,
the county, city, or town shall place notice of such termination and
the availability of refunds in a newspaper of general circulation at
least two times and shall notify all potential claimants by first-class
mail to the last known address of claimants. All funds available for
refund shall be retained for a period of one year. At the end of one
year, any remaining funds shall be retained by the local government,
but must be expended for the indicated public facilities. This notice
requirement shall not apply if there are no unexpended or unencumbered
balances within an account or accounts being terminated.
(3) A developer may request and shall receive a refund, including
interest earned on the impact fees, when the developer does not proceed
with the development activity and no impact has resulted.

Sec. 10 RCW 36.70A.070 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 26 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
The comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or
chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps,
and descriptive text covering objectives, principles, and standards
used to develop the comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an
internally consistent document and all elements shall be consistent
with the future land use map. A comprehensive plan shall be adopted
and amended with public participation as provided in RCW 36.70A.140.
Each comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for
each of the following:
(1) A land use element designating the proposed general
distribution and general location and extent of the uses of land, where
appropriate, for agriculture, timber production, housing, commerce,
industry, recreation, open spaces, general aviation airports, public
utilities, public facilities, and other land uses. The land use
element shall include population densities, building intensities, and
estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall
provide for protection of the quality and quantity of groundwater used
for public water supplies. Wherever possible, the land use element
should consider utilizing urban planning approaches that promote
physical activity. Where applicable, the land use element shall review
drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby
jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate
or cleanse those discharges that pollute waters of the state, including
Puget Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.
(2) A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of
established residential neighborhoods that: (a) Includes an inventory
and analysis of existing and projected housing needs that identifies
the number of housing units necessary to manage projected growth; (b)
includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory
provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of
housing, including single-family residences; (c) identifies sufficient
land for housing, including, but not limited to, government-assisted
housing, housing for low-income families, manufactured housing,
multifamily housing, and group homes and foster care facilities; and
(d) makes adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all
economic segments of the community.
(3) A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An
inventory of existing capital facilities owned by public entities,
showing the locations and capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a
forecast of the future needs for such capital facilities; (c) the
proposed locations and capacities of expanded or new capital
facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such capital
facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies
sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to
reassess the land use element if probable funding falls short of
meeting existing needs and to ensure that the land use element, capital
facilities plan element, and financing plan within the capital
facilities plan element are coordinated and consistent. Park and
recreation facilities shall be included in the capital facilities plan
element.
(4) A utilities element consisting of the general location,
proposed location, and capacity of all existing and proposed utilities,
including, but not limited to, electrical lines, telecommunication
lines, and natural gas lines.
(5) Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element
including lands that are not designated for urban growth, agriculture,
forest, or mineral resources. The following provisions shall apply to
the rural element:
(a) Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because
circumstances vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of
rural densities and uses, a county may consider local circumstances,
but shall develop a written record explaining how the rural element
harmonizes the planning goals in RCW 36.70A.020 and meets the
requirements of this chapter.
(b) Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural
development, forestry, and agriculture in rural areas. The rural
element shall provide for a variety of rural densities, uses, essential
public facilities, and rural governmental services needed to serve the
permitted densities and uses. To achieve a variety of rural densities
and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density transfer, design
guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative techniques
that will accommodate appropriate rural densities and uses that are not
characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural
character.
(c) Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall
include measures that apply to rural development and protect the rural
character of the area, as established by the county, by:
(i) Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;
(ii) Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the
surrounding rural area;
(iii) Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land
into sprawling, low-density development in the rural area;
(iv) Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and
surface water and groundwater resources; and
(v) Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural,
forest, and mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.
(d) Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to
the requirements of this subsection and except as otherwise
specifically provided in this subsection (5)(d), the rural element may
allow for limited areas of more intensive rural development, including
necessary public facilities and public services to serve the limited
area as follows:
(i) Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or
redevelopment of existing commercial, industrial, residential, or
mixed-use areas, whether characterized as shoreline development,
villages, hamlets, rural activity centers, or crossroads developments.
(A) A commercial, industrial, residential, shoreline, or mixed-use
area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of this
subsection, but shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and
(iii) of this subsection.
(B) Any development or redevelopment other than an industrial area
or an industrial use within a mixed-use area or an industrial area
under this subsection (5)(d)(i) must be principally designed to serve
the existing and projected rural population.
(C) Any development or redevelopment in terms of building size,
scale, use, or intensity shall be consistent with the character of the
existing areas. Development and redevelopment may include changes in
use from vacant land or a previously existing use so long as the new
use conforms to the requirements of this subsection (5);
(ii) The intensification of development on lots containing, or new
development of, small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including
commercial facilities to serve those recreational or tourist uses, that
rely on a rural location and setting, but that do not include new
residential development. A small-scale recreation or tourist use is
not required to be principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population. Public services and public facilities
shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or tourist
use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;
(iii) The intensification of development on lots containing
isolated nonresidential uses or new development of isolated cottage
industries and isolated small-scale businesses that are not principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population and
nonresidential uses, but do provide job opportunities for rural
residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion of small-scale
businesses as long as those small-scale businesses conform with the
rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(15). Rural counties may also allow new
small-scale businesses to utilize a site previously occupied by an
existing business as long as the new small-scale business conforms to
the rural character of the area as defined by the local government
according to RCW 36.70A.030(15). Public services and public facilities
shall be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated
nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that does not
permit low-density sprawl;
(iv) A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the
existing areas or uses of more intensive rural development, as
appropriate, authorized under this subsection. Lands included in such
existing areas or uses shall not extend beyond the logical outer
boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing a new pattern of
low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary
delineated predominately by the built environment, but that may also
include undeveloped lands if limited as provided in this subsection.
The county shall establish the logical outer boundary of an area of
more intensive rural development. In establishing the logical outer
boundary, the county shall address (A) the need to preserve the
character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities, (B)
physical boundaries, such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and
land forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular
boundaries, and (D) the ability to provide public facilities and public
services in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;
(v) For purposes of (d) of this subsection, an existing area or
existing use is one that was in existence:
(A) On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to
plan under all of the provisions of this chapter;
(B) On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW
36.70A.040(2), in a county that is planning under all of the provisions
of this chapter under RCW 36.70A.040(2); or
(C) On the date the office of financial management certifies the
county's population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that
is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040(5).
(e) Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit
in the rural area a major industrial development or a master planned
resort unless otherwise specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and
36.70A.365.
(6) A transportation element that implements, and is consistent
with, the land use element.
(a) The transportation element shall include the following
subelements:
(i) Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;
(ii) Estimated traffic impacts to state-owned transportation
facilities resulting from land use assumptions to assist the department
of transportation in monitoring the performance of state facilities, to
plan improvements for the facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned transportation facilities;
(iii) Facilities and services needs, including:
(A) An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation
facilities and services, including transit alignments and general
aviation airport facilities, to define existing capital facilities and
travel levels as a basis for future planning. This inventory must
include state-owned transportation facilities within the city or
county's jurisdictional boundaries;
(B) Level of service standards for all locally owned arterials and
transit routes to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system.
These standards should be regionally coordinated;
(C) For state-owned transportation facilities, level of service
standards for highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW,
to gauge the performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting
level of service standards for state highways in the local
comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the system, to
evaluate improvement strategies, and to facilitate coordination between
the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit program and
the office of financial management's ten-year investment program. The
concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply to
transportation facilities and services of statewide significance except
for counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the
mainland are state highways or ferry routes. In these island counties,
state highways and ferry route capacity must be a factor in meeting the
concurrency requirements in (b) of this subsection;
(D) Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance
locally owned transportation facilities or services that are below an
established level of service standard;
(E) Forecasts of traffic for at least ten years based on the
adopted land use plan to provide information on the location, timing,
and capacity needs of future growth;
(F) Identification of state and local system needs to meet current
and future demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation
facilities must be consistent with the statewide multimodal
transportation plan required under chapter 47.06 RCW;
(iv) Finance, including:
(A) An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against
probable funding resources;
(B) A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the
comprehensive plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the
basis for the six-year street, road, or transit program required by RCW
35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795
for public transportation systems. The multiyear financing plan should
be coordinated with the ten-year investment program developed by the
office of financial management as required by RCW 47.05.030;
(C) If probable funding falls short of meeting identified needs, a
discussion of how additional funding will be raised, or how land use
assumptions will be reassessed to ensure that level of service
standards will be met;
(v) Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment
of the impacts of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on
the transportation systems of adjacent jurisdictions;
(vi) Demand-management strategies;
(vii) Pedestrian and bicycle component to include collaborative
efforts to identify and designate planned improvements for pedestrian
and bicycle facilities and corridors that address and encourage
enhanced community access and promote healthy lifestyles.
(b) After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions
required to plan or who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local
jurisdictions must adopt and enforce ordinances which prohibit
development approval if the development causes the level of service on
a locally owned transportation facility to decline below the standards
adopted in the transportation element of the comprehensive plan, unless
transportation improvements or strategies to accommodate the impacts of
development are made concurrent with the development. These strategies
may include increased public transportation service, ride sharing
programs, demand management, and other transportation systems
management strategies. For the purposes of this subsection (6),
"concurrent with the development" means that improvements or strategies
are in place at the time of development, or that a financial commitment
is in place to complete the improvements or strategies within six
years. If the collection of impact fees is delayed under RCW
82.02.050(3), the six-year period required by this subsection (6)(b)
must begin after the county or city receives full payment of all impact
fees due.
(c) The transportation element described in this subsection (6),
the six-year plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121
for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems, and
the ten-year investment program required by RCW 47.05.030 for the
state, must be consistent.
(7) An economic development element establishing local goals,
policies, objectives, and provisions for economic growth and vitality
and a high quality of life. The element shall include: (a) A summary
of the local economy such as population, employment, payroll, sectors,
businesses, sales, and other information as appropriate; (b) a summary
of the strengths and weaknesses of the local economy defined as the
commercial and industrial sectors and supporting factors such as land
use, transportation, utilities, education, workforce, housing, and
natural/cultural resources; and (c) an identification of policies,
programs, and projects to foster economic growth and development and to
address future needs. A city that has chosen to be a residential
community is exempt from the economic development element requirement
of this subsection.
(8) A park and recreation element that implements, and is
consistent with, the capital facilities plan element as it relates to
park and recreation facilities. The element shall include: (a)
Estimates of park and recreation demand for at least a ten-year period;
(b) an evaluation of facilities and service needs; and (c) an
evaluation of intergovernmental coordination opportunities to provide
regional approaches for meeting park and recreational demand.
(9) It is the intent that new or amended elements required after
January 1, 2002, be adopted concurrent with the scheduled update
provided in RCW 36.70A.130. Requirements to incorporate any such new
or amended elements shall be null and void until funds sufficient to
cover applicable local government costs are appropriated and
distributed by the state at least two years before local government
must update comprehensive plans as required in RCW 36.70A.130.

Sec. 11 RCW 90.46.015 and 2009 c 456 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of ecology shall, in coordination with the
department of health, adopt rules for reclaimed water use consistent
with this chapter. The rules must address all aspects of reclaimed
water use, including commercial and industrial uses, land applications,
direct groundwater recharge, wetland discharge, surface percolation,
constructed wetlands, and streamflow or surface water augmentation.
The department of health shall, in coordination with the department of
ecology, adopt rules for greywater reuse. The rules must also
designate whether the department of ecology or the department of health
will be the lead agency responsible for a particular aspect of
reclaimed water use. In developing the rules, the departments of
health and ecology shall amend or rescind any existing rules on
reclaimed water in conflict with the new rules.
(2) All rules required to be adopted pursuant to this section must
be completed no ((later than December 31, 2010, although the department
of ecology is encouraged to adopt the final rules as soon as possible))
earlier than June 30, 2013.
(3) The department of ecology must consult with the advisory
committee created under RCW 90.46.050 in all aspects of rule
development required under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 By November 30, 2011, the department of
ecology shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on the progress of reissuing the national pollution discharge
elimination system municipal storm water general permits first issued
on January 17, 2007. The report shall include a description of the
department's proposed draft permits and an update on the permit
development process.

Sec. 13 RCW 90.58.080 and 2007 c 170 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Local governments shall develop or amend a master program for
regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state consistent with the
required elements of the guidelines adopted by the department in
accordance with the schedule established by this section.
(2)(a) Subject to the provisions of subsections (5) and (6) of this
section, each local government subject to this chapter shall develop or
amend its master program for the regulation of uses of shorelines
within its jurisdiction according to the following schedule:
(i) On or before December 1, 2005, for the city of Port Townsend,
the city of Bellingham, the city of Everett, Snohomish county, and
Whatcom county;
(ii) On or before December 1, 2009, for King county and the cities
within King county greater in population than ten thousand;
(iii) Except as provided by (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, on
or before December 1, 2011, for Clallam, Clark, Jefferson, King,
Kitsap, Pierce, Snohomish, Thurston, and Whatcom counties and the
cities within those counties;
(iv) On or before December 1, 2012, for Cowlitz, Island, Lewis,
Mason, San Juan, Skagit, and Skamania counties and the cities within
those counties;
(v) On or before December 1, 2013, for Benton, Chelan, Douglas,
Grant, Kittitas, Spokane, and Yakima counties and the cities within
those counties; and
(vi) On or before December 1, 2014, for Adams, Asotin, Columbia,
Ferry, Franklin, Garfield, Grays Harbor, Klickitat, Lincoln, Okanogan,
Pacific, Pend Oreille, Stevens, Wahkiakum, Walla Walla, and Whitman
counties and the cities within those counties.
(b) Nothing in this subsection (2) shall preclude a local
government from developing or amending its master program prior to the
dates established by this subsection (2).
(3)(a) Following approval by the department of a new or amended
master program, local governments required to develop or amend master
programs on or before December 1, 2009, as provided by subsection
(2)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section, shall be deemed to have complied
with the schedule established by subsection (2)(a)(iii) of this section
and shall not be required to complete master program amendments until
((seven)) ten years after the applicable dates established by
subsection (2)(a)(iii) of this section. Any jurisdiction listed in
subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section that has a new or amended master
program approved by the department on or after March 1, 2002, but
before July 27, 2003, shall not be required to complete master program
amendments until ((seven)) ten years after the applicable date provided
by subsection (2)(a)(iii) of this section.
(b) Following approval by the department of a new or amended master
program, local governments choosing to develop or amend master programs
on or before December 1, 2009, shall be deemed to have complied with
the schedule established by subsection (2)(a)(iii) through (vi) of this
section and shall not be required to complete master program amendments
until ((seven)) ten years after the applicable dates established by
subsection (2)(a)(iii) through (vi) of this section.
(4) Local governments shall conduct a review of their master
programs at least once every ((seven)) ten years after the applicable
dates established by subsection (2)(a)(iii) through (vi) of this
section. Following the review required by this subsection (4), local
governments shall, if necessary, revise their master programs. The
purpose of the review is:
(a) To assure that the master program complies with applicable law
and guidelines in effect at the time of the review; and
(b) To assure consistency of the master program with the local
government's comprehensive plan and development regulations adopted
under chapter 36.70A RCW, if applicable, and other local requirements.
(5) Local governments are encouraged to begin the process of
developing or amending their master programs early and are eligible for
grants from the department as provided by RCW 90.58.250, subject to
available funding. Except for those local governments listed in
subsection (2)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section, the deadline for
completion of the new or amended master programs shall be two years
after the date the grant is approved by the department. Subsequent
master program review dates shall not be altered by the provisions of
this subsection.
(6)(a) Grants to local governments for developing and amending
master programs pursuant to the schedule established by this section
shall be provided at least two years before the adoption dates
specified in subsection (2) of this section. To the extent possible,
the department shall allocate grants within the amount appropriated for
such purposes to provide reasonable and adequate funding to local
governments that have indicated their intent to develop or amend master
programs during the biennium according to the schedule established by
subsection (2) of this section. Any local government that applies for
but does not receive funding to comply with the provisions of
subsection (2) of this section may delay the development or amendment
of its master program until the following biennium.
(b) Local governments with delayed compliance dates as provided in
(a) of this subsection shall be the first priority for funding in
subsequent biennia, and the development or amendment compliance
deadline for those local governments shall be two years after the date
of grant approval.
(c) Failure of the local government to apply in a timely manner for
a master program development or amendment grant in accordance with the
requirements of the department shall not be considered a delay
resulting from the provisions of (a) of this subsection.
(7) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, all local
governments subject to the requirements of this chapter that have not
developed or amended master programs on or after March 1, 2002, shall,
no later than December 1, 2014, develop or amend their master programs
to comply with guidelines adopted by the department after January 1,
2003.
(8) Local governments may be provided an additional year beyond the
deadlines in this section to complete their master program or
amendment. The department shall grant the request if it determines
that the local government is likely to adopt or amend its master
program within the additional year.

--- END ---