BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.52.010 and 2007 c 132 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A public utility district may include along with, or as part of,
its regular customer billings((,)) a request for voluntary
contributions to assist qualified low-income residential customers of
the district in paying their water, sewer, or electricity bills. All
funds received by the district in response to such requests shall be
(1) transmitted (a) to the grantee of the department of ((community,
trade, and economic development)) commerce which administers federally
funded energy assistance programs for the state in the district's
service area or (b) to a charitable organization within the district's
service area; or (2) retained by the district. All such funds shall be
used solely to supplement assistance to low-income residential
customers of the district in paying their water, sewer, or electricity
bills. The grantee, charitable organization, or district is
responsible to determine which of the district's customers are
qualified for low-income assistance and the amount of assistance to be
provided to those who are qualified.

--- END ---