BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
by an eligible entity, interest received on loans issued by the
eligible entity as part of a first-time home buyer program.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply to this section.
(a) "Eligible entity" means a nonprofit organization certified as
a community development financial institution by the federal community
development financial institutions fund.
(b) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization exempt from
federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to interest received on or
after August 1, 2011.

--- END ---