BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) At any time prior to or upon retiring and prior to receiving
any pension disbursements, a participant is allowed to:
(a) Purchase retirement pension coverage as provided in subsection
(2) of this section for years of service credited prior to their
enrollment in the pension system, and for which reinstatement of years
of service is not available under RCW 41.24.040; or
(b) Purchase retirement pension coverage as provided in subsection
(2) of this section for years of service that were lost due to the
withdrawal of pension fees.
(2) The participant and/or the municipality must make payment for
the purchase of retirement pension coverage by paying the actuarial
value of the resulting benefit increase in a manner defined by the
state board.
(3) Retirement pension coverage may only be purchased for the
period in which service was performed as defined in RCW 41.24.010(9)
and in a manner consistent with this section.

--- END ---