BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Four-wheel all-terrain vehicle" means any motorized nonhighway
vehicle with handlebars that is fifty inches or less in width, has a
seat height of at least twenty inches, weighs less than one thousand
five hundred pounds, and has tires having a diameter of thirty inches
or less.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may operate a four-wheel all-terrain vehicle as
defined in section 1 of this act upon any roadway of this state having
a speed limit of thirty-five miles per hour or less subject to the
following restrictions and requirements:
(a) A person may not operate a four-wheel all-terrain vehicle upon
state highways that are listed in chapter 47.17 RCW; however, a person
may operate a four-wheel all-terrain vehicle upon a segment of a state
highway listed in chapter 47.17 RCW if the segment is within the limits
of a city and the speed limit on the segment is thirty-five miles per
hour or less;
(b) A person may not operate a four-wheel all-terrain vehicle upon
a roadway of this state without first having obtained and having in
full force and effect a current and proper vehicle registration, and a
license plate in compliance with chapter 46.16A RCW. The license plate
must be displayed in compliance with chapter 46.16A RCW. A four-wheel
all-terrain vehicle may not be registered for commercial use;
(c) A person may not operate a four-wheel all-terrain vehicle upon
a roadway of this state without (i) first obtaining a valid driver's
license issued to Washington residents in compliance with chapter 46.20
RCW, or (ii) possessing a valid driver's license issued by the state of
the person's residence if the person is a nonresident;
(d) A person may not operate a four-wheel all-terrain vehicle
subject to registration under chapter 46.16A RCW on a roadway of this
state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle liability
policy in compliance with chapter 46.30 RCW;
(e) A person operating a four-wheel all-terrain vehicle may not
cross a roadway with a speed limit in excess of thirty-five miles per
hour, unless the crossing begins and ends on a roadway, or an ORV trail
as defined in RCW 46.09.310, with a speed limit of thirty-five miles
per hour or less and occurs at an intersection of approximately ninety
degrees, except that the operator of a four-wheel all-terrain vehicle
may not cross at an uncontrolled intersection of a public highway
listed under chapter 47.17 RCW; and
(f)(i) A person may not operate a four-wheel all-terrain vehicle on
the roadways within the boundaries of a city with a population of
fifteen thousand or more unless the city by ordinance has approved the
operation of four-wheel all-terrain vehicles on city roadways.
(ii) The legislative body of a city with a population of less than
fifteen thousand may, by ordinance, designate a road or highway within
its boundaries to be unsuitable for use by four-wheel all-terrain
vehicles.
(iii) Any roadways authorized by a legislative body of a city under
(f)(i) of this subsection or designated as unsuitable under (f)(ii) of
this subsection must be listed publicly and made accessible from the
main page of the city web site.
(2) A person who operates a four-wheel all-terrain vehicle under
this section must pay the annual vehicle license fee required in RCW
46.17.350(1)(e) for the four-wheel all-terrain vehicle.
(3) Any four-wheel all-terrain vehicle operated under this section
must have:
(a) Headlights meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.030 and
46.37.040 and used at all times when the vehicle is in motion upon a
highway;
(b) Tail lamps meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.050 and used
at all times when the vehicle is in motion upon a highway;
(c) A stop lamp meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.200;
(d) Reflectors meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.060;
(e) Turn signals meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.200;
(f) A mirror on both the left and right handlebar which must be
located to give the operator a complete view of the highway for a
distance of at least two hundred feet to the rear of the vehicle;
(g) A windshield, unless the operator wears glasses, goggles, or a
face shield while operating the vehicle, of a type conforming to rules
adopted by the Washington state patrol;
(h) A horn or warning device meeting the requirements of RCW
46.37.380;
(i) Brakes in working order;
(j) A spark arrester and muffling device meeting the requirements
of RCW 46.09.470; and
(k) Fenders adequate for minimizing the spray or splash of water,
rocks, or mud from the roadway. Fenders must be as wide as the tires
behind which they are mounted and extend downward at least half way to
the center of the axle.
(4) A person must certify under oath, on a form provided by the
department, that the equipment listed in subsection (3) of this section
has been installed on the four-wheel all-terrain vehicle and that the
equipment is operable. A person who makes a false statement regarding
the installation of the equipment listed in subsection (3) of this
section is guilty of false swearing, a gross misdemeanor, under RCW
9A.72.040.
(5) Every person operating a four-wheel all-terrain vehicle under
this section is granted all rights and is subject to all duties
applicable to the operator of a motorcycle under RCW 46.37.530 and
chapter 46.61 RCW, except that four-wheel all-terrain vehicles may not
be operated side-by-side in a single lane of traffic. Four-wheel all-terrain vehicles are subject to chapter 46.55 RCW.
(6) Any person who violates this section commits a traffic
infraction.
(7) Accidents must be recorded and tracked in compliance with
chapter 46.52 RCW. An accident report must indicate and be tracked
separately when any of the vehicles involved are a four-wheel all-terrain vehicle.
(8) Local authorities may not establish requirements for the
registration of four-wheel all-terrain vehicles.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.09.360 and 2006 c 212 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this chapter, any
city, county, or other political subdivision of this state, or any
state agency, may regulate the operation of nonhighway vehicles on
public lands, waters, and other properties under its jurisdiction, and
on streets, roads, or highways within its boundaries as outlined in
this section, by adopting regulations or ordinances of its governing
body, provided such regulations are not less stringent than the
provisions of this chapter. However, the legislative body of a:
(a) City with a population of ((less)) fewer than three thousand
persons, or of a county with a population of no more than five thousand
persons, may, by ordinance, designate a street, road, or highway within
its boundaries to be suitable for use by off-road vehicles((. The
legislative body of a)); and
(b) County with a population of more than five thousand persons
may, by ordinance, designate a road or highway within its boundaries to
be suitable for use by off-road vehicles if the road or highway is a
direct connection between a city with a population of ((less)) fewer
than three thousand persons and an off-road vehicle recreation
facility.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section,
"off-road vehicles" does not include four-wheel all-terrain vehicles as
defined in section 1 of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.17.200 and 2011 c 171 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to all other fees and taxes required by law, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall charge:
(a) The following license plate fees for each license plate, unless
the owner or type of vehicle is exempt from payment:

FEE TYPE FEE DISTRIBUTION

Reflectivity $ 2.00 RCW 46.68.070

Replacement $ 10.00 RCW 46.68.070

Replacement, four-wheel all-terrain vehicle $ 2.00 Section 11 of this act

Replacement, motorcycle $ 2.00 RCW 46.68.070

Original issue, moped $1.50 RCW 46.68.070

(b) A license plate retention fee, as required under RCW
46.16A.200(10)(((a)(iii))) (c), of twenty dollars if the owner wishes
to retain the current license plate number upon license plate
replacement, unless the owner or type of vehicle is exempt from
payment. The twenty dollar fee must be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(c) A ten dollar license plate transfer fee, as required under RCW
46.16A.200(8)(a), when transferring standard issue license plates from
one vehicle to another, unless the owner or type of vehicle is exempt
from payment. The ten dollar license plate transfer fee must be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.
(d) Former prisoner of war license plates, as described in RCW
46.18.235, may be transferred to a replacement vehicle upon payment of
a five dollar license plate fee, in addition to any other fee required
by law.
(2) The department may, upon request, provide license plates that
have been used and returned to the department to individuals for
nonvehicular use. The department may charge a fee of up to five
dollars per license plate to cover costs or recovery for postage and
handling. The department may waive the fee for license plates used in
educational projects and may, by rule, provide standards for the fee
waiver and restrictions on the number of license plates provided to any
one person. The fee must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund
created in RCW 46.68.070.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.17.350 and 2010 c 161 s 531 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before accepting an application for a vehicle registration, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall require the applicant, unless specifically exempt, to
pay the following vehicle license fee by vehicle type:

VEHICLE TYPE INITIAL FEE RENEWAL FEE DISTRIBUTED UNDER

(a) Auto stage, six seats or less $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(b) Camper $ 4.90 $ 3.50 RCW 46.68.030

(c) Commercial trailer $ 34.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.035

(d) For hire vehicle, six seats
or less $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(e) Four-wheel all-terrain
vehicle $ 30.00 $ 30.00 Section 11 of this act

(f) Mobile home (if registered) $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(((f))) (g) Moped $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(((g))) (h) Motor home $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(((h))) (i) Motorcycle $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(((i))) (j) Off-road vehicle $ 18.00 $ 18.00 RCW 46.68.045

(((j))) (k) Passenger car $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(((k))) (l) Private use single-axle trailer $ 15.00 $ 15.00 RCW 46.68.035(2)

(((l))) (m) Snowmobile $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.350

(((m))) (n) Snowmobile,
vintage $ 12.00 $ 12.00 RCW 46.68.350

(((n))) (o) Sport utility vehicle $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(((o))) (p) Tow truck $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(((p))) (q) Trailer, over 2000
pounds $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(((q))) (r) Travel trailer $ 30.00 $ 30.00 RCW 46.68.030

(2) The vehicle license fee required in subsection (1) of this
section is in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005,
and any other fee or tax required by law.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.16A.080 and 2011 c 171 s 45 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following vehicles are not required to be registered under this
chapter:
(1) Converter gears used to convert a semitrailer into a trailer or
a two-axle truck or tractor into a three or more axle truck or tractor
or used in any other manner to increase the number of axles of a
vehicle;
(2) Electric-assisted bicycles;
(3)(a) Farm implements, tractors, trailers, and other farm vehicles
(i) operated within a radius of fifteen miles of the farm where it is
principally used or garaged, including trailers designed as cook or
bunk houses, (ii) used exclusively for animal herding, and (iii)
temporarily operating or drawn upon the public highways, and (b)
trailers used exclusively to transport farm implements from one farm to
another during daylight hours or at night when the trailer is equipped
with lights that comply with applicable law;
(4) Forklifts operated during daylight hours on public highways
adjacent to and within five hundred feet of the warehouses they serve;
(5) Golf carts, as defined in RCW 46.04.1945, operating within a
designated golf cart zone as described in RCW 46.08.175;
(6) Motor vehicles operated solely within a national recreation
area that is not accessible by a state highway, including motorcycles,
motor homes, passenger cars, and sport utility vehicles. This
exemption applies only after initial registration;
(7) Motorized foot scooters;
(8) Nurse rigs or equipment auxiliary for the use of and designed
or modified for the fueling, repairing, or loading of spray and
fertilizer applicator rigs and not used, designed, or modified
primarily for the purpose of transportation;
(9) Off-road vehicles operated on a street, road, or highway as
authorized under RCW 46.09.360, or nonhighway roads under RCW
46.09.450. For purposes of this subsection "off-road vehicles" does
not include four-wheel all-terrain vehicles registered for use under
section 2 of this act;
(10) Special highway construction equipment;
(11) Dump trucks and tractor-dump trailer combinations that are:
(a) Designed and used primarily for construction work on highways;
(b) Not designed or used primarily for the transportation of
persons or property on a public highway; and
(c) Only incidentally operated or moved over the highways;
(12) Spray or fertilizer applicator rigs designed and used
exclusively for spraying or fertilization in the conduct of
agricultural operations and not primarily for the purpose of
transportation;
(13) Tow dollies;
(14) Trams used for transporting persons to and from facilities
related to the horse racing industry as regulated in chapter 67.16 RCW,
as long as the public right-of-way routes over which the trams operate
are not more than one mile from end to end, the public rights-of-way
over which the tram operates have average daily traffic of not more
than fifteen thousand vehicles per day, and the activity is in
conformity with federal law. The operator must be a licensed driver
and at least eighteen years old. For the purposes of this section,
"tram" also means a vehicle, or combination of vehicles linked together
with a single mode of propulsion, used to transport persons from one
location to another; and
(15) Vehicles used by the state parks and recreation commission
exclusively for park maintenance and operations upon public highways
within state parks.

Sec. 7 RCW 79A.80.010 and 2011 c 320 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" or "agencies" means the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of natural resources, and the parks and
recreation commission.
(2) "Annual natural investment permit" means the annual permit
issued by the parks and recreation commission for the purpose of
launching boats from the designated state parks boat launch sites.
(3) "Camper registration" means proof of payment of a camping fee
on recreational lands managed by the parks and recreation commission.
(4) "Day-use permit" means the permit created in RCW 79A.80.030.
(5) "Discover pass" means the annual pass created in RCW
79A.80.020.
(6) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
46.04.320 and which are required to be registered under chapter 46.16A
RCW. "Motor vehicle" does not include those motor vehicles exempt from
registration under RCW 46.16A.080, four-wheel all-terrain vehicles
registered for use under section 2 of this act, and state and publicly
owned motor vehicles as provided in RCW 46.16A.170.
(7) "Recreation site or lands" means a state park or fish and
wildlife conservation sites including water access areas, boat ramps,
wildlife areas, parking areas, roads, and trailheads, or department of
natural resources developed or designated recreation areas, sites,
trailheads, and parking areas.
(8) "Sno-park seasonal permit" means the seasonal permit issued by
the parks and recreation commission for providing access to winter
recreational facilities for the period of November 1st through March
31st.
(9) "Vehicle access pass" means the pass created in RCW 79A.80.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 46.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may not operate a nonhighway vehicle on public lands
unless the area is designated by the land manager as open for
nonhighway vehicle use.
(2) A violation of this section is a traffic infraction with a
penalty of up to five hundred dollars.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.09.470 and 2011 c 171 s 28 and 2011 c 121 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, it is a
traffic infraction for any person to operate any nonhighway vehicle:
(a) In such a manner as to endanger the property of another;
(b) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without a lighted headlight and taillight between the hours of
dusk and dawn, or when otherwise required for the safety of others
regardless of ownership;
(c) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without an adequate braking device or when otherwise required
for the safety of others regardless of ownership;
(d) Without a spark arrester approved by the department of natural
resources;
(e) Without an adequate, and operating, muffling device which
effectively limits vehicle noise to no more than eighty-six decibels on
the "A" scale at fifty feet as measured by the Society of Automotive
Engineers (SAE) test procedure J 331a, except that a maximum noise
level of one hundred and five decibels on the "A" scale at a distance
of twenty inches from the exhaust outlet shall be an acceptable
substitute in lieu of the Society of Automotive Engineers test
procedure J 331a when measured:
(i) At a forty-five degree angle at a distance of twenty inches
from the exhaust outlet;
(ii) With the vehicle stationary and the engine running at a steady
speed equal to one-half of the manufacturer's maximum allowable ("red
line") engine speed or where the manufacturer's maximum allowable
engine speed is not known the test speed in revolutions per minute
calculated as sixty percent of the speed at which maximum horsepower is
developed; and
(iii) With the microphone placed ten inches from the side of the
vehicle, one-half way between the lowest part of the vehicle body and
the ground plane, and in the same lateral plane as the rearmost exhaust
outlet where the outlet of the exhaust pipe is under the vehicle;
(f) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle upon the shoulder or inside bank or slope of any nonhighway
road or highway, or upon the median of any divided highway;
(g) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle in any area or in such a manner so as to unreasonably expose
the underlying soil, or to create an erosion condition, or to injure,
damage, or destroy trees, growing crops, or other vegetation;
(h) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle or on any nonhighway road or trail, when these are restricted
to pedestrian or animal travel;
(i) On any public lands in violation of rules and regulations of
the agency administering such lands; and
(j) On a private nonhighway road in violation of RCW 46.09.450(3).
(2) It is a misdemeanor for any person to operate any nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance.
(3)(a) Except for an off-road vehicle equipped with seat belts and
roll bars or an enclosed passenger compartment, it is a traffic
infraction for any person to operate or ride an off-road vehicle on a
nonhighway road without wearing upon his or her head a motorcycle
helmet fastened securely while in motion. For purposes of this
section, "motorcycle helmet" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
46.37.530.
(b) Subsection (3)(a) of this section does not apply to an off-road
vehicle operator operating on his or her own land.
(c) Subsection (3)(a) of this section does not apply to an off-road
vehicle operator operating on agricultural lands owned or leased by the
off-road vehicle operator or the operator's employer.
(4) It is not a traffic infraction to operate an off-road vehicle
on a street, road, or highway as authorized under RCW 46.09.360 ((or)),
46.61.705, or section 2 of this act.

Sec. 10 RCW 46.63.020 and 2010 c 252 s 3, 2010 c 161 s 1125, and
2010 c 8 s 9077 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Failure to perform any act required or the performance of any act
prohibited by this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution relating to traffic
including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is
designated as a traffic infraction and may not be classified as a
criminal offense, except for an offense contained in the following
provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent administrative
regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:
(1) RCW 46.09.470(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance;
(2) RCW 46.09.480 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;
(3) RCW 46.10.490(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit-forming drugs or in a manner endangering the person of another;
(4) RCW 46.10.495 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;
(5) Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of title,
registration certificates, and markings indicating that a vehicle has
been destroyed or declared a total loss;
(6) RCW 46.16A.030 and 46.16A.050(3) relating to the nonpayment of
taxes and fees by failure to register a vehicle and falsifying
residency when registering a motor vehicle;
(7) RCW 46.16A.520 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to
drive;
(8) RCW 46.16A.320 relating to vehicle trip permits;
(9) RCW 46.19.050 relating to knowingly providing false information
in conjunction with an application for a special placard or license
plate for disabled persons' parking;
(10) RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's
license;
(11) RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a
driver's license or instruction permit;
(12) RCW 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession and use of
a driver's license;
(13) RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked
license or status;
(14) RCW 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle
with a suspended or revoked license;
(15) RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational driver's license, temporary restricted driver's license,
or ignition interlock driver's license;
(16) RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without
an ignition interlock device in violation of a license notation that
the device is required;
(17) RCW 46.20.750 relating to circumventing an ignition interlock
device;
(18) RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;
(19) Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;
(20) RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of
financial responsibility;
(21) RCW 46.35.030 relating to recording device information;
(22) RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of
sunscreening material;
(23) RCW 46.37.650 relating to the sale, resale, distribution, or
installation of a previously deployed air bag;
(24) RCW 46.37.671 through 46.37.675 relating to signal preemption
devices;
(25) RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot
vehicles;
(26) RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous
articles;
(27) RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(28) RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(29) RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairers, storage
persons, and appraisers;
(30) RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving
record to be furnished to an insurance company, an employer, and an
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency;
(31) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a
registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;
(32) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck
operators;
(33) RCW 46.55.300 relating to vehicle immobilization;
(34) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers,
flaggers, or firefighters;
(35) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or
cooperate with an officer;
(36) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give
identification to an officer;
(37) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police
vehicles;
(38) RCW 46.61.212(4) relating to reckless endangerment of
emergency zone workers;
(39) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;
(40) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(41) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty- one
driving a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;
(42) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;
(43) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;
(44) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent driving;
(45) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of roadway
workers;
(46) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on highways;
(47) RCW 46.61.655(7) (a) and (b) relating to failure to secure a
load;
(48) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an unattended
vehicle with the motor running;
(49) Section 2(4) of this act relating to a false statement
regarding the installation of equipment on four-wheel all-terrain
vehicles;
(50) RCW 46.61.740 relating to theft of motor vehicle fuel;
(((50))) (51) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or
attempt to cancel a traffic citation;
(((51))) (52) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding,
abetting, coercing, and committing crimes;
(((52))) (53) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic
offenders;
(((53))) (54) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to
obtain a refund;
(((54))) (55) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle
business practices, except where that chapter provides for the
assessment of monetary penalties of a civil nature;
(((55))) (56) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of
passengers in for hire vehicles;
(((56))) (57) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier
insurance;
(((57))) (58) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine
without a vehicle certificate;
(((58))) (59) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a
limousine carrier;
(((59))) (60) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;
(((60))) (61) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training
schools;
(((61))) (62) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a
cab card, letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued
under chapter 46.87 RCW;
(((62))) (63) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an
unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
The multiuse roadway safety account is created in the motor vehicle
fund. All receipts from vehicle license fees under RCW 46.17.350(1)(e)
and replacement license plate fees for four-wheel all-terrain vehicles
under RCW 46.17.200(1) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for grants administered by the department
of transportation to: (1) Counties to perform safety engineering
analysis of mixed vehicle use on any road within a county; and (2)
local governments to provide funding to erect signs providing notice to
the motoring public that four-wheel all-terrain vehicles are present.

Sec. 12 RCW 46.37.010 and 2011 c 171 s 79 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is a traffic infraction for any person to drive or move, or
for a vehicle owner to cause or knowingly permit to be driven or moved,
on any highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles that:
(a) Is in such unsafe condition as to endanger any person;
(b) Is not at all times equipped with such lamps and other
equipment in proper working condition and adjustment as required by
this chapter or by rules issued by the Washington state patrol;
(c) Contains any parts in violation of this chapter or rules issued
by the Washington state patrol.
(2) It is a traffic infraction for any person to do any act
forbidden or fail to perform any act required under this chapter or
rules issued by the Washington state patrol.
(3) Nothing contained in this chapter or the state patrol's
regulations shall be construed to prohibit the use of additional parts
and accessories on any vehicle not inconsistent with the provisions of
this chapter or the state patrol's regulations.
(4) The provisions of the chapter and the state patrol's
regulations with respect to equipment on vehicles shall not apply to
implements of husbandry, road machinery, road rollers, or farm tractors
except as herein made applicable.
(5) No owner or operator of a farm tractor, self-propelled unit of
farm equipment, or implement of husbandry shall be guilty of a crime or
subject to penalty for violation of RCW 46.37.160 as now or hereafter
amended unless such violation occurs on a public highway.
(6) It is a traffic infraction for any person to sell or offer for
sale vehicle equipment which is required to be approved by the state
patrol as prescribed in RCW 46.37.005 unless it has been approved by
the state patrol.
(7) The provisions of this chapter with respect to equipment
required on vehicles shall not apply to:
(a) Motorcycles or motor-driven cycles except as herein made
applicable;
(b) Golf carts, as defined in RCW 46.04.1945, operating within a
designated golf cart zone as described in RCW 46.08.175, except as
provided in RCW 46.08.175(8); and
(c) Four-wheel all-terrain vehicles that are registered for use
under section 2 of this act.
(8) This chapter does not apply to off-road vehicles used on
nonhighway roads or used on streets, roads, or highways as authorized
under RCW 46.09.360.
(9) This chapter does not apply to vehicles used by the state parks
and recreation commission exclusively for park maintenance and
operations upon public highways within state parks.
(10) Notices of traffic infraction issued to commercial drivers
under the provisions of this chapter with respect to equipment required
on commercial motor vehicles shall not be considered for driver
improvement purposes under chapter 46.20 RCW.
(11) Whenever a traffic infraction is chargeable to the owner or
lessee of a vehicle under subsection (1) of this section, the driver
shall not be arrested or issued a notice of traffic infraction unless
the vehicle is registered in a jurisdiction other than Washington
state, or unless the infraction is for an offense that is clearly
within the responsibility of the driver.
(12) Whenever the owner or lessee is issued a notice of traffic
infraction under this section the court may, on the request of the
owner or lessee, take appropriate steps to make the driver of the
vehicle, or any other person who directs the loading, maintenance, or
operation of the vehicle, a codefendant. If the codefendant is held
solely responsible and is found to have committed the traffic
infraction, the court may dismiss the notice against the owner or
lessee.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.84.092 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 6, 2011 1st sp.s.
c 7 s 22, 2011 c 369 s 6, 2011 c 339 s 1, 2011 c 311 s 9, 2011 c 272 s
3, 2011 c 120 s 3, and 2011 c 83 s 7 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin
taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin
water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction
fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the Interstate 405
express toll lanes operations account, the education construction fund,
the education legacy trust account, the election account, the energy
freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail
assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the freight
mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account,
the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account,
the health system capacity account, the high capacity transportation
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the
highway infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high
occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net
assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the
judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold
excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
multiagency permitting team account, the multimodal transportation
account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal
justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster
reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public transportation systems account,
the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital
construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program
account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure account, the
skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement
and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state
employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route number 520
civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account,
the state wildlife account, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account),
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain
injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement
system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state economic development
commission account, the Washington state health insurance pool account,
the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act takes effect March 1, 2013.

--- END ---