BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.56.020 and 2009 c 495 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to establish an adverse health events
and incident notification and reporting system that is designed to
facilitate quality improvement in the health care system, improve
patient safety, assist the public in making informed health care
choices, and decrease medical errors in a nonpunitive manner. The
notification and reporting system shall not be designed to punish
errors by health care practitioners or health care facility employees.
(2) When a medical facility confirms that an adverse event has
occurred, it shall submit to:
(a) The department of health, using the internet-based system
established under RCW 70.56.040(2), if operational, and any payor, as
that term is defined in RCW 41.05.036, for service relating to the
adverse event:
(((a))) (i) Notification of the event, with the date, type of
adverse event, and any additional contextual information the facility
chooses to provide, within forty-eight hours; and
(((b))) (ii) A report regarding the event within forty-five days
that may be amended by the medical facility within sixty days of the
submission; and
(b) The patient or family affected by the adverse event:
(i) A notice that an adverse event relating to the patient has been
reported to the department of health. The notice must include the
information provided to the department under (a) of this subsection;
and
(ii) Information on how the patient or family may access adverse
event reports via the department of health's web site.
((The notification and report shall be submitted to the department
using the internet-based system established under RCW 70.56.040(2) if
the system is operational.
(c) A medical facility may amend the notification or report within
sixty days of the submission.))
(3) The notification and report shall be filed in a format
specified by the department after consultation with medical facilities
and the independent entity if an independent entity has been contracted
for under RCW 70.56.040(1). The format shall identify the facility,
but shall not include any identifying information for any of the health
care professionals, facility employees, or patients involved. This
provision does not modify the duty of a hospital to make a report to
the department of health or a disciplinary authority if a licensed
practitioner has committed unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW
18.130.180.
(4) As part of the report filed under subsection (2)(((b))) (a)(ii)
of this section, the medical facility must conduct a root cause
analysis of the event, describe the corrective action plan that will be
implemented consistent with the findings of the analysis, or provide an
explanation of any reasons for not taking corrective action. The
department shall adopt rules, in consultation with medical facilities
and the independent entity if an independent entity has been contracted
for under RCW 70.56.040(1), related to the form and content of the root
cause analysis and corrective action plan. In developing the rules,
consideration shall be given to existing standards for root cause
analysis or corrective action plans adopted by the joint commission on
accreditation of health facilities and other national or governmental
entities.
(5) If, in the course of investigating a complaint received from an
employee of a medical facility, the department determines that the
facility has not provided notification of an adverse event or
undertaken efforts to investigate the occurrence of an adverse event,
the department shall direct the facility to provide notification or to
undertake an investigation of the event.
(6) The protections of RCW 43.70.075 apply to notifications of
adverse events that are submitted in good faith by employees of medical
facilities.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.130.080 and 2008 c 134 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) An individual, an impaired practitioner program, or a
voluntary substance abuse monitoring program approved by a disciplining
authority, may submit a written complaint to the disciplining authority
charging a license holder or applicant with unprofessional conduct and
specifying the grounds therefor or to report information to the
disciplining authority, or voluntary substance abuse monitoring
program, or an impaired practitioner program approved by the
disciplining authority, which indicates that the license holder may not
be able to practice his or her profession with reasonable skill and
safety to consumers as a result of a mental or physical condition.
(b)(i) Every license holder, corporation, organization, health care
facility, and state and local governmental agency that employs a
license holder shall report to the disciplining authority when the
employed license holder's services have been terminated or restricted
based upon a final determination that the license holder has either
committed an act or acts that may constitute unprofessional conduct or
that the license holder may not be able to practice his or her
profession with reasonable skill and safety to consumers as a result of
a mental or physical condition.
(ii) All reports required by (b)(i) of this subsection must be
submitted to the disciplining authority as soon as possible, but no
later than twenty days after a determination has been made. A report
should contain the following information, if known:
(A) The name, address, and telephone number of the person making
the report;
(B) The name, address, and telephone number of the license holder
being reported;
(C) The case number of any patient whose treatment is the subject
of the report;
(D) A brief description or summary of the facts that gave rise to
the issuance of the report, including dates of occurrences;
(E) If court action is involved, the name of the court in which the
action is filed, the date of filing, and the docket number; and
(F) Any further information that would aid in the evaluation of the
report.
(iii) Mandatory reports required by (b)(i) of this subsection are
exempt from public inspection and copying to the extent permitted under
chapter 42.56 RCW or to the extent that public inspection or copying of
the report would invade or violate a person's right to privacy as set
forth in RCW 42.56.050.
(2) After receiving a written complaint under subsection (1) of
this section, the disciplining authority must submit a copy of the
complaint to the department of health's adverse health events and
incident notification and reporting system, which information shall be
used as necessary by the department in conducting investigations under
RCW 70.56.030.
(3) If the disciplining authority determines that a complaint
submitted under subsection (1) of this section merits investigation, or
if the disciplining authority has reason to believe, without a formal
complaint, that a license holder or applicant may have engaged in
unprofessional conduct, the disciplining authority shall investigate to
determine whether there has been unprofessional conduct. In
determining whether or not to investigate, the disciplining authority
shall consider any prior complaints received by the disciplining
authority, any prior findings of fact under RCW 18.130.110, any
stipulations to informal disposition under RCW 18.130.172, and any
comparable action taken by other state disciplining authorities.
(((3))) (4) Notwithstanding subsection (((2))) (3) of this section,
the disciplining authority shall initiate an investigation in every
instance where:
(a) The disciplining authority receives information that a health
care provider has been disqualified from participating in the federal
medicare program, under Title XVIII of the federal social security act,
or the federal medicaid program, under Title XIX of the federal social
security act; or
(b) There is a pattern of complaints, arrests, or other actions
that may not have resulted in a formal adjudication of wrongdoing, but
when considered together demonstrate a pattern of similar conduct that,
without investigation, likely poses a risk to the safety of the license
holder's patients.
(((4))) (5) Failure of a license holder to submit a mandatory
report to the disciplining authority under subsection (1)(b) of this
section is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred
dollars and constitutes unprofessional conduct.
(((5))) (6) If a report has been made by a hospital to the
department under RCW 70.41.210 or an ambulatory surgical facility under
RCW 70.230.120, a report to the disciplining authority under subsection
(1)(b) of this section is not required.
(((6))) (7) A person is immune from civil liability, whether direct
or derivative, for providing information in good faith to the
disciplining authority under this section.
(((7))) (8)(a) The secretary is authorized to receive criminal
history record information that includes nonconviction data for any
purpose associated with the investigation or licensing of persons under
this chapter.
(b) Dissemination or use of nonconviction data for purposes other
than that authorized in this section is prohibited.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.56.030 and 2009 c 495 s 13 and 2009 c 488 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Receive and investigate, where necessary, notifications and
reports of adverse events, including root cause analyses and corrective
action plans submitted as part of reports and relevant complaint
information submitted under RCW 18.130.080, and communicate to
individual facilities the department's conclusions, if any, regarding
an adverse event reported by a facility; and
(b) Adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter.
(2) The department may enforce the reporting requirements of RCW
70.56.020 using its existing enforcement authority provided in chapter
18.46 RCW for childbirth centers, chapter 70.41 RCW for hospitals, and
chapter 71.12 RCW for psychiatric hospitals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2012, medical facilities must submit an
annual fee of one thousand dollars to the department in order to fund
the adverse health events and incident notification system. This fee
must be used by the department for oversight and enforcement activities
as well as investigations conducted under this chapter.
(2) Fees collected under this section must be deposited into the
health professions account in RCW 43.70.320.
(3) The department may adopt rules to implement this section and
may adjust the fee under subsection (1) of this section annually for
inflation if deemed necessary by the department.

--- END ---