BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Washington state has some of the most
desirable cruising waters in the world for pleasure boaters and
especially large yachts. It is beneficial to employment and the
economy to encourage boaters to call Washington their home port. A
larger yacht will contribute significant revenue to the local community
in which it is moored. Job losses in the marine industry have been
significant because pleasure boaters have moved their vessels out of
the state to other states and countries. The state also loses out by
losing the associated sales and use tax revenue from the purchase of
these vessels.
(2) The legislature finds that passage of this act will save jobs
and increase employment as Washington once again becomes a destination
for boaters.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 applies only up to three
hundred thousand dollars of the selling price of a vessel. Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, any amount above three
hundred thousand dollars is not subject to the tax imposed in RCW
82.08.020.
(2) A buyer claiming a partial exemption under subsection (1) of
this section for the purchase of a watercraft is liable for the
additional tax imposed under RCW 82.08.020 on that portion of the
selling price of the watercraft that exceeds three hundred thousand
dollars, if the watercraft is used in a manner inconsistent with the
definition of vessel in this section. The buyer must pay the
additional tax due under this subsection (2), along with any applicable
penalties and interest under chapter 82.32 RCW, directly to the
department. For purposes of the tax imposed under this subsection, the
limitation period on assessments in RCW 82.32.050 begins to run from
the date that the watercraft is first used in a manner inconsistent
with the definition of vessel in this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "vessel" means every
privately owned watercraft used or capable of being used as a means of
transportation on the water, other than a seaplane, and that is used
solely for personal purposes and is not required to be listed and
assessed as provided in RCW 84.40.065.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.0266 and 1999 c 358 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 ((shall)) does not apply to sales
to nonresidents of this state ((for use outside of this state)) of
watercraft requiring coast guard registration or registration by the
state of principal use according to the Federal Boating Act of 1958,
even though delivery be made within this state, but only when:
(1)(a) The watercraft will not be used within this state for more
than forty-five days; and
(((2))) (b) An appropriate exemption certificate supported by
identification ascertaining residence as required by the department of
revenue and signed by the purchaser or ((his)) the purchaser's agent
establishing the fact that the purchaser is a nonresident and that the
watercraft is for use outside of this state, a copy of which ((shall be
retained by the dealer)) the dealer must retain; or
(2) The buyer has purchased a nonresident/visitor annual permit as
provided in section 10 of this act for the vessel. Sellers making tax
exempt sales under this subsection must retain a copy of the buyer's
nonresident/visitor annual permit.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.08.02665 and 1999 c 358 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of vessels
to residents of foreign countries ((for use outside of this state, even
though delivery is made within this state)), but only if:
(1)(a) The vessel will not be used within this state for more than
forty-five days; and
(((2))) (b) An appropriate exemption certificate supported by
identification as required by the department of revenue and signed by
the purchaser or the purchaser's agent establishes the fact that the
purchaser is a resident of a foreign country and that the vessel is for
use outside of this state. A copy of the exemption certificate is to
be retained by the dealer; or
(2) The buyer has purchased a nonresident/visitor annual permit as
provided in section 10 of this act for the vessel. Sellers making tax
exempt sales under this subsection must retain a copy of the buyer's
nonresident/visitor annual permit.
(3)(a) As used in this section, except as otherwise provided in (b)
of this subsection, "vessel" means every watercraft used or capable of
being used as a means of transportation on the water, other than a
seaplane.
(b) For purposes of the exemption provided in subsection (2) of
this section, "vessel" has the same meaning as in section 2 of this
act.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.08.700 and 2010 c 106 s 219 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to nonresident
individuals of vessels thirty feet or longer if an individual
purchasing a vessel purchases and displays a valid use permit.
(2) The exemption provided in this section does not apply to the
sale of a vessel, as defined in section 2 of this act, if the selling
price exceeds three hundred thousand dollars.
(3)(a) An individual claiming exemption from retail sales tax under
this section must display proof of his or her current nonresident
status at the time of purchase.
(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident individual's status includes
one piece of identification such as a valid driver's license from the
jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid
identification card that has a photograph of the holder and is issued
by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification under this subsection
(((2))) (3)(b) must show the holder's residential address and have as
one of its legal purposes the establishment of residency in that out-of-state jurisdiction.
(((3))) (4) Nothing in this section requires the vessel dealer to
make tax exempt retail sales to nonresidents. A dealer may choose to
make sales to nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount
of sales tax collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If
the dealer chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting
the sales tax, the vendor must examine the proof of nonresidence,
determine whether the proof is acceptable under subsection (((2)))
(3)(b) of this section, and maintain records for each nontaxable sale
that shows the type of proof accepted, including any identification
numbers where appropriate, and the expiration date, if any.
(((4))) (5) A vessel dealer ((shall)) must issue a use permit to a
buyer if the dealer is satisfied that the buyer is a nonresident. The
use permit must be in a form and manner required by the department and
must include an affidavit, signed by the purchaser, declaring that the
vessel will be used in a manner consistent with this section. The fee
for the issuance of a use permit is five hundred dollars for vessels
fifty feet in length or less and eight hundred dollars for vessels
greater than fifty feet in length. Funds collected under this section
and RCW 82.12.700 must be reported on the dealer's excise tax return
and remitted to the department in accordance with RCW 82.32.045. The
department must transmit the fees to the state treasurer to be
deposited in the state general fund. The use permit must be displayed
on the vessel and is valid for twelve consecutive months from the date
of issuance. A use permit is not renewable. A purchaser at the time
of purchase must make an irrevocable election to take the exemption
authorized in this section or the exemption in either RCW 82.08.0266 or
82.08.02665. A vessel dealer must maintain a copy of the use permit
for the dealer's records. Vessel dealers must provide copies of use
permits issued by the dealer under this section and RCW 82.12.700 to
the department on a quarterly basis.
(((5))) (6) A nonresident who claims an exemption under this
section and who uses a vessel in this state after his or her use permit
for that vessel has expired is liable for the tax imposed under RCW
82.08.020 on the original selling price of the vessel and must pay the
tax directly to the department. Interest at the rate provided in RCW
82.32.050 applies to amounts due under this subsection, retroactively
to the date the vessel was purchased, and accrues until the full amount
of tax due is paid to the department.
(((6))) (7) Any vessel dealer who makes sales without collecting
the tax to a person who does not hold valid identification establishing
out-of-state residency, and any dealer who fails to maintain records of
sales to nonresidents as provided in this section, is personally liable
for the amount of tax due.
(((7))) (8) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration of the
fee imposed in this section and RCW 82.12.700.
(((8))) (9) A vessel dealer that issues use permits under this
section and RCW 82.12.700 must file with the department all returns in
an electronic format as provided or approved by the department. As
used in this subsection, "returns" has the same meaning as "return" in
RCW 82.32.050.
(a) Any return required to be filed in an electronic format under
this subsection is not filed until received by the department in an
electronic format provided or approved by the department.
(b) The electronic filing requirement in this subsection ends when
a vessel dealer no longer issues use permits, and the dealer has
electronically filed all of its returns reporting the fees collected
under this section and RCW 82.12.700.
(c) The department may waive the electronic filing requirement in
this subsection for good cause shown.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed in RCW 82.12.020 applies only up to three
hundred thousand dollars of the value of the vessel used. Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, the value of a vessel that
is above three hundred thousand dollars is not subject to the tax
imposed in RCW 82.12.020.
(2) A taxpayer claiming a partial exemption under subsection (1) of
this section for the use of a watercraft is liable for the additional
tax imposed under RCW 82.12.020 on that portion of the value of the
watercraft used that exceeds three hundred thousand dollars, including
any applicable penalties and interest under chapter 82.32 RCW, if the
watercraft is used in a manner inconsistent with the definition of
vessel in this section. This subsection does not apply to a taxpayer
with respect to the use of a watercraft, if the taxpayer is subject to
the additional tax due in section 2(2) of this act with respect to the
watercraft. For purposes of the tax imposed under this subsection, the
limitation period on assessments in RCW 82.32.050 begins to run from
the date that the watercraft is first used in a manner inconsistent
with the definition of vessel in this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "vessel" has the same meaning
as in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax imposed under RCW 82.12.020 does not apply to the use
of a vessel, as defined in section 2 of this act, so long as:
(a) The vessel is used solely for the personal use of the owner;
and
(b) The owner has a valid nonresident/visitor annual permit under
section 10 of this act for the vessel. The nonresident/visitor annual
permit must be obtained within sixty days of the first use of the
vessel on Washington waters or of the first use of the vessel on
Washington waters after the expiration of the previous
nonresident/visitor annual permit obtained for the vessel.
(2) If a taxpayer becomes ineligible for the exemption in
subsection (1) of this section, the limitation period on assessments in
RCW 82.32.050 begins to run from the date that either of the conditions
in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section are not met.

Sec. 8 RCW 82.12.700 and 2007 c 22 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of a
vessel thirty feet or longer if a nonresident individual:
(a) Purchased the vessel from a vessel dealer in accordance with
RCW 82.08.700;
(b) Purchased the vessel in the state from a person other than a
vessel dealer, but the nonresident individual purchases and displays a
valid use permit from a vessel dealer under this section within
fourteen days of the date that the vessel is purchased in this state;
or
(c) Acquired the vessel outside the state, but purchases and
displays a valid use permit from a vessel dealer under this section
within fourteen days of the date that the vessel is first brought into
this state.
(2) The exemption provided in subsection (1) of this section does
not apply to the use of a vessel, as defined in section 2 of this act,
if the value of the vessel used exceeds three hundred thousand dollars.
(3) Any vessel dealer that makes tax exempt sales under RCW
82.08.700 ((shall)) must issue use permits under this section. A
vessel dealer shall issue a use permit under this section if the dealer
is satisfied that the individual purchasing the permit is a
nonresident. The use permit is valid for twelve consecutive months
from the date of issuance. A use permit is not renewable, and an
individual may only purchase one use permit for a particular vessel.
A person who has been issued a use permit under RCW 82.08.700 for a
particular vessel may not purchase a use permit under this section for
the same vessel after the use permit issued under RCW 82.08.700
expires. All other requirements and conditions, not inconsistent with
the provisions of this section, relating to use permits in RCW
82.08.700, apply to use permits under this section. A person may not
claim an exemption under RCW 82.12.0251(1) within twenty-four months
after a use permit, issued under this section or RCW 82.08.700, for the
same vessel, has expired.
(((3))) (4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a
nonresident who claims an exemption under this section and who uses a
vessel in this state after his or her use permit for that vessel has
expired is liable for the tax imposed under RCW 82.12.020 based on the
value of the vessel at the time that the vessel was either purchased in
this state under circumstances in which the exemption under RCW
82.08.700 did not apply or was first brought into this state, as the
case may be. Interest at the rate provided in RCW 82.32.050 applies to
amounts due under this subsection, retroactively to the date that the
vessel was purchased in this state or first brought into the state, and
accrues until the full amount of tax due is paid to the department.
(b) A nonresident individual who is exempt under both this section
and RCW 82.08.700 and who uses a vessel in this state after his or her
use permit for that vessel expires is liable for tax and interest as
provided in RCW 82.08.700(((5))) (6).
(((4))) (5) Any vessel dealer that issues a use permit to an
individual who does not hold valid identification establishing out-of-state residency, and any dealer that fails to maintain records for each
use permit issued that shows the type of proof accepted, including any
identification numbers where appropriate, and the expiration date, if
any, is personally liable for the amount of tax due.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of a local sales tax imposed under the authority
of this chapter, RCW 81.104.170, or any other provision of law on the
sale of a vessel, the tax applies in the same manner as in section 2 of
this act.
(2) For purposes of a local use tax imposed under the authority of
this chapter, RCW 81.104.170, or any other provision of law on the use
of a vessel, the tax applies in the same manner as in section 6 of this
act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "vessel" has the same meaning
as in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
a vessel owner may purchase a nonresident/visitor annual permit if the
vessel:
(a) Is currently registered or numbered under the provisions of RCW
88.02.570; and
(b) Will be used on Washington state waters solely for the personal
use of the owner for no longer than twelve consecutive months.
(2) Solely for the purposes of this section, "vessel" means the
same as provided in section 2 of this act.
(3) A nonresident/visitor annual permit may be obtained from the
department, county auditor, or other agent or subagent appointed by the
director. The nonresident/visitor annual permit:
(a) Must show the date the vessel first came into Washington state;
and
(b) Is valid for one year.
(4) The department, county auditor, or other agent or subagent
appointed by the director must collect the fee required in RCW
88.02.640(1)(m) when issuing a nonresident/visitor annual permit. The
fee must be calculated by using the same methods used to calculate the
tax under chapter 82.49 RCW.
(5) A nonresident/visitor annual permit is not required under this
section if the vessel is used in conducting temporary business activity
within Washington state.
(6) The department must adopt rules to implement this section,
including rules on issuing and displaying the nonresident/visitor
annual permit.

Sec. 11 RCW 88.02.570 and 2010 c 161 s 1018 are each amended to
read as follows:
Vessel registration is required under this chapter except for the
following:
(1) A military vessel owned by the United States government;
(2) A public vessel owned by the United States government, unless
the vessel is a type used for recreation;
(3) A vessel clearly identified as being:
(a) Owned by a state, county, or city; and
(b) Used primarily for governmental purposes;
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection (4),
a vessel either (((a))) (i) registered or numbered under the laws of a
country other than the United States or (((b))) (ii) having a valid
United States customs service cruising license issued pursuant to 19
C.F.R. Sec. 4.94. Either vessel is exempt from registration only for
the first sixty days of use on Washington state waters. On or before
the sixty-first day of use on Washington state waters, any vessel in
the state under this subsection must obtain a vessel visitor permit as
required under RCW 88.02.610;
(b) A vessel, as defined in section 2 of this act, for which the
owner is issued a nonresident/visitor annual permit under section 10 of
this act and registered under RCW 88.02.550;
(5)(a) A vessel that is currently registered or numbered under the
laws of the state of principal operation or that has been issued a
valid number under federal law. However, either vessel must be
registered in Washington state if the state of principal operation
changes to Washington state by the sixty-first day after the vessel
arrives in Washington state;
(b) A vessel, as defined in section 2 of this act, for which the
owner is issued a nonresident/visitor annual permit under section 10 of
this act and registered under RCW 88.02.550;
(6)(a) A vessel owned by a nonresident if:
(((a))) (i) The vessel is located upon the waters of this state
exclusively for repairs, alteration, or reconstruction, or any testing
related to these services;
(((b))) (ii) An employee of the facility providing these services
is on board the vessel during any testing; and
(((c))) (iii) The nonresident files an affidavit with the
department of revenue by the sixty-first day verifying that the vessel
is located upon the waters of this state for these services.
(b) The nonresident ((shall)) must continue to file an affidavit
every sixty days thereafter, as long as the vessel is located upon the
waters of this state exclusively for repairs, alteration,
reconstruction, or testing;
(7) A vessel equipped with propulsion machinery of less than ten
horsepower that:
(a) Is owned by the owner of a vessel for which a valid vessel
number has been issued;
(b) Displays the number of that numbered vessel followed by the
suffix "1" in the manner prescribed by the department; and
(c) Is used as a tender for direct transportation between the
numbered vessel and the shore and for no other purpose;
(8) A vessel under sixteen feet in overall length that has no
propulsion machinery of any type or that is not used on waters subject
to the jurisdiction of the United States or on the high seas beyond the
territorial seas for vessels owned in the United States and are powered
by propulsion machinery of ten or less horsepower;
(9) A vessel with no propulsion machinery of any type for which the
primary mode of propulsion is human power;
(10) A vessel primarily engaged in commerce that has or is required
to have a valid marine document as a vessel of the United States. A
commercial vessel that the department of revenue determines has the
external appearance of a vessel that would otherwise be required to
register under this chapter, must display decals issued annually by the
department of revenue that indicate the vessel's exempt status;
(11) A vessel primarily engaged in commerce that is owned by a
resident of a country other than the United States;
(12)(a) A vessel owned by a nonresident natural person brought into
the state for use or enjoyment while temporarily within the state for
not more than six months in any continuous twelve-month period that
(((a))) (i) is currently registered or numbered under the laws of the
state of principal use or (((b))) (ii) has been issued a valid number
under federal law. This type of vessel is exempt from registration
only for the first sixty days of use on Washington state waters. On or
before the sixty-first day of use on Washington state waters, any
vessel under this subsection must obtain a nonresident vessel permit as
required under RCW 88.02.620;
(b) A vessel, as defined in section 2 of this act, for which the
owner is issued a nonresident/visitor annual permit under section 10 of
this act and registered under RCW 88.02.550;
(13) A vessel used in this state by a nonresident individual
possessing a valid use permit issued under RCW 82.08.700 or 82.12.700;
and
(14) A vessel held for sale by any licensed dealer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 88.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A marina that leases permanent moorage to vessels must require
the following information from the lessee as a condition of leasing
moorage space:
(a) The name of the legal owner of the vessel;
(b) A local contact person, if different than the owner;
(c) The owner's address and telephone number;
(d) The vessel's hull identification number;
(e) The vessel's coast guard registration (if applicable);
(f) The vessel's home port;
(g) The date on which the moorage lease began; and
(h) The vessel's country or state of registration and registration
number.
(2) A marina must maintain records of the information required
under subsection (1) of this section for at least two years. The
marina must permit any authorized agent of the department or the
department of revenue to inspect these records upon request.
(3) A marina that leases permanent moorage to vessels must require
proof of vessel registration or a written statement of intent to
register a vessel as a condition of leasing moorage space. If the
applicant's vessel is not registered in this state, the marina must
inform the moorage applicant of the state law requiring vessel
registration and direct the moorage applicant to the appropriate vessel
registration forms. After being informed by the marina of the
registration requirements, it is the moorage applicant's responsibility
to register the vessel.

Sec. 13 RCW 88.02.610 and 2010 c 161 s 1026 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
a vessel owner ((shall)) must apply for a vessel visitor permit if the
vessel is:
(a) Currently registered or numbered under the laws of a country
other than the United States or has a valid United States customs
service cruising license issued under 19 C.F.R. Sec. 4.94; and
(b) Being used on Washington state waters for the personal use of
the owner for more than sixty days.
(2) The vessel visitor permit provided in this section does not
apply to a vessel as defined in section 2 of this act.
(3) A vessel visitor permit:
(a) May be obtained from the department, county auditor or other
agent, or subagent appointed by the director;
(b) Must show the date the vessel first came into Washington state;
and
(c) Is valid as long as the vessel remains currently registered or
numbered under the laws of a country other than the United States or
the United States customs service cruising license remains valid.
(((3))) (4) The department, county auditor or other agent, or
subagent appointed by the director ((shall)) must collect the fee
required in RCW 88.02.640(1)(l) when issuing a vessel visitor permit.
(((4))) (5) The department ((shall)) must adopt rules to implement
this section, including rules on issuing and displaying the vessel
visitor permit.

Sec. 14 RCW 88.02.620 and 2010 c 161 s 1027 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
a vessel owner who is a nonresident natural person ((shall)) must apply
for a nonresident vessel permit on or before the sixty-first day of use
in Washington state if the vessel:
(a) Is currently registered or numbered under the laws of the state
of principal operation or has been issued a valid number under federal
law; and
(b) Has been brought into Washington state for personal use for not
more than six months in any continuous twelve-month period.
(2) The nonresident vessel permit provided in this section does not
apply to a vessel as defined in section 2 of this act.
(3) A nonresident vessel permit:
(a) May be obtained from the department, county auditor or other
agent, or subagent appointed by the director;
(b) Must show the date the vessel first came into Washington state;
and
(c) Is valid for two months.
(((3))) (4) The department, county auditor or other agent, or
subagent appointed by the director ((shall)) must collect the fee
required in RCW 88.02.640(1)(g) when issuing nonresident vessel
permits.
(((4))) (5) A nonresident vessel permit is not required under this
section if the vessel is used in conducting temporary business activity
within Washington state.
(((5))) (6) The department ((shall)) must adopt rules to implement
this section, including rules on issuing and displaying the nonresident
vessel permit.

Sec. 15 RCW 88.02.640 and 2010 c 161 s 1028 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other fees and taxes required by law, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director ((shall)) must charge the following vessel fees:

FEE AMOUNT AUTHORITY DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary permit $5.00 RCW 88.02.800(2) General fund

(b) Derelict vessel and
invasive species removal Subsection (3) of this
section Subsections (3) and (4) of
this section Subsection (3) of this
section

(c) Duplicate registration $1.25 RCW 88.02.590(1)(c) General fund

(d) Filing RCW 46.17.005 RCW 46.17.005 RCW 46.68.440

(e) License plate
technology RCW 46.17.015 RCW 46.17.015 RCW 46.68.400

(f) License service RCW 46.17.025 RCW 46.17.025 RCW 46.68.220

(g) Nonresident vessel
permit $25.00 RCW 88.02.620(((3))) (4) Subsection (6) of this
section

(h) Registration $10.50 RCW 88.02.560(2) General fund

(i) Replacement decal $1.25 RCW 88.02.595(1)(c) General fund

(j) Title application $5.00 RCW 88.02.515 General fund

(k) Transfer $1.00 RCW 88.02.560(7) General fund

(l) Vessel visitor permit $30.00 RCW 88.02.610(((3))) (4) General fund

(m) Nonresident/visitor
annual permit .5% of the fair market value
of the vessel Section 10 of this act General fund

(2) The five dollar dealer temporary permit fee required in
subsection (1) of this section must be credited to the payment of
registration fees at the time application for registration is made.
(3)(a) Until June 30, 2012, the derelict vessel and invasive
species removal fee required in subsection (1) of this section is five
dollars and must be distributed as follows:
(i) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the aquatic
invasive species prevention account created in RCW 77.12.879;
(ii) One dollar must be deposited into the freshwater aquatic algae
control account created in RCW 43.21A.667;
(iii) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic invasive
species enforcement account created in RCW 43.43.400; and
(iv) Two dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal
account created in RCW 79.100.100.
(b) On and after June 30, 2012, the derelict vessel and invasive
species removal fee is two dollars and must be deposited into the
derelict vessel removal account created in RCW 79.100.100. If the
department of natural resources indicates that the balance of the
derelict vessel removal account, not including any transfer or
appropriation of funds into the account or funds deposited into the
account collected under subsection (5) of this section reaches one
million dollars as of March 1st of any year, the collection of the two
dollar derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee must be
suspended for the following fiscal year.
(4) Until January 1, 2014, an annual derelict vessel removal
surcharge of one dollar must be charged with each vessel registration.
The surcharge:
(a) Is to address the significant backlog of derelict vessels
accumulated in Washington state waters that pose a threat to the health
and safety of the people and to the environment;
(b) Is to be used only for the removal of vessels that are less
than seventy-five feet in length; and
(c) Must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal account
created in RCW 79.100.100.
(5) The twenty-five dollar nonresident vessel permit fee must be
paid by the vessel owner to the department for the cost of providing
the identification document by the department. Any moneys remaining
from the fee after the payment of costs must be allocated to counties
by the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW
88.02.655.
(6) The thirty dollar vessel visitor permit fee must be distributed
as follows:
(a) Five dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal
account created in RCW 79.100.100;
(b) The department may keep an amount to cover costs for providing
the vessel visitor permit;
(c) Any moneys remaining must be allocated to counties by the state
treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.655; and
(d) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW 46.17.005 are
in addition to any other fee or tax due for the titling and
registration of vessels.

Sec. 16 RCW 82.49.020 and 1984 c 250 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following are exempt from the tax imposed under this chapter:
(1) Vessels exempt from the registration requirements of chapter
88.02 RCW, except as provided in subsection (7) of this section;
(2) Vessels used exclusively for commercial fishing purposes;
(3) Vessels under sixteen feet in overall length;
(4) Vessels owned and operated by the United States, a state of the
United States, or any municipality or political subdivision thereof;
(5) Vessels owned by a nonprofit organization or association
engaged in character building of boys and girls under eighteen years of
age and solely used for such purposes, as determined by the department
for the purposes of RCW 84.36.030; ((and))
(6) Vessels owned and held for sale by a dealer, but not rented on
a regular commercial basis; and
(7) Vessels, as defined in section 2 of this act, for which the
nonresident owner has purchased a nonresident/visitor annual permit as
provided in section 10 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This act takes effect August 1, 2011.

--- END ---