BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 30.08.025 and 2006 c 48 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, if the
conditions of this section are met, a bank, a trust company, or a
holding company of a bank or a trust company, may be organized as, or
convert to, a limited liability company under the Washington limited
liability company act, chapter 25.15 RCW. As used in this section,
"bank" includes an applicant to become a bank or holding company of a
bank, "trust company" includes an applicant to become a trust company,
and "holding company" means a holding company of a bank or trust
company.
(2)(a) Before a bank, trust company, or holding company may
organize as, or convert to, a limited liability company, the bank,
trust company, or holding company must obtain approval of the director.
(b)(i) To obtain approval under this section from the director, the
bank, trust company, or holding company must file a request for
approval with the director at least ninety days before the day on which
the bank, trust company, or holding company becomes a limited liability
company.
(ii) If the director does not disapprove the request for approval
within ninety days from the day on which the director receives the
request, the request is considered approved.
(iii) When taking action on a request for approval filed under this
section, the director may:
(A) Approve the request;
(B) Approve the request subject to terms and conditions the
director considers necessary; or
(C) Disapprove the request.
(3) To approve a request for approval, the director must find that
the bank, trust company, or holding company:
(a) Will operate in a safe and sound manner; and
(b) Has the following characteristics:
(i) The certificate of formation and limited liability company
require or set forth that the duration of the limited liability company
is perpetual;
(ii) The bank, trust company, or holding company is not otherwise
subject to automatic termination, dissolution, or suspension upon the
happening of some event other than the passage of time;
(iii) The exclusive authority to manage the bank, trust company, or
holding company is vested in a board of managers or directors that:
(A) Is elected or appointed by the owners;
(B) Is not required to have owners of the bank, trust company, or
holding company included on the board;
(C) Possesses adequate independence and authority to supervise the
operation of the bank, trust company, or holding company; and
(D) Operates with substantially the same rights, powers,
privileges, duties, and responsibilities as the board of directors of
a corporation;
(iv) Neither state law, nor the bank's, trust company's, or holding
company's operating agreement, bylaws, or other organizational
documents provide that an owner of the bank, trust company, or holding
company is liable for the debts, liabilities, and obligations of the
bank, trust company, or holding company in excess of the amount of the
owner's investment;
(v) Neither state law, nor the bank's, trust company's, or holding
company's operating agreement, bylaws, or other organizational
documents require the consent of any other owner of the bank, trust
company, or holding company in order for any owner to transfer an
ownership interest in the bank, trust company, or holding company,
including voting rights;
(vi) The bank, trust company, or holding company is able to obtain
new investment funding if needed to maintain adequate capital;
(vii) The bank, trust company, or holding company is able to comply
with all legal and regulatory requirements for a federally insured
depository bank, trust company, or holding company of a federally
insured depository bank, under applicable federal and state law; and
(viii) A bank, trust company, or holding company that is organized
as a limited liability company shall maintain the characteristics
listed in this subsection (3)(b) during such time as it is authorized
to conduct business under this title as a limited liability company.
(4)(a) All rights, privileges, powers, duties, and obligations of
a bank, trust company, or holding company, that is organized as a
limited liability company, and its members and managers are governed by
the Washington limited liability company act, chapter 25.15 RCW,
except:
(i) To the extent chapter 25.15 RCW is in conflict with federal law
or regulation respecting the organization of a federally insured
depository institution as a limited liability company, such federal law
or regulation supersedes the conflicting provisions contained in
chapter 25.15 RCW in relation to a bank, trust company, or holding
company organized as a limited liability company pursuant to this
section; and
(ii) Without limitation, the following are inapplicable to a bank,
trust company, or holding company organized as a limited liability
company:
(A) Permitting automatic dissolution or suspension of a limited
liability company as set forth in RCW 25.15.270(1), pursuant to a
statement of limited duration which, though impermissible under
subsection (3)(b)(i) of this section, has been provided for in a
certificate of formation;
(B) Permitting automatic dissolution or suspension of a limited
liability company, pursuant to the limited liability company agreement,
as set forth in RCW 25.15.270(2);
(C) Permitting dissolution of the limited liability company
agreement based upon agreement of all the members, as set forth in RCW
25.l5.270(3);
(D) Permitting dissociation of all the members of the limited
liability company, as set forth in RCW 25.l5.270(4); and
(E) Permitting automatic dissolution or suspension of a limited
liability company, pursuant to operation of law, as otherwise set forth
in chapter 25.15 RCW.
(b) Notwithstanding (a) of this subsection:
(i) For purposes of transferring a member's interests in the bank,
trust company, or holding company, a member's interest in the bank,
trust company, or holding company is treated like a share of stock in
a corporation; and
(ii) If a member's interest in the bank, trust company, or holding
company is transferred voluntarily or involuntarily to another person,
the person who receives the member's interest obtains the member's
entire rights associated with the member's interest in the bank, trust
company, or holding company including((,)) all economic rights and all
voting rights.
(c) A bank, trust company, or holding company may not by agreement
or otherwise change the application of (a) of this subsection to the
bank, trust company, or holding company.
(5)(a) Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 25.15 RCW or this
section to the contrary, all voting members remain liable and
responsible as fiduciaries of a bank, trust company, or holding company
organized as a limited liability company, regardless of resignation,
dissociation, or disqualification, to the same extent that directors of
a bank, trust company, or holding company organized as a corporation
would be or remain liable or responsible to the department and
applicable federal banking regulators; and
(b) If death, incapacity, or disqualification of all members of the
limited liability company would result in a complete dissociation of
all members, then the bank ((or)), trust company, holding company, or
((both)) all three, as applicable is deemed nonetheless to remain in
existence for purposes of the department or an applicable federal
regulator, or both, having standing under RCW 30.44.270 or applicable
federal law, or both, to exercise the powers and authorities of a
receiver for the bank, trust company, or holding company.
(6) For the purposes of this section, and unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, for the purpose of applying chapter 25.15
RCW to a bank, trust company, or holding company organized as a limited
liability company:
(a) "Articles of incorporation" includes a limited liability
company's certificate of formation, as that term is used in RCW
25.15.005(1) and 25.15.070, and a limited liability company agreement
as that term is used in RCW 25.15.005(5);
(b) "Board of directors" includes one or more persons who have,
with respect to a bank, trust company, or holding company described in
subsection (1) of this section, authority that is substantially similar
to that of a board of directors of a corporation;
(c) "Bylaws" includes a limited liability company agreement as that
term is defined in RCW 25.15.005(5);
(d) "Corporation" includes a limited liability company organized
under chapter 25.15 RCW;
(e) "Director" includes any of the following of a limited liability
company:
(i) A manager;
(ii) A director; or
(iii) Other person who has, with respect to the bank, trust
company, or holding company described in subsection (1) of this
section, authority substantially similar to that of a director of a
corporation;
(f) "Dividend" includes distributions made by a limited liability
company under RCW 25.15.215;
(g) "Incorporator" includes the person or persons executing the
certificate of formation as provided in RCW 25.15.085(1);
(h) "Officer" includes any of the following of a bank, trust
company, or holding company:
(i) An officer; or
(ii) Other person who has, with respect to the bank, trust company,
or holding company, authority substantially similar to that of an
officer of a corporation;
(i) "Security," "shares," or "stock" of a corporation includes a
membership interest in a limited liability company and any certificate
or other evidence of an ownership interest in a limited liability
company; and
(j) "Stockholder" or "shareholder" includes an owner of an equity
interest in a bank, trust company, or holding company, including a
member as defined in RCW 25.15.005(8) and 25.15.115.

--- END ---