BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that state
agencies dispose of state-owned lands when these lands cannot be
advantageously used by the agency or when dispositions are beneficial
to the public's interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department of natural resources
established in chapter 43.30 RCW, the department of fish and wildlife
established in chapter 43.300 RCW, and the parks and recreation
commission established in chapter 79A.05 RCW must identify and list
property that is no longer required for their departmental purposes.
(2) By November 1, 2012, the agencies listed in subsection (1) of
this section must sell the property identified that is no longer
required for departmental purposes.
(3) Unless otherwise provided, all moneys received pursuant to the
provisions of this section, less any real estate transaction fees, must
be deposited in the appropriate agency accounts to be used for
maintenance and operation of department lands.

Sec. 3 RCW 79.64.030 and 2003 c 334 s 521 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Funds in the resource management cost account from the moneys
received from leases, sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements,
and rights-of-way issued by the department and affecting school lands,
university lands, scientific school lands, normal school lands, capitol
building lands, or institutional lands shall be pooled and expended by
the department solely for the purpose of defraying the costs and
expenses necessarily incurred in managing and administering all of the
trust lands enumerated in this section. Such funds may be used for
similar costs and expenses in managing and administering other lands
managed by the department provided that such expenditures that have
been or may be made on such other lands shall be repaid to the resource
management cost account together with interest at a rate determined by
the board.
(2) Moneys collected from the sale of land in section 2 of this act
must be dedicated to operations and maintenance of department lands.
(3) Costs and expenses necessarily incurred in managing and
administering agricultural college lands shall not be deducted from
proceeds received from the sale of such lands or from the sale of
resources that are part of the lands. Costs and expenses incurred in
managing and administering agricultural college trust lands shall be
funded by appropriation under RCW 79.64.090.
(4) An accounting shall be made annually of the accrued
expenditures from the pooled trust funds in the account. In the event
the accounting determines that expenditures have been made from moneys
received from trust lands for the benefit of other lands, such
expenditure shall be considered a debt and an encumbrance against the
property benefitted, including state forest lands. The results of the
accounting shall be reported to the legislature at the next regular
session. The state treasurer is authorized, upon request of the
department, to transfer funds between the forest development account
and the resource management cost account solely for purpose of repaying
loans pursuant to this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 79A.05.215 and 2010 c 161 s 1164 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state parks renewal and stewardship account is created in the
state treasury. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all
receipts from user fees, concessions, leases, donations collected under
RCW 46.16A.090(3), and other state park-based activities shall be
deposited into the account. Moneys collected from the sale of land in
section 2 of this act must be dedicated to operations and maintenance
of commission lands. Expenditures from the account may be used for
operating state parks, developing and renovating park facilities,
undertaking deferred maintenance, enhancing park stewardship, and other
state park purposes. Expenditures from the account may be made only
after appropriation by the legislature.

Sec. 5 RCW 77.12.170 and 2009 c 333 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife
account which consists of moneys received from:
(a) Rentals or concessions of the department;
(b) The sale of real or personal property held for department
purposes, unless the property is seized or recovered through a fish,
shellfish, or wildlife enforcement action. Moneys collected from the
sale of land in section 2 of this act must be dedicated to operations
and maintenance of department lands;
(c) The assessment of administrative penalties, and the sale of
licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by chapter 77.32 RCW and
RCW 77.65.490, except annual resident adult saltwater and all annual
razor clam and shellfish licenses, which shall be deposited into the
state general fund;
(d) Fees for informational materials published by the department;
(e) Fees for personalized vehicle, Wild on Washington, and
Endangered Wildlife license plates and Washington's Wildlife license
plate collection as provided in chapter ((46.16)) 46.17 RCW;
(f) Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;
(g) Compensation for damage to department property or wildlife
losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received under RCW 77.12.320.
However, this excludes fish and shellfish overages, and court-ordered
restitution or donations associated with any fish, shellfish, or
wildlife enforcement action, as such moneys must be deposited pursuant
to RCW 77.15.425;
(h) Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter
82.27 RCW;
(i) The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles
authorized by the commission; and
(j) The sale of watchable wildlife decals under RCW 77.32.560.
(2) State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in
subsection (1) of this section shall deposit them in the state treasury
to be credited to the state wildlife account.

--- END ---