BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.245.040 and 2009 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The attending physician shall:
(a) Make the initial determination of whether a patient has a
terminal disease, is competent, and has made the request voluntarily;
(b) Request that the patient demonstrate Washington state residency
under RCW 70.245.130;
(c) To ensure that the patient is making an informed decision,
inform the patient of:
(i) His or her medical diagnosis;
(ii) His or her prognosis;
(iii) The potential risks associated with taking the medication to
be prescribed;
(iv) The probable result of taking the medication to be prescribed;
and
(v) The feasible alternatives including, but not limited to,
comfort care, hospice care, and pain control;
(d) Refer the patient to a consulting physician for medical
confirmation of the diagnosis, and for a determination that the patient
is competent and acting voluntarily;
(e) Refer the patient for counseling if appropriate under RCW
70.245.060;
(f) Recommend that the patient notify next of kin;
(g) Counsel the patient about the importance of having another
person present when the patient takes the medication prescribed under
this chapter and of not taking the medication in a public place;
(h) Inform the patient that he or she has an opportunity to rescind
the request at any time and in any manner, and offer the patient an
opportunity to rescind at the end of the fifteen-day waiting period
under RCW 70.245.090;
(i) Verify, immediately before writing the prescription for
medication under this chapter, that the patient is making an informed
decision;
(j) Fulfill the medical record documentation requirements of RCW
70.245.120;
(k) Ensure that all appropriate steps are carried out in accordance
with this chapter before writing a prescription for medication to
enable a qualified patient to end his or her life in a humane and
dignified manner; and
(l)(i) Dispense medications directly, including ancillary
medications intended to facilitate the desired effect to minimize the
patient's discomfort, if the attending physician is authorized under
statute and rule to dispense and has a current drug enforcement
administration certificate; or
(ii) With the patient's written consent:
(A) Contact a pharmacist and inform the pharmacist of the
prescription; and
(B) Deliver the written prescription personally, by mail or
facsimile to the pharmacist, who will dispense the medications directly
to either the patient, the attending physician, or an expressly
identified agent of the patient. Medications dispensed pursuant to
this subsection shall not be dispensed by mail or other form of
courier.
(2) The ((attending)) physician ((may)) who signs the patient's
death certificate ((which)) shall list ((the underlying terminal
disease as)) the cause of death as assisted suicide.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.245.180 and 2009 c 1 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter authorizes a physician or any other
person to end a patient's life by lethal injection, mercy killing, or
active euthanasia. Actions taken in accordance with this chapter
except for filling out the death certificate and for recording accurate
vital statistics do not, for any purpose, constitute suicide, assisted
suicide, mercy killing, or homicide, under the law. State reports
shall ((not)) refer to practice under this chapter as (("suicide" or))
"assisted suicide((.))" or "ingested lethal medication" consistent with
RCW 70.245.010 (((7), (11), and)) (12) ((, 70.245.020(1),
70.245.040(1)(k), 70.245.060, 70.245.070, 70.245.090, 70.245.120 (1)
and (2), 70.245.160 (1) and (2), 70.245.170, 70.245.190(1) (a) and (d),
and 70.245.200(2), state reports shall refer to practice under this
chapter as obtaining and self-administering life-ending medication)).
(2) Nothing contained in this chapter shall be interpreted to lower
the applicable standard of care for the attending physician, consulting
physician, psychiatrist or psychologist, or other health care provider
participating under this chapter.

--- END ---