BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that organ
donation from deceased persons saves lives and reduces suffering for
recipients of all ages. The legislature further finds that waiting
lists for healthy organs continue to grow, creating an urgent need for
increasing organ donation in the state.
(2) A work group is created to study how other states and countries
have developed sustainable programs for increasing organ donation in
their communities. The work group shall consider all strategies that
have been shown to support and promote organ donation including, but
not limited to, donor designation registries, presumed consent, opt-in
and opt-out policies, professional education, and public education.
All costs associated with this work group will be covered by private
donations from interested parties. No state funds may be used to fund
the work group.
(3) The work group must include one representative each from at
least two designated organ procurement organizations, a transplant
center, the Washington medical association, the Washington hospital
association, the Washington funeral directors association, a licensed
eye bank, a licensed tissue bank, and a research institution.
(4) The work group is directed to report to the legislature by
December 30, 2011, with recommendations for increasing organ donations
in Washington state.

--- END ---