BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that technology
effectively integrated into K-12 core subjects will engage and motivate
students to explore high-demand careers, such as engineering,
mathematics, computer science, communication, art, entrepreneurship,
and others; fields in which skilled individuals will create the new
ideas, new products, and new industries of the future; fields that
demand the collaborative information skills and technological fluency
of digital citizenship. The legislature further finds that knowing and
applying the core concepts and principles of mathematics and the
sciences are included in the goals for Washington students but these
learning goals do not include technology and do not acknowledge its
ability to support the development of higher-order thinking skills.
The legislature further finds that given technology's importance in the
high-demand fields of work the state should inspire, engage, and
prepare all students for the technological world.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.150.210 and 2009 c 548 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
A basic education is an evolving program of instruction that is
intended to provide students with the opportunity to become responsible
and respectful global citizens, to contribute to their economic well-being and that of their families and communities, to explore and
understand different perspectives, and to enjoy productive and
satisfying lives. Additionally, the state of Washington intends to
provide for a public school system that is able to evolve and adapt in
order to better focus on strengthening the educational achievement of
all students, which includes high expectations for all students and
gives all students the opportunity to achieve personal and academic
success. To these ends, the goals of each school district, with the
involvement of parents and community members, shall be to provide
opportunities for every student to develop the knowledge and skills
essential to:
(1) Read with comprehension, write effectively, and communicate
successfully in a variety of ways and settings and with a variety of
audiences;
(2) Know and apply the core concepts and principles of mathematics;
social, physical, and life sciences; technology; civics and history,
including different cultures and participation in representative
government; geography; arts; and health and fitness;
(3) Think analytically, logically, and creatively, and to integrate
different experiences and knowledge to form reasoned judgments and
solve problems; and
(4) Understand the importance of work and finance and how
performance, effort, and decisions directly affect future career and
educational opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect September 1, 2011.

--- END ---