BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that:
(1) Health care costs are growing rapidly, exceeding the consumer
price index year after year. Consequently, state health programs are
capturing a growing share of the state budget, even as state revenues
have declined. Sustaining these critical health programs will require
actions to effectively contain health care cost increases in the
future; and
(2) The primary care health home model has been demonstrated to
successfully constrain costs, while improving quality of care. Chronic
care management, occurring within a primary care health home, has been
shown to be especially effective at reducing costs and improving
quality. However, broad adoption of these models has been impeded by
a fee-for-service system that reimburses volume of services and does
not adequately support important primary care health home services,
such as case management and patient outreach. Furthermore, successful
implementation will require a broad adoption effort by private and
public payers, in coordination with providers.
Therefore the legislature intends to promote the adoption of
primary care health homes for children and adults and, within them,
advance the practice of chronic care management to improve health
outcomes and reduce unnecessary costs. To facilitate the best
coordination and patient care, primary care health homes are encouraged
to collaborate with other providers currently outside the medical
insurance model, such as dental providers and senior service providers
like the area agencies on aging. The legislature also intends for the
methods and approach of the primary care health home to become part of
basic primary care medical education.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.09.010 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 8 s 28 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
((As used in this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Children's health program" means the health care services
program provided to children under eighteen years of age and in
households with incomes at or below the federal poverty level as
annually defined by the federal department of health and human services
as adjusted for family size, and who are not otherwise eligible for
medical assistance or the limited casualty program for the medically
needy.
(2) (("Committee" means the children's health services committee
created in section 3 of this act.
(3))) "Chronic care management" means the health care management
within a health home of persons identified with, or at high risk for,
one or more chronic conditions. Effective chronic care management:
(a) Actively assists patients to acquire self-care skills to
improve functioning and health outcomes, and slow the progression of
disease or disability;
(b) Employs evidence-based clinical practices;
(c) Coordinates care across health care settings and providers,
including tracking referrals;
(d) Provides ready access to behavioral health services that are,
to the extent possible, integrated with primary care; and
(e) Uses appropriate community resources to support individual
patients and families in managing chronic conditions.
(3) "Chronic condition" means a prolonged condition and includes,
but is not limited to:
(a) A mental health condition;
(b) A substance use disorder;
(c) Asthma;
(d) Diabetes;
(e) Heart disease; and
(f) Being overweight, as evidenced by a body mass index over
twenty-five.
(4) "County" means the board of county commissioners, county
council, county executive, or tribal jurisdiction, or its designee. A
combination of two or more county authorities or tribal jurisdictions
may enter into joint agreements ((to fulfill the requirements of RCW
74.09.415 through 74.09.435)).
(((4))) (5) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(((5))) (6) "Department of health" means the Washington state
department of health created pursuant to RCW 43.70.020.
(((6))) (7) "Full benefit dual eligible beneficiary" means an
individual who, for any month: Has coverage for the month under a
medicare prescription drug plan or medicare advantage plan with part D
coverage; and is determined eligible by the state for full medicaid
benefits for the month under any eligibility category in the state's
medicaid plan or a section 1115 demonstration waiver that provides
pharmacy benefits.
(((7))) (8) "Health home" means coordinated health care provided by
a licensed primary care provider coordinating all medical care
services, and a multidisciplinary health care team comprised of
clinical and nonclinical staff. At a minimum, primary care health home
services include:
(a) Comprehensive care management including, but not limited to,
chronic care treatment and management;
(b) Extended hours of service;
(c) Multiple ways for patients to communicate with the team,
including electronically and by phone;
(d) Education of patients on self-care, prevention, and health
promotion, including the use of patient decision aids;
(e) Coordinating and assuring smooth transitions and follow-up from
inpatient to other settings;
(f) Individual and family support including authorized
representatives;
(g) The use of information technology to link services, track
tests, generate patient registries, and provide clinical data; and
(h) Ongoing performance reporting and quality improvement.
(9) "Internal management" means the administration of medical
assistance, medical care services, the children's health program, and
the limited casualty program.
(((8))) (10) "Limited casualty program" means the medical care
program provided to medically needy persons as defined under Title XIX
of the federal social security act, and to medically indigent persons
who are without income or resources sufficient to secure necessary
medical services.
(((9))) (11) "Medical assistance" means the federal aid medical
care program provided to categorically needy persons as defined under
Title XIX of the federal social security act.
(((10))) (12) "Medical care services" means the limited scope of
care financed by state funds and provided to disability lifeline
benefits recipients, and recipients of alcohol and drug addiction
services provided under chapter 74.50 RCW.
(((11))) (13) "Multidisciplinary health care team" means an
interdisciplinary team of health professionals which may include, but
is not limited to, medical specialists, nurses, pharmacists,
nutritionists, dieticians, social workers, behavioral and mental health
providers including substance use disorder prevention and treatment
providers, doctors of chiropractic, physical therapists, licensed
complementary and alternative medicine practitioners, and physicians'
assistants.
(14) "Nursing home" means nursing home as defined in RCW 18.51.010.
(((12))) (15) "Poverty" means the federal poverty level determined
annually by the United States department of health and human services,
or successor agency.
(((13))) (16) "Primary care provider" means a general practice
physician, family practitioner, internist, pediatrician, osteopath,
naturopathic physician, and advanced registered nurse practitioner
licensed under Title 18 RCW.
(17) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.70.533 and 2007 c 259 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall conduct a program of training and
technical assistance regarding care of people with chronic conditions
for providers of primary care. The program shall emphasize evidence-based high quality preventive and chronic disease care and shall
collaborate with the health care authority to promote the adoption of
primary care health homes established under this act. The department
may designate one or more chronic conditions to be the subject of the
program.
(2) The training and technical assistance program shall include the
following elements:
(a) Clinical information systems and sharing and organization of
patient data;
(b) Decision support to promote evidence-based care;
(c) Clinical delivery system design;
(d) Support for patients managing their own conditions; and
(e) Identification and use of community resources that are
available in the community for patients and their families.
(3) In selecting primary care providers to participate in the
program, the department shall consider the number and type of patients
with chronic conditions the provider serves, and the provider's
participation in the medicaid program, the basic health plan, and
health plans offered through the public employees' benefits board.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "health home" and "primary
care provider" have the same meaning as in RCW 74.09.010.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.09.522 and 1997 c 59 s 15 and 1997 c 34 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section, "managed health care system"
means any health care organization, including health care providers,
insurers, health care service contractors, health maintenance
organizations, health insuring organizations, or any combination
thereof, that provides directly or by contract health care services
covered under RCW 74.09.520 and rendered by licensed providers, on a
prepaid capitated basis and that meets the requirements of section
1903(m)(1)(A) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or
federal demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI
of the federal social security act.
(2) The department of social and health services shall enter into
agreements with managed health care systems to provide health care
services to recipients of temporary assistance for needy families under
the following conditions:
(a) Agreements shall be made for at least thirty thousand
recipients statewide;
(b) Agreements in at least one county shall include enrollment of
all recipients of temporary assistance for needy families;
(c) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section
1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act or federal
demonstration waivers granted under section 1115(a) of Title XI of the
federal social security act, recipients shall have a choice of systems
in which to enroll and shall have the right to terminate their
enrollment in a system: PROVIDED, That the department may limit
recipient termination of enrollment without cause to the first month of
a period of enrollment, which period shall not exceed twelve months:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department shall not restrict a
recipient's right to terminate enrollment in a system for good cause as
established by the department by rule;
(d) To the extent that this provision is consistent with section
1903(m) of Title XIX of the federal social security act, participating
managed health care systems shall not enroll a disproportionate number
of medical assistance recipients within the total numbers of persons
served by the managed health care systems, except as authorized by the
department under federal demonstration waivers granted under section
1115(a) of Title XI of the federal social security act;
(e) In negotiating with managed health care systems the department
shall adopt a uniform procedure to ((negotiate and)) enter into
contractual arrangements, to be included in contracts issued or renewed
on or after January 1, 2012, including:
(i) Standards regarding the quality of services to be provided;
((and))
(ii) The financial integrity of the responding system;
(iii) Provider reimbursement methods that incentivize chronic care
management within health homes;
(iv) Provider reimbursement methods that reward health homes that,
by using chronic care management, reduce emergency department and
inpatient use; and
(v) Promoting provider participation in the program of training and
technical assistance regarding care of people with chronic conditions
described in RCW 43.70.533, including allocation of funds to support
provider participation in the training, unless the managed care system
is an integrated health delivery system that has programs in place for
chronic care management.
Contracts that include the items in (e)(iii) through (v) of this
subsection must not exceed the rates that would be paid in the absence
of these provisions;
(f) The department shall seek waivers from federal requirements as
necessary to implement this chapter;
(g) The department shall, wherever possible, enter into prepaid
capitation contracts that include inpatient care. However, if this is
not possible or feasible, the department may enter into prepaid
capitation contracts that do not include inpatient care;
(h) The department shall define those circumstances under which a
managed health care system is responsible for out-of-plan services and
assure that recipients shall not be charged for such services; ((and))
(i) Nothing in this section prevents the department from entering
into similar agreements for other groups of people eligible to receive
services under this chapter; and
(j) The department must consult with the federal center for
medicare and medicaid innovation and seek funding opportunities to
support health homes.
(3) The department shall ensure that publicly supported community
health centers and providers in rural areas, who show serious intent
and apparent capability to participate as managed health care systems
are seriously considered as contractors. The department shall
coordinate its managed care activities with activities under chapter
70.47 RCW.
(4) The department shall work jointly with the state of Oregon and
other states in this geographical region in order to develop
recommendations to be presented to the appropriate federal agencies and
the United States congress for improving health care of the poor, while
controlling related costs.
(5) The legislature finds that competition in the managed health
care marketplace is enhanced, in the long term, by the existence of a
large number of managed health care system options for medicaid
clients. In a managed care delivery system, whose goal is to focus on
prevention, primary care, and improved enrollee health status,
continuity in care relationships is of substantial importance, and
disruption to clients and health care providers should be minimized.
To help ensure these goals are met, the following principles shall
guide the department in its healthy options managed health care
purchasing efforts:
(a) All managed health care systems should have an opportunity to
contract with the department to the extent that minimum contracting
requirements defined by the department are met, at payment rates that
enable the department to operate as far below appropriated spending
levels as possible, consistent with the principles established in this
section.
(b) Managed health care systems should compete for the award of
contracts and assignment of medicaid beneficiaries who do not
voluntarily select a contracting system, based upon:
(i) Demonstrated commitment to or experience in serving low-income
populations;
(ii) Quality of services provided to enrollees;
(iii) Accessibility, including appropriate utilization, of services
offered to enrollees;
(iv) Demonstrated capability to perform contracted services,
including ability to supply an adequate provider network;
(v) Payment rates; and
(vi) The ability to meet other specifically defined contract
requirements established by the department, including consideration of
past and current performance and participation in other state or
federal health programs as a contractor.
(c) Consideration should be given to using multiple year
contracting periods.
(d) Quality, accessibility, and demonstrated commitment to serving
low-income populations shall be given significant weight in the
contracting, evaluation, and assignment process.
(e) All contractors that are regulated health carriers must meet
state minimum net worth requirements as defined in applicable state
laws. The department shall adopt rules establishing the minimum net
worth requirements for contractors that are not regulated health
carriers. This subsection does not limit the authority of the
department to take action under a contract upon finding that a
contractor's financial status seriously jeopardizes the contractor's
ability to meet its contract obligations.
(f) Procedures for resolution of disputes between the department
and contract bidders or the department and contracting carriers related
to the award of, or failure to award, a managed care contract must be
clearly set out in the procurement document. In designing such
procedures, the department shall give strong consideration to the
negotiation and dispute resolution processes used by the Washington
state health care authority in its managed health care contracting
activities.
(6) The department may apply the principles set forth in subsection
(5) of this section to its managed health care purchasing efforts on
behalf of clients receiving supplemental security income benefits to
the extent appropriate.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.47.100 and 2009 c 568 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A managed health care system participating in the plan shall do
so by contract with the administrator and shall provide, directly or by
contract with other health care providers, covered basic health care
services to each enrollee covered by its contract with the
administrator as long as payments from the administrator on behalf of
the enrollee are current. A participating managed health care system
may offer, without additional cost, health care benefits or services
not included in the schedule of covered services under the plan. A
participating managed health care system shall not give preference in
enrollment to enrollees who accept such additional health care benefits
or services. Managed health care systems participating in the plan
shall not discriminate against any potential or current enrollee based
upon health status, sex, race, ethnicity, or religion. The
administrator may receive and act upon complaints from enrollees
regarding failure to provide covered services or efforts to obtain
payment, other than authorized copayments, for covered services
directly from enrollees, but nothing in this chapter empowers the
administrator to impose any sanctions under Title 18 RCW or any other
professional or facility licensing statute.
(2) The plan shall allow, at least annually, an opportunity for
enrollees to transfer their enrollments among participating managed
health care systems serving their respective areas. The administrator
shall establish a period of at least twenty days in a given year when
this opportunity is afforded enrollees, and in those areas served by
more than one participating managed health care system the
administrator shall endeavor to establish a uniform period for such
opportunity. The plan shall allow enrollees to transfer their
enrollment to another participating managed health care system at any
time upon a showing of good cause for the transfer.
(3) Prior to negotiating with any managed health care system, the
administrator shall determine, on an actuarially sound basis, the
reasonable cost of providing the schedule of basic health care
services, expressed in terms of upper and lower limits, and recognizing
variations in the cost of providing the services through the various
systems and in different areas of the state.
(4) In negotiating with managed health care systems for
participation in the plan, the administrator shall adopt a uniform
procedure that includes at least the following:
(a) The administrator shall issue a request for proposals,
including standards regarding the quality of services to be provided;
financial integrity of the responding systems; and responsiveness to
the unmet health care needs of the local communities or populations
that may be served;
(b) The administrator shall then review responsive proposals and
may negotiate with respondents to the extent necessary to refine any
proposals;
(c) The administrator may then select one or more systems to
provide the covered services within a local area; and
(d) The administrator may adopt a policy that gives preference to
respondents, such as nonprofit community health clinics, that have a
history of providing quality health care services to low-income
persons.
(5)(a) The administrator may contract with a managed health care
system to provide covered basic health care services to subsidized
enrollees, nonsubsidized enrollees, health coverage tax credit eligible
enrollees, or any combination thereof. At a minimum, such contracts
issued on or after January 1, 2012, must include:
(i) Provider reimbursement methods that incentivize chronic care
management within health homes;
(ii) Provider reimbursement methods that reward health homes that,
by using chronic care management, reduce emergency department and
inpatient use; and
(iii) Promoting provider participation in the program of training
and technical assistance regarding care of people with chronic
conditions described in RCW 43.70.533, including allocation of funds to
support provider participation in the training unless the managed care
system is an integrated health delivery system that has programs in
place for chronic care management.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "chronic care management,"
"chronic condition," and "health home" have the same meaning as in RCW
74.09.010.
(c) Contracts that include the items in (a)(i) through (iii) of
this subsection must not exceed the rates that would be paid in the
absence of these provisions.
(6) The administrator may establish procedures and policies to
further negotiate and contract with managed health care systems
following completion of the request for proposal process in subsection
(4) of this section, upon a determination by the administrator that it
is necessary to provide access, as defined in the request for proposal
documents, to covered basic health care services for enrollees.
(7) The administrator may implement a self-funded or self-insured
method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized enrollees, as
provided under RCW 41.05.140. Prior to implementing a self-funded or
self-insured method, the administrator shall ensure that funding
available in the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account is
sufficient for the self-funded or self-insured risk assumed, or
expected to be assumed, by the administrator. If implementing a self-funded or self-insured method, the administrator may request funds to
be moved from the basic health plan trust account or the basic health
plan subscription account to the basic health plan self-insurance
reserve account established in RCW 41.05.140.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.05.021 and 2009 c 537 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state health care authority is created within
the executive branch. The authority shall have an administrator
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The
administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The
administrator may employ up to seven staff members, who shall be exempt
from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are
necessary to administer this chapter. The administrator may delegate
any power or duty vested in him or her by this chapter, including
authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings
conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The primary duties of the authority
shall be to: Administer state employees' insurance benefits and
retired or disabled school employees' insurance benefits; administer
the basic health plan pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; study state-purchased health care programs in order to maximize cost containment in
these programs while ensuring access to quality health care; implement
state initiatives, joint purchasing strategies, and techniques for
efficient administration that have potential application to all state-purchased health services; and administer grants that further the
mission and goals of the authority. The authority's duties include,
but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To administer health care benefit programs for employees and
retired or disabled school employees as specifically authorized in RCW
41.05.065 and in accordance with the methods described in RCW
41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this chapter;
(b) To analyze state-purchased health care programs and to explore
options for cost containment and delivery alternatives for those
programs that are consistent with the purposes of those programs,
including, but not limited to:
(i) Creation of economic incentives for the persons for whom the
state purchases health care to appropriately utilize and purchase
health care services, including the development of flexible benefit
plans to offset increases in individual financial responsibility;
(ii) Utilization of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems,
utilization review, and prospective payment methods, and that ensure
access to quality care, including assuring reasonable access to local
providers, especially for employees residing in rural areas;
(iii) Coordination of state agency efforts to purchase drugs
effectively as provided in RCW 70.14.050;
(iv) Development of recommendations and methods for purchasing
medical equipment and supporting services on a volume discount basis;
(v) Development of data systems to obtain utilization data from
state-purchased health care programs in order to identify cost centers,
utilization patterns, provider and hospital practice patterns, and
procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained pursuant to RCW
41.05.031; and
(vi) In collaboration with other state agencies that administer
state purchased health care programs, private health care purchasers,
health care facilities, providers, and carriers:
(A) Use evidence-based medicine principles to develop common
performance measures and implement financial incentives in contracts
with insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers that:
(I) Reward improvements in health outcomes for individuals with
chronic diseases, increased utilization of appropriate preventive
health services, and reductions in medical errors; and
(II) Increase, through appropriate incentives to insuring entities,
health care facilities, and providers, the adoption and use of
information technology that contributes to improved health outcomes,
better coordination of care, and decreased medical errors;
(B) Through state health purchasing, reimbursement, or pilot
strategies, promote and increase the adoption of health information
technology systems, including electronic medical records, by hospitals
as defined in RCW 70.41.020(4), integrated delivery systems, and
providers that:
(I) Facilitate diagnosis or treatment;
(II) Reduce unnecessary duplication of medical tests;
(III) Promote efficient electronic physician order entry;
(IV) Increase access to health information for consumers and their
providers; and
(V) Improve health outcomes;
(C) Coordinate a strategy for the adoption of health information
technology systems using the final health information technology report
and recommendations developed under chapter 261, Laws of 2005;
(c) To analyze areas of public and private health care interaction;
(d) To provide information and technical and administrative
assistance to the board;
(e) To review and approve or deny applications from counties,
municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state to
provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to their
employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW 41.04.205 and (g) of
this subsection, setting the premium contribution for approved groups
as outlined in RCW 41.05.050;
(f) To review and approve or deny the application when the
governing body of a tribal government applies to transfer their
employees to an insurance or self-insurance program administered under
this chapter. In the event of an employee transfer pursuant to this
subsection (1)(f), members of the governing body are eligible to be
included in such a transfer if the members are authorized by the tribal
government to participate in the insurance program being transferred
from and subject to payment by the members of all costs of insurance
for the members. The authority shall: (i) Establish the conditions
for participation; (ii) have the sole right to reject the application;
and (iii) set the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined
in RCW 41.05.050. Approval of the application by the authority
transfers the employees and dependents involved to the insurance,
self-insurance, or health care program approved by the authority;
(g) To ensure the continued status of the employee insurance or
self-insurance programs administered under this chapter as a
governmental plan under section 3(32) of the employee retirement income
security act of 1974, as amended, the authority shall limit the
participation of employees of a county, municipal, school district,
educational service district, or other political subdivision, or a
tribal government, including providing for the participation of those
employees whose services are substantially all in the performance of
essential governmental functions, but not in the performance of
commercial activities;
(h) To establish billing procedures and collect funds from school
districts in a way that minimizes the administrative burden on
districts;
(i) To publish and distribute to nonparticipating school districts
and educational service districts by October 1st of each year a
description of health care benefit plans available through the
authority and the estimated cost if school districts and educational
service district employees were enrolled;
(j) To apply for, receive, and accept grants, gifts, and other
payments, including property and service, from any governmental or
other public or private entity or person, and make arrangements as to
the use of these receipts to implement initiatives and strategies
developed under this section;
(k) To issue, distribute, and administer grants that further the
mission and goals of the authority;
(l) To adopt rules consistent with this chapter as described in RCW
41.05.160 including, but not limited to:
(i) Setting forth the criteria established by the board under RCW
41.05.065 for determining whether an employee is eligible for benefits;
(ii) Establishing an appeal process in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW by which an employee may appeal an eligibility determination;
(iii) Establishing a process to assure that the eligibility
determinations of an employing agency comply with the criteria under
this chapter, including the imposition of penalties as may be
authorized by the board.
(2) On and after January 1, 1996, the public employees' benefits
board may implement strategies to promote managed competition among
employee health benefit plans. Strategies may include but are not
limited to:
(a) Standardizing the benefit package;
(b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit package;
(c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent of the lowest
priced qualified plan within a geographical area;
(d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this subsection
with regards to: Efficiencies in health service delivery, cost shifts
to subscribers, access to and choice of managed care plans statewide,
and quality of health services. The health care authority shall also
advise on the value of administering a benchmark employer-managed plan
to promote competition among managed care plans.
(3)(a) The authority must enter into contracts with all the managed
care plans and for the self-insured plan or plans, to be implemented as
soon as possible but no later than 2013, that include:
(i) Provider reimbursement methods that incentivize chronic care
management within health homes;
(ii) Provider reimbursement methods that reward health homes that,
by using chronic care management, reduce emergency department and
inpatient use; and
(iii) Promoting provider participation in the program of training
and technical assistance regarding care of people with chronic
conditions described in RCW 43.70.533, including allocating funds for
provider participation in the training unless the managed care system
is an integrated health delivery system that has programs in place for
chronic care management.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "chronic care management,"
and "health home" have the same meaning as in RCW 74.09.010.
(c) Contracts with fully insured plans that include the items in
(a)(i) through (iii) of this subsection must be funded within the
resources provided by employer funding rates provided for employee
health benefits in the omnibus appropriations act.
(d) Funding for the items in (a)(i) through (iii) of this
subsection in self-insured plans must not increase the resources
provided by employer funding rates provided for employee health
benefits in the omnibus appropriations act in the absence of these
provisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that collaboration among public payers,
private health carriers, third-party payers, and providers to identify
appropriate reimbursement methods to align incentives in support of
patient centered health homes is necessary to implement the
requirements of this act. The legislature therefore declares its
intent to exempt from state antitrust laws, and to provide immunity
from federal antitrust laws, through the state action doctrine, the
collaborative and associated payment reforms designed and implemented
under this section that might otherwise be constrained by such laws.
The legislature does not authorize any person or entity to engage in
activities or to conspire to engage in activities that would constitute
per se violations of state or federal antitrust laws including, but not
limited to, agreements among competing health care providers or health
carriers as to the prices of specific levels of reimbursement for
health care services.
(2) The legislature recognizes that many Washingtonians are covered
by health plans regulated by the federal government, including self-insured and Taft-Hartley plans. While such plans are largely outside
the state's purview, they share with the state an interest in
containing health care costs and promoting quality of care. The
legislature recognizes that the participation of such plans in the
state's efforts to promote health homes and reform payment methods
would greatly increase the likelihood of success of such efforts.
(3) The administrator shall establish a collaborative work group
process to encourage input from and participation by such plans to work
with the state and carriers to promote health homes and to learn from
the experience of the health care authority for successful
implementation of health homes for employees with chronic and multiple
conditions.
(4) Beginning December 1, 2012, the administrator must report to
the legislature annually on the efforts of the collaborative work group
to broadly implement health homes. The report must also document the
efforts to integrate health homes in the publicly purchased programs
administered under this chapter and chapters 74.09 and 70.47 RCW.
(5) The administrator may write rules to establish the information
that insurance carriers must submit for inclusion in the annual report
to the legislature.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "chronic condition" and
"health home" have the same meaning as in RCW 74.09.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
Each carrier licensed under this title and providing a
comprehensive health plan in the state shall participate in the
collaborative work group established in section 7 of this act and
submit information the health care authority requires for the annual
report to the legislature.

--- END ---