BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.51 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A nursing home licensed under this chapter may employ
physicians for the provision of professional services to its residents
under the following conditions:
(a) The nursing home may not in any manner, directly or indirectly,
supplant, diminish, or regulate any employed physician's judgment
concerning the practice of medicine or the diagnosis and treatment of
any patient; and
(b) The employed physicians may provide professional services only
to residents of the nursing home or a related living facility.
(2) The employment of physicians as authorized by this section may
be through the following entities:
(a) Any entity that owns, controls, or manages the nursing home; or
(b) A separate entity authorized to conduct business in the state
of Washington that has common or overlapping ownership as an affiliate
or subsidiary of any entity that owns, controls, or manages the nursing
home.
(3) An entity employing physicians under this section shall notify
the department of such employment annually.
(4) As used in this section, "related living facility" means (a) a
separate nursing home that is owned, controlled, or managed by the same
or an affiliated or subsidiary entity; or (b) a facility that (i)
provides independent living services or boarding home services under
chapter 18.20 RCW, in a single contiguous campus as the nursing home,
and (ii) is owned, controlled, or managed by the same or related entity
as the nursing home. For purposes of this subsection "contiguous"
means land adjoining or touching property on which the nursing home is
located, including land divided by a public road.

--- END ---