BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.15 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Affiliate" means, with respect to an insured, any entity that
controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the
insured.
(2) "Affiliated group" means any group of entities that are all
affiliated.
(3) With respect to an insured, an entity has "control" over
another entity when:
(a) The entity directly or indirectly or acting through one or more
other persons owns, controls, or has the power to vote twenty-five
percent or more of any class of voting securities of the other entity;
or
(b) The entity controls in any manner the election of a majority of
the directors or trustees of the other entity.
(4)(a) "Exempt commercial purchaser" means any person purchasing
commercial insurance that, at the time of placement, meets the
following requirements:
(i) The person employs or retains a qualified risk manager to
negotiate insurance coverage;
(ii) The person has paid aggregate nationwide commercial property
and casualty insurance premiums in excess of one hundred thousand
dollars in the immediately preceding twelve months; and
(iii) The person meets at least one of the following criteria:
(A) The person possesses a net worth in excess of twenty million
dollars, as the amount is adjusted under (b) of this subsection;
(B) The person generates annual revenues in excess of fifty million
dollars, as the amount is adjusted under (b) of this subsection;
(C) The person employs more than five hundred full-time or full-time equivalent employees per insured or is a member of an affiliated
group employing more than one thousand employees in the aggregate;
(D) The person is a not-for-profit organization or public entity
generating annual budgeted expenditures of at least thirty million
dollars, as the amount is adjusted under (b) of this subsection; or
(E) The person is a municipality with a population in excess of
fifty thousand persons.
(b) The amounts in (a)(iii)(A), (B), and (D) of this subsection
must be adjusted to reflect the percentage change for the five-year
period in the consumer price index for all urban consumers published by
the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of
labor.
(c) For the purpose of this subsection, "commercial insurance"
means property and casualty insurance pertaining to a business,
profession, occupation, nonprofit organization, or public entity.
(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "insured's
home state" means, with respect to an insured:
(i) The state in which an insured maintains its principal place of
business or, in the case of an individual, the individual's principal
residence; or
(ii) If one hundred percent of the insured risk is located out of
the state referred to in this subsection, the state to which the
greatest percentage of the insured's taxable premium for that insurance
contract is allocated.
(b) If more than one insured from an affiliated group are named
insureds on a single insurance contract issued by an unauthorized
insurer, the term "insured's home state" means the insured's home
state, as determined pursuant to (a) of this subsection, of the member
of the affiliated group that has the largest percentage of premium
attributed to it under the insurance contract.
(c) To determine the home state of the insured, the principal place
of business is the state where the insured maintains its headquarters
and where the insured's high-level officers direct, control, and
coordinate the business activities of the insured.
(6) "Qualified risk manager" means, with respect to a policyholder
of commercial insurance, a person who meets all of the following
requirements:
(a) The person is an employee of, or third party consultant
retained by, the commercial policyholder;
(b) The person provides skilled services in loss prevention, loss
reduction, or risk and insurance coverage analysis, and purchase of
insurance; and
(c) The person:
(i)(A) Has a bachelor's degree or higher from an accredited college
or university in risk management, business administration, finance,
economics, or any other field determined by the commissioner to
demonstrate minimum competence in risk management; and
(B)(I) Has three years of experience in risk financing, claims
administration, loss prevention, risk and insurance analysis, or
purchasing commercial lines of insurance; or
(II) Has one of the following designations:
(AA) A designation as a chartered property and casualty underwriter
(CPCU) issued by the American institute for CPCU/insurance institute of
America;
(BB) A designation as an associate in risk management issued by the
American institute for CPCU/insurance institute of America;
(CC) A designation as certified risk manager issued by the national
alliance for insurance education and research;
(DD) A designation as a RIMS fellow issued by the global risk
management institute; or
(EE) Any other designation, certification, or license determined by
the commissioner to demonstrate minimum competency in risk management;
(ii)(A) Has at least seven years of experience in risk financing,
claims administration, loss prevention, risk and insurance coverage
analysis, or purchasing commercial lines of insurance; and
(B) Has any one of the designations specified in (c)(i)(B)(II)(AA)
through (EE) of this subsection;
(iii) Has at least ten years of experience in risk financing,
claims administration, loss prevention, risk and insurance coverage
analysis, or purchasing commercial lines of insurance; or
(iv) Has a graduate degree from an accredited college or university
in risk management, business administration, finance, economics, or any
other field determined by the commissioner to demonstrate minimum
competence in risk management.

Sec. 2 RCW 48.15.040 and 2010 c 230 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
If certain insurance coverages cannot be procured from authorized
insurers, such coverages, hereinafter designated as "surplus lines,"
may be procured from unauthorized insurers subject to the following
conditions:
(1) The insurance must be procured through a licensed surplus line
broker under this chapter. If the insurance is property and casualty
insurance, except industrial insurance under Title 51 RCW, then the
insurance must be procured under the laws and rules of the insured's
home state.
(2) The insurance must not be procurable, after diligent effort has
been made to do so from among a majority of the insurers authorized to
transact that kind of insurance in this state.
(3) Coverage shall not be procured from an unauthorized insurer for
the purpose of securing a lower premium rate than would be accepted by
any authorized insurer nor to secure any other competitive advantage.
(4) The commissioner may by regulation establish the degree of
effort required to comply with subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(5) At the time of ((the)) procuring ((of any such)) the insurance
((an affidavit setting forth)) the surplus line broker must certify to
the accuracy of the facts ((referred to)) supporting the surplus line
broker's diligent effort required in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section ((must be executed by the surplus line broker. Such affidavit
shall)).
(a) The certification must set forth the facts supporting the
surplus line broker's diligent effort.
(b) The certification must state that under the penalty of
suspension or revocation of the surplus line broker's license the facts
contained in the certification are true and correct.
(c) The certification may be in electronic, digital, or another
format as designated by the commissioner.
(d) The certification must be filed with the commissioner within
((thirty)) sixty days after the insurance is procured.
(6) For purposes of chapter 48.164 RCW, a joint underwriting
association established or authorized by the legislature is not an
authorized insurer.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.15.040 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 32 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
If certain insurance coverages cannot be procured from authorized
insurers, such coverages, hereinafter designated as "surplus lines,"
may be procured from unauthorized insurers subject to the following
conditions:
(1) The insurance must be procured through a licensed surplus line
broker under this chapter. If the insurance is property and casualty
insurance, except industrial insurance under Title 51 RCW, then the
insurance must be procured under the laws and rules of the insured's
home state.
(2) The insurance must not be procurable, after diligent effort has
been made to do so from among a majority of the insurers authorized to
transact that kind of insurance in this state.
(3) Coverage shall not be procured from an unauthorized insurer for
the purpose of securing a lower premium rate than would be accepted by
any authorized insurer nor to secure any other competitive advantage.
(4) The commissioner may by regulation establish the degree of
effort required to comply with subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(5) At the time of ((the)) procuring ((of any such)) the insurance
((an affidavit setting forth)) the surplus line broker must certify to
the accuracy of the facts ((referred to)) supporting the surplus line
broker's diligent effort required in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section ((must be executed by the surplus line broker. Such affidavit
shall)).
(a) The certification must set forth the facts supporting the
surplus line broker's diligent effort.
(b) The certification must state that under the penalty of
suspension or revocation of the surplus line broker's license the facts
contained in the certification are true and correct.
(c) The certification may be in electronic, digital, or another
format as designated by the commissioner.
(d) The certification must be filed with the commissioner within
((thirty)) sixty days after the insurance is procured.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 48.15 RCW
to read as follows:
When a national insurance producer database of the national
association of insurance commissioners, or other equivalent uniform
national database, for the licensure of surplus line brokers is
created, the commissioner may participate in the database.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.15 RCW
to read as follows:
A surplus line broker seeking to procure from or place insurance
with an unauthorized insurer for an exempt commercial purchaser is not
required to satisfy the diligent effort requirement set forth in RCW
48.15.040 when:
(1) The surplus line broker or referring insurance producer
procuring or placing the surplus line insurance has disclosed to the
exempt commercial purchaser that such insurance may or may not be
available from the admitted market that may provide greater protection
with more regulatory oversight; and
(2) The exempt commercial purchaser has subsequently requested in
writing the surplus line broker or referring insurance producer to
procure or place such insurance from an unauthorized insurer.
(3) Records of the surplus line broker's satisfaction of the
requirements of this section must be maintained in compliance with RCW
48.15.100.

Sec. 6 RCW 48.15.090 and 1997 c 89 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A surplus line broker ((shall)) must not knowingly place
surplus line insurance with insurers unsound financially. The surplus
line broker ((shall)) must ascertain the financial condition of the
unauthorized insurer, and maintain written evidence thereof, before
placing insurance therewith. The surplus line broker ((shall not)) may
only so insure with:
(a)(i) Any foreign insurer ((having less than six million dollars
of capital and surplus or substantially equivalent capital funds, of
which not less than one million five hundred thousand dollars is
capital)):
(A) That is authorized to write the kind of insurance in its
domiciliary jurisdiction; and
(B) Has capital and surplus or its equivalent under the laws of its
domiciliary jurisdiction which equals the greater of:
(I) The minimum capital and surplus requirements under the laws of
this state; or
(II) Fifteen million dollars.
(ii) The requirements of (a)(i)(B) of this subsection may be
satisfied by an insurer's possessing less than the minimum capital and
surplus upon an affirmative finding of acceptability by the
commissioner. The finding must be based upon factors such as quality
of management, capital and surplus of any parent company, company
underwriting profit and investment income trends, market availability,
and company record and reputation within the industry. The
commissioner is prohibited from making an affirmative finding of
acceptability when the foreign insurer's capital and surplus is less
than four million five hundred thousand dollars; or
(b) Any alien insurer ((having less than six million dollars of
capital and surplus or substantially equivalent capital funds. By
January 1, 1992, this requirement shall be increased to twelve million
five hundred thousand dollars. By January 1, 1993, this requirement
shall be further increased to fifteen million dollars.
Such alien insurers must have in force in the United States an
irrevocable trust fund, in a qualified United States financial
institution, on behalf of United States policyholders of not less than
five million four hundred thousand dollars and consisting of cash,
securities, letters of credit, or of investments of substantially the
same character and quality as those which are eligible investments for
the capital and statutory reserves of admitted insurers authorized to
write like kinds of insurance in this state.
There must be on file with the commissioner a copy of the trust,
certified by the trustee, evidencing a subsisting trust fund deposit
having an expiration date which at no time shall be less than five
years after the date of creation of the trust. Such trust fund shall
be included in the calculation of the insurer's capital and surplus or
its equivalents; or
(c) Any group including incorporated and individual insurers
maintaining a trust fund of less than fifty million dollars as security
to the full amount thereof for all policyholders in the United States
of each member of the group, and such trust shall likewise comply with
the terms and conditions established in (b) of this subsection for an
alien insurer; or
(d) Any insurance exchange created by the laws of an individual
state, maintaining capital and surplus, or substantially equivalent
capital funds of less than fifty million dollars in the aggregate. For
insurance exchanges which maintain funds for the protection of all
insurance exchange policyholders, each individual syndicate shall
maintain minimum capital and surplus, or the substantial equivalent
thereof, of not less than six million dollars. In the event the
insurance exchange does not maintain funds for the protection of all
insurance exchange policyholders, each individual syndicate shall meet
the minimum capital and surplus requirements of (a) of this
subsection)) that is listed on the quarterly listing of alien insurers
maintained by the international insurers department of the national
association of insurance commissioners.
(2) The commissioner may, by rule((:
(a) Increase the financial requirements under subsection (1) of
this section by not more than one million dollars in any twelve-month
period, but in no case may the requirements exceed fifteen million
dollars; or
(b))), prescribe the terms under which the foregoing financial
requirements may be waived in circumstances where insurance cannot be
otherwise procured on risks located in this state.
(3) For any violation of this section the surplus line broker may
be fined not less than one hundred dollars or more than five thousand
dollars, and in addition to or in lieu thereof the surplus line
broker's license may be revoked, suspended, or nonrenewed.

Sec. 7 RCW 48.15.110 and 2009 c 549 s 7058 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each surplus line broker ((shall)) must on or before the first
day of March of each year file with the commissioner a verified
statement of all surplus line insurance transacted by him or her during
the preceding calendar year.
(2) The statement ((shall)) must be ((on forms)) in a form and
format as prescribed ((and furnished)) by the commissioner and
((shall)) must show:
(a) Aggregate of net premiums; and
(b) Additional information as required by the commissioner.
(3) This section does not apply to property and casualty insurance
procured by the surplus line broker when the insured's home state is a
state other than this state.

Sec. 8 RCW 48.15.120 and 2009 c 549 s 7059 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On or before the first day of March of each year each surplus
line broker ((shall)) must remit to the state treasurer through the
commissioner a tax on the premiums, exclusive of sums collected to
cover federal and state taxes and examination fees, on surplus line
insurance subject to tax transacted by him or her during the preceding
calendar year as shown by his or her annual statement filed with the
commissioner, and at the same rate as is applicable to the premiums of
authorized foreign insurers under this code. ((Such)) The tax when
collected ((shall)) must be credited to the general fund.
(2) ((If a surplus line policy covers risks or exposures only
partially in)) For property and casualty insurance other than
industrial insurance under Title 51 RCW, if this state is the insured's
home state, the tax so payable ((shall)) must be computed upon the
((proportion of the)) entire premium ((which is properly allocable to
the)) under subsection (1) of this section, without regard to whether
the policy covers risks or exposures that are located in this state.
(3) For all other lines of insurance, if a surplus line policy
covers risks or exposures only partially in this state, the tax so
payable must be computed upon the proportion of the premium that is
properly allocable to the risks or exposures located in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 8 of this act applies to all surplus
line insurance policies with an effective date on or after July 21,
2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 2 of this act expires December 31,
2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Section 3 of this act takes effect December
31, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1, 2, and 4 through 9 of this act
are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
institutions, and take effect July 21, 2011.

--- END ---