BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that
manufactured/mobile home tenants have a substantial investment in their
residences and appurtenances for which a space or lot is rented in a
manufactured/mobile home park. Alternate sites for the relocation of
manufactured/mobile homes are difficult to find due to the shortage of
vacant spaces, new park development, and the restrictions of age, size,
or style of homes permitted in many parks. Likewise, the cost of
moving a home is substantial and the risk of damage when moving is
significant. These conditions result in the creation of a captive
market of tenants. This captivity contributes to an imbalance in the
bargaining relationship between park owners and tenants in favor of the
park owners.
(2) The legislature also finds that because homes in parks are
often occupied by senior citizens, persons on fixed incomes, and
persons of low or moderate incomes, rent increases affect these persons
with particular harshness. Continual space or lot rent increases in
parks diminish the value of the investment of tenants. State law
permits park owners to require tenants to make modifications to their
homes for a variety of reasons that constitute capital improvements,
which accrue to the benefit of the park owner by increasing the market
value of the park itself. Additionally, many tenants make voluntary
improvements to their spaces or lots that are permanent and affixed to
the space or lot rented. These improvements inure to the benefit of
the park owner and become the property of the park owner when the
tenant leaves. Further, in many instances, rents in parks have been
raised to such a level that tenants are unable to find purchasers for
their homes, resulting in a serious reduction in the sale price of
their home, which makes them captives in the park and has them face a
significant or total loss of equity in their homes if they leave.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to facilitate and encourage
fair bargaining between tenants and park owners to achieve mutually
satisfactory agreements regarding space or lot rents in parks. Absent
such agreements, the legislature further intends to protect the tenants
from unreasonable space or lot rent increases while simultaneously
recognizing and providing for the need of park owners to receive a just
and reasonable return on the investment in their property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Base rent" means the space or lot rent in effect on January 1,
2011, as determined under this chapter.
(2) "Base year" means a base rent charged or collected in any park
for the first year following the date of the space rent ceiling.
(3) "Base year rent" means the space or lot rent charged or
collected in a park for a base year.
(4) "Board" means the manufactured/mobile home park rental review
board established by the department under section 8 of this act.
(5) "Consumer price index" means the consumer price index for all
urban consumers applicable to the pertinent geographical or political
area of the state of Washington as published by the United States
department of labor, bureau of labor statistics.
(6) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(7) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce.
(8) "Manufactured/mobile home" or "home" means a structure designed
for human habitation and for being moved on a street or highway, but
does not include a recreational vehicle unless the recreational vehicle
is located on a space or lot in a park or community and is occupied by
a tenant on a permanent basis. As used in this subsection,
"recreational vehicle" means a type of manufactured/mobile home if it
is located on a space or lot in a park and is occupied by a tenant on
a permanent basis. As used in this subsection, "permanent basis" means
occupancy for a period in excess of six months per year.
(9) "Manufactured/mobile home park" or "park" means any parcel of
land where two or more manufactured/mobile home spaces or lots are
rented or held out for rent to accommodate homes for human habitation.
(10) "Manufactured/mobile home park owner" or "park owner" means
the owner, lessor, landlord, operator, or manager of a park.
(11) "Manufactured/mobile home space or lot" or "space or lot"
means the site within a park intended, designed, or used for the
location or accommodation of a home for human habitation.
(12) "Manufactured/mobile home tenant" or "tenant" means any person
who owns or is entitled to occupy a manufactured/mobile home.
(13) "Net operating income" means the gross income of a
manufactured/mobile home park less allowable operating expenses. As
used in this subsection, "gross income" means the sum of: Gross rents;
interest from rental deposits, unless directly paid by the park owner
to the tenants; income derived from any source related to or operated
on the park including, but not limited to, laundry facilities, vending
machines, amusement devices, cleaning fees or services, and garage and
parking fees; and all other income or consideration received or
receivable for or in connection with the use or occupancy of a
manufactured/mobile home space or lot.
(14) "Operating expenses," for a manufactured/mobile home park,
means the following: Real property taxes; utility costs; management
fees actually paid if management services are contracted for, or the
reasonable value of management services performed by the park owner,
limited to no more than four percent of the gross income of the park;
normal repair and maintenance expenses; license and registration fees
paid by the park owner and not the tenants; and other operating
expenses deemed reasonable by the board.
(15) "Rent increase" means any additional consideration demanded
from a tenant for a manufactured/mobile home space or lot.
(16) "Space or lot rent" means the consideration demanded or
received for the use or occupancy of a manufactured/mobile home space
or lot exclusive of any consideration paid for the occupancy of the
home itself. The payment of space or lot rent entitles the tenant to
the full use and enjoyment of all of the park's amenities, facilities,
services, and utilities that are not individually metered and
separately billed to the tenant.
(17) "Space rent ceiling" means the amount determined under section
4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) This chapter applies to every home
located in a park except for those parks that are specifically excluded
from coverage by the director.
(2) This chapter does not apply to any park that the director finds
is (a) owned and operated by the residents of the park or (b) is owned
and operated by a nonprofit corporation granted tax-exempt status by
the internal revenue service.
(3) Exemption from this chapter is granted only upon approval of an
application for such status made to the director by the tenants of the
park or their representatives or by the nonprofit corporation. Any
park where one or more lots are not owned by a tenant and are rented by
the nonprofit corporation are not exempt from this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Within sixty calendar days after the
effective date of this section, a park owner must submit to the
department: A rent schedule of space or lot rents within the park on
January 1, 2011; a schedule of any other charges paid by tenants within
the park; the amount of the charges and to whom paid; the name,
address, e-mail, and telephone number of the park's manager, if any;
and the name, address, e-mail, and telephone number of the park owner.
A park owner shall also update the registration of the park within
thirty days of any change to the information previously filed for the
park with the director and the department of licensing. A park owner
shall also provide any further information as required by resolution of
the board.
(2) A park owner is not eligible to receive a space rent ceiling
adjustment under this chapter unless the current registration as may be
required for the park is on file with the director and the department
of licensing, and complete with the board, prior to the time a petition
for a space rent ceiling adjustment is filed.
(3) At the time of any registration of a park with the director, a
park owner must have paid any registration fees required by the
department of licensing or under chapter RCW 59.30 RCW.
(4) The board shall not accept any petition from a park owner for
a space rent ceiling adjustment or commence a proceeding under section
9 of this act if the park owner has not paid the required registration
fees to the director or to the department of licensing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A park owner shall file an annual report
with the board on a date as determined by the board. The report must
contain all pertinent financial information related to the operation of
the park. The report must include a history of space or lot rent
increases, or increases in space or lot rent for capital improvements,
for the previous five years of operation of the park. The report must
be made available for review and photocopying at the place of business
of the board. The board may charge a reasonable fee for photocopying
any report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Beginning on the first day of the first
month following the effective date of this section, a park owner shall
not charge or collect space or lot rents for any manufactured/mobile
home spaces or lots in an amount more than the space or lot rents in
effect on January 1, 2011, except as provided in this chapter.
(2) Any park owner or tenant may petition the board for the purpose
of determining the base rent in effect, in any existing park on January
1, 2011, or in any park developed subsequent to January 1, 2011.
(3) After the effective date of this section, a park owner who has
established the base rent for the park is entitled to one annual
adjustment in the base rent charged for each space or lot in a park
equal to the increase in the consumer price index from the date of the
establishment of the base rent or the most recent annual adjustment of
the space rent to the date proposed in the park owner's petition. The
annual space rent adjustment may not exceed five percent, with a
minimum increase set at three percent or the annual cost of living
adjustment for social security as measured by the consumer price index
for urban wage earners and clerical workers prepared by the bureau of
labor statistics, United States department of labor, whichever is
lower. There may not be an additional increase in rent under this
subsection unless the consumer price index increase exceeds ten
percent. If the consumer price index increase exceeds ten percent, the
rent increase must be one percent for each one percent that the
consumer price index exceeds ten percent. The one percent rent
adjustment must contain the park owner's calculations supporting the
amount of the permissive annual adjustment.
(4) A park owner may increase a tenant's rent more than once per
year for a pro rata share of any increase in the manufactured/mobile
home park's real property taxes or utilities in accordance with RCW
59.20.060(2)(c) if the tenant's rental agreement also provides for a
pro rata reduction in the tenant's rent if the manufactured/mobile home
park's real property taxes or utilities decrease.
(5) A park owner may petition the board for an extraordinary
adjustment of the space rent ceiling. The petition must contain the
amount of and the basis for the requested adjustment. The park owner
shall submit as part of the petition process proof of gross income,
operating expenses, costs of capital improvements, and net operating
income of the park for the previous three full calendar years. It is
assumed as part of the park owner's petition that a typical industry
standard of operating expenses for a park is set between thirty-five
and forty percent of gross receipts for Washington state, and a
reasonable return on the park owner's net operating income is set at
9.5 percent. Excluded from operating expenses are: Costs due to
deferred maintenance; debt service expenses; depreciation; any
rehabilitation of homes a park owner gains title to or typical real
estate selling, recording, and title expenses; land lease expenses; and
any attorneys' fees or court costs of any kind.
(6) An adjustment of the base rent in any park is not effective
until at least twelve months from the date of the establishment of the
base rent or the effective date of any prior adjustment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) A minimum of fifty percent of the
tenants of a manufactured/mobile home park under this chapter may
petition the board to determine whether the base rent of adjustments
applicable to the tenant's manufactured/mobile home spaces or lots are
valid under this chapter. The petition must contain the names,
addresses, and telephone numbers of the tenants filing the petition and
the park owner or manager, a statement of the relief requested, and the
basis of the requested relief. The petition must be signed by the
tenants submitting the petition, accompanied by proof that the petition
was personally served or mailed to the park owner or manager and by the
payment of a petition fee, if any, as established by resolution of the
board.
(2) Any park owner under this chapter may petition the board to
determine whether the base rent or proposed adjustments of the base
rent applicable to any manufactured/mobile home space or lot within the
owner's park are valid under this chapter. The petition must contain
the name, address, e-mail, and telephone number of the park owner
filing the petition and the tenants of the park affected by the
proposed adjustment, a statement of the amount of the adjustment or
other relief requested, and the basis of the requested adjustment or
relief. The petition must be signed by the park owner submitting the
petition, accompanied by proof that the petition was personally served
or mailed to each tenant and by the payment of a petition fee, if any,
as established by resolution of the board.
(3) The board may designate the form of the petition submitted by
a tenant or park owner under this section. If the board designates the
form, each tenant and park owner must submit his or her petition on the
form and no other form is acceptable.
(4) A petition may not be accepted by the board unless it is
accompanied by the payment of a one hundred dollar fee payable to the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The manufactured/mobile home park rental
review board is established by the department. The board must be
composed of five members. Two members must be tenants of a park and be
officers of an organization established for the education and service
to tenants in parks. Two members must be park owners, as designated
and recommended by mobile home communities of Washington state. One
member must be a representative of the department. Board members must
be selected by the director and shall serve for a term of three years.
Board members may not receive compensation from the department.
(2) The board has the following duties and powers:
(a) Subject to the approval of the department, the board may adopt
rules to effectuate the purposes and policies of this chapter and to
enable the board to carry out its duties and powers.
(b) The department shall appoint a manufactured/mobile home rent
review director who shall administer and carry out the purposes and
policies of this chapter. The rent review director must be an employee
of the department.
(c) The board, through the rent review director, shall keep a
record of its proceedings.
(d) The board shall: Require registration fees for each park, with
the fee amounts to be determined by the department of licensing;
designate the form of petitions; collect a petition fee of one hundred
dollars payable to the department; and determine the acceptability of
petitions filed.
(e) The board shall determine the validity of base rents and
adjustments to the base rents of all manufactured/mobile home spaces or
lots within all parks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The proceedings of the board are
initiated by the filing and acceptance of a petition under this
chapter. Upon the filing and acceptance of a petition, the board shall
establish the date and time to consider the petition. A proceeding
must commence within forty-five days from the filing and acceptance of
a petition unless the board has commenced a proceeding on another
petition that conflicts with this forty-five day period. The board
shall mail a written notice of its proceedings to all parties affected
by a petition at least fifteen days before the date and time
designated.
(2) Each party to a proceeding may be assisted by an attorney or
another representative designated by the party. Any costs for the
attorney or another representative must be borne by the respective
party.
(3) Formal rules of evidence do not apply, but all testimony must
be given under oath. The board may compel, by subpoena, the production
of documents and the attendance of witnesses at its hearings.
(4) If a party fails to appear at a duly noticed proceeding, the
board may hear and review any evidence that may be presented and may
make determinations and findings as supported by the evidence
presented.
(5) The board shall determine the validity of the space rent
ceiling or space rent ceiling adjustments and may grant or deny other
relief requested by the petition relating to the proceeding.
(6) The board shall make written findings, based on the evidence
presented, on all issues relevant to the determinations.
(7) The board shall meet to consider the evidence and arguments of
the parties no later than ten days after the matter has been submitted
for decision, and shall make a final decision within a reasonable time.
An adjustment of park rents is not allowed without a board decision.
(8) The decision of the board must be supported by the evidence
submitted at the hearing. The petitioning party has the burden of
proof in such proceedings.
(9) The proponent of any adjustment to a base rent has the burden
of proof by a preponderance of the evidence.
(10) The determinations and findings of the board constitute a
final administrative action. The determinations and findings of the
board must be mailed to each party to a proceeding. The decision
becomes effective upon the date it is mailed to the parties unless
otherwise stated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Upon written request from the park's
tenant's association, or a majority of the park's tenants, the park
owner, park manager, or a representative from the park owner's
management company must meet and discuss any capital expenditure with
the tenants between ten and thirty days after the park owner has given
the tenants notice of an increase in the tenants' monthly occupancy
charges.
(2) The park owner shall provide reasonable evidence of the cost of
a capital expenditure for any requesting tenant's association or a
majority of the park's tenants. The cost of any capital expenditure
must include the actual cost of the capital expenditure, legal and
engineering fees, interest, points, and other borrowing costs incurred
to make the capital expenditure, if the park owner uses funds borrowed
from a financial institution.
(3) Capital expenditures, which may be used to increase a tenant's
rent or occupancy charges, are divided into three categories:
(a) Capital improvements. Capital improvements are the addition of
improvements where none existed before, such as the construction of a
new clubhouse, swimming pool, or other such amenity, or an addition to
an existing clubhouse, swimming pool, or other amenity. The park owner
shall notify all tenants in writing of the intent to make a capital
improvement in excess of ten thousand dollars. The park owner must
absorb the first five thousand dollars of capital improvements during
any one calendar year.
(b) Capital replacements. Capital replacements are the major
repairs, replacements, or renovation of any existing improvement in the
park, such as utility systems, streets, and common buildings. Capital
replacements also include the addition of items like water, gas, and
septic or electric systems or meters. The park owner may make capital
replacement expenditures without the consent or vote of the tenants.
The park owner shall apply any insurance proceeds received in
connection with a capital replacement item before seeking any increase
in rent or occupancy charges from the tenants. The park owner must
absorb the first five thousand dollars of any capital replacements
during any one calendar year.
(c) Capital mandates. A capital mandate can be either a capital
improvement or a capital replacement that is required: (i) By a
governmental entity, quasi-governmental entity, utility company, or
other service provider, such as water, sewer, septic, telephone, cable
television, or garbage; (ii) due to fire, flood, earthquake, or other
similar casualty loss or natural disaster; or (iii) to protect the
health and safety of the tenants or to permit the continued occupancy
or operation of the park in compliance with applicable law. The park
owner may make capital mandate expenditures without the consent or vote
of the tenants. The park owner shall apply any insurance proceeds
received in connection with a capital mandate item before increasing
the rent to the tenants for a capital mandate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) It is presumed that the net operating
income produced by a park owner during the base year provides a fair
return on park property. The park owner bears the burden of proving
that any increase in rent to a tenant is justified to realize a fair
rate of return.
(2) The board may determine that the base year net operating income
yielded other than a fair return on park property, in which case the
base rent may be adjusted accordingly. In order to make such a
determination, the board must find that the park owner's operating and
maintenance expenses in the base year were unusually high or low in
comparison to other years. Adjustments to the base rent may be made in
calculating these expenses so that the base year operating expenses
reflect average expenses for the park property over a reasonable period
of time, including factors as determined by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) To determine the net operating income
of the base year, a sum equal to the operating expenses for the base
year must be deducted from the actual or realized gross income in the
base year.
(2) If the park owner did not own the subject property during the
base year, the operating expenses for the base year must be determined
by one of the following methods, whichever the board determines to be
more reliable in the particular case:
(a) The previous owner's actual operating expenses, if such
determination is available; or
(b) Actual operating expenses for the first calendar year of
ownership, discounted to the current calendar year.
(3) To determine the net operating income for any year subsequent
to the base year, a sum equal to the actual operating expenses for the
particular year must be deducted from the actual or annualized income,
determined by analyzing the monthly rents in effect at the time of
filing a petition.
(4) While the net operating income formula should operate to allow
a park owner a fair return on park property, the board shall consider
all relevant factors presented in making a determination as set forth
in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) A space or lot rent increase is not
valid when any petition is pending before the board or any proceeding
on any petition is being conducted by the board. A space or lot rent
increase is also not valid during the period in which the board's
decision for that park is being reviewed by a court of competent
jurisdiction, except that permissible annual adjustments may be payable
during such judicial review.
(2) A park owner shall not increase space or lot rents under this
chapter if the park owner:
(a) Has failed to comply with this chapter or rules adopted under
this chapter, including any provisions requiring the payment of
registration fees, registration penalties, or petition fees; or
(b) Has failed to comply substantially with any applicable state or
local housing, health, or safety law, or has been found in violation of
chapter 59.20 RCW by ruling of the attorney general's dispute
resolution program.
(3) A park owner shall not increase space or lot rents unless the
notice to increase space or lot rents contains a statement in
substantially the following form: "The undersigned (owner) certifies
that this manufactured/mobile home space or lot and common areas of the
park are not subject to any uncorrected citation or notices of
violation of any state or local housing, health, or safety law issued
by any government official or agency, or has been found in violation of
chapter 59.20 RCW by ruling of the attorney general's dispute
resolution program."
(4) If a park owner fails to comply with this section, a tenant may
refuse to pay the space or lot rent increase, seek administrative or
civil remedies under this chapter, or raise the park owner's
noncompliance as an affirmative defense in any resulting unlawful
detainer action filed by the park owner. If a tenant pays a rent
increase subsequently found by the board to be in violation of this
chapter, the park owner must credit the affected tenant's rental
account by any overpayment of rent determined by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A park owner shall not reduce the level or
kind of services provided to tenants in effect on January 1, 2011, or
take any action in retaliation for the exercise by tenants of any of
the rights granted under this chapter.
(1) If a park owner provides in the rent, without separate charge,
utilities or similar services including, but not limited to, natural
gas, electricity, water, sewer, garbage, or cable television, and
attempts to charge separately for these services by any means of
transferring to the tenant the obligation for payment for these
services, the cost savings must be given to the tenant by a space or
lot rent reduction equal to the actual reduction of the park owner's
cost of the transferred utility or similar service, less common area
usage based on the park owner's actual costs for the twelve-month
period prior to any notice to the tenants of the change. Failure to
comply with this subsection precludes a park owner from seeking and
receiving any relief under this chapter until compliance occurs.
(2) In determining the cost savings to be given to tenants in the
form of decreased space or lot rents, the cost of installation of
separate utility meters or other costs incurred by the park owner do
not constitute a deduction against space or lot rent reduction.
However, this does not prohibit the consideration of those costs as an
increased operating expense.
(3) If a service other than a utility or similar service is reduced
or eliminated or a utility or similar service is reduced or eliminated
without a concomitant decrease in rent, the affected tenants may file
a petition to determine the validity of the action. The petition must
be filed within one year of the date on which the service was reduced
or eliminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) Any person who demands, accepts, or
retains any payment in violation of this chapter is liable in a civil
action to the person from whom the payment is demanded, accepted, or
retained for damages in the sum of three times the amount by which the
payment or payments demanded, accepted, or retained exceed the maximum
space or lot rent that could lawfully be demanded, accepted, or
retained, together with reasonable attorneys' fees and costs as
determined by the court.
(2) It is unlawful for a park owner to adjust any rent in an amount
in excess of that allowed under this chapter or by order of the board.
An owner who willfully and knowingly violates this chapter or the
orders of the board is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(3) The board, the rent review director, the director, tenants, and
park owners may seek relief from the appropriate court within the
jurisdiction within which the park is located to enforce this chapter
or rules adopted under this chapter or to restrain or enjoin any
violation of this chapter or rules, orders, and decisions of the board.
(4) Any waiver or purported waiver by a tenant of the rights
granted under this chapter, whether oral or written, is void as
contrary to public policy.
(5) A park owner or tenant aggrieved by any action of the board may
seek judicial review by appealing to the appropriate court within the
jurisdiction. This chapter prevents any interference or retaliatory
acts against any individual tenant, group of tenants, or tenant's
association. If the board determines that the park owner has
interfered with or retaliated against any individual tenant, group of
tenants, or tenant's association, the park owner is subject to fines of
up to one thousand dollars per incident, which must be paid to the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The initial cost of the administration of
this chapter must be funded by the payment of three dollars per space
or lot, occupied or vacant, in all manufactured/mobile home parks. The
three dollar payment must be paid annually by the park owner to the
department beginning the effective date of this section. The payment
may be increased as determined by the department.

Sec. 17 RCW 35.21.830 and 1981 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The imposition of controls on rent is of statewide significance and
is preempted by the state. Except for space or lot rents, as defined
in section 2 of this act, in manufactured/mobile home parks, as defined
in section 2 of this act, no city or town of any class may enact,
maintain, or enforce ordinances or other provisions which regulate the
amount of rent to be charged for single family or multiple unit
residential rental structures or sites other than properties in public
ownership, under public management, or properties providing low-income
rental housing under joint public-private agreements for the financing
or provision of such low-income rental housing. This section shall not
be construed as prohibiting any city or town from entering into
agreements with private persons which regulate or control the amount of
rent to be charged for rental properties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 This chapter must be liberally construed to
achieve its purposes and to preserve its validity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2011, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act
is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 Sections 1 through 16 and 18 through 20 of
this act constitute a new chapter in Title 59 RCW.

--- END ---