BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 81.84.010 and 2009 c 557 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A commercial ferry may not operate any vessel or ferry for the
public use for hire between fixed termini or over a regular route upon
the waters within this state, including the rivers and lakes ((and
Puget Sound)), without first applying for and obtaining from the
commission a certificate declaring that public convenience and
necessity require such operation. Service authorized by certificates
issued to a commercial ferry operator must be exercised by the operator
in a manner consistent with the conditions established in the
certificate and tariff filed under chapter 81.28 RCW. However, a
certificate is not required for a vessel primarily engaged in
transporting freight other than vehicles, whose gross earnings from the
transportation of passengers or vehicles, or both, are not more than
ten percent of the total gross annual earnings of such vessel.
(2) If the commission finds, after a hearing, that an existing or
a proposed commercial ferry service does not serve an essential
transportation purpose and is solely for recreation, the commission
may, by order, exempt that service from the requirements of
certification and regulation under this chapter. If the nonessential
service is a proposed service not already provided by an existing
certificate holder, the commission must also find, after notice to any
existing certificate holder operating within the same territory and an
opportunity to be heard, that the proposed service would not adversely
affect the rates or services of any existing certificate holder.
(3) This section does not affect the right of any county public
transportation benefit area or other public agency within this state to
construct, condemn, purchase, operate, or maintain, itself or by
contract, agreement, or lease, with any person, firm, or corporation,
ferries or boats across the waters within this state, including rivers
and lakes and Puget Sound, if the operation is not over the same route
or between the same districts being served by a certificate holder
without first acquiring the rights granted to the certificate holder
under the certificate.
(4) The holder of a certificate of public convenience and necessity
granted under this chapter must initiate service within five years of
obtaining the certificate((, except that the holder of a certificate of
public convenience and necessity for passenger-only ferry service in
Puget Sound must initiate service within twenty months of obtaining the
certificate)). The certificate holder shall report to the commission
every six months after the certificate is granted on the progress of
the certificated route. The reports shall include, but not be limited
to, the progress of environmental impact, parking, local government
land use, docking, and financing considerations. ((Except in the case
of passenger-only ferry service in Puget Sound,)) If service has not
been initiated within five years of obtaining the certificate, the
commission may extend the certificate on a twelve-month basis for up to
three years if the six-month progress reports indicate there is
significant advancement toward initiating service.
(5) This section does not apply to a commercial ferry operating on
Puget Sound.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.84.020 and 2007 c 234 s 93 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the filing of an application, the commission shall give
reasonable notice to the department, affected cities, counties, and
public transportation benefit areas and any common carrier which might
be adversely affected, of the time and place for hearing on such
application. The commission may, after notice and an opportunity for
a hearing, issue the certificate as prayed for, or refuse to issue it,
or issue it for the partial exercise only of the privilege sought, and
may attach to the exercise of the rights granted by the certificate any
terms and conditions as in its judgment the public convenience and
necessity may require; but the commission may not grant a certificate
to operate between districts or into any territory ((prohibited by RCW
47.60.120 or)) already served by an existing certificate holder, unless
the existing certificate holder has failed or refused to furnish
reasonable and adequate service, has failed to provide the service
described in its certificate or tariffs after the time allowed to
initiate service has elapsed, or has not objected to the issuance of
the certificate as prayed for.
(2) Before issuing a certificate, the commission shall determine
that the applicant has the financial resources to operate the proposed
service for at least twelve months, based upon the submission by the
applicant of a pro forma financial statement of operations. Issuance
of a certificate must be determined upon, but not limited to, the
following factors: Ridership and revenue forecasts; the cost of
service for the proposed operation; an estimate of the cost of the
assets to be used in providing the service; a statement of the total
assets on hand of the applicant that will be expended on the proposed
operation; and a statement of prior experience, if any, in such field
by the applicant. The documentation required of the applicant under
this section must comply with the provisions of RCW 9A.72.085.
(3) In granting a certificate for passenger-only ferries and
determining what conditions to place on the certificate, the commission
shall consider and give substantial weight to the effect of its
decisions on public agencies operating, or eligible to operate,
passenger-only ferry service.
(((4) Until July 1, 2007, the commission shall not accept or
consider an application for passenger-only ferry service serving any
county in the Puget Sound area with a population of over one million
people. Applications for passenger-only ferry service serving any
county in the Puget Sound area with a population of over one million
pending before the commission as of May 9, 2005, must be held in
abeyance and not be considered before July 1, 2007.))

Sec. 3 RCW 81.84.060 and 2007 c 234 s 97 are each amended to read
as follows:
The commission, upon complaint by an interested party, or upon its
own motion after notice and opportunity for hearing, may cancel,
revoke, suspend, alter, or amend a certificate issued under this
chapter on any of the following grounds:
(1) Failure of the certificate holder to initiate service by the
conclusion of the fifth year after the certificate has been granted or
by the conclusion of an extension granted under RCW 81.84.010(((2)))
(4), if the commission has considered the progress report information
required under RCW 81.84.010(((2))) (4);
(2) ((Failure of a certificate holder for passenger-only ferry
service in Puget Sound to initiate service by the conclusion of the
twentieth month after the certificate has been granted;
(3))) Failure of the certificate holder to file an annual report;
(((4))) (3) The filing by a certificate holder of an annual report
that shows no revenue in the previous twelve-month period after service
has been initiated;
(((5))) (4) The violation of any provision of this chapter;
(((6))) (5) The violation of or failure to observe the provisions
or conditions of the certificate or tariffs;
(((7))) (6) The violation of an order, decision, rule, regulation,
or requirement established by the commission under this chapter;
(((8))) (7) Failure of a certificate holder to maintain the
required insurance coverage in full force and effect; or
(((9))) (8) Failure or refusal to furnish reasonable and adequate
service after initiating service.
The commission shall take appropriate action within thirty days
upon a complaint by an interested party or of its own finding that a
provision of this section has been violated.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.60.115 and 1983 c 3 s 134 are each amended to read
as follows:
The bonds herein authorized shall, in the discretion of the
department, be exchanged at the best possible price for the bonds being
refunded, or any such bonds not exchanged shall be sold in the manner
provided in RCW 47.60.090. The bonds herein authorized shall be issued
in accordance with, and shall be subject to, the provisions of RCW
47.60.050, 47.60.060, 47.60.080, 47.60.100, and 47.60.110((, and
47.60.120)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 47.60.120 (Other crossings -- Infringement
of existing franchises -- Waivers) and 2003 c 373 s 2, 2003 c 83 s 204,
1993 c 427 s 1, 1984 c 7 s 307, & 1961 c 13 s 47.60.120 are each
repealed.

--- END ---