BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.290.030 and 2008 c 233 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to
purchase or receive private metal property or nonferrous metal property
from any person who cannot produce at least one piece of current
government-issued picture identification, including a valid driver's
license or identification card issued by any state.
(2) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive private metal
property or commercial metal property unless the seller: (a) Has a
commercial account with the scrap metal business; (b) can prove
ownership of the property by producing written documentation that the
seller is the owner of the property; or (c) can produce written
documentation that the seller is an employee or agent authorized to
sell the property on behalf of a commercial enterprise.
(3) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to
purchase or receive metallic wire that was burned in whole or in part
to remove insulation unless the seller can produce written proof to the
scrap metal business that the wire was lawfully burned.
(4) No transaction involving private metal property or nonferrous
metal property valued at greater than thirty dollars may be made in
cash or with any person who does not provide a street address under the
requirements of RCW 19.290.020. For transactions valued at greater
than thirty dollars, the person with whom the transaction is being made
may only be paid by a nontransferable check, mailed by the scrap metal
business to a street address provided under RCW 19.290.020, no earlier
than ten days, and no later than thirty days after the transaction was
made. The requirement to submit payment no later than thirty days
after the transaction is tolled if the private metal property or
nonferrous metal property is under investigation by the police. A
transaction occurs on the date provided in the record required under
RCW 19.290.020. A failure to meet the requirement to submit payment no
later than thirty days after the transaction is not subject to the
penalties provided in RCW 19.290.080.
(5) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive beer kegs from
anyone except a manufacturer of beer kegs or licensed brewery.

--- END ---