BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that some economic
development initiatives, including tax incentives and infrastructure
finance, have the potential for a positive fiscal impact on the state
that is not always reflected in the fiscal notes prepared by state
agencies. It is the intent of this legislation to adopt a pilot
project to review the feasibility and reliability of fiscal notes that
reflect the potential for increased revenue from economic development
initiatives.
The office of financial management and the department of revenue,
in consultation with the senate and house of representatives, must
perform economic modeling on three examples of economic development
legislation enacted during the 2011 legislative session. The office of
financial management and the department of revenue must monitor the
implementation of the legislation and compare the economic impacts to
economic modeling. No later than five years after the effective date
of the legislation, the department of revenue and the office of
financial management must compare the economic modeling with the actual
results of the legislation and must provide a report to the legislature
comparing the two.

--- END ---