BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.87.020 and 2003 c 143 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The purpose of this chapter is to provide for safety of life
and limb, to promote safety awareness, and to ensure the safe design,
mechanical and electrical operation, and inspection of conveyances, and
performance of conveyance work, and all such operation, inspection, and
conveyance work subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be
reasonably safe to persons and property and in conformity with the
provisions of this chapter and the applicable statutes of the state of
Washington, and all orders, and rules of the department. The use of
unsafe and defective conveyances imposes a substantial probability of
serious and preventable injury to employees and the public exposed to
unsafe conditions. The prevention of these injuries and protection of
employees and the public from unsafe conditions is in the best interest
of the people of this state. It is the policy of the legislature that
employees should be protected from workplace reprisal or retaliatory
action for the opposition to or reporting in good faith of practices
that may violate the provisions of this chapter and the rules
promulgated hereunder, or of the safety, installation, repair, or
maintenance policies of their employers. Personnel performing work
covered by this chapter must, by documented training or experience or
both, be familiar with the operation and safety functions of the
components and equipment. Training and experience must include, but
not be limited to, recognizing the safety hazards and performing the
procedures to which the personnel performing conveyance work covered by
this chapter are assigned in conformance with the requirements of this
chapter. This chapter establishes the minimum standards for personnel
performing conveyance work.
(2) This chapter is not intended to prevent the use of systems,
methods, or devices of equivalent or superior quality, strength, fire
resistance, code effectiveness, durability, and safety to those
required by this chapter, provided that there is technical
documentation to demonstrate the equivalency of the system, method, or
device, as prescribed in this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter.
(3) In any suit for damages allegedly caused by a failure or
malfunction of the conveyance, conformity with the rules of the
department is prima facie evidence that the conveyance work, operation,
and inspection is reasonably safe to persons and property.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.87.010 and 2009 c 128 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory committee" means the elevator advisory committee as
described in this chapter.
(2) "Alteration" means any change to equipment, including its
parts, components, and/or subsystems, other than maintenance, repair,
or replacement.
(3) "Automobile parking elevator" means an elevator: (a) Located
in either a stationary or horizontally moving hoistway; (b) used
exclusively for parking automobiles where, during the parking process,
each automobile is moved either under its own power or by means of a
power-driven transfer device onto and off the elevator directly into
parking spaces or cubicles in line with the elevator; and (c) in which
persons are not normally stationed on any level except the receiving
level.
(4) "Belt manlift" means a power driven endless belt provided with
steps or platforms and a hand hold for the transportation of personnel
from floor to floor.
(5) "Casket lift" means a lift that (a) is installed at a mortuary,
(b) is designed exclusively for carrying of caskets, (c) moves in
guides in a basically vertical direction, and (d) serves two or more
floors or landings.
(6) "Conveyance" means an elevator, escalator, dumbwaiter, belt
manlift, automobile parking elevator, moving walk, and other elevating
devices, as defined in this section.
(7) "Conveyance work" means the alteration, construction,
dismantling, erection, installation, maintenance, relocation, and
wiring of a conveyance.
(8) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(9) "Director" means the director of the department or his or her
representative.
(10) "Dumbwaiter" means a hoisting and lowering mechanism equipped
with a car (a) that moves in guides in a substantially vertical
direction, (b) the floor area of which does not exceed nine square
feet, (c) the inside height of which does not exceed four feet, (d) the
capacity of which does not exceed five hundred pounds, and (e) that is
used exclusively for carrying materials.
(11) "Elevator" means a hoisting or lowering machine equipped with
a car or platform that moves in guides and serves two or more floors or
landings of a building or structure;
(a) "Passenger elevator" means an elevator (i) on which passengers
are permitted to ride and (ii) that may be used to carry freight or
materials when the load carried does not exceed the capacity of the
elevator;
(b) "Freight elevator" means an elevator (i) used primarily for
carrying freight and (ii) on which only the operator, the persons
necessary for loading and unloading, and other employees approved by
the department are permitted to ride;
(c) "Sidewalk elevator" means a freight elevator that: (i)
Operates between a sidewalk or other area outside the building and
floor levels inside the building below the outside area, (ii) does not
have a landing opening into the building at its upper limit of travel,
and (iii) is not used to carry automobiles;
(d) "Hand elevator" means an elevator utilizing manual energy to
move the car;
(e) "Inclined elevator" means an elevator that travels at an angle
of inclination of seventy degrees or less from the horizontal;
(f) "Multideck elevator" means an elevator having two or more
compartments located one immediately above the other;
(g) "Observation elevator" means an elevator designed to permit
exterior viewing by passengers while the car is traveling;
(h) "Power elevator" means an elevator utilizing energy other than
gravitational or manual to move the car;
(i) "Electric elevator" means an elevator where the energy is
applied by means of an electric driving machine;
(j) "Hydraulic elevator" means an elevator where the energy is
applied by means of a liquid under pressure in a cylinder equipped with
a plunger or piston;
(k) "Direct-plunger hydraulic elevator" means a hydraulic elevator
having a plunger or cylinder directly attached to the car frame or
platform;
(l) "Electro-hydraulic elevator" means a direct-plunger elevator
where liquid is pumped under pressure directly into the cylinder by a
pump driven by an electric motor;
(m) "Maintained-pressure hydraulic elevator" means a direct-plunger
elevator where liquid under pressure is available at all times for
transfer into the cylinder;
(n) "Roped hydraulic elevator" means a hydraulic elevator having
its plunger or piston connected to the car with wire ropes or
indirectly coupled to the car by means of wire ropes and sheaves;
(o) "Rack and pinion elevator" means a power elevator, with or
without a counterweight, that is supported, raised, and lowered by a
motor or motors that drive a pinion or pinions on a stationary rack
mounted in the hoistway;
(p) "Screw column elevator" means a power elevator having an
uncounterweighted car that is supported, raised, and lowered by means
of a screw thread;
(q) "Rooftop elevator" means a power passenger or freight elevator
that operates between a landing at roof level and one landing below and
opens onto the exterior roof level of a building through a horizontal
opening;
(r) "Special purpose personnel elevator" means an elevator that is
limited in size, capacity, and speed, and permanently installed in
structures such as grain elevators, radio antenna, bridge towers,
underground facilities, dams, power plants, and similar structures to
provide vertical transportation of authorized personnel and their tools
and equipment only;
(s) "Workmen's construction elevator" means an elevator that is not
part of the permanent structure of a building and is used to raise and
lower workers and other persons connected with, or related to, the
building project;
(t) "Boat launching elevator" means a conveyance that serves a boat
launching structure and a beach or water surface and is used for the
carrying or handling of boats in which people ride;
(u) "Limited-use/limited-application elevator" means a power
passenger elevator where the use and application is limited by size,
capacity, speed, and rise, intended principally to provide vertical
transportation for people with physical disabilities.
(12) "Elevator contractor" means any person, firm, or company that
possesses an elevator contractor license in accordance with this
chapter and who is engaged in the business of performing conveyance
work covered by this chapter.
(13) "Elevator contractor license" means a license that is issued
to an elevator contractor who has met the qualification requirements
established in RCW 70.87.240.
(14) "Elevator helper/apprentice" means a person who works under
the general direction of a licensed elevator mechanic. A license is
not required to be an elevator helper/apprentice.
(15) "Elevator mechanic" means any person who possesses an elevator
mechanic license in accordance with this chapter and who is engaged in
performing conveyance work covered by this chapter.
(16) "Elevator mechanic license" means a license that is issued to
a person who has met the qualification requirements established in RCW
70.87.240.
(17) "Escalator" means a power-driven, inclined, continuous
stairway used for raising and lowering passengers.
(18) "Existing installations" means an installation defined as an
"installation, existing" in this chapter or in rules adopted under this
chapter.
(19) "Inspector" means an elevator inspector of the department or
an elevator inspector of a municipality having in effect an elevator
ordinance pursuant to RCW 70.87.200.
(20) "License" means a written license, duly issued by the
department, authorizing a person, firm, or company to carry on the
business of performing conveyance work or to perform conveyance work
covered by this chapter.
(21) "Licensee" means the elevator mechanic or elevator contractor.
(22) "Maintenance" means a process of routine examination,
lubrication, cleaning, servicing, and adjustment of parts, components,
and/or subsystems for the purpose of ensuring performance in accordance
with this chapter. "Maintenance" includes repair and replacement, but
not alteration.
(23) "Material hoist" means a hoist that is not a part of a
permanent structure used to raise or lower materials during
construction, alteration, or demolition. It is not applicable to the
temporary use of permanently installed personnel elevators as material
hoists.
(24) "Material lift" means a lift that (a) is permanently
installed, (b) is comprised of a car or platform that moves in guides,
(c) serves two or more floors or landings, (d) travels in a vertical or
inclined position, (e) is an isolated, self-contained lift, (f) is not
part of a conveying system, and (g) is installed in a commercial or
industrial area not accessible to the general public or intended to be
operated by the general public.
(25) "Moving walk" means a passenger carrying device (a) on which
passengers stand or walk and (b) on which the passenger carrying
surface remains parallel to its direction of motion.
(26) "One-man capacity manlift" means a single passenger, hand-powered counterweighted device, or electric-powered device, that
travels vertically in guides and serves two or more landings.
(27) "Owner" means any person having title to or control of a
conveyance, as guardian, trustee, lessee, or otherwise.
(28) "Permit" means a permit issued by the department: (a) To
perform conveyance work, other than maintenance; or (b) to operate a
conveyance.
(29) "Person" means this state, a political subdivision, any public
or private corporation, any firm, or any other entity as well as an
individual.
(30) "Personnel hoist" means a hoist that is not a part of a
permanent structure, is installed inside or outside buildings during
construction, alteration, or demolition, and used to raise or lower
workers and other persons connected with, or related to, the building
project. The hoist may also be used for transportation of materials.
(31) "Platform" means a rigid surface that is maintained in a
horizontal position at all times when in use, and upon which passengers
stand or a load is carried.
(32) "Private residence conveyance" means a conveyance installed in
or on the premises of a single-family dwelling and operated for
transporting persons or property from one elevation to another.
(33) "Public agency" means a county, incorporated city or town,
municipal corporation, state agency, institution of higher education,
political subdivision, or other public agency and includes any
department, bureau, office, board, commission or institution of such
public entities.
(34) "Repair" means the reconditioning or renewal of parts,
components, and/or subsystems necessary to keep equipment in compliance
with this chapter.
(35) "Replacement" means the substitution of a device, component,
and/or subsystem in its entirety with a unit that is basically the same
as the original for the purpose of ensuring performance in accordance
with this chapter.
(36) "Single-occupancy farm conveyance" means a hand-powered
counterweighted single-occupancy conveyance that travels vertically in
a grain elevator and is located on a farm that does not accept
commercial grain.
(37) "Stairway chair lift" means a lift that travels in a basically
inclined direction and is designed for use by individuals with
disabilities.
(38) "Wheelchair lift" means a lift that travels in a vertical or
inclined direction and is designed for use by individuals with
disabilities.
(39) "Employee" means any person employed by an elevator
contractor.
(40) "Whistleblower" means any employee who in good faith reports
practices or opposes practices that may violate the provisions of this
chapter or the rules promulgated hereunder, or of the safety,
installation, repair, or maintenance policies of his or her employer.
The term also means (a) an employee who is believed to have reported
such practices but who, in fact, has not reported such practices or (b)
an employee who has assisted in the reporting of practices or has
provided testimony or information in connection with the reporting of
practices.
(41) "Workplace reprisal or retaliatory action" includes actions
such as discharge or in any manner discrimination against any employee
who has reported or filed any complaint or instituted or caused to be
instituted any proceeding under or related to this chapter, or has
testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding or because of
the exercise by such employee on behalf of himself or herself or others
of any right or responsibility afforded by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.87 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employee who is a whistleblower and who as a result of being
a whistleblower has been subjected to workplace reprisal or retaliatory
action has the remedies provided under chapter 49.60 RCW.
(2) The identity of a whistleblower who reports, in good faith, to
the department or to a political subdivision that regulates
conveyances, practices that may violate the provisions of this chapter
or the rules promulgated hereunder must remain confidential. The
provisions of RCW 4.24.500 through 4.24.520, providing certain
protections to persons who communicate to government agencies, apply to
such reports.

--- END ---