BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 36.87.020 and 1991 c 363 s 89 are each amended to read
as follows:
A majority of the landowners or the owners of the majority of the
frontage on any county road or portion thereof may petition the county
legislative authority to vacate and abandon the same or any portion
thereof. The petition must show the land owned by each petitioner and
set forth that such county road is useless as part of the county road
system and that the public will be benefited by its vacation and
abandonment. The legislative authority may (1) require the petitioners
to make an appropriate cash deposit or furnish an appropriate bond
against which all costs and expenses incurred in the examination,
report, and proceedings pertaining to the petition shall be charged; or
(2) by ordinance or resolution require the petitioners to pay a fee
adequate to cover such costs and expenses.

--- END ---