BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.44.037 and 1991 c 143 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 46.44.036 and subject to such
rules and regulations governing their operation as may be adopted by
the state department of transportation, operation of the following
combinations is lawful:
(1) A combination consisting of a truck tractor, a semitrailer, and
another semitrailer or a full trailer. In this combination a converter
gear used to convert a semitrailer into a full trailer shall be
considered to be a part of the full trailer and not a separate vehicle.
A converter gear being pulled without load and not used to convert a
semitrailer into a full trailer may be substituted in lieu of a full
trailer or a semitrailer in any lawful combination;
(2) A combination not exceeding seventy-five feet in overall length
consisting of four trucks or truck tractors used in driveaway service
where three of the vehicles are towed by the fourth in triple
saddlemount position;
(3) A combination consisting of a truck tractor carrying a freight
compartment no longer than eight feet, a semitrailer, and another
semitrailer or full trailer that meets the legal length requirement for
a truck and trailer combination set forth in RCW 46.44.030;
(4) A combination consisting of a motor vehicle and up to two
trailers when the operator or driver holds a commercial driver's
license. However, it is unlawful for the commercial driver's license
holder to operate a motor vehicle with two trailers on a city street
except to the extent required to gain access to or from a county road
or state highway.

--- END ---