BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.56.820 and 2008 c 122 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless otherwise delegated, only the legislature may authorize
the imposition of tolls on eligible toll facilities.
(2) All revenue from an eligible toll facility must be used only to
construct, improve, preserve, maintain, manage, or operate the eligible
toll facility on or in which the revenue is collected; however, the
toll revenue must be used exclusively for "highway purposes" as that
term is construed in Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution.
Expenditures of toll revenues are subject to appropriation and must be
made only:
(a) To cover the operating costs of the eligible toll facility,
including necessary maintenance, preservation, administration, and toll
enforcement by public law enforcement within the boundaries of the
facility;
(b) To meet obligations for the repayment of debt and interest on
the eligible toll facilities, and any other associated financing costs
including, but not limited to, required reserves and insurance;
(c) To meet any other obligations to provide funding contributions
for any projects or operations on the eligible toll facilities;
(d) To provide for the operations of conveyances of people or
goods; or
(e) For any other improvements to the eligible toll facilities.

--- END ---