BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.52.180 and 2011 c 60 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use
of facilities of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of
assisting a campaign for election of a person to an office or for the
promotion of or opposition to a ballot proposition. Knowing
acquiescence by a person with authority to direct, control, or
influence the actions of the state officer or state employee using
public resources in violation of this section constitutes a violation
of this section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not limited
to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state
employees of the agency during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the agency, and clientele lists of persons served by
the agency.
(2) This section shall not apply to the following activities:
(a) Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected
legislative body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote
upon a motion, proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support
or oppose a ballot proposition as long as (i) required notice of the
meeting includes the title and number of the ballot proposition, and
(ii) members of the legislative body or members of the public are
afforded an approximately equal opportunity for the expression of an
opposing view;
(b) A statement by an elected official in support of or in
opposition to any ballot proposition at an open press conference or in
response to a specific inquiry. For the purposes of this subsection,
it is not a violation of this section for an elected official to
respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to make
incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official
communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an
actual, measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards
shall adopt by rule a definition of measurable expenditure;
(c) The maintenance of official legislative web sites throughout
the year, regardless of pending elections. The web sites may contain
any discretionary material which was also specifically prepared for the
legislator in the course of his or her duties as a legislator,
including newsletters and press releases. The official legislative web
sites of legislators seeking reelection shall not be altered between
June 30th and November 15th of the election year. The web site shall
not be used for campaign purposes;
(d) Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of
the office or agency; ((and))
(e) De minimis use of public facilities by statewide elected
officials and legislators incidental to the preparation or delivery of
permissible communications, including written and verbal communications
initiated by them of their views on ballot propositions that
foreseeably may affect a matter that falls within their constitutional
or statutory responsibilities; and
(f) Distributions throughout a legislator's district of contact
cards, newsletters, government guides, or similar printed materials
produced with legislative resources at community centers, libraries,
senior centers, city halls, and similar civic centers or public sites
for the purpose of informing the public as to legislative matters or
providing information on how the public may contact legislators or
participate in legislative proceedings. A legislator may print or
distribute a newsletter and his or her contact information in
newspapers that are published or circulated in the legislator's
legislative district. Provided, however, that no materials may be
prepared or distributed for campaign purposes.
(3) As to state officers and employees, this section operates to
the exclusion of RCW 42.17A.555.

--- END ---