BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An omnibus operating, capital, or transportation appropriations
bill and any tax or fee bill, and any proposed substitute, striking
amendment, or conference committee report thereon, must be made
publicly available to the members of the legislature and the public at
least twenty-four hours before such a bill is eligible for a public
hearing, is eligible for legislative action, or is eligible to be voted
on by the senate or the house of representatives.
(2) A bill identified in subsection (1) of this section is not
eligible for legislative action on the floor of either the senate or
house of representatives until twenty-four hours after it has been
placed on the floor calendar.
(3) A bill identified in subsection (1) of this section is not
eligible for final passage in either house of the legislature unless
copies of the bill, in the form to be passed, have been made available
to the members of that house of the legislature and the public for at
least twenty-four hours.
(4) This section may be suspended by a two-thirds vote of the
members elected to the house of the legislature in which it is pending,
and every individual consideration of a bill or action suspending this
section must be recorded in the journal of the respective house of the
legislature.

--- END ---