BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Prior to issuing a permit or other form of development approval
in an unincorporated portion of an urban growth area, the county and
the city or cities surrounding the unincorporated portion of the urban
growth area must enter into an interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34
RCW that:
(a) Stipulates the density that will be allowed in the
unincorporated portion of the urban growth area;
(b) Specifies mitigation of transportation impacts on roads of the
surrounding city or cities; and
(c) Stipulates how urban governmental services will be funded and
provided in the unincorporated portion of the urban growth area.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies only to unincorporated
portions of urban growth areas that:
(a) Border Puget Sound;
(b) Are surrounded on the landward side entirely by one or more
cities;
(c) Are one or more miles from any other portion of an urban growth
area that is in unincorporated territory; and
(d) Are fifty or more acres in size.

--- END ---