BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.280.020 and 2009 c 565 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(2) "Conservation and efficiency resources" means any reduction in
electric power consumption that results from increases in the
efficiency of energy use, production, transmission, or distribution.
(3) "Consumer-owned utility" includes a municipal electric utility
formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title
54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, a port district formed
under Title 53 RCW, or a water-sewer district formed under Title 57
RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to one
or more retail electric customers in the state.
(4) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(5) "Electric utility" means a consumer-owned or investor-owned
utility.
(6) "Full requirements customer" means an electric utility that
relies on the Bonneville power administration for all power needed to
supply its total load requirement other than that served by
nondispatchable generating resources totaling no more than six
megawatts or renewable resources.
(7) "Governing body" means the elected board of directors, city
council, commissioners, or board of any consumer-owned utility.
(8) "High efficiency cogeneration" means the sequential production
of electricity and useful thermal energy from a common fuel source,
where, under normal operating conditions, the facility has a useful
thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total
energy output.
(9) "Integrated resource plan" means an analysis describing the mix
of generating resources and conservation and efficiency resources that
will meet current and projected needs at the lowest reasonable cost to
the utility and its ratepayers and that complies with the requirements
specified in RCW 19.280.030(1).
(10) "Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by
investors that meets the definition in RCW 80.04.010 and is engaged in
distributing electricity to more than one retail electric customer in
the state.
(11) "Lowest reasonable cost" means the lowest cost mix of
generating resources and conservation and efficiency resources
determined through a detailed and consistent analysis of a wide range
of commercially available resources. At a minimum, this analysis must
consider resource cost, market-volatility risks, demand-side resource
uncertainties, resource dispatchability, resource effect on system
operation, the risks imposed on the utility and its ratepayers, public
policies regarding resource preference and energy adopted by Washington
state or the federal government, and the cost of risks associated with
environmental effects including emissions of carbon dioxide.
(12) "Plan" means either an "integrated resource plan" or a
"resource plan."
(13) "Renewable resources" means electricity generation facilities
fueled by: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar energy; (d) geothermal
energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) biomass energy utilizing animal waste,
solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field residues or dedicated
energy crops that do not include wood pieces that have been treated
with chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or
copper-chrome-arsenic; (g) by-products of pulping or wood manufacturing
processes, including but not limited to bark, wood chips, sawdust, and
lignin in spent pulping liquors; (h) ocean thermal, wave, or tidal
power; or (i) gas from sewage treatment facilities.
(14) "Resource plan" means an assessment that estimates electricity
loads and resources over a defined period of time and complies with the
requirements in RCW 19.280.030(2).

Sec. 2 RCW 19.280.040 and 2006 c 195 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Investor-owned utilities shall submit integrated resource plans
to the commission.
(a) The commission shall acknowledge by order an integrated
resource plan that is consistent with RCW 19.280.030. In any
cost-recovery proceeding, the commission shall give considerable weight
to utility actions that are consistent with an acknowledged integrated
resource plan. The commission shall not penalize a utility for any
reasonable action that is inconsistent with an acknowledged integrated
resource plan.
(b) The commission shall reject by order any integrated resource
plan that is inconsistent with RCW 19.280.030. The commission shall
set forth the reasons for rejection and provide direction regarding any
additional analyses or actions that should be undertaken.
(c) The commission shall establish by rule the requirements for
((preparation)) preparing and ((submission of)) submitting integrated
resource plans and its guidelines for acknowledging the plans.
(2) The commission may adopt additional rules as necessary to
clarify the requirements of RCW 19.280.030 as they apply to
investor-owned utilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 19.280 RCW
to read as follows:
For any consumer-owned utility subject to the jurisdiction of the
state auditor under chapter 43.09 RCW, the department may request the
state auditor to audit a utility for compliance with RCW 19.280.050 (1)
and (2) at the discretion of the state auditor. Should the state
auditor report noncompliance with this chapter in the audit report, the
department shall note those audit findings in the report prepared under
RCW 19.280.060.

--- END ---