BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.315 and 2010 c 236 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2007-08 school year, funding for voluntary
all-day kindergarten programs shall be phased-in beginning with schools
with the highest poverty levels, defined as those schools with the
highest percentages of students qualifying for free and reduced-price
lunch support in the prior school year. During the 2011-2013 biennium,
funding shall continue to be phased-in each year until full statewide
implementation of all-day kindergarten is achieved in the 2017-18
school year. Once a school receives funding for the all-day
kindergarten program, that school shall remain eligible for funding in
subsequent school years regardless of changes in the school's
percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price lunches as
long as other program requirements are fulfilled. Additionally,
schools receiving all-day kindergarten program support shall agree to
the following conditions:
(a) Provide at least a one thousand-hour instructional program;
(b) Provide a curriculum that offers a rich, varied set of
experiences that assist students in:
(i) Developing initial skills in the academic areas of reading,
mathematics, and writing;
(ii) Developing a variety of communication skills;
(iii) Providing experiences in science, social studies, arts,
health and physical education, and a world language other than English;
(iv) Acquiring large and small motor skills;
(v) Acquiring social and emotional skills including successful
participation in learning activities as an individual and as part of a
group; and
(vi) Learning through hands-on experiences;
(c) Establish learning environments that are developmentally
appropriate and promote creativity;
(d) Beginning with the 2012-13 school year, to the extent funds are
available, identify the skills, knowledge, and characteristics of
kindergarten students at the beginning of the school year in order to
determine kindergarten readiness and inform instruction to meet the
needs of individual students. To measure these skills, knowledge, and
characteristics, kindergarten teachers must use a kindergarten
assessment process as specified by the superintendent of public
instruction, in consultation with the department of early learning, and
report the results to the superintendent. The superintendent shall
make the assessment process available on a voluntary basis at the
beginning of the 2011-12 school year. School districts shall provide
an opportunity for parents and guardians to excuse their children from
participating in the kindergarten assessment process;
(e) Demonstrate strong connections and communication with early
learning community providers; and
(((e))) (f) Participate in kindergarten program readiness
activities with early learning providers and parents.
(2) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction shall designate one or more school
districts to serve as resources and examples of best practices in
designing and operating a high-quality all-day kindergarten program.
Designated school districts shall serve as lighthouse programs and
provide technical assistance to other school districts in the initial
stages of implementing an all-day kindergarten program. Examples of
topics addressed by the technical assistance include strategic
planning, developing the instructional program and curriculum, working
with early learning providers to identify students and communicate with
parents, and developing kindergarten program readiness activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
Before the implementation of a kindergarten assessment process as
provided in RCW 28A.150.315, the director shall seek input from the
University of Washington on a kindergarten assessment process that
addresses issues such as cultural responsiveness, accommodations and
usefulness for children with disabilities, parent involvement and
satisfaction, potential for improving instruction, and cost benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect September 1, 2011.

--- END ---