BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71A.20.020 and 1994 c 215 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following residential habilitation centers are permanently
established to provide services to persons with developmental
disabilities: Lakeland Village, located at Medical Lake, Spokane
county; Rainier School, located at Buckley, Pierce county; Yakima
Valley School, located at Selah, Yakima county; Fircrest School,
located at Seattle, King county; and Frances Haddon Morgan Children's
Center, located at Bremerton, Kitsap county.
(2) Residential habilitation centers must be fostered and supported
by the state.
(3) Eligibility for admission to residential habilitation centers
must exclusively be determined under the requirements of federal law
and regulations.
(4) Any individual entitled to admission to a residential
habilitation center is entitled to a fully informed choice between
admission to a residential habilitation center or appropriate
alternatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Closure" means the decision to permanently cease operations of
a facility and terminate participation of the facility in the Title XIX
medicaid program;
(2) "Discharge" or "relocation" means the permanent movement of an
individual to another facility or place which operates independently
from the facility.
(3) "Facility" means a state-operated nursing facility or an
intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual
disabilities participating in the Title XIX medicaid program.
(4) "Resident" means a person admitted to a facility and includes
the resident's guardian or other legal representative;
(5) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services;
(6) "Transfer" means the permanent movement of an entire facility,
including residents served, staff, and records, to a new location.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 NOTIFICATION OF FACILITY CLOSURE AND GENERAL
PLAN OF CLOSURE. (1) The secretary shall submit written notification
of an impending voluntary closure of the facility to all of the
following:
(a) Federal agencies as required by law;
(b) The state long-term care ombudsman; and
(c) Residents of the facility.
(2) The written notification must be provided not later than the
date that is one hundred twenty days prior to the date of the closure.
(3) The written notification must include:
(a) A general plan for the discharge and adequate relocation of the
residents by a specified date prior to closure, including:
(i) A description of the organization and staffing implementing the
requirements in this chapter; and
(ii) Assurances that the residents will be relocated to the most
appropriate facility or other residential setting in terms of quality,
services, and location, and taking into consideration the needs,
choice, and best interests of each resident; and
(b) A description of all the steps the administrator of the
facility is required to take under section 4 of this act and the right
to a hearing under section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 IMPLEMENTATION OF DISCHARGE AND RELOCATION
OF RESIDENTS. The secretary shall, with respect to each resident, take
all of the following steps:
(1) Prepare and ensure the safe and orderly discharge and
relocation of a resident from the facility on a case-by-case basis;
(2) Prepare a final summary of the resident's developmental,
behavioral, social, health, and nutritional status, and, with the
consent of the resident, parents (if the client is a minor), or legal
guardian, provide a copy to staff implementing this section and
alternative facilities;
(3) Involve the resident and his or her family in all care,
benefit, and service decisions prompted by the transition; fully
identify, inform, and disclose the resident of all alternative
facilities and service options; and ensure that the resident exercises
a fully informed choice whether he or she wishes to move and to what
facility or place;
(4) Consistent with the requirements of an individual plan of care
under 42 C.F.R. Sec. 456.380, develop a postdischarge plan of care
based on an independent current assessment of the resident's needs for
facility care and the type of care needed, and documenting each
resident's needs and preferences and outlining plans to assist the
resident's adjustment to the new living environment;
(5) In the postdischarge plan, include the following:
(a) An assessment of the resident's medical and psychological
condition and needs, including the necessity and to prepare the
resident for discharge and relocation;
(b) An assessment that includes analysis and mediation of any risk
of death or injury resulting from changes in the location, including
shock or posttraumatic stress resulting from change of location, and
unfamiliarity with staff, surroundings, and peers;
(c) Prior notification of the resident's new facility or
residential setting is advised in writing in advance of the resident's
conditions and needs;
(d) Adequate and appropriate transportation on the day of transfer
or discharge; and
(e) Documentation that the discharge and relocation is in the best
interests of the resident; and
(6) Execute the closure, discharge, and relocation of all residents
in compliance with federal and state law, including this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RIGHT TO HEARING. (1) A resident has a
right to a hearing in the event:
(a) A proposal is made to relocate to a facility where equal or
greater services will not be provided to the resident;
(b) The secretary fails to comply with any of the requirements of
this chapter; or
(c) A resident disagrees with the postdischarge plan.
(2) The right to hearing is not exclusive of other remedies
available to the resident under state or federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RELOCATION PRIOR TO CLOSURE OF RESIDENTIAL
HABILITATION CENTER. The secretary shall ensure that, before a
facility closes, all residents of the facility have been successfully
relocated to another facility or an alternative home and community-based setting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 71A RCW.

--- END ---