BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.17.745 and 1970 ex.s. c 51 s 150 are each amended
to read as follows:
A state highway to be known as state route number 527 is
established as follows:
Beginning at a junction with state route number ((522)) 405 in the
vicinity of Bothell, thence northerly to a junction with state route
number 5 in ((the vicinity south of)) Everett.

--- END ---