BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 59.20.130 and 1999 c 359 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be the duty of the landlord to:
(1) Comply with codes, statutes, ordinances, and administrative
rules applicable to the mobile home park;
(2) Maintain the common premises and prevent the accumulation of
stagnant water and to prevent the detrimental effects of moving water
when such condition is not the fault of the tenant;
(3) Keep any shared or common premises and vacant mobile home lots
reasonably clean, sanitary, and safe from defects to reduce the hazards
of fire or accident;
(4) Keep all common premises of the mobile home park, and vacant
mobile home lots, not in the possession of tenants, free of weeds or
plant growth noxious and detrimental to the health of the tenants and
free from potentially injurious or unsightly objects and condition;
(5) Maintain, in good condition, or remove all trees that were not
planted by the current tenants;
(6) Exterminate or make a reasonable effort to exterminate rodents,
vermin, or other pests dangerous to the health and safety of the tenant
whenever infestation exists on the common premises or whenever
infestation occurs in the interior of a mobile home, manufactured home,
or park model as a result of infestation existing on the common
premises;
(((6))) (7) Maintain and protect all utilities provided to the
mobile home, manufactured home, or park model in good working
condition. Maintenance responsibility shall be determined at that
point where the normal mobile home, manufactured home, or park model
utilities "hook-ups" connect to those provided by the landlord or
utility company;
(((7))) (8) Respect the privacy of the tenants and shall have no
right of entry to a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model
without the prior written consent of the occupant, except in case of
emergency or when the occupant has abandoned the mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model. Such consent may be revoked in
writing by the occupant at any time. The ownership or management shall
have a right of entry upon the land upon which a mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model is situated for maintenance of
utilities, to insure compliance with applicable codes, statutes,
ordinances, administrative rules, and the rental agreement and the
rules of the park, and protection of the mobile home park at any
reasonable time or in an emergency, but not in a manner or at a time
which would interfere with the occupant's quiet enjoyment. The
ownership or management shall make a reasonable effort to notify the
tenant of their intention of entry upon the land which a mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model is located prior to entry;
(((8))) (9) Allow tenants freedom of choice in the purchase of
goods and services, and not unreasonably restrict access to the mobile
home park for such purposes;
(((9))) (10) Maintain roads within the mobile home park in good
condition and take reasonable steps to prevent the accumulation of
water, snow, or ice that would prevent tenants from accessing their
homes or exiting the mobile home park; and
(((10))) (11) Notify each tenant within five days after a petition
has been filed by the landlord for a change in the zoning of the land
where the mobile home park is located and make a description of the
change available to the tenant.
A landlord shall not have a duty to repair a defective condition
under this section, nor shall any defense or remedy be available to the
tenant under this chapter, if the defective condition complained of was
caused by the conduct of the tenant, the tenant's family, invitee, or
other person acting under the tenant's control, or if a tenant
unreasonably fails to allow the landlord access to the property for
purposes of repair.

--- END ---