BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that copper used
in antifouling boat bottom paints are slowly released into the water by
waterborne vessels and contribute to both water and sediment pollution.
(2) The legislature finds that contamination from boat bottom
paints containing copper is a significant contributor to water
pollution going into Puget Sound and other waters of the state.
(3) The legislature recognizes that aquatic antifouling paints are
used on vessel hulls to prevent the growth of aquatic organisms, such
as barnacles and algae. Most antifouling paints use copper or other
toxic materials to prevent the growth of aquatic organisms. Boat
bottom paints containing copper or other toxic substances may have
unintended lethal effects on other aquatic organisms, including salmon.
(4) The legislature recognizes that Washington's marine and fresh
waters are home to thousands of recreational vessels that are
unintentionally contributing to water pollution. Therefore, the
legislature intends to phase out the use of copper paints in hull
coatings used on recreational vessels and encourage the use of nontoxic
alternatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2)(a) "Recreational water vessel" means any vessel that is (i)
manufactured or used primarily for pleasure; or (ii) leased, rented, or
chartered to a person for the pleasure of that person.
(b) "Recreational water vessel" does not include a vessel that is
subject to United States coast guard inspection and that (i) is engaged
in commercial use; or (ii) carries paying passengers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 After January 1, 2017, no manufacturer,
wholesaler, retailer, or distributor may sell or offer for sale in
Washington state any new recreational water vessel with antifouling
paint containing copper.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 After January 1, 2020, no antifouling paint
containing more than 0.5 percent of copper may be offered for sale in
Washington state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) By January 1, 2017, the department must
survey the manufacturers of boat paint sold or offered for sale in
Washington state to determine the types of antifouling boat paints that
are available for sale or offered for sale in Washington state.
(2) By January 1, 2018, the department must present the findings to
the appropriate committees of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department, in consultation and
cooperation with other state natural resources agencies, must increase
education efforts regarding recreational water vessel hull cleaning to
reduce the spread of invasive species. This effort must include a
review of best practices that consider the type of antifouling paint
used and recommendations regarding appropriate hull cleaning that
includes in-water methods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A person or entity found to be in violation
of this chapter is subject to a civil fine of up to ten thousand
dollars per day per violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---