BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.04.030 and 2001 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The fish and wildlife commission consists of nine registered voters
of the state. In January of each odd-numbered year, the governor shall
appoint with the advice and consent of the senate three registered
voters to the commission to serve for terms of six years from that
January or until their successors are appointed and qualified. If a
vacancy occurs on the commission prior to the expiration of a term, the
governor shall appoint a registered voter within sixty days to complete
the term. If a member is not confirmed by the senate by the end of the
second full regular legislative session following the member's initial
appointment, that member's position is considered vacated. Three
members shall be residents of that portion of the state lying east of
the summit of the Cascade mountains, and three shall be residents of
that portion of the state lying west of the summit of the Cascade
mountains. Three additional members shall be appointed at-large. No
two members may be residents of the same county. The legal office of
the commission is at the administrative office of the department in
Olympia.

--- END ---