BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.210 and 2009 c 333 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall maintain and manage real or personal
property owned, leased, or held by the department and shall control the
construction of buildings, structures, and improvements in or on the
property. The director may adopt rules for the operation and
maintenance of the property.
(2) The commission may authorize the director to sell, lease,
convey, or grant concessions upon real or personal property under the
control of the department. This includes the authority to sell timber,
gravel, sand, and other materials or products from real property held
by the department, and to sell or lease the department's real or
personal property or grant concessions or rights-of-way for roads or
utilities in the property. Oil and gas resources owned by the state
which lie below lands owned, leased, or held by the department shall be
offered for lease by the commissioner of public lands pursuant to
chapter 79.14 RCW with the proceeds being deposited in the state
wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, the commissioner of public lands shall condition such leases
at the request of the department to protect wildlife and its habitat.
(3) In order to facilitate subsection (2) of this section as it
relates to timber sales, the department must evaluate opportunities for
and provide recommendations to the commission on timber sales from
department-managed land that would generate revenue while sustaining or
enhancing the suitability of the landscape for fish and wildlife
habitat. The evaluations and recommendations must be conducted within
existing resources, and be presented to the commission by December 1,
2012, and at least every five years thereafter.
(4) If the commission determines that real or personal property
held by the department cannot be used advantageously by the department,
the director may dispose of that property if it is in the public
interest.
(5) If the state acquired real property with use limited to
specific purposes, the director may negotiate terms for the return of
the property to the donor or grantor. Other real property shall be
sold to the highest bidder at public auction. After appraisal, notice
of the auction shall be published at least once a week for two
successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the
county where the property is located at least twenty days prior to
sale.
(6) Proceeds from the sales shall be deposited in the state
wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170. Proceeds from the sale of
timber must be deposited in the state wildlife account created in RCW
77.12.170, where consistent with the code of federal regulations, and
must be used for the operation and maintenance of department-managed
lands.

--- END ---