BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.56.370 and 2000 c 69 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person owning oil or having control over oil that enters
the waters of the state in violation of RCW 90.56.320 shall be strictly
liable, without regard to fault, for the damages to persons or
property, public or private, caused by such entry.
(2) Damages for which responsible parties are liable under this
section include loss of income, revenue, the means of producing income
or revenue, or an economic benefit resulting from an injury to or loss
of real or personal property or natural resources.
(3) Damages for which responsible parties are liable under this
section include damages provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section resulting from any action conducted in response to a violation
of RCW 90.56.320, including actions to collect, investigate, perform
surveillance over, remove, contain, treat, or disperse oil discharged
into waters of the state.
(4) In any action to recover damages resulting from the discharge
of oil in violation of RCW 90.56.320, the owner or person having
control over the oil shall be relieved from strict liability, without
regard to fault, if that person can prove that the discharge was caused
solely by:
(a) An act of war or sabotage;
(b) An act of God;
(c) Negligence on the part of the United States government; or
(d) Negligence on the part of the state of Washington.
(((3))) (5) The liability established in this section shall in no
way affect the rights which:
(a) The owner or other person having control over the oil may have
against any person whose acts may in any way have caused or contributed
to the discharge of oil((,)); or
(b) The state of Washington may have against any person whose
actions may have caused or contributed to the discharge of oil.

--- END ---