BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.56.042 and 1984 c 7 s 249 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to enter into agreements with any
county of this state and/or with an adjoining state or county thereof
for the purpose of implementing an investigation of the feasibility of
any toll bridge project for the bridging of a river forming a portion
of the boundary of this state, and the adjoining state. The department
may use funds available to it to carry out the purposes of this
subsection. These agreements may provide that if any such project is
determined to be feasible and is adopted, any advancement of funds by
any state or county may be reimbursed out of any proceeds derived from
the sale of bonds or out of tolls and revenues to be derived from the
project.
(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for the
purpose of constructing a state boundary bridge, the department shall
issue a request for proposals to interested parties that must include,
at least, the following:
(a) A requirement that the contractor comply with all applicable
laws, rules, and regulations, including those pertaining to the
environment, worker health and safety, apprenticeship utilization, and
prevailing wages; and
(b) A requirement that the department seek to use products,
materials, and components required for the construction of a state
boundary bridge that are fabricated within the boundaries of the state
of Washington or the adjoining state, or both, unless doing so would
jeopardize federal funding, and while considering factors such as the
ability to recycle and utilize recycled materials in the construction
process, the proximity of fabrication plants to the construction site,
and transportation cost and conveniences. For the purposes of this
subsection (2)(b), "construction" means fabrication by the joining
together, by welding or fastening, of all steel parts from which the
total bridge is constructed.

--- END ---