BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that health care
costs continue to grow at unsustainable rates, hindering the state's
ability to invest in other essential services such as education and
public safety, decreasing the competitiveness of our businesses, and
placing undue strain on many individuals and families.
(2) The legislature therefore intends: (a) That state agencies,
large and small businesses, and health care providers, insurers, and
consumers work together towards the goal of providing universal access
to affordable, portable health insurance products; (b) that as a means
to this end, in implementing the federal affordable care act in
Washington, including the health benefit exchange, there be a constant
focus on integrating strategies to improve the quality and
affordability of our health care delivery system, tailored to the
unique circumstances and characteristics of our state.
(3) The legislature further intends to demonstrate good progress in
the development of an exchange that aims to meet criteria established
by the health and human services department for level two funding
opportunities to support the establishment of an exchange.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The state shall establish a health benefit
exchange consistent with the federal affordable care act, P.L. 111-148,
to begin operations no later than January 1, 2014, and intended to:
(1) Increase access to quality affordable health care coverage and
reduce the number of uninsured persons in Washington state;
(2) Recognize the need for a private health insurance market to
exist outside of the exchange and the need for a regulatory framework
that applies both inside and outside of the exchange;
(3) Create an organized, transparent, and accountable health
insurance marketplace for Washingtonians to purchase affordable,
quality health care coverage, to claim available federal refundable
premium tax credits and cost-sharing subsidies, and to meet the
personal responsibility requirements for minimum essential coverage as
provided under the federal affordable care act;
(4) Recognize that the regulation of the health insurance market,
both inside and outside the exchange, should continue to be performed
by the insurance commissioner;
(5) Strengthen the state health care delivery system and maximize
existing efficiencies within the system;
(6) Promote quality improvement, cost containment, and innovative
payment structures throughout the state health care system;
(7) Increase the availability of health care coverage through the
private health insurance market to qualified individuals and small
employers;
(8) Encourage carrier competition based on price and quality, and
not on risk selection to ensure a sustainable system of health care
coverage;
(9) Promote consumer literacy and empower consumers to compare
plans and make informed decisions about their health care and coverage;
(10) Effectively and efficiently administer health care subsidies
and determination of eligibility for participation in publicly
subsidized health care programs, including the exchange;
(11) Seamlessly direct consumers to information about and
enrollment in programs in addition to those related to health care that
are available to lower income individuals and families; and
(12) Enhance portability of insurance coverage and ensure seamless
coverage options for enrollees with income and eligibility changes;
(13) Create opportunities and flexibility to address possible
future changes in federal law and funding challenges.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout sections 2 and 4 through 6 of this act, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise. Terms and phrases used in sections 2 and
4 through 6 of this act that are not defined in this section must be
defined as consistent with implementation of a state health benefit
exchange pursuant to the affordable care act.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the Washington state
health care authority, established under chapter 41.05 RCW.
(2) "Affordable care act" means the federal patient protection and
affordable care act, P.L. 111-148, as amended by the federal health
care and education reconciliation act of 2010, P.L. 111-152, or federal
regulations or guidance issued under the affordable care act.
(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority,
established under chapter 41.05 RCW.
(4) "Board" means the health benefit exchange board established
under section 4 of this act.
(5) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner, established in
Title 48 RCW.
(6) "Exchange" means a state health benefit exchange pursuant to
the affordable care act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The health benefit exchange board shall
be established as a nonprofit, public-private partnership, composed of
nine persons with expertise in the Washington state health care system
and private and public health care coverage. By September 1, 2011, the
governor shall appoint representatives from each of the following
groups:
(a) Two employee benefits specialists;
(b) A health economist or actuary;
(c) Small businesses;
(d) Health care consumer advocates;
(e) The administrator of the health care authority under chapter
41.05 RCW;
(f) The insurance commissioner or designee as a nonvoting ex
officio member; and
(g) Two appointments from a list of recommendations submitted by
the legislature. Each chamber of the legislature shall forward two
recommendations representing mutually agreed on names from each caucus.
(2) The board shall elect a chair from among its members.
(3) Board members may not have any conflicts of interest relating
to the work of the board. Board members who develop a conflict of
interest must be removed from the board.
(4) Initial members of the board shall serve staggered terms not to
exceed four years. Initial appointments must be made on or before
September 1, 2011. Members appointed thereafter shall serve two-year
terms.
(5) Members of the board must be reimbursed for their travel
expenses while on official business in accordance with RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060. The board shall prescribe rules for the conduct of its
business. Meetings of the board are at the call of the chair.
(6) The board shall conduct its business consistent with the
provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW, the open public meetings act.
Consistent with the open public meetings act, the board may hold
executive sessions to consider proprietary or confidential nonpublished
information.
(7) The board may establish technical advisory committees or seek
the advice of technical experts when necessary to execute the powers
and duties included in this act.
(8) The board is not civilly or criminally liable and may not have
any penalty or cause of action of any nature arise against them for any
action taken or not taken, including any discretionary decision or
failure to make a discretionary decision, when the action or inaction
is done in good faith and in the performance of the powers and duties
under this act. Nothing in this section prohibits legal actions
against the board to enforce the board's statutory or contractual
duties or obligations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1)(a) In consultation with the joint select
committee on health reform implementation, the board and the authority
shall apply for planning and establishment grants pursuant to the
affordable care act. Whenever possible, planning and establishment
grant applications shall allow for the possibility of partially funding
the activities of the joint select committee on health reform
implementation.
(b) The authority and the board, in consultation with the joint
select committee on health reform implementation, shall implement
provisions of the planning and establishment grants as approved by the
United States secretary of health and human services.
(2) By December 1, 2011, the authority and the board, in
consultation with the joint select committee on health reform
implementation, shall develop a broad range of options for establishing
and implementing a state-administered health benefit exchange. The
options must include analysis and recommendations on the following:
(a) The structure of the public-private partnership that will
govern the exchange, operations of the exchange, and administration of
the exchange, including:
(i) The goals and principles of governing the exchange;
(ii) The creation and implementation of a single state-administered
exchange for all geographic areas in the state that operates as the
exchange for both the individual and small employer markets by January
1, 2014;
(iii) Whether and under what circumstances the state should
consider establishment of a regionally administered multistate exchange
as an option after implementation of the single state-administered
exchange;
(iv) Whether the role of an exchange includes serving as an
aggregator of funds that comprise the premium for a health plan offered
through the exchange;
(v) The administrative, fiduciary, accounting, contracting, and
other services to be provided by the exchange;
(vi) Coordination of the exchange with other state programs;
(vii) Development of sustainable funding for administration of the
exchange as of January 1, 2015; and
(viii) Recognizing the need for expedience in determining the
structure of needed information technology, the necessary information
technology to support implementation of exchange activities.
(b) Whether to adopt and implement a federal basic health plan
option as authorized in the affordable care act, whether the federal
basic health plan option should be administered by the entity that
administers the exchange or by a state agency, and whether the federal
basic health plan option should merge risk pools for rating with any
portion of the state's medicaid program;
(c) Individual and small group market impacts, including whether
to:
(i) Merge the risk pools for rating the individual and small group
markets in the exchange and the private health insurance markets; and
(ii) Increase the small group market to firms with up to one
hundred employees;
(d) Creation of a competitive purchasing environment for qualified
health plans offered through the exchange, including promoting
participation in the exchange to a level sufficient to provide
sustainable funding for the exchange;
(e) Certifying, selecting, and facilitating the offer of individual
and small group plans through an exchange, to include designation of
qualified health plans and the levels of coverage for the plans;
(f) The role and services provided by producers and navigators,
including the option to use private insurance market brokers as
navigators;
(g) Effective implementation of risk management methods:
Reinsurance, risk corridors, risk adjustment, to include the entity
designated to operate reinsurance and risk adjustment, and the
continuing role of the Washington state health insurance pool;
(h) Participation in innovative efforts to contain costs in
Washington's markets for public and private health care coverage;
(i) Providing federal refundable premium tax credits and reduced
cost-sharing subsidies through the exchange, including the processes
and entity responsible for determining eligibility to participate in
the exchange and the cost-sharing subsidies provided through the
exchange;
(j) The staff, resources, and revenues necessary to operate and
administer an exchange for the first two years of operation; and
(k) Any other areas identified by the joint select committee on
health reform implementation.
(3)(a) In consultation with the joint select committee on health
reform implementation, the authority shall develop a work plan for the
development of options under subsection (2) of this section in
discrete, prioritized stages.
(b) The joint select committee on health reform implementation may
submit to the authority specific questions pertaining to the
establishment of a health benefit exchange under section 2 of this act.
(4) The authority shall consult with the commissioner, the joint
select committee on health reform implementation, and stakeholders
relevant to carrying out the activities required under this section,
including: (a) Educated health care consumers who are enrolled in
commercial health insurance coverage and publicly subsidized health
care programs; (b) individuals and entities with experience in
facilitating enrollment in health insurance coverage, including health
carriers, producers, and navigators; (c) representatives of small
businesses, employees of small businesses, and self-employed
individuals; (d) advocates for enrolling hard to reach populations and
populations enrolled in publicly subsidized health care programs; (e)
the office of the insurance commissioner; (f) publicly subsidized
health care programs; and (g) members in good standing of the American
academy of actuaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The authority may enter into:
(a) Information sharing agreements with federal and state agencies
and other state exchanges to carry out the provisions of this act:
PROVIDED, That, such agreements include adequate protections with
respect to the confidentiality of the information to be shared and
comply with all state and federal laws and regulations; and
(b) Interdepartmental agreements with the office of the insurance
commissioner, the department of social and health services, the
department of health, and any other state agencies necessary to
implement this act.
(2) To the extent funding is available, the authority shall:
(a) Provide staff and resources to implement this act;
(b) Manage and administer the grant and other funds;
(c) Expend funds specifically appropriated by the legislature to
implement the provisions of this act; and
(d) Adopt all rules necessary for the implementation of this act.
All rules must be adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 41.05 RCW.

--- END ---