BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.63.161 and 2004 c 210 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After June 10, 2004, a city may designate a new manufactured
housing community as a nonconforming use, but may not order the removal
or phased elimination of an existing manufactured housing community
because of its status as a nonconforming use.
(2) A city may not prohibit the entry or require the removal of a
manufactured/mobile home, park model, or recreational vehicle
authorized in a manufactured housing community under chapter 59.20 RCW
on the basis of the community's status as a nonconforming use.

Sec. 2 RCW 35A.63.146 and 2004 c 210 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After June 10, 2004, a code city may designate a manufactured
housing community as a nonconforming use, but may not order the removal
or phased elimination of an existing manufactured housing community
because of its status as a nonconforming use.
(2) A code city may not prohibit the entry or require the removal
of a manufactured/mobile home, park model, or recreational vehicle
authorized in a manufactured housing community under chapter 59.20 RCW
on the basis of the community's status as a nonconforming use.

Sec. 3 RCW 36.70.493 and 2004 c 210 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After June 10, 2004, a county may designate a manufactured
housing community as a nonconforming use, but may not order the removal
or phased elimination of an existing manufactured housing community
because of its status as a nonconforming use.
(2) A county may not prohibit the entry or require the removal of
a manufactured/mobile home, park model, or recreational vehicle
authorized in a manufactured housing community under chapter 59.20 RCW
on the basis of the community's status as a nonconforming use.

--- END ---