BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that effective
collaboration and communication between mental health and chemical
dependency treatment providers and service delivery systems and law
enforcement and criminal justice agencies is important to both the care
of persons with mental disorders and chemical dependency and public
safety. The legislature also finds that many state and local efforts
in recent years have worked to address improved treatment of persons
with mental disorders, chemical dependency disorders, or co-occurring
mental and substance abuse disorders who are confined in a correctional
institution and to improve communication and collaboration among the
agencies, institutions, and professionals who are responsible for the
care or custody of those persons. While numerous laws have been
enacted to clarify the appropriate sharing of information between those
agencies, institutions, and professionals, the legislature finds
further clarification will continue to aide and improve the care of
those persons and augment public safety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
It is permissible to provide to a correctional institution, as
defined in RCW 9.94.049, with the fact, place, and date of an
involuntary commitment and the fact and date of discharge or release of
a person who has been involuntarily committed under chapter 71.05,
71.34, 70.96A, or 70.96B RCW, without a person's consent, in the course
of the implementation and use of the department's postinstitutional
medical assistance system supporting the expedited medical
determinations and medical suspensions as provided in RCW 74.09.555.
Disclosure under this section is mandatory for the purposes of the
health insurance portability and accountability act.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.05.190 and 1997 c 112 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
If the person is not approved for admission by a facility providing
seventy-two hour evaluation and treatment, and the individual has not
been arrested, the facility shall furnish transportation, if not
otherwise available, for the person to his or her place of residence or
other appropriate place. If the individual has been arrested, the
evaluation and treatment facility shall detain the individual for not
more than eight hours at the request of the peace officer. The
facility shall make reasonable attempts to contact the requesting peace
officer during this time to inform the peace officer that the person is
not approved for admission in order to enable a peace officer to return
to the facility and take the individual back into custody.

Sec. 4 RCW 71.05.390 and 2009 c 320 s 3 and 2009 c 217 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as provided in this section, RCW 71.05.445, 71.05.630,
70.96A.150, 71.05.385, section 2 of this act, or pursuant to a valid
release under RCW 70.02.030, the fact of admission and all information
and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of
providing services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of
services at public or private agencies shall be confidential.
Information and records may be disclosed only:
(1) In communications between qualified professional persons to
meet the requirements of this chapter, in the provision of services or
appropriate referrals, or in the course of guardianship proceedings.
The consent of the person, or his or her personal representative or
guardian, shall be obtained before information or records may be
disclosed by a professional person employed by a facility unless
provided to a professional person:
(a) Employed by the facility;
(b) Who has medical responsibility for the patient's care;
(c) Who is a designated mental health professional;
(d) Who is providing services under chapter 71.24 RCW;
(e) Who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where
the person is confined or supervised; or
(f) Who is providing evaluation, treatment, or follow-up services
under chapter 10.77 RCW.
(2) When the communications regard the special needs of a patient
and the necessary circumstances giving rise to such needs and the
disclosure is made by a facility providing services to the operator of
a facility in which the patient resides or will reside.
(3)(a) When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian,
designates persons to whom information or records may be released, or
if the person is a minor, when his or her parents make such
designation.
(b) A public or private agency shall release to a person's next of
kin, attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator, if
any:
(i) The information that the person is presently a patient in the
facility or that the person is seriously physically ill;
(ii) A statement evaluating the mental and physical condition of
the patient, and a statement of the probable duration of the patient's
confinement, if such information is requested by the next of kin,
attorney, personal representative, guardian, or conservator; and
(iii) Such other information requested by the next of kin or
attorney as may be necessary to decide whether or not proceedings
should be instituted to appoint a guardian or conservator.
(4) To the extent necessary for a recipient to make a claim, or for
a claim to be made on behalf of a recipient for aid, insurance, or
medical assistance to which he or she may be entitled.
(5)(a) For either program evaluation or research, or both:
PROVIDED, That the secretary adopts rules for the conduct of the
evaluation or research, or both. Such rules shall include, but need
not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and researchers
must sign an oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning
persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency,
or person) I, . . . . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or
otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any
information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research
regarding persons who have received services such that the person who
received such services is identifiable.
I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information
may subject me to civil liability under the provisions of state law.

/s/ . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the
compilation and publication of statistical data for use by government
or researchers under standards, including standards to assure
maintenance of confidentiality, set forth by the secretary.
(6)(a) To the courts as necessary to the administration of this
chapter or to a court ordering an evaluation or treatment under chapter
10.77 RCW solely for the purpose of preventing the entry of any
evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any order
entered under this chapter.
(b) To a court or its designee in which a motion under chapter
10.77 RCW has been made for involuntary medication of a defendant for
the purpose of competency restoration.
(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purpose
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(7)(a) When a mental health professional is requested by a
representative of a law enforcement or corrections agency, including a
police officer, sheriff, community corrections officer, a municipal
attorney, or prosecuting attorney to undertake an investigation or
provide treatment under RCW 71.05.150, 10.31.110, or 71.05.153, the
mental health professional shall, if requested to do so, advise the
representative in writing of the results of the investigation including
a statement of reasons for the decision to detain or release the person
investigated. Such written report shall be submitted within seventy-two hours of the completion of the investigation or the request from
the law enforcement or corrections representative, whichever occurs
later.
(b) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(8) To the attorney of the detained person.
(9) To the prosecuting attorney as necessary to carry out the
responsibilities of the office under RCW 71.05.330(2) and
71.05.340(1)(b) and 71.05.335. The prosecutor shall be provided access
to records regarding the committed person's treatment and prognosis,
medication, behavior problems, and other records relevant to the issue
of whether treatment less restrictive than inpatient treatment is in
the best interest of the committed person or others. Information shall
be disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person and the
person's counsel.
(10)(a) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person,
when the identity of the person is known to the public or private
agency, whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to
have been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may
designate a representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure
shall be made by the professional person in charge of the public or
private agency or his or her designee and shall include the dates of
commitment, admission, discharge, or release, authorized or
unauthorized absence from the agency's facility, and only such other
information that is pertinent to the threat or harassment. The
decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for the
agency or its employees so long as the decision was reached in good
faith and without gross negligence.
(b) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(11)(a) To appropriate corrections and law enforcement agencies all
necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent
situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public.
The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for
the mental health service provider or its employees so long as the
decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence.
(b) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(12) To the persons designated in RCW 71.05.425 and 71.05.385 for
the purposes described in those sections.
(13) Civil liability and immunity for the release of information
about a particular person who is committed to the department under RCW
71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(3)(c) after dismissal of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030, is governed by RCW 4.24.550.
(14) Upon the death of a person, his or her next of kin, personal
representative, guardian, or conservator, if any, shall be notified.
Next of kin who are of legal age and competent shall be notified
under this section in the following order: Spouse, parents, children,
brothers and sisters, and other relatives according to the degree of
relation. Access to all records and information compiled, obtained, or
maintained in the course of providing services to a deceased patient
shall be governed by RCW 70.02.140.
(15) To the department of health for the purposes of determining
compliance with state or federal licensure, certification, or
registration rules or laws. However, the information and records
obtained under this subsection are exempt from public inspection and
copying pursuant to chapter 42.56 RCW.
(16) To mark headstones or otherwise memorialize patients interred
at state hospital cemeteries. The department of social and health
services shall make available the name, date of birth, and date of
death of patients buried in state hospital cemeteries fifty years after
the death of a patient.
(17) To law enforcement officers and to prosecuting attorneys as
are necessary to enforce RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(ii). The extent of
information that may be released is limited as follows:
(a) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, an
official copy of any order or orders of commitment, and an official
copy of any written or oral notice of ineligibility to possess a
firearm that was provided to the person pursuant to RCW 9.41.047(1),
shall be disclosed upon request;
(b) The law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may only release
the information obtained to the person's attorney as required by court
rule and to a jury or judge, if a jury is waived, that presides over
any trial at which the person is charged with violating RCW
9.41.040(2)(a)(ii);
(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
(18) When a patient would otherwise be subject to the provisions of
this section and disclosure is necessary for the protection of the
patient or others due to his or her unauthorized disappearance from the
facility, and his or her whereabouts is unknown, notice of such
disappearance, along with relevant information, may be made to
relatives, the department of corrections when the person is under the
supervision of the department, and governmental law enforcement
agencies designated by the physician or psychiatric advanced registered
nurse practitioner in charge of the patient or the professional person
in charge of the facility, or his or her professional designee.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the uniform health
care information act, chapter 70.02 RCW, applies to all records and
information compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of
providing services.
(19) The fact of admission, as well as all records, files,
evidence, findings, or orders made, prepared, collected, or maintained
pursuant to this chapter shall not be admissible as evidence in any
legal proceeding outside this chapter without the written consent of
the person who was the subject of the proceeding except as provided in
RCW 71.05.385, in a subsequent criminal prosecution of a person
committed pursuant to RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c) on charges
that were dismissed pursuant to chapter 10.77 RCW due to incompetency
to stand trial, in a civil commitment proceeding pursuant to chapter
71.09 RCW, or, in the case of a minor, a guardianship or dependency
proceeding. The records and files maintained in any court proceeding
pursuant to this chapter shall be confidential and available subsequent
to such proceedings only to the person who was the subject of the
proceeding or his or her attorney. In addition, the court may order
the subsequent release or use of such records or files only upon good
cause shown if the court finds that appropriate safeguards for strict
confidentiality are and will be maintained.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.05.425 and 2009 c 521 s 158 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the
earliest possible date, and in no event later than thirty days before
conditional release, final release, authorized leave under RCW
71.05.325(2), or transfer to a facility other than a state mental
hospital, the superintendent shall send written notice of conditional
release, release, authorized leave, or transfer of a person committed
under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c) following dismissal of a sex,
violent, or felony harassment offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4) to
the following:
(i) The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the person
will reside; and
(ii) The sheriff of the county in which the person will reside.
(b) The same notice as required by (a) of this subsection shall be
sent to the following, if such notice has been requested in writing
about a specific person committed under RCW 71.05.280(3) or
71.05.320(3)(c) following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony
harassment offense pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4):
(i) The victim of the sex, violent, or felony harassment offense
that was dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4) preceding commitment
under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c) or the victim's next of kin
if the crime was a homicide;
(ii) Any witnesses who testified against the person in any court
proceedings; ((and))
(iii) Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.
Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the
notice, information regarding any other person specified in writing by
the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the notice are
confidential and shall not be available to the person committed under
this chapter; and
(iv) The chief of police of the city, if any, and the sheriff of
the county, if any, which had jurisdiction of the person on the date of
the applicable offense.
(c) The thirty-day notice requirements contained in this subsection
shall not apply to emergency medical transfers.
(d) The existence of the notice requirements in this subsection
will not require any extension of the release date in the event the
release plan changes after notification.
(2) If a person committed under RCW 71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(3)(c)
following dismissal of a sex, violent, or felony harassment offense
pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4) escapes, the superintendent shall
immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means
available, the chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the
county in which the person escaped and in which the person resided
immediately before the person's arrest. If previously requested, the
superintendent shall also notify the witnesses and the victim of the
sex, violent, or felony harassment offense that was dismissed pursuant
to RCW 10.77.086(4) preceding commitment under RCW 71.05.280(3) or
71.05.320(3) or the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide.
In addition, the secretary shall also notify appropriate parties
pursuant to RCW 71.05.390(18). If the person is recaptured, the
superintendent shall send notice to the persons designated in this
subsection as soon as possible but in no event later than two working
days after the department learns of such recapture.
(3) If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is
under the age of sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be
sent to the parent or legal guardian of the child.
(4) The superintendent shall send the notices required by this
chapter to the last address provided to the department by the
requesting party. The requesting party shall furnish the department
with a current address.
(5) For purposes of this section the following terms have the
following meanings:
(a) "Violent offense" means a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) "Sex offense" means a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030;
(c) "Next of kin" means a person's spouse, state registered
domestic partner, parents, siblings, and children;
(d) "Felony harassment offense" means a crime of harassment as
defined in RCW 9A.46.060 that is a felony.

Sec. 6 RCW 10.77.165 and 2010 c 28 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event of an escape by a person committed under this
chapter from a state facility or the disappearance of such a person on
conditional release or other authorized absence, the superintendent
shall provide notification of the person's escape or disappearance for
the public's safety or to assist in the apprehension of the person.
(a) The superintendent shall notify:
(i) State and local law enforcement officers located in the city
and county where the person escaped and in the city and county which
had jurisdiction of the person on the date of the applicable offense;
(ii) Other appropriate governmental agencies; and
(iii) The person's relatives.
(b) The superintendent shall provide the same notification as
required by (a) of this subsection to the following, if such notice has
been requested in writing about a specific person committed under this
chapter:
(i) The victim of the crime for which the person was convicted or
the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide;
(ii) Any witnesses who testified against the person in any court
proceedings if the person was charged with a violent offense; and
(iii) Any other appropriate persons.
(2) Information regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses
requesting the notice, information regarding any other person specified
in writing by the prosecuting attorney to receive the notice, and the
notice are confidential and shall not be available to the person
committed under this chapter.
(3) The notice provisions of this section are in addition to those
provided in RCW 10.77.205.

Sec. 7 RCW 10.31.110 and 2007 c 375 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a police officer has reasonable cause to believe that the
individual has committed acts constituting a nonfelony crime that is
not a serious offense as identified in RCW 10.77.092 and the individual
is known by history or consultation with the regional support network
to suffer from a mental disorder, the arresting officer may:
(a) Take the individual to a crisis stabilization unit as defined
in RCW 71.05.020(6). Individuals delivered to a crisis stabilization
unit pursuant to this section may be held by the facility for a period
of up to twelve hours((: PROVIDED, that they are)). The individual
must be examined by a mental health professional within three hours of
((their)) arrival;
(b) Refer the individual to a mental health professional for
evaluation for initial detention and proceeding under chapter 71.05
RCW; or
(c) Release the individual upon agreement to voluntary
participation in outpatient treatment.
(2) If the individual is released to the community, the mental
health provider shall inform the arresting officer of the release
within a reasonable period of time after the release if the arresting
officer has specifically requested notification and provided contact
information to the provider.
(3) In deciding whether to refer the individual to treatment under
this section, the police officer shall be guided by standards mutually
agreed upon with the prosecuting authority, which address, at a
minimum, the length, seriousness, and recency of the known criminal
history of the individual, the mental health history of the individual,
where available, and the circumstances surrounding the commission of
the alleged offense.
(((3))) (4) Any agreement to participate in treatment shall not
require individuals to stipulate to any of the alleged facts regarding
the criminal activity as a prerequisite to participation in a mental
health treatment alternative. The agreement is inadmissible in any
criminal or civil proceeding. The agreement does not create immunity
from prosecution for the alleged criminal activity.
(((4))) (5) If an individual violates such agreement and the mental
health treatment alternative is no longer appropriate:
(a) The mental health provider shall inform the referring law
enforcement agency of the violation; and
(b) The original charges may be filed or referred to the
prosecutor, as appropriate, and the matter may proceed accordingly.
(((5))) (6) The police officer is immune from liability for any
good faith conduct under this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.96B.045 and 2007 c 120 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a designated crisis responder receives information alleging
that a person, as the result of:
(a) A mental disorder, presents an imminent likelihood of serious
harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after
investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the
reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the
information if any, the designated crisis responder may take the
person, or cause by oral or written order the person to be taken into
emergency custody in an evaluation and treatment facility for not more
than seventy-two hours as described in this chapter; or
(b) Chemical dependency, presents an imminent likelihood of serious
harm, or is in imminent danger because of being gravely disabled, after
investigation and evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the
reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing the
information if any, the designated crisis responder may take the
person, or cause by oral or written order the person to be taken into
emergency custody in a secure detoxification facility for not more than
seventy-two hours as described in this chapter.
(2) The evaluation and treatment facility, the secure
detoxification facility, or other certified chemical dependency
provider shall then evaluate the person's condition and admit, detain,
transfer, or discharge such person in accordance with this chapter.
The facility shall notify in writing the court and the designated
crisis responder of the date and time of the initial detention of each
person involuntarily detained so that a probable cause hearing will be
held no later than seventy-two hours after detention.
(3) A peace officer may take or cause the person to be taken into
custody and immediately delivered to an evaluation and treatment
facility, secure detoxification facility, or other certified chemical
dependency treatment provider: (a) Pursuant to this section; or (b)
when he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person, as a
result of a mental disorder or chemical dependency, presents an
imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent danger because
of being gravely disabled. An individual brought to a facility by a
peace officer may be held for up to twelve hours((: PROVIDED, That)).
The individual ((is)) must be examined by a designated crisis responder
within three hours of arrival. Within twelve hours of arrival the
designated crisis responder must determine whether the individual meets
detention criteria. If the individual is detained, the designated
mental health professional shall file a petition for detention or
supplemental petition as appropriate and commence service on the
designated attorney for the detained person. If the individual is
released to the community, the mental health provider shall inform the
peace officer of the release within a reasonable period of time after
the release if the peace officer has specifically requested
notification and provided contact information to the provider.
(4) Nothing in this chapter limits the power of a peace officer to
take a person into custody and immediately deliver the person to the
emergency department of a local hospital or to a detoxification
facility.

Sec. 9 RCW 71.05.153 and 2007 c 375 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When a designated mental health professional receives
information alleging that a person, as the result of a mental disorder,
presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm, or is in imminent
danger because of being gravely disabled, after investigation and
evaluation of the specific facts alleged and of the reliability and
credibility of the person or persons providing the information if any,
the designated mental health professional may take such person, or
cause by oral or written order such person to be taken into emergency
custody in an evaluation and treatment facility for not more than
seventy-two hours as described in RCW 71.05.180.
(2) A peace officer may take or cause such person to be taken into
custody and immediately delivered to a crisis stabilization unit, an
evaluation and treatment facility, or the emergency department of a
local hospital under the following circumstances:
(a) Pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) When he or she has reasonable cause to believe that such person
is suffering from a mental disorder and presents an imminent likelihood
of serious harm or is in imminent danger because of being gravely
disabled.
(3) Persons delivered to a crisis stabilization unit, evaluation
and treatment facility, or the emergency department of a local hospital
by peace officers pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may be
held by the facility for a period of up to twelve hours: PROVIDED,
That they are examined by a mental health professional within three
hours of their arrival. Within twelve hours of their arrival, the
designated mental health professional must determine whether the
individual meets detention criteria. If the individual is detained,
the designated mental health professional shall file a petition for
detention or a supplemental petition as appropriate and commence
service on the designated attorney for the detained person. If the
individual is released to the community, the mental health provider
shall inform the peace officer of the release within a reasonable
period of time after the release if the peace officer has specifically
requested notification and provided contact information to the
provider.

Sec. 10 RCW 71.34.340 and 2005 c 453 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The fact of admission and all information obtained through
treatment under this chapter is confidential. Confidential information
may be disclosed only:
(1) In communications between mental health professionals to meet
the requirements of this chapter, in the provision of services to the
minor, or in making appropriate referrals;
(2) In the course of guardianship or dependency proceedings;
(3) To persons with medical responsibility for the minor's care;
(4) To the minor, the minor's parent, and the minor's attorney,
subject to RCW 13.50.100;
(5) When the minor or the minor's parent designates in writing the
persons to whom information or records may be released;
(6) To the extent necessary to make a claim for financial aid,
insurance, or medical assistance to which the minor may be entitled or
for the collection of fees or costs due to providers for services
rendered under this chapter;
(7) To the courts as necessary to the administration of this
chapter;
(8) To law enforcement officers or public health officers as
necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their office. However,
only the fact and date of admission, and the date of discharge, the
name and address of the treatment provider, if any, and the last known
address shall be disclosed upon request;
(9) To law enforcement officers, public health officers, relatives,
and other governmental law enforcement agencies, if a minor has escaped
from custody, disappeared from an evaluation and treatment facility,
violated conditions of a less restrictive treatment order, or failed to
return from an authorized leave, and then only such information as may
be necessary to provide for public safety or to assist in the
apprehension of the minor. The officers are obligated to keep the
information confidential in accordance with this chapter;
(10) To the secretary for assistance in data collection and program
evaluation or research, provided that the secretary adopts rules for
the conduct of such evaluation and research. The rules shall include,
but need not be limited to, the requirement that all evaluators and
researchers sign an oath of confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning
persons who have received services from (fill in the facility, agency,
or person) I, . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or otherwise
make known to unauthorized persons or the public any information
obtained in the course of such evaluation or research regarding minors
who have received services in a manner such that the minor is
identifiable.
I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information
may subject me to civil liability under state law.

/s/ . . . . . . . . . . . . "

(11) To appropriate law enforcement agencies, upon request, all
necessary and relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent
situation that poses a significant and imminent risk to the public.
The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for
the mental health service provider or its employees so long as the
decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence;
(12) To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when
the identity of the person is known to the public or private agency,
whose health and safety has been threatened, or who is known to have
been repeatedly harassed, by the patient. The person may designate a
representative to receive the disclosure. The disclosure shall be made
by the professional person in charge of the public or private agency or
his or her designee and shall include the dates of admission,
discharge, authorized or unauthorized absence from the agency's
facility, and only such other information that is pertinent to the
threat or harassment. The decision to disclose or not shall not result
in civil liability for the agency or its employees so long as the
decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence;
(13) To a minor's next of kin, attorney, guardian, or conservator,
if any, the information that the minor is presently in the facility or
that the minor is seriously physically ill and a statement evaluating
the mental and physical condition of the minor as well as a statement
of the probable duration of the minor's confinement;
(14) Upon the death of a minor, to the minor's next of kin;
(15) To a facility in which the minor resides or will reside;
(16) To law enforcement officers and to prosecuting attorneys as
are necessary to enforce RCW 9.41.040(2)(a)(ii). The extent of
information that may be released is limited as follows:
(a) Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary commitment, an
official copy of any order or orders of commitment, and an official
copy of any written or oral notice of ineligibility to possess a
firearm that was provided to the person pursuant to RCW 9.41.047(1),
shall be disclosed upon request;
(b) The law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may only release
the information obtained to the person's attorney as required by court
rule and to a jury or judge, if a jury is waived, that presides over
any trial at which the person is charged with violating RCW
9.41.040(2)(a)(ii);
(c) Disclosure under this subsection is mandatory for the purposes
of the health insurance portability and accountability act.
This section shall not be construed to prohibit the compilation and
publication of statistical data for use by government or researchers
under standards, including standards to assure maintenance of
confidentiality, set forth by the secretary. The fact of admission and
all information obtained pursuant to this chapter are not admissible as
evidence in any legal proceeding outside this chapter, except
guardianship or dependency, without the written consent of the minor or
the minor's parent;
(17) For the purpose of a correctional facility participating in
the postinstitutional medical assistance system supporting the
expedited medical determinations and medical suspensions as provided in
RCW 74.09.555 and section 2 of this act.

Sec. 11 RCW 70.02.900 and 2000 c 5 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter does not restrict a health care provider, a third-party payor, or an insurer regulated under Title 48 RCW from complying
with obligations imposed by federal or state health care payment
programs or federal or state law.
(2) This chapter does not modify the terms and conditions of
disclosure under Title 51 RCW and chapters 13.50, 26.09, 70.24,
((70.39,)) 70.96A, 71.05, ((and)) 71.34, and 74.09 RCW and rules
adopted under these provisions.

--- END ---