BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.135.130 and 2009 c 43 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This section applies only to health care assistants certified
in categories C or E by the department of health.
(2)(a) The administration of drugs by a health care assistant is
restricted to oral, topical, rectal, otic, ophthalmic, or inhaled
routes administered pursuant to a written order of a supervising health
care practitioner. The drugs authorized for administration under this
section are limited to the following:
(i) Over-the-counter drugs that may be administered to a patient
while in the care of a health care practitioner are: Benadryl,
acetaminophen, ibuprofen, aspirin, neosporin, polysporin, normal
saline, colace, kenalog, and hydrocortisone cream;
(ii) Nonover-the-counter unit dose legend drugs that may be
administered to a patient while in the care of a health care
practitioner are: Kenalog, hydrocortisone cream, reglan, compazine,
zofran, bactroban, albuterol, xopenex, silvadene, gastrointestinal
cocktail, fluoride, lmx cream, emla, lat, optic dyes, oral contrast,
and oxygen.
(b) ((Only health care assistants who are certified as category C
or E assistants by the department of health may administer the oral
drugs specified in (a) of this subsection.
(c))) Health care assistants authorized to administer certain over-the-counter and legend drugs under (((a) of)) this ((subsection))
section must demonstrate initial and ongoing competency to administer
specific drugs as determined by the health care practitioner.
(((2))) (3) A health care practitioner must administer a medication
if:
(a) A patient is unable to physically ingest or safely apply a
medication independently or with assistance; or
(b) A patient is unable to indicate an awareness that he or she is
taking a medication.
(((3))) (4) This section expires July 1, 2013.

--- END ---