BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that persons who
have been wrongly convicted and imprisoned for crimes they did not
commit have been uniquely victimized and have suffered tremendous
injustice by being stripped of their lives and liberty and forced to
endure the horror of prison. The legislature also finds that a
majority of those wrongly convicted do not have legal redress to
recover damages in order to restore their lives. Thus, the legislature
intends to provide compassionate assistance to those who have been
convicted and imprisoned for crimes they did not commit in
acknowledgment of the unique circumstances they face.
(2) The legislature also recognizes that resources in addition to
monetary compensation, including access to physical and mental health
care and job training, are critically important tools for those wrongly
convicted to begin restoring their lives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Any person convicted in a superior court
of the state of Washington and subsequently imprisoned for one or more
felonies of which he or she is actually innocent may file a claim for
compensation and damages against the state.
(2) For purposes of this chapter, a person is:
(a) "Actually innocent" of a felony if he or she did not commit any
of the acts charged in the accusatory instrument, or the person's acts
or omissions charged in the accusatory instrument did not constitute a
crime;
(b) "Wrongly convicted" if he or she was charged, convicted, and
imprisoned for one or more felonies of which he or she is actually
innocent.
(3) If the person entitled to file a claim under subsection (1) of
this section is incapacitated and incapable of filing the claim, or if
he or she is a minor, or is a nonresident of the state, the claim may
be filed on behalf of that person by any relative, attorney, or agent
acting as the person's representative.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All claims of wrongful conviction and
imprisonment shall be filed with the risk management division.
(2) All claims of wrongful conviction and imprisonment shall be
reviewed by the risk management division to determine an initial
valuation, and to delegate to the appropriate officer to investigate,
negotiate, compromise, and settle the claim.
(3) All claims of wrongful conviction and imprisonment that result
in a lawsuit shall be forwarded to the attorney general's office.
Thereafter the attorney general and the risk management division shall
collaborate in the investigation, denial, or settlement of the claim.
(4) The valuation of a specific claim of wrongful conviction and
imprisonment against the state shall be privileged and confidential.
(5) "Risk management division" means the division of the office of
financial management that carries out the powers and duties under this
chapter relating to claim filing, claims administration, and claims
payment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) In order to file a claim for wrongful
conviction and imprisonment, the claimant must establish by documentary
evidence that:
(a) The claimant has been convicted of one or more felonies in a
superior court of the state of Washington and subsequently sentenced to
a term of imprisonment, and has served all or part of the sentence;
(b)(i) The claimant is not currently incarcerated for any offense;
and
(ii) During the period of confinement for which the claimant is
seeking compensation, the claimant was not serving a term of
imprisonment or a concurrent sentence for any crime other than the
felony or felonies for which the claimant was sentenced and which are
grounds for the compensation claim;
(c)(i) The claimant's judgment of conviction was reversed or
vacated and the accusatory instrument dismissed on the basis of
significant new information dispositive in extent or exculpatory in
nature or, if a new trial was ordered following the presentation of
significant new information, either the claimant was found not guilty
at the new trial or the claimant was not retried and the accusatory
instrument dismissed; or
(ii) The statute on which the accusatory instrument was based or
the application of the statute violated the Constitution of the United
States or the state Constitution; and
(d) The claim is not time-barred by the provisions of section 10 of
this act.
(2) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section, the claim shall state facts in sufficient detail for the
division of risk management to determine that:
(a) The claimant did not commit any of the acts charged in the
accusatory instrument or the claimant's acts or omissions charged in
the accusatory instrument did not constitute a crime; and
(b) The claimant did not commit or suborn perjury, or fabricate
evidence to cause or bring about the conviction. A guilty plea to a
crime the claimant did not commit, or a confession that is proven to be
false, does not constitute perjury or fabricated evidence under this
subsection.
(3) The claimant shall verify the claim unless he or she is
incapacitated, in which case the person filing on behalf of the
claimant shall verify the claim.
(4) The office of the county prosecuting attorney responsible for
charging and prosecuting the felony or felonies for which the claimant
was sentenced and which are grounds for the complaint is not a party to
the action, but may submit information to the division of risk
management related to a claim for compensation under this section.
(5)(a) If the division of risk management finds after reading the
claim that the claimant does not meet the filing criteria set forth in
both this section and section 2 of this act, it shall reject the claim.
(b) If the division of risk management rejects the claim, the
division shall set forth the reasons for its decision in writing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) If the division of risk management finds
that the claimant meets all the requirements set out in sections 2 and
4 of this act then the claimant must be awarded:
(a) Compensation, as adjusted for partial years served and to
account for inflation from the effective date of this section, of:
(i) Fifty thousand dollars for each year of actual confinement
including time spent awaiting trial; and
(ii) Twenty-five thousand dollars for each year served on death
row; and
(iii) Twenty-five thousand dollars for each year served on parole,
community custody, or as a registered sex offender pursuant to the
felony or felonies which are grounds for the compensation claim;
(b) Compensation for child support payments owed by the claimant
that became due and interest on child support arrearages that accrued
while the claimant was in custody on the felony or felonies which are
grounds for the compensation claim. Such funds shall be paid on the
person's behalf in a lump-sum payment to the department of social and
health services for distribution to the obligee under the child support
order;
(c) Costs associated with the claimant's criminal defense at trial
and on appeal;
(d) Reimbursement for all restitution, assessments, fees, and any
other sums paid by the claimant as required by the judgment and
sentence;
(e) Reimbursement for any reasonable reintegrative services and
mental, physical health, and dental care costs incurred by the claimant
in the time period between his or her release from custody and the date
of the award; and
(f) Reasonable attorneys' fees for successfully bringing the
wrongful conviction claim. The attorneys' fees shall be calculated at
ten percent of the damage award, as calculated under (a) through (e) of
this subsection, plus expenses. However, attorneys' fees, exclusive of
expenses, shall not exceed seventy-five thousand dollars. These fees
shall not be deducted from the compensation due to the claimant and
counsel shall not be entitled to receive additional fees from the
client. The risk management division may not award any attorneys' fees
to the claimant if the claimant fails to prove he or she was wrongly
convicted.
(2) The compensation and damage award shall not include any
punitive damages.
(3) The compensation and damage award shall not be offset by any
expenses incurred by the state or any political subdivision of the
state including, but not limited to, expenses incurred to secure the
claimant's custody, or to feed, clothe, or provide medical services for
the claimant. The risk management division shall not offset against
the award the value of any services or reduction in fees for services
to be provided to the claimant as part of the damages awarded to the
claimant pursuant to this section.
(4)(a) A person awarded compensation under this section is entitled
to an annuity payment, based on a preset value sum equal to the total
amount to which the person is awarded under this section.
(b) The annuity payments under this section are payable in equal
monthly installments for the life of the clamant and must be based on
a five percent per annum interest rate and other actuarial factors
within the discretion of the risk management division.
(c) The annuity payments may not be accelerated, deferred,
increased, or decreased. The claimant may not sell, mortgage or
otherwise encumber, or anticipate the payments, wholly or partly, by
assignment or otherwise.
(5) Upon a finding that the claimant has met the requirements set
out in sections 2 and 4 of this act, the risk management division must
award up to ten years of eligibility to participate in the health and
dental insurance plans and contracts offered by the public employees'
benefits board. The risk management division shall direct the health
care authority to enroll the claimant and his or her dependent children
and spouse or domestic partner as provided for in section 10 of this
act. The risk management division shall specify the amount of time for
which the claimant and his or her dependent children and spouse or
domestic partner are eligible to receive benefits, and that the
claimant and his or her dependent children and spouse or domestic
partner shall not be responsible for any costs associated with
participation.
(6) Upon request of the claimant, the risk management division
shall refer the claimant to the department of corrections, the
employment security department, or the department of social and health
services for access to reentry services, if available, including but
not limited to the community-based transition programs and long-term
support programs for education, mentoring, life skills training,
assessment, job skills development, and mental health and substance
abuse treatment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The risk management division shall not
make any payment of claims for monetary compensation under section 5
subsections (1) through (4) until July 1, 2015.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Claims approved by the risk management
division shall be submitted to the legislature for appropriation in the
same manner as judgments against the state under RCW 4.92.040(4)
through (6).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A person who files a claim under this
chapter may appeal the decision of the risk management division if the
claim:
(a) Is denied; or
(b) Is disputed by the person filing the claim and the person
disagrees with the amount of compensation determined by the risk
management division.
(2) In the case of denial of a claim, review of the risk management
division decision shall be de novo.
(3) The venue for such action shall be governed by RCW 4.92.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 On or after the effective date of this
section, when a court grants judicial relief, such as reversal and
vacation of a person's conviction, consistent with the criteria
established in section 4 of this act, the court shall:
(1) Provide to the person at the time the relief is granted a copy
of chapter 4.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 17 of this
act). If an individual entitled to receive the information required
under this subsection shows that he or she was not provided with the
information, he or she shall have an additional twelve months, beyond
the statute of limitations under section 11 of this act, to bring a
claim under this chapter.
(2) Upon request by the person wrongly convicted, seal the
claimant's record of conviction and issue the claimant a written court
order certifying that the claimant has been exonerated.
(3) Upon request of the claimant, order the claimant's record of
conviction vacated if the record has not already been vacated,
expunged, or destroyed under court rules. The requirements for
vacating records under RCW 9.94A.640 shall not apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) The provisions of this chapter shall
not preclude any other legal remedy available to the claimant to seek
redress for the wrongful conviction and imprisonment.
(2) If the claimant pursues a separate claim for tortious conduct
pursuant to the wrongful conviction, the related arrest, or subsequent
incarceration, the statute of limitations under this chapter is tolled
pending resolution of that claim, and the tort award shall offset any
compensation awarded under this chapter.
(3) The division of risk management may not deny a claim submitted
under this chapter based upon a release dismissal agreement, plea
agreement, or any similar agreement whereby the prosecutor's office or
an agent acting on its behalf agrees to take or refrain from certain
action if the accused individual agrees to forgo legal action against
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Except as provided in section 8(1)(b) of
this act, a claim for compensation under this chapter shall be
commenced within three years after the grant of judicial relief and
satisfaction of other conditions described in section 5 of this act;
provided, however, that any action by the state challenging or
appealing the grant of judicial relief shall toll the three-year
period. Any person meeting the criteria set forth in section 2 of this
act who was wrongly convicted before the effective date of this section
may file a claim for compensation under this chapter within three years
after the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An individual who was awarded compensation under section 5 of
this act and his or her dependent children and spouse or domestic
partner are eligible to participate in the health and dental insurance
plans and contracts offered by the public employees' benefits board as
prescribed by direction from the risk management division, and no
person eligible under this section is responsible for any costs
associated with that participation.
(2) The health care authority, upon receipt of the direction from
the risk management division, must enroll the individual and his or her
dependent children and spouse or domestic partner in a health and
dental insurance plan in compliance with the terms and conditions of
the direction from the division of risk management.
(3) The director shall adopt rules under RCW 41.50.050 as the
director may find necessary to implement this section and to avoid
conflicts with any applicable federal or state laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A
RCW to read as follows:
When the division of risk management refers a person to the
department under section 5 of this act as part of the person's award in
a wrongful conviction claim, the department shall provide reasonable
reentry services to the person. Nothing in this section requires the
department to establish new reentry programs or services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW
to read as follows:
When the risk management division refers a person to the department
under section 5 of this act as part of the person's award in a wrongful
conviction claim, the department shall provide reasonable reentry
services to the person. Nothing in this section requires the
department to establish new reentry programs or services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 50.08 RCW
to read as follows:
When the risk management division refers a person to the department
under section 5 of this act as part of the person's award in a wrongful
conviction claim, the department shall provide reasonable reentry
services to the person. Nothing in this section requires the
department to establish new reentry programs or services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Sections 1 through 11 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 4 RCW.

--- END ---