BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 51.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In addition to those general powers and rights deemed
appropriate by the department, retrospective rating plan employers and
groups who administer their plans with an approved claims administrator
shall have the authority to assist the department in the processing of
claims. However, the department retains the final authority over
decisions with respect to any individual claim. The authority of
retrospective rating plan employers and groups includes, but is not
limited to, the following:
(a) Authorization to schedule medical examinations and
consultations, using only qualified persons from the department's
approved examiner list. No more than two independent medical exams for
each claim may be scheduled by the claims administrator within any
twenty-four month period. An independent medical exam may be scheduled
when the claim file includes medical reports indicating that an exam
may be necessary for any of the following reasons: Establishing a
diagnosis, outlining a program of treatment, evaluating what, if any,
conditions are related to the claimed industrial injury or occupational
disease, determining whether an industrial injury or occupational
disease has aggravated a preexisting condition, establishing an
impairment rating when the claim file medical reports indicate that the
worker's claim-related condition is at maximum medical improvement,
evaluating whether the industrial injury or occupational disease has
worsened, or evaluating the worker's mental or physical restrictions as
well as the worker's ability to work. The results of any independent
medical exam scheduled under this subsection must be sent by the
examiner or independent medical examination panel directly to the
department for the claimant's claim file. The department shall
strictly enforce penalties under RCW 51.32.110 for refusals to submit
to medical examinations scheduled by retrospective rating plan
employers or groups, obstruction of the same, or other prohibited
actions set out in RCW 51.32.110.
(b) Authorization to schedule vocational assessments using only
qualified providers from a qualified provider list developed by the
department. Providers may be selected based on department quality or
performance indicators and based on industry experience. Any
vocational assessment resulting from a referral under this section must
be sent by the vocational rehabilitation counselor directly to the
department for the claimant's claim file.
(c) Authorization to close claims as provided by this subsection.
If a claim with date of injury or manifestation of occupational disease
on or after January 1, 2012: (i) Involves only medical treatment
and/or the payment of temporary disability compensation under RCW
51.32.090 for a period of thirty days or less; (ii) at the time medical
treatment is concluded, does not involve permanent disability; (iii) is
one with respect to which the department has not intervened under
subsection (2) of this section; and (iv) concerns an injured worker who
has returned to work with the retrospective rating plan employer or
group at the worker's previous job or at a job that has at least
ninety-five percent of at-injury wages and benefits, the claim may be
closed by the retrospective rating plan employer or group, subject to
reporting of claims to the department in a manner prescribed by
department rules adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. No later than at the
time of closure for such claims, the retrospective rating plan employer
or group shall forward to the worker a notification developed by the
department describing in nontechnical language the worker's rights
under this title.
(2) If a dispute arises from the handling of any claim under this
section, the injured worker, or retrospective rating plan employer or
group, may request the department to intervene.
(3) The department may require the retrospective rating plan
employer or group to notify the department prior to exercising any
authority authorized by this section. Rules adopted under this section
must minimize the department's need to respond and ensure that any
delay in response by the department does not impede the timely
administration of the claim. Charges incurred by the retrospective
rating plan employer or group for independent medical examinations or
vocational rehabilitation assessments shall be charged against the
claim.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "approved claims
administrator" means a person who meets department qualifications to
manage industrial insurance claims for retrospective rating plan
employers and groups. Any claims managers employed by the approved
claims administrator to manage retrospective rating plan claims must
complete training approved or provided by the department as established
in rule, and are subject to department audit or review of their claims
management process. The director shall take corrective action, subject
to appeal to the board of industrial insurance appeals, against a
retrospective rating plan employer or group that has received authority
to assist the department with processing of claims, if the director
determines that a claims manager under its direction is not following
proper industrial insurance claims procedures. Corrective actions
taken by the director may include:
(a) Probationary period of time for the claims manager;
(b) Additional mandatory training for claims management personnel;
and
(c) Monitoring of the activities of the employer or group to
determine progress towards compliance.
The director shall adopt rules defining the corrective actions
which may be taken in response to a given condition. If the director
determines that compliance has been attained, no further action shall
be taken. If compliance has not been attained, the director may take
additional corrective action including the removal of the additional
authority to assist the department in the processing of claims under
this section. The withdrawal of approval revokes the ability of the
approved claims administrator to exercise authority under this section,
but does not otherwise affect the administrator's status or the
retrospective rating plan employer or group's status in the
retrospective rating program.
(5) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---