BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The college board shall create an efficient, streamlined, and
simple financial aid process for colleges and students. The new
process must include, but not be limited to, standardized application
forms, eligibility criteria, deadlines, award verification, and
published informational materials.
(2) A detailed implementation plan of the new process shall be
approved by the college board by September 2011 with full
implementation of the process no later than January 2012.
(3) The college board shall disclose all information necessary for
compliance with RCW 28B.15.0681 and 28B.76.300(4) to each college
district.

--- END ---