BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.431 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Nursing facility medicaid payment rate allocations shall be
facility-specific and shall have seven components: Direct care,
therapy care, support services, operations, property, financing
allowance, and variable return. The department shall establish and
adjust each of these components, as provided in this section and
elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing facility in this
state.
(2) Component rate allocations in therapy care and support services
for all facilities shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of
eighty-five percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are
set up or in use. Component rate allocations in operations, property,
and financing allowance for essential community providers shall be
based upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of
licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use.
Component rate allocations in operations, property, and financing
allowance for small nonessential community providers shall be based
upon a minimum facility occupancy of ninety percent of licensed beds,
regardless of how many beds are set up or in use. Component rate
allocations in operations, property, and financing allowance for large
nonessential community providers shall be based upon a minimum facility
occupancy of ninety-two percent of licensed beds, regardless of how
many beds are set up or in use. For all facilities, the component rate
allocation in direct care shall be based upon actual facility
occupancy. The median cost limits used to set component rate
allocations shall be based on the applicable minimum occupancy
percentage. In determining each facility's therapy care component rate
allocation under RCW 74.46.511, the department shall apply the
applicable minimum facility occupancy adjustment before creating the
array of facilities' adjusted therapy costs per adjusted resident day.
In determining each facility's support services component rate
allocation under RCW 74.46.515(3), the department shall apply the
applicable minimum facility occupancy adjustment before creating the
array of facilities' adjusted support services costs per adjusted
resident day. In determining each facility's operations component rate
allocation under RCW 74.46.521(3), the department shall apply the
minimum facility occupancy adjustment before creating the array of
facilities' adjusted general operations costs per adjusted resident
day.
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months.
Effective July 1, 2009, the direct care component rate allocation shall
be rebased, ((using the adjusted cost report data for the calendar year
two years immediately preceding the rate rebase period,)) so that
adjusted cost report data for calendar year 2007 is used for July 1,
2009, through June 30, ((2012)) 2013. Beginning July 1, ((2012)) 2013,
the direct care component rate allocation shall be rebased biennially
during every ((even-numbered)) odd-numbered year thereafter using
adjusted cost report data from two years prior to the rebase period, so
adjusted cost report data for calendar year ((2010)) 2011 is used for
July 1, ((2012)) 2013, through June 30, ((2014)) 2015, and so forth.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the direct care component rate allocation established in accordance
with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or
factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations
act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any
earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or
compounded to the direct care component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter.
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months.
Effective July 1, 2009, the therapy care component rate allocation
shall be cost rebased, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar
year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, ((2012)) 2013.
Beginning July 1, ((2012)) 2013, the therapy care component rate
allocation shall be rebased biennially during every ((even-numbered))
odd-numbered year thereafter using adjusted cost report data from two
years prior to the rebase period, so adjusted cost report data for
calendar year ((2010)) 2011 is used for July 1, ((2012)) 2013, through
June 30, ((2014)) 2015, and so forth.
(b) Therapy care component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the therapy care component rate allocation established in accordance
with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or
factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations
act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any
earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or
compounded to the therapy care component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Effective July 1, 2009, the support services component rate
allocation shall be cost rebased, so that adjusted cost report data for
calendar year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, ((2012))
2013. Beginning July 1, ((2012)) 2013, the support services component
rate allocation shall be rebased biennially during every ((even-numbered)) odd-numbered year thereafter using adjusted cost report data
from two years prior to the rebase period, so adjusted cost report data
for calendar year ((2010)) 2011 is used for July 1, ((2012)) 2013,
through June 30, ((2014)) 2015, and so forth.
(b) Support services component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the support services component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions
factor or factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial
appropriations act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied
solely or compounded to the support services component rate allocation
established in accordance with this chapter.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months.
Effective July 1, 2009, the operations component rate allocation shall
be cost rebased, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar year
2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, ((2012)) 2013.
Beginning July 1, ((2012)) 2013, the operations care component rate
allocation shall be rebased biennially during every ((even-numbered))
odd-numbered year thereafter using adjusted cost report data from two
years prior to the rebase period, so adjusted cost report data for
calendar year ((2010)) 2011 is used for July 1, ((2012)) 2013, through
June 30, ((2014)) 2015, and so forth.
(b) Operations component rate allocations established in accordance
with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the operations component rate allocation established in accordance with
this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or factors
for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations act, no
economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any earlier
biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or compounded to
the operations component rate allocation established in accordance with
this chapter.
(8) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(9) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: Inflation adjustments for partial-period
cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing facilities
entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a period of
absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded new bed
capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of ownership
of the nursing facility business, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(10) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(11) Effective July 1, 2010, there shall be no rate adjustment for
facilities with banked beds. For purposes of calculating minimum
occupancy, licensed beds include any beds banked under chapter 70.38
RCW.
(12) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a certificate of
need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001, must have
a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a) the
depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation; and
(b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to
be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate
allocation.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.437 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) ((Beginning July 1, 1999,)) The department shall establish for
each medicaid nursing facility a financing allowance component rate
allocation. The financing allowance component rate shall be rebased
annually, effective July 1st, in accordance with the provisions of this
section and this chapter.
(2) ((Effective July 1, 2001,)) The financing allowance ((shall
be)) is determined by multiplying the net invested funds of each
facility by ((.10)) .04, and dividing by the greater of a nursing
facility's total resident days from the most recent cost report period
or resident days calculated on eighty-five percent facility
occupancy((. Effective July 1, 2002, the financing allowance component
rate allocation for all facilities, other than essential community
providers, shall be set by using the greater of a facility's total
resident days from the most recent cost report period or resident days
calculated at ninety percent facility occupancy. However, assets
acquired on or after May 17, 1999, shall be grouped in a separate
financing allowance calculation that shall be multiplied by .085. The
financing allowance factor of .085 shall not be applied to the net
invested funds pertaining to new construction or major renovations
receiving certificate of need approval or an exemption from certificate
of need requirements under chapter 70.38 RCW, or to working drawings
that have been submitted to the department of health for construction
review approval, prior to May 17, 1999)) for essential community
providers, ninety percent facility occupancy for small nonessential
community providers, or ninety-two percent occupancy for large
nonessential community providers. If a capitalized addition,
renovation, replacement, or retirement of an asset will result in a
different licensed bed capacity during the ensuing period, the prior
period total resident days used in computing the financing allowance
shall be adjusted to the greater of the anticipated resident day level
or eighty-five percent of the new licensed bed capacity for essential
community providers, ninety percent facility occupancy for small
nonessential community providers, or ninety-two percent occupancy for
large nonessential community providers. ((Effective July 1, 2002, for
all facilities, other than essential community providers, the total
resident days used to compute the financing allowance after a
capitalized addition, renovation, replacement, or retirement of an
asset shall be set by using the greater of a facility's total resident
days from the most recent cost report period or resident days
calculated at ninety percent facility occupancy.))
(3) In computing the portion of net invested funds representing the
net book value of tangible fixed assets, the same assets, depreciation
bases, lives, and methods referred to in ((RCW 74.46.330, 74.46.350,
74.46.360, 74.46.370, and 74.46.380)) department rule, including owned
and leased assets, shall be utilized, except that the capitalized cost
of land upon which the facility is located and such other contiguous
land which is reasonable and necessary for use in the regular course of
providing resident care ((shall)) must also be included. Subject to
provisions and limitations contained in this chapter, for land
purchased by owners or lessors before July 18, 1984, capitalized cost
of land ((shall be)) is the buyer's capitalized cost. For all partial
or whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, if the land is purchased
after July 17, 1984, capitalized cost ((shall be)) is that of the owner
of record on July 17, 1984, or buyer's capitalized cost, whichever is
lower. In the case of leased facilities where the net invested funds
are unknown or the contractor is unable to provide necessary
information to determine net invested funds, the secretary ((shall
have)) has the authority to determine an amount for net invested funds
based on an appraisal conducted according to ((RCW 74.46.360(1)))
department rule.
(4) ((Effective July 1, 2001, for the purpose of calculating a
nursing facility's financing allowance component rate, if a contractor
has elected to bank licensed beds prior to May 25, 2001, or elects to
convert banked beds to active service at any time, under chapter 70.38
RCW, the department shall use the facility's new licensed bed capacity
to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting and revise the
financing allowance component rate, as needed, effective as of the date
the beds are banked or converted to active service. However, in no
case shall the department use less than eighty-five percent occupancy
of the facility's licensed bed capacity after banking or conversion.
Effective July 1, 2002, in no case, other than for essential community
providers, shall the department use less than ninety percent occupancy
of the facility's licensed bed capacity after conversion.
(5))) The financing allowance rate allocation calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.46.485 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Employ the resource utilization group III case mix
classification methodology. The department shall use the forty-four
group index maximizing model for the resource utilization group III
grouper version 5.10, but the department may revise or update the
classification methodology to reflect advances or refinements in
resident assessment or classification, subject to federal requirements.
The department may adjust the case mix index for any of the lowest ten
resource utilization group categories beginning with PA1 through PE2 to
any case mix index that aids in achieving the purpose and intent of RCW
74.39A.007 and cost-efficient care; and
(b) Implement minimum data set 3.0 under the authority of this
section and RCW 74.46.431(3). The department must notify nursing home
contractors twenty-eight days in advance the date of implementation of
the minimum data set 3.0. In the notification, the department must
identify for all semiannual rate settings following the date of minimum
data set 3.0 implementation a previously established semiannual case
mix adjustment established for the semiannual rate settings that will
be used for semiannual case mix calculations in direct care until
minimum data set 3.0 is fully implemented. ((After the department has
fully implemented minimum data set 3.0, it must adjust any semiannual
rate setting in which it used the previously established case mix
adjustment using the new minimum data set 3.0 data.))
(2) A default case mix group shall be established for cases in
which the resident dies or is discharged for any purpose prior to
completion of the resident's initial assessment. The default case mix
group and case mix weight for these cases shall be designated by the
department.
(3) A default case mix group may also be established for cases in
which there is an untimely assessment for the resident. The default
case mix group and case mix weight for these cases shall be designated
by the department.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.46.496 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Each case mix classification group shall be assigned a case mix
weight. The case mix weight for each resident of a nursing facility
for each calendar quarter or six-month period during a calendar year
shall be based on data from resident assessment instruments completed
for the resident and weighted by the number of days the resident was in
each case mix classification group. Days shall be counted as provided
in this section.
(2) The case mix weights shall be based on the average minutes per
registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, and certified nurse aide,
for each case mix group, and using the United States department of
health and human services 1995 nursing facility staff time measurement
study stemming from its multistate nursing home case mix and quality
demonstration project. Those minutes shall be weighted by statewide
ratios of registered nurse to certified nurse aide, and licensed
practical nurse to certified nurse aide, wages, including salaries and
benefits, which shall be based on 1995 cost report data for this state.
(3) The case mix weights shall be determined as follows:
(a) Set the certified nurse aide wage weight at 1.000 and calculate
wage weights for registered nurse and licensed practical nurse average
wages by dividing the certified nurse aide average wage into the
registered nurse average wage and licensed practical nurse average
wage;
(b) Calculate the total weighted minutes for each case mix group in
the resource utilization group III classification system by multiplying
the wage weight for each worker classification by the average number of
minutes that classification of worker spends caring for a resident in
that resource utilization group III classification group, and summing
the products;
(c) Assign ((a)) the lowest case mix weight ((of 1.000)) to the
resource utilization group III classification group with the lowest
total weighted minutes and calculate case mix weights by dividing the
lowest group's total weighted minutes into each group's total weighted
minutes and rounding weight calculations to the third decimal place.
(4) The case mix weights in this state may be revised if the United
States department of health and human services updates its nursing
facility staff time measurement studies. The case mix weights shall be
revised, but only when direct care component rates are cost-rebased as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, to be effective on the July
1st effective date of each cost-rebased direct care component rate.
However, the department may revise case mix weights more frequently if,
and only if, significant variances in wage ratios occur among direct
care staff in the different caregiver classifications identified in
this section.
(5) Case mix weights shall be revised when direct care component
rates are cost-rebased as provided in RCW 74.46.431(4).

Sec. 5 RCW 74.46.501 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) From individual case mix weights for the applicable quarter,
the department shall determine two average case mix indexes for each
medicaid nursing facility, one for all residents in the facility, known
as the facility average case mix index, and one for medicaid residents,
known as the medicaid average case mix index.
(2)(a) In calculating a facility's two average case mix indexes for
each quarter, the department shall include all residents or medicaid
residents, as applicable, who were physically in the facility during
the quarter in question based on the resident assessment instrument
completed by the facility and the requirements and limitations for the
instrument's completion and transmission (January 1st through March
31st, April 1st through June 30th, July 1st through September 30th, or
October 1st through December 31st).
(b) The facility average case mix index shall exclude all default
cases as defined in this chapter. However, the medicaid average case
mix index shall include all default cases.
(3) Both the facility average and the medicaid average case mix
indexes shall be determined by multiplying the case mix weight of each
resident, or each medicaid resident, as applicable, by the number of
days, as defined in this section and as applicable, the resident was at
each particular case mix classification or group, and then averaging.
(4) In determining the number of days a resident is classified into
a particular case mix group, the department shall determine a start
date for calculating case mix grouping periods as specified by rule.
(5) The cutoff date for the department to use resident assessment
data, for the purposes of calculating both the facility average and the
medicaid average case mix indexes, and for establishing and updating a
facility's direct care component rate, shall be one month and one day
after the end of the quarter for which the resident assessment data
applies.
(6)(a) Although the facility average and the medicaid average case
mix indexes shall both be calculated quarterly, the cost-rebasing
period facility average case mix index will be used throughout the
applicable cost-rebasing period in combination with cost report data as
specified by RCW 74.46.431 and 74.46.506, to establish a facility's
allowable cost per case mix unit. To allow for the transition to
minimum data set 3.0 and implementation of resource utilization group
IV for the July 1, 2011, through July 1, 2012, cost-rebasing periods
the department may determine the calendar quarter or quarters upon
which the facility average case mix must be calculated. A facility's
medicaid average case mix index shall be used to update a nursing
facility's direct care component rate semiannually.
(b) The facility average case mix index used to establish each
nursing facility's direct care component rate shall be based on an
average of calendar quarters of the facility's average case mix indexes
from the four calendar quarters occurring during the cost report period
used to rebase the direct care component rate allocations as specified
in RCW 74.46.431. To allow for the transition to minimum data set 3.0
and implementation of resource utilization group IV for the July 1,
2011, through July 1, 2012, cost-rebasing periods the department may
determine the calendar quarter or quarters upon which the facility
average case mix must be calculated.
(c) The medicaid average case mix index used to update or
recalibrate a nursing facility's direct care component rate
semiannually shall be from the calendar six-month period commencing
nine months prior to the effective date of the semiannual rate. For
example, July 1, 2010, through December 31, 2010, direct care component
rates shall utilize case mix averages from the October 1, 2009, through
March 31, 2010, calendar quarters, and so forth.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 74.46.433 (Variable return component
rate allocation) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 4, 2006 c 258 s 3, 2001 1st
sp.s. c 8 s 6, & 1999 c 353 s 9 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
March 1, 2011.

--- END ---