BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A capital budget is hereby adopted and,
subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the several dollar
amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as shall be
sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2013, out of the several funds specified in this act.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Fiscal year 2012" or "FY 2012" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2012.
(b) "Fiscal year 2013" or "FY 2013" means the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2013.
(c) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.
(d) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose.
Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act, any portion
of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose that is not
expended subject to the specified conditions and limitations to fulfill
the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Rural Washington Loan Fund (19882002)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,682,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,892,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water Assistance Account (20044002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Expenditures of the reappropriation shall comply with RCW
70.119A.170.
(2)(a) The state building construction account reappropriation is
provided solely to provide assistance to counties, cities, and special
purpose districts to identify, acquire, and rehabilitate public water
systems that have water quality problems or have been allowed to
deteriorate to a point where public health is an issue. Eligibility is
confined to applicants that already own at least one group A public
water system and that demonstrate a track record of sound drinking
water utility management. Funds may be used for: Planning, design,
and other preconstruction activities; system acquisition; and capital
construction costs.
(b) The state building construction account reappropriation must be
jointly administered by the department of health, the public works
board, and the department of commerce using the drinking water state
revolving fund loan program as an administrative model. In order to
expedite the use of these funds and minimize administration costs, this
reappropriation must be administered by guidance, rather than rule.
Projects must generally be prioritized using the drinking water state
revolving fund loan program criteria. All financing provided through
this program must be in the form of grants that must partially cover
project costs. The maximum grant to any eligible entity may not exceed
twenty-five percent of the funds allocated to the appropriation in
section 201, chapter 277, Laws of 2004.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,493,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,693,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20064008)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $64,319 of the remaining reappropriation for El Centro de la
raza may be used for building infrastructure.
(2) $10,000 of the remaining reappropriation for miracle league
handicapped baseball may be used for pre-grading and resurfacing
construction.
(3) $1,394,107 of the remaining reappropriation for MOBIUS/inland
northwest science and technology center may be used for building
design, construction, and renovation.
(4) $500,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Soundway
property preservation project may be used by the city of Seattle, in
cooperation with the nature consortium for habitat, recreation
improvements, or stewardship of the property, if the city of Seattle
enacts pending city legislation to preserve the property and place it
under the jurisdiction of city of Seattle parks and recreation.
(5) The reappropriation is adjusted for the transfer of the
Vancouver national historical reserve west barracks project to the
Washington state historical society and the termination of the
following projects that are no longer viable: (a) Snohomish senior
center and (b) central area motivation program (CAMP).

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,031,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,368,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,399,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water Assistance Program (20064003)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,372,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,880,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Rural Washington Loan Fund (20064010)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,663,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,464,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,127,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board (20064011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: A maximum of twenty-five percent of the
appropriation in this section may be used for grants.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,197,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,251,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,448,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Job and Economic Development Grants (20064950)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
107, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.
(2) Up to $1,000,000 of the reappropriation for the Pacific
Northwest national labs campus infrastructure project may be used for
giga-pop infrastructure.
(3) Up to $2,200,000 of the reappropriation may be used for
military communities infrastructure projects. Military communities
infrastructure projects shall include:
(a) Grants to counties and cities for the purchase of development
easements and the purchase of real property in fee simple to restrict
the use of accident potential zones and clear zones. The office of
financial management shall establish a competitive process for
selecting projects to receive the grants. Final allocation of these
grants shall be at the discretion and with the approval of the director
of the office of financial management.
The grants are subject to the following conditions:
(i) The county or city must be subject to and in compliance with
RCW 36.70A.530;
(ii) The grants may not be used to remove encroachments into these
zones allowed by county or city zoning or permitting actions;
(iii) The county or city must have an encroachment prevention plan
preventing future encroachment into these zones; and
(iv) The grant provided by the state must not exceed one-third of
the project cost with funds from local and federal sources providing
the balance of the funds.
(b) Up to $481,000 of the reappropriation may be used for
improvements to a military department site on Fairchild air force base.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,012,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,988,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Jobs in Communities (20064951)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 140, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,309,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,941,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water Assistance Program (20074004)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,244,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,100,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,344,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,556,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Public Works Trust Fund (20074005)

Reappropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,215,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,215,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $231,785,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $327,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Water System Acquisition and Rehabilitation Program (20074006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation must be jointly
administered by the department of health, the public works board, and
the department of commerce using the drinking water state revolving
fund loan program as an administrative model. In order to expedite the
use of these funds and minimize administration costs, this
appropriation must be administered by guidance, rather than rule.
Projects must generally be prioritized using the drinking water state
revolving fund loan program criteria. All financing provided through
this program must be in the form of grants that must partially cover
project costs. The maximum grant to any eligible entity may not exceed
twenty-five percent of the funds allocated to this appropriation.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,550,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Rural Washington Loan Fund (20074008)

Reappropriation:
Rural Washington Loan Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,781,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,027,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(20074009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,062,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,727,000
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,905,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,694,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $180,306,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Job Development Fund Grants (20074010)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1032, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.
(2) $3,000,000 of the reappropriation may be used for a grant to
the port of Grays Harbor for the bulk liquid facility project.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,322,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,609,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board (20074015)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: A maximum of twenty-five percent of the
appropriation may be used for grants.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,289,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,711,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Longview Regional Water Treatment Plant Dredging (20081001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is provided solely for emergency
dredging to prevent the sandbars in the Cowlitz river from obstructing
the intake facility necessary for the city of Longview to obtain
drinking water.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $110,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Quincy Water Treatment System (20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $398,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,102,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Innovation Partnership Zones (20082003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,535,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,465,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Washington State Horse Park (20082004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,243,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20084001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1008, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
(3) $1,000,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Evergreen
school district health and biosciences academy may be used for land
acquisition. If the facility is not constructed by June 30, 2015, the
school district shall reimburse the state an amount equal to $1,000,000
increased by the average percentage appreciation in property values for
undeveloped land in the surrounding area between the date the school
district acquired the property and June 30, 2015 or the date the school
district disposes of the property.
(4) $600,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the institute for
community leadership may be used for land acquisition.
(5) $250,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Pacific
Northwest ilocandia association may be used for acquisition and
renovation.
(6) $200,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the library
connection at Greenbridge may be used for construction and equipment.
(7) $1,000,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Evergreen
school district health and biosciences academy may be used for land
acquisition.
(8) The remaining reappropriation for the Mobius/inland northwest
science and technology center may be used for building design,
construction, and renovation.
(9) The reappropriation is adjusted for the transfer of the
Vancouver national historical reserve project to the Washington state
historical society; the reduction of $1,400,000 from the Tacoma narrows
bridge lights project; and the termination of the following projects
that are no longer viable: (a) Camp kilworth land acquisition -Federal Way, (b) Kitsap SEED, and (c) Seatac world war I memorial
plaza.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,860,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,484,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,344,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Development Fund (20084850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1014, chapter 328, Laws of 2008.
(2) $105,521 of the remaining reappropriation for El Centro de la
raza center may be used for building infrastructure.
(3) $1,000,000 of the remaining reappropriation for the Salishan
housing community project may be used for infrastructure and housing.
(4) The reappropriation is adjusted for the termination of the
homesight center project which is no longer viable.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,847,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,069,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,916,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Belfair Sewer Improvements (20084852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,294,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Schools Program (20084856)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,090,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,495,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2008 Local and Community Projects (20084861)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,161,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,968,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,129,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000005)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,930,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,201,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,131,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,131,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building for the Arts Grants (30000006)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of
section 1011, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,881,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,719,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (30000007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,727,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,773,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building Communities Fund Grants (30000008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,084,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,917,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,001,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000010)

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,253,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,253,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Innovation Partnership Zones (30000012)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing
(30000013)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $7,000,000 of the reappropriations are provided solely for
facilities housing low-income migrant, seasonal, or temporary
farmworkers. The operation of the facilities built under this section
shall be in compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1342. The department shall
work with the farmworker housing advisory committee to prioritize
funding of projects to the areas of highest need. Funding may also be
provided, to the extent qualified projects are submitted, for health
and safety projects. Any of this appropriation that is not obligated
by June 30, 2011, shall be added to the amount appropriated for the
general pool of projects.
(2) $3,000,000 of the reappropriations are provided solely to
promote development of safe and affordable housing units for persons
eligible for services from the division of developmental disabilities
within the department of social and health services.
(3) $10,000 of the reappropriations are provided solely to the St.
Luke's Lutheran Church/Interfaith Task Force on Homelessness for the
construction of a mobile camp facility.
(4) $2,500,000 of the reappropriations are provided solely for the
development of farm infrastructure improvements. Any of this
appropriation that is not obligated by June 30, 2011, must be added to
the amount appropriated for the general pool of projects.
(5) $1,000,000 from the taxable bonds account is provided solely
for the development or preservation of farmworker housing for migrant
and seasonal farmworkers located on private farms.
(6) $5,000,000 of the reappropriation from the state building
construction account is provided solely to build low-income housing
units in underserved communities and to concurrently develop capacity
in these same communities. Underserved communities of concern are
those that have high levels of poverty, specifically, thirty percent of
the local median income; experience chronic homelessness; and lack
affordable housing. Underserved communities include veterans,
immigrants, refugees, and those communities of color disproportionately
impacted by chronic homelessness and lack of affordable housing. The
department shall collaborate with representatives of underserved
communities and organizations committed to assistance in these efforts
to prioritize and plan distribution of funding.
(7) The department may not make loans from capital bond proceeds
appropriated in this section if the appropriations are also obligated
for other grants or loans or if the anticipated repayments of the loans
are from future state legislative appropriations.
(8) The legislature recognizes and supports the housing priorities
reflected in the American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009 with
the estimated amount of $144,000,000 provided solely for the following
programs:
(a) The community development fund's neighborhood stabilization
fund to purchase and rehabilitate foreclosed vacant properties and to
help create affordable housing and stabilize neighborhoods.
(b) The public housing capital fund to assist housing authorities
build and rehabilitate low-income housing stock. Housing authorities
are required to give priority consideration to the rehabilitation of
vacant rental units and capital projects that are already underway or
included in the five-year capital fund plans.
(c) HOME funding to the Washington state housing finance commission
for a competitive program pursuant to the qualified allocation plan to
owners of projects who have received or receive simultaneously an award
of low-income housing tax credits under section 42(h) of the internal
revenue code of 1986.
(d) Weatherization appropriated in section 1052 of this act for
grants and loans to local energy programs for weatherization of
multifamily and single family homes.
(9) $5,000,000 is provided solely for two geographically diverse
projects that serve security lifeline clients who are homeless and have
a mental or behavioral health disorder. This housing must be provided
in coordination with community agencies who can offer supportive
services.
(10) Up to $25,000,000 of the reappropriations are for the
department of commerce to contract with the Washington state housing
finance commission to provide equity funding and administration
necessary to implement the Washington works housing program and to
facilitate nonprofit entities' use of tax-exempt multifamily bonds
issued by the Washington state housing finance commission. The
projects receiving these funds shall meet the affordability requirement
for the period after initial bond indebtedness, as established in
section 2(2) of chapter 6, Laws of 2010.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,394,000
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,701,000
Washington Housing Trust Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,199,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $76,294,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $53,706,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $130,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (30000019)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(8) The reappropriation is subject to section 1014, chapter 36,
Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,880,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,245,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Energy Freedom Program (30000056)

Reappropriation:
Energy Recovery Act Account--Federal Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
2010 Local and Community Projects (30000082)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(2) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(3) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(4) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(5) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(6) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(7) The reappropriation is subject to section 1015, chapter 36,
Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,654,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,096,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Schools (91000002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The acquisition, rehabilitation, expansion, or improvement of
surplus school buildings to be converted into community facilities for
the delivery of nonresidential coordinated services for children and
families.
(a) Eligible applicants include local governments, nonprofit
organizations, nonprofit early learning providers, and tribal
governments. Only the following surplus schools may be eligible for
grant funding under this section: Fauntleroy school, University
Heights school, and Martin Luther King elementary school.
(b) As part of the grant process, applicants must submit a
comprehensive plan for the use of the surplus school that includes
information on the following:
(i) A list of partner entities that will assist the lead eligible
applicant to provide or coordinate services for children and families;
(ii) A memorandum of understanding between the lead eligible
applicant and each partner; and
(iii) An examination of capital and operating funding sources that
applicants intend to apply to the project and coordinated services at
each school to be served, whether such funding is derived from grants
under this section or from other federal, state, local, or private
sources.
(c) Project applicants must demonstrate that the proposed project
is ready to proceed, will make timely use of the funds, and requires
state funding to accomplish a discrete, usable phase of the project
that may include acquisition.
(d) If grant funds under this subsection are used for the
acquisition of surplus school facilities, the sale proceeds must be
used by the local school board disposing of such property for
renovation, replacement, or new construction of school facilities in
the district, but shall not be used as local match for projects
receiving state school construction assistance grants.
(e) In contracts for grants authorized under this subsection, the
department shall include provisions that require that capital
improvements must be held by the grantee for a specified period of time
appropriate to the amount of the grant and that facilities must be used
for the express purpose of the grant. If the grantee is found to be
out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the grantee shall
repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant plus
interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington
general obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of
authorization of the grant.
(2) The construction of a nonmobile facility, accessible to
students in central and eastern Washington for the purpose of financial
literacy education, for the eastern and western Washington junior
achievement world initiative.
(3) $1,500,000 of the reappropriation in this section is provided
solely for acquisition of the Martin Luther King elementary school.
This is in addition to the amount provided for the Martin Luther King
elementary school in section 1033, chapter 497, Laws of 2009.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,096,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Development Block Grants (91000011)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,187,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,013,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Weatherization (91000013)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,668,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,332,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Temporary Public Works Grant Program (92000021)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of
section 1050, chapter 497, Laws of 2009.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,440,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,484,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,924,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,673,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,597,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Jobs Act for K-12 Public Schools & Higher Education Institutions
(91000085)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is provided solely for grants to public
school districts and public higher education institutions for
operational cost savings improvements to public school district and
higher education facilities and related projects that result in energy
and operational cost savings. Related projects are those projects that
must be completed in order for the energy efficiency improvements to be
effective. Grants may also be used for loan interest payments over the
term of a loan.
(2) The department of commerce, in consultation with the department
of general administration, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, and the Washington State University energy program shall
establish a competitive process to solicit and evaluate applications
from public school districts and public higher education institutions.
Final grant awards shall be determined by the department of commerce.
(3) The definitions in this section apply throughout this section.
(a) "Cost-effectiveness" means that the present value to public
school districts and public higher education institutions of the energy
reasonably expected to be saved or produced by a facility, activity,
measure, or piece of equipment over its useful life, including any
compensation received from a utility or the Bonneville power
administration, is greater than the net present value of the costs of
implementing, maintaining, and operating such facility, activity,
measure, or piece of equipment over its useful life, when discounted at
the cost of public borrowing.
(b) "Energy equipment" means energy management systems and any
equipment, materials, or supplies that are expected, upon installation,
to reduce the energy use or energy cost of an existing building or
facility, and the services associated with the equipment, materials, or
supplies, including but not limited to design, engineering, financing,
installation, project management, guarantees, operations, and
maintenance. Reduction in energy use or energy cost may also include
reductions in the use or cost of water, wastewater, or solid waste.
(c) "Energy cost savings" means savings realized in expenses for
energy use and expenses associated with water, wastewater, or solid
waste systems.
(d) "Energy savings performance contracting" means the process
authorized by chapter 39.35C RCW by which a company contracts with a
public agency to conduct energy audits and guarantee energy savings
from energy efficiency.
(e) "Operational cost savings" means savings realized from parts,
service fees, capital renewal costs, and other measurable annual
expenses to maintain and repair systems. This definition does not mean
labor savings related to existing facility staff.
(f) "Public facilities" means buildings, building components, and
major equipment or systems owned by public school districts and public
higher education institutions.
(g) "Innovative measures" means advanced or emerging technologies,
systems or approaches that may not yet be in common practice but
improve energy efficiency, accelerate deployment, or reduce energy
usage, and become widely commercially available in the future if proven
successful in demonstration programs without compromising the
guaranteed performance or measurable energy and operational cost
savings anticipated. Examples of innovative measures include, but are
not limited to, advanced energy and systems operations monitoring,
diagnostics and controls systems for buildings; novel heating, cooling,
ventilation and water heating systems; advanced windows and insulation
technologies, highly efficient lighting technologies, designs, and
controls; and integration of renewable energy sources into buildings,
and energy savings verification technologies and solutions.
(4) Grants must be awarded in competitive rounds, based on demand
and capacity, with at least five percent of each grant round awarded to
small public school districts with fewer than 1,000 full-time
equivalent students, based on demand and capacity.
(5) Within each competitive round, projects must be weighted and
prioritized based on the following criteria and in the following order:
(a) Leverage ratio: In each round, the higher the leverage ratio
of nonstate funding sources to state jobs act grant, the higher the
project ranking.
(b) Energy savings: In each round, the higher the energy savings,
the higher the project ranking. Applicants must submit documentation
that demonstrates energy and operational cost savings resulting from
the installation of the energy equipment and improvements. The energy
savings analysis shall be performed by a licensed engineer, and the
documentation must include but is not limited to the following:
(i) A description of the energy equipment and improvements;
(ii) A description of the energy and operational cost savings; and
(iii) A description of the extent to which the project employs
collaborative and innovative measures and encourages demonstration of
new and emerging technologies with high energy-savings or energy cost-reductions.
(c) Expediency of expenditure: Project readiness to spend funds
must be prioritized so that the legislative intent to expend funds
quickly is met.
(6) Projects that do not use energy savings performance contracting
must: (a) Verify energy and operational cost savings for ten years or
until the energy and operational costs savings pay for the project,
whichever is shorter; (b) follow the department of general
administration's energy savings performance contracting project
guidelines; and (c) employ a licensed engineer for the energy audit and
construction. The department of commerce may require third-party
verification of savings if a project is not implemented by an energy
savings performance contractor selected by the department of general
administration through the request of qualifications process. Third-party verification must be conducted either by an energy savings
performance contractor selected by the department of general
administration through a request for qualifications, a licensed
engineer that is a certified energy manager, a project resource
conservation manager, or educational service district resource
conservation manager.
(7) To intensify competition, the department of commerce may only
award funds to the top eighty-five percent of projects applying in a
round until the department of commerce determines a final round is
appropriate. Projects that do not receive a grant award in one round
may reapply in subsequent rounds.
(8) To match federal grants and programs that require state
matching funds and produce significantly higher efficiencies in
operations and utilities, the level of innovation criteria may be
increased for the purposes of weighted scoring to capture those federal
dollars for selected projects that require a higher level of innovation
and regional collaboration.
(9) Grant amounts awarded to each project must allow for the
maximum number of projects funded with the greatest energy and cost
benefit.
(10)(a) The department of commerce must use bond proceeds to pay
one-half of the preliminary audit, up to five cents per square foot, if
the project does not meet the school district's and higher education
institution's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria. Public school
districts and public higher education institutions must pay the other
one-half of the cost of the preliminary audit if the project does not
meet their predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria.
(b) The energy savings performance contractor shall not charge for
an investment grade audit if the project does not meet the school
district's and higher education institution's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria. Public school districts and public higher
education institutions must pay the full price of an investment grade
audit if they do not proceed with a project that meets the school
district's and higher education institution's predetermined cost-effectiveness criteria.
(11) The department of commerce may charge projects administrative
fees and may pay the department of general administration, the
Washington State University energy program, and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction administration fees in an amount
determined through a memorandum of understanding.
(12) The department of commerce and the department of general
administration must submit a joint report to the appropriate committees
of the legislature and the office of financial management on the timing
and use of the grant funds, program administrative function, compliance
with apprenticeship utilization requirements in RCW 39.04.320,
compliance with prevailing wage requirements, and administration fees
by the end of each fiscal year, until the funds are fully expended and
all savings verification requirements are fulfilled.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,921,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board - Export Assistance Grants
and Loans (92000069)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
loans and grants to local governments and public institutions of higher
education for technical assistance and infrastructure to support growth
of export of Washington state products and services.

Reappropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,982,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000095)

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $240,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Community Economic Revitalization Board (30000097)

Appropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Assistance, Weatherization, Affordable Housing Trust Fund
(30000098)

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Building Communities Fund Grants (30000102)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as otherwise directed before the effective date of this
section, the department shall not expend the appropriation in this
section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have been
either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount sufficient
to complete the projects or a distinct phase of the project that is
useable to the public for this purpose intended by the legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(2)(c).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Authorized Amount

Tempest Building Rehabilitation
Completion--Serenity House
of Clallam County $52,000

Urban Rest Stop 2--Low Income
Housing Institute $313,000

University Commons--University
District Food Bank $570,000

Lakewood Clinic Renovation--Community Health Care $120,000

Total $1,055,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,055,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,055,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (30000166)

The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Authorized Amount

Second Harvest $1,250,000

American Lake Veterans Golf
Course $1,000,000

Skagit Valley Hospital $750,000

Tacoma's Hilltop Health Center $2,000,000

Total $5,000,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Clean Energy Partnership (30000175)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for implementation of the
recommendations of the clean energy leadership council by providing
state matching funds for projects that:
(a) Integrate energy efficiency and renewable energy in buildings;
(b) Integrate renewable energy into the regional electrical grid;
or
(c) Advance bioenergy in the state.
(2) State funding must not exceed fifty percent of the total
program or project funds.
(3) Eligible projects must:
(a) Involve a majority of companies that are located in Washington
state;
(b) Represent a substantially new solution that is not widely
available today; and
(c) Designed to generate solutions that are applicable both inside
and outside of the state.

Appropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Public Works Trust Fund (30000103)

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $386,019,039

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,544,076,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,930,095,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1048 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Oversight of State Facilities (20082855)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,019,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,019,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1049 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Cowlitz River Dredging (20082856)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $813,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $644,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,457,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1050 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Catastrophic Flood Relief (20084850)

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $1,320,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for the
Chehalis basin flood control authority to (i) establish local flood
districts to develop, construct, maintain, operate, and fund flood
control measures throughout the basin, (ii) to complete by December
2011 the ongoing study of the effect of possible retention structures
on fish in the basin, and (iii) to complete the hydraulic model for the
Chehalis river to calculate flood levels, flood damages, and benefits
of proposed flood mitigation projects for the lower portions of the
river; and
(b) $1,200,000 of the appropriations are provided solely for
nonfederal matching funds and state agency costs associated with the
United States army corps of engineers flood hazard mitigation projects
for the Chehalis river basin.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to fulfill the commitment
of section 101, chapter 179, Laws of 2008 and chapter 180, Laws of
2008, by appropriating funds when the federal match requirement is
needed.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,125,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $895,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,465,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,515,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1051 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Graving Dock Settlement (30000026)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1052 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Emergency Repairs (30000027)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1053 FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
The legislature directed the office of financial management (OFM)
to identify $50,000,000 in project savings based on criteria described
in section 1023, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. The office of
financial management is further directed by the legislature to ensure
that the project savings identified in the office of financial
management capital projects savings list (OFM document number 2011-02)
are placed in or remain in reserve status.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1054 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
O'Brien Building Improvements (20081007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Upon completion of the project, temporary
modular buildings shall be removed, and the parking lot shall be
restored and landscaped within budget.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,965,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,237,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,202,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1055 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Campus High Voltage System Improvements (20081010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $163,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,041,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,204,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1056 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Improvements (20081011)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $398,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,353,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,751,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1057 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works Preservation (30000012)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,734,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,666,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1058 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Powerhouse: Improvements and Preservation (30000056)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $980,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,240,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1059 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Facility Oversight Program: Staffing (30000063)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $740,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,260,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1060 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Capitol Campus Heating System Improvements (30000486)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1061 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Transportation Building Preservation (20021008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,053,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,996,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,049,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1062 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Critical Campus Steam System Repairs (30000535)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1063 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Minor Works Preservation (30000550)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,329,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,420,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,749,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1064 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Emergency Repairs (30000552)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1065 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
NRB Garage Fire Suppression System Repairs (30000578)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,040,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,040,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1066 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (30000580)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,250,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1067 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
Legislative Building Critical Hydronic Loop Repairs (30000584)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,310,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,310,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1068 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
GA Building Demolition (30000588)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1069 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION
The department of general administration shall provide the office
of the superintendent of public instruction with existing standard
construction contract and consultant agreement standardized language
and selection process, for publication on office of the superintendent
of public instruction's web site, which can be used at no charge by
school districts. In addition, the department of general
administration shall provide an option to school districts to modify
existing standard construction contract or consultant agreement
language and assist districts with the consultant selection process an
hourly rate for these services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1070 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Preservation (30000002)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,776,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $523,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,299,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,018,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,317,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1071 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Program (30000003)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,989,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,139,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1072 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Camp Murray New Primary Gate Entrance (30000482)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,995,000
Military Department Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,435,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,430,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $497,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,357,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1073 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Combined Support Maintenance Shop (20082006)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,736,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,264,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1074 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Preservation (30000560)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,601,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,198,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,799,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,061,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,860,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1075 FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Minor Works Program (30000561)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,958,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,273,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $69,231,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1076 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Historic Barn Preservation (20084851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1077 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND
HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Courthouse Preservation (30000004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2001 FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION
Fire Alarm Replacement (30000004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Special Commitment Center: Utility Replacements (20081504)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: It is the intent of the reappropriation to
replace essential utilities, such as sanitary sewer, high voltage
electrical, and fiber optic communications, serving the special
commitment center and McNeil corrections center on McNeil Island by
replacing the Island's electrical feed from the shoreline landing to
the McNeil corrections center generator building, and continuing on to
the special commitment center. The department shall coordinate the
work with the department of corrections for the most cost-effective
approach to the work.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,136,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,636,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Design and Project Management Services to Close Maple Lane School
(30002227)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,337,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,337,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Special Commitment Center: Medium Management Housing Addition
(20082505)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $100,000 is provided solely for the
update to the predesign for the 80 bed housing unit. This updated
predesign shall examine alternatives including the use of modular
structures.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,096,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,246,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements
(30000366)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,438,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $212,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (30000367)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,320,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Facilities Preservation (30000368)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,590,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,590,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Echo Glen Children's Center: Portable Classroom Replacement
(30000844)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Eastern State Hospital: Westlake Building Renovation (30000852)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $840,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,100,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,090,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Design and Management Services to Close Maple Lane School
(92000005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $406,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $354,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Western State Hospital: Traffic Study Implementation (30000843)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $355,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements
(30001264)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (30001290)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Minor Works Preservation: Facilities Preservation (30001291)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Emergency Repairs (30001900)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH
SERVICES
Hazards Abatement and Demolition (30002221)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: Addition (20082003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,177,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,177,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (20064001)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,158,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,438,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $94,596,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Public Health Laboratory: HVAC Systems Upgrades (20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,220,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000013)

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,348,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal
Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,640,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,988,000

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,868,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,822,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $199,472,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Minor Works Preservation: Facility Preservation (30000027)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $380,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,580,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Tulalip Water Pipeline (30000296)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
construction of the Tulalip water pipeline between the city of Everett
and Tulalip Indian Reservation.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works Preservation: Facilities Preservation (30000003)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,722,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,727,446
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,449,446

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Install Close Custody Slider Doors
(20062070)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $741,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,168,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,909,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Replace Telecommunications
Infrastructure (20081013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $218,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,632,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Correctional Complex: Close Sewer Lagoon (20082022)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,041,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,024,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,415,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide Minor Works: Infrastructure Preservation (30000016)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $238,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,208,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,446,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements
(30000047)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $940,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,669,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,609,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000086)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $725,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,132,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,857,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Clallam Bay Corrections Center: Replace 5 Towers and Housing Roofs
(30000108)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The funding is provided solely for the
replacement of roofs on offender housing units.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $839,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $393,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,711,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,943,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Replace Fire Detection/Suppression
(30000123)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $398,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,098,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Correctional Complex: Water Line Replacements (30000137)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $738,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,538,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide Minor Works: Programmatic Projects (30000173)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,534,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,734,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Housing Units, Kitchen and Site
Work (30000482)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,945,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,919,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,764,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Westside Corrections Complex: Siting and Predesign (92000032)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,567,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,033,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Regional Infrastructure (20042008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,230,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,330,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: Roof and Equipment Replacement
(30000195)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,648,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,307,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Correctional Complex: Special Offender Unit Core Building
and Wings Roofing (30000528)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,186,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,186,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Monroe Correctional Complex: Washington State Reformatory Living
Units Fixtures and Plumbing (30000531)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,304,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,246,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,550,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide: Minor Works Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation
(30000539)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,827,601
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,327,601

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide: Minor Works Preservation: Facility Preservation
(30000540)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,978,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,478,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide: Minor Works Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code
Requirements (30000541)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,490,120
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,090,120

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide: New Prison Reception Center (30000570)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,674,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $246,181,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $260,855,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington Corrections Center: 300 Minimum Security Bed Expansion
(30000589)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,805,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,576,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,381,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Statewide: Emergency Repairs (30000703)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,500,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 3001 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (19742006)

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,952,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,246,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,198,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Low-Level Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (19972012)

Reappropriation:
Site Closure Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,288,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,145,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,433,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Twin Lake Aquifer Recharge Project (20042951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $356,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $141,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $497,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Supply Facilities (20044006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $567,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $654,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,996,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Conveyance Infrastructure Projects (20052850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 322, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,620,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,180,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3006 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation (20052851)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,968,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,929,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,900,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,797,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3007 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Quad Cities Water Right Mitigation (20052852)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,921,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $279,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3008 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
State Drought Preparedness (20054009)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for
response to the statewide drought that was declared pursuant to chapter
43.83B RCW. The department of ecology may provide funding or
compensation for purchase or lease of water rights and to public bodies
as defined in chapter 83B.050 RCW in connection with projects and
measures designed to alleviate drought conditions which may affect:
Public health and safety; drinking water supplies; agricultural
activities; or fish and wildlife survival.
(2) Projects or measures for which funding or compensation will be
provided must be connected with a water system, water source, or water
body which is receiving, or has been projected to receive, less than
seventy five percent of normal water supply, as the result of natural
drought conditions. This reduction in water supply must be such that
it is causing, or will cause, undue hardship for the entities or fish
or wildlife depending on the water supply. General criteria for
guidelines to be established by the department of ecology for
distribution of funds must include: A balanced and equitable
distribution of these funds among the different sectors affected by
drought; a funding process that ensures funds are available for drought
impacts that arise both early and later during the course of the
drought; and preference for projects that leverage other federal and
local funds.

Reappropriation:
State Drought Preparedness Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20062003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 136, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,216,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,078,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,294,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3010 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Motor Vehicle Mercury Removal Program (20062850)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 137, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (20062950)

Reappropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,981,000
Appropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,520,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $218,201,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account (20064002)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,574,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,781,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,355,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $216,261,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (20064007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,708,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,163,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,871,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,619,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,490,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Local Toxics Grants for Cleanup and Prevention (20064008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $83,140,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $98,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Transfer of Water Rights for Cabin Owners (20081951)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $347,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Puget Sound Storm water Projects (20082002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,076,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,844,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,920,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm water Projects (20082003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $591,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,409,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reclaimed Water (20084002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,605,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,455,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Puget Sound Aquatic Cleanup and Restoration (20084004)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,353,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,647,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3020 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grants (20084008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,890,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,985,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $92,875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (20084010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,273,000
Water Quality Capital Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,186,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,459,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,424,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,883,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Loan Program (20084011)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,134,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,988,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,122,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $97,878,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3023 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Yakima River Basin Water Storage Feasibility Study (20084026)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
completion of the United States bureau of reclamation's Yakima basin
storage feasibility study, including the associated joint national
environmental policy act, the state environmental policy act, and
environmental impact statement. The reappropriated funds are to be
used by the bureau of reclamation and the department of ecology to
evaluate potential in basin storage facilities such as the proposed
Bumping Lake and Wymer reservoirs and other reasonable alternatives
that will enhance water supplies and streamflows in the Yakima basin.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,150,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3024 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (20084029)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,398,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,602,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Mason County Consortium (20084851)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3026 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000007)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,890,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,379,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal
Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,166,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,435,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,265,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3027 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (30000008)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,557,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,443,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3028 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Cleanup and Prevention of Waste Tire Piles (30000012)

Reappropriation:
Waste Tire Removal Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $720,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3029 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Upper Columbia River Black Sand Beach Cleanup (30000016)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3030 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Program (30000019)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,864,000
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,114,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,886,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3031 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Skykomish Cleanup and Restoration (30000020)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,199,000
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,402,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,601,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,749,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3032 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000028)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,484,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $516,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3033 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Kittitas Groundwater Study (30000029)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
By September 30, 2010, if, after consultation with major Yakima
basin governments and stakeholders, the department of ecology and
Kittitas county reach an agreement on a preferred approach, including
the appropriate geographic scope and administering entity, the
appropriation may be fully or partially redirected for the following
purposes:
(1) Funds may be provided to develop and implement water banking
and transfer methods and agreements that are fully protective of senior
water rights and that protect domestic groundwater users and improve
the profitability of farming operations. The legislature finds such
activities to be in the public interest because they can help sustain
the viability of the agricultural economy and enhance the certainty of
water supplies for domestic groundwater users.
(2) Funds may be provided to lease or purchase water rights to
create a reserve water supply for domestic groundwater users that have
a groundwater right with a priority date later than May 10, 1905, as
well as for all out-of-priority groundwater users. In securing water
for such domestic groundwater users, strong preference shall be given
to the use of water banking and transfer methods that provide
alternatives to permanent purchase and dry-up of agricultural water
rights in the basin, including dry-year options, water banking, long-term water supply lease agreements, long-term agricultural land
fallowing agreements, and reduced consumptive use through efficiency or
alternative cropping arrangements while maintaining historic return
flows.
(3) A portion of the reappropriation may be used for administrative
costs, not to exceed four percent, and other costs associated with
leasing or acquiring and transferring the water rights. All costs
shall be fully recovered from participating domestic water users for
their prorated portion of the cost, including but not limited to the
costs of securing a water right or rights for this purpose, costs
associated with the development and implementation of alternative
agricultural water transfer methods, associated annual operational
costs, and federal water service contract costs owed to the United
States bureau of reclamation. Funds recovered in this manner shall be
deposited in the state and local improvement revolving fund and may be
used for any purpose provided in this section.

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities)--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3034 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grant Program (30000039)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $3,000,000 is provided solely for the city
of Bothell to remediate soil contamination.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,554,000
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,417,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $55,971,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,940,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,911,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3035 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm Water Retrofit and Low-Impact Development Grant Program
(30000097)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
terms and conditions:
(1) Up to $1,343,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation may be used for storm water retrofit and low-impact
development in the city of Bremerton.
(2) Up to $6,929,000 of the local toxics control account--state
appropriation and $1,071,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation may be used for local governments to build staffing
capacity to address storm water in their communities and to improve
storm water research, data management, and monitoring.
(3) The remaining moneys must be allocated through a grant process
to local governments covered by national pollutant discharge
elimination system municipal phase I or phase II permits to fund local
government projects or activities that mitigate or prevent
contamination of storm water or the recontamination of receiving waters
previously remediated under federal or state-approved activities.

Reappropriation:
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,284,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account--
Waste Facilities 1980--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,274,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,737,000
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,929,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,549,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,609,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3036 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Diesel Particle Emissions in Tacoma (30000139)

The reappropriation in this section is provided contingent upon the
department working with the Port of Tacoma to establish a diesel idling
reduction program. The department shall report to the legislature by
December 1, 2010, on the progress of the diesel idling reduction
program and other efforts to reduce diesel particle emissions in
Tacoma.

Reappropriation:
Air Pollution Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3037 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Wood Smoke Particle Emissions in Tacoma (30000140)

Reappropriation:
Air Pollution Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3038 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000142)

Reappropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,750,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,400,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,850,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3039 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (30000144)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $17,500,000 of the cleanup
settlement account--state appropriation may be used for cleanup
activities associated with the Asarco contamination in Everett.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $511,000
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,900,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,097,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,508,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,690,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,198,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3040 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Settlement Funding To Clean Up Toxic Sites (30000145)

Reappropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,630,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,870,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3041 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Leaking Underground Tanks (91000002)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3042 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3043 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Protect Communities from Flood and Drought (92000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,723,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,277,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3044 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Wastewater Treatment and Water Reclamation (92000041)

The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section 3016,
chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,980,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3045 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (30000208)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3046 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000209)

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $102,000,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,205,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $184,205,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $736,820,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $921,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3047 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Waste Tire Pile Prevention and Cleanup (30000210)

Appropriation:
Waste Tire Removal Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3048 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Health Threats from Wood Stove Pollution (30000211)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3049 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Reducing Health Threats from Diesel Emissions (30000212)

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3050 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Watershed Plan Implementation and Flow Achievement (30000213)

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for
projects that improve water supplies and help achieve instream flows by
implementing watershed plans, as follows:
(1) Surface or groundwater storage feasibility projects, where such
projects are consistent with the recommendations of the water storage
task force report to the legislature, February 2001 (Ecology
Publication # 01 11 2002). The department shall consult the department
of fish and wildlife before issuing water storage grants.
(2) Infrastructure or water management projects that resolve
conflicts among water needs for municipal, agricultural, rural, and
fish restoration purposes. The stream flow improvements and other
public benefits secured from these projects must be commensurate with
the investment of state funds.
(3) Purchase and installation of water measuring devices in salmon
critical basins and areas participating in the department of fish and
wildlife fish screening and cooperative compliance program, and basins
where watershed plans call for additional water use or stream flow
measurement.
(4) Acquisition of water to achieve instream flows or to establish
water banks, water exchanges or similar tools. The department shall
give priority to water acquisitions in salmon critical basins and in
basins with adopted watershed plans (chapter 90.82 RCW). The
department shall place acquired water into the state's trust water
rights program (chapters 90.38 and 90.42 RCW).

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3051 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Coordinated Prevention Grants (30000214)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $4,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for grants
to local governments for local waste and pollution prevention projects.
Grants shall fund new organics composting and conversion, green
building, and moderate risk waste initiatives described in the state
"beyond waste" plan.
(2) Up to $2,000,000 of the appropriation may be used for grants to
local governments to provide alternatives to backyard burning of
organic materials. Priority for these grants shall be given to: (a)
Urban growth areas of less than 5,000 people affected by the January 1,
2007, ban on outdoor burning; (b) projects that develop infrastructure
for anon going program; and (c) projects that coordinate regionally.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,610,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,440,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $143,050,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3052 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Hood Canal Regional Septic Repair Loan Program (30000215)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3053 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Remedial Action Grant Program (30000216)

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $52,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,234,931
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,234,931

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3054 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (30000217)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3055 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Burlington Northern Santa Fe Skykomish Restoration (30000218)

Appropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $284,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $284,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3056 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Safe Soils Remediation Program - Central Washington (30000263)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3057 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Swift Creek Natural Asbestos Cleanup (30000015)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3058 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,247,662
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,247,662

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3059 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Yakima Basin Integrated Water Management Plan Implementation
(30000278)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3060 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
ASARCO - Tacoma Smelter Plume and Mines (30000280)

Appropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,647,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,647,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3061 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Boat Launch (30000281)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3062 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Padilla Bay Federal Capital Projects (30000282)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3063 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Coastal Wetlands Federal Funds Administration (30000283)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3064 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Irrigation Efficiencies (30000285)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3065 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm water (30000294)

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3066 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Green River Flood Levee Improvements (30000295)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation is provided solely for projects that will
start construction during the 2011-2013 biennium;
(2) All funding shall be provided by the department to the King
county flood control district. Prior to construction, the district
shall ensure that levee designs comply with all environmental
requirements;
(3) $3,200,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
improvements to the Boeing levee;
(4) $1,400,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
improvements to the Hawley road levee; and
(5) $1,600,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
improvements to the reddington levee.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3067 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Mount Vernon Flood Protection (30000297)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3068 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Rocky Reach - Chelan County Public Utility District (20061023)

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/
Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3069 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Ike Kinswa State Park Improvement (20082950)

Reappropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/
Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3070 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Moran Mount Constitution Road Improvements (30000518)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $875,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $875,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3071 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works: Preservation (30000001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,330,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,930,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3072 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Trail Development (30000003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3073 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Puget Sound Initiative (30000050)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3074 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Twanoh State Park: Storm Water Improvements (30000054)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $210,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3075 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Cama Beach State Park (30000101)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,175,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,775,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3076 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Dash Point State Park: Sanitary Sewer Collection System (30000269)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,312,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,312,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3077 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fort Worden State Park: Housing Areas Exterior Improvements
(30000433)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $546,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $746,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3078 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Illahee State Park: Wastewater Treatment Upgrade (30000447)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,522,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,022,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3079 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deception Pass State Park: Wastewater System (30000483)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3080 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Clean Vessel Boating Pumpout Grants (30000665)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3081 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Parkland Acquisition (30000666)

Appropriation:
Parkland Acquisition Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3082 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Deception Pass State Park: Sewer and Storm Water Improvements
(30000059)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,232,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $911,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,143,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3083 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Flaming Geyser State Park: Parkwide Infrastructure Redevelopment
(30000173)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $203,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,003,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3084 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Fish Barrier Removal (30000540)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,238,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,940,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,178,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3085 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Potholes Replace Failed RV Campsites Electrical Hookups (30000549)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,305,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,305,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3086 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Iron Horse State Park Tunnel Hazard Repair (30000552)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,896,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,896,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3087 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works: Health and Safety (30000667)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,866,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,866,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3088 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Minor Works: Facilities and Infrastructure Preservation (30000766)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,368,964
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,368,964

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3089 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Federal Grant Authority (30000768)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3090 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Local Grant Authority (30000769)

Appropriation:
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account--Private/
Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3091 FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION
Facility and Infrastructure Backlog Reduction (30000770)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,300,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3092 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (19982003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 158, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $396,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $487,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $883,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $177,388,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,271,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3093 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20044001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,496,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $404,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,475,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,375,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3094 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (20044002)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Any amount of the reappropriations that is
not obligated to a specific project may be used to fund alternate
projects approved by the legislature from the same account in biennia
succeeding that in which the moneys were originally appropriated.

Reappropriation:
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,272,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,728,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3095 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Youth Athletic Fields (20062952)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 172, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $456,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,044,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3096 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20064001)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriations are subject to the
provisions of section 403, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,303,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,453,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,547,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3097 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife and Recreation Program (20064002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 404, chapter 488, Laws of 2005.

Reappropriation:
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,655,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3098 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (20064003)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $248,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,023,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,271,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3099 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (20064004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is subject to the
provisions of section 170, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.

Reappropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $591,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,988,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,579,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3100 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest and Fish Passage Program (20082001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) This reappropriation is provided solely for the salmon recovery
funding board in consultation with the small forest landowner office of
the department of natural resources and the department of fish and
wildlife to provide grants to correct fish passage blockages on
nonindustrial forest lands. Selection of projects must be coordinated
with the other salmon recovery grant programs.
(2) In addition to the annual project progress reporting
requirement of RCW 43.88.160(3), the committee shall file quarterly
project progress reports with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $584,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,416,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3101 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (20084001)

Reappropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,795,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,226,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,021,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3102 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (20084003)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,300
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $472,300

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3103 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Restoration and Acquisition (20084004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,391,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,359,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3104 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (20084005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,426,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,599,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3105 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (20084008)

Reappropriation:
NOVA Program Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,778,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,258,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,036,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3106 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (20084011)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriations are provided solely for the approved list
of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2007-3 as developed on March
17, 2007, and LEAP capital document No. 2008-1 as developed on February
13, 2008.
(2) If additional funds are available after funding the farmlands
preservation account projects approved in subsection (1) of this
section, the committee may: Provide one-time grants of up to $25,000
each to counties requesting assistance in developing farmlands
preservation strategies for the purpose of seeking grants from the
farmlands preservation account in future grant cycles.
(3) Funds reappropriated for distribution according to the
provisions of RCW 79A.15.040(1)(c) must be allocated forty percent to
local government projects and sixty percent to state agency projects.
If the cumulative total of local government projects is less than forty
percent of the total distribution to this category, the difference may
be allocated to state agency projects.
(4) Up to $627,299 of the reappropriation from the riparian
protection account is provided solely for the Chehalis river surge
plain natural area preserve. This amount may not be expended for the
project until the department of natural resources has completed a
management plan for the preserve that maintains recreational access and
that management plan is presented to the house of representatives
capital budget and senate ways and means committees.

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,376,000
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,881,000
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,558,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,705,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,520,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $72,480,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3107 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (20084851)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,216,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,641,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,857,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,143,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3108 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000002)

Reappropriation:
Outdoor Recreation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,087,000
Farmlands Preservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,900,000
Riparian Protection Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Habitat Conservation Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,055,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,042,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,958,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3109 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000003)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,550,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,450,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3110 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Land and Water Conservation Fund (30000005)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,890,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,110,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3111 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account (30000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriation is provided solely for
the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2009-3, developed
March 9, 2009.

Reappropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,525,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,525,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,025,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3112 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000009)

Reappropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $346,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $149,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $495,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3113 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Improvement Grants (30000010)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $989,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3114 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
National Recreational Trails Program (30000012)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3115 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Acquisition and Restoration (30000080)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,945,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,055,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3116 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000081)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,795,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,205,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3117 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Salmon Recovery Funding Board Programs (30000140)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
Salmon Recovery Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,062,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,248,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,310,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3118 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Land and Water Conservation Fund (30000142)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3119 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Firearms and Archery Range Recreation (30000144)

Appropriation:
Firearms Range Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $365,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,412,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,777,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3120 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Improvement Grants (30000145)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,100,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3121 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Boating Facilities Program (30000138)

Appropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3122 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (30000141)

Appropriation:
Recreation Resources Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3123 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Recreational Trails Program (30000146)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3124 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000148)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall not be expended on
the acquisition of lands by state agencies.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3125 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (91000001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,900,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3126 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Restoration (30000147)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall not be expended on
the acquisition of lands by state agencies.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3127 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Washington Wildlife Recreation Grants (30000149)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation shall not be expended on
the acquisition of lands by state agencies.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3128 FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION
FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (30000203)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3129 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Flood Assistance for Farm Communities (20084850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $387,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,113,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3130 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Livestock Nutrient Program (30000001)

Reappropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3131 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program (30000003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3132 FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Conservation Assistance Revolving Account (CREP PIP Loans)
(30000005)

Reappropriation:
Conservation Assistance Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $285,000
Appropriation:
Conservation Assistance Revolving Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,365,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3133 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Puget Sound Initiative - Nearshore Salmon Restoration (20062001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $151,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,347,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,498,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3134 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Voights Creek Hatchery (20081003)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The reappropriated funds are provided for
property acquisition and permitting. If the department does not
acquire property, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $538,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $754,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,292,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3135 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Issaquah Hatchery Gravity Intake (20081850)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $562,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3136 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Stemilt Basin Acquisition (20082029)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3137 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000149)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $420,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3138 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000300)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,557,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,057,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3139 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Migratory Waterfowl Habitat (20082045)

Reappropriation:
State Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Appropriation:
State Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $743,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,993,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3140 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (30000022)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3141 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Access Areas Preservation (30000086)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $408,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3142 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Skamania Hatchery Intake Replacement (30000088)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $324,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,850,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,674,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3143 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Carpenter Creek Estuary Restoration (92000023)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,784,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,784,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3144 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (30000135)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3145 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Leque Island Highway 532 Road Protection (92000019)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $680,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3146 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Dam and Dike (30000145)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $597,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $897,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3147 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Fish Passage Barrier Corrections (30000173)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $410,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $590,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3148 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Bebee Springs Phase 3 (92000006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $843,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,643,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3149 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Road Maintenance and Abandonment Plan (30000295)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,826,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,727,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,553,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3150 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Access Areas Preservation (30000296)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,027,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,574,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,601,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3151 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Dam and Dike (30000297)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,043,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,043,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3152 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Puget Sound General Investigation for Nearshore Restoration
(92000025)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $629,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $401,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,030,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3153 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Mitigation Projects and Dedicated Funding (20082048)

(1) The reappropriations in this section are provided contingent
upon the department providing advance notice to the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature and the office of financial management
before applying for federal grants for acquisition of fish and wildlife
habitat lands. The department shall submit this information in the
form of a report that explains the funding source, the match and use
requirements, a description of the project that will be funded, and a
description of future impacts to the operating budget.
(2) Up to $2,300,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
capital projects and engineering to pay the total cost of labor and
materials provided by the department of fish and wildlife.

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,500,000
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,350,000

Appropriation:
General Fund--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000
State Wildlife Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Special Wildlife Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000
Special Wildlife Account--Private/Local . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,450,000
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,863,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $121,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $216,063,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3154 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Cherry Valley Fish Passage and Stream Restoration (30000105)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,451,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,451,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3155 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (30000284)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,241,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,741,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3156 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Infrastructure Preservation (30000298)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,530,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,130,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3157 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Fish Passage Barrier Corrections (30000372)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,280,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,280,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3158 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Minor Works: Emergency Projects (30000404)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3159 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
Voights Creek Hatchery Development (92000008)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3160 FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
Community Partnership Restoration Grants (30000007)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,450,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3161 FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
Community Partnership Restoration Grants (30000008)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3162 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Acquisition Grants (20052021)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,500,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,906,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,406,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3163 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Marine Station (20081015)

Reappropriation:
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $503,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $503,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,006,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $494,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3164 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Legacy (30000060)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3165 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Hazardous Fuels Reduction, Forest Health, and Ecosystem Improvement
(91000001)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3166 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Elk River Estuarine Lands Acquisition (91000007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3167 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Forest Riparian Easement Program (30000198)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3168 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Minor Works: Preservation (30000202)

Appropriation:
Forest Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $446,000
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $474,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $920,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,680,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3169 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Land Bank (30000205)

Appropriation:
Resources Management Cost Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,000,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Narrow-Banding (30000035)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Minor Works: Preservation (30000050)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,100,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,415,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 5001 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2007-09 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (20084200)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For school construction projects funded
through the school construction assistance grant program, the
superintendent of public instruction shall require mapping the design
of new facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be
remodeled.

Reappropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $766,759,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $791,759,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5002 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Northeast King County Skills Center (20084855)

Reappropriation:
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,914,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,688,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,602,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5003 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Vocational Skills Centers (20084300)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,570,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,137,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,707,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5004 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Pierce County Skills Center (20084856)

Reappropriation:
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,070,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,966,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,036,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5005 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2009-11 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (30000031)

(1) In calculating square foot eligibility for state assistance
grants, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced by fifty
percent.
(2) For school construction projects funded through the school
construction assistance grant program, the superintendent of public
instruction shall require mapping the design of new facilities and
remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled.
(3) Up to $17,000,000 of the state building construction account--state appropriation in this section is for the Grand Coulee Dam school
district school project, contingent on the availability of sufficient
contributions from federal, local, or private sources to make up the
remainder of the total cost of the project. The Grand Coulee Dam
school district is faced with a unique set of local funding barriers
and federal funds may substitute as the usual requirement for school
district participation. In the event sufficient matching contributions
are not secured, these funds shall lapse.
(4) $250,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to develop a K-12 facility inventory and
condition system based on option number 3, described in the joint
legislative audit and review committee's January 2010 report, "K-12
Pilot Facility Inventory, Condition and Use System" as providing semi-
customized information capabilities with complete state data. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction must require school
districts to submit any energy audits completed for K-12 public school
buildings to be incorporated in the inventory system. It is the
legislature's intent to improve the availability of information
regarding the local use of state funds provided for school maintenance.
Although school facilities are constructed by, and the property of,
local jurisdictions, the legislature encourages school districts to
invest in activities that extend the useful life of school district
facilities. The state's general taxpayers have an interest in
information regarding these local decisions since state policy has been
to contribute funds in the biennial omnibus operating budget for
facilities' maintenance and to contribute capital budget funds to
eligible districts for renovation and replacement of buildings. In
light of 2010 legislation enacting changes to RCW 28A.150.260 that
increase state funding for school maintenance from $73.27 per annual
average full-time equivalent K-12 student to $153.18 per student by the
2015-16 school year, with annual adjustments for inflation thereafter,
it is the legislature's intent to facilitate development of an
information system that will provide better data regarding school
districts' use of any state funds provided to assist with maintenance
and to monitor facilities' conditions.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $193,375,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,938,000
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $59,428,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $358,741,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,622,130,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,921,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,441,954,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5006 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Energy Efficiency and Small Repair Grants (91000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Up to $3,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
nonrecurring costs associated with school facility repairs and
renovations necessary for health and safety. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with maintenance
and operations administrators of school districts, shall develop
criteria for providing funding for specific projects to stay within the
appropriation level provided in this section. The criteria must
include, but are not limited to, the following: (a) Limiting recipient
district applications to one hundred thousand dollars per three-year
period; (b) limiting districts eligible to receive the grant only once
in any three-year period; and (c) requiring any district receiving
funding provided in this section to demonstrate a consistent commitment
to addressing school facilities needs.
(2) $50,000,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely for
energy operational cost savings improvements to school facilities. The
reappropriation must be distributed using the performance-based
contracting method of delivering energy operational cost savings
improvements to public facilities.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction must report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature and the office of financial
management on the timing and use of the funds by the end of each fiscal
year, until the funds are fully expended.
(4) $100,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to the
Monroe public schools for retrofitting the Frank Wagner Elementary
chimney.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $57,061,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,939,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $70,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $274,000,000
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $212,000,000
Common School Construction Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $486,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,934,561,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,421,161,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Small Repair Grant Program (30000073)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5009 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Capital Program Administration - Maintenance Level (30000095)

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,851,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,111,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,962,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5010 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Skills Centers Minor Works-Facility Preservation (30000111)

Appropriation:

State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
Aviation High School (30000112)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5012 FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION
The superintendent of public instruction shall work with the
department of general administration to help raise school district
awareness of the department's services related to standard construction
contract language, consultant agreement language, and the consultant
selection process. The superintendent of public instruction shall use
their web site, or other means, to post access to this information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
Minor Works - Preservation (30000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $520,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $620,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5014 FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Campus Preservation (30000018)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $550,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,557,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,107,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5015 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR
CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS
Minor Public Works (30000013)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,811,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,611,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Odegaard Undergraduate Learning Center (30000370)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5017 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Bothell (20082006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,650,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,435,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,585,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5018 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Tacoma-Soils Remediation (20082852)

Reappropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5019 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Tacoma-Land Acquisition (20092003)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $245,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,755,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5020 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
House of Knowledge Longhouse (30000021)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $324,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,024,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5021 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Safe Campus (30000022)

Reappropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5022 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000027)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,975,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,175,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington High Voltage Infrastructure Improvement
Project (30000371)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,850,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5024 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Minor Capital Repairs (30000372)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,112,000
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,712,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $106,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $145,312,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5025 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000480)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $103,300,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5026 FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Emergency Repairs (30000481)

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5027 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Pullman - Design Disciplines Facility
Renovation (30000516)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5028 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Vancouver - Applied Technology and
Classroom Building (20062950)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,013,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,513,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5029 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Spokane - Riverpoint Biomedical and
Health Sciences (20162953)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,640,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,840,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5030 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Preservation (30000065)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,250,000
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $165,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,415,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,713,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,128,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5031 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Program (30000066)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,027,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,527,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5032 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Bridge Replacement (30000499)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5033 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Preservation (30000525)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,450,000
Washington State University Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,780,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,230,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $89,960,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,190,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5034 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Fulmer Hall Partial Building Renovation (30000650)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5035 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000823)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,115,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,460,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,575,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5036 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Emergency Repairs (30000824)

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5037 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Compliance (20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,857,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,157,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5038 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Patterson Hall Remodel (20062002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,630,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,343,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $64,973,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5039 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Compliance (30000053)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5040 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000054)

Reappropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,950,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5041 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Infrastructure Preservation (30000055)

Reappropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5042 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Program (30000056)

Reappropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,806,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,306,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5043 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Riverpoint Center Property Sale (30000061)

Eastern Washington University is authorized to sell its center at
701 West First Avenue in downtown Spokane, and directed to deposit the
proceeds of the sale into the Eastern Washington University capital
projects account. The university shall report to the office of
financial management and to the appropriate committees of the
legislature upon the sale of the downtown center and completion of the
updated appraisal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5044 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Upgrade/Repair Campus Water System (30000422)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,511,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,511,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5045 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000427)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5046 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Infrastructure Preservation (30000428)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Eastern Washington University Capital
Projects Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5047 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Compliance (30000429)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5048 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000431)

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,217,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,868,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,085,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5049 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Emergency Repairs (30000465)

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5050 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Hogue Hall Renovation and Addition (20082003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,962,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,989,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,276,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,265,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5051 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (30000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $677,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $218,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $895,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $755,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5052 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Infrastructure Preservation (30000009)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,364,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,754,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $986,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,740,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5053 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000016)

Reappropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,327,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,283,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,610,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5054 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Program (30000025)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $506,000
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $262,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $768,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,413,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,181,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5055 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Science Building (30000045)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $244,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $356,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5056 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works Preservation: Health, Safety, and Code Compliance
(30000442)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5057 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works Preservation: Infrastructure Preservation (30000443)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,250,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,650,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5058 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works Preservation: Facility Preservation (30000444)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,650,000
Central Washington University Capital
Projects Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,150,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5059 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Combined Utilities (30000448)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,600,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5060 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000463)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,422,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,688,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,110,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5061 FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Emergency Repairs (30000522)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5062 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Communications Laboratory Building Preservation and Renovation
(30000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $737,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,777,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,084,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,598,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5063 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works Preservation (30000003)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $275,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,250,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,525,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5064 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works: Health, Safety, Code Compliance (30000016)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,465,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,515,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5065 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Laboratory and Art Annex Building Renovation (30000026)

Reappropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,799,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,849,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5066 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works: Program (30000031)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,040,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5067 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Minor Works: Infrastructure (30000046)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,345,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,380,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5068 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Life Safety Code Compliance (30000035)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,485,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,940,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5069 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Facilities Preservation (30000051)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,485,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,940,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5070 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Infrastructure Preservation (30000067)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $950,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5071 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Science Center - Lab I, 2nd Floor Renovation (30000116)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,950,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,950,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5072 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System
Repairs(30000502)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $760,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,040,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,800,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5073 FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
Emergency Repairs (30000507)

Appropriation:
The Evergreen State College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5074 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Miller Hall Renovation (20041953)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,517,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,517,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5075 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Program (20082093)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $191,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,254,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,445,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5076 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (30000004)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $257,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,315,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,572,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5077 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Facilities Preservation (30000005)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $391,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,520,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,911,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5078 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Infrastructure (30000006)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $178,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,603,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5079 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Program (30000007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $525,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $825,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,423,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,248,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5080 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Network Infrastructure/Switches (30000011)

Reappropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $461,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,155,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,616,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5081 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Classroom and Lab Upgrades (30000425)

Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,799,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,799,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5082 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Fraser Hall Renovation (30000427)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,480,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,480,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5083 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Compliance (30000430)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,450,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,800,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5084 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Facilities Preservation (30000431)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,650,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,600,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5085 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Infrastructure Preservation (30000432)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $332,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,332,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,664,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,656,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,320,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5086 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000510)

Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,614,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,456,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5087 FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Emergency Repairs (30000511)

Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5088 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Pacific-Lewis and Clark Station Camp Park Project (2002S001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,313,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,119,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,432,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5089 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Lewis and Clark Trail Interpretive Infrastructure Grant (20024001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $576,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,424,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5090 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Statewide - Washington Heritage Project Grants (20064004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
212, chapter 371, Laws of 2006.
(2) The reappropriation is adjusted for the termination of the
Village Theatre project which is no longer viable.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $987,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,670,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,657,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5091 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Grants (20074004)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the project list in section
5137, chapter 520, Laws of 2007.
(2) The reappropriation is adjusted for the termination of the
Martin Luther King Ballet project which is no longer viable.
(3) The reappropriation for the historic Seattle PDA project is
transferred to the Center for Wooden Boats.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,533,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,422,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,955,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5092 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Washington Heritage Project Capital Grants (30000011)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of RCW
27.34.330.
(2) The 2011-13 projects must be selected based on their readiness
to proceed.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,030,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,395,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,425,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5093 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Minor Works: Preservation (30000093)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,252,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,402,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5094 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Vancouver National Historic Reserve Visitors Center (91000001)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5095 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Vancouver National Historic Reserve West Barracks (91000002)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(2)(a) The Washington state historical society shall include
provisions in the contract under this section that require that: (i)
Capital improvements be held by the grantee for a specified period of
time that is appropriate to the amount of the grant; and (ii) the
facility be used to provide a public benefit.
(b) If the grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions
of the contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5096 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY
Building Preservation (30000111)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5097 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Museum System Repair and Upgrades/Preservation (20081013)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,091,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,791,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5098 FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Minor Works: Facility Preservation (30000014)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5099 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Water System Replacement (20061501)

Reappropriation:
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,351,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,951,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5100 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
North Seattle Community College: Technology Building Renewal
(30000129)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,861,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,814,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,945,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5101 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lake Washington Technical College: Allied Health Building
(20062697)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,179,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,626,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,805,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5102 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
South Puget Sound Community College: Learning Resource Center
(20062698)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,593,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,872,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,689,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $41,154,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5103 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Wood Construction Center
(20081216)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,436,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,873,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,309,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5104 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Peninsula College: Business and Humanities Center (20081218)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,229,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,715,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5105 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM

Spokane Falls Community College: Chemistry and Life Science
Building (20081219)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $741,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,786,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,527,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5106 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Spokane Community College: Technical Education Building (20081220)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,976,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,454,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,430,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5107 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Index Hall Replacement (20081221)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $546,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,633,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,411,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,590,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5108 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Trades and Industry Building
(20081222)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $559,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,285,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,810,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,654,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5109 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Skagit Valley College: Academic and Student Services Building
(20081224)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $483,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,494,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,383,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,360,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5110 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Lower Columbia College: Health and Science Building (20081225)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $35,101,000
Community/Technical College Capital
Projects Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,701,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,537,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,388,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5111 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Grays Harbor College: Science and Math Building (20081226)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,012,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,556,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,270,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $48,838,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5112 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Pierce College Fort Steilacoom: Cascade Core (20081321)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,925,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,925,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,850,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,991,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,841,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5113 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Health Careers Center (20082701)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $341,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,725,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,766,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5114 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellevue Community College: Health Science Building (20082702)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,554,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,712,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,766,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5115 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bates Technical College: Mohler Communications Technology Center
(20082703)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $837,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $529,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,657,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,023,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5116 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Clark College: Health and Advanced Technologies Building
(20082705)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $652,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,922,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,186,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,760,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5117 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (30000010)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $494,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,983,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,004,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,481,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5118 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (30000036)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,309,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,401,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,710,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5119 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs "A" (30000048)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,472,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $781,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,253,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,282,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,535,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5120 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works: Program (30000078)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,740,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,161,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,901,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,184,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,085,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5121 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: College/City Library (30000113)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5122 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Bellingham Technical College: Fisheries Program (30000117)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5123 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Wenatchee Valley College: Music and Arts Center (30000119)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5124 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Seattle Central Community College: Seattle Maritime Academy
(30000120)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $600,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $737,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,954,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,291,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5125 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Yakima Valley Community College: Palmer Martin Building (30000121)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $537,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,584,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,581,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5126 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Centralia Community College: Student Services (30000123)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,138,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,112,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,250,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5127 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Green River Community College: Science Math Technology Building
(30000130)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $609,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $21,838,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $706,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,153,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5128 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works: Preservation (30000210)

Reappropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,162,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,838,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5129 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Site Repairs "A" (30000504)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,045,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,180,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,225,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5130 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Facility Repairs "A" (30000505)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,829,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $63,316,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,145,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5131 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Construction Contingency Pool (92000007)

The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for
allocation by the state board for community and technical colleges for
major construction and renovation projects that confront emergent and
unavoidable costs in excess of the construction contingency and
management reserves included in the project appropriation. The board
shall report at least quarterly to the office of financial management
and the legislative capital budget committees on requests for and
allocations from the pool.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,339,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,339,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5132 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Roof Repairs "A" (30000434)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $36,500,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $45,625,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5133 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Minor Works: Preservation (30000461)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,001,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,001,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5134 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Preventive Facility Maintenance and Building System Repairs
(30000709)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $91,200,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $114,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5135 FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE
SYSTEM
Emergency Repairs (30000710)

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

(End of part)

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS AND SUPPLEMENTAL PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 6001 (1) Allotments for appropriations in this
act shall be provided in accordance with the capital project review
requirements adopted by the office of financial management and in
compliance with RCW 43.88.110. Projects that will be employing
alternative public works construction procedures under chapter 39.10
RCW are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and
RCW 43.88.110.
(2) Each project is defined as proposed in the legislative budget
notes or in the governor's budget document.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6002 To ensure that major construction
projects are carried out in accordance with legislative and executive
intent, appropriations in this act in excess of $5,000,000 shall not be
expended or encumbered until the office of financial management has
reviewed and approved the agency's predesign. The predesign document
shall include but not be limited to program, site, and cost analysis in
accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial
management. To improve monitoring of major construction projects,
progress reports shall be submitted by the agency administering the
project to the office of financial management and to the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and senate. Reports will be
submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a format to be
developed by the office of financial management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6003 (1) To ensure minor works appropriations
are carried out in accordance with legislative intent, funds
appropriated in this act shall not be allotted until project lists are
on file at the office of financial management, the house of
representatives capital budget committee, and the senate ways and means
committee. All projects must meet the criteria included in subsection
(2)(a) of this section. Revisions to the lists must be filed with the
office of financial management, the house of representatives capital
budget committee, and the senate ways and means committee and include
an explanation of variances from the prior lists before funds may be
expended on the revisions.
(2)(a) Minor works projects are single line appropriations that
include multiple projects of a similar nature and that are valued
between $25,000 and $1,000,000 each, with the exception of higher
education minor works projects that may be valued up to $2,000,000.
These projects can generally be completed within two years of the
appropriation with the funding provided. Agencies are prohibited from
including projects on their minor works lists that are a phase of a
larger project, and that if combined over a continuous period of time,
would exceed $1,000,000, or $2,000,000 for higher education minor works
projects. Improvements for accessibility in compliance with the
Americans with disabilities act may be included in any of the above
minor works categories.
(b) Minor works appropriations shall not be used for, among other
things: Studies, except for technical or engineering reviews or
designs that lead directly to and support a project on the same minor
works list; planning; design outside the scope of work on a minor works
list; moveable, temporary, and traditionally funded operating equipment
not in compliance with the equipment criteria established by the office
of financial management; software not dedicated to control of a
specialized system; moving expenses; land or facility acquisition; or
to supplement funding for projects with funding shortfalls unless
expressly authorized elsewhere in this act. The office of financial
management may make an exception to the limitations described in this
subsection (2)(b) for exigent circumstances after notifying the
legislative fiscal committees and waiting ten days for comments by the
legislature regarding the proposed exception.
(c) Minor works preservation projects may include program
improvements of no more than twenty-five percent of the individual
minor works preservation project cost.
(3) It is generally not the intent of the legislature to make
future appropriations for capital expenditures or for maintenance and
operating expenses for an acquisition project or a significant
expansion project that is initiated through the minor works process and
therefore does not receive a policy and fiscal analysis by the
legislature. Minor works projects are intended to be one-time
expenditures that do not require future state resources to complete.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6004 (1) The office of financial management
may authorize a transfer of appropriation authority provided for a
capital project that is in excess of the amount required for the
completion of such project to another capital project for which the
appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used to expand
the capacity of any facility beyond that intended in making the
appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between capital
appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or
institution of higher education and only between capital projects that
are funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur
between projects to local government agencies except where the grants
are provided within a single omnibus appropriation and where such
transfers are specifically authorized by the implementing statutes that
govern the grants.
(2) The office of financial management may find that an amount is
in excess of the amount required for the completion of a project only
if: (a) The project as defined in the notes to the budget document is
substantially complete and there are funds remaining; or (b) bids have
been let on a project and it appears to a substantial certainty that
the project as defined in the notes to the budget document can be
completed within the biennium for less than the amount appropriated in
this act.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the intent is that each
project be defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's
budget document, unless it clearly appears from the legislative history
that the legislature intended to define the scope of a project in a
different way.
(4) Transfers of funds to an agency's infrastructure savings
appropriation are subject to review and approval by the office of
financial management. Expenditures from an infrastructure savings
appropriation are limited to projects that have a primary purpose to
correct infrastructure deficiencies or conditions that: (a) Adversely
affect the ability to utilize the infrastructure for its current
programmatic use; (b) reduce the life expectancy of the infrastructure;
or (c) increase the operating costs of the infrastructure for its
current programmatic use. Eligible infrastructure projects may include
structures and surface improvements, site amenities, utility systems
outside building footprints and natural environmental changes or
requirements as part of an environmental regulation, a declaration of
emergency for an infrastructure issue in conformance with RCW
43.88.250, or infrastructure planning as part of a facility master
plan.
(5) A report of any transfer effected under this section, except
emergency projects or any transfer under $250,000, shall be filed with
the legislative fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by the office of financial management at least thirty
days before the date the transfer is effected. The office of financial
management shall report all emergency or smaller transfers within
thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6005 (1) It is expected that projects be ready
to proceed in a timely manner depending on the type or phase of the
project or program that is the subject of the appropriation in this
act. Except for major projects that customarily may take more than two
biennia to complete from predesign to the end of construction, or large
infrastructure grant or loan programs supporting projects that often
take more than two biennia to complete, the legislature generally does
not intend to reappropriate funds more than once, particularly for
smaller grant programs, local/community projects, and minor works.
(2) Agencies shall expedite the expenditure of reappropriations and
appropriations in this act in order to: (a) Rehabilitate
infrastructure resources; (b) accelerate environmental rehabilitation
and restoration projects for the improvement of the state's natural
environment; (c) reduce additional costs associated with acquisition
and construction inflationary pressures; and (d) provide additional
employment opportunities associated with capital expenditures.
(3) To the extent feasible, agencies are directed to accelerate
expenditure rates at their current level of permanent employees and
shall use contracted design and construction services wherever
necessary to meet the goals of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6006 State agencies, including institutions of
higher education, shall allot and report full-time equivalent staff for
capital projects in a manner comparable to staff reporting for
operating expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6007 The department of general administration
shall not charge the facility depreciation component of lease charges
for nonprofit tenants in the building adjoining Capitol Way and 11th
avenue during the 2011-2013 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6008 Executive Order No. 05-05, archaeological
and cultural resources, was issued effective November 10, 2005.
Agencies and higher education institutions shall comply with the
requirements set forth in this executive order.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6009 ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES
THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS
The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid
from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the
purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section,
agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial
contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an
agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the
authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation
therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial
contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent
provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance
committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Department of corrections: Enter into a financing contract for
up to $12,400,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to move correctional industries
facilities and operations from McNeil island corrections center to
Stafford creek corrections center.
(2) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase up to 40
acres of land.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley
Community College for up to $2,700,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a music
and art center.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the water and
environment center.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Peninsula college
for up to $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the Forks Satellite building.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Peninsula college
for up to $800,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a wellness center on the Port
Angeles campus.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom community
college for up to $3,916,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build an auxiliary services
building.
(3) Department of general administration: Enter into a financing
contract for up to $6,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the rehabilitation of the
John L. O'Brien building, subject to approval of the project scope by
the speaker of the house of representatives and the chief clerk of the
house of representatives.
(4) Department of social and health services: Enter into a
financing contract for up to $15,850,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct or
renovate specialized housing and treatment facilities for youth
committed to the juvenile rehabilitation administration. The debt
service is to be paid with the savings associated with closure of the
Maple Lane school.
(5)(a) Department of general administration: Enter into a
financing contract for up to $685,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the preservation of
the transportation building.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $250,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the "Perry street child care site" land purchase.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6010 PUGET SOUND PROTECTION AND RESTORATION
Consistent with RCW 90.71.340, when expending appropriations under
this act that contribute to Puget Sound protection and recovery,
agencies shall consult with the Puget Sound partnership to ensure that
projects and expenditures are either in, or consistent with the 2020
action agenda. These consultations shall include the exchange of
information on specific actions, projects, associated funding,
performance measures, and other information necessary to track project
implementation and ensure alignment with the action agenda. In
situations where the Puget Sound partnership finds that a project is
not in, or is not consistent with the action agenda Puget Sound
partnership shall document this finding and report back to the governor
and legislative fiscal committees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6011 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE--ART WORK
ALLOWANCE POOLING
(1) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction of school plant facilities may be expended for
the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The department of commerce may
combine the proceeds from individual projects in order to fund larger
works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and representatives of school
district boards.
(2) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding
two hundred thousand dollars by colleges or universities may be
expended for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.027. The department of
commerce may combine the proceeds from individual projects in order to
fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with
the board of regents or trustees.
(3) One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for
original construction of any public building by a state agency as
defined in RCW 43.17.020 may be expended for the purposes of RCW
43.17.200. The department of commerce may combine the proceeds from
individual projects in order to fund larger works of art or mobile art
displays in consultation with the state agency.
(4) At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the
department of commerce during the 2011-2013 biennium for the purposes
of RCW 28A.335.210, 28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 must be expended solely
for direct acquisition of works of art. The department of commerce may
use up to $100,000 of this amount to conserve or maintain existing
pieces in the state art collection pursuant to chapter 36, Laws of
2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6012 The amounts shown under the headings
"Prior Biennia," "Future Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for
informational purposes only and do not constitute legislative approval
of these amounts. "Prior biennia" typically refers to the immediate
prior biennium for reappropriations, but may refer to multiple biennia
in the case of specific projects. A "future biennia" amount is an
estimate of what may be appropriated for the project or program in the
2011-2013 biennium and the following three biennia; an amount of zero
does not necessarily constitute legislative intent to not provide
funding for the project or program in the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6013 "Reappropriations" in this act are
appropriations and, unless the context clearly provides otherwise, are
subject to the relevant conditions and limitations applicable to
appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to the unexpended
balances remaining on June 30, 2011, from the 2009-2011 biennial
appropriations for each project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6014 To carry out the provisions of this act,
the governor may assign responsibility for predesign, design,
construction, and other related activities to any appropriate agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6015 If any federal moneys appropriated by
this act for capital projects are not received by the state, the
department or agency to which the moneys were appropriated may replace
the federal moneys with funds available from private or local sources.
No replacement may occur under this section without the prior approval
of the director of financial management in consultation with the senate
ways and means committee and the house of representatives capital
budget committee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6016 (1) Unless otherwise stated, for all
appropriations under this act that require a match of nonstate money or
in-kind contributions, the following requirement, consistent with RCW
43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall be timed so
that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the intended
state share of total project costs.
(2) Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not
required to permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for
phased projects if a proportional amount of the required matching funds
is provided for each distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6017 NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS
Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from
the state building construction account, or any other account receiving
bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building
construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee
to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and
regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds.
Portions of the general obligation bond proceeds authorized by chapter
. . ., Laws of 2011 (Z-0354.2/11) for deposit into the state taxable
building construction account that are in excess of amounts required to
comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations
shall be deposited into the state building construction account. The
state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of
financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation
authority between the state building construction account, or any other
account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building
construction account is necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6018 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
The office of financial management, in consultation with the fiscal
committees of the legislature, may select capital projects that have
completed predesign to undergo a budget evaluation study. The budget
evaluation study team approach using value engineering techniques must
be utilized by the office of financial management in conducting the
studies. The office of financial management shall select the budget
evaluation team members, contract for the study, and report the results
to the legislature and agencies in a timely manner following the study.
Funds from the project appropriation must be used by the office of
financial management through an interagency agreement with the affected
agencies to cover the cost of the study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6019 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
Community Partnership Restoration Grants (30000008)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6020 A new section is added to 2009 c 497
(uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
Design and Project Management Services to Close Maple Lane School
(30002227)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,337,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,337,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6021 SALARY ADJUSTMENT
The appropriations in this act shall be expended solely for the
purposes designated in this act and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Appropriations in this act are provided solely for a 3.0
percent salary reduction effective July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2013,
for all employees of the executive, legislative, and judicial branches,
including those employees in the Washington management service, and
including employees exempt from merit system rules, except for:
(a) Elected officials whose salaries are set by the commission on
salaries for elected officials;
(b) Student employees at state institutions of higher education;
(c) Faculty employees at state institutions of higher education:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That, appropriations to higher education
institutions are reduced in an amount reflecting a 3.0 percent
reduction in faculty salary expenditures;
(d) Certificated employees of the state school for the blind and
the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss;
(e) Commissioned officers of the Washington state patrol
represented by the state patrol troopers' association and the
Washington state patrol lieutenants' association;
(f) Represented ferry workers of the Washington state department of
transportation, provided, however, that other reductions are included
in section 504 of the 2011-2013 transportation appropriations act;
(g) Employees whose salary is less than $2,500 per month; and
(h) Employees as specified in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) For employees subject to the 3.0 percent reduction in salary
under subsection (1) of this section employees will receive temporary
salary reduction leave of up to 5.2 hours per month. The director of
personnel shall adopt rules governing the accrual and use of temporary
salary reduction leave.
(3) The department of retirement systems shall include any forgone
salary or lost work hours under subsections (1) and (3) of this section
in the final average compensation of employees affected for purposes of
calculating retirement benefits, as specified in executive request
legislation Z-0211.1/11.
(4) The appropriation from dedicated funds and accounts shall be
made in the amounts specified and from the dedicated funds and accounts
specified in office of financial management document 2011-01, which is
hereby incorporated by reference. The office of financial management
shall allocate the moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts
specified and to the state agencies specified in office of financial
management document 2011-01 and adjust appropriation schedules
accordingly.

Sec. 6022 2009 c 497 s 1050 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT))
COMMERCE
Temporary Public Works Grant Program (92000021)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
grants for the specified public works projects and competitive public
works grant programs specified below. The public works board (board)
shall administer the following competitive public works grant programs
within the amounts specified, provided that up to ten percent of the
amounts provided for competitive grant programs may be transferred to
other competitive grant categories if acceptable applications for any
category do not total the amount available.
(1) $9,531,000 is provided solely for a competitive public works
grant program for local governments serving communities in rural
counties as defined in RCW 43.160.020. The board shall prioritize
applications for funding for this small community jobs program based on
the following criteria:
(a) The unemployment rate of the community;
(b) The ability of the applicant to complete the project promptly;
and
(c) The value the project presents to the community in lasting
improvements to public safety, environmental quality, recreation and
community life, or economic development.
(2) $9,531,000 is provided solely for a competitive public works
grant program for local governments serving high density urban
communities. The board shall prioritize applications for funding from
this urban vitality program based on the following criteria:
(a) The proposed project's ability to decrease the per capita
vehicle miles driven in the community by increasing access to mass
transit, supporting residential density in proximity to employment
opportunities, and improving the safety and appeal of walking and
biking in a community;
(b) The ability of the applicant to complete the project promptly;
and
(c) The local support for the project as indicated by the level of
local matching funds devoted to the project. Local matching funds do
not include funds from other state sources.
(3) The state taxable building construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for emergency loans under RCW
43.155.065.
(4) $23,535,000 is provided solely for the following list of
projects. The appropriation for Airway Heights wastewater treatment
plant is contingent upon a capacity agreement with the Kalispel Tribe
that precludes the need to build multiple wastewater treatment
facilities on the West Plains. If any project on the following list is
unable to show reasonable progress towards accomplishing the intended
project by December 31, 2010, the board may transfer the amount
allocated for the project to the competitive grant categories in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Airway Heights Water Treatment Plant $1,000,000

Small Community Jobs - Assistance for Grand Coulee School $500,000

Small Community Jobs - Camano Island County Park Development $300,000

Small Community Jobs - Connell Infrastructure $1,100,000

Small Community Jobs - Dayton School Biomass Heating System $100,000

Small Community Jobs - Grandview Downtown Revitalization $500,000

Small Community Jobs - Green Acres Neighborhood Park $200,000

Small Community Jobs - Hoh Tribe Fire Station $623,000

Small Community Jobs - Longview Elementary Safety Underpass $250,000

Small Community Jobs - Mesa Playground $35,000

Small Community Jobs - Pasco Commercial Avenue Construction $800,000

Small Community Jobs - Union Gap School Crossing Improvement $227,000

Small Community Jobs - Yakima Downtown Futures $1,000,000

Small Community Jobs - Yelm Longmire Park $400,000

Urban Vitality - Federal Way Urban Infrastructure $5,000,000

((Urban Vitality - Infrastructure for Puyallup (Parametrix) $2,000,000))

Urban Vitality - Percival Landing $3,000,000

Urban Vitality - Redmond Square Development $2,000,000

Urban Vitality - Renton Hawks Landing $1,700,000

Water - Gig Harbor Waste Water Treatment $2,500,000

Water - Pine Terrace Water Association Project $300,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,597,000))
$40,597,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,597,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,597,000))
$42,597,000

Sec. 6023 RCW 39.94.040 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6015 and 2010
1st sp.s. c 35 s 406 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 28B.10.022, the state may not enter
into any financing contract for itself if the aggregate principal
amount payable thereunder is greater than an amount to be established
from time to time by the state finance committee or participate in a
program providing for the issuance of certificates of participation,
including any contract for credit enhancement, without the prior
approval of the state finance committee. Except as provided in RCW
28B.10.022, the state finance committee shall approve the form of all
financing contracts or a standard format for all financing contracts.
The state finance committee also may:
(a) Consolidate existing or potential financing contracts into
master financing contracts with respect to property acquired by one or
more agencies, departments, instrumentalities of the state, the state
board for community and technical colleges, or a state institution of
higher learning; or to be acquired by an other agency;
(b) Approve programs providing for the issuance of certificates of
participation in master financing contracts for the state or for other
agencies;
(c) Enter into agreements with trustees relating to master
financing contracts; and
(d) Make appropriate rules for the performance of its duties under
this chapter.
(2) In the performance of its duties under this chapter, the state
finance committee may consult with representatives from the department
of general administration, the office of financial management, and the
department of information services.
(3) With the approval of the state finance committee, the state
also may enter into agreements with trustees relating to financing
contracts and the issuance of certificates of participation.
(4) Except for financing contracts for real property used for the
purposes described under chapter 28B.140 RCW, the state may not enter
into any financing contract for real property of the state without
prior approval of the legislature. For the purposes of this
requirement, a financing contract must be treated as used for real
property if it is being entered into by the state for the acquisition
of land; the acquisition of an existing building; the construction of
a new building; or a major remodeling, renovation, rehabilitation, or
rebuilding of an existing building. Prior approval of the legislature
is not required under this chapter for a financing contract entered
into by the state under this chapter for energy conservation
improvements to existing buildings where such improvements include:
(a) Fixtures and equipment that are not part of a major remodeling,
renovation, rehabilitation, or rebuilding of the building, or (b) other
improvements to the building that are being performed for the primary
purpose of energy conservation. Such energy conservation improvements
must be determined eligible for financing under this chapter by the
office of financial management in accordance with financing guidelines
established by the state treasurer, and are to be treated as personal
property for the purposes of this chapter.
(5) The state may not enter into any financing contract on behalf
of an other agency without the approval of such a financing contract by
the governing body of the other agency. ((For the purposes of this
requirement, a financing contract must be treated as used for real
property if it is being entered into by the state for the acquisition
of land; the acquisition of an existing building; the construction of
a new building; or a major remodeling, renovation, rehabilitation, or
rebuilding of an existing building. Prior approval of the legislature
is not required under this chapter for a financing contract entered
into by the state under this chapter for energy conservation
improvements to existing buildings where such improvements include (a)
fixtures and equipment that are not part of a major remodeling,
renovation, rehabilitation, or rebuilding of the building, or (b) other
improvements to the building that are being performed for the primary
purpose of energy conservation. Such energy conservation improvements
must be determined eligible for financing under this chapter by the
office of financial management in accordance with financing guidelines
established by the state treasurer, and are to be treated as personal
property for the purposes of this chapter.))

Sec. 6024 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 1017 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Energy Regional Innovation Cluster Match (91000080)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely to
support facilities to be located in Washington state to increase the
competitiveness of state or regional proposals for federal energy
innovation and research funding. State funding must not exceed twenty
percent of the total program or project funds. If a Washington state
research organization is not awarded federal funding for energy
innovation and research by June 30, 2011, the remaining appropriation
in this section may be allotted for export assistance as provided in
section 1018 of this act.

Appropriation:
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,500,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,500,000))
$0

Sec. 6025 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 5037 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works - Program (20082093)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $587,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,087,000

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,913,000))
$1,358,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,000,000))
$9,445,000

Sec. 6026 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 1021 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Risk Pool (91000001)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
a risk pool to complete projects within the scope described in budget
documents submitted as part of the governor's capital budget request
and consistent with legislative history. This section only applies to
projects included in ((this)) the 2010 supplemental capital budget with
reduced appropriations. The office of financial management may allot
portions of this appropriation ten days after notifying the senate ways
and means committee and the house of representatives capital budget
committee. The notification must include an explanation of the need
and the amount for the allotment to complete the scope of an approved
project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,000,000))
$0

Sec. 6027 RCW 43.17.200 and 2005 c 36 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, all state agencies
including all state departments, boards, councils, commissions, and
quasi public corporations shall allocate, as a nondeductible item, out
of any moneys appropriated for the original construction of any public
building, an amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to
be expended by the Washington state arts commission for the acquisition
of works of art. The works of art may be placed on public lands,
integral to or attached to a public building or structure, detached
within or outside a public building or structure, part of a portable
exhibition or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or
exhibited in other public facilities. In addition to the cost of the
works of art, the one-half of one percent of the appropriation as
provided herein shall be used to provide for the administration of the
visual arts program, including conservation of the state art
collection, by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for
installation of the works of art. For the purpose of this section
building shall not include highway construction sheds, warehouses or
other buildings of a temporary nature.

Sec. 6028 RCW 28B.10.027 and 2005 c 36 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, all universities and
colleges shall allocate as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys
appropriated for the original construction or any major renovation or
remodel work exceeding two hundred thousand dollars of any building, an
amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to be expended
by the Washington state arts commission with the approval of the board
of regents or trustees for the acquisition of works of art. The works
of art may be placed on public lands of institutions of higher
education, integral to or attached to a public building or structure of
institutions of higher education, detached within or outside a public
building or structure of institutions of higher education, part of a
portable exhibition or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or
loaned or exhibited in other public facilities.
In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of one
percent of the appropriation shall be used to provide for the
administration of the visual arts program, including conservation of
the state art collection, by the Washington state arts commission and
all costs for installation of the work of art. For the purpose of this
section building shall not include sheds, warehouses, and other
buildings of a temporary nature.

Sec. 6029 RCW 28A.335.210 and 2006 c 263 s 327 are each amended
to read as follows:
Except during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the superintendent of
public instruction shall allocate, as a nondeductible item, out of any
moneys appropriated for state assistance to school districts for the
original construction of any school plant facility the amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to be expended by the
Washington state arts commission for the acquisition of works of art.
The works of art may be placed in accordance with Article IX, sections
2 and 3 of the state Constitution on public lands, integral to or
attached to a public building or structure, detached within or outside
a public building or structure, part of a portable exhibition or
collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in
other public facilities. The Washington state arts commission shall,
in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction,
determine the amount to be made available for the purchase of works of
art under this section, and payments therefor shall be made in
accordance with law. The designation of projects and sites, selection,
contracting, purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design, execution
and placement, acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or
disposition of works of art shall be the responsibility of the
Washington state arts commission in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and representatives of school
district boards of directors. The superintendent of public instruction
and the school district board of directors of the districts where the
sites are selected shall have the right to:
(1) Waive its use of the one-half of one percent of the
appropriation for the acquisition of works of art before the selection
process by the Washington state arts commission;
(2) Appoint a representative to the body established by the
Washington state arts commission to be part of the selection process
with full voting rights;
(3) Reject the results of the selection process;
(4) Reject the placement of a completed work or works of art on
school district premises if such works are portable.
Rejection at any point before or after the selection process shall
not cause the loss of or otherwise endanger state construction funds
available to the local school district. Any works of art rejected
under this section shall be applied to the provision of works of art
under this chapter, at the discretion of the Washington state arts
commission, notwithstanding any contract or agreement between the
affected school district and the artist involved. In addition to the
cost of the works of art the one-half of one percent of the
appropriation as provided in this section shall be used to provide for
the administration, including conservation of the state art collection,
by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation
of the work of art. For the purpose of this section building shall not
include sheds, warehouses, or other buildings of a temporary nature.
The executive director of the arts commission, the superintendent
of public instruction, and the Washington state school directors
association shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the
one-half of one percent for works of art under this section.

Sec. 6030 RCW 28B.15.210 and 2009 c 499 s 1 and 2009 c 497 s 6019
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all
building fees at the University of Washington, including building fees
to be charged students registering in the schools of medicine and
dentistry, shall be paid into the state treasury and credited as
follows:
One-half or such larger portion as may be necessary to prevent a
default in the payments required to be made out of the bond retirement
fund to the "University of Washington bond retirement fund" and the
remainder thereof to the "University of Washington building account."
The sum so credited to the University of Washington building account
shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting, altering,
maintaining, equipping, or furnishing buildings, and for certificates
of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW, except for any sums
transferred as authorized in RCW 28B.20.725(3). The sum so credited to
the University of Washington bond retirement fund shall be used for the
payment of principal of and interest on bonds outstanding as provided
by chapter 28B.20 RCW except for any sums transferred as authorized in
RCW 28B.20.725(5). During the ((2009-2011)) 2011-2013 biennium, sums
credited to the University of Washington building account shall also be
used for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.

Sec. 6031 RCW 28B.15.310 and 2009 c 499 s 2 and 2009 c 497 s 6020
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof, all
building fees shall be paid and credited as follows: To the Washington
State University bond retirement fund, one-half or such larger portion
as may be necessary to prevent a default in the payments required to be
made out of such bond retirement fund; and the remainder thereof to the
Washington State University building account.
The sum so credited to the Washington State University building
account shall be expended by the board of regents for buildings,
equipment, or maintenance on the campus of Washington State University
as may be deemed most advisable and for the best interests of the
university, and for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94
RCW, except for any sums transferred as authorized by law. During the
((2009-2011)) 2011-2013 biennium, sums credited to the Washington State
University building account shall also be used for routine facility
maintenance and utility costs. Expenditures so made shall be accounted
for in accordance with existing law and shall not be expended until
appropriated by the legislature.
The sum so credited to the Washington State University bond
retirement fund shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the
principal of and interest on building bonds issued by the university,
except for any sums which may be transferred out of such fund as
authorized by law.

Sec. 6032 RCW 28B.35.370 and 2009 c 499 s 5 and 2009 c 497 s 6021
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof all
building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State
College shall be paid into the state treasury and these together with
such normal school fund revenues as provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are
received by the state treasury shall be credited as follows:
(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of
each regional university and The Evergreen State College, if issuing
bonds payable out of its building fees and above described normal
school fund revenues, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts
required in the ensuing twelve months to pay and secure the payment of
the principal of and interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified
by each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be a
prior lien and charge against all building fees and above described
normal school fund revenues of such institution. The state treasurer
shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington
University capital projects account, the Western Washington University
capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital
projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the
state treasury. The amounts deposited in the respective capital
projects accounts shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the
principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by such regional
universities and The Evergreen State College as authorized by law. If
in any twelve month period it shall appear that the amount certified by
any such board of trustees is insufficient to pay and secure the
payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building
and above described normal school fund revenue bonds of its
institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of trustees and
such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of
moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest
on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.
(2) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751 shall
be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the Western Washington University capital projects account, or The
Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively, which
accounts are hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited
in the respective capital projects accounts shall be appropriated and
expended to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest
on bonds payable out of the building fees and normal school revenue and
for the construction, reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance,
demolition and major alteration of buildings and other capital assets,
and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or
appurtenances in relation thereto except for any sums transferred
therefrom as authorized by law. During the ((2009-2011)) 2011-2013
biennium, sums in the respective capital accounts shall also be used
for routine facility maintenance and utility costs.
(3) Funds available in the respective capital projects accounts may
also be used for certificates of participation under chapter 39.94 RCW.

Sec. 6033 RCW 28B.50.360 and 2009 c 499 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
Within thirty-five days from the date of start of each quarter all
collected building fees of each such community and technical college
shall be paid into the state treasury, and shall be credited as
follows:
(1) On or before June 30th of each year the college board if
issuing bonds payable out of building fees shall certify to the state
treasurer the amounts required in the ensuing twelve-month period to
pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such
bonds. The state treasurer shall thereupon deposit the amounts so
certified in the community and technical college capital projects
account. Such amounts of the funds deposited in the community and
technical college capital projects account as are necessary to pay and
secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the building
bonds issued by the college board as authorized by this chapter shall
be devoted to that purpose. If in any twelve-month period it shall
appear that the amount certified by the college board is insufficient
to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the
outstanding building bonds, the state treasurer shall notify the
college board and such board shall adjust its certificate so that all
requirements of moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal
and interest on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at
all times.
(2) The community and technical college capital projects account is
hereby created in the state treasury. The sums deposited in the
capital projects account shall be appropriated and expended to pay and
secure the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable
out of the building fees and for the construction, reconstruction,
erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major alteration of
buildings and other capital assets owned by the state board for
community and technical colleges in the name of the state of
Washington, and the acquisition of sites, rights-of-way, easements,
improvements or appurtenances in relation thereto, engineering and
architectural services provided by the department of general
administration, and for the payment of principal of and interest on any
bonds issued for such purposes. During the 2011-2013 biennium, sums in
the capital projects account shall also be used for routine facility
maintenance and utility costs.
(3) Funds available in the community and technical college capital
projects account may also be used for certificates of participation
under chapter 39.94 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6034 Part headings and captions in this act
are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6035 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6036 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately, except for sections 6030 through 6033 of this act which
take effect July 1, 2010.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

. . . . . . . . . . . . 108, 111
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 116
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2, 28, 153, 157
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 90
DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 30, 34
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 98
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 38, 151
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 129
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 113
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 29, 158
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 97, 151
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 78
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 89
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 71
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 107
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 102
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 119
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 108
WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 107
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 126
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 110
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 122, 158
--- END ---