BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means the number of
persons expected to meet entitlement requirements and require the
services of public assistance programs, state correctional
institutions, state correctional noninstitutional supervision, state
institutions for juvenile offenders, the common school system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, and adoption support.
(2) "Director" means the director of the office of forecast
councils.
(3) "Office" means the office of forecast councils.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) There is created the office of forecast
councils. The economic and revenue forecast council is created within
the office of forecast councils. The caseload forecast council is
created within the office of forecast councils.
(2) The office is headed by a director appointed by the economic
and revenue forecast council and the caseload forecast council. The
chairs of the two councils shall develop a process for the selection of
the director. Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members
of each council is required for any decisions regarding employment of
the director. The director must be employed for a term of three years.
At the end of the first year of each three-year term the councils shall
consider extension of the director's term by one year. The supervisor
of the economic and revenue forecast council serves as the first
director for the office beginning July 1, 2011, for the remainder of
his or her original term. The council may fix the compensation of the
director.
(3) The director may employ staff as necessary to perform the
duties imposed by this chapter and to perform the duties necessary to
support the work of the economic and revenue forecast council and the
caseload forecast council.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.33.010 and 1990 c 229 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The economic and revenue forecast council is hereby created
within the office of forecast councils. The economic and revenue
forecast council ((shall)) consists of two individuals appointed by the
governor and four individuals, one of whom is appointed by the
chairperson of each of the two largest political caucuses in the senate
and house of representatives. The chair of the economic and revenue
forecast council ((shall)) must be selected from among the four caucus
appointees. The economic and revenue forecast council may select such
other officers as the members deem necessary.
(2) The ((council)) director shall ((employ an economic and revenue
forecast supervisor to)) supervise the preparation of all economic and
revenue forecasts. ((As used in this chapter, "supervisor" means the
economic and revenue forecast supervisor. Approval by an affirmative
vote of at least five members of the council is required for any
decisions regarding employment of the supervisor. Employment of the
supervisor shall terminate after each term of three years. At the end
of the first year of each three-year term the council shall consider
extension of the supervisor's term by one year. The council may fix
the compensation of the supervisor. The supervisor shall employ staff
sufficient to accomplish the purposes of this section.))
(3) The economic and revenue forecast council ((shall)) oversees
the preparation of and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four
members, the official, optimistic, and pessimistic state economic and
revenue forecasts prepared under RCW 82.33.020 (as recodified by this
act). If the economic and revenue forecast council is unable to
approve a forecast before a date required in RCW 82.33.020 (as
recodified by this act), the ((supervisor)) director shall submit the
forecast without approval and the forecast ((shall have)) has the same
effect as if approved by the economic and revenue forecast council.
(4) ((A)) An economic and revenue forecast councilmember who does
not cast an affirmative vote for approval of the official economic and
revenue forecast may request, and the ((supervisor)) director shall
provide, an alternative economic and revenue forecast based on
assumptions specified by the member.
(5) Members of the economic and revenue forecast council ((shall))
serve without additional compensation but ((shall)) must be reimbursed
for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending
sessions of the economic and revenue forecast council or on official
business authorized by the economic and revenue forecast council.
Nonlegislative members of the economic and revenue forecast council
((shall)) must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.33.020 and 2005 c 319 s 137 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Four times each year the ((supervisor)) director shall prepare,
subject to the approval of the economic and revenue forecast council
under RCW 82.33.010 (as recodified by this act):
(a) An official state economic and revenue forecast;
(b) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
optimistic economic and revenue projections; ((and))
(c) An unofficial state economic and revenue forecast based on
pessimistic economic and revenue projections; and
(d) An unofficial budget projection, in conjunction with the office
of financial management, that encompasses revenue projections and
expenditure projections for the current biennium and the following two
biennia.
(2) The ((supervisor)) director shall submit forecasts prepared
under this section, along with any unofficial forecasts provided under
RCW 82.33.010 (as recodified by this act), to the governor and the
members of the committees on ways and means and the chairs of the
committees on transportation of the senate and house of
representatives, including one copy to the staff of each of the
committees, on or before November 20th, February 20th in the even-numbered years, March 20th in the odd-numbered years, June 20th, and
September 20th. In addition, the director shall submit an unofficial,
preliminary state revenue forecast on or around February 6th in even-numbered years, March 6th in odd-numbered years, and November 6th in
each year. All forecasts ((shall)) must include both estimated
receipts and estimated revenues in conformance with generally accepted
accounting principles as provided by RCW 43.88.037.
(3) All agencies of state government shall provide to the
((supervisor)) director immediate access to all information relating to
economic and revenue forecasts. Revenue collection information
((shall)) must be available to the ((supervisor)) director the first
business day following the conclusion of each collection period.
(4) The economic and revenue forecast ((supervisor)) director and
staff shall ((co-locate and)) share information, data, and files with
the tax research section of the department of revenue but ((shall)) may
not duplicate the duties and functions of one another.
(5) As part of its forecasts under subsection (1) of this section,
the ((supervisor)) director shall provide estimated revenue from
tuition fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.33.030 and 1984 c 138 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administrator of the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee may request, and the ((supervisor)) director shall
provide, alternative economic and revenue forecasts based on
assumptions specified by the administrator.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.88C.010 and 2000 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The caseload forecast council is hereby created. The caseload
forecast council ((shall)) consists of two individuals appointed by the
governor and four individuals, one of whom is appointed by the
chairperson of each of the two largest political caucuses in the senate
and house of representatives. The chair of the caseload forecast
council ((shall)) must be selected from among the four caucus
appointees. The caseload forecast council may select such other
officers as the members deem necessary.
(2) The ((council)) director shall ((employ a caseload forecast
supervisor to)) supervise the preparation of all caseload forecasts.
((As used in this chapter, "supervisor" means the caseload forecast
supervisor.
(3) Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the
council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the
supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each
term of three years. At the end of the first year of each three-year
term the council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by
one year. The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The
supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of
this section.
(4))) (3) The caseload forecast council ((shall)) oversees the
preparation of and approves, by an affirmative vote of at least four
members, the official state caseload forecasts prepared under RCW
43.88C.020 (as recodified by this act). If the caseload forecast
council is unable to approve a forecast before a date required in RCW
43.88C.020 (as recodified by this act), the ((supervisor)) director
shall submit the forecast without approval and the forecast ((shall
have)) has the same effect as if approved by the caseload forecast
council.
(((5))) (4) A caseload forecast councilmember who does not cast an
affirmative vote for approval of the official caseload forecast may
request, and the ((supervisor)) director shall provide, an alternative
forecast based on assumptions specified by the member.
(((6))) (5) Members of the caseload forecast council ((shall))
serve without additional compensation but ((shall)) must be reimbursed
for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending
sessions of the caseload forecast council or on official business
authorized by the caseload forecast council. Nonlegislative members of
the council ((shall)) must be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(((7) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means the number of
persons expected to meet entitlement requirements and require the
services of public assistance programs, state correctional
institutions, state correctional noninstitutional supervision, state
institutions for juvenile offenders, the common school system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, and adoption support.
(8) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this chapter.))

Sec. 7 RCW 43.88C.020 and 1997 c 168 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In consultation with the caseload forecast work group
established under RCW 43.88C.030 (as recodified by this act), and
subject to the approval of the caseload forecast council under RCW
43.88C.010 (as recodified by this act), the ((supervisor)) director
shall prepare:
(a) An official state caseload forecast; and
(b) Other caseload forecasts based on alternative assumptions as
the council may determine.
(2) The ((supervisor)) director shall submit caseload forecasts
prepared under this section, along with any unofficial forecasts
provided under RCW 43.88C.010 (as recodified by this act), to the
governor and the members of the legislative fiscal committees,
including one copy to the staff of each of the committees. The
forecasts ((shall)) must be submitted at least three times each year
and on such dates as the caseload forecast council determines will
facilitate the development of budget proposals by the governor and the
legislature.
(3) All agencies of state government shall provide to the
((supervisor)) director immediate access to all information relating to
caseload forecasts.
(4) The administrator of the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee may request, and the ((supervisor))
director shall provide, alternative caseload forecasts based on
assumptions specified by the administrator.
(5) The official state caseload forecast under this section
((shall)) must be the basis of the governor's budget document as
provided in RCW 43.88.030 and utilized by the legislature in the
development of the omnibus biennial appropriations act.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.88.120 and 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 13 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Each agency engaged in the collection of revenues shall prepare
estimated revenues and estimated receipts for the current and ensuing
biennium and shall submit the estimates to the director of financial
management and the director of revenue at times and in the form
specified by the directors, along with any other information which the
directors may request. ((For those agencies required to develop six-year programs and financial plans under RCW 44.40.070, six-year revenue
estimates shall be submitted to the director of financial management
and the transportation committees of the senate and the house of
representatives unless the responsibility for reporting these revenue
estimates is assumed elsewhere.))
(2) A copy of such revenue estimates ((shall)) must be
simultaneously submitted to the economic and revenue forecast work
group when required by ((the office of)) the economic and revenue
forecast council.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.94.431 and 1995 c 403 s 630 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in RCW 43.05.060 through 43.05.080 and
43.05.150, and in addition to or as an alternate to any other penalty
provided by law, any person who violates any of the provisions of
chapter 70.94 RCW, chapter 70.120 RCW, or any of the rules in force
under such chapters may incur a civil penalty in an amount not to
exceed ten thousand dollars per day for each violation. Each such
violation ((shall be)) is a separate and distinct offense, and in case
of a continuing violation, each day's continuance ((shall be)) is a
separate and distinct violation.
(b) Any person who fails to take action as specified by an order
issued pursuant to this chapter ((shall be)) is liable for a civil
penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars for each day of continued
noncompliance.
(2)(a) Penalties incurred but not paid ((shall)) accrue interest,
beginning on the ninety-first day following the date that the penalty
becomes due and payable, at the highest rate allowed by RCW 19.52.020
on the date that the penalty becomes due and payable. If violations or
penalties are appealed, interest ((shall)) does not begin to accrue
until the thirty-first day following final resolution of the appeal.
(b) The maximum penalty amounts established in this section may be
increased annually to account for inflation as determined by ((the
state office of)) the economic and revenue forecast council.
(3) Each act of commission or omission which procures, aids or
abets in the violation ((shall be)) is considered a violation under the
provisions of this section and subject to the same penalty. The
penalties provided in this section ((shall be)) are imposed pursuant to
RCW 43.21B.300.
(4) All penalties recovered under this section by the department
((shall)) must be paid into the state treasury and credited to the air
pollution control account established in RCW 70.94.015 or, if recovered
by the authority, ((shall)) must be paid into the treasury of the
authority and credited to its funds. If a prior penalty for the same
violation has been paid to a local authority, the penalty imposed by
the department under subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) must be
reduced by the amount of the payment.
(5) To secure the penalty incurred under this section, the state or
the authority ((shall)) will have a lien on any vessel used or operated
in violation of this chapter which ((shall be)) is enforced as provided
in RCW 60.36.050.
(6) Public or private entities that are recipients or potential
recipients of department grants, whether for air quality related
activities or not, may have such grants rescinded or withheld by the
department for failure to comply with provisions of this chapter.
(7) In addition to other penalties provided by this chapter,
persons knowingly under-reporting emissions or other information used
to set fees, or persons required to pay emission or permit fees who are
more than ninety days late with such payments may be subject to a
penalty equal to three times the amount of the original fee owed.
(8) By January 1, 1992, the department ((shall)) must develop rules
for excusing excess emissions from enforcement action if such excess
emissions are unavoidable. The rules ((shall)) must specify the
criteria and procedures for the department and local air authorities to
determine whether a period of excess emissions is excusable in
accordance with the state implementation plan.

Sec. 10 RCW 70.94.483 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 932 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The wood stove education and enforcement account is hereby
created in the state treasury. Money placed in the account ((shall))
must include all money received under subsection (2) of this section
and any other money appropriated by the legislature. Money in the
account ((shall)) must be spent for the purposes of the wood stove
education program established under RCW 70.94.480 and for enforcement
of the wood stove program, and ((shall be)) is subject to legislative
appropriation. However, during the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the wood stove education and enforcement
account to the air pollution control account such amounts as specified
in the omnibus operating budget bill.
(2) The department of ecology, with the advice of the advisory
committee, shall set a flat fee of thirty dollars, on the retail sale,
as defined in RCW 82.04.050, of each solid fuel burning device after
January 1, 1992. The fee ((shall be)) is imposed upon the consumer and
((shall)) is not ((be)) subject to the retail sales tax provisions of
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The fee may be adjusted annually above
thirty dollars to account for inflation as determined by the ((state
office of the)) economic and revenue forecast council. The fee
((shall)) must be collected by the department of revenue in conjunction
with the retail sales tax under chapter 82.08 RCW. If the seller fails
to collect the fee herein imposed or fails to remit the fee to the
department of revenue in the manner prescribed in chapter 82.08 RCW,
the seller ((shall be)) is personally liable to the state for the
amount of the fee. The collection provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW
((shall)) apply. The department of revenue shall deposit fees
collected under this section in the wood stove education and
enforcement account.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.06.087 and 1997 c 168 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, this
chapter does not apply to the ((economic and revenue forecast
supervisor and staff employed)) director of the office of forecast
councils employed under ((RCW 82.33.010 or the caseload forecast
supervisor and staff employed under RCW 43.88C.010)) section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) The economic and revenue forecast
council is transferred to the office of forecast councils.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the economic and
revenue forecast council shall be delivered to the custody of the
office of forecast councils. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
economic and revenue forecast council shall be made available to the
office of forecast councils. All funds, credits, or other assets held
by the economic and revenue forecast council shall be assigned to the
office of forecast councils.
(b) Any appropriations made to the economic and revenue forecast
council shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred
and credited to the office of forecast councils.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the economic and revenue forecast council are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the office of forecast councils.
All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil
service law, are assigned to the office of forecast councils to perform
their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the economic and
revenue forecast council shall be continued and acted upon by the
office of forecast councils. All existing contracts and obligations
shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the office of
forecast councils.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the economic and revenue forecast council shall not affect the validity
of any act performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The caseload forecast council is
transferred to the office of forecast councils.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the caseload forecast
council shall be delivered to the custody of the office of forecast
councils. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles,
and other tangible property employed by the caseload forecast council
shall be made available to the office of forecast councils. All funds,
credits, or other assets held by the caseload forecast council shall be
assigned to the office of forecast councils.
(b) Any appropriations made to the caseload forecast council shall,
on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to
the office of forecast councils.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the caseload forecast council are transferred
to the jurisdiction of the office of forecast councils. All employees
classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are
assigned to the office of forecast councils to perform their usual
duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights,
subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance
with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the caseload forecast
council shall be continued and acted upon by the office of forecast
councils. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full
force and shall be performed by the office of forecast councils.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the caseload forecast council shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 All provisions of chapters 82.33 and 43.88C
RCW are recodified in chapter 43.--- RCW (the new chapter created under
section 14 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---