BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
Achievement Gap Oversight and Accountability Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.300.136 (Achievement gap oversight and accountability
committee -- Policy and strategy recommendations) and 2010 c 235 s 901 &
2009 c 468 s 2; and
(2) RCW 28A.300.137 (Strategies to address the achievement gap--Improvement of education performance measures -- Annual report) and 2009
c 468 s 3 & 2008 c 298 s 3.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.290.010 and 2010 c 236 s 15 and 2010 c 234 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The quality education council is created to recommend and
inform the ongoing implementation by the legislature of an evolving
program of basic education and the financing necessary to support such
program. The council shall develop strategic recommendations on the
program of basic education for the common schools. The council shall
take into consideration the capacity report produced under RCW
28A.300.172 and the availability of data and progress of implementing
the data systems required under RCW 28A.655.210. Any recommendations
for modifications to the program of basic education shall be based on
evidence that the programs effectively support student learning. The
council shall update the statewide strategic recommendations every four
years. The recommendations of the council are intended to:
(a) Inform future educational policy and funding decisions of the
legislature and governor;
(b) Identify measurable goals and priorities for the educational
system in Washington state for a ten-year time period, including the
goals of basic education and ongoing strategies for coordinating
statewide efforts to eliminate the achievement gap and reduce student
dropout rates; and
(c) Enable the state of Washington to continue to implement an
evolving program of basic education.
(2) The council may request updates and progress reports from the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, the professional educator standards board, and the
department of early learning on the work of the agencies as well as
educational working groups established by the legislature.
(3) The chair of the council shall be selected from the
councilmembers. The council shall be composed of the following
members:
(a) Four members of the house of representatives, with two members
representing each of the major caucuses and appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives;
(b) Four members of the senate, with two members representing each
of the major caucuses and appointed by the president of the senate; and
(c) One representative each from the office of the governor, office
of the superintendent of public instruction, state board of education,
professional educator standards board, and department of early
learning((; and
(d) One nonlegislative representative from the achievement gap
oversight and accountability committee established under RCW
28A.300.136, to be selected by the members of the committee.
(4) In the 2009 fiscal year, the council shall meet as often as
necessary as determined by the chair. In subsequent years, the council
shall meet no more than four times a year)).
(((5))) (4)(a) The council shall submit an initial report to the
governor and the legislature by January 1, 2010, detailing its
recommendations, including recommendations for resolving issues or
decisions requiring legislative action during the 2010 legislative
session, and recommendations for any funding necessary to continue
development and implementation of chapter 548, Laws of 2009.
(b) The initial report shall, at a minimum, include:
(i) Consideration of how to establish a statewide beginning teacher
mentoring and support system;
(ii) Recommendations for a program of early learning for at-risk
children;
(iii) A recommended schedule for the concurrent phase-in of the
changes to the instructional program of basic education and the
implementation of the funding formulas and allocations to support the
new instructional program of basic education as established under
chapter 548, Laws of 2009. The phase-in schedule shall have full
implementation completed by September 1, 2018; and
(iv) A recommended schedule for phased-in implementation of the new
distribution formula for allocating state funds to school districts for
the transportation of students to and from school, with phase-in
beginning no later than September 1, 2013.
(((6))) (5) The council shall submit a report to the legislature by
January 1, 2012, detailing its recommendations for a comprehensive plan
for a voluntary program of early learning. Before submitting the
report, the council shall seek input from the early learning advisory
council created in RCW 43.215.090.
(((7))) (6) The council shall submit a report to the governor and
the legislature by December 1, 2010, that includes:
(a) Recommendations for specific strategies, programs, and funding,
including funding allocations through the funding distribution formula
in RCW 28A.150.260, that are designed to close the achievement gap and
increase the high school graduation rate in Washington public schools.
The council shall consult with ((the achievement gap oversight and
accountability committee and)) the building bridges work group in
developing its recommendations; and
(b) Recommendations for assuring adequate levels of state-funded
classified staff to support essential school and district services.
(((8))) (7) The council shall be staffed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial
management. Additional staff support shall be provided by the state
entities with representatives on the council. Senate committee
services and the house of representatives office of program research
may provide additional staff support.
(((9))) (8) Legislative members of the council shall serve without
additional compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council
or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative
members of the council may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.175.075 and 2010 c 243 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
establish a state-level building bridges work group that includes K-12
and state agencies that work with youth who have dropped out or are at
risk of dropping out of school. The following agencies shall appoint
representatives to the work group: The office of the superintendent of
public instruction, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, the department of early learning, the employment security
department, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
department of health, the community mobilization office, and the
children's services and behavioral health and recovery divisions of the
department of social and health services. The work group should also
consist of one representative from each of the following agencies and
organizations: A statewide organization representing career and
technical education programs including skill centers; the juvenile
courts or the office of juvenile justice, or both; the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys; the Washington state office of
public defense; accredited institutions of higher education; the
educational service districts; the area workforce development councils;
parent and educator associations; ((achievement gap oversight and
accountability committee;)) office of the education ombudsman; local
school districts; agencies or organizations that provide services to
special education students; community organizations serving youth;
federally recognized tribes and urban tribal centers; each of the major
political caucuses of the senate and house of representatives; and the
minority commissions.
(2) To assist and enhance the work of the building bridges programs
established in RCW 28A.175.025, the state-level work group shall:
(a) Identify and make recommendations to the legislature for the
reduction of fiscal, legal, and regulatory barriers that prevent
coordination of program resources across agencies at the state and
local level;
(b) Develop and track performance measures and benchmarks for each
partner agency or organization across the state including performance
measures and benchmarks based on student characteristics and outcomes
specified in RCW 28A.175.035(1)(e); and
(c) Identify research-based and emerging best practices regarding
prevention, intervention, and retrieval programs.
(3)(a) The work group shall report to the quality education
council, appropriate committees of the legislature, and the governor on
an annual basis beginning December 1, 2007, with proposed strategies
for building K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement
systems in local communities throughout the state including, but not
limited to, recommendations for implementing emerging best practices,
needed additional resources, and eliminating barriers.
(b) By September 15, 2010, the work group shall report on:
(i) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the
percentage of students graduating from high school;
(ii) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the
percentage of youth who have dropped out of school who should be
reengaged in education and be college and work ready;
(iii) Recommended funding for supporting career guidance and the
planning and implementation of K-12 dropout prevention, intervention,
and reengagement systems in school districts and a plan for phasing the
funding into the program of basic education, beginning in the 2011-2013
biennium; and
(iv) A plan for phasing in the expansion of the current school
improvement planning program to include state-funded, dropout-focused
school improvement technical assistance for school districts in
significant need of improvement regarding high school graduation rates.
(4) State agencies in the building bridges work group shall work
together, wherever feasible, on the following activities to support
school/family/community partnerships engaged in building K-12 dropout
prevention, intervention, and reengagement systems:
(a) Providing opportunities for coordination and flexibility of
program eligibility and funding criteria;
(b) Providing joint funding;
(c) Developing protocols and templates for model agreements on
sharing records and data;
(d) Providing joint professional development opportunities that
provide knowledge and training on:
(i) Research-based and promising practices;
(ii) The availability of programs and services for vulnerable
youth; and
(iii) Cultural competence.
(5) The building bridges work group shall make recommendations to
the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2010, on a state-level
and regional infrastructure for coordinating services for vulnerable
youth. Recommendations must address the following issues:
(a) Whether to adopt an official conceptual approach or framework
for all entities working with vulnerable youth that can support
coordinated planning and evaluation;
(b) The creation of a performance-based management system,
including outcomes, indicators, and performance measures relating to
vulnerable youth and programs serving them, including accountability
for the dropout issue;
(c) The development of regional and/or county-level multipartner
youth consortia with a specific charge to assist school districts and
local communities in building K-12 comprehensive dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement systems;
(d) The development of integrated or school-based one-stop shopping
for services that would:
(i) Provide individualized attention to the neediest youth and
prioritized access to services for students identified by a dropout
early warning and intervention data system;
(ii) Establish protocols for coordinating data and services,
including getting data release at time of intake and common assessment
and referral processes; and
(iii) Build a system of single case managers across agencies;
(e) Launching a statewide media campaign on increasing the high
school graduation rate; and
(f) Developing a statewide database of available services for
vulnerable youth.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.410.260 and 2009 c 468 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board((, in consultation
and collaboration with the achievement gap oversight and accountability
committee established under RCW 28A.300.136,)) shall identify a list of
model standards for cultural competency and make recommendations to the
education committees of the legislature on the strengths and weaknesses
of those standards.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cultural competency"
includes knowledge of student cultural histories and contexts, as well
as family norms and values in different cultures; knowledge and skills
in accessing community resources and community and parent outreach; and
skills in adapting instruction to students' experiences and identifying
cultural contexts for individual students.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.655.115 and 2010 c 235 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2010-11 school year, each school shall
conduct outreach and seek feedback from a broad and diverse range of
parents, other individuals, and organizations in the community
regarding their experiences with the school. The school shall
summarize the responses in its annual report under RCW 28A.655.110.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
create a working group with representatives of organizations
representing parents, teachers, and principals as well as diverse
communities. ((The working group shall also include a representative
from the achievement gap oversight and accountability committee.)) By
September 1, 2010, the working group shall develop model feedback tools
and strategies that school districts may use to facilitate the feedback
process required in subsection (1) of this section. The model tools
and strategies are intended to provide assistance to school districts.
School districts are encouraged to adapt the models or develop unique
tools and strategies that best fit the circumstances in their
communities.

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.657.005 and 2010 c 235 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that it is the state's responsibility to
create a coherent and effective accountability framework for the
continuous improvement for all schools and districts. This system must
provide an excellent and equitable education for all students; an
aligned federal/state accountability system; and the tools necessary
for schools and districts to be accountable. These tools include the
necessary accounting and data reporting systems, assessment systems to
monitor student achievement, and a system of general support, targeted
assistance, and, if necessary, intervention.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction is
responsible for developing and implementing the accountability tools to
build district capacity and working within federal and state
guidelines. The legislature assigned the state board of education
responsibility and oversight for creating an accountability framework.
This framework provides a unified system of support for challenged
schools that aligns with basic education, increases the level of
support based upon the magnitude of need, and uses data for decisions.
Such a system will identify schools and their districts for recognition
as well as for additional state support. For a specific group of
challenged schools, defined as persistently lowest-achieving schools,
and their districts, it is necessary to provide a required action
process that creates a partnership between the state and local district
to target funds and assistance to turn around the identified lowest-achieving schools.
Phase I of this accountability system will recognize schools that
have done an exemplary job of raising student achievement and closing
the achievement gaps using the state board of education's
accountability index. ((The state board of education shall have
ongoing collaboration with the achievement gap oversight and
accountability committee regarding the measures used to measure the
closing of the achievement gaps and the recognition provided to the
school districts for closing the achievement gaps.)) Phase I will also
target the lowest five percent of persistently lowest-achieving schools
defined under federal guidelines to provide federal funds and federal
intervention models through a voluntary option in 2010, and for those
who do not volunteer and have not improved student achievement, a
required action process beginning in 2011.
Phase II of this accountability system will work toward
implementing the state board of education's accountability index for
identification of schools in need of improvement, including those that
are not Title I schools, and the use of state and local intervention
models and state funds through a required action process beginning in
2013, in addition to the federal program. Federal approval of the
state board of education's accountability index must be obtained or
else the federal guidelines for persistently lowest-achieving schools
will continue to be used.
The expectation from implementation of this accountability system
is the improvement of student achievement for all students to prepare
them for postsecondary education, work, and global citizenship in the
twenty-first century.

Sec. 7 RCW 28A.657.070 and 2010 c 235 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A required action plan review panel shall be established to
offer an objective, external review of a request from a school district
for reconsideration of the state board of education's rejection of the
district's required action plan. The review and reconsideration by the
panel shall be based on whether the state board of education gave
appropriate consideration to the unique circumstances and
characteristics identified in the academic performance audit of the
local school district whose required action plan was rejected.
(2)(a) The panel shall be composed of five individuals with
expertise in school improvement, school and district restructuring, or
parent and community involvement in schools. Two of the panel members
shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; two
shall be appointed by the president of the senate; and one shall be
appointed by the governor.
(b) The speaker of the house of representatives, president of the
senate, and governor shall solicit recommendations for possible panel
members from the Washington association of school administrators, the
Washington state school directors' association, the association of
Washington school principals, ((the achievement gap oversight and
accountability committee,)) and associations representing certificated
teachers, classified school employees, and parents.
(c) Members of the panel shall be appointed no later than December
1, 2010, but the superintendent of public instruction shall convene the
panel only as needed to consider a school district's request for
reconsideration. Appointments shall be for a four-year term, with
opportunity for reappointment. Reappointments in the case of a vacancy
shall be made expeditiously so that all requests are considered in a
timely manner.
(3) The required action plan review panel may reaffirm the decision
of the state board of education, recommend that the state board
reconsider the rejection, or recommend changes to the required action
plan that should be considered by the district and the state board of
education to secure approval of the plan. The state board of education
shall consider the recommendations of the panel and issue a decision in
writing to the local school district and the panel. If the school
district must submit a new required action plan to the state board of
education, the district must submit the plan within forty days of the
board's decision.
(4) The state board of education and superintendent of public
instruction must develop timelines and procedures for the deliberations
under this section so that school districts can implement a required
action plan within the time frame required under RCW 28A.657.060.

Sec. 8 RCW 28A.657.110 and 2010 c 235 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall continue to refine the
development of an accountability framework that creates a unified
system of support for challenged schools, that aligns with basic
education, increases the level of support based upon the magnitude of
need, and uses data for decisions.
(2) The state board of education shall develop an accountability
index to identify schools and districts for recognition, for continuous
improvement, and for additional state support. The index shall be
based on criteria that are fair, consistent, and transparent.
Performance shall be measured using multiple outcomes and indicators
including, but not limited to, graduation rates and results from
statewide assessments. The index shall be developed in such a way as
to be easily understood by both employees within the schools and
districts, as well as parents and community members. It is the
legislature's intent that the index provide feedback to schools and
districts to self-assess their progress, and enable the identification
of schools with exemplary student performance and those that need
assistance to overcome challenges in order to achieve exemplary student
performance.
(3) The state board of education, in cooperation with the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, shall annually recognize
schools for exemplary performance as measured on the state board of
education accountability index. ((The state board of education shall
have ongoing collaboration with the achievement gap oversight and
accountability committee regarding the measures used to measure the
closing of the achievement gaps and the recognition provided to the
school districts for closing the achievement gaps.))
(4) In coordination with the superintendent of public instruction,
the state board of education shall seek approval from the United States
department of education for use of the accountability index and the
state system of support, assistance, and intervention, to replace the
federal accountability system under P.L. 107-110, the no child left
behind act of 2001.
(5) The state board of education shall work with the education data
center established within the office of financial management and the
technical working group established in section 112, chapter 548, Laws
of 2009 to determine the feasibility of using the prototypical funding
allocation model as not only a tool for allocating resources to schools
and districts but also as a tool for schools and districts to report to
the state legislature and the state board of education on how the state
resources received are being used.

Arts Commission
NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.46.015 (Washington state arts commission established--Composition) and 1999 c 241 s 1 & 1985 c 317 s 2;
(2) RCW 43.46.030 (Terms -- Vacancies) and 1985 c 317 s 3, 1967 ex.s.
c 125 s 4, & 1965 c 8 s 43.46.030;
(3) RCW 43.46.040 (Compensation -- Travel expenses -- Organization--Chairperson -- Rules -- Quorum) and 1985 c 317 s 4 & 1965 c 8 s 43.46.040;
(4) RCW 43.46.045 (Executive director -- Employees) and 1988 c 81 s
23, 1985 c 317 s 5, & 1967 ex.s. c 125 s 2;
(5) RCW 43.46.050 (Powers and duties generally) and 1985 c 317 s 6
& 1965 c 8 s 43.46.050;
(6) RCW 43.46.055 (Development of arts and humanities) and 1985 c
317 s 7 & 1967 ex.s. c 125 s 1;
(7) RCW 43.46.060 (Gifts and grants) and 1965 c 8 s 43.46.060;
(8) RCW 43.46.070 (Biennial report) and 1985 c 317 s 8 & 1965 c 8
s 43.46.070;
(9) RCW 28B.10.025 (Purchases of works of art -- Procedure) and 2005
c 36 s 2, 1990 c 33 s 557, 1983 c 204 s 8, 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 8, & 1974
ex.s. c 176 s 4;
(10) RCW 43.19.455 (Purchase of works of art -- Procedure) and 2005
c 36 s 6, 1990 c 33 s 576, 1983 c 204 s 6, & 1974 ex.s. c 176 s 3;
(11) RCW 43.17.205 (Purchase of works of art -- Interagency
reimbursement for expenditure by visual arts program) and 1990 c 33 s
574 & 1983 c 204 s 3; and
(12) RCW 43.17.210 (Purchase of works of art -- Procedure) and 2005
c 36 s 5, 1990 c 33 s 575, & 1983 c 204 s 5.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.46.005 and 1985 c 317 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The conservation and development of the state's artistic resources
is essential to the social, educational, and economic growth of the
state of Washington. Artists, works of art, and artistic institutions
contribute to the quality of life and the general welfare of the
citizens of the state, and are an appropriate matter of concern to the
government of the state of Washington. The department of commerce is
designated the state arts agency.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.46.081 and 2007 c 128 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((Washington state arts commission shall establish and))
department of commerce shall administer the poet laureate program. The
poet laureate shall engage in activities to promote and encourage
poetry within the state, including but not limited to readings,
workshops, lectures, or presentations for Washington educational
institutions and communities in geographically diverse areas over a
two-year term.
(2) Selection of a poet laureate shall be made by a committee
appointed and coordinated by the department of commerce in consultation
with the Washington commission for the humanities. The committee may
include representatives of the Washington state library, the education
community, the Washington commission for the humanities, publishing,
and the community of Washington poets.
(3) The commission and the committee shall establish criteria to be
used for the selection of a poet laureate. In addition to other
criteria established, the poet laureate must be a published poet, a
resident of Washington state, active in the poetry community, and
willing and able to promote poetry in the state of Washington
throughout the two-year term.
(4) The recommendation of the poet laureate selection committee
shall be forwarded to the ((commission, which)) director of the
department of commerce, who shall appoint the poet laureate ((with the
approval of the governor)).
(5) The poet laureate shall receive compensation at a level
determined by the ((commission)) department. Travel expenses shall be
provided in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(6) The poet laureate may not serve more than two consecutive
two-year terms.
(7) The commission shall fund the poet laureate program through
gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private sources that are
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.46.085 and 2007 c 128 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The poet laureate account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from gifts, grants, or endowments from public
or private sources must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may only be used for the poet laureate program. Only
the ((executive)) director of the ((commission)) department of commerce
or the ((executive)) director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.46.090 and 2009 c 549 s 5134 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature recognizes this state's responsibility to foster
culture and the arts and its interest in the viable development of the
state's artists ((by the establishment of the Washington state arts
commission)). The legislature declares it to be a policy of this state
that a portion of appropriations for capital expenditures be set aside
for the acquisition of works of art to be placed in public buildings or
lands. ((There is hereby established a visual arts program to be
administered by the Washington state arts commission.))

Sec. 14 RCW 43.46.095 and 1990 c 33 s 578 are each amended to
read as follows:
All works of art purchased and commissioned ((under the visual arts
program)) from appropriations for capital expenditures shall become a
part of a state art collection ((developed,)) administered((, and
operated)) by the ((Washington state arts commission)) department of
commerce. All works of art previously purchased or commissioned under
RCW 43.46.090, 43.17.200, ((43.19.455, 28B.10.025,)) or 28A.335.210
shall be considered a part of the state art collection to be
administered by the ((Washington state arts commission)) department.

Sec. 15 RCW 28A.335.210 and 2006 c 263 s 327 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall allocate, as a
nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for state assistance
to school districts for the original construction of any school plant
facility the amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation
((to be expended by the Washington state arts commission)) for the
acquisition of works of art. The works of art may be placed in
accordance with Article IX, sections 2 and 3 of the state Constitution
on public lands, integral to or attached to a public building or
structure, detached within or outside a public building or structure,
part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a temporary
exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public facilities. ((The
Washington state arts commission shall, in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction, determine the amount to be made
available for the purchase of works of art under this section, and
payments therefor shall be made in accordance with law. The
designation of projects and sites, selection, contracting, purchase,
commissioning, reviewing of design, execution and placement,
acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or disposition of works of
art shall be the responsibility of the Washington state arts commission
in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and
representatives of school district boards of directors. The
superintendent of public instruction and the school district board of
directors of the districts where the sites are selected shall have the
right to:
(1) Waive its use of the one-half of one percent of the
appropriation for the acquisition of works of art before the selection
process by the Washington state arts commission;
(2) Appoint a representative to the body established by the
Washington state arts commission to be part of the selection process
with full voting rights;
(3) Reject the results of the selection process;
(4) Reject the placement of a completed work or works of art on
school district premises if such works are portable.
Rejection at any point before or after the selection process shall
not cause the loss of or otherwise endanger state construction funds
available to the local school district. Any works of art rejected
under this section shall be applied to the provision of works of art
under this chapter, at the discretion of the Washington state arts
commission, notwithstanding any contract or agreement between the
affected school district and the artist involved. In addition to the
cost of the works of art the one-half of one percent of the
appropriation as provided in this section shall be used to provide for
the administration, including conservation of the state art collection,
by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation
of the work of art.)) For the purpose of this section building shall
not include sheds, warehouses, or other buildings of a temporary
nature.
((The executive director of the arts commission, the superintendent
of public instruction, and the Washington state school directors
association shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the
one-half of one percent for works of art under this section.))

Sec. 16 RCW 28B.10.027 and 2005 c 36 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
All universities and colleges shall allocate as a nondeductible
item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original construction or
any major renovation or remodel work exceeding two hundred thousand
dollars of any building, an amount of one-half of one percent of the
appropriation to be expended by ((the Washington state arts commission
with the approval of)) the board of regents or trustees for the
acquisition of works of art. The works of art may be placed on public
lands of institutions of higher education, integral to or attached to
a public building or structure of institutions of higher education,
detached within or outside a public building or structure of
institutions of higher education, part of a portable exhibition or
collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in
other public facilities.
((In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of one
percent of the appropriation shall be used to provide for the
administration of the visual arts program, including conservation of
the state art collection, by the Washington state arts commission and
all costs for installation of the work of art.)) For the purpose of
this section building shall not include sheds, warehouses, and other
buildings of a temporary nature.

Sec. 17 RCW 43.17.200 and 2005 c 36 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
All state agencies including all state departments, boards,
councils, commissions, and quasi public corporations shall allocate, as
a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original
construction of any public building, an amount of one-half of one
percent of the appropriation to be expended ((by the Washington state
arts commission)) for the acquisition of works of art. The works of
art may be placed on public lands, integral to or attached to a public
building or structure, detached within or outside a public building or
structure, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a
temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public
facilities. ((In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of one percent of the appropriation as provided herein shall be
used to provide for the administration of the visual arts program,
including conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington
state arts commission and all costs for installation of the works of
art.)) For the purpose of this section building shall not include
highway construction sheds, warehouses or other buildings of a
temporary nature.

Sec. 18 RCW 37.14.030 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 128 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
The principal proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in
this chapter and deposited in the Indian cultural center construction
account in the general fund shall be administered by the ((executive))
director of the ((arts commission)) department of commerce.

Sec. 19 RCW 43.03.028 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department of personnel shall study the duties and salaries
of the directors of the several departments and the members of the
several boards and commissions of state government, who are subject to
appointment by the governor or whose salaries are fixed by the
governor, and of the chief executive officers of the following agencies
of state government:
The ((arts commission; the)) human rights commission; the board of
accountancy; the board of pharmacy; the eastern Washington historical
society; the Washington state historical society; the recreation and
conservation office; the criminal justice training commission; the
department of personnel; the state library; the traffic safety
commission; the horse racing commission; the advisory council on
vocational education; the public disclosure commission; the state
conservation commission; the commission on Hispanic affairs; the
commission on Asian Pacific American affairs; the state board for
volunteer firefighters and reserve officers; the transportation
improvement board; the public employment relations commission; the
forest practices appeals board; and the energy facilities site
evaluation council.
(2) The department of personnel shall report to the governor or the
chairperson of the appropriate salary fixing authority at least once in
each fiscal biennium on such date as the governor may designate, but
not later than seventy-five days prior to the convening of each regular
session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year, its
recommendations for the salaries to be fixed for each position.

Sec. 20 RCW 43.63A.750 and 2006 c 371 s 235 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A competitive grant program to assist nonprofit organizations
in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating performing arts, art
museums, and cultural facilities is created.
(2)(a) The department shall submit a list of recommended performing
arts, art museum projects, and cultural organization projects eligible
for funding to the governor and the legislature in the department's
biennial capital budget request beginning with the 2001-2003 biennium
and thereafter. The list, in priority order, shall include a
description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding,
and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The
total amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial
project list shall not exceed twelve million dollars.
(b) The department shall establish a competitive process to
prioritize applications for state assistance as follows:
(i) The department shall conduct a statewide solicitation of
project applications from nonprofit organizations, local governments,
and other entities, as determined by the department. The department
shall evaluate and rank applications in consultation with a citizen
advisory committee((, including a representative from the state arts
commission,)) using objective criteria. The evaluation and ranking
process shall also consider local community support for projects and an
examination of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects.
(ii) The department may establish the amount of state grant
assistance for individual project applications but the amount shall not
exceed twenty percent of the estimated total capital cost or actual
cost of a project, whichever is less. The remaining portions of the
project capital cost shall be a match from nonstate sources. The
nonstate match may include cash, the value of real property when
acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind
contributions. The department is authorized to set matching
requirements for individual projects. State assistance may be used to
fund separate definable phases of a project if the project demonstrates
adequate progress and has secured the necessary match funding.
(iii) The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise
financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has
approved a specific list of projects. In contracts for grants
authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions
requiring that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a
specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and
that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the
grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the
contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

Sec. 21 RCW 79.24.720 and 2005 c 330 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department of general administration is responsible for the
stewardship, preservation, operation, and maintenance of the public and
historic facilities of the state capitol, subject to the policy
direction of the state capitol committee ((and the legislative
buildings committee as created in chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1301),
Laws of 2005,)) and the guidance of the capitol campus design advisory
committee. In administering this responsibility, the department shall:
(1) Apply the United States secretary of the interior's standards
for the treatment of historic properties;
(2) Seek to balance the functional requirements of state government
operations with public access and the long-term preservation needs of
the properties themselves; and
(3) Consult with the capitol furnishings preservation committee,
the state historic preservation officer, ((the state arts commission,))
and the state facilities accessibility advisory committee in fulfilling
the responsibilities provided for in this section.

Athletic Training Advisory Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 RCW 18.250.030 (Athletic training advisory
committee) and 2007 c 253 s 4 are each repealed.

Sec. 23 RCW 18.250.010 and 2007 c 253 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Athlete" means a person who participates in exercise,
recreation, sport, or games requiring physical strength,
range-of-motion, flexibility, body awareness and control, speed,
stamina, or agility, and the exercise, recreation, sports, or games are
of a type conducted in association with an educational institution or
professional, amateur, or recreational sports club or organization.
(2) "Athletic injury" means an injury or condition sustained by an
athlete that affects the person's participation or performance in
exercise, recreation, sport, or games and the injury or condition is
within the professional preparation and education of an athletic
trainer.
(3) "Athletic trainer" means a person who is licensed under this
chapter. An athletic trainer can practice athletic training through
the consultation, referral, or guidelines of a licensed health care
provider working within their scope of practice.
(4)(a) "Athletic training" means the application of the following
principles and methods as provided by a licensed athletic trainer:
(i) Risk management and prevention of athletic injuries through
preactivity screening and evaluation, educational programs, physical
conditioning and reconditioning programs, application of commercial
products, use of protective equipment, promotion of healthy behaviors,
and reduction of environmental risks;
(ii) Recognition, evaluation, and assessment of athletic injuries
by obtaining a history of the athletic injury, inspection and palpation
of the injured part and associated structures, and performance of
specific testing techniques related to stability and function to
determine the extent of an injury;
(iii) Immediate care of athletic injuries, including emergency
medical situations through the application of first-aid and emergency
procedures and techniques for nonlife-threatening or life-threatening
athletic injuries;
(iv) Treatment, rehabilitation, and reconditioning of athletic
injuries through the application of physical agents and modalities,
therapeutic activities and exercise, standard reassessment techniques
and procedures, commercial products, and educational programs, in
accordance with guidelines established with a licensed health care
provider as provided in RCW 18.250.070; and
(v) Referral of an athlete to an appropriately licensed health care
provider if the athletic injury requires further definitive care or the
injury or condition is outside an athletic trainer's scope of practice,
in accordance with RCW 18.250.070.
(b) "Athletic training" does not include:
(i) The use of spinal adjustment or manipulative mobilization of
the spine and its immediate articulations;
(ii) Orthotic or prosthetic services with the exception of
evaluation, measurement, fitting, and adjustment of temporary,
prefabricated or direct-formed orthosis as defined in chapter 18.200
RCW;
(iii) The practice of occupational therapy as defined in chapter
18.59 RCW;
(iv) The practice of ((acupuncture)) East Asian medicine as defined
in chapter 18.06 RCW;
(v) Any medical diagnosis; and
(vi) Prescribing legend drugs or controlled substances, or surgery.
(5) (("Committee" means the athletic training advisory committee.
(6))) "Department" means the department of health.
(((7))) (6) "Licensed health care provider" means a physician,
physician assistant, osteopathic physician, osteopathic physician
assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, naturopath, physical
therapist, chiropractor, dentist, massage practitioner, acupuncturist,
occupational therapist, or podiatric physician and surgeon.
(((8))) (7) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.

Sec. 24 RCW 18.250.020 and 2007 c 253 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the
secretary may:
(a) Adopt rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, necessary to
implement this chapter;
(b) Establish all license, examination, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.250;
(c) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(d) Establish administrative procedures, administrative
requirements, and fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
All fees collected under this section must be credited to the health
professions account as required under RCW 43.70.320;
(e) Develop and administer, or approve, or both, examinations to
applicants for a license under this chapter;
(f) Issue a license to any applicant who has met the education,
training, and examination requirements for licensure and deny a license
to applicants who do not meet the minimum qualifications for licensure.
However, denial of licenses based on unprofessional conduct or impaired
practice is governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130
RCW;
(g) ((In consultation with the committee,)) Approve examinations
prepared or administered by private testing agencies or organizations
for use by an applicant in meeting the licensing requirements under RCW
18.250.060;
(h) Determine which states have credentialing requirements
substantially equivalent to those of this state, and issue licenses to
individuals credentialed in those states that have successfully
fulfilled the requirements of RCW 18.250.080;
(i) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as
needed to implement and administer this chapter;
(j) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and
licensees; and
(k) Establish requirements and procedures for an inactive license.
(2) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the
discipline of licensees under this chapter.

Sec. 25 RCW 18.250.060 and 2007 c 253 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
An applicant for an athletic trainer license must:
(1) Have received a bachelor's or advanced degree from an
accredited four-year college or university that meets the academic
standards of athletic training, accepted by the secretary((, as advised
by the committee));
(2) Have successfully completed an examination administered or
approved by the secretary((, in consultation with the committee)); and
(3) Submit an application on forms prescribed by the secretary and
pay the licensure fee required under this chapter.

Capitol Campus Design Advisory Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 RCW 43.34.080 (Capitol campus design
advisory committee -- Generally) and 1990 c 93 s 1 are each repealed.

Chemical Dependency Certification Advisory Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 RCW 18.205.080 (Chemical dependency
certification advisory committee -- Composition -- Terms) and 1998 c 243 s
8 are each repealed.

Sec. 28 RCW 18.205.020 and 2008 c 135 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Certification" means a voluntary process recognizing an
individual who qualifies by examination and meets established
educational prerequisites, and which protects the title of practice.
(2) "Certified chemical dependency professional" means an
individual certified in chemical dependency counseling, under this
chapter.
(3) "Certified chemical dependency professional trainee" means an
individual working toward the education and experience requirements for
certification as a chemical dependency professional.
(4) "Chemical dependency counseling" means employing the core
competencies of chemical dependency counseling to assist or attempt to
assist an alcohol or drug addicted person to develop and maintain
abstinence from alcohol and other mood-altering drugs.
(5) (("Committee" means the chemical dependency certification
advisory committee established under this chapter.
(6))) "Core competencies of chemical dependency counseling" means
competency in the nationally recognized knowledge, skills, and
attitudes of professional practice, including assessment and diagnosis
of chemical dependency, chemical dependency treatment planning and
referral, patient and family education in the disease of chemical
dependency, individual and group counseling with alcoholic and drug
addicted individuals, relapse prevention counseling, and case
management, all oriented to assist alcoholic and drug addicted patients
to achieve and maintain abstinence from mood-altering substances and
develop independent support systems.
(((7))) (6) "Department" means the department of health.
(((8))) (7) "Health profession" means a profession providing health
services regulated under the laws of this state.
(((9))) (8) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.

Sec. 29 RCW 18.205.060 and 1998 c 243 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary
has the authority to:
(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this
chapter((, in consultation with the committee));
(2) Establish all certification, examination, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.250;
(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(4) Issue certificates to applicants who have met the education,
training, and examination requirements for certification and to deny
certification to applicants who do not meet the minimum qualifications,
except that proceedings concerning the denial of certification based
upon unprofessional conduct or impairment shall be governed by the
uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;
(5) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff
as needed to implement this chapter, and hire individuals certified
under this chapter to serve as examiners for any practical
examinations;
(6) Determine minimum education requirements and evaluate and
designate those educational programs that will be accepted as proof of
eligibility to take a qualifying examination for applicants for
certification;
(7) Prepare, grade, and administer, or determine the nature of, and
supervise the grading and administration of, examinations for
applicants for certification;
(8) Determine whether alternative methods of training are
equivalent to formal education, and establish forms, procedures, and
criteria for evaluation of an applicant's alternative training to
determine the applicant's eligibility to take any qualifying
examination;
(9) Determine which states have credentialing requirements
equivalent to those of this state, and issue certificates to
individuals credentialed in those states without examinations;
(10) Define and approve any experience requirement for
certification;
(11) Implement and administer a program for consumer education;
(12) Adopt rules implementing a continuing competency program;
(13) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and
certificated individuals;
(14) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an
examination failure; and
(15) Establish disclosure requirements.

Correctional Industries Board of Directors
NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 72.09.070 (Correctional industries board of directors--Duties) and 2004 c 167 s 1, 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 535, 1993 sp.s. c 20 s 3,
1989 c 185 s 4, & 1981 c 136 s 8; and
(2) RCW 72.09.080 (Correctional industries board of directors--Appointment of members, chair -- Compensation -- Support) and 1993 sp.s. c
20 s 4, 1989 c 185 s 5, & 1981 c 136 s 9.

Sec. 31 RCW 72.09.090 and 1989 c 185 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The correctional industries account is established in the state
treasury. The department of corrections shall deposit in the account
all moneys collected and all profits that accrue from the industrial
and agricultural operations of the department and any moneys
appropriated to the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
for expenses arising in the correctional industries operations.
The division's net profits from correctional industries' sales and
contracts shall be reinvested, without appropriation, in the expansion
and improvement of correctional industries. However, the ((board of
directors)) secretary shall annually recommend that some portion of the
profits from correctional industries be returned to the state general
fund.
The ((board and)) secretary shall request appropriations or
increased appropriations whenever it appears that additional money is
needed to provide for the establishment and operation of a
comprehensive correctional industries program.

Sec. 32 RCW 72.09.100 and 2005 c 346 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the
power to provide for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove
statutory and other restrictions which have limited work programs in
the past. It is also the intent of the legislature to ensure that the
((correctional industries board of directors)) department, in
developing and selecting correctional industries work programs, does
not encourage the development of, or provide for selection of or
contracting for, or the significant expansion of, any new or existing
class I correctional industries work programs that unfairly compete
with Washington businesses. The legislature intends that the
requirements relating to fair competition in the correctional
industries work programs be liberally construed by the ((correctional
industries board of directors)) department to protect Washington
businesses from unfair competition. For purposes of establishing such
a comprehensive program, the legislature recommends that the department
consider adopting any or all, or any variation of, the following
classes of work programs:
(1) CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES.
(a) The employer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit organization
pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the department.
The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both the
public and private sector.
(b) The customer model industries in this class shall be operated
and managed by the department to provide Washington state manufacturers
or businesses with products or services currently produced or provided
by out-of-state or foreign suppliers.
(c) The ((correctional industries board of directors)) department
shall review these proposed industries, including any potential new
class I industries work program or the significant expansion of an
existing class I industries work program, before the department
contracts to provide such products or services. The review shall
include the analysis required under RCW 72.09.115 to determine if the
proposed correctional industries work program will compete with any
Washington business. An agreement for a new class I correctional
industries work program, or an agreement for a significant expansion of
an existing class I correctional industries work program, that unfairly
competes with any Washington business is prohibited.
(d) The department ((of corrections)) shall supply appropriate
security and custody services without charge to the participating
firms.
(e) Inmates who work in free venture industries shall do so at
their own choice. They shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry
is located, as determined by the director of correctional industries.
If the director cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then
the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.
(f) An inmate who is employed in the class I program of
correctional industries shall not be eligible for unemployment
compensation benefits pursuant to any of the provisions of Title 50 RCW
until released on parole or discharged.
(2) CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be state-owned and operated
enterprises designed primarily to reduce the costs for goods and
services for tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations.
(b)(i) The industries selected for development within this class
shall, as much as possible, match the available pool of inmate work
skills and aptitudes with the work opportunities in the free community.
The industries shall be closely patterned after private sector
industries but with the objective of reducing public support costs
rather than making a profit.
(ii) The products and services of this industry, including
purchased products and services necessary for a complete product line,
may be sold to the following:
(A) Public agencies;
(B) Nonprofit organizations;
(C) Private contractors when the goods purchased will be ultimately
used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization;
(D) An employee and immediate family members of an employee of the
department ((of corrections)); and
(E) A person under the supervision of the department ((of
corrections)) and his or her immediate family members.
(iii) The ((correctional industries board of directors)) department
shall authorize the type and quantity of items that may be purchased
and sold under (b)(ii)(D) and (E) of this subsection.
(iv) It is prohibited to purchase any item purchased under
(b)(ii)(D) and (E) of this subsection for the purpose of resale.
(v) Clothing manufactured by an industry in this class may be
donated to nonprofit organizations that provide clothing free of charge
to low-income persons.
(c)(i) Class II correctional industries products and services shall
be reviewed by the ((correctional industries board of directors))
department before offering such products and services for sale to
private contractors.
(ii) The ((board of directors)) secretary shall conduct a yearly
marketing review of the products and services offered under this
subsection. Such review shall include an analysis of the potential
impact of the proposed products and services on the Washington state
business community. To avoid waste or spoilage and consequent loss to
the state, when there is no public sector market for such goods, by-products and surpluses of timber, agricultural, and animal husbandry
enterprises may be sold to private persons, at private sale. Surplus
by-products and surpluses of timber, agricultural and animal husbandry
enterprises that cannot be sold to public agencies or to private
persons may be donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of
surplus products shall be carried out in accordance with rules
prescribed by the secretary.
(d) Security and custody services shall be provided without charge
by the department ((of corrections)).
(e) Inmates working in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall be paid for their work on a gratuity scale
which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar nature in
the locality in which the industry is located and which is approved by
the director of correctional industries.
(f) ((Subject to approval of the correctional industries board,))
Provisions of RCW 41.06.142 shall not apply to contracts with
Washington state businesses entered into by the department ((of
corrections)) through class II industries.
(3) CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department
((of corrections)). They shall be designed and managed to accomplish
the following objectives:
(i) Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and
experience so that the inmate will be able to qualify for better work
both within correctional industries and the free community. It is not
intended that an inmate's work within this class of industries should
be his or her final and total work experience as an inmate.
(ii) Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or work
training per week.
(iii) Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public support
costs.
(b) Class III correctional industries shall be reviewed by the
((correctional industries board of directors)) department to set policy
for work crews. The department shall ((present to the board of
directors)) prepare quarterly detail statements showing where work
crews worked, what correctional industry class, and the hours worked.
((The board of directors may review any class III program at its
discretion.))
(c) Supervising, management, and custody staff shall be employees
of the department.
(d) All able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are
not working in other classes of industries shall work in this class.
(e) Except for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates
in this class shall be paid for their work in accordance with an inmate
gratuity scale. The scale shall be adopted by the secretary of
corrections.
(4) CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES.
(a) Industries in this class shall be operated by the department
((of corrections)). They shall be designed and managed to provide
services in the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The
services shall be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor
or infirm, or to nonprofit organizations.
(b) Class IV correctional industries shall be reviewed by the
((correctional industries board of directors)) department to set policy
for work crews. The department shall ((present to the board of
directors)) prepare quarterly detail statements showing where work
crews worked, what correctional industry class, and the hours worked.
((The board of directors may review any class IV program at its
discretion.)) Class IV correctional industries operated in work camps
established pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 are exempt from the requirements
of this subsection (4)(b).
(c) Inmates in this program shall reside in facilities owned by,
contracted for, or licensed by the department ((of corrections)). A
unit of local government shall provide work supervision services
without charge to the state and shall pay the inmate's wage.
(d) The department ((of corrections)) shall reimburse participating
units of local government for liability and workers compensation
insurance costs.
(e) Inmates who work in this class of industries shall do so at
their own choice and shall receive a gratuity which shall not exceed
the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the
industry is located.
(5) CLASS V: COMMUNITY RESTITUTION PROGRAMS.
(a) Programs in this class shall be subject to supervision by the
department ((of corrections)). The purpose of this class of industries
is to enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off
all or part of a community restitution order as ordered by the
sentencing court.
(b) Employment shall be in a community restitution program operated
by the state, local units of government, or a nonprofit agency.
(c) To the extent that funds are specifically made available for
such purposes, the department ((of corrections)) shall reimburse
nonprofit agencies for workers compensation insurance costs.

Sec. 33 RCW 72.09.015 and 2010 c 181 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Adult basic education" means education or instruction designed
to achieve general competence of skills in reading, writing, and oral
communication, including English as a second language and preparation
and testing services for obtaining a high school diploma or a general
equivalency diploma.
(2) "Base level of correctional services" means the minimum level
of field services the department of corrections is required by statute
to provide for the supervision and monitoring of offenders.
(3) "Community custody" has the same meaning as that provided in
RCW 9.94A.030 and also includes community placement and community
supervision as defined in RCW 9.94B.020.
(4) "Contraband" means any object or communication the secretary
determines shall not be allowed to be: (a) Brought into; (b) possessed
while on the grounds of; or (c) sent from any institution under the
control of the secretary.
(5) "Correctional facility" means a facility or institution
operated directly or by contract by the secretary for the purposes of
incarcerating adults in total or partial confinement, as defined in RCW
9.94A.030.
(6) "County" means a county or combination of counties.
(7) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(8) "Earned early release" means earned release as authorized by
RCW 9.94A.728.
(9) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had
multiple-site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations
demonstrating that the program or practice is effective in reducing
recidivism for the population.
(10) "Extended family visit" means an authorized visit between an
inmate and a member of his or her immediate family that occurs in a
private visiting unit located at the correctional facility where the
inmate is confined.
(11) "Good conduct" means compliance with department rules and
policies.
(12) "Good performance" means successful completion of a program
required by the department, including an education, work, or other
program.
(13) "Immediate family" means the inmate's children, stepchildren,
grandchildren, great grandchildren, parents, stepparents, grandparents,
great grandparents, siblings, and a person legally married to or in a
state registered domestic partnership with an inmate. "Immediate
family" does not include an inmate adopted by another inmate or the
immediate family of the adopted or adopting inmate.
(14) "Indigent inmate," "indigent," and "indigency" mean an inmate
who has less than a ten-dollar balance of disposable income in his or
her institutional account on the day a request is made to utilize funds
and during the thirty days previous to the request.
(15) "Individual reentry plan" means the plan to prepare an
offender for release into the community. It should be developed
collaboratively between the department and the offender and based on an
assessment of the offender using a standardized and comprehensive tool
to identify the offender's risks and needs. The individual reentry
plan describes actions that should occur to prepare individual
offenders for release from prison or jail, specifies the supervision
and services they will experience in the community, and describes an
offender's eventual discharge to aftercare upon successful completion
of supervision. An individual reentry plan is updated throughout the
period of an offender's incarceration and supervision to be relevant to
the offender's current needs and risks.
(16) "Inmate" means a person committed to the custody of the
department, including but not limited to persons residing in a
correctional institution or facility and persons released from such
facility on furlough, work release, or community custody, and persons
received from another state, state agency, county, or federal
jurisdiction.
(17) "Labor" means the period of time before a birth during which
contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and duration to
bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the cervix.
(18) "Physical restraint" means the use of any bodily force or
physical intervention to control an offender or limit an offender's
freedom of movement in a way that does not involve a mechanical
restraint. Physical restraint does not include momentary periods of
minimal physical restriction by direct person-to-person contact,
without the aid of mechanical restraint, accomplished with limited
force and designed to:
(a) Prevent an offender from completing an act that would result in
potential bodily harm to self or others or damage property;
(b) Remove a disruptive offender who is unwilling to leave the area
voluntarily; or
(c) Guide an offender from one location to another.
(19) "Postpartum recovery" means (a) the entire period a woman or
youth is in the hospital, birthing center, or clinic after giving birth
and (b) an additional time period, if any, a treating physician
determines is necessary for healing after the woman or youth leaves the
hospital, birthing center, or clinic.
(20) "Privilege" means any goods or services, education or work
programs, or earned early release days, the receipt of which are
directly linked to an inmate's (a) good conduct; and (b) good
performance. Privileges do not include any goods or services the
department is required to provide under the state or federal
Constitution or under state or federal law.
(21) "Promising practice" means a practice that presents, based on
preliminary information, potential for becoming a research-based or
consensus-based practice.
(22) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some
research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the
standard of evidence-based practices.
(23) "Restraints" means anything used to control the movement of a
person's body or limbs and includes:
(a) Physical restraint; or
(b) Mechanical device including but not limited to: Metal
handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather cuffs, other
hospital-type restraints, tasers, or batons.
(24) "Secretary" means the secretary of corrections or his or her
designee.
(25) "Significant expansion" includes any expansion into a new
product line or service to the class I business that results from an
increase in benefits provided by the department, including a decrease
in labor costs, rent, or utility rates (for water, sewer, electricity,
and disposal), an increase in work program space, tax advantages, or
other overhead costs.
(26) "Superintendent" means the superintendent of a correctional
facility under the jurisdiction of the Washington state department of
corrections, or his or her designee.
(27) "Transportation" means the conveying, by any means, of an
incarcerated pregnant woman or youth from the correctional facility to
another location from the moment she leaves the correctional facility
to the time of arrival at the other location, and includes the
escorting of the pregnant incarcerated woman or youth from the
correctional facility to a transport vehicle and from the vehicle to
the other location.
(28) "Unfair competition" means any net competitive advantage that
a business may acquire as a result of a correctional industries
contract, including labor costs, rent, tax advantages, utility rates
(water, sewer, electricity, and disposal), and other overhead costs.
To determine net competitive advantage, the ((correctional industries
board)) department of corrections shall review and quantify any
expenses unique to operating a for-profit business inside a prison.
(29) "Vocational training" or "vocational education" means
"vocational education" as defined in RCW 72.62.020.
(30) "Washington business" means an in-state manufacturer or
service provider subject to chapter 82.04 RCW existing on June 10,
2004.
(31) "Work programs" means all classes of correctional industries
jobs authorized under RCW 72.09.100.

Sec. 34 RCW 72.62.020 and 1989 c 185 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
When used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
The term "vocational education" means a planned series of learning
experiences, the specific objective of which is to prepare individuals
for gainful employment as semiskilled or skilled workers or technicians
or subprofessionals in recognized occupations and in new and emerging
occupations, but shall not mean programs the primary characteristic of
which is repetitive work for the purpose of production, including the
correctional industries program. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to prohibit the ((correctional industries board of
directors)) department of corrections from identifying and establishing
trade advisory or apprenticeship committees to advise them on
correctional industries work programs.

Council for Children and Families
NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.121.010 (Legislative declaration, intent) and 1982 c 4
s 1;
(2) RCW 43.121.015 (Definitions) and 2008 c 152 s 8, 1988 c 278 s
4, & 1987 c 351 s 2;
(3) RCW 43.121.020 (Council established -- Members, chairperson--Appointment, qualifications, terms, vacancies) and 2008 c 152 s 7, 2007
c 144 s 1, 1996 c 10 s 1, 1994 c 48 s 1, 1989 c 304 s 4, 1987 c 351 s
3, 1984 c 261 s 1, & 1982 c 4 s 2;
(4) RCW 43.121.030 (Compensation and travel expenses of members)
and 1984 c 287 s 87 & 1982 c 4 s 3;
(5) RCW 43.121.040 (Executive director, salary -- Staff) and 1982 c
4 s 4;
(6) RCW 43.121.050 (Council powers and duties -- Generally -- Rules)
and 1988 c 278 s 5, 1987 c 351 s 4, & 1982 c 4 s 5;
(7) RCW 43.121.060 (Contracts for services -- Scope of programs--Funding) and 1982 c 4 s 6;
(8) RCW 43.121.070 (Contracts for services -- Factors in awarding)
and 1982 c 4 s 7;
(9) RCW 43.121.080 (Contracts for services -- Partial funding by
administering organization, what constitutes) and 1982 c 4 s 8;
(10) RCW 43.121.110 (Parenting skills -- Legislative findings) and
1988 c 278 s 1;
(11) RCW 43.121.120 (Community-based early parenting skills
programs -- Funding) and 1988 c 278 s 2;
(12) RCW 43.121.130 (Decreased state funding of parenting skills
programs -- Evaluation) and 1998 c 245 s 48 & 1988 c 278 s 3;
(13) RCW 43.121.140 (Shaken baby syndrome -- Outreach campaign) and
1993 c 107 s 2;
(14) RCW 43.121.150 (Juvenile crime--Legislative findings) and 1997
c 338 s 56;
(15) RCW 43.121.160 (Postpartum depression--Public information and
communication outreach campaign) and 2005 c 347 s 2; and
(16) RCW 43.121.910 (Severability -- 1982 c 4) and 1982 c 4 s 15.

Sec. 36 RCW 43.121.100 and 2005 c 53 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((The council may accept)) Contributions, grants, or gifts in cash
or otherwise, including funds generated by the sale of "heirloom" birth
certificates under chapter 70.58 RCW from persons, associations, or
corporations and funds generated through the issuance of the "Keep Kids
Safe" license plate under chapter ((46.16)) 46.18 RCW((. All moneys
received by the council or any employee thereof from contributions,
grants, or gifts)) and not funds through appropriation by the
legislature shall be deposited in a depository approved by the state
treasurer to be known as the children's trust fund. Disbursements of
such funds shall be on the authorization of the ((council or a duly
authorized representative thereof and only for the purposes stated in
RCW 43.121.050)) secretary of the department of social and health
services or the secretary's designee. In order to maintain an
effective expenditure and revenue control, such funds shall be subject
in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation shall be
required to permit expenditure of such funds.

Sec. 37 RCW 43.215.146 and 2007 c 466 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
RCW ((43.121.170 through)) 43.215.145, 43.215.147, and 43.121.185
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had
multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations
demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the
population.
(2) "Home visitation" means providing services in the permanent or
temporary residence, or in other familiar surroundings, of the family
receiving such services.
(3) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some
research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the
standard of evidence-based practices.

Sec. 38 RCW 43.215.147 and 2008 c 152 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Within available funds, the ((council for children and
families)) department shall fund evidence-based and research-based home
visitation programs for improving parenting skills and outcomes for
children. Home visitation programs must be voluntary and must address
the needs of families to alleviate the effect on child development of
factors such as poverty, single parenthood, parental unemployment or
underemployment, parental disability, or parental lack of high school
diploma, which research shows are risk factors for child abuse and
neglect and poor educational outcomes.
(2) The ((council for children and families shall develop a plan))
department shall work with the department of social and health
services((,)) and the department of health((, the department of early
learning, and the family policy council)) to develop a plan to
coordinate or consolidate home visitation services for children and
families ((and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
by December 1, 2007, with their recommendations for implementation of
the plan)) to the extent practicable.

Children of Incarcerated Parents Advisory Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 RCW 43.63A.068 (Advisory committee on
policies and programs for children and families with incarcerated
parents -- Funding for programs and services) and 2009 c 518 s 18 & 2007
c 384 s 6 are each repealed.

Sec. 40 RCW 28A.300.520 and 2009 c 578 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall review current
policies and assess the adequacy and availability of programs targeted
at children who have a parent who is incarcerated in a department of
corrections facility. The superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt policies that support the children of incarcerated parents and
meet their needs with the goal of facilitating normal child
development, including maintaining adequate academic progress, while
reducing intergenerational incarceration.
(2) To the extent funds are available, ((the superintendent shall
conduct the following activities)) to assist in implementing the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section((:
(a))), the superintendent shall gather information and data on the
students who are the children of inmates incarcerated in department of
corrections facilities((; and
(b) Participate in the children of incarcerated parents advisory
committee and report information obtained under this section to the
advisory committee)).

Sec. 41 RCW 43.215.065 and 2007 c 384 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The director of the department of early learning shall
review current department policies and assess the adequacy and
availability of programs targeted at persons who receive assistance who
are the children and families of a person who is incarcerated in a
department of corrections facility. Great attention shall be focused
on programs and policies affecting foster youth who have a parent who
is incarcerated.
(b) The director shall adopt policies that support the children of
incarcerated parents and meet their needs with the goal of facilitating
normal child development, while reducing intergenerational
incarceration.
(2) ((The director shall conduct the following activities)) To
assist in implementing the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section((:
(a))), the director shall gather information and data on the
recipients of assistance who are the children and families of inmates
incarcerated in department of corrections facilities((; and
(b) Participate in the children of incarcerated parents advisory
committee and report information obtained under this section to the
advisory committee)).

Sec. 42 RCW 72.09.495 and 2007 c 384 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of corrections shall review current department
policies and assess the following:
(a) The impact of existing policies on the ability of offenders to
maintain familial contact and engagement between inmates and children;
and
(b) The adequacy and availability of programs targeted at inmates
with children.
(2) The secretary shall adopt policies that encourage familial
contact and engagement between inmates and their children with the goal
of reducing recidivism and intergenerational incarceration. Programs
and policies should take into consideration the children's need to
maintain contact with his or her parent and the inmate's ability to
develop plans to financially support their children, assist in
reunification when appropriate, and encourage the improvement of
parenting skills where needed.
(3) The department shall conduct the following activities to assist
in implementing the requirements of subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Gather information and data on the families of inmates,
particularly the children of incarcerated parents; and
(b) Evaluate data to determine the impact on recidivism and
intergenerational incarceration((; and
(c) Participate in the children of incarcerated parents advisory
committee and report information obtained under this section to the
advisory committee)).

Sec. 43 RCW 74.04.800 and 2007 c 384 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The secretary of social and health services shall review
current department policies and assess the adequacy and availability of
programs targeted at persons who receive services through the
department who are the children and families of a person who is
incarcerated in a department of corrections facility. Great attention
shall be focused on programs and policies affecting foster youth who
have a parent who is incarcerated.
(b) The secretary shall adopt policies that encourage familial
contact and engagement between inmates of the department of corrections
facilities and their children with the goal of facilitating normal
child development, while reducing recidivism and intergenerational
incarceration. Programs and policies should take into consideration
the children's need to maintain contact with his or her parent, the
inmate's ability to develop plans to financially support their
children, assist in reunification when appropriate, and encourage the
improvement of parenting skills where needed. The programs and
policies should also meet the needs of the child while the parent is
incarcerated.
(2) ((The secretary shall conduct the following activities)) To
assist in implementing the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section((:
(a))), the secretary shall gather information and data on the
recipients of public assistance, or children in the care of the state
under chapter 13.34 RCW, who are the children and families of inmates
incarcerated in department of corrections facilities((; and
(b) Participate in the children of incarcerated parents advisory
committee and report information obtained under this section to the
advisory committee)).

Eastern State Hospital Board and Western State Hospital Board
Sec. 44 RCW 72.23.025 and 2006 c 333 s 204 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the legislature to improve the quality of
service at state hospitals, eliminate overcrowding, and more
specifically define the role of the state hospitals. The legislature
intends that eastern and western state hospitals shall become clinical
centers for handling the most complicated long-term care needs of
patients with a primary diagnosis of mental disorder. To this end, the
legislature intends that funds appropriated for mental health programs,
including funds for regional support networks and the state hospitals
be used for persons with primary diagnosis of mental disorder. The
legislature finds that establishment of ((the eastern state hospital
board, the western state hospital board, and)) institutes for the study
and treatment of mental disorders at both eastern state hospital and
western state hospital will be instrumental in implementing the
legislative intent.
(2)(((a) The eastern state hospital board and the western state
hospital board are each established. Members of the boards shall be
appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate. Each board
shall include:
(i) The director of the institute for the study and treatment of
mental disorders established at the hospital;
(ii) One family member of a current or recent hospital resident;
(iii) One consumer of services;
(iv) One community mental health service provider;
(v) Two citizens with no financial or professional interest in
mental health services;
(vi) One representative of the regional support network in which
the hospital is located;
(vii) One representative from the staff who is a physician;
(viii) One representative from the nursing staff;
(ix) One representative from the other professional staff;
(x) One representative from the nonprofessional staff; and
(xi) One representative of a minority community.
(b) At least one representative listed in (a)(viii), (ix), or (x)
of this subsection shall be a union member.
(c) Members shall serve four-year terms. Members of the board
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060 and shall receive compensation as provided in RCW
43.03.240.
(3) The boards established under this section shall:
(a) Monitor the operation and activities of the hospital;
(b) Review and advise on the hospital budget;
(c) Make recommendations to the governor and the legislature for
improving the quality of service provided by the hospital;
(d) Monitor and review the activities of the hospital in
implementing the intent of the legislature set forth in this section;
and
(e) Consult with the secretary regarding persons the secretary may
select as the superintendent of the hospital whenever a vacancy occurs.
(4))) (a) There is established at eastern state hospital and
western state hospital, institutes for the study and treatment of
mental disorders. The institutes shall be operated by joint operating
agreements between state colleges and universities and the department
of social and health services. The institutes are intended to conduct
training, research, and clinical program development activities that
will directly benefit ((mentally ill)) persons with mental illness who
are receiving treatment in Washington state by performing the following
activities:
(i) Promote recruitment and retention of highly qualified
professionals at the state hospitals and community mental health
programs;
(ii) Improve clinical care by exploring new, innovative, and
scientifically based treatment models for persons presenting
particularly difficult and complicated clinical syndromes;
(iii) Provide expanded training opportunities for existing staff at
the state hospitals and community mental health programs;
(iv) Promote bilateral understanding of treatment orientation,
possibilities, and challenges between state hospital professionals and
community mental health professionals.
(b) To accomplish these purposes the institutes may, within funds
appropriated for this purpose:
(i) Enter joint operating agreements with state universities or
other institutions of higher education to accomplish the placement and
training of students and faculty in psychiatry, psychology, social
work, occupational therapy, nursing, and other relevant professions at
the state hospitals and community mental health programs;
(ii) Design and implement clinical research projects to improve the
quality and effectiveness of state hospital services and operations;
(iii) Enter into agreements with community mental health service
providers to accomplish the exchange of professional staff between the
state hospitals and community mental health service providers;
(iv) Establish a student loan forgiveness and conditional
scholarship program to retain qualified professionals at the state
hospitals and community mental health providers when the secretary has
determined a shortage of such professionals exists.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary,
the institutes may enter into agreements with the department or the
state hospitals which may involve changes in staffing necessary to
implement improved patient care programs contemplated by this section.
(d) The institutes are authorized to seek and accept public or
private gifts, grants, contracts, or donations to accomplish their
purposes under this section.

Escrow Commission
Sec. 45 RCW 18.44.011 and 2010 c 34 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Controlling person" is any person who owns or controls ten
percent or more of the beneficial ownership of any escrow agent,
regardless of the form of business organization employed and regardless
of whether such interest stands in such person's true name or in the
name of a nominee.
(2) "Department" means the department of financial institutions.
(3) "Designated escrow officer" means any licensed escrow officer
designated by a licensed escrow agent and approved by the director as
the licensed escrow officer responsible for supervising that agent's
handling of escrow transactions, management of the agent's trust
account, and supervision of all other licensed escrow officers employed
by the agent.
(4) "Director" means the director of financial institutions, or his
or her duly authorized representative.
(5) "Director of licensing" means the director of the department of
licensing, or his or her duly authorized representative.
(6) "Escrow" means any transaction, except the acts of a qualified
intermediary in facilitating an exchange under section 1031 of the
internal revenue code, wherein any person or persons, for the purpose
of effecting and closing the sale, purchase, exchange, transfer,
encumbrance, or lease of real or personal property to another person or
persons, delivers any written instrument, money, evidence of title to
real or personal property, or other thing of value to a third person to
be held by such third person until the happening of a specified event
or the performance of a prescribed condition or conditions, when it is
then to be delivered by such third person, in compliance with
instructions under which he or she is to act, to a grantee, grantor,
promisee, promisor, obligee, obligor, lessee, lessor, bailee, bailor,
or any agent or employee thereof.
(7) "Escrow agent" means any person engaged in the business of
performing for compensation the duties of the third person referred to
in subsection (6) of this section.
(8) (("Escrow commission" means the escrow commission of the state
of Washington created by RCW 18.44.500.
(9))) "Licensed escrow agent" means any sole proprietorship, firm,
association, partnership, or corporation holding a license as an escrow
agent under the provisions of this chapter.
(((10))) (9) "Licensed escrow officer" means any natural person
handling escrow transactions and licensed as such by the director.
(((11))) (10) "Person" means a natural person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or the plural
thereof, whether resident, nonresident, citizen, or not.
(((12))) (11) "Split escrow" means a transaction in which two or
more escrow agents act to effect and close an escrow transaction.

Sec. 46 RCW 18.44.195 and 2010 c 34 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person desiring to become a licensed escrow officer must
successfully pass an examination as required by the director.
(2) The examination shall be in such form as prescribed by the
director ((with the advice of the escrow commission)).

Sec. 47 RCW 18.44.221 and 1999 c 30 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director shall, within thirty days after ((the)) a written
request ((of the escrow commission)), hold a public hearing to
determine whether the fidelity bond, surety bond, and/or the errors and
omissions policy specified in RCW 18.44.201 is reasonably available to
a substantial number of licensed escrow agents. If the director
determines and the insurance commissioner concurs that such bond or
bonds and/or policy is not reasonably available, the director shall
waive the requirements for such bond or bonds and/or policy for a fixed
period of time.

Sec. 48 RCW 18.44.251 and 1995 c 238 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A request for a waiver of the required errors and omissions policy
may be accomplished under the statute by submitting to the director an
affidavit that substantially addresses the following:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 49 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 18.44.500 (Escrow commission -- Members -- Terms -- Compensation
and travel expenses) and 1995 c 238 s 3, 1985 c 340 s 3, & 1984 c 287
s 36; and
(2) RCW 18.44.510 (Compensation and travel expenses of commission
members) and 1984 c 287 s 37 & 1977 ex.s. c 156 s 29.

Fairs Commission
NEW SECTION. Sec. 50 RCW 15.76.170 (Fairs commission -- Creation,
terms, compensation, powers and duties) and 2010 c 8 s 6100, 1984 c 287
s 18, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 21, 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 11, & 1961 c
61 s 8 are each repealed.

Sec. 51 RCW 15.76.110 and 1961 c 61 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Director" ((shall)) means the director of agriculture.
(("Commission" shall mean the fairs commission created by this
chapter.))
(2) "State allocations" ((shall)) means allocations from the state
fair fund.

Sec. 52 RCW 15.76.150 and 2002 c 313 s 113 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall have the authority to make allocations from the
state fair fund, including interest income under RCW 43.79A.040,
exclusively as follows: Eighty-five percent to participating
agricultural fairs, distributed according to the merit of such fairs
measured by a merit rating to be set up by the director. This merit
rating shall take into account such factors as area and population
served, open and/or youth participation, attendance, gate receipts,
number and type of exhibits, premiums and prizes paid, community
support, evidence of successful achievement of the aims and purposes of
the fair, extent of improvements made to grounds and facilities from
year to year, and overall condition and appearance of grounds and
facilities. The remaining fifteen percent of money in the state fair
fund may be used for special assistance to any participating fair or
fairs and for administrative expenses incurred in the administration of
this chapter only((, including expenses incurred by the fair commission
as may be approved by the director)): PROVIDED, That not more than
five percent of the state fair fund may be used for such expenses.
The division and payment of funds authorized in this section shall
occur at such times as the director may prescribe.

Family Policy Council
Sec. 53 RCW 13.40.462 and 2006 c 304 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall establish a reinvesting in youth
program that awards grants to counties for implementing research-based
early intervention services that target juvenile justice-involved youth
and reduce crime, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated
for this specific purpose.
(2) Effective July 1, 2007, any county or group of counties may
apply for participation in the reinvesting in youth program.
(3) Counties that participate in the reinvesting in youth program
shall have a portion of their costs of serving youth through the
research-based intervention service models paid for with moneys from
the reinvesting in youth account established pursuant to RCW 13.40.466.
(4) The department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall review county applications for
funding through the reinvesting in youth program and shall select the
counties that will be awarded grants with funds appropriated to
implement this program. The department, in consultation with the
Washington state institute for public policy, shall develop guidelines
to determine which counties will be awarded funding in accordance with
the reinvesting in youth program. At a minimum, counties must meet the
following criteria in order to participate in the reinvesting in youth
program:
(a) Counties must match state moneys awarded for research-based
early intervention services with nonstate resources that are at least
proportional to the expected local government share of state and local
government cost avoidance that would result from the implementation of
such services;
(b) Counties must demonstrate that state funds allocated pursuant
to this section are used only for the intervention service models
authorized pursuant to RCW 13.40.464;
(c) Counties must participate fully in the state quality assurance
program established in RCW 13.40.468 to ensure fidelity of program
implementation. If no state quality assurance program is in effect for
a particular selected research-based service, the county must submit a
quality assurance plan for state approval with its grant application.
Failure to demonstrate continuing compliance with quality assurance
plans shall be grounds for termination of state funding; and
(d) Counties that submit joint applications must submit for
approval by the department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration multicounty plans for efficient program
delivery.
(((5) The department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall convene a technical advisory
committee comprised of representatives from the house of
representatives, the senate, the governor's office of financial
management, the department of social and health services juvenile
rehabilitation administration, the family policy council, the juvenile
court administrator's association, and the Washington association of
counties to assist in the implementation of chapter 304, Laws of
2006.))

Sec. 54 RCW 43.70.555 and 1998 c 245 s 77 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department((, in consultation with the family policy council
created in chapter 70.190 RCW,)) shall establish, by rule, standards
for local health departments and networks to use in assessment,
performance measurement, policy development, and assurance regarding
social development to prevent health problems caused by risk factors
empirically linked to: Violent criminal acts by juveniles, teen
substance abuse, teen pregnancy and male parentage, teen suicide
attempts, dropping out of school, child abuse or neglect, and domestic
violence. The standards shall be based on the standards set forth in
the public health services improvement plan as required by RCW
43.70.550.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 55 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 70.190.005 (Purpose) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 301 & 1992 c 198
s 1;
(2) RCW 70.190.010 (Definitions) and 2009 c 565 s 52, 2009 c 479 s
58, 1996 c 132 s 2, 1995 c 399 s 200, & 1992 c 198 s 3;
(3) RCW 70.190.020 (Consolidate efforts of existing entities) and
1994 sp.s. c 7 s 315 & 1992 c 198 s 4;
(4) RCW 70.190.030 (Proposals to facilitate services at the
community level) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 316 & 1992 c 198 s 5;
(5) RCW 70.190.040 (Finding -- Grants to improve readiness to learn)
and 1993 c 336 s 901;
(6) RCW 70.190.050 (Community networks -- Outcome evaluation) and
1998 c 245 s 122 & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 207;
(7) RCW 70.190.060 (Community networks -- Legislative intent--Membership -- Open meetings) and 2005 c 274 s 345, 1998 c 314 s 12, 1996
c 132 s 3, & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 303;
(8) RCW 70.190.065 (Member's authorization of expenditures--Limitation) and 1996 c 132 s 5;
(9) RCW 70.190.070 (Community networks -- Duties) and 1994 sp.s. c 7
s 304;
(10) RCW 70.190.075 (Lead fiscal agent) and 1996 c 132 s 4;
(11) RCW 70.190.080 (Community networks -- Programs and plans) and
1996 c 132 s 6 & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 305;
(12) RCW 70.190.085 (Community networks -- Sexual abstinence and
activity campaign) and 1994 c 299 s 5;
(13) RCW 70.190.090 (Community networks -- Planning grants and
contracts -- Distribution of funds -- Reports) and 1999 c 309 s 918, 1996
c 132 s 7, & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 306;
(14) RCW 70.190.100 (Duties of council) and 2009 c 479 s 59, 1998
c 245 s 123, & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 307;
(15) RCW 70.190.110 (Program review) and 1998 c 245 s 124 & 1994
sp.s. c 7 s 308;
(16) RCW 70.190.120 (Interagency agreement) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s
309;
(17) RCW 70.190.130 (Comprehensive plan -- Approval process -- Network
expenditures -- Penalty for noncompliance with chapter) and 1998 c 314 s
13, 1996 c 132 s 8, & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 310;
(18) RCW 70.190.150 (Federal restrictions on funds transfers,
waivers) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 312;
(19) RCW 70.190.160 (Community networks -- Implementation in federal
and state plans) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 314;
(20) RCW 70.190.170 (Transfer of funds and programs to state
agency) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 320;
(21) RCW 70.190.180 (Community network -- Grants for use of school
facilities) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 604;
(22) RCW 70.190.190 (Network members immune from civil liability--Network assets not subject to attachment or execution) and 1996 c 132
s 9;
(23) RCW 70.190.910 (Severability -- 1992 c 198) and 1992 c 198 s 20;
and
(24) RCW 70.190.920 (Effective date -- 1992 c 198) and 1992 c 198 s
21.

Sec. 56 RCW 74.14A.060 and 2000 c 219 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary of the department of social and health services shall
charge appropriated funds to support blended funding projects for youth
subject to any current or future waiver the department receives to the
requirements of IV-E funding. To be eligible for blended funding a
child must be eligible for services designed to address a behavioral,
mental, emotional, or substance abuse issue from the department of
social and health services and require services from more than one
categorical service delivery system. ((Before any blended funding
project is established by the secretary, any entity or person proposing
the project shall seek input from the public health and safety network
or networks established in the catchment area of the project. The
network or networks shall submit recommendations on the blended funding
project to the family policy council. The family policy council shall
advise the secretary whether to approve the proposed blended funding
project. The network shall review the proposed blended funding project
pursuant to its authority to examine the decategorization of program
funds under RCW 70.190.110, within the current appropriation level.))
The department shall document the number of children who participate in
blended funding projects, the total blended funding amounts per child,
the amount charged to each appropriation by program, and services
provided to each child through each blended funding project and report
this information to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1st of each year, beginning in December 1, 2000.

Sec. 57 RCW 74.14C.050 and 1995 c 311 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
By December 1, 1995, the department, with the assistance of ((the
family policy council,)) two urban and two rural public health and
safety networks to be chosen by the ((family policy council,))
secretary and two private, nonprofit agencies with expertise and
experience in preservation services, shall submit to the legislature an
implementation and evaluation plan that identifies:
(1) A valid and reliable process that can be used by caseworkers
for accurately identifying clients who are eligible for intensive
family preservation services and family preservation services. The
plan shall recognize the due process rights of families that receive
preservation services and recognize that family preservation services
are not intended to be investigative for purposes of chapter 13.34 RCW;
(2) Necessary data by which program success will be measured,
projections of service needs, budget requests, and long-range planning;
(3) Regional and statewide projections of service needs;
(4) A cost estimate for statewide implementation and expansion of
preservation services on a phased-in basis beginning no later than July
1, 1996;
(5) A plan and time frame for phased-in implementation of
preservation services on a statewide basis to be accomplished as soon
as possible but no later than July 1, 1997;
(6) Data regarding the number of children in foster care, group
care, institutional placements, and other out-of-home placements due to
medical needs, mental health needs, developmental disabilities, and
juvenile offenses, and an assessment of the feasibility of providing
preservation services to include all of these children;
(7) Standards and outcome measures for the department when the
department provides preservation services directly; and
(8) A process to assess outcome measures identified in RCW
74.14C.030 for contractors providing preservation services.

Firearms Range Advisory Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 58 RCW 79A.25.220 (Firearms range advisory
committee) and 2007 c 241 s 55, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 71, & 1990 c 195 s 3
are each repealed.

Hanford Area Economic Investment Fund Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 59 RCW 43.31.425 (Hanford area economic
investment fund committee) and 1998 c 76 s 2 & 1991 c 272 s 20 are each
repealed.

Sec. 60 RCW 43.31.428 and 2004 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The ((Hanford area economic investment fund committee created under
RCW 43.31.425)) department of commerce may:
(1) ((Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the
conduct of its business;
(2) Utilize the services of other governmental agencies;
(3))) Accept from any federal or state agency loans or grants for
the purposes of funding Hanford area revolving loan funds, Hanford area
infrastructure projects, or Hanford area economic development projects;
(((4))) (2) Adopt rules for the administration of the program,
including the terms and rates pertaining to its loans, and criteria for
awarding grants, loans, and financial guarantees;
(((5))) (3) Adopt a spending strategy for the moneys in the fund
created in RCW 43.31.422. The strategy shall include five and ten year
goals for economic development and diversification for use of the
moneys in the Hanford area;
(((6) Recommend to the director)) (4) Make no more than two
allocations eligible for funding per calendar year, with a first
priority on Hanford area revolving loan allocations, and Hanford area
infrastructure allocations followed by other Hanford area economic
development and diversification projects if the committee finds that
there are no suitable allocations in the priority allocations described
in this section;
(((7))) (5) Establish and administer a revolving fund consistent
with this section and RCW 43.31.422 ((and 43.31.425)); and
(((8))) (6) Make grants from the Hanford area economic investment
fund consistent with this section and RCW 43.31.422 ((and 43.31.425)).

Sec. 61 RCW 43.31.422 and 2004 c 77 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The Hanford area economic investment fund is established in the
custody of the state treasurer. Moneys in the fund shall only be used
for reasonable assistant attorney general costs in support of the
((committee or pursuant to the decisions of the committee created in
RCW 43.31.425 for)) Hanford area revolving loan funds, Hanford area
infrastructure projects, or other Hanford area economic development and
diversification projects, but may not be used for government or
nonprofit organization operating expenses. Up to five percent of
moneys in the fund may be used for program administration. For the
purpose of this chapter "Hanford area" means Benton and Franklin
counties. The director of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce or the director's designee shall authorize
disbursements from the fund ((after an affirmative vote of at least six
members of the committee created in RCW 43.31.425 on any decisions
reached by the committee created in RCW 43.31.425)). The fund is
subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for disbursements. The legislature intends
to establish similar economic investment funds for areas that develop
low-level radioactive waste disposal facilities.

Home Care Quality Authority
NEW SECTION. Sec. 62 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 70.127.041 (Home care quality authority not subject to
regulation) and 2002 c 3 s 13;
(2) RCW 74.39A.230 (Authority created) and 2002 c 3 s 2; and
(3) RCW 74.39A.280 (Powers) and 2002 c 3 s 7.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 63 RCW 74.39A.290 is decodified.

Sec. 64 RCW 74.39A.095 and 2009 c 580 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In carrying out case management responsibilities established
under RCW 74.39A.090 for consumers who are receiving services under the
medicaid personal care, community options programs entry system or
chore services program through an individual provider, each area agency
on aging shall provide oversight of the care being provided to
consumers receiving services under this section to the extent of
available funding. Case management responsibilities incorporate this
oversight, and include, but are not limited to:
(a) Verification that any individual provider ((who has not been
referred to a consumer by the authority)) has met any training
requirements established by the department;
(b) Verification of a sample of worker time sheets;
(c) Monitoring the consumer's plan of care to verify that it
adequately meets the needs of the consumer, through activities such as
home visits, telephone contacts, and responses to information received
by the area agency on aging indicating that a consumer may be
experiencing problems relating to his or her home care;
(d) Reassessing and reauthorizing services;
(e) Monitoring of individual provider performance((. If, in the
course of its case management activities, the area agency on aging
identifies concerns regarding the care being provided by an individual
provider who was referred by the authority, the area agency on aging
must notify the authority regarding its concerns)); and
(f) Conducting criminal background checks or verifying that
criminal background checks have been conducted for any individual
provider ((who has not been referred to a consumer by the authority)).
Individual providers who are hired after January 1, 2012, are subject
to background checks under RCW 74.39A.055.
(2) The area agency on aging case manager shall work with each
consumer to develop a plan of care under this section that identifies
and ensures coordination of health and long-term care services that
meet the consumer's needs. In developing the plan, they shall utilize,
and modify as needed, any comprehensive community service plan
developed by the department as provided in RCW 74.39A.040. The plan of
care shall include, at a minimum:
(a) The name and telephone number of the consumer's area agency on
aging case manager, and a statement as to how the case manager can be
contacted about any concerns related to the consumer's well-being or
the adequacy of care provided;
(b) The name and telephone numbers of the consumer's primary health
care provider, and other health or long-term care providers with whom
the consumer has frequent contacts;
(c) A clear description of the roles and responsibilities of the
area agency on aging case manager and the consumer receiving services
under this section;
(d) The duties and tasks to be performed by the area agency on
aging case manager and the consumer receiving services under this
section;
(e) The type of in-home services authorized, and the number of
hours of services to be provided;
(f) The terms of compensation of the individual provider;
(g) A statement by the individual provider that he or she has the
ability and willingness to carry out his or her responsibilities
relative to the plan of care; and
(h)(i) Except as provided in (h)(ii) of this subsection, a clear
statement indicating that a consumer receiving services under this
section has the right to waive any of the case management services
offered by the area agency on aging under this section, and a clear
indication of whether the consumer has, in fact, waived any of these
services.
(ii) The consumer's right to waive case management services does
not include the right to waive reassessment or reauthorization of
services, or verification that services are being provided in
accordance with the plan of care.
(3) Each area agency on aging shall retain a record of each waiver
of services included in a plan of care under this section.
(4) Each consumer has the right to direct and participate in the
development of their plan of care to the maximum practicable extent of
their abilities and desires, and to be provided with the time and
support necessary to facilitate that participation.
(5) A copy of the plan of care must be distributed to the
consumer's primary care provider, individual provider, and other
relevant providers with whom the consumer has frequent contact, as
authorized by the consumer.
(6) The consumer's plan of care shall be an attachment to the
contract between the department, or their designee, and the individual
provider.
(7) If the department or area agency on aging case manager finds
that an individual provider's inadequate performance or inability to
deliver quality care is jeopardizing the health, safety, or well-being
of a consumer receiving service under this section, the department or
the area agency on aging may take action to terminate the contract
between the department and the individual provider. If the department
or the area agency on aging has a reasonable, good faith belief that
the health, safety, or well-being of a consumer is in imminent
jeopardy, the department or area agency on aging may summarily suspend
the contract pending a fair hearing. The consumer may request a fair
hearing to contest the planned action of the case manager, as provided
in chapter 34.05 RCW. ((When the department or area agency on aging
terminates or summarily suspends a contract under this subsection, it
must provide oral and written notice of the action taken to the
authority.)) The department may by rule adopt guidelines for
implementing this subsection.
(8) The department or area agency on aging may reject a request by
a consumer receiving services under this section to have a family
member or other person serve as his or her individual provider if the
case manager has a reasonable, good faith belief that the family member
or other person will be unable to appropriately meet the care needs of
the consumer. The consumer may request a fair hearing to contest the
decision of the case manager, as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW. The
department may by rule adopt guidelines for implementing this
subsection.

Sec. 65 RCW 74.39A.220 and 2002 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The people of the state of Washington find as follows:
(1) Thousands of Washington seniors and persons with disabilities
live independently in their own homes, which they prefer and is less
costly than institutional care such as nursing homes.
(2) Many Washington seniors and persons with disabilities currently
receive long-term in-home care services from individual providers hired
directly by them under the medicaid personal care, community options
programs entry system, or chore services program.
(3) Quality long-term in-home care services allow Washington
seniors, persons with disabilities, and their families the choice of
allowing seniors and persons with disabilities to remain in their
homes, rather than forcing them into institutional care such as nursing
homes. Long-term in-home care services are also less costly, saving
Washington taxpayers significant amounts through lower reimbursement
rates.
(((4) The quality of long-term in-home care services in Washington
would benefit from improved regulation, higher standards, better
accountability, and improved access to such services. The quality of
long-term in-home care services would further be improved by a well-trained, stable individual provider workforce earning reasonable wages
and benefits.
(5) Washington seniors and persons with disabilities would benefit
from the establishment of an authority that has the power and duty to
regulate and improve the quality of long-term in-home care services.
(6) The authority should ensure that the quality of long-term in-home care services provided by individual providers is improved through
better regulation, higher standards, increased accountability, and the
enhanced ability to obtain services. The authority should also
encourage stability in the individual provider workforce through
collective bargaining and by providing training opportunities.))

Sec. 66 RCW 74.39A.240 and 2002 c 3 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 74.39A.030 and
74.39A.095 and 74.39A.220 through 74.39A.300, and 41.56.026((,
70.127.041, and 74.09.740)) unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) (("Authority" means the home care quality authority.
(2) "Board" means the board created under RCW 74.39A.230.
(3))) "Consumer" means a person to whom an individual provider
provides any such services.
(((4))) (2) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(3) "Individual provider" means a person, including a personal
aide, who has contracted with the department to provide personal care
or respite care services to functionally disabled persons under the
medicaid personal care, community options program entry system, chore
services program, or respite care program, or to provide respite care
or residential services and support to persons with developmental
disabilities under chapter 71A.12 RCW, or to provide respite care as
defined in RCW 74.13.270.

Sec. 67 RCW 74.39A.250 and 2002 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The authority must carry out the following duties:
(a) Establish qualifications and reasonable standards for
accountability for and investigate the background of individual
providers and prospective individual providers, except in cases where,
after the department has sought approval of any appropriate amendments
or waivers under RCW 74.09.740, federal law or regulation requires that
such qualifications and standards for accountability be established by
another entity in order to preserve eligibility for federal funding.
Qualifications established must include compliance with the minimum
requirements for training and satisfactory criminal background checks
as provided in RCW 74.39A.050 and confirmation that the individual
provider or prospective individual provider is not currently listed on
any long-term care abuse and neglect registry used by the department at
the time of the investigation;
(b) Undertake recruiting activities to identify and recruit
individual providers and prospective individual providers;
(c) Provide training opportunities, either directly or through
contract, for individual providers, prospective individual providers,
consumers, and prospective consumers;
(d))) The department shall provide assistance to consumers and
prospective consumers in finding individual providers and prospective
individual providers through the establishment of a referral registry
of individual providers and prospective individual providers. Before
placing an individual provider or prospective individual provider on
the referral registry, the ((authority)) department shall determine
that:
(((i))) (a) The individual provider or prospective individual
provider has met the minimum requirements for training set forth in RCW
74.39A.050;
(((ii))) (b) The individual provider or prospective individual
provider has satisfactorily undergone a criminal background check
conducted within the prior twelve months; and
(((iii))) (c) The individual provider or prospective individual
provider is not listed on any long-term care abuse and neglect registry
used by the department((;
(e) Remove)).
(2) The department shall remove from the referral registry any
individual provider or prospective individual provider ((the authority
determines)) that does not ((to)) meet the qualifications set forth in
(((d) of this)) subsection (1) of this section or to have committed
misfeasance or malfeasance in the performance of his or her duties as
an individual provider. The individual provider or prospective
individual provider, or the consumer to which the individual provider
is providing services, may request a fair hearing to contest the
removal from the referral registry, as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW((;
(f) Provide routine, emergency, and respite referrals of individual
providers and prospective individual providers to consumers and
prospective consumers who are authorized to receive long-term in-home
care services through an individual provider;
(g))).
(3) The department shall give preference in the recruiting,
training, referral, and employment of individual providers and
prospective individual providers to recipients of public assistance or
other low-income persons who would qualify for public assistance in the
absence of such employment((; and
(h) Cooperate with the department, area agencies on aging, and
other federal, state, and local agencies to provide the services
described and set forth in this section. If, in the course of carrying
out its duties, the authority identifies concerns regarding the
services being provided by an individual provider, the authority must
notify the relevant area agency or department case manager regarding
such concerns.
(2) In determining how best to carry out its duties, the authority
must identify existing individual provider recruitment, training, and
referral resources made available to consumers by other state and local
public, private, and nonprofit agencies. The authority may coordinate
with the agencies to provide a local presence for the authority and to
provide consumers greater access to individual provider recruitment,
training, and referral resources in a cost-effective manner. Using
requests for proposals or similar processes, the authority may contract
with the agencies to provide recruitment, training, and referral
services if the authority determines the agencies can provide the
services according to reasonable standards of performance determined by
the authority. The authority must provide an opportunity for consumer
participation in the determination of the standards)).

Sec. 68 RCW 74.39A.260 and 2009 c 580 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department must perform criminal background checks for
individual providers and prospective individual providers ((and ensure
that the authority has ready access to any long-term care abuse and
neglect registry used by the department)). Individual providers who
are hired after January 1, 2012, are subject to background checks under
RCW 74.39A.055.

Sec. 69 RCW 74.39A.270 and 2007 c 361 s 7 and 2007 c 278 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Solely for the purposes of collective bargaining and as
expressly limited under subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
governor is the public employer, as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW, of
individual providers, who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, are public employees as defined in chapter 41.56 RCW. To
accommodate the role of the state as payor for the community-based
services provided under this chapter and to ensure coordination with
state employee collective bargaining under chapter 41.80 RCW and the
coordination necessary to implement RCW 74.39A.300, the public employer
shall be represented for bargaining purposes by the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW. The governor or
governor's designee shall periodically consult with the authority
during the collective bargaining process to allow the authority to
communicate issues relating to the long-term in-home care services
received by consumers. ((The governor or the governor's designee shall
consult the authority on all issues for which the exclusive bargaining
representative requests to engage in collective bargaining under
subsections (6) and (7) of this section.)) The ((authority))
department shall ((work with)) solicit input from the developmental
disabilities council, the governor's committee on disability issues and
employment, the state council on aging, and other consumer advocacy
organizations to obtain informed input from consumers on their
interests, including impacts on consumer choice, for all issues
proposed for collective bargaining under subsections (5) and (6) ((and
(7))) of this section.
(2) Chapter 41.56 RCW governs the collective bargaining
relationship between the governor and individual providers, except as
otherwise expressly provided in this chapter and except as follows:
(a) The only unit appropriate for the purpose of collective
bargaining under RCW 41.56.060 is a statewide unit of all individual
providers;
(b) The showing of interest required to request an election under
RCW 41.56.060 is ten percent of the unit, and any intervener seeking to
appear on the ballot must make the same showing of interest;
(c) The mediation and interest arbitration provisions of RCW
41.56.430 through 41.56.470 and 41.56.480 apply, except that:
(i) With respect to commencement of negotiations between the
governor and the bargaining representative of individual providers,
negotiations shall be commenced by May 1st of any year prior to the
year in which an existing collective bargaining agreement expires; and
(ii) The decision of the arbitration panel is not binding on the
legislature and, if the legislature does not approve the request for
funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe benefit
provisions of the arbitrated collective bargaining agreement, is not
binding on the authority or the state;
(d) Individual providers do not have the right to strike; and
(e) Individual providers who are related to, or family members of,
consumers or prospective consumers are not, for that reason, exempt
from this chapter or chapter 41.56 RCW.
(3) Individual providers who are public employees solely for the
purposes of collective bargaining under subsection (1) of this section
are not, for that reason, employees of the state, its political
subdivisions, or an area agency on aging for any purpose. Chapter
41.56 RCW applies only to the governance of the collective bargaining
relationship between the employer and individual providers as provided
in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) Consumers and prospective consumers retain the right to select,
hire, supervise the work of, and terminate any individual provider
providing services to them. Consumers may elect to receive long-term
in-home care services from individual providers who are not referred to
them by the authority.
(5) ((In implementing and administering this chapter, neither the
authority nor any of its contractors may reduce or increase the hours
of service for any consumer below or above the amount determined to be
necessary under any assessment prepared by the department or an area
agency on aging.
(6))) Except as expressly limited in this section and RCW
74.39A.300, the wages, hours, and working conditions of individual
providers are determined solely through collective bargaining as
provided in this chapter. No agency or department of the state may
establish policies or rules governing the wages or hours of individual
providers. However, this subsection does not modify:
(a) The department's authority to establish a plan of care for each
consumer or its core responsibility to manage long-term in-home care
services under this chapter, including determination of the level of
care that each consumer is eligible to receive. However, at the
request of the exclusive bargaining representative, the governor or the
governor's designee appointed under chapter 41.80 RCW shall engage in
collective bargaining, as defined in RCW 41.56.030(4), with the
exclusive bargaining representative over how the department's core
responsibility affects hours of work for individual providers. This
subsection shall not be interpreted to require collective bargaining
over an individual consumer's plan of care;
(b) The department's authority to terminate its contracts with
individual providers who are not adequately meeting the needs of a
particular consumer, or to deny a contract under RCW 74.39A.095(8);
(c) The consumer's right to assign hours to one or more individual
providers selected by the consumer within the maximum hours determined
by his or her plan of care;
(d) The consumer's right to select, hire, terminate, supervise the
work of, and determine the conditions of employment for each individual
provider providing services to the consumer under this chapter;
(e) The department's obligation to comply with the federal medicaid
statute and regulations and the terms of any community-based waiver
granted by the federal department of health and human services and to
ensure federal financial participation in the provision of the
services; and
(f) The legislature's right to make programmatic modifications to
the delivery of state services under this title, including standards of
eligibility of consumers and individual providers participating in the
programs under this title, and the nature of services provided. The
governor shall not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement under
this chapter that does not expressly reserve the legislative rights
described in this subsection (((6))) (5)(f).
(((7))) (6) At the request of the exclusive bargaining
representative, the governor or the governor's designee appointed under
chapter 41.80 RCW shall engage in collective bargaining, as defined in
RCW 41.56.030(4), with the exclusive bargaining representative over
employer contributions to the training partnership for the costs of:
(a) Meeting all training and peer mentoring required under this
chapter; and (b) other training intended to promote the career
development of individual providers.
(((8)(a))) (7) The state, the department, ((the authority,)) the
area agencies on aging, or their contractors under this chapter may not
be held vicariously or jointly liable for the action or inaction of any
individual provider or prospective individual provider, whether or not
that individual provider or prospective individual provider was
included on the ((authority's)) referral registry or referred to a
consumer or prospective consumer. The existence of a collective
bargaining agreement, the placement of an individual provider on the
referral registry, or the development or approval of a plan of care for
a consumer who chooses to use the services of an individual provider
and the provision of case management services to that consumer, by the
department or an area agency on aging, does not constitute a special
relationship with the consumer.
(((b) The members of the board are immune from any liability
resulting from implementation of this chapter.
(9))) (8) Nothing in this section affects the state's
responsibility with respect to unemployment insurance for individual
providers. However, individual providers are not to be considered, as
a result of the state assuming this responsibility, employees of the
state.

Sec. 70 RCW 41.56.030 and 2010 c 296 s 3 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Adult family home provider" means a provider as defined in RCW
70.128.010 who receives payments from the medicaid and state-funded
long-term care programs.
(2) "Bargaining representative" means any lawful organization which
has as one of its primary purposes the representation of employees in
their employment relations with employers.
(3) "Child care subsidy" means a payment from the state through a
child care subsidy program established pursuant to RCW 74.12.340 or
74.08A.340, 45 C.F.R. Sec. 98.1 through 98.17, or any successor
program.
(4) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligations of the public employer and the exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times, to confer and negotiate in
good faith, and to execute a written agreement with respect to
grievance procedures and collective negotiations on personnel matters,
including wages, hours and working conditions, which may be peculiar to
an appropriate bargaining unit of such public employer, except that by
such obligation neither party shall be compelled to agree to a proposal
or be required to make a concession unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(5) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(6) "Executive director" means the executive director of the
commission.
(7) "Family child care provider" means a person who: (a) Provides
regularly scheduled care for a child or children in the home of the
provider or in the home of the child or children for periods of less
than twenty-four hours or, if necessary due to the nature of the
parent's work, for periods equal to or greater than twenty-four hours;
(b) receives child care subsidies; and (c) is either licensed by the
state under RCW 74.15.030 or is exempt from licensing under chapter
74.15 RCW.
(8) (("Home care quality authority" means the authority under
chapter 74.39A RCW.
(9))) "Individual provider" means an individual provider as defined
in RCW 74.39A.240(4) who, solely for the purposes of collective
bargaining, is a public employee as provided in RCW 74.39A.270.
(((10))) (9) "Institution of higher education" means the University
of Washington, Washington State University, Central Washington
University, Eastern Washington University, Western Washington
University, The Evergreen State College, and the various state
community colleges.
(((11))) (10)(a) "Language access provider" means any independent
contractor who provides spoken language interpreter services for
department of social and health services appointments or medicaid
enrollee appointments, or provided these services on or after January
1, 2009, and before June 10, 2010, whether paid by a broker, language
access agency, or the department.
(b) "Language access provider" does not mean an owner, manager, or
employee of a broker or a language access agency.
(((12))) (11) "Public employee" means any employee of a public
employer except any person (a) elected by popular vote, or (b)
appointed to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or resolution for a
specified term of office as a member of a multimember board,
commission, or committee, whether appointed by the executive head or
body of the public employer, or (c) whose duties as deputy,
administrative assistant or secretary necessarily imply a confidential
relationship to (i) the executive head or body of the applicable
bargaining unit, or (ii) any person elected by popular vote, or (iii)
any person appointed to office pursuant to statute, ordinance or
resolution for a specified term of office as a member of a multimember
board, commission, or committee, whether appointed by the executive
head or body of the public employer, or (d) who is a court commissioner
or a court magistrate of superior court, district court, or a
department of a district court organized under chapter 3.46 RCW, or (e)
who is a personal assistant to a district court judge, superior court
judge, or court commissioner. For the purpose of (e) of this
subsection, no more than one assistant for each judge or commissioner
may be excluded from a bargaining unit.
(((13))) (12) "Public employer" means any officer, board,
commission, council, or other person or body acting on behalf of any
public body governed by this chapter, or any subdivision of such public
body. For the purposes of this section, the public employer of
district court or superior court employees for wage-related matters is
the respective county legislative authority, or person or body acting
on behalf of the legislative authority, and the public employer for
nonwage-related matters is the judge or judge's designee of the
respective district court or superior court.
(((14))) (13) "Uniformed personnel" means: (a) Law enforcement
officers as defined in RCW 41.26.030 employed by the governing body of
any city or town with a population of two thousand five hundred or more
and law enforcement officers employed by the governing body of any
county with a population of ten thousand or more; (b) correctional
employees who are uniformed and nonuniformed, commissioned and
noncommissioned security personnel employed in a jail as defined in RCW
70.48.020(9), by a county with a population of seventy thousand or
more, and who are trained for and charged with the responsibility of
controlling and maintaining custody of inmates in the jail and
safeguarding inmates from other inmates; (c) general authority
Washington peace officers as defined in RCW 10.93.020 employed by a
port district in a county with a population of one million or more; (d)
security forces established under RCW 43.52.520; (e) firefighters as
that term is defined in RCW 41.26.030; (f) employees of a port district
in a county with a population of one million or more whose duties
include crash fire rescue or other firefighting duties; (g) employees
of fire departments of public employers who dispatch exclusively either
fire or emergency medical services, or both; or (h) employees in the
several classes of advanced life support technicians, as defined in RCW
18.71.200, who are employed by a public employer.

Sec. 71 RCW 43.105.340 and 2008 c 151 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall coordinate among state agencies to develop
a consumer protection web site. The web site shall serve as a one-stop
web site for consumer information. At a minimum, the web site must
provide links to information on:
(a) Insurance information provided by the office of the insurance
commissioner, including information on how to file consumer complaints
against insurance companies, how to look up authorized insurers, and
how to learn more about health insurance benefits;
(b) Child care information provided by the department of early
learning, including how to select a child care provider, how child care
providers are rated, and information about product recalls;
(c) Financial information provided by the department of financial
institutions, including consumer information on financial fraud,
investing, credit, and enforcement actions;
(d) Health care information provided by the department of health,
including health care provider listings and quality assurance
information;
(e) ((Home care information provided by the home care quality
authority, including information to assist consumers in finding an in-home provider;
(f))) Licensing information provided by the department of
licensing, including information regarding business, vehicle, and
professional licensing; and
(((g))) (f) Other information available on existing state agency
web sites that could be a helpful resource for consumers.
(2) By July 1, 2008, state agencies shall report to the department
on whether they maintain resources for consumers that could be made
available through the consumer protection web site.
(3) By September 1, 2008, the department shall make the consumer
protection web site available to the public.
(4) After September 1, 2008, the department, in coordination with
other state agencies, shall develop a plan on how to build upon the
consumer protection web site to create a consumer protection portal.
The plan must also include an examination of the feasibility of
developing a toll-free information line to support the consumer
protection portal. The plan must be submitted to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008.

Home Inspector Advisory Licensing Board
NEW SECTION. Sec. 72 RCW 18.280.040 (Home inspector advisory
licensing board) and 2008 c 119 s 4 are each repealed.

Sec. 73 RCW 18.280.010 and 2008 c 119 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) (("Board" means the home inspector advisory licensing board.
(2))) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(((3))) (2) "Director" means the director of the department of
licensing.
(((4))) (3) "Entity" or "entities" means educational groups or
organizations, national organizations or associations, or a national
test organization.
(((5))) (4) "Home inspection" means a professional examination of
the current condition of a house.
(((6))) (5) "Home inspector" means a person who carries out a
noninvasive examination of the condition of a home, often in connection
with the sale of that home, using special training and education to
carry out the inspection.
(((7))) (6) "Report" means a written report prepared and issued
after a home inspection.
(((8))) (7) "Wood destroying organism" means insects or fungi that
consume, excavate, develop in, or otherwise modify the integrity of
wood or wood products. "Wood destroying organism" includes but is not
limited to carpenter ants, moisture ants, subterranean termites,
dampwood termites, beetles in the family Anobiidae, and wood decay
fungi, known as wood rot.

Sec. 74 RCW 18.280.030 and 2008 c 119 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
A person licensed under this chapter is responsible for performing
a visual and noninvasive inspection of the following readily accessible
systems and components of a home and reporting on the general condition
of those systems and components at the time of the inspection in his or
her written report: The roof, foundation, exterior, heating system,
air-conditioning system, structure, plumbing and electrical systems,
and other aspects of the home as may be identified by the ((board))
director. The inspection must include looking for certain fire and
safety hazards as defined by the ((board)) director. The standards of
practice to be developed by the ((board)) director will be used as the
minimum standards for an inspection. The duties of the home inspector
with regard to wood destroying organisms are provided in RCW
18.280.190.

Sec. 75 RCW 18.280.050 and 2008 c 119 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director has the following authority in administering this
chapter:
(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind rules ((approved by the board)) as
deemed necessary to carry out this chapter;
(2) To administer licensing examinations ((approved by the board))
and to adopt or recognize examinations prepared by other entities ((as
approved by the board));
(3) To adopt standards of professional conduct, practice, and
ethics ((as approved by the board)); and
(4) To adopt fees as provided in RCW 43.24.086.

Sec. 76 RCW 18.280.060 and 2008 c 119 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((board)) director has the following authority in administering
this chapter:
(1) ((To establish rules, including board organization and
assignment of terms, and meeting frequency and timing, for adoption by
the director;
(2))) To establish the minimum qualifications for licensing
applicants as provided in this chapter;
(((3))) (2) To approve the method of administration of examinations
required by this chapter ((or by rule as established by the director));
(((4))) (3) To approve the content of or recognition of
examinations prepared by other entities ((for adoption by the
director));
(((5))) (4) To set the time and place of examinations ((with the
approval of the director)); and
(((6))) (5) To establish and review standards of professional
conduct, practice, and ethics ((for adoption by the director. These)),
which standards must address what constitutes certain fire and safety
hazards as used in RCW 18.280.030.

Sec. 77 RCW 18.280.070 and 2008 c 119 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
In order to become licensed as a home inspector, an applicant must
submit the following to the department:
(1) An application on a form developed by the department;
(2) Proof of a minimum of one hundred twenty hours of classroom
instruction approved by the ((board)) director;
(3) Proof of up to forty hours of field training supervised by a
licensed home inspector;
(4) Evidence of successful passage of the written exam as required
in RCW 18.280.080; and
(5) The fee in the amount set by the department.

Sec. 78 RCW 18.280.080 and 2008 c 119 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
Applicants for licensure must pass an exam that is psychometrically
valid, reliable, and legally defensible by the state. The exam is to
be developed, maintained, and administered by the department. The
((board shall recommend to the)) director shall determine whether to
use an exam that is prepared by a national entity. If an exam prepared
by a national entity is used, a section specific to Washington shall be
developed by the director and included as part of the entire exam.

Sec. 79 RCW 18.280.110 and 2008 c 119 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) As a condition of renewing a license under this chapter, a
licensed home inspector shall present satisfactory evidence to the
((board)) director of having completed the continuing education
requirements provided for in this section.
(2) Each applicant for license renewal shall complete at least
twenty-four hours of instruction in courses approved by the ((board))
director every two years.

Sec. 80 RCW 18.280.120 and 2008 c 119 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A licensed home inspector shall provide a written report of the
home inspection to each person for whom the inspector performs a home
inspection within a time period set by the ((board)) director in rule.
The issues to be addressed in the report shall be set by the ((board))
director in rule.
(2) A licensed home inspector, or other licensed home inspectors or
employees who work for the same company or for any company in which the
home inspector has a financial interest, shall not, from the time of
the inspection until one year from the date of the report, perform any
work other than home inspection-related consultation on the home upon
which he or she has performed a home inspection.

Sec. 81 RCW 18.280.130 and 2008 c 119 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director shall immediately suspend the license of a person
who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of
social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a
child support order. If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements for a license under this chapter during the suspension,
reissuance of the license is automatic upon the ((board's)) director's
receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the child
support order. The procedure in RCW 74.20A.320 is the exclusive
administrative remedy for contesting the establishment of noncompliance
with a child support order, and suspension of a license under this
subsection, and satisfies the requirements of RCW 34.05.422.
(2) The director((, with the assistance of the board,)) shall
establish by rule under what circumstances a home inspector license may
be suspended or revoked. These circumstances shall be based upon
accepted industry standards ((and the board's cumulative experience)).
(3) Any person aggrieved by a decision of the director under this
section may appeal the decision as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW. The
adjudicative proceeding shall be conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW by
an administrative law judge appointed pursuant to RCW 34.12.030.

Horse Racing Commission-Reducing Commission Members
Sec. 82 RCW 67.16.012 and 1998 c 345 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby created the Washington horse racing commission, to
consist of ((five)) three commissioners, appointed by the governor and
confirmed by the senate. The commissioners shall be citizens,
residents, and qualified electors of the state of Washington, one of
whom shall be a breeder of race horses and shall be of at least one
year's standing. The terms of the members shall be six years. Each
member shall hold office until his or her successor is appointed and
qualified. Vacancies in the office of commissioner shall be filled by
appointment to be made by the governor for the unexpired term. Any
commissioner may be removed at any time at the pleasure of the
governor. Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, each
commissioner shall enter into a surety company bond, to be approved by
the governor and attorney general, payable to the state of Washington,
in the penal sum of five thousand dollars, conditioned upon the
faithful performance of his or her duties and the correct accounting
and payment of all sums received and coming within his or her control
under this chapter, and in addition thereto each commissioner shall
take and subscribe to an oath of office of the same form as that
prescribed by law for elective state officers.

Indeterminate Sentencing Review Board
Sec. 83 RCW 9.95.003 and 2007 c 362 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board is created within the department. The board shall
consist of a ((chairman)) chair and four other members, each of whom
shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate.
Each member shall hold office for a term of five years, and until his
or her successor is appointed and qualified. The terms shall expire on
April 15th of the expiration year. Vacancies in the membership of the
board shall be filled by appointment by the governor with the consent
of the senate. In the event of the inability of any member to act, the
governor shall appoint some competent person to act in his stead during
the continuance of such inability. The members shall not be removable
during their respective terms except for cause determined by the
superior court of Thurston county. The governor in appointing the
members shall designate one of them to serve as ((chairman)) chair at
the governor's pleasure. The appointed ((chairman)) chair shall serve
as a fully participating board member ((and as the director of the
agency)).
The members of the board and ((its officers and employees)) staff
assigned to the board shall not engage in any other business or
profession or hold any other public office without the prior approval
of the executive ethics board indicating compliance with RCW 42.52.020,
42.52.030, 42.52.040 and 42.52.120; nor shall they, at the time of
appointment or employment or during their incumbency, serve as the
representative of any political party on an executive committee or
other governing body thereof, or as an executive officer or employee of
any political committee or association. The members of the board shall
each severally receive salaries fixed by the governor in accordance
with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040, and in addition shall receive
travel expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Members of the board and
employees assigned to the board shall be employees of the department.
The ((board)) secretary may employ((, and fix, with the approval of
the governor, the compensation of and prescribe the duties of)) a
senior administrative officer and such ((officers, employees, and
assistants)) other personnel as may be necessary((, and provide
necessary quarters, supplies, and equipment)) to carry out the duties
of the board.

Sec. 84 RCW 9.95.005 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 318 are each
amended to read as follows:
The board shall meet at major state correctional institutions at
such times as may be necessary for a full and complete study of the
cases of all convicted persons whose durations of confinement are to be
determined by it; whose community custody supervision is under the
board's authority; or whose applications for parole come before it.
Other times and places of meetings may also be fixed by the board.
The superintendents of the different institutions shall provide
suitable quarters for the board ((and assistants)) while in the
discharge of their duties.

Sec. 85 RCW 9.95.007 and 1986 c 224 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board may meet and transact business in panels. Each board
panel shall consist of at least two members of the board. In all
matters concerning the internal affairs of the board and policy-making
decisions, a majority of the full board must concur in such matters.
The ((chairman)) chair of the board with the consent of a majority of
the board may designate any two members to exercise all the powers and
duties of the board in connection with any hearing before the board.
If the two members so designated cannot unanimously agree as to the
disposition of the hearing assigned to them, such hearing shall be
reheard by the full board. All actions of the full board shall be by
concurrence of a majority of the sitting board members.

Sec. 86 RCW 9.95.140 and 2009 c 28 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall cause a complete record to be kept of every
prisoner under the jurisdiction of the board released on parole or
community custody. Such records shall be organized in accordance with
the most modern methods of filing and indexing so that there will be
always immediately available complete information about each such
prisoner. Subject to information sharing provisions related to
((mentally ill)) offenders((,)) with mental illness and the end of
sentence review committee, ((and the department of corrections,)) the
board may make rules as to the privacy of such records and their use by
others than the board and ((its)) the department staff assigned to
perform board-related duties. Sex offenders convicted of crimes
committed before July 1, 1984, who are under the board's jurisdiction
shall be subject to the determinations of the end of sentence review
committee regarding risk level and subject to sex offender registration
and community notification. The board and the department staff
assigned to perform board-related duties shall be immune from liability
for the release of information concerning sex offenders as provided in
RCW 4.24.550.
The superintendents of state correctional facilities and all
officers and employees thereof and all other public officials shall at
all times cooperate with the board and furnish to the board((, its
officers, and employees)) and staff assigned to perform board-related
duties such information as may be necessary to enable it to perform its
functions, and such superintendents and other employees shall at all
times give the members of the board((, its officers, and employees))
and staff assigned to perform board-related duties free access to all
prisoners confined in the state correctional facilities.
(2) Offenders sentenced under RCW 9.94A.507 shall be subject to the
determinations of the end of sentence review committee regarding risk
level and subject to sex offender registration and community
notification.
(3) The end of sentence review committee shall make law enforcement
notifications for offenders under board jurisdiction on the same basis
that it notifies law enforcement regarding offenders sentenced under
chapter 9.94A RCW for crimes committed after July 1, 1984.

Sec. 87 RCW 9.95.280 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 344 are each
amended to read as follows:
The secretary, upon recommendation by the board, may deputize any
person (regularly employed by another state) to act as an officer and
agent of this state in effecting the return of any person convicted of
a crime committed before July 1, 1984, who has violated the terms and
conditions of parole or probation as granted by this state. In any
matter relating to the return of such a person, any agent so deputized
shall have all the powers of a police officer of this state.

Sec. 88 RCW 9.95.300 and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 346 are each
amended to read as follows:
The secretary, upon recommendation by the board, may enter into
contracts with similar officials of any other state or states for the
purpose of sharing an equitable portion of the cost of effecting the
return of any person who has violated the terms and conditions of
parole, probation, or community custody as granted by this state.

Sec. 89 RCW 9.96.050 and 2009 c 325 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) When an offender on parole has performed all obligations of
his or her release, including any and all legal financial obligations,
for such time as shall satisfy the indeterminate sentence review board
that his or her final release is not incompatible with the best
interests of society and the welfare of the paroled individual, the
board may make a final order of discharge and issue a certificate of
discharge to the offender.
(b) The board retains the jurisdiction to issue a certificate of
discharge after the expiration of the offender's or parolee's maximum
statutory sentence. If not earlier granted and any and all legal
financial obligations have been paid, the board shall issue a final
order of discharge three years from the date of parole unless the
parolee is on suspended or revoked status at the expiration of the
three years.
(c) The discharge, regardless of when issued, shall have the effect
of restoring all civil rights not already restored by RCW 29A.08.520,
and the certification of discharge shall so state.
(d) This restoration of civil rights shall not restore the right to
receive, possess, own, or transport firearms.
(e) The board shall issue a certificate of discharge to the
offender in person or by mail to the offender's last known address.
(2) ((The board shall send to the department of corrections)) A
copy of every signed certificate of discharge for offender sentences
under the authority of the department of corrections shall be placed in
the department's files.
(3) The discharge provided for in this section shall be considered
as a part of the sentence of the convicted person and shall not in any
manner be construed as affecting the powers of the governor to pardon
any such person.

Sec. 90 RCW 71.05.385 and 2009 c 320 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A mental health service provider shall release to the persons
authorized under subsection (2) of this section, upon request:
(a) The fact, place, and date of an involuntary commitment, the
fact and date of discharge or release, and the last known address of a
person who has been committed under this chapter.
(b) Information related to mental health services, in the format
determined under subsection (9) of this section, concerning a person
who:
(i) Is currently committed to the custody or supervision of the
department of corrections or the indeterminate sentence review board
under chapter 9.94A or 9.95 RCW;
(ii) Has been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity
of a serious violent offense; or
(iii) Was charged with a serious violent offense and such charges
were dismissed under RCW 10.77.086.
Legal counsel may release such information to the persons
authorized under subsection (2) of this section on behalf of the mental
health service provider, provided that nothing in this subsection shall
require the disclosure of attorney work product or attorney-client
privileged information.
(2) The information subject to release under subsection (1) of this
section shall be released to law enforcement officers, personnel of a
county or city jail, designated mental health professionals, public
health officers, therapeutic court personnel, or personnel of the
department of corrections, ((or personnel of)) including the
indeterminate sentence review board and personnel assigned to perform
board-related duties, when such information is requested during the
course of business and for the purpose of carrying out the
responsibilities of the requesting person's office. No mental health
service provider or person employed by a mental health service
provider, or its legal counsel, shall be liable for information
released to or used under the provisions of this section or rules
adopted under this section except under RCW 71.05.440.
(3) A person who requests information under subsection (1)(b) of
this section must comply with the following restrictions:
(a) Information must be requested only for the purposes permitted
by this subsection and for the purpose of carrying out the
responsibilities of the requesting person's office. Appropriate
purposes for requesting information under this section include:
(i) Completing presentence investigations or risk assessment
reports;
(ii) Assessing a person's risk to the community;
(iii) Assessing a person's risk of harm to self or others when
confined in a city or county jail;
(iv) Planning for and provision of supervision of an offender,
including decisions related to sanctions for violations of conditions
of community supervision; and
(v) Responding to an offender's failure to report for department of
corrections supervision.
(b) Information shall not be requested under this section unless
the requesting person has reasonable suspicion that the individual who
is the subject of the information:
(i) Has engaged in activity indicating that a crime or a violation
of community custody or parole has been committed or, based upon his or
her current or recent past behavior, is likely to be committed in the
near future; or
(ii) Is exhibiting signs of a deterioration in mental functioning
which may make the individual appropriate for civil commitment under
this chapter.
(c) Any information received under this section shall be held
confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure outlined in
this chapter, except:
(i) Such information may be shared with other persons who have the
right to request similar information under subsection (2) of this
section, solely for the purpose of coordinating activities related to
the individual who is the subject of the information in a manner
consistent with the official responsibilities of the persons involved;
(ii) Such information may be shared with a prosecuting attorney
acting in an advisory capacity for a person who receives information
under this section. A prosecuting attorney under this subsection shall
be subject to the same restrictions and confidentiality limitations as
the person who requested the information; and
(iii) As provided in RCW 72.09.585.
(4) A request for information related to mental health services
under this section shall not require the consent of the subject of the
records. Such request shall be provided in writing, except to the
extent authorized in subsection (5) of this section. A written request
may include requests made by e-mail or facsimile so long as the
requesting person is clearly identified. The request must specify the
information being requested.
(5) In the event of an emergency situation that poses a significant
risk to the public or the offender, a mental health service provider,
or its legal counsel, shall release information related to mental
health services delivered to the offender and, if known, information
regarding where the offender is likely to be found to the department of
corrections or law enforcement upon request. The initial request may
be written or oral. All oral requests must be subsequently confirmed
in writing. Information released in response to an oral request is
limited to a statement as to whether the offender is or is not being
treated by the mental health service provider and the address or
information about the location or whereabouts of the offender.
(6) Disclosure under this section to state or local law enforcement
authorities is mandatory for the purposes of the health insurance
portability and accountability act.
(7) Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the
release of information contained in the treatment records of any
patient who receives treatment for alcoholism or drug dependency, the
release of the information may be restricted as necessary to comply
with federal law and regulations.
(8) This section does not modify the terms and conditions of
disclosure of information related to sexually transmitted diseases
under chapter 70.24 RCW.
(9) In collaboration with interested organizations, the department
shall develop a standard form for requests for information related to
mental health services made under this section and a standard format
for information provided in response to such requests. Consistent with
the goals of the health information privacy provisions of the federal
health insurance portability and accountability act, in developing the
standard form for responsive information, the department shall design
the form in such a way that the information disclosed is limited to the
minimum necessary to serve the purpose for which the information is
requested.

Sec. 91 RCW 72.09.585 and 2004 c 166 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) When the department is determining an offender's risk
management level, the department shall inquire of the offender and
shall be told whether the offender is subject to court-ordered
treatment for mental health services or chemical dependency services.
The department shall request and the offender shall provide an
authorization to release information form that meets applicable state
and federal requirements and shall provide the offender with written
notice that the department will request the offender's mental health
and substance abuse treatment information. An offender's failure to
inform the department of court-ordered treatment is a violation of the
conditions of supervision if the offender is in the community and an
infraction if the offender is in confinement, and the violation or
infraction is subject to sanctions.
(2) When an offender discloses that he or she is subject to court-ordered mental health services or chemical dependency treatment, the
department shall provide the mental health services provider or
chemical dependency treatment provider with a written request for
information and any necessary authorization to release information
forms. The written request shall comply with rules adopted by the
department of social and health services or protocols developed jointly
by the department and the department of social and health services. A
single request shall be valid for the duration of the offender's
supervision in the community. Disclosures of information related to
mental health services made pursuant to a department request shall not
require consent of the offender.
(3) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445
or ((71.34.225)) 71.34.345 may be released to the indeterminate
sentence review board as relevant to carry out its responsibility of
planning and ensuring community protection with respect to persons
under its jurisdiction. Further disclosure by the indeterminate
sentence review board is subject to the limitations set forth in
subsections (5) and (6) of this section and must be consistent with the
written policy of the indeterminate sentence review board. The
decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability for the
indeterminate sentence review board or ((its employees)) staff assigned
to perform board-related duties provided that the decision was reached
in good faith and without gross negligence.
(4) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445
or ((71.34.225)) 71.34.345 may be used to meet the statutory duties of
the department to provide evidence or report to the court. Disclosure
to the public of information provided to the court by the department
related to mental health services shall be limited in accordance with
RCW 9.94A.500 or this section.
(5) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445
or ((71.34.225)) 71.34.345 may be disclosed by the department to other
state and local agencies as relevant to plan for and provide offenders
transition, treatment, and supervision services, or as relevant and
necessary to protect the public and counteract the danger created by a
particular offender, and in a manner consistent with the written policy
established by the secretary. The decision to disclose or not shall
not result in civil liability for the department or its employees so
long as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross
negligence. The information received by a state or local agency from
the department shall remain confidential and subject to the limitations
on disclosure set forth in chapters 70.02, 71.05, and 71.34 RCW and,
subject to these limitations, may be released only as relevant and
necessary to counteract the danger created by a particular offender.
(6) The information received by the department under RCW 71.05.445
or ((71.34.225)) 71.34.345 may be disclosed by the department to
individuals only with respect to offenders who have been determined by
the department to have a high risk of reoffending by a risk assessment,
as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, only as relevant and necessary for those
individuals to take reasonable steps for the purpose of self-protection, or as provided in RCW 72.09.370(2). The information may
not be disclosed for the purpose of engaging the public in a system of
supervision, monitoring, and reporting offender behavior to the
department. The department must limit the disclosure of information
related to mental health services to the public to descriptions of an
offender's behavior, risk he or she may present to the community, and
need for mental health treatment, including medications, and shall not
disclose or release to the public copies of treatment documents or
records, except as otherwise provided by law. All disclosure of
information to the public must be done in a manner consistent with the
written policy established by the secretary. The decision to disclose
or not shall not result in civil liability for the department or its
employees so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without
gross negligence. Nothing in this subsection prevents any person from
reporting to law enforcement or the department behavior that he or she
believes creates a public safety risk.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 92 RCW 4.24.5502 is decodified.

Mental Health Counselors, Marriage and Family
Therapists, and Social Workers Advisory Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 93 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 18.225.060 (Washington state mental health counselors,
marriage and family therapists, and social workers advisory committee--Established -- Composition) and 2001 c 251 s 6; and
(2) RCW 18.225.070 (Department of health -- Advice/assistance of
advisory committee) and 2001 c 251 s 7.

Sec. 94 RCW 18.225.010 and 2008 c 135 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advanced social work" means the application of social work
theory and methods including emotional and biopsychosocial assessment,
psychotherapy under the supervision of a licensed independent clinical
social worker, case management, consultation, advocacy, counseling, and
community organization.
(2) "Applicant" means a person who completes the required
application, pays the required fee, is at least eighteen years of age,
and meets any background check requirements and uniform disciplinary
act requirements.
(3) "Associate" means a prelicensure candidate who has a graduate
degree in a mental health field under RCW 18.225.090 and is gaining the
supervision and supervised experience necessary to become a licensed
independent clinical social worker, a licensed advanced social worker,
a licensed mental health counselor, or a licensed marriage and family
therapist.
(4) (("Committee" means the Washington state mental health
counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers advisory
committee.
(5))) "Department" means the department of health.
(((6))) (5) "Disciplining authority" means the department.
(((7))) (6) "Independent clinical social work" means the diagnosis
and treatment of emotional and mental disorders based on knowledge of
human development, the causation and treatment of psychopathology,
psychotherapeutic treatment practices, and social work practice as
defined in advanced social work. Treatment modalities include but are
not limited to diagnosis and treatment of individuals, couples,
families, groups, or organizations.
(((8))) (7) "Marriage and family therapy" means the diagnosis and
treatment of mental and emotional disorders, whether cognitive,
affective, or behavioral, within the context of relationships,
including marriage and family systems. Marriage and family therapy
involves the professional application of psychotherapeutic and family
systems theories and techniques in the delivery of services to
individuals, couples, and families for the purpose of treating such
diagnosed nervous and mental disorders. The practice of marriage and
family therapy means the rendering of professional marriage and family
therapy services to individuals, couples, and families, singly or in
groups, whether such services are offered directly to the general
public or through organizations, either public or private, for a fee,
monetary or otherwise.
(((9))) (8) "Mental health counseling" means the application of
principles of human development, learning theory, psychotherapy, group
dynamics, and etiology of mental illness and dysfunctional behavior to
individuals, couples, families, groups, and organizations, for the
purpose of treatment of mental disorders and promoting optimal mental
health and functionality. Mental health counseling also includes, but
is not limited to, the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of mental
and emotional disorders, as well as the application of a wellness model
of mental health.
(((10))) (9) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.

Sec. 95 RCW 18.225.040 and 2009 c 492 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary
has the authority to:
(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this
chapter((. Any rules adopted shall be in consultation with the
committee));
(2) Establish all licensing, examination, and renewal fees in
accordance with RCW 43.70.250;
(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(4) Issue licenses to applicants who have met the education,
training, and examination requirements for licensure and to deny a
license to applicants who do not meet the requirements;
(5) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff
as needed to implement this chapter, and hire individuals licensed
under this chapter to serve as examiners for any practical
examinations;
(6) Administer and supervise the grading and taking of examinations
for applicants for licensure;
(7) Determine which states have credentialing requirements
substantially equivalent to those of this state, and issue licenses to
individuals credentialed in those states without examinations;
(8) Implement and administer a program for consumer education ((in
consultation with the committee));
(9) Adopt rules implementing a continuing education program ((in
consultation with the committee));
(10) Maintain the official record of all applicants and licenses;
and
(11) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an
examination failure.
The office of crime victims advocacy shall supply the ((committee))
department with information on methods of recognizing victims of human
trafficking, what services are available for these victims, and where
to report potential trafficking situations. The information supplied
must be culturally sensitive and must include information relating to
minor victims. The ((committee)) department shall disseminate this
information to licensees ((by)): By providing the information on the
((committee's)) department's web site; by including the information in
newsletters; by holding trainings at meetings attended by organization
members; or through another distribution method determined by the
((committee)) department. The ((committee)) department shall report to
the office of crime victims advocacy on the method or methods it uses
to distribute information under this subsection((;
(11) Maintain the official record of all applicants and licensees;
and
(12) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an
examination failure)).

Livestock Identification Advisory Board
NEW SECTION. Sec. 96 RCW 16.57.015 (Livestock identification
advisory board -- Rule review -- Fee setting) and 2003 c 326 s 3 & 1993 c
354 s 10 are each repealed.

Sec. 97 RCW 16.57.353 and 2004 c 233 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may adopt rules:
(a) To support the agriculture industry in meeting federal
requirements for the country-of-origin labeling of meat. Any
requirements established under this subsection for country of origin
labeling purposes shall be substantially consistent with and shall not
exceed the requirements established by the United States department of
agriculture; and
(b) ((In consultation with the livestock identification advisory
board under RCW 16.57.015,)) To implement federal requirements for
animal identification needed to trace the source of livestock for
disease control and response purposes.
(2) The director may cooperate with and enter into agreements with
other states and agencies of federal government to carry out such
systems and to promote consistency of regulation.

Midwifery Advisory Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 98 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 18.50.140 (Midwifery advisory committee -- Generally) and
1994 sp.s. c 9 s 706, 1991 c 3 s 114, 1987 c 467 s 5, & 1981 c 53 s 3;
and
(2) RCW 18.50.150 (Midwifery advisory committee -- Advice and
recommendations) and 1998 c 245 s 6, 1991 c 3 s 115, & 1981 c 53 s 4.

Sec. 99 RCW 18.50.045 and 1991 c 3 s 107 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary shall ((promulgate)) adopt standards by rule under
chapter 34.05 RCW for accrediting midwifery educational programs. The
standards shall cover the provision of adequate clinical and didactic
instruction in all subjects and noncurriculum matters under this
section including, but not limited to, staffing and teacher
qualifications. In developing the standards, the secretary shall ((be
advised by and receive the recommendations of the midwifery advisory
committee)) consult with a statewide midwifery association.

Sec. 100 RCW 18.50.060 and 1991 c 3 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary is hereby authorized and empowered to execute the
provisions of this chapter and shall offer examinations in midwifery at
least twice a year at such times and places as the secretary may
select. The examinations shall be written and shall be in the English
language.
(2) The secretary, with the assistance of ((the midwifery advisory
committee,)) a statewide midwifery association shall develop or approve
a licensure examination in the subjects that the secretary determines
are within the scope of and commensurate with the work performed by a
licensed midwife. The examination shall be sufficient to test the
scientific and practical fitness of candidates to practice midwifery.
All application papers shall be deposited with the secretary and there
retained for at least one year, when they may be destroyed.
(3) If the examination is satisfactorily completed, the secretary
shall issue to such candidate a license entitling the candidate to
practice midwifery in the state of Washington.

Sec. 101 RCW 18.50.105 and 1991 c 3 s 111 are each amended to
read as follows:
The secretary, with the advice of ((the midwifery advisory
committee,)) a statewide midwifery association shall develop a form to
be used by a midwife to inform the patient of the qualifications of a
licensed midwife.

Migratory Waterfowl Art Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 RCW 77.12.680 (Migratory waterfowl art
committee -- Membership -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Chairman -- Review of
expenditures -- Compensation) and 1987 c 506 s 54 & 1985 c 243 s 5 are
each repealed.

Sec. 103 RCW 77.12.670 and 2002 c 283 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The)) Beginning July 1, 2011, the department, after
soliciting recommendations from the public, shall select the design for
the migratory bird stamp ((to be produced by the department shall use
the design as provided by the migratory waterfowl art committee)).
(2) All revenue derived from the sale of migratory bird license
validations or stamps by the department to any person hunting waterfowl
or to any stamp collector shall be deposited in the state wildlife
((fund)) account and shall be used only for that portion of the cost of
printing and production of the stamps for migratory waterfowl hunters
as determined by subsection (4) of this section, and for those
migratory waterfowl projects specified by the director of the
department for the acquisition and development of migratory waterfowl
habitat in the state and for the enhancement, protection, and
propagation of migratory waterfowl in the state. Migratory bird
license validation and stamp funds may not be used on lands controlled
by private hunting clubs or on private lands that charge a fee for
public access. Migratory bird license validation and stamp funds may
be used for migratory waterfowl projects on private land where public
hunting is provided by written permission or on areas established by
the department as waterfowl hunting closures.
(3) All revenue derived from the sale of the license validation and
stamp by the department to persons hunting solely nonwaterfowl
migratory birds shall be deposited in the state wildlife ((fund))
account and shall be used only for that portion of the cost of printing
and production of the stamps for nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters as
determined by subsection (4) of this section, and for those
nonwaterfowl migratory bird projects specified by the director for the
acquisition and development of nonwaterfowl migratory bird habitat in
the state and for the enhancement, protection, and propagation of
nonwaterfowl migratory birds in the state.
(4) With regard to the revenue from license validation and stamp
sales that is not the result of sales to stamp collectors, the
department shall determine the proportion of migratory waterfowl
hunters and solely nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters by using the
yearly migratory bird hunter harvest information program survey results
or, in the event that these results are not available, other similar
survey results. A two-year average of the most recent survey results
shall be used to determine the proportion of the revenue attributed to
migratory waterfowl hunters and the proportion attributed to solely
nonwaterfowl migratory bird hunters for each fiscal year. For fiscal
year 1998-99 and for fiscal year 1999-2000, ninety-six percent of the
stamp revenue shall be attributed to migratory waterfowl hunters and
four percent of the stamp revenue shall be attributed to solely
nonwaterfowl migratory game hunters.
(5) Acquisition shall include but not be limited to the acceptance
of gifts of real estate or any interest therein or the rental, lease,
or purchase of real estate or any interest therein. If the department
acquires any fee interest, leasehold, or rental interest in real
property under this section, it shall allow the general public
reasonable access to that property and shall, if appropriate, ensure
that the deed or other instrument creating the interest allows such
access to the general public. If the department obtains a covenant in
real property in its favor or an easement or any other interest in real
property under this section, it shall exercise its best efforts to
ensure that the deed or other instrument creating the interest grants
to the general public in the form of a covenant running with the land
reasonable access to the property. The private landowner from whom the
department obtains such a covenant or easement shall retain the right
of granting access to the lands by written permission, but may not
charge a fee for access.
(6) The department may produce migratory bird stamps in any given
year in excess of those necessary for sale in that year. The excess
stamps may be sold to the ((migratory waterfowl art committee for sale
to the)) public.

Sec. 104 RCW 77.12.690 and 2009 c 333 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((migratory waterfowl art committee)) director is
responsible for the selection of the annual migratory bird stamp design
((and shall provide the design to the department. If the committee
does not perform this duty within the time frame necessary to achieve
proper and timely distribution of the stamps to license dealers, the
director shall initiate the art work selection for that year)). The
((committee)) department shall create collector art prints and related
artwork, utilizing the same design ((as provided to the department)).
The administration, sale, distribution, and other matters relating to
the prints and sales of stamps with prints and related artwork shall be
the responsibility of the ((migratory waterfowl art committee))
department.
(2) The total amount brought in from the sale of prints and related
artwork shall be deposited in the state wildlife account created in RCW
77.12.170. The costs of producing and marketing of prints and related
artwork((, including administrative expenses mutually agreed upon by
the committee and the director,)) shall be paid out of the total amount
brought in from sales of those same items. Net funds derived from the
sale of prints and related artwork shall be used by the director to
contract with one or more appropriate individuals or nonprofit
organizations for the development of waterfowl propagation projects
within Washington which specifically provide waterfowl for the Pacific
flyway. The department shall not contract with any individual or
organization that obtains compensation for allowing waterfowl hunting
except if the individual or organization does not permit hunting for
compensation on the subject property.
((The migratory waterfowl art committee shall have an annual audit
of its finances conducted by the state auditor and shall furnish a copy
of the audit to the commission.))

Sec. 105 RCW 77.08.045 and 1998 c 191 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this title or rules adopted pursuant to this title:
(1) "Migratory waterfowl" means members of the family Anatidae,
including brants, ducks, geese, and swans;
(2) "Migratory bird" means migratory waterfowl and coots, snipe,
doves, and band-tailed pigeon;
(3) "Migratory bird stamp" means the stamp that is required by RCW
77.32.350 to be in the possession of all persons to hunt migratory
birds; and
(4) "Prints and artwork" means replicas of the original stamp
design that are sold to the general public. Prints and artwork are not
to be construed to be the migratory bird stamp that is required by RCW
77.32.350. Artwork may be any facsimile of the original stamp design,
including color renditions, metal duplications, or any other kind of
design((; and
(5) "Migratory waterfowl art committee" means the committee created
by RCW 77.12.680. The committee's primary function is to select the
annual migratory bird stamp design)).

Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities
Advisory Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 RCW 46.09.280 (Nonhighway and off-road
vehicle activities advisory committee) and 2007 c 241 s 19, 2004 c 105
s 8, 2003 c 185 s 1, & 1986 c 206 s 13 are each repealed.

Sec. 107 RCW 46.09.020 and 2007 c 241 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) (("Advisory committee" means the nonhighway and off-road
vehicle activities advisory committee established in RCW 46.09.280.
(2))) "Board" means the recreation and conservation funding board
established in RCW 79A.25.110.
(((3))) (2) "Dealer" means a person, partnership, association, or
corporation engaged in the business of selling off-road vehicles at
wholesale or retail in this state.
(((4))) (3) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(((5))) (4) "Highway," for the purpose of this chapter only, means
the entire width between the boundary lines of every roadway publicly
maintained by the state department of transportation or any county or
city with funding from the motor vehicle fund. A highway is generally
capable of travel by a conventional two-wheel drive passenger
automobile during most of the year and in use by such vehicles.
(((6))) (5) "Motorized vehicle" means a vehicle that derives motive
power from an internal combustion engine.
(((7))) (6) "Nonhighway road" means any road owned or managed by a
public agency or any private road for which the owner has granted an
easement for public use for which appropriations from the motor vehicle
fund were not used for (a) original construction or reconstruction in
the last twenty-five years; or (b) maintenance in the last four years.
(((8))) (7) "Nonhighway road recreation facilities" means
recreational facilities that are adjacent to, or accessed by, a
nonhighway road and intended primarily for nonhighway road recreational
users.
(((9))) (8) "Nonhighway road recreational user" means a person
whose purpose for consuming fuel on a nonhighway road or off-road is
primarily for nonhighway road recreational purposes, including, but not
limited to, hunting, fishing, camping, sightseeing, wildlife viewing,
picnicking, driving for pleasure, kayaking/canoeing, and gathering
berries, firewood, mushrooms, and other natural products.
(((10))) (9) "Nonhighway vehicle" means any motorized vehicle
including an ORV when used for recreational purposes on nonhighway
roads, trails, or a variety of other natural terrain.
Nonhighway vehicle does not include:
(a) Any vehicle designed primarily for travel on, over, or in the
water;
(b) Snowmobiles or any military vehicles; or
(c) Any vehicle eligible for a motor vehicle fuel tax exemption or
rebate under chapter 82.36 RCW while an exemption or rebate is claimed.
This exemption includes but is not limited to farm, construction, and
logging vehicles.
(((11))) (10) "Nonmotorized recreational facilities" means
recreational trails and facilities that are adjacent to, or accessed
by, a nonhighway road and intended primarily for nonmotorized
recreational users.
(((12))) (11) "Nonmotorized recreational user" means a person whose
purpose for consuming fuel on a nonhighway road or off-road is
primarily for nonmotorized recreational purposes including, but not
limited to, walking, hiking, backpacking, climbing, cross-country
skiing, snowshoeing, mountain biking, horseback riding, and pack animal
activities.
(((13))) (12) "Off-road vehicle" or "ORV" means any nonstreet
licensed vehicle when used for recreational purposes on nonhighway
roads, trails, or a variety of other natural terrain. Such vehicles
include, but are not limited to, all-terrain vehicles, motorcycles,
four-wheel drive vehicles, and dune buggies.
(((14))) (13) "Operator" means each person who operates, or is in
physical control of, any nonhighway vehicle.
(((15))) (14) "Organized competitive event" means any competition,
advertised in advance through written notice to organized clubs or
published in local newspapers, sponsored by recognized clubs, and
conducted at a predetermined time and place.
(((16))) (15) "ORV recreation facilities" include, but are not
limited to, ORV trails, trailheads, campgrounds, ORV sports parks, and
ORV use areas, designated for ORV use by the managing authority that
are intended primarily for ORV recreational users.
(((17))) (16) "ORV recreational user" means a person whose purpose
for consuming fuel on nonhighway roads or off-road is primarily for ORV
recreational purposes, including but not limited to riding an all-terrain vehicle, motorcycling, or driving a four-wheel drive vehicle or
dune buggy.
(((18))) (17) "ORV sports park" means a facility designed to
accommodate competitive ORV recreational uses including, but not
limited to, motocross racing, four-wheel drive competitions, and flat
track racing. Use of ORV sports parks can be competitive or
noncompetitive in nature.
(((19))) (18) "ORV trail" means a multiple-use corridor designated
by the managing authority and maintained for recreational use by
motorized vehicles.
(((20))) (19) "ORV use permit" means a permit issued for operation
of an off-road vehicle under this chapter.
(((21))) (20) "Owner" means the person other than the lienholder,
having an interest in or title to a nonhighway vehicle, and entitled to
the use or possession thereof.
(((22))) (21) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation.

Orthotic and Prosthetics Advisory Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 RCW 18.200.060 (Advisory committee--Composition -- Terms -- Duties) and 1997 c 285 s 7 are each repealed.

Sec. 109 RCW 18.200.010 and 1997 c 285 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) (("Advisory committee" means the orthotics and prosthetics
advisory committee.
(2))) "Department" means the department of health.
(((3))) (2) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.
(((4))) (3) "Orthotics" means the science and practice of
evaluating, measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling, fitting,
adjusting, or servicing, as well as providing the initial training
necessary to accomplish the fitting of, an orthosis for the support,
correction, or alleviation of neuromuscular or musculoskeletal
dysfunction, disease, injury, or deformity. The practice of orthotics
encompasses evaluation, treatment, and consultation. With basic
observational gait and postural analysis, orthotists assess and design
orthoses to maximize function and provide not only the support but the
alignment necessary to either prevent or correct deformity or to
improve the safety and efficiency of mobility or locomotion, or both.
Orthotic practice includes providing continuing patient care in order
to assess its effect on the patient's tissues and to assure proper fit
and function of the orthotic device by periodic evaluation.
(((5))) (4) "Orthotist" means a person licensed to practice
orthotics under this chapter.
(((6))) (5) "Orthosis" means a custom-fabricated, definitive brace
or support that is designed for long-term use. Except for the
treatment of scoliosis, orthosis does not include prefabricated or
direct-formed orthotic devices, as defined in this section, or any of
the following assistive technology devices: Commercially available
knee orthoses used following injury or surgery; spastic muscle tone-inhibiting orthoses; upper extremity adaptive equipment; finger
splints; hand splints; custom-made, leather wrist gauntlets; face masks
used following burns; wheelchair seating that is an integral part of
the wheelchair and not worn by the patient independent of the
wheelchair; fabric or elastic supports; corsets; arch supports, also
known as foot orthotics; low-temperature formed plastic splints;
trusses; elastic hose; canes; crutches; cervical collars; dental
appliances; and other similar devices as determined by the secretary,
such as those commonly carried in stock by a pharmacy, department
store, corset shop, or surgical supply facility. Prefabricated
orthoses, also known as custom-fitted, or off-the-shelf, are devices
that are manufactured as commercially available stock items for no
specific patient. Direct-formed orthoses are devices formed or shaped
during the molding process directly on the patient's body or body
segment. Custom-fabricated orthoses, also known as custom-made
orthoses, are devices designed and fabricated, in turn, from raw
materials for a specific patient and require the generation of an
image, form, or mold that replicates the patient's body or body segment
and, in turn, involves the rectification of dimensions, contours, and
volumes to achieve proper fit, comfort, and function for that specific
patient.
(((7))) (6) "Prosthetics" means the science and practice of
evaluating, measuring, designing, fabricating, assembling, fitting,
aligning, adjusting, or servicing, as well as providing the initial
training necessary to accomplish the fitting of, a prosthesis through
the replacement of external parts of a human body lost due to
amputation or congenital deformities or absences. The practice of
prosthetics also includes the generation of an image, form, or mold
that replicates the patient's body or body segment and that requires
rectification of dimensions, contours, and volumes for use in the
design and fabrication of a socket to accept a residual anatomic limb
to, in turn, create an artificial appendage that is designed either to
support body weight or to improve or restore function or cosmesis, or
both. Involved in the practice of prosthetics is observational gait
analysis and clinical assessment of the requirements necessary to
refine and mechanically fix the relative position of various parts of
the prosthesis to maximize the function, stability, and safety of the
patient. The practice of prosthetics includes providing continuing
patient care in order to assess the prosthetic device's effect on the
patient's tissues and to assure proper fit and function of the
prosthetic device by periodic evaluation.
(((8))) (7) "Prosthetist" means a person who is licensed to
practice prosthetics under this chapter.
(((9))) (8) "Prosthesis" means a definitive artificial limb that is
alignable or articulated, or, in lower extremity applications, capable
of weight bearing. Prosthesis means an artificial medical device that
is not surgically implanted and that is used to replace a missing limb,
appendage, or other external human body part including an artificial
limb, hand, or foot. The term does not include artificial eyes, ears,
fingers or toes, dental appliances, ostomy products, devices such as
artificial breasts, eyelashes, wigs, or other devices as determined by
the secretary that do not have a significant impact on the
musculoskeletal functions of the body. In the lower extremity of the
body, the term prosthesis does not include prostheses required for
amputations distal to and including the transmetatarsal level. In the
upper extremity of the body, the term prosthesis does not include
prostheses that are provided to restore function for amputations distal
to and including the carpal level.
(((10))) (9) "Authorized health care practitioner" means licensed
physicians, physician's assistants, osteopathic physicians,
chiropractors, naturopaths, podiatric physicians and surgeons,
dentists, and advanced registered nurse practitioners.

Sec. 110 RCW 18.200.050 and 1997 c 285 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to other authority provided by law, the secretary has
the authority to:
(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this
chapter;
(2) Establish administrative procedures, administrative
requirements, and fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
All fees collected under this section must be credited to the health
professions account as required under RCW 43.70.320;
(3) Register applicants, issue licenses to applicants who have met
the education, training, and examination requirements for licensure,
and deny licenses to applicants who do not meet the minimum
qualifications, except that proceedings concerning the denial of
credentials based upon unprofessional conduct or impairment are
governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;
(4) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff
as needed to implement this chapter and hire individuals licensed under
this chapter to serve as examiners for any practical examinations;
(5) Determine minimum education requirements and evaluate and
designate those educational programs from which graduation will be
accepted as proof of eligibility to take a qualifying examination for
applicants for licensure;
(6) Establish the standards and procedures for revocation of
approval of education programs;
(7) Utilize or contract with individuals or organizations having
expertise in the profession or in education to assist in the
evaluations;
(8) Prepare and administer, or approve the preparation and
administration of, examinations for applicants for licensure;
(9) Determine whether alternative methods of training are
equivalent to formal education, and establish forms, procedures, and
criteria for evaluation of an applicant's alternative training to
determine the applicant's eligibility to take any qualifying
examination;
(10) Determine which jurisdictions have licensing requirements
equivalent to those of this state and issue licenses without
examinations to individuals licensed in those jurisdictions;
(11) Define and approve any experience requirement for licensing;
(12) Implement and administer a program for consumer education;
(13) Adopt rules implementing continuing competency requirements
for renewal of the license and relicensing;
(14) Maintain the official department records of all applicants and
licensees;
(15) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an
examination failure;
(16) Establish requirements and procedures for an inactive license;
and
(17) ((With the advice of the advisory committee, the secretary
may)) Recommend collaboration with health professions, boards, and
commissions to develop appropriate referral protocols.

Sec. 111 RCW 18.200.070 and 1997 c 285 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An applicant must file a written application on forms provided
by the department showing to the satisfaction of the secretary((, in
consultation with the advisory committee,)) that the applicant meets
the following requirements:
(a) The applicant possesses a baccalaureate degree with coursework
appropriate for the profession approved by the secretary, or possesses
equivalent training as determined by the secretary pursuant to
subsections (3) and (5) of this section;
(b) The applicant has the amount of formal training, including the
hours of classroom education and clinical practice, in areas of study
as the secretary deems necessary and appropriate;
(c) The applicant has completed a clinical internship or residency
in the professional area for which a license is sought in accordance
with the standards, guidelines, or procedures for clinical internships
or residencies inside or outside the state as established by the
secretary, or that are otherwise substantially equivalent to the
standards commonly accepted in the fields of orthotics and prosthetics
as determined by the secretary pursuant to subsections (3) and (5) of
this section. The secretary must set the internship as at least one
year.
(2) An applicant for licensure as either an orthotist or
prosthetist must pass all written and practical examinations that are
required and approved by the secretary ((in consultation with the
advisory committee)).
(3) The standards and requirements for licensure established by the
secretary must be substantially equal to the standards commonly
accepted in the fields of orthotics and prosthetics.
(4) An applicant failing to make the required grade in the first
examination may take up to three subsequent examinations as the
applicant desires upon prepaying a fee, determined by the secretary
under RCW 43.70.250, for each subsequent examination. Upon failing
four examinations, the secretary may invalidate the original
application and require remedial education before the person may take
future examinations.
(5) The secretary may waive some of the education, examination, or
experience requirements of this section if the secretary determines
that the applicant meets alternative standards, established by the
secretary through rule, that are substantially equivalent to the
requirements in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Performance Agreement Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 RCW 28B.10.922 (Performance agreements--State committee -- Development of final proposals -- Implementation--Updates) and 2008 c 160 s 4 are each repealed.

Problem Gambling Advisory Committee
Sec. 113 RCW 43.20A.890 and 2010 c 171 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A program for (a) the prevention and treatment of problem and
pathological gambling; and (b) the training of professionals in the
identification and treatment of problem and pathological gambling is
established within the department of social and health services, to be
administered by a qualified person who has training and experience in
problem gambling or the organization and administration of treatment
services for persons suffering from problem gambling. The department
may certify and contract with treatment facilities for any services
provided under the program. The department shall track program
participation and client outcomes.
(2) To receive treatment under subsection (1) of this section, a
person must:
(a) Need treatment for problem or pathological gambling, or because
of the problem or pathological gambling of a family member, but be
unable to afford treatment; and
(b) Be targeted by the department of social and health services as
being most amenable to treatment.
(3) Treatment under this section is available only to the extent of
the funds appropriated or otherwise made available to the department of
social and health services for this purpose. The department may
solicit and accept for use any gift of money or property made by will
or otherwise, and any grant of money, services, or property from the
federal government, any tribal government, the state, or any political
subdivision thereof or any private source, and do all things necessary
to cooperate with the federal government or any of its agencies or any
tribal government in making an application for any grant.
(4) The department may adopt rules establishing standards for the
review and certification of treatment facilities under this program.
(5) ((The department of social and health services shall establish
an advisory committee to assist it in designing, managing, and
evaluating the effectiveness of the program established in this
section. The advisory committee shall give due consideration in the
design and management of the program that persons who hold licenses or
contracts issued by the gambling commission, horse racing commission,
and lottery commission are not excluded from, or discouraged from,
applying to participate in the program. The committee shall include,
at a minimum, persons knowledgeable in the field of problem and
pathological gambling and persons representing tribal gambling,
privately owned nontribal gambling, and the state lottery.
(6))) For purposes of this section, "pathological gambling" is a
mental disorder characterized by loss of control over gambling,
progression in preoccupation with gambling and in obtaining money to
gamble, and continuation of gambling despite adverse consequences.
"Problem gambling" is an earlier stage of pathological gambling which
compromises, disrupts, or damages family or personal relationships or
vocational pursuits.

Real Estate Appraiser Commission
NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 18.140.230 (Real estate appraiser commission--Establishment -- Composition) and 2005 c 339 s 19 & 2000 c 249 s 3;
(2) RCW 18.140.240 (Commission/members -- Duties and
responsibilities) and 2000 c 249 s 4; and
(3) RCW 18.140.250 (Commission member's compensation) and 2000 c
249 s 5.

Sec. 115 RCW 18.140.010 and 2005 c 339 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Appraisal" means the act or process of estimating value; an
estimate of value; or of or pertaining to appraising and related
functions.
(2) "Appraisal report" means any communication, written or oral, of
an appraisal, review, or consulting service in accordance with the
standards of professional conduct or practice, adopted by the director,
that is transmitted to the client upon completion of an assignment.
(3) "Appraisal assignment" means an engagement for which an
appraiser is employed or retained to act, or would be perceived by
third parties or the public as acting, as a disinterested third party
in rendering an unbiased analysis, opinion, or conclusion relating to
the value of specified interests in, or aspects of, identified real
estate. The term "appraisal assignment" may apply to valuation work
and analysis work.
(4) "Brokers price opinion" means an oral or written report of
property value that is prepared by a real estate broker or salesperson
licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW.
(5) "Client" means any party for whom an appraiser performs a
service.
(6) (("Commission" means the real estate appraiser commission of
the state of Washington.
(7))) "Comparative market analysis" means a brokers price opinion.
(((8))) (7) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(((9))) (8) "Director" means the director of the department of
licensing.
(((10))) (9) "Expert review appraiser" means a state-certified or
state-licensed real estate appraiser chosen by the director for the
purpose of providing appraisal review assistance to the director.
(((11))) (10) "Federal department" means an executive department of
the United States of America specifically concerned with housing
finance issues, such as the department of housing and urban
development, the department of veterans affairs, or their legal federal
successors.
(((12))) (11) "Federal financial institutions regulatory agency"
means the board of governors of the federal reserve system, the federal
deposit insurance corporation, the office of the comptroller of the
currency, the office of thrift supervision, the national credit union
administration, their successors and/or such other agencies as may be
named in future amendments to 12 U.S.C. Sec. 3350(6).
(((13))) (12) "Federal secondary mortgage marketing agency" means
the federal national mortgage association, the government national
mortgage association, the federal home loan mortgage corporation, their
successors and/or such other similarly functioning housing finance
agencies as may be federally chartered in the future.
(((14))) (13) "Federally related transaction" means any real
estate-related financial transaction that the federal financial
institutions regulatory agency or the resolution trust corporation
engages in, contracts for, or regulates; and that requires the services
of an appraiser.
(((15))) (14) "Financial institution" means any person doing
business under the laws of this state or the United States relating to
banks, bank holding companies, savings banks, trust companies, savings
and loan associations, credit unions, consumer loan companies, and the
affiliates, subsidiaries, and service corporations thereof.
(((16))) (15) "Mortgage broker" for the purpose of this chapter
means a mortgage broker licensed under chapter 19.146 RCW, any mortgage
broker approved and subject to audit by the federal national mortgage
association, the government national mortgage association, or the
federal home loan mortgage corporation as provided in RCW 19.146.020,
any mortgage broker approved by the United States secretary of housing
and urban development for participation in any mortgage insurance under
the national housing act, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1201, and the affiliates,
subsidiaries, and service corporations thereof.
(((17))) (16) "Real estate" means an identified parcel or tract of
land, including improvements, if any.
(((18))) (17) "Real estate-related financial transaction" means any
transaction involving:
(a) The sale, lease, purchase, investment in, or exchange of real
property, including interests in property, or the financing thereof;
(b) The refinancing of real property or interests in real property;
and
(c) The use of real property or interests in property as security
for a loan or investment, including mortgage-backed securities.
(((19))) (18) "Real property" means one or more defined interests,
benefits, or rights inherent in the ownership of real estate.
(((20))) (19) "Review" means the act or process of critically
studying an appraisal report prepared by another.
(((21))) (20) "Specialized appraisal services" means all appraisal
services that do not fall within the definition of appraisal
assignment. The term "specialized appraisal service" may apply to
valuation work and to analysis work. Regardless of the intention of
the client or employer, if the appraiser would be perceived by third
parties or the public as acting as a disinterested third party in
rendering an unbiased analysis, opinion, or conclusion, the work is
classified as an appraisal assignment and not a specialized appraisal
service.
(((22))) (21) "State-certified general real estate appraiser" means
a person certified by the director to develop and communicate real
estate appraisals of all types of property. A state-certified general
real estate appraiser may designate or identify an appraisal rendered
by him or her as a "certified appraisal."
(((23))) (22) "State-certified residential real estate appraiser"
means a person certified by the director to develop and communicate
real estate appraisals of all types of residential property of one to
four units without regard to transaction value or complexity and
nonresidential property having a transaction value as specified in
rules adopted by the director. A state certified residential real
estate appraiser may designate or identify an appraisal rendered by him
or her as a "certified appraisal."
(((24))) (23) "State-licensed real estate appraiser" means a person
licensed by the director to develop and communicate real estate
appraisals of noncomplex one to four residential units and complex one
to four residential units and nonresidential property having
transaction values as specified in rules adopted by the director.
(((25))) (24) "State-registered appraiser trainee," "trainee," or
"trainee real estate appraiser" means a person registered by the
director under RCW 18.140.280 to develop and communicate real estate
appraisals under the immediate and personal direction of a state-certified real estate appraiser. Appraisals are limited to those types
of properties that the supervisory appraiser is permitted by their
current credential, and that the supervisory appraiser is competent and
qualified to appraise. By signing the appraisal report, or being
identified in the certification or addenda as having lent significant
professional assistance, the state-registered appraiser trainee accepts
total and complete individual responsibility for all content, analyses,
and conclusions in the report.
(((26))) (25) "Supervisory appraiser" means a person holding a
currently valid certificate issued by the director as a state-certified
real estate appraiser providing direct supervision to another state-certified, state-licensed, or state-registered appraiser trainee. The
supervisory appraiser must be in good standing in each jurisdiction
that he or she is credentialed. The supervisory appraiser must sign
all appraisal reports. By signing the appraisal report, the
supervisory appraiser accepts full responsibility for all content,
analyses, and conclusions in the report.

Sec. 116 RCW 18.140.030 and 2005 c 339 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW necessary
to implement this chapter and chapter 18.235 RCW((, with the advice and
approval of the commission));
(2) To receive and approve or deny applications for certification
or licensure as a state-certified or state-licensed real estate
appraiser and for registration as a state-registered appraiser trainee
under this chapter; to establish appropriate administrative procedures
for the processing of such applications; to issue certificates,
licenses, or registrations to qualified applicants pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter; and to maintain a roster of the names and
addresses of individuals who are currently certified, licensed, or
registered under this chapter;
(3) ((To provide administrative assistance to the members of and to
keep records for the real estate appraiser commission;
(4))) To solicit bids and enter into contracts with educational
testing services or organizations for the preparation of questions and
answers for certification or licensure examinations;
(((5))) (4) To administer or contract for administration of
certification or licensure examinations at locations and times as may
be required to carry out the responsibilities under this chapter;
(((6))) (5) To enter into contracts for professional services
determined to be necessary for adequate enforcement of this chapter;
(((7) To consider recommendations by the real estate appraiser
commission relating to the experience, education, and examination
requirements for each classification of state-certified appraiser and
for licensure;
(8) To consider recommendations by the real estate appraiser
commission relating to the educational requirements for the state-registered appraiser trainee classification;
(9) To consider recommendations by the real estate appraiser
commission relating to the maximum number of state-registered appraiser
trainees that each supervisory appraiser will be permitted to
supervise;
(10) To consider recommendations by the real estate appraiser
commission relating to continuing education requirements as a
prerequisite to renewal of certification or licensure;
(11) To consider recommendations by the real estate appraiser
commission relating to standards of professional appraisal conduct or
practice in the enforcement of this chapter;
(12))) (6) To employ such professional, clerical, and technical
assistance as may be necessary to properly administer the work of the
director;
(((13))) (7) To establish forms necessary to administer this
chapter;
(((14))) (8) To establish an expert review appraiser roster
comprised of state-certified or licensed real estate appraisers whose
purpose is to assist the director by applying their individual
expertise by reviewing real estate appraisals for compliance with this
chapter. Qualifications to act as an expert review appraiser shall be
established by the director ((with the advice of the commission)). An
application to serve as an expert review appraiser shall be submitted
to the real estate appraiser program, and the roster of accepted expert
review appraisers shall be maintained by the department. An expert
review appraiser may be added to or deleted from that roster by the
director. The expert review appraiser shall be reimbursed for expenses
((in the same manner as)) by the department ((reimburses the
commission)); and
(((15))) (9) To do all other things necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter and minimally meet the requirements of
federal guidelines regarding state certification or licensure of
appraisers and registration of state-registered appraiser trainees that
the director determines are appropriate for state-certified and state-licensed appraisers and state-registered appraiser trainees in this
state.

Sec. 117 RCW 18.140.160 and 2007 c 256 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW
18.235.130, the director may take disciplinary action for the following
conduct, acts, or conditions:
(1) Failing to meet the minimum qualifications for state
certification, licensure, or registration established by or pursuant to
this chapter;
(2) Paying money other than the fees provided for by this chapter
to any employee of the director ((or the commission)) to procure state
certification, licensure, or registration under this chapter;
(3) Continuing to act as a state-certified real estate appraiser,
state-licensed real estate appraiser, or state-registered appraiser
trainee when his or her certificate, license, or registration is on an
expired status;
(4) Violating any provision of this chapter or any lawful rule made
by the director pursuant thereto;
(5) Issuing an appraisal report on any real property in which the
appraiser has an interest unless his or her interest is clearly stated
in the appraisal report;
(6) Being affiliated as an employer, independent contractor, or
supervisory appraiser of a state-certified real estate appraiser,
state-licensed real estate appraiser, or state-registered appraiser
trainee whose certification, license, or registration is currently in
a suspended or revoked status;
(7) Failure or refusal without good cause to exercise reasonable
diligence in performing an appraisal practice under this chapter,
including preparing an oral or written report to communicate
information concerning an appraisal practice; and
(8) Negligence or incompetence in performing an appraisal practice
under this chapter, including preparing an oral or written report to
communicate information concerning an appraisal practice.

Sec. 118 RCW 18.140.170 and 2005 c 339 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director may investigate the actions of a state-certified or
state-licensed real estate appraiser or a state-registered appraiser
trainee or an applicant for certification, licensure, or registration
or recertification, relicensure, or reregistration. Upon receipt of
information indicating that a state-certified or state-licensed real
estate appraiser or state-registered appraiser trainee under this
chapter may have violated this chapter, the director may cause one or
more of the staff investigators to make an investigation of the facts
to determine whether or not there is admissible evidence of any such
violation. ((If technical assistance is required, a staff investigator
may consult with one or more of the members of the commission.))

Salmon Recovery Funding Board
NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 RCW 77.85.110 (Salmon recovery funding
board -- Creation -- Membership) and 2007 c 241 s 20 & 1999 sp.s. c 13 s 3
are each repealed.

Sec. 120 RCW 77.85.005 and 2009 c 345 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that repeated attempts to improve salmonid
fish runs throughout the state of Washington have failed to avert
listings of salmon and steelhead runs as threatened or endangered under
the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.).
These listings threaten the sport, commercial, and tribal fishing
industries as well as the economic well-being and vitality of vast
areas of the state. It is the intent of the legislature to begin
activities required for the recovery of salmon stocks as soon as
possible, although the legislature understands that successful recovery
efforts may not be realized for many years because of the life cycle of
salmon and the complex array of natural and human-caused problems they
face.
The legislature finds that it is in the interest of the citizens of
the state of Washington for the state to retain primary responsibility
for managing the natural resources of the state, rather than abdicate
those responsibilities to the federal government, and that the state
may best accomplish this objective by integrating local and regional
recovery activities into a statewide strategy that can make the most
effective use of provisions of federal laws allowing for a state lead
in salmon recovery, delivered through implementation activities
consistent with regional and watershed recovery plans. The legislature
also finds that a statewide salmon recovery strategy must be developed
and implemented through an active public involvement process in order
to ensure public participation in, and support for, salmon recovery.
The legislature also finds that there is a substantial link between the
provisions of the federal endangered species act and the federal clean
water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.). The legislature further finds
that habitat restoration is a vital component of salmon recovery
efforts. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to
specifically address salmon habitat restoration in a coordinated manner
and to develop a structure that allows for the coordinated delivery of
federal, state, and local assistance to communities for habitat
projects that will assist in the recovery and enhancement of salmon
stocks. A strong watershed-based locally implemented plan is essential
for local, regional, and statewide salmon recovery.
The legislature also finds that credible scientific review and
oversight is essential for any salmon recovery effort to be successful.
The legislature further finds that it is important to monitor the
overall health of the salmon resource to determine if recovery efforts
are providing expected returns. It is important to monitor salmon
habitat projects and salmon recovery activities to determine their
effectiveness in order to secure federal acceptance of the state's
approach to salmon recovery. Adaptive management cannot exist without
monitoring. For these reasons, the legislature believes that a
coordinated and integrated monitoring system should be developed and
implemented.
The legislature therefore finds that a coordinated framework for
responding to the salmon crisis is needed immediately. To that end,
the governor's salmon recovery office should be created to provide
overall coordination of the state's response; an independent science
panel is needed to provide scientific review and oversight; a
coordinated state funding process should be established through a
salmon recovery funding ((board)) office; the appropriate local or
tribal government should provide local leadership in identifying and
sequencing habitat projects to be funded by state agencies; habitat
projects should be implemented without delay; and a strong locally
based effort to restore salmon habitat should be established by
providing a framework to allow citizen volunteers to work effectively.

Sec. 121 RCW 77.85.020 and 2009 c 345 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning December 2010, the recreation and conservation office
shall produce a biennial report on the statewide status of salmon
recovery and watershed health, summarize the funded projects and
programs ((funded by the salmon recovery funding board)), and summarize
progress as measured by high-level indicators and state agency
compliance with applicable protocols established by the forum for
monitoring salmon recovery and watershed health. The report must be a
consolidation of the current reporting activities((, including the
salmon recovery funding board and the forum on monitoring salmon
recovery and watershed health,)) on the status of salmon recovery and
watershed health in Washington state, in accordance with RCW
77.85.250(8). The report shall also include a high-level status report
on watershed planning efforts under chapter 90.82 RCW as summarized by
the department of ecology and on salmon recovery and watershed planning
as summarized by the Puget Sound partnership. The report's
introduction must include a list of high-level questions related to the
status of watershed health and salmon recovery to help decision makers
and the public respond to salmon recovery and watershed health
management needs.
(2) The department, the department of ecology, the department of
natural resources, and the state conservation commission shall provide
to the recreation and conservation office information requested by the
office necessary to prepare the consolidated report on salmon recovery
and watershed health.

Sec. 122 RCW 77.85.050 and 2009 c 345 s 3 and 2009 c 333 s 25 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Counties, cities, and tribal governments must jointly
designate, by resolution or by letters of support, the area for which
a habitat project list is to be developed and the lead entity that is
to be responsible for submitting the habitat project list. No project
included on a habitat project list shall be considered mandatory in
nature and no private landowner may be forced or coerced into
participation in any respect. The lead entity may be a county, city,
conservation district, special district, tribal government, regional
recovery organization, or other entity.
(b) The lead entity shall establish a committee that consists of
representative interests of counties, cities, conservation districts,
tribes, environmental groups, business interests, landowners, citizens,
volunteer groups, regional fish enhancement groups, and other habitat
interests. The purpose of the committee is to provide a citizen-based
evaluation of the projects proposed to promote salmon habitat.
(c) The committee shall compile a list of habitat projects,
establish priorities for individual projects, define the sequence for
project implementation, and submit these activities as the habitat
project list. The committee shall also identify potential federal,
state, local, and private funding sources.
(2) The area covered by the habitat project list must be based, at
a minimum, on a WRIA, combination of WRIAs, or any other area as agreed
to by the counties, cities, and tribes in resolutions or in letters of
support meeting the requirements of this subsection. Preference will
be given to projects in an area that contain a salmon species that is
listed or proposed for listing under the federal endangered species
act.
(3) The lead entity shall submit the habitat project list to the
((salmon recovery funding board)) recreation and conservation office in
accordance with procedures adopted by the board.
(4) The recreation and conservation office shall administer funding
to support the functions of lead entities.

Sec. 123 RCW 77.85.120 and 2007 c 241 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) The ((salmon recovery funding board)) recreation and
conservation office is responsible for making grants and loans for
salmon habitat projects and salmon recovery activities from the amounts
appropriated ((to the board)) for this purpose. To accomplish this
purpose the ((board)) recreation and conservation office may:
(((a))) (1) Provide assistance to grant applicants regarding the
procedures and criteria for grant and loan awards;
(((b))) (2) Make and execute all manner of contracts and agreements
with public and private parties as the board deems necessary,
consistent with the purposes of this chapter;
(((c))) (3) Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property,
or financial or other aid in any form from any other source on any
terms that are not in conflict with this chapter;
(((d))) (4) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to
carry out the purposes of this chapter; and
(((e))) (5) Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry
out the powers expressly granted or implied under this chapter.
(((2) The recreation and conservation office shall provide all
necessary grants and loans administration assistance to the board, and
shall distribute funds as provided by the board in RCW 77.85.130.))

Sec. 124 RCW 77.85.130 and 2007 c 341 s 36 and 2007 c 257 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The ((salmon recovery funding board)) recreation and
conservation office shall develop procedures and criteria for
allocation of funds for salmon habitat projects and salmon recovery
activities on a statewide basis to address the highest priorities for
salmon habitat protection and restoration. To the extent practicable
the ((board)) office shall adopt an annual allocation of funding. The
allocation should address both protection and restoration of habitat,
and should recognize the varying needs in each area of the state on an
equitable basis. The ((board)) office has the discretion to partially
fund, or to fund in phases, salmon habitat projects. The ((board))
office may annually establish a maximum amount of funding available for
any individual project, subject to available funding. No projects
required solely as a mitigation or a condition of permitting are
eligible for funding.
(2)(a) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and
activities the ((board)) office shall give preference to projects that:
(i) Are based upon the limiting factors analysis identified under
RCW 77.85.060;
(ii) Provide a greater benefit to salmon recovery based upon the
stock status information contained in the department of fish and
wildlife salmonid stock inventory (SASSI), the salmon and steelhead
habitat inventory and assessment project (SSHIAP), and any comparable
science-based assessment when available;
(iii) Will benefit listed species and other fish species;
(iv) Will preserve high quality salmonid habitat;
(v) Are included in a regional or watershed-based salmon recovery
plan that accords the project, action, or area a high priority for
funding;
(vi) Are, except as provided in RCW 77.85.240, sponsored by an
entity that is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010; and
(vii) Are projects referenced in the action agenda developed by the
Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.
(b) In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and
activities the ((board)) office shall also give consideration to
projects that:
(i) Are the most cost-effective;
(ii) Have the greatest matched or in-kind funding;
(iii) Will be implemented by a sponsor with a successful record of
project implementation;
(iv) Involve members of the veterans conservation corps established
in RCW 43.60A.150; and
(v) Are part of a regionwide list developed by lead entities.
(3) The ((board)) recreation and conservation office may reject,
but not add, projects from a habitat project list submitted by a lead
entity for funding.
(4) The ((board)) office shall establish criteria for determining
when block grants may be made to a lead entity. The ((board)) office
may provide block grants to the lead entity to implement habitat
project lists developed under RCW 77.85.050, subject to available
funding. The ((board)) office shall determine an equitable minimum
amount of project funds for each recovery region, and shall distribute
the remainder of funds on a competitive basis. The ((board)) office
may also provide block grants to the lead entity or regional recovery
organization to assist in carrying out functions described under this
chapter. Block grants must be expended consistent with the priorities
established for the ((board)) office in subsection (2) of this section.
Lead entities or regional recovery organizations receiving block grants
under this subsection shall provide an annual report to the ((board))
office summarizing how funds were expended for activities consistent
with this chapter, including the types of projects funded, project
outcomes, monitoring results, and administrative costs.
(5) The ((board)) recreation and conservation office may waive or
modify portions of the allocation procedures and standards adopted
under this section in the award of grants or loans to conform to
legislative appropriations directing an alternative award procedure or
when the funds to be awarded are from federal or other sources
requiring other allocation procedures or standards as a condition of
the ((board's)) office's receipt of the funds. The ((board)) office
shall develop an integrated process to manage the allocation of funding
from federal and state sources to minimize delays in the award of
funding while recognizing the differences in state and legislative
appropriation timing.
(6) The board may award a grant or loan for a salmon recovery
project on private or public land when the landowner has a legal
obligation under local, state, or federal law to perform the project,
when expedited action provides a clear benefit to salmon recovery, and
there will be harm to salmon recovery if the project is delayed. For
purposes of this subsection, a legal obligation does not include a
project required solely as a mitigation or a condition of permitting.
(7) Property acquired or improved by a project sponsor may be
conveyed to a federal agency if: (a) The agency agrees to comply with
all terms of the grant or loan to which the project sponsor was
obligated; or (b) the board approves: (i) Changes in the terms of the
grant or loan, and the revision or removal of binding deed of right
instruments; and (ii) a memorandum of understanding or similar document
ensuring that the facility or property will retain, to the extent
feasible, adequate habitat protections; and (c) the appropriate
legislative authority of the county or city with jurisdiction over the
project area approves the transfer and provides notification to the
((board)) office.
(8) Any project sponsor receiving funding from the ((salmon
recovery funding board)) recreation and conservation office that is not
subject to disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW must, as a mandatory
contractual prerequisite to receiving the funding, agree to disclose
any information in regards to the expenditure of that funding as if the
project sponsor was subject to the requirements of chapter 42.56 RCW.
(9) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the
project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the
Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 125 RCW 77.85.135 and 2001 c 227 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
In providing funding for habitat projects, the ((salmon recovery
funding board)) recreation and conservation office shall require
recipients to incorporate the environmental benefits of the project
into their grant applications, and the ((board)) office shall utilize
the statement of environmental benefits in its prioritization and
selection process. The ((board)) office shall also develop appropriate
outcome-focused performance measures to be used both for management and
performance assessment of the grant program. To the extent possible,
the ((board)) office should coordinate its performance measure system
with other natural resource-related agencies as defined in RCW
43.41.270. The ((board)) recreation and conservation office shall
consult with affected interest groups in implementing this section.

Sec. 126 RCW 77.85.140 and 2009 c 518 s 9 and 2009 c 345 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Habitat project lists shall be submitted to the ((salmon
recovery funding board)) recreation and conservation office for funding
at least once a year on a schedule established by the board. The
((board)) office shall provide the legislature with a list of the
proposed projects and a list of the projects funded by October 1st of
each year for informational purposes. Project sponsors who complete
salmon habitat projects approved for funding from habitat project lists
and have met grant application deadlines will be paid by the ((salmon
recovery funding board)) recreation and conservation office within
thirty days of project completion.
(2) The recreation and conservation office shall track all funds
allocated for salmon habitat projects and salmon recovery activities
((on behalf of the board)), including both funds allocated by the
((board)) office and funds allocated by other state or federal agencies
for salmon recovery or water quality improvement.

Sec. 127 RCW 79A.25.010 and 2007 c 241 s 40 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Marine recreation land" means any land with or without
improvements which (a) provides access to, or in whole or in part
borders on, fresh or salt water suitable for recreational use by
watercraft, or (b) may be used to create, add to, or make more usable,
bodies of water, waterways, or land, for recreational use by
watercraft.
(2) "Public body" means any county, city, town, port district, park
and recreation district, metropolitan park district, or other municipal
corporation which is authorized to acquire or improve public outdoor
recreation land, and shall also mean Indian tribes now or hereafter
recognized as such by the federal government for participation in the
land and water conservation program.
(3) "Tax on marine fuel" means motor vehicle fuel tax which is (a)
tax on fuel used in, or sold or distributed for use in, any watercraft,
(b) refundable pursuant to chapter 82.36 RCW, and (c) paid to the
director of licensing with respect to taxable sales, distributions, or
uses occurring on or after December 3, 1964.
(4) "Watercraft" means any boat, vessel, or other craft used for
navigation on or through water.
(5) "Board" means the recreation and conservation funding board.
(6) "Director" means the director of the recreation and
conservation office.
(7) "Office," "recreation and conservation office," or "the office
of recreation and conservation" means the state agency responsible for
administration of programs and activities of the recreation and
conservation funding board, ((the salmon recovery funding board,)) the
invasive species council, and such other duties or boards, councils, or
advisory groups as are or may be established or directed for
administrative placement in the agency.
(8) "Council" means the Washington invasive species council created
in RCW 79A.25.310.

Sec. 128 RCW 79A.25.240 and 2009 c 345 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The recreation and conservation office ((shall provide necessary
grants and loan administration support to the salmon recovery funding
board as provided in RCW 77.85.120. The office)) shall ((also)) be
responsible for administering and tracking salmon recovery expenditures
under RCW 77.85.140. ((The office shall provide all necessary
administrative support to the salmon recovery funding board, and the
salmon recovery funding board shall be located with the office.))

Sec. 129 RCW 43.41.270 and 2009 c 345 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of financial management shall assist natural
resource-related agencies in developing outcome-focused performance
measures for administering natural resource-related and environmentally
based grant and loan programs. These performance measures are to be
used in determining grant eligibility, for program management and
performance assessment.
(2) The office of financial management and the recreation and
conservation office shall assist natural resource-related agencies in
developing recommendations for a monitoring program to measure outcome-
focused performance measures required by this section. The
recommendations must be consistent with the framework and coordinated
monitoring strategy developed by the monitoring oversight committee
established in RCW 77.85.210.
(3) Natural resource agencies shall consult with grant or loan
recipients including local governments, tribes, nongovernmental
organizations, and other interested parties, and report to the office
of financial management on the implementation of this section.
(4) For purposes of this section, "natural resource-related
agencies" include the department of ecology, the department of natural
resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the state conservation
commission, the recreation and conservation ((funding board, the salmon
recovery funding board,)) office and the public works board within the
department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce.
(5) For purposes of this section, "natural resource-related
environmentally based grant and loan programs" includes the
conservation reserve enhancement program; dairy nutrient management
grants under chapter 90.64 RCW; state conservation commission water
quality grants under chapter 89.08 RCW; coordinated prevention grants,
public participation grants, and remedial action grants under RCW
70.105D.070; water pollution control facilities financing under chapter
70.146 RCW; aquatic lands enhancement grants under RCW 79.105.150;
habitat grants under the Washington wildlife and recreation program
under RCW 79A.15.040; salmon recovery grants under chapter 77.85 RCW;
and the public works trust fund program under chapter 43.155 RCW. The
term also includes programs administered by the department of fish and
wildlife related to protection or recovery of fish stocks which are
funded with moneys from the capital budget.

Sec. 130 RCW 76.13.150 and 2003 c 311 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that a state-led cost-sharing program is
necessary to assist small forest landowners with removing and replacing
fish passage barriers that were added to their land prior to May 14,
2003, to help achieve the goals of the forests and fish report, and to
assist small forest landowners in complying with the state's fish
passage requirements.
(2) The small forest landowner office must, in cooperation with the
department of fish and wildlife, establish a program designed to assist
small forest landowners with repairing or removing fish passage
barriers and assist lead entities in acquiring the data necessary to
fill any gaps in fish passage barrier information. The small forest
landowner office and the department of fish and wildlife must work
closely with lead entities or other local watershed groups to make
maximum use of current information regarding the location and priority
of current fish passage barriers. Where additional fish passage
barrier inventories are necessary, funding will be sought for the
collection of this information. Methods, protocols, and formulas for
data gathering and prioritizing must be developed in consultation with
the department of fish and wildlife. The department of fish and
wildlife must assist in the training and management of fish passage
barrier location data collection.
(3) The small forest landowner office must actively seek out
funding for the program authorized in this section. The small forest
landowner office must work with consenting landowners to identify and
secure funding from local, state, federal, tribal, or nonprofit habitat
restoration organizations and other private sources, including the
((salmon recovery funding board)) recreation and conservation office,
the United States department of agriculture, the United States
department of transportation, the Washington state department of
transportation, the United States department of commerce, and the
federal highway administration.
(4)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the small
forest landowner office, in implementing the program established in
this section, must provide the highest proportion of public funding
available for the removal or replacement of any fish passage barrier.
(b) In no case shall a small forest landowner be required to pay
more than the lesser of either: (i) Twenty-five percent of any costs
associated with the removal or replacement of a particular fish passage
barrier; or (ii) five thousand dollars for the removal or replacement
of a particular fish passage barrier. No small forest landowner shall
be required to pay more than the maximum total annual costs in (c) of
this subsection.
(c) The portion of the total cost of removing or replacing fish
passage barriers that a small forest landowner must pay in any calendar
year shall be determined based on the average annual timber volume
harvested from the landowner's lands in this state during the three
preceding calendar years, and whether the fish passage barrier is in
eastern or western Washington.
(i) In western Washington (west of the Cascade Crest), a small
forest landowner who has harvested an average annual timber volume of
less than five hundred thousand board feet shall not be required to pay
more than a total of eight thousand dollars during that calendar year,
a small forest landowner who has harvested an annual average timber
volume between five hundred thousand and nine hundred ninety-nine
thousand board feet shall not be required to pay more than a total of
sixteen thousand dollars during that calendar year, a small forest
landowner who has harvested an average annual timber volume between one
million and one million four hundred ninety-nine thousand board feet
shall not be required to pay more than a total of twenty-four thousand
dollars during that calendar year, and a small forest landowner who has
harvested an average annual timber volume greater than or equal to one
million five hundred thousand board feet shall not be required to pay
more than a total of thirty-two thousand dollars during that calendar
year, regardless of the number of fish passage barriers removed or
replaced on the landowner's lands during that calendar year.
(ii) In eastern Washington (east of the Cascade Crest), a small
forest landowner who has harvested an average annual timber volume of
less than five hundred thousand board feet shall not be required to pay
more than a total of two thousand dollars during that calendar year, a
small forest landowner who has harvested an annual average timber
volume between five hundred thousand and nine hundred ninety-nine
thousand board feet shall not be required to pay more than a total of
four thousand dollars during that calendar year, a small forest
landowner who has harvested an average annual timber volume between one
million and one million four hundred ninety-nine thousand board feet
shall not be required to pay more than a total of twelve thousand
dollars during that calendar year, and a small forest landowner who has
harvested an average annual timber volume greater than or equal to one
million five hundred thousand board feet shall not be required to pay
more than a total of sixteen thousand dollars during that calendar
year, regardless of the number of fish passage barriers removed or
replaced on the landowner's lands during that calendar year.
(iii) Maximum total annual costs for small forest landowners with
fish passage barriers in both western and eastern Washington shall be
those specified under (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.
(d) If an existing fish passage barrier on land owned by a small
forest landowner was installed under an approved forest practices
application or notification, and hydraulics approval, and that fish
passage barrier becomes a high priority for fish passage based on the
watershed ranking in RCW ((76.13.150)) 77.12.755, one hundred percent
public funding shall be provided.
(5) If a small forest landowner is required to contribute a portion
of the funding under the cost-share program established in this
section, that landowner may satisfy his or her required proportion by
providing either direct monetary contributions or in-kind services to
the project. In-kind services may include labor, equipment, materials,
and other landowner-provided services determined by the department to
have an appropriate value to the removal of a particular fish passage
barrier.
(6)(a) The department, using fish passage barrier assessments and
ranked inventory information provided by the department of fish and
wildlife and the appropriate lead entity as delineated in RCW
77.12.755, must establish a prioritized list for the funding of fish
passage barrier removals on property owned by small forest landowners
that ensures that funding is provided first to the known fish passage
barriers existing on forest land owned by small forest landowners that
cause the greatest harm to public resources.
(b) As the department collects information about the presence of
fish passage barriers from submitted checklists, it must share this
information with the department of fish and wildlife ((and the
technical advisory groups established in RCW 77.85.070)). If the
addition of the information collected in the checklists or any other
changes to the scientific instruments described in RCW 77.12.755 alter
the analysis conducted under RCW 77.12.755, the department must alter
the funding order appropriately to reflect the new information.
(7) The department may accept commitments from small forest
landowners that they will participate in the program to remove fish
passage barriers from their land at any time, regardless of the funding
order given to the fish passage barriers on a particular landowner's
property.

Sec. 131 RCW 90.71.370 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 36 s 6013 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2008, and by September 1st of each even-numbered
year beginning in 2010, the council shall provide to the governor and
the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives its recommendations for the funding necessary to
implement the action agenda in the succeeding biennium. The
recommendations shall:
(a) Identify the funding needed by action agenda element;
(b) Address funding responsibilities among local, state, and
federal governments, as well as nongovernmental funding; and
(c) Address funding needed to support the work of the partnership,
the panel, the ecosystem work group, and entities assisting in
coordinating local efforts to implement the plan.
(2) In the 2008 report required under subsection (1) of this
section, the council shall include recommendations for projected
funding needed through 2020 to implement the action agenda; funding
needs for science panel staff; identify methods to secure stable and
sufficient funding to meet these needs; and include proposals for new
sources of funding to be dedicated to Puget Sound protection and
recovery. In preparing the science panel staffing proposal, the
council shall consult with the panel.
(3) By November 1st of each odd-numbered year beginning in 2009,
the council shall produce a state of the Sound report that includes, at
a minimum:
(a) An assessment of progress by state and nonstate entities in
implementing the action agenda, including accomplishments in the use of
state funds for action agenda implementation;
(b) A description of actions by implementing entities that are
inconsistent with the action agenda and steps taken to remedy the
inconsistency;
(c) The comments by the panel on progress in implementing the plan,
as well as findings arising from the assessment and monitoring program;
(d) A review of citizen concerns provided to the partnership and
the disposition of those concerns;
(e) A review of the expenditures of funds to state agencies for the
implementation of programs affecting the protection and recovery of
Puget Sound, and an assessment of whether the use of the funds is
consistent with the action agenda; and
(f) An identification of all funds provided to the partnership, and
recommendations as to how future state expenditures for all entities,
including the partnership, could better match the priorities of the
action agenda.
(4)(a) The council shall review state programs that fund facilities
and activities that may contribute to action agenda implementation. By
November 1, 2009, the council shall provide initial recommendations
regarding program changes to the governor and appropriate fiscal and
policy committees of the senate and house of representatives. By
November 1, 2010, the council shall provide final recommendations
regarding program changes, including proposed legislation to implement
the recommendation, to the governor and appropriate fiscal and policy
committees of the senate and house of representatives.
(b) The review in this subsection shall be conducted with the
active assistance and collaboration of the agencies administering these
programs, and in consultation with local governments and other entities
receiving funding from these programs:
(i) Water pollution control facilities financing, chapter 70.146
RCW;
(ii) The water pollution control revolving fund, chapter 90.50A
RCW;
(iii) The public works assistance account, chapter 43.155 RCW;
(iv) The aquatic lands enhancement account, RCW 79.105.150;
(v) The state toxics control account and local toxics control
account and clean-up program, chapter 70.105D RCW;
(vi) The acquisition of habitat conservation and outdoor recreation
land, chapter 79A.15 RCW;
(vii) The ((salmon recovery funding board, RCW 77.85.110))
recreation and conservation office, RCW 77.85.120 through 77.85.150;
(viii) The community economic revitalization board, chapter 43.160
RCW;
(ix) Other state financial assistance to water quality-related
projects and activities; and
(x) Water quality financial assistance from federal programs
administered through state programs or provided directly to local
governments in the Puget Sound basin.
(c) The council's review shall include but not be limited to:
(i) Determining the level of funding and types of projects and
activities funded through the programs that contribute to
implementation of the action agenda;
(ii) Evaluating the procedures and criteria in each program for
determining which projects and activities to fund, and their
relationship to the goals and priorities of the action agenda;
(iii) Assessing methods for ensuring that the goals and priorities
of the action agenda are given priority when program funding decisions
are made regarding water quality-related projects and activities in the
Puget Sound basin and habitat-related projects and activities in the
Puget Sound basin;
(iv) Modifying funding criteria so that projects, programs, and
activities that are inconsistent with the action agenda are ineligible
for funding;
(v) Assessing ways to incorporate a strategic funding approach for
the action agenda within the outcome-focused performance measures
required by RCW 43.41.270 in administering natural resource-related and
environmentally based grant and loan programs.
(5) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the council's review must
result in a ranking of projects affecting the protection and recovery
of the Puget Sound basin that are proposed in the governor's capital
budget submitted under RCW 43.88.060. The ranking shall include
recommendations for reallocation of total requested funds for Puget
Sound basin projects to achieve the greatest positive outcomes for
protection and recovery of Puget Sound and shall be submitted to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature no later than February
1, 2011.

Salmon Stamp Selection Committee
NEW SECTION. Sec. 132 RCW 77.12.856 (Salmon stamp selection
committee -- Creation) and 1999 c 342 s 5 are each repealed.

Sec. 133 RCW 77.12.850 and 1999 c 342 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 77.12.850
through 77.12.860 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Salmon" means all species of the genus Oncorhynchus, except
those classified as game fish in this title, and includes:

Scientific Name
Common Name

Oncorhynchus tshawytscha Chinook salmon

Oncorhynchus kisutch Coho salmon

Oncorhynchus keta Chum salmon

Oncorhynchus gorbuscha Pink salmon

Oncorhynchus nerka Sockeye salmon

(2) "Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.
(3) (("Committee" means the salmon stamp selection committee
created in RCW 77.12.856.
(4))) "Stamp" means the stamp created under the Washington salmon
stamp program and the Washington junior salmon stamp program, created
in RCW 77.12.850 through 77.12.860.

Sentencing Guidelines Commission
NEW SECTION. Sec. 134 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 13.40.005 (Juvenile disposition standards commission--Abolished -- References to commission -- Transfer of powers, duties, and
functions) and 1995 c 269 s 301;
(2) RCW 9.94A.850 (Sentencing guidelines commission -- Established--Powers and duties) and 2009 c 375 s 8, 2009 c 28 s 17, & 2005 c 282 s
19;
(3) RCW 9.94A.860 (Sentencing guidelines commission -- Membership--Appointments -- Terms of office -- Expenses and compensation) and 2001 2nd
sp.s. c 12 s 311, 1996 c 232 s 3, 1993 c 11 s 1, 1988 c 157 s 2, 1984
c 287 s 10, & 1981 c 137 s 6;
(4) RCW 9.94A.8672 (Sex offender policy board -- Establishment) and
2008 c 249 s 2;
(5) RCW 9.94A.8673 (Sex offender policy board -- Membership) and 2008
c 249 s 3; and
(6) RCW 9.94A.8675 (Sex offender policy board -- Authority) and 2008
c 249 s 5.

Sec. 135 RCW 9.94A.480 and 2002 c 290 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A current, newly created or reworked judgment and sentence
document for each felony sentencing shall record any and all
recommended sentencing agreements or plea agreements and the sentences
for any and all felony crimes kept as public records under RCW
9.94A.475 shall contain the clearly printed name and legal signature of
the sentencing judge. The judgment and sentence document as defined in
this section shall also provide additional space for the sentencing
judge's reasons for going either above or below the presumptive
sentence range for any and all felony crimes covered as public records
under RCW 9.94A.475. Both the sentencing judge and the prosecuting
attorney's office shall each retain or receive a completed copy of each
sentencing document as defined in this section for their own records.
(2) The ((sentencing guidelines commission)) office of financial
management shall be sent a completed copy of the judgment and sentence
document upon conviction for each felony sentencing under subsection
(1) of this section and shall compile a yearly and cumulative judicial
record of each sentencing judge in regards to his or her sentencing
practices for any and all felony crimes involving:
(a) Any violent offense as defined in this chapter;
(b) Any most serious offense as defined in this chapter;
(c) Any felony with any deadly weapon special verdict under RCW
((9.94A.602)) 9.94A.825;
(d) Any felony with any deadly weapon enhancements under RCW
9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both; and/or
(e) The felony crimes of possession of a machine gun, possessing a
stolen firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first or second degree, and/or use of a
machine gun in a felony.
(3) The ((sentencing guidelines commission)) office of financial
management shall compare each individual judge's sentencing practices
to the standard or presumptive sentence range for any and all felony
crimes listed in subsection (2) of this section for the appropriate
offense level as defined in RCW 9.94A.515 or 9.94A.518, offender score
as defined in RCW 9.94A.525, and any applicable deadly weapon
enhancements as defined in RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both. These
comparative records shall be retained and made available to the public
for review in a current, newly created or reworked official published
document by the ((sentencing guidelines commission)) office of
financial management.
(4) Any and all felony sentences which are either above or below
the standard or presumptive sentence range in subsection (3) of this
section shall also mark whether the prosecuting attorney in the case
also recommended a similar sentence, if any, which was either above or
below the presumptive sentence range and shall also indicate if the
sentence was in conjunction with an approved alternative sentencing
option including a first-time offender waiver, sex offender sentencing
alternative, or other prescribed sentencing option.
(5) If any completed judgment and sentence document as defined in
subsection (1) of this section is not sent to the ((sentencing
guidelines commission)) office of financial management as required in
subsection (2) of this section, the ((sentencing guidelines
commission)) office of financial management shall have the authority
and shall undertake reasonable and necessary steps to assure that all
past, current, and future sentencing documents as defined in subsection
(1) of this section are received by the ((sentencing guidelines
commission)) office of financial management.

Sec. 136 RCW 9.94A.863 and 2009 c 431 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((sentencing guidelines commission)) office of financial
management shall review the monetary threshold amounts differentiating
the various degrees of property crimes in Washington state to determine
whether such amounts should be modified. The ((sentencing guidelines
commission)) office of financial management shall report to the
legislature with its recommendations by November 1, 2014, and every
five years thereafter.

Sec. 137 RCW 13.50.010 and 2010 c 150 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this chapter:
(a) "Juvenile justice or care agency" means any of the following:
Police, diversion units, court, prosecuting attorney, defense attorney,
detention center, attorney general, the legislative children's
oversight committee, the office of the family and children's ombudsman,
the department of social and health services and its contracting
agencies, schools; persons or public or private agencies having
children committed to their custody; and any placement oversight
committee created under RCW 72.05.415;
(b) "Official juvenile court file" means the legal file of the
juvenile court containing the petition or information, motions,
memorandums, briefs, findings of the court, and court orders;
(c) "Records" means the official juvenile court file, the social
file, and records of any other juvenile justice or care agency in the
case;
(d) "Social file" means the juvenile court file containing the
records and reports of the probation counselor.
(2) Each petition or information filed with the court may include
only one juvenile and each petition or information shall be filed under
a separate docket number. The social file shall be filed separately
from the official juvenile court file.
(3) It is the duty of any juvenile justice or care agency to
maintain accurate records. To this end:
(a) The agency may never knowingly record inaccurate information.
Any information in records maintained by the department of social and
health services relating to a petition filed pursuant to chapter 13.34
RCW that is found by the court to be false or inaccurate shall be
corrected or expunged from such records by the agency;
(b) An agency shall take reasonable steps to assure the security of
its records and prevent tampering with them; and
(c) An agency shall make reasonable efforts to insure the
completeness of its records, including action taken by other agencies
with respect to matters in its files.
(4) Each juvenile justice or care agency shall implement procedures
consistent with the provisions of this chapter to facilitate inquiries
concerning records.
(5) Any person who has reasonable cause to believe information
concerning that person is included in the records of a juvenile justice
or care agency and who has been denied access to those records by the
agency may make a motion to the court for an order authorizing that
person to inspect the juvenile justice or care agency record concerning
that person. The court shall grant the motion to examine records
unless it finds that in the interests of justice or in the best
interests of the juvenile the records or parts of them should remain
confidential.
(6) A juvenile, or his or her parents, or any person who has
reasonable cause to believe information concerning that person is
included in the records of a juvenile justice or care agency may make
a motion to the court challenging the accuracy of any information
concerning the moving party in the record or challenging the continued
possession of the record by the agency. If the court grants the
motion, it shall order the record or information to be corrected or
destroyed.
(7) The person making a motion under subsection (5) or (6) of this
section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to
the original action and to any agency whose records will be affected by
the motion.
(8) The court may permit inspection of records by, or release of
information to, any clinic, hospital, or agency which has the subject
person under care or treatment. The court may also permit inspection
by or release to individuals or agencies, including juvenile justice
advisory committees of county law and justice councils, engaged in
legitimate research for educational, scientific, or public purposes.
The court shall release to the ((sentencing guidelines commission))
office of financial management records needed for its research and
data-gathering functions ((under RCW 9.94A.850 and other statutes)).
Access to records or information for research purposes shall be
permitted only if the anonymity of all persons mentioned in the records
or information will be preserved. Each person granted permission to
inspect juvenile justice or care agency records for research purposes
shall present a notarized statement to the court stating that the names
of juveniles and parents will remain confidential.
(9) Juvenile detention facilities shall release records to the
((sentencing guidelines commission under RCW 9.94A.850)) office of
financial management upon request. The commission shall not disclose
the names of any juveniles or parents mentioned in the records without
the named individual's written permission.
(10) Requirements in this chapter relating to the court's authority
to compel disclosure shall not apply to the legislative children's
oversight committee or the office of the family and children's
ombudsman.
(11) For the purpose of research only, the administrative office of
the courts shall maintain an electronic research copy of all records in
the judicial information system related to juveniles. Access to the
research copy is restricted to the Washington state center for court
research. The Washington state center for court research shall
maintain the confidentiality of all confidential records and shall
preserve the anonymity of all persons identified in the research copy.
The research copy may not be subject to any records retention schedule
and must include records destroyed or removed from the judicial
information system pursuant to RCW 13.50.050 (17) and (18) and
13.50.100(3).
(12) The court shall release to the Washington state office of
public defense records needed to implement the agency's oversight,
technical assistance, and other functions as required by RCW 2.70.020.
Access to the records used as a basis for oversight, technical
assistance, or other agency functions is restricted to the Washington
state office of public defense. The Washington state office of public
defense shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential
information included in the records.

Sec. 138 RCW 9.94A.030 and 2010 c 274 s 401, 2010 c 267 s 9, 2010
c 227 s 11, and 2010 c 224 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the indeterminate sentence review board created
under chapter 9.95 RCW.
(2) "Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit," or
"collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department,
means that the department, either directly or through a collection
agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.760, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal
financial obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and,
consistent with current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the
superior court clerk without depositing it in a departmental account.
(3) (("Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.
(4))) "Community corrections officer" means an employee of the
department who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in
supervision of sentenced offenders and monitoring of sentence
conditions.
(((5))) (4) "Community custody" means that portion of an offender's
sentence of confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed as
part of a sentence under this chapter and served in the community
subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and activities by
the department.
(((6))) (5) "Community protection zone" means the area within eight
hundred eighty feet of the facilities and grounds of a public or
private school.
(((7))) (6) "Community restitution" means compulsory service,
without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender.
(((8))) (7) "Confinement" means total or partial confinement.
(((9))) (8) "Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to
Title 10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of
guilty, and acceptance of a plea of guilty.
(((10))) (9) "Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court
prohibiting conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the
crime for which the offender has been convicted, and shall not be
construed to mean orders directing an offender affirmatively to
participate in rehabilitative programs or to otherwise perform
affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to monitor
compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.
(((11))) (10) "Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's
prior convictions and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in
federal court, or elsewhere.
(a) The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (i)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and
terms thereof; and (ii) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and
the length of incarceration.
(b) A conviction may be removed from a defendant's criminal history
only if it is vacated pursuant to RCW 9.96.060, 9.94A.640, 9.95.240, or
a similar out-of-state statute, or if the conviction has been vacated
pursuant to a governor's pardon.
(c) The determination of a defendant's criminal history is distinct
from the determination of an offender score. A prior conviction that
was not included in an offender score calculated pursuant to a former
version of the sentencing reform act remains part of the defendant's
criminal history.
(((12))) (11) "Criminal street gang" means any ongoing
organization, association, or group of three or more persons, whether
formal or informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or
symbol, having as one of its primary activities the commission of
criminal acts, and whose members or associates individually or
collectively engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal street
gang activity. This definition does not apply to employees engaged in
concerted activities for their mutual aid and protection, or to the
activities of labor and bona fide nonprofit organizations or their
members or agents.
(((13))) (12) "Criminal street gang associate or member" means any
person who actively participates in any criminal street gang and who
intentionally promotes, furthers, or assists in any criminal act by the
criminal street gang.
(((14))) (13) "Criminal street gang-related offense" means any
felony or misdemeanor offense, whether in this state or elsewhere, that
is committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association
with any criminal street gang, or is committed with the intent to
promote, further, or assist in any criminal conduct by the gang, or is
committed for one or more of the following reasons:
(a) To gain admission, prestige, or promotion within the gang;
(b) To increase or maintain the gang's size, membership, prestige,
dominance, or control in any geographical area;
(c) To exact revenge or retribution for the gang or any member of
the gang;
(d) To obstruct justice, or intimidate or eliminate any witness
against the gang or any member of the gang;
(e) To directly or indirectly cause any benefit, aggrandizement,
gain, profit, or other advantage for the gang, its reputation,
influence, or membership; or
(f) To provide the gang with any advantage in, or any control or
dominance over any criminal market sector, including, but not limited
to, manufacturing, delivering, or selling any controlled substance
(chapter 69.50 RCW); arson (chapter 9A.48 RCW); trafficking in stolen
property (chapter 9A.82 RCW); promoting prostitution (chapter 9A.88
RCW); human trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100); or promoting pornography
(chapter 9.68 RCW).
(((15))) (14) "Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing
court that equals the difference between the offender's net daily
income and the reasonable obligations that the offender has for the
support of the offender and any dependents.
(((16))) (15) "Day reporting" means a program of enhanced
supervision designed to monitor the offender's daily activities and
compliance with sentence conditions, and in which the offender is
required to report daily to a specific location designated by the
department or the sentencing court.
(((17))) (16) "Department" means the department of corrections.
(((18))) (17) "Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states
with exactitude the number of actual years, months, or days of total
confinement, of partial confinement, of community custody, the number
of actual hours or days of community restitution work, or dollars or
terms of a legal financial obligation. The fact that an offender
through earned release can reduce the actual period of confinement
shall not affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate
sentence.
(((19))) (18) "Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings
of an offender remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any
amount required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this
definition, "earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal
services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or
otherwise, and, notwithstanding any other provision of law making the
payments exempt from garnishment, attachment, or other process to
satisfy a court-ordered legal financial obligation, specifically
includes periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs,
or insurance policies of any type, but does not include payments made
under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020 and 50.40.050,
or Title 74 RCW.
(((20))) (19) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as defined
in RCW 10.99.020 and 26.50.010.
(((21))) (20) "Drug offender sentencing alternative" is a
sentencing option available to persons convicted of a felony offense
other than a violent offense or a sex offense and who are eligible for
the option under RCW 9.94A.660.
(((22))) (21) "Drug offense" means:
(a) Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of
a controlled substance (RCW 69.50.4013) or forged prescription for a
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.403);
(b) Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates
to the possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a
controlled substance; or
(c) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws
of this state would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(((23))) (22) "Earned release" means earned release from
confinement as provided in RCW 9.94A.728.
(((24))) (23) "Escape" means:
(a) Sexually violent predator escape (RCW 9A.76.115), escape in the
first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060),
willful failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful
failure to be available for supervision by the department while in
community custody (RCW 72.09.310); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as an escape
under (a) of this subsection.
(((25))) (24) "Felony traffic offense" means:
(a) Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW
46.61.522), eluding a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW 46.52.020(4)), felony driving while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502(6)), or
felony physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504(6)); or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a felony
traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((26))) (25) "Fine" means a specific sum of money ordered by the
sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specific period of time.
(((27))) (26) "First-time offender" means any person who has no
prior convictions for a felony and is eligible for the first-time
offender waiver under RCW 9.94A.650.
(((28))) (27) "Home detention" means a program of partial
confinement available to offenders wherein the offender is confined in
a private residence subject to electronic surveillance.
(((29))) (28) "Legal financial obligation" means a sum of money
that is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for
legal financial obligations which may include restitution to the
victim, statutorily imposed crime victims' compensation fees as
assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court costs, county or interlocal
drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and costs of defense,
fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to the
offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for
vehicular assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug, RCW 46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a),
legal financial obligations may also include payment to a public agency
of the expense of an emergency response to the incident resulting in
the conviction, subject to RCW 38.52.430.
(((30))) (29) "Minor child" means a biological or adopted child of
the offender who is under age eighteen at the time of the offender's
current offense.
(((31))) (30) "Most serious offense" means any of the following
felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies:
(a) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or
criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A
felony;
(b) Assault in the second degree;
(c) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(d) Child molestation in the second degree;
(e) Controlled substance homicide;
(f) Extortion in the first degree;
(g) Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;
(h) Indecent liberties;
(i) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(j) Leading organized crime;
(k) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(l) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(m) Promoting prostitution in the first degree;
(n) Rape in the third degree;
(o) Robbery in the second degree;
(p) Sexual exploitation;
(q) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving of
a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless
manner;
(r) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(s) Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual
motivation;
(t) Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW
9.94A.825;
(u) Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2,
1993, that is comparable to a most serious offense under this
subsection, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
most serious offense under this subsection;
(v)(i) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
((9A.88.100)) 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975
1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979, RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a),
(b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June 11, 1986, and
RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11, 1986,
until July 1, 1988;
(ii) A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988,
if: (A) The crime was committed against a child under the age of
fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the victim and perpetrator is
included in the definition of indecent liberties under RCW
9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27, 1997,
or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997;
(w) Any out-of-state conviction for a felony offense with a finding
of sexual motivation if the minimum sentence imposed was ten years or
more; provided that the out-of-state felony offense must be comparable
to a felony offense under Title 9 or 9A RCW and the out-of-state
definition of sexual motivation must be comparable to the definition of
sexual motivation contained in this section.
(((32))) (31) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a
violent offense.
(((33))) (32) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is
less than eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court
jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the
appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court pursuant to RCW
13.40.110. In addition, for the purpose of community custody
requirements under this chapter, "offender" also means a misdemeanor or
gross misdemeanor probationer convicted of an offense included in RCW
9.94A.501(1) and ordered by a superior court to probation under the
supervision of the department pursuant to RCW 9.92.060, 9.95.204, or
9.95.210. Throughout this chapter, the terms "offender" and
"defendant" are used interchangeably.
(((34))) (33) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more
than one year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under
contract by the state or any other unit of government, or, if home
detention or work crew has been ordered by the court or home detention
has been ordered by the department as part of the parenting program, in
an approved residence, for a substantial portion of each day with the
balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement
includes work release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of
work crew and home detention.
(((35))) (34) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity" means:
(a) The commission, attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation of, or any
prior juvenile adjudication of or adult conviction of, two or more of
the following criminal street gang-related offenses:
(i) Any "serious violent" felony offense as defined in this
section, excluding Homicide by Abuse (RCW 9A.32.055) and Assault of a
Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120);
(ii) Any "violent" offense as defined by this section, excluding
Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130);
(iii) Deliver or Possession with Intent to Deliver a Controlled
Substance (chapter 69.50 RCW);
(iv) Any violation of the firearms and dangerous weapon act
(chapter 9.41 RCW);
(v) Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300);
(vi) Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310);
(vii) Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080);
(viii) Harassment where a subsequent violation or deadly threat is
made (RCW 9A.46.020(2)(b));
(ix) Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120);
(x) Any felony conviction by a person eighteen years of age or
older with a special finding of involving a juvenile in a felony
offense under RCW 9.94A.833;
(xi) Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);
(xii) Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030);
(xiii) Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070);
(xiv) Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080);
(xv) Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065);
(xvi) Possession of a Stolen Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068);
(xvii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070);
(xviii) Taking a Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW
9A.56.075);
(xix) Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120);
(xx) Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130);
(xxi) Intimidating a Witness (RCW 9A.72.110);
(xxii) Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120);
(xxiii) Reckless Endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);
(xxiv) Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);
(xxv) Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020); or
(xxvi) Malicious Mischief 3 (RCW 9A.48.090);
(b) That at least one of the offenses listed in (a) of this
subsection shall have occurred after July 1, 2008;
(c) That the most recent committed offense listed in (a) of this
subsection occurred within three years of a prior offense listed in (a)
of this subsection; and
(d) Of the offenses that were committed in (a) of this subsection,
the offenses occurred on separate occasions or were committed by two or
more persons.
(((36))) (35) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:
(a)(i) Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a
most serious offense; and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least two separate
occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of felonies that under
the laws of this state would be considered most serious offenses and
would be included in the offender score under RCW 9.94A.525; provided
that of the two or more previous convictions, at least one conviction
must have occurred before the commission of any of the other most
serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or
(b)(i) Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape
of a child in the first degree, child molestation in the first degree,
rape in the second degree, rape of a child in the second degree, or
indecent liberties by forcible compulsion; (B) any of the following
offenses with a finding of sexual motivation: Murder in the first
degree, murder in the second degree, homicide by abuse, kidnapping in
the first degree, kidnapping in the second degree, assault in the first
degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, assault of a child in the second degree, or burglary in the
first degree; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (((36))) (35)(b)(i); and
(ii) Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this
subsection, been convicted as an offender on at least one occasion,
whether in this state or elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of
this subsection or any federal or out-of-state offense or offense under
prior Washington law that is comparable to the offenses listed in
(b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for rape of a child in the
first degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this subsection
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in
the second degree constitutes a conviction under (b)(i) of this
subsection only when the offender was eighteen years of age or older
when the offender committed the offense.
(((37))) (36) "Predatory" means: (a) The perpetrator of the crime
was a stranger to the victim, as defined in this section; (b) the
perpetrator established or promoted a relationship with the victim
prior to the offense and the victimization of the victim was a
significant reason the perpetrator established or promoted the
relationship; or (c) the perpetrator was: (i) A teacher, counselor,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any public or private school
and the victim was a student of the school under his or her authority
or supervision. For purposes of this subsection, "school" does not
include home-based instruction as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; (ii) a
coach, trainer, volunteer, or other person in authority in any
recreational activity and the victim was a participant in the activity
under his or her authority or supervision; (iii) a pastor, elder,
volunteer, or other person in authority in any church or religious
organization, and the victim was a member or participant of the
organization under his or her authority; or (iv) a teacher, counselor,
volunteer, or other person in authority providing home-based
instruction and the victim was a student receiving home-based
instruction while under his or her authority or supervision. For
purposes of this subsection: (A) "Home-based instruction" has the same
meaning as defined in RCW 28A.225.010; and (B) "teacher, counselor,
volunteer, or other person in authority" does not include the parent or
legal guardian of the victim.
(((38))) (37) "Private school" means a school regulated under
chapter 28A.195 or 28A.205 RCW.
(((39))) (38) "Public school" has the same meaning as in RCW
28A.150.010.
(((40))) (39) "Repetitive domestic violence offense" means any:
(a)(i) Domestic violence assault that is not a felony offense under
RCW 9A.36.041;
(ii) Domestic violence violation of a no-contact order under
chapter 10.99 RCW that is not a felony offense;
(iii) Domestic violence violation of a protection order under
chapter 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 26.50 RCW that is not a felony offense;
(iv) Domestic violence harassment offense under RCW 9A.46.020 that
is not a felony offense; or
(v) Domestic violence stalking offense under RCW 9A.46.110 that is
not a felony offense; or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, tribal court, military, county, or
municipal conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state
would be classified as a repetitive domestic violence offense under (a)
of this subsection.
(((41))) (40) "Restitution" means a specific sum of money ordered
by the sentencing court to be paid by the offender to the court over a
specified period of time as payment of damages. The sum may include
both public and private costs.
(((42))) (41) "Risk assessment" means the application of the risk
instrument recommended to the department by the Washington state
institute for public policy as having the highest degree of predictive
accuracy for assessing an offender's risk of reoffense.
(((43))) (42) "Serious traffic offense" means:
(a) Nonfelony driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.502), nonfelony actual physical control
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or hit-and-run an
attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or
(b) Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a
serious traffic offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((44))) (43) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent
offense and means:
(a)(i) Murder in the first degree;
(ii) Homicide by abuse;
(iii) Murder in the second degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(v) Assault in the first degree;
(vi) Kidnapping in the first degree;
(vii) Rape in the first degree;
(viii) Assault of a child in the first degree; or
(ix) An attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit one of these felonies; or
(b) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a serious
violent offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((45))) (44) "Sex offense" means:
(a)(i) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW other than
RCW 9A.44.132;
(ii) A violation of RCW 9A.64.020;
(iii) A felony that is a violation of chapter 9.68A RCW other than
RCW 9.68A.080;
(iv) A felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt,
criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes; or
(v) A felony violation of RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register) if
the person has been convicted of violating RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to
register) on at least one prior occasion;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex
offense in (a) of this subsection;
(c) A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW
9.94A.835 or 13.40.135; or
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex
offense under (a) of this subsection.
(((46))) (45) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes
for which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his
or her sexual gratification.
(((47))) (46) "Standard sentence range" means the sentencing
court's discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.
(((48))) (47) "Statutory maximum sentence" means the maximum length
of time for which an offender may be confined as punishment for a crime
as prescribed in chapter 9A.20 RCW, RCW 9.92.010, the statute defining
the crime, or other statute defining the maximum penalty for a crime.
(((49))) (48) "Stranger" means that the victim did not know the
offender twenty-four hours before the offense.
(((50))) (49) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the
physical boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized
under contract by the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.
(((51))) (50) "Transition training" means written and verbal
instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender
during the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of
the work ethic camp program. The transition training shall include
instructions in the offender's requirements and obligations during the
offender's period of community custody.
(((52))) (51) "Victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or
property as a direct result of the crime charged.
(((53))) (52) "Violent offense" means:
(a) Any of the following felonies:
(i) Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an
attempt to commit a class A felony;
(ii) Criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony;
(iii) Manslaughter in the first degree;
(iv) Manslaughter in the second degree;
(v) Indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion;
(vi) Kidnapping in the second degree;
(vii) Arson in the second degree;
(viii) Assault in the second degree;
(ix) Assault of a child in the second degree;
(x) Extortion in the first degree;
(xi) Robbery in the second degree;
(xii) Drive-by shooting;
(xiii) Vehicular assault, when caused by the operation or driving
of a vehicle by a person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a
reckless manner; and
(xiv) Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of
any vehicle by any person while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of
any vehicle in a reckless manner;
(b) Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior
to July 1, 1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent
offense in (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a violent
offense under (a) or (b) of this subsection.
(((54))) (53) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement
consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community
that complies with RCW 9.94A.725.
(((55))) (54) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration
program as provided in RCW 9.94A.690 designed to reduce recidivism and
lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders to complete a
comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills
development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy
training, and basic adult education.
(((56))) (55) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a
regular course of study at school.

Sec. 139 RCW 9.94A.74501 and 2001 c 35 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((sentencing guidelines commission)) department of
corrections shall serve as the state council for interstate adult
offender supervision as required under article IV of RCW 9.94A.745, the
interstate compact for adult offender supervision. ((To assist the
commission in performing its functions as the state council,)) The
department of corrections shall provide staffing and support services.
The ((commission)) department of corrections may form a subcommittee,
including members representing the legislative, judicial, and executive
branches of state government, and victims' groups((, and the secretary
of corrections,)) to perform the functions of the state council. Any
such subcommittee shall include representation of both houses and at
least two of the four largest political caucuses in the legislature.
(2) The ((commission,)) department or a subcommittee if formed for
that purpose, shall:
(a) Review department operations and procedures under RCW
9.94A.745, and recommend policies to the compact administrator,
including policies to be pursued in the administrator's capacity as the
state's representative on the interstate commission created under
article III of RCW 9.94A.745;
(b) Report annually to the legislature on interstate supervision
operations and procedures under RCW 9.94A.745, including
recommendations for policy changes; and
(c) Not later than December 1, 2004, report to the legislature on
the effectiveness of its functioning as the state council under article
IV of RCW 9.94A.745, and recommend any legislation it deems
appropriate.
(3) The ((commission, or a subcommittee if formed for that
purpose,)) secretary shall appoint ((one of its members, or)) an
employee of the department ((designated by the secretary)), or a
subcommittee if formed for that purpose shall appoint one of its
members, to represent the state at meetings of the interstate
commission created under article III of RCW 9.94A.745 when the compact
administrator cannot attend.

Sec. 140 RCW 9.94A.855 and 2005 c 282 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((commission)) office of financial management shall appoint a
research staff of sufficient size and with sufficient resources to
accomplish its duties. The ((commission)) office of financial
management may request from ((the office of financial management, the
indeterminate sentence review board,)) the administrative office of the
courts, the department of corrections, and the department of social and
health services such data, information, and data processing assistance
as it may need to accomplish its duties, and such services shall be
provided without cost to the ((commission)) office of financial
management. ((The commission shall adopt its own bylaws.
The salary for a full-time executive officer, if any, shall be
fixed by the governor pursuant to RCW 43.03.040.))

Sec. 141 RCW 9.94A.870 and 1999 c 143 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the governor finds that an emergency exists in that the
population of a state residential correctional facility exceeds its
reasonable, maximum capacity, then the governor may ((do any one or
more of the following:
(1) Call the sentencing guidelines commission into an emergency
meeting for the purpose of evaluating the standard ranges and other
standards. The commission may adopt any revision or amendment to the
standard ranges or other standards that it believes appropriate to deal
with the emergency situation. The revision or amendment shall be
adopted in conformity with chapter 34.05 RCW and shall take effect on
the date prescribed by the commission. The legislature shall approve
or modify the commission's revision or amendment at the next
legislative session after the revision or amendment takes effect.
Failure of the legislature to act shall be deemed as approval of the
revision or amendment;
(2))) call the clemency and pardons board into an emergency meeting
for the purpose of recommending whether the governor's commutation or
pardon power should be exercised to meet the present emergency.

Sec. 142 RCW 9.94A.875 and 1984 c 209 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
If the governor finds that an emergency exists in that the
populations of county jails exceed their reasonable, maximum capacity
in a significant manner as a result of increases in the sentenced felon
population due to implementation of chapter 9.94A RCW, the governor may
((do any one or more of the following:
(1) Call the sentencing guidelines commission into an emergency
meeting for the purpose of evaluating the standard ranges and other
standards. The commission may adopt any revision or amendment to the
standard ranges or other standards that it believes appropriate to deal
with the emergency situation. The revision or amendment shall be
adopted in conformity with chapter 34.05 RCW and shall take effect on
the date prescribed by the commission. The legislature shall approve
or modify the commission's revision or amendment at the next
legislative session after the revision or amendment takes effect.
Failure of the legislature to act shall be deemed as approval of the
revision or amendment. The commission shall also analyze how
alternatives to total confinement are being provided and used and may
recommend other emergency measures that may relieve the overcrowding.
(2))) call the clemency and pardons board into an emergency meeting
for the purpose of recommending whether the governor's commutation or
pardon power should be exercised to meet the present emergency.

Sec. 143 RCW 9A.52.025 and 1989 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of residential burglary if, with intent to
commit a crime against a person or property therein, the person enters
or remains unlawfully in a dwelling other than a vehicle.
(2) Residential burglary is a class B felony. In establishing
sentencing guidelines and disposition standards, ((the sentencing
guidelines commission and)) the juvenile disposition standards
commission shall consider residential burglary as a more serious
offense than second degree burglary.

Sec. 144 RCW 10.98.140 and 1987 c 462 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The section, the department, and the office of financial
management shall be the primary sources of information for criminal
justice forecasting. The information maintained by these agencies
shall be complete, accurate, and sufficiently timely to support state
criminal justice forecasting.
(2) The office of financial management shall be the official state
agency for the sentenced felon jail forecast. This forecast shall
provide at least a six-year projection and shall be published by
December 1 of every even-numbered year beginning with 1986. The office
of financial management shall seek advice regarding the assumptions in
the forecast from criminal justice agencies and associations.
(3) The ((sentencing guidelines commission)) office of financial
management shall keep records on all sentencings above or below the
standard range defined by chapter 9.94A RCW. As a minimum, the records
shall include the name of the offender, the crimes for which the
offender was sentenced, the name and county of the sentencing judge,
and the deviation from the standard range. Such records shall be made
available to public officials upon request.

Sec. 145 RCW 10.98.160 and 2005 c 282 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
In the development and modification of the procedures, definitions,
and reporting capabilities of the section, the department, the office
of financial management, and the responsible agencies and persons shall
consider the needs of other criminal justice agencies such as the
administrative office of the courts, local law enforcement agencies,
local jails, ((the sentencing guidelines commission,)) the
indeterminate sentence review board, the clemency board, prosecuting
attorneys, and affected state agencies such as the office of financial
management and legislative committees dealing with criminal justice
issues. The Washington integrated justice information board shall
review and provide recommendations to state justice agencies and the
courts for development and modification of the statewide justice
information network.

Sec. 146 RCW 70.96A.350 and 2009 c 479 s 50 and 2009 c 445 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a)
Substance abuse treatment and treatment support services for offenders
with an addiction or a substance abuse problem that, if not treated,
would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a
prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of drug and
alcohol treatment services and treatment support services for
nonviolent offenders within a drug court program; (c) the
administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a
drug court; and (d) during the 2007-2009 biennium, operation of the
integrated crisis response and intensive case management pilots
contracted with the department of social and health services division
of alcohol and substance abuse. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's
successful completion of his or her substance abuse treatment program,
but does not include the following services: Housing other than that
provided as part of an inpatient substance abuse treatment program,
vocational training, and mental health counseling; and
(b) "Treatment support" means transportation to or from inpatient
or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and
child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's
ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.
(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of:
(a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b)
any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.
(4)(a) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2003, the state
treasurer shall transfer eight million nine hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund into the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into eight equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2005, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state
treasurer shall transfer eight million two hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into four equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the
amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the
implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor
statistics.
(b) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate
the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a)
of this subsection to the division of alcohol and substance abuse for
the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.
(5) Moneys appropriated to the division of alcohol and substance
abuse from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed
as specified in this subsection. The department shall serve as the
fiscal agent for purposes of distribution. Until July 1, 2004, the
department may not use moneys appropriated from the criminal justice
treatment account for administrative expenses and shall distribute all
amounts appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section in
accordance with this subsection. Beginning in July 1, 2004, the
department may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated
under subsection (4)(b) of this section for its administrative costs.
(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the
distribution formula adopted under this section. The division of
alcohol and substance abuse, in consultation with the department of
corrections, ((the sentencing guidelines commission,)) the Washington
state association of counties, the Washington state association of drug
court professionals, the superior court judges' association, the
Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, representatives of the
criminal defense bar, representatives of substance abuse treatment
providers, and any other person deemed by the division to be necessary,
shall establish a fair and reasonable methodology for distribution to
counties of moneys in the criminal justice treatment account. County
or regional plans submitted for the expenditure of formula funds must
be approved by the panel established in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating
offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting
attorney. The division shall appoint a panel of representatives from
the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges'
association, the Washington state association of counties, the
Washington defender's association or the Washington association of
criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington
state association of drug court professionals, substance abuse
treatment providers, and the division. The panel shall review county
or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants
approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that
treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.
(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor,
county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment
provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the
criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority,
and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court
shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative
authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b)
of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the
criminal justice treatment account within that county. The funds shall
be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance abuse
treatment pursuant to RCW 70.96A.090, treatment support services, and
for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation
of a drug court.
(a) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of
counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent on the
administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a
drug court.
(b) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of
counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for
treatment support services.
(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and
submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under
this section.
(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to
supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used
for substance abuse treatment.
(9) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW
2.28.170(3)(b).
(10) The authority under this section to use funds from the
criminal justice treatment account for the administrative and overhead
costs associated with the operation of a drug court expires June 30,
2013.

Sec. 147 RCW 72.09.350 and 1993 c 459 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of corrections and the University of Washington
may enter into a collaborative arrangement to provide improved services
for ((mentally ill)) offenders with mental illness with a focus on
prevention, treatment, and reintegration into society. The
participants in the collaborative arrangement may develop a strategic
plan within sixty days after May 17, 1993, to address the management of
((mentally ill)) offenders with mental illness within the correctional
system, facilitating their reentry into the community and the mental
health system, and preventing the inappropriate incarceration of
((mentally ill)) individuals with mental illness. The collaborative
arrangement may also specify the establishment and maintenance of a
corrections mental health center located at McNeil Island corrections
center. The collaborative arrangement shall require that an advisory
panel of key stakeholders be established and consulted throughout the
development and implementation of the center. The stakeholders
advisory panel shall include a broad array of interest groups drawn
from representatives of mental health, criminal justice, and
correctional systems. The stakeholders advisory panel shall include,
but is not limited to, membership from: The department of corrections,
the department of social and health services mental health division and
division of juvenile rehabilitation, regional support networks, local
and regional law enforcement agencies, ((the sentencing guidelines
commission,)) county and city jails, mental health advocacy groups for
((the mentally ill, developmentally disabled)) individuals with mental
illness, individuals with developmental disabilities, and traumatically
brain-injured, and the general public. The center established by the
department of corrections and University of Washington, in consultation
with the stakeholder advisory groups, shall have the authority to:
(a) Develop new and innovative treatment approaches for corrections
mental health clients;
(b) Improve the quality of mental health services within the
department and throughout the corrections system;
(c) Facilitate mental health staff recruitment and training to meet
departmental, county, and municipal needs;
(d) Expand research activities within the department in the area of
treatment services, the design of delivery systems, the development of
organizational models, and training for corrections mental health care
professionals;
(e) Improve the work environment for correctional employees by
developing the skills, knowledge, and understanding of how to work with
offenders with special chronic mental health challenges;
(f) Establish a more positive rehabilitative environment for
offenders;
(g) Strengthen multidisciplinary mental health collaboration
between the University of Washington, other groups committed to the
intent of this section, and the department of corrections;
(h) Strengthen department linkages between institutions of higher
education, public sector mental health systems, and county and
municipal corrections;
(i) Assist in the continued formulation of corrections mental
health policies;
(j) Develop innovative and effective recruitment and training
programs for correctional personnel working with ((mentally ill))
offenders with mental illness;
(k) Assist in the development of a coordinated continuum of mental
health care capable of providing services from corrections entry to
community return; and
(l) Evaluate all current and innovative approaches developed within
this center in terms of their effective and efficient achievement of
improved mental health of inmates, development and utilization of
personnel, the impact of these approaches on the functioning of
correctional institutions, and the relationship of the corrections
system to mental health and criminal justice systems. Specific
attention should be paid to evaluating the effects of programs on the
reintegration of ((mentally ill)) offenders with mental illness into
the community and the prevention of inappropriate incarceration of
((mentally ill)) persons with mental illness.
(2) The corrections mental health center may conduct research,
training, and treatment activities for the ((mentally ill)) offender
with mental illness within selected sites operated by the department.
The department shall provide support services for the center such as
food services, maintenance, perimeter security, classification,
offender supervision, and living unit functions. The University of
Washington may develop, implement, and evaluate the clinical,
treatment, research, and evaluation components of the mentally ill
offender center. The institute of (([for])) for public policy and
management may be consulted regarding the development of the center and
in the recommendations regarding public policy. As resources permit,
training within the center shall be available to state, county, and
municipal agencies requiring the services. Other state colleges, state
universities, and mental health providers may be involved in activities
as required on a subcontract basis. Community mental health
organizations, research groups, and community advocacy groups may be
critical components of the center's operations and involved as
appropriate to annual objectives. ((Mentally ill)) Clients with mental
illness may be drawn from throughout the department's population and
transferred to the center as clinical need, available services, and
department jurisdiction permits.
(3) The department shall prepare a report of the center's progress
toward the attainment of stated goals and provide the report to the
legislature annually.

Sec. 148 RCW 72.66.016 and 1983 c 255 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A furlough shall not be granted to a resident if the furlough
would commence prior to the time the resident has served the minimum
amounts of time provided under this section:
(a) If his or her minimum term of imprisonment is longer than
twelve months, he or she shall have served at least six months of the
term;
(b) If his or her minimum term of imprisonment is less than twelve
months, he or she shall have served at least ninety days and shall have
no longer than six months left to serve on his or her minimum term;
(c) If he or she is serving a mandatory minimum term of
confinement, he or she shall have served all but the last six months of
such term.
(2) A person convicted and sentenced for a violent offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030 is not eligible for furlough until the person
has served at least one-half of the minimum term ((as established by
the board of prison terms and paroles or the sentencing guidelines
commission)).

State Noxious Weed Control Board
NEW SECTION. Sec. 149 RCW 17.10.030 (State noxious weed control
board -- Members -- Terms -- Elections -- Meetings -- Reimbursement for travel
expenses) and 1997 c 353 s 4, 1987 c 438 s 2, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34
s 23, & 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 3 are each repealed.

Sec. 150 RCW 17.10.010 and 1997 c 353 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Noxious weed" means a plant that when established is highly
destructive, competitive, or difficult to control by cultural or
chemical practices.
(2) "State noxious weed list" means a list of noxious weeds adopted
by the ((state noxious weed control board)) department. The list is
divided into three classes:
(a) Class A consists of those noxious weeds not native to the state
that are of limited distribution or are unrecorded in the state and
that pose a serious threat to the state;
(b) Class B consists of those noxious weeds not native to the state
that are of limited distribution or are unrecorded in a region of the
state and that pose a serious threat to that region;
(c) Class C consists of any other noxious weeds.
(3) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, firm,
the state or any department, agency, or subdivision thereof, or any
other entity.
(4) "Owner" means the person in actual control of property, or his
or her agent, whether the control is based on legal or equitable title
or on any other interest entitling the holder to possession and, for
purposes of liability, pursuant to RCW 17.10.170 or 17.10.210, means
the possessor of legal or equitable title or the possessor of an
easement: PROVIDED, That when the possessor of an easement has the
right to control or limit the growth of vegetation within the
boundaries of an easement, only the possessor of the easement is
deemed, for the purpose of this chapter, an "owner" of the property
within the boundaries of the easement.
(5) As pertains to the duty of an owner, the words "control",
"contain", "eradicate", and the term "prevent the spread of noxious
weeds" means conforming to the standards of noxious weed control or
prevention in this chapter or as adopted by rule in chapter 16-750 WAC
by the ((state noxious weed control board)) department and an activated
county noxious weed control board.
(6) "Agent" means any occupant or any other person acting for the
owner and working or in charge of the land.
(7) "Agricultural purposes" are those that are intended to provide
for the growth and harvest of food and fiber.
(8) "Director" means the director of the department of agriculture
or the director's appointed representative.
(9) "Weed district" means a weed district as defined in chapters
17.04 and 17.06 RCW.
(10) "Aquatic noxious weed" means an aquatic plant species that is
listed on the state weed list under RCW 17.10.080.
(11) "Screenings" means a mixture of mill or elevator run mixture
or a combination of varying amounts of materials obtained in the
process of cleaning either grain or seeds, or both, such as light or
broken grain or seed, weed seeds, hulls, chaff, joints, straw, elevator
dust, floor sweepings, sand, and dirt.
(12) "Department" means the department of agriculture.

Sec. 151 RCW 17.10.040 and 1997 c 353 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
An inactive county noxious weed control board may be activated by
any one of the following methods:
(1) Either within sixty days after a petition is filed by one
hundred registered voters within the county or, on its own motion, the
county legislative authority shall hold a hearing to determine whether
there is a need, due to a damaging infestation of noxious weeds, to
activate the county noxious weed control board. If such a need is
found to exist, then the county legislative authority shall, in the
manner provided by RCW 17.10.050, appoint five persons to the county's
noxious weed control board.
(2) If the county's noxious weed control board is not activated
within one year following a hearing by the county legislative authority
to determine the need for activation, then upon the filing with the
((state noxious weed control board)) department of a petition comprised
either of the signatures of at least two hundred registered voters
within the county, or of the signatures of a majority of an adjacent
county's noxious weed control board, the ((state board)) director
shall, within six months of the date of the filing, hold a hearing in
the county to determine the need for activation. If a need for
activation is found to exist, then the ((state board)) director shall
order the county legislative authority to activate the county's noxious
weed control board and to appoint members to the board in the manner
provided by RCW 17.10.050.
(3) The director((, upon request of the state noxious weed control
board,)) shall order a county legislative authority to activate the
noxious weed control board immediately if an infestation of a class A
noxious weed or class B noxious weed designated for control on the
state noxious weed list is confirmed in that county. The county
legislative authority may, as an alternative to activating the noxious
weed board, combat the class A noxious weed or class B noxious weed
with county resources and personnel operating with the authorities and
responsibilities imposed by this chapter on a county noxious weed
control board. No county may continue without a noxious weed control
board for a second consecutive year if the class A noxious weed or
class B noxious weed has not been eradicated.

Sec. 152 RCW 17.10.070 and 1998 c 245 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) In addition to the powers conferred on the state noxious weed
control board under other provisions of this chapter, it has the power
to:
(a) Employ a state noxious weed control board executive secretary,
and additional persons as it deems necessary, to disseminate
information relating to noxious weeds to county noxious weed control
boards and weed districts, to coordinate the educational and weed
control efforts of the various county and regional noxious weed control
boards and weed districts, and to assist the board in carrying out its
responsibilities;
(b) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules, pursuant to the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as may be necessary to carry out the
duties and authorities assigned to the board by this chapter.
(2))) The ((state noxious weed control board)) department shall
provide a written report before January 1st of each odd-numbered year
to the county noxious weed control boards and the weed districts
showing the expenditure of state funds on noxious weed control;
specifically how the funds were spent; the status of the state, county,
and district programs; and recommendations for the continued best use
of state funds for noxious weed control. The report shall include
recommendations as to the long-term needs regarding weed control.

Sec. 153 RCW 17.10.074 and 1997 c 353 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to the powers conferred on the director under other
provisions of this chapter, the director((, with the advice of the
state noxious weed control board,)) has power to:
(a) Require the county legislative authority or the noxious weed
control board of any county or any weed district to report to it
concerning the presence, absence, or estimated amount of noxious weeds
and measures, if any, taken or planned for the control thereof;
(b) Employ staff as may be necessary in the administration of this
chapter;
(c) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules, pursuant to the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as may be necessary to carry out this
chapter;
(d) Do such things as may be necessary and incidental to the
administration of its functions pursuant to this chapter including but
not limited to surveying for and detecting noxious weed infestations;
(e) Upon receipt of a complaint signed by a majority of the members
of an adjacent county noxious weed control board or weed district, or
by one hundred registered voters that are land owners within the
county, require the county legislative authority or noxious weed
control board of the county or weed district that is the subject of the
complaint to respond to the complaint within forty-five days with a
plan for the control of the noxious weeds cited in the complaint;
(f) If the complaint in (e) of this subsection involves a class A
or class B noxious weed, order the county legislative authority,
noxious weed control board, or weed district to take immediate action
to eradicate or control the noxious weed infestation. If the county or
the weed district does not take action to control the noxious weed
infestation in accordance with the order, the director may control it
or cause it to be controlled. The county or weed district is liable
for payment of the expense of the control work including necessary
costs and expenses for attorneys' fees incurred by the director in
securing payment from the county or weed district. The director may
bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to collect
the expenses of the control work, costs, and attorneys' fees;
(g) In counties without an activated noxious weed control board,
enter upon any property as provided for in RCW 17.10.160, issue or
cause to be issued notices and citations and take the necessary action
to control noxious weeds as provided in RCW 17.10.170, hold hearings on
any charge or cost of control action taken as provided for in RCW
17.10.180, issue a notice of civil infraction as provided for in RCW
17.10.230 ((and)), 17.10.310 ((through [and])), and 17.10.350, and
place a lien on any property pursuant to RCW 17.10.280, 17.10.290, and
17.10.300 with the same authorities and responsibilities imposed by
these sections on county noxious weed control boards;
(h) Adopt a list of noxious weed seeds and toxic weeds which shall
be controlled in designated articles, products, or feed stuffs as
provided for in RCW 17.10.235.
(2) The moneys appropriated for noxious weed control to the
department shall be used for ((administration of the state noxious weed
control board,)) the administration of the director's powers under this
chapter, the purchase of materials for controlling, containing, or
eradicating noxious weeds, the purchase or collection of biological
control agents for controlling noxious weeds, and the contracting for
services to carry out the purposes of this chapter. In a county with
an activated noxious weed control board, the director shall make every
effort to contract with that board for the needed services.
(((3) If the director determines the need to reallocate funds
previously designated for county use, the director shall convene a
meeting of the state noxious weed control board to seek its advice
concerning any reallocation.))

Sec. 154 RCW 17.10.080 and 1997 c 353 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((state noxious weed control board)) department shall each
year or more often, following a hearing, adopt a state noxious weed
list.
(2) Any person may request during a comment period established by
the ((state weed board)) director the inclusion, deletion, or
designation change of any plant to the state noxious weed list.
(3) The ((state noxious weed control board)) department shall send
a copy of the list to each activated county noxious weed control board,
to each weed district, and to the county legislative authority of each
county with an inactive noxious weed control board.
(4) The record of rule making must include the written findings of
the ((board)) department for the inclusion of each plant on the list.
The findings shall be made available upon request to any interested
person.

Sec. 155 RCW 17.10.090 and 1997 c 353 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each county noxious weed control board shall, within ninety days of
the adoption of the state noxious weed list ((from)) by the ((state
noxious weed control board)) department and following a hearing, select
those weeds from the class C list and those weeds from the class B list
not designated for control in the noxious weed control region in which
the county lies that it finds necessary to be controlled in the county.
The weeds thus selected and all class A weeds and those class B weeds
that have been designated for control in the noxious weed control
region in which the county lies shall be classified within that county
as noxious weeds, and those weeds comprise the county noxious weed
list.

Sec. 156 RCW 17.10.100 and 1997 c 353 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Where any of the following occur, the ((state noxious weed control
board)) director may, following a hearing, order any county noxious
weed control board or weed district to include a noxious weed from the
((state board's)) department's list in the county's noxious weed list:
(1) Where the ((state noxious weed control board)) department
receives a petition from at least one hundred registered voters within
the county requesting that the weed be listed.
(2) Where the ((state noxious weed control board)) department
receives a request for inclusion from an adjacent county's noxious weed
control board or weed district, which the adjacent board or district
has included that weed in its county list, and the adjacent board or
weed district alleges that its noxious weed control program is being
hampered by the failure to include the weed on the county's noxious
weed list.

Sec. 157 RCW 17.10.130 and 1997 c 353 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The powers and duties of a regional noxious weed control board are
as follows:
(1) The regional board shall, within ninety days of the adoption of
the state noxious weed list ((from)) by the ((state noxious weed
control board)) department and following a hearing, select those weeds
from the state list that it finds necessary to be controlled on a
regional basis. The weeds thus selected shall also be contained in the
county noxious weed list of each county in the region.
(2) The regional board shall take action as may be necessary to
coordinate the noxious weed control programs of the region and adopt a
regional plan for the control of noxious weeds.

Sec. 158 RCW 17.10.160 and 1997 c 353 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any authorized agent or employee of the county noxious weed control
board ((or of the state noxious weed control board)) or of the
department ((of agriculture)) where not otherwise proscribed by law may
enter upon any property for the purpose of administering this chapter
and any power exercisable pursuant thereto, including the taking of
specimens of weeds, general inspection, and the performance of
eradication or control work. Prior to carrying out the purpose for
which the entry is made, the official making such entry or someone in
his or her behalf, shall make a reasonable attempt to notify the owner
of the property as to the purpose and need for the entry.
(1) When there is probable cause to believe that there is property
within this state not otherwise exempt from process or execution upon
which noxious weeds are standing or growing and the owner refuses
permission to inspect the property, a judge of the superior court or
district court in the county in which the property is located may, upon
the request of the county noxious weed control board or its agent,
issue a warrant directed to the board or agent authorizing the taking
of specimens of weeds or other materials, general inspection, and the
performance of eradication or control work.
(2) Application for issuance and execution and return of the
warrant authorized by this section shall be in accordance with the
applicable rules of the superior court or the district courts.
(3) Nothing in this section requires the application for and
issuance of any warrant not otherwise required by law: PROVIDED, That
civil liability for negligence shall lie in any case in which entry and
any of the activities connected therewith are not undertaken with
reasonable care.
(4) Any person who improperly prevents or threatens to prevent
entry upon land as authorized in this section or any person who
interferes with the carrying out of this chapter shall be upon
conviction guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 159 RCW 17.10.201 and 1997 c 353 s 34 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((state noxious weed control board)) department shall:
(a) Work with the various federal and tribal land management
agencies to coordinate state and federal noxious weed control;
(b) Encourage the various federal and tribal land management
agencies to devote more time and resources to noxious weed control; and
(c) Assist the various federal and tribal land management agencies
by seeking adequate funding for noxious weed control.
(2) County noxious weed control boards and weed districts shall
work with the various federal and tribal land management agencies in
each county in order to:
(a) Identify new noxious weed infestations;
(b) Outline and plan necessary noxious weed control actions;
(c) Develop coordinated noxious weed control programs; and
(d) Notify local federal and tribal agency land managers of noxious
weed infestations.
(3) The department ((of agriculture)), county noxious weed control
boards, and weed districts are authorized to enter federal lands, with
the approval of the appropriate federal agency, to survey for and
control noxious weeds where control measures of a type and extent
required under this chapter have not been taken.
(4) The department ((of agriculture)), county noxious weed control
boards, and weed districts may bill the federal land management agency
that manages the land for all costs of the noxious weed control
performed on federal land. If not paid by the federal agency that
manages the land, the cost of the noxious weed control on federal land
may be paid from any funds available to the county noxious weed control
board or weed district that performed the noxious weed control.
Alternatively, the costs of noxious weed control on federal land may be
paid from any funds specifically appropriated to the department of
agriculture for that purpose.
(5) The department ((of agriculture)), county noxious weed control
boards, and weed districts are authorized to enter into any reasonable
agreement with the appropriate authorities for the control of noxious
weeds on federal or tribal lands.
(6) The department ((of agriculture)), county noxious weed control
boards, and weed districts shall consult with state agencies managing
federal land concerning noxious weed infestation and control programs.

Sec. 160 RCW 17.10.210 and 1997 c 353 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever the director, the county noxious weed control board,
or a weed district finds that a parcel of land is so seriously infested
with class A or class B noxious weeds that control measures cannot be
undertaken thereon without quarantining the land and restricting or
denying access thereto or use thereof, the director, the county noxious
weed control board, or weed district, with the approval of the director
of the department ((of agriculture)), may issue an order for the
quarantine and restriction or denial of access or use. Upon issuance
of the order, the director, the county noxious weed control board, or
the weed district shall commence necessary control measures and may
institute legal action for the collection of costs for control work,
which may include attorneys' fees and the costs of other appropriate
actions.
(2) An order of quarantine shall be served, by any method
sufficient for the service of civil process, on all persons known to
qualify as owners of the land within the meaning of this chapter.
(3) The director shall((, with the advice of the state noxious weed
control board,)) determine how the expense of control work undertaken
pursuant to this section, and the cost of any quarantine in connection
therewith, is apportioned.

Sec. 161 RCW 17.10.235 and 1997 c 353 s 26 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director ((of agriculture)) shall adopt((, with the advice
of the state noxious weed control board,)) rules designating noxious
weed seeds which shall be controlled in products, screenings, or
articles to prevent the spread of noxious weeds. The rules shall
identify the products, screenings, and articles in which the seeds must
be controlled and the maximum amount of the seed to be permitted in the
product, screenings, or article to avoid a hazard of spreading the
noxious weed by seed from the product, screenings, or article. The
director shall also adopt((, with the advice of the state board,))
rules designating toxic weeds which shall be controlled in feed stuffs
and screenings to prevent injury to the animal that consumes the feed.
The rules shall identify the feed stuffs and screenings in which the
toxic weeds must be controlled and the maximum amount of the toxic weed
to be permitted in the feed. Rules developed under this section shall
identify ways that products, screenings, articles, or feed stuffs
containing noxious weed seeds or toxic weeds can be made available for
beneficial uses.
(2) Any person who knowingly or negligently sells or otherwise
distributes a product, article, screenings, or feed stuff designated by
rule containing noxious weed seeds or toxic weeds designated for
control by rule and in an amount greater than the amount established by
the director for the seed or weed by rule is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(3) The department ((of agriculture shall)), upon request of the
buyer, inspect products, screenings, articles, or feed stuffs
designated by rule and charge fees, in accordance with chapter
((22.09)) 17.24 RCW, to determine the presence of designated noxious
((weed seeds or toxic)) weeds.

Sec. 162 RCW 17.10.250 and 1997 c 353 s 28 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislative authority of any county with an activated noxious
weed control board or the board of any weed district may apply to the
director for noxious weed control funds when informed by the director
that funds are available. Any applicant must employ adequate
administrative personnel to supervise an effective weed control program
as determined by the director ((with advice from the state noxious weed
control board)). The director ((with advice from the state noxious
weed control board)) shall adopt rules on the distribution and use of
noxious weed control account funds.

Sec. 163 RCW 17.10.260 and 1987 c 438 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
The administrative powers granted under this chapter to the
director ((of the department of agriculture and to the state noxious
weed control board)) shall be exercised in conformity with the
provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as
now or hereafter amended. The use of any substance to control noxious
weeds shall be subject to the provisions of the water pollution control
act, chapter 90.48 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, the Washington
pesticide control act, chapter 15.58 RCW, and the Washington pesticide
application act, chapter 17.21 RCW.

Sec. 164 RCW 17.10.350 and 2003 c 53 s 117 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person found to have committed a civil infraction under
this chapter shall be assessed a monetary penalty not to exceed one
thousand dollars. The ((state noxious weed control board)) director
shall adopt a schedule of monetary penalties for each violation of this
chapter classified as a civil infraction and submit the schedule to the
appropriate court. If a monetary penalty is imposed by the court, the
penalty is immediately due and payable. The court may, at its
discretion, grant an extension of time, not to exceed thirty days, in
which the penalty must be paid.
(2) Failure to pay any monetary penalties imposed under this
chapter is punishable as a misdemeanor.

Sec. 165 RCW 17.15.020 and 1997 c 357 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each of the following state agencies or institutions shall
implement integrated pest management practices when carrying out the
agency's or institution's duties related to pest control:
(1) The department of agriculture;
(2) ((The state noxious weed control board;
(3))) The department of ecology;
(((4))) (3) The department of fish and wildlife;
(((5))) (4) The department of transportation;
(((6))) (5) The parks and recreation commission;
(((7))) (6) The department of natural resources;
(((8))) (7) The department of corrections;
(((9))) (8) The department of general administration; and
(((10))) (9) Each state institution of higher education, for the
institution's own building and grounds maintenance.

Sec. 166 RCW 17.26.006 and 1995 c 255 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
This state is facing an environmental disaster that will affect
other states as well as other nations. The legislature finds that six
years is sufficient time for state agencies to debate solutions to the
spartina and purple loosestrife problems that are occurring in state
waters. One of the purposes of chapter 255, Laws of 1995 is to focus
agency action on control and future eradication of spartina and purple
loosestrife. It is the mandate of the legislature that one state
agency, the department of agriculture, be responsible for a unified
effort to eliminate spartina and control purple loosestrife((, with the
advice of the state noxious weed control board,)) and that state agency
shall be directly accountable to the legislature on the progress of the
spartina eradication and purple loosestrife control program.

Sec. 167 RCW 17.26.015 and 1998 c 245 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state department of agriculture is the lead agency for the
control of spartina and purple loosestrife ((with the advice of the
state noxious weed control board)).
(2) Responsibilities of the lead agency include:
(a) Coordination of the control program including memorandums of
understanding, contracts, and agreements with local, state, federal,
and tribal governmental entities and private parties;
(b) Preparation of a statewide spartina management plan utilizing
integrated vegetation management strategies that encompass all of
Washington's tidelands. The plan shall be developed in cooperation
with local, state, federal, and tribal governments, private landowners,
and concerned citizens. The plan shall prioritize areas for control.
Nothing in this subsection prohibits the department from taking action
to control spartina in a particular area of the state in accordance
with a plan previously prepared by the state while preparing the
statewide plan;
(c) Directing on the ground control efforts that include, but are
not limited to: (i) Control work and contracts; (ii) spartina survey;
(iii) collection and maintenance of spartina location data; (iv)
purchasing equipment, goods, and services; (v) survey of threatened and
endangered species; and (vi) site-specific environmental information
and documents; and
(d) Evaluating the effectiveness of the control efforts.
((The lead agency shall report to the appropriate standing
committees of the house of representatives and the senate no later than
December 15th of each year through the year 1999 on the progress of the
program, the number of acres treated by various methods of control, and
on the funds spent.))

Sec. 168 RCW 77.60.130 and 2007 c 341 s 59 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The aquatic nuisance species committee is created for the
purpose of fostering state, federal, tribal, and private cooperation on
aquatic nuisance species issues. The mission of the committee is to
minimize the unauthorized or accidental introduction of nonnative
aquatic species and give special emphasis to preventing the
introduction and spread of aquatic nuisance species. The term "aquatic
nuisance species" means a nonnative aquatic plant or animal species
that threatens the diversity or abundance of native species, the
ecological stability of infested waters, or commercial, agricultural,
or recreational activities dependent on such waters.
(2) The committee consists of representatives from each of the
following state agencies: Department of fish and wildlife, department
of ecology, department of agriculture, department of health, department
of natural resources, Puget Sound partnership, state patrol, ((state
noxious weed control board,)) and Washington sea grant program. The
committee shall encourage and solicit participation by: Federally
recognized tribes of Washington, federal agencies, Washington
conservation organizations, environmental groups, and representatives
from industries that may either be affected by the introduction of an
aquatic nuisance species or that may serve as a pathway for their
introduction.
(3) The committee has the following duties:
(a) Periodically revise the state of Washington aquatic nuisance
species management plan, originally published in June 1998;
(b) Make recommendations to the legislature on statutory provisions
for classifying and regulating aquatic nuisance species;
(c) Recommend to the ((state noxious weed control board))
department of agriculture that a plant be classified under the process
designated by RCW 17.10.080 as an aquatic noxious weed;
(d) Coordinate education, research, regulatory authorities,
monitoring and control programs, and participate in regional and
national efforts regarding aquatic nuisance species;
(e) Consult with representatives from industries and other
activities that may serve as a pathway for the introduction of aquatic
nuisance species to develop practical strategies that will minimize the
risk of new introductions; and
(f) Prepare a biennial report to the legislature with the first
report due by December 1, 2001, making recommendations for better
accomplishing the purposes of this chapter, and listing the
accomplishments of this chapter to date.
(4) The committee shall accomplish its duties through the authority
and cooperation of its member agencies. Implementation of all plans
and programs developed by the committee shall be through the member
agencies and other cooperating organizations.

Sec. 169 RCW 79A.25.320 and 2006 c 152 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Membership in the council includes a representative from the
following entities:
(a) The department of agriculture, represented by the director or
the director's designee;
(b) The department of fish and wildlife, represented by the
director or the director's designee;
(c) The department of ecology, represented by the director or the
director's designee;
(d) The department of natural resources, represented by the
commissioner or the commissioner's designee;
(e) The department of transportation, represented by the secretary
or the secretary's designee;
(f) ((The Washington state noxious weed control board, appointed by
the board;
(g))) A county located east of the crest of the Cascade mountains,
appointed by the other members of the council; and
(((h))) (g) A county located west of the crest of the Cascade
mountains, appointed by the other members of the council.
(2) The councilmembers may add members to the council as the
councilmembers deem appropriate to accomplish its goals.
(3) The council must invite one representative each from the United
States department of agriculture, the United States fish and wildlife
service, the United States environmental protection agency, and the
United States coast guard to participate on the council in a nonvoting,
ex officio capacity.
(4) A representative of the office of the governor must convene the
first meeting of the council and serve as chair until the council
selects a chair. At the first meeting of the council, the council
shall address issues including, but not limited to, voting methods,
meeting schedules, and the need for and use of advisory and technical
committees.

Sec. 170 RCW 79A.25.340 and 2006 c 152 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The council shall develop and periodically update a statewide
strategic plan for addressing invasive species. The strategic plan
should incorporate the reports and activities of the aquatic nuisance
species committee, the ((state noxious weed control board)) department
of agriculture, and other appropriate reports and activities. In
addition, the council must coordinate with the biodiversity council
created in Executive Order 04-02 to ensure that a statewide strategy
for the control of invasive species is integrated into the thirty-year
strategy for biodiversity conservation that the biodiversity council
must submit to the legislature in 2007.
(2) The strategic plan must, at a minimum, address:
(a) Statewide coordination and intergovernmental cooperation;
(b) Prevention of new biological invasions through deliberate or
unintentional introduction;
(c) Inventory and monitoring of invasive species;
(d) Early detection of and rapid response to new invasions;
(e) Control, management, and eradication of established populations
of invasive species;
(f) Projects that can be implemented during the period covered by
the strategic plan for the control, management, and eradication of new
or established populations of invasive species;
(g) Revegetation, reclamation, or restoration of native species
following control or eradication of invasive species;
(h) Tools that can be made available to assist state agencies that
are responsible for managing public land to control invasive noxious
weeds and recommendations as to how the agencies should be held
responsible for the failure to control invasive noxious weeds;
(i) Research and public education;
(j) Funding and resources available for invasive species
prevention, control, and management; and
(k) Recommendations for legislation necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.
(3) The strategic plan must be updated at least once every three
years following its initial development. The strategic plan must be
submitted to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature
by September 15th of each applicable year. The council shall complete
the initial strategic plan within two years of June 7, 2006.
(4) Each state department and agency named to the council shall,
consistent with state law, make best efforts to implement elements of
the completed plan that are applicable to the department or agency.

Well Drilling Technical Advisory Group
NEW SECTION. Sec. 171 RCW 18.104.190 (Technical advisory group)
and 2005 c 84 s 8 & 1993 c 387 s 25 are each repealed.

Sec. 172 RCW 18.104.040 and 1993 c 387 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall have the power:
(1) To issue, deny, suspend or revoke licenses pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter;
(2) At all reasonable times, to enter upon lands for the purpose of
inspecting, taking measurements from, or tagging any well, constructed
or being constructed;
(3) To call upon or receive professional or technical advice from
the department of health((, the technical advisory group created in RCW
18.104.190,)) or any other public agency or person;
(4) To adopt rules, in consultation with the department of health
((and the technical advisory group created in RCW 18.104.190, governing
licensing and well construction)), as may be appropriate to carry out
the purposes of this chapter. The rules adopted by the department may
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Standards for the construction and maintenance of wells and
their casings;
(b) Methods of capping, sealing, and decommissioning wells to
prevent contamination of groundwater resources and to protect public
health and safety;
(c) Methods of artificial recharge of groundwater bodies and of
construction of wells which insure separation of individual water
bearing formations;
(d) The manner of conducting and the content of examinations
required to be taken by applicants for license hereunder;
(e) Requirements for the filing of notices of intent, well reports,
and the payment of fees;
(f) Reporting requirements of well contractors;
(g) Limitations on well construction in areas identified by the
department as requiring intensive control of withdrawals in the
interests of sound management of the groundwater resource;
(5) To require the operator in the construction of a well and the
property owner in the maintenance of a well to guard against waste and
contamination of the groundwater resources;
(6) To require the operator to place a well identification tag on
a new well and on an existing well on which work is performed after the
effective date of rules requiring well identification tags and to place
or require the owner to place a well identification tag on an existing
well;
(7) To require the well owner to repair or decommission any well:
(a) That is abandoned, unusable, or not intended for future use; or
(b) That is an environmental, safety, or public health hazard.

Sec. 173 RCW 18.104.043 and 2005 c 84 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If requested in writing by the governing body of a local health
district or county, the department by memorandum of agreement may
delegate to the governing body the authority to administer and enforce
the well tagging, sealing, and decommissioning portions of the water
well construction program.
(2) The department shall determine whether a local health district
or county that seeks delegation under this section has the resources,
capability, and expertise, including qualified field inspectors, to
administer the delegated program. If the department determines the
local government has these resources, it shall notify well contractors
and operators of the proposal. The department shall accept written
comments on the proposal for sixty days after the notice is mailed.
(3) If the department determines that a delegation of authority to
a local health district or county to administer and enforce the well
sealing and decommissioning portions of the water well construction
program will enhance the public health and safety and the environment,
the department and the local governing body may enter into a memorandum
of agreement setting forth the specific authorities delegated by the
department to the local governing body. The memorandum of agreement
must be, at a minimum, reviewed annually. The department((, in
consultation with the technical advisory group, created under RCW
18.104.190,)) shall adopt rules outlining the annual review and
reporting process. A detailed summary of the review must be made
available to well contractors and operators upon request and be
published on the department's web site.
(4) With regard to the portions of the water well construction
program delegated under this section, the local governing agency shall
exercise only the authority delegated to it under this section. If,
after a public hearing, the department determines that a local
governing body is not administering the program in accordance with this
chapter, it shall notify the local governing body of the deficiencies.
If corrective action is not taken within a reasonable time, not to
exceed sixty days, the department by order shall withdraw the
delegation of authority.
(5) The department shall promptly furnish the local governing body
with a copy of each water well report and notification of start cards
received in the area covered by a delegated program.
(6) The department and the local governing body shall coordinate to
reduce duplication of effort and shall share all appropriate
information including technical reports, violations, and well reports.
(7) Any person aggrieved by a decision of a local health district
or county under a delegated program may appeal the decision to the
department. The department's decision is subject to review by the
pollution control hearings board as provided in RCW 43.21B.110.
(8) The department shall not delegate the authority to license well
contractors, renew licenses, receive notices of intent to commence
constructing a well, receive well reports, or collect state fees
provided for in this chapter.

Sec. 174 RCW 18.104.049 and 1993 c 387 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department by rule shall adopt procedures to permit a well
operator to modify construction standards to meet unforeseen
circumstances encountered during the construction of a well. ((The
procedures shall be developed in consultation with the technical
advisory group established in RCW 18.104.190.))

Sec. 175 RCW 18.104.100 and 2005 c 84 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall be renewed every
two years. A license shall be renewed upon payment of a renewal fee
and completion of continuing education requirements and receipt of a
completed license renewal application. If a licensee fails to submit
an application for renewal, the renewal fee, and proof of completion of
the required continuing education, the license shall be suspended at
the end of its effective term. The licensee is not allowed to perform
work authorized by their license during the time that it is suspended.
The licensee is allowed thirty days to submit an application for
renewal, the renewal fee, and proof of completion of the required
continuing education for the renewal period. Continuing education
obtained during the thirty-day suspension period may be applied only to
the next renewal period. If a licensee fails to submit an application
for renewal, the renewal fee, and proof of completion of the required
continuing education by the end of the thirty-day suspension period,
the license expires. The department shall adopt rules((, in
consultation with the technical advisory group created under RCW
18.104.190,)) that allow for an extension of the thirty-day suspension
period for certain situations that are beyond the control of the
licensee. The rules must also allow for a retirement or inactive
license.
(2) A person whose license has expired must apply for a new license
as provided in this chapter. The department may waive the requirement
for a written examination and on-site testing for a person whose
license has expired.
(3) The department may refuse to renew a license if the licensee
has not complied with an order issued by the department or has not paid
a penalty imposed in accordance with this chapter, unless the order or
penalty is under appeal.
(4) The department may issue a conditional license to enable a
former licensee to comply with an order to correct problems with a
well.

Sec. 176 RCW 18.104.200 and 2005 c 84 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person seeking a new license or to renew an existing license
under this chapter must demonstrate a willingness to maintain a high
level of professional competency by completing continuing education
programs as required by the department by rule. The department shall
not approve any continuing education program unless: (a) It is offered
by an approved provider; (b) it is open to all persons licensed or
pursuing a license under this chapter; and (c) the fees charged are
reasonable for all persons desiring to attend the program.
(2) The department((, in consultation with the technical advisory
group created in RCW 18.104.190,)) shall adopt rules governing
continuing education programs. At a minimum, the rules must establish:
A method of approving providers of continuing education; a criteria to
evaluate the offerings, workshops, courses, classes, or programs; a
criteria for assigning credits; and a criteria for reporting and
verifying completion.
(3) The department shall support approved providers by providing,
upon request and at the department's discretion, technical assistance
and presenters for continuing education offerings.
(4) The department shall maintain a current list of all continuing
education offerings by approved providers and ensure that the list is
available to all licensees by request. The list must also be posted on
the department's web site.

Workforce Training Customer Advisory Committee
Sec. 177 RCW 28C.04.390 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 24 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The college board worker retraining program funds shall be
used for training programs and related support services, including
financial aid, counseling, referral to training resources, job
referral, and job development that:
(a) Are consistent with the unified plan for workforce development;
(b) Provide increased enrollments for dislocated workers;
(c) Provide customized training opportunities for dislocated
workers; and
(d) Provide increased enrollments and support services, including
financial aid for those students not receiving unemployment insurance
benefits, that do not replace or supplant any existing enrollments,
programs, support services, or funding sources.
(2) The college board shall develop a plan for use of the worker
retraining program funds in conjunction with the workforce training
customer advisory committee established in subsection (3) of this
section. In developing the plan the college board shall:
(a) Provide that applicants for worker retraining program funds
shall solicit financial support for training programs and give priority
in receipt of funds to those applicants which are most successful in
matching public dollars with financial support;
(b) Provide that applicants for worker retraining program funds
shall develop training programs in partnership with local businesses,
industry associations, labor, and other partners as appropriate and
give priority in receipt of funds to those applicants who develop
customized training programs in partnership with local businesses,
industry associations, and labor organizations;
(c) Give priority in receipt of funds to those applicants serving
rural areas;
(d) Ensure that applicants receiving worker retraining program
funds gather information from local workforce development councils on
employer workforce needs, including the needs of businesses with less
than twenty-five employees;
(e) Provide for specialized vocational training at a private career
school or college at the request of a recipient eligible under
subsection (1)(b) of this section. Available tuition for the training
is limited to the amount that would otherwise be payable per enrolled
quarter to a public institution; and
(f) Give priority in receipt of funds to those applicants working
toward careers in the aerospace, health care, advanced manufacturing,
construction, forest product, and renewable energy industries; high-demand occupations in strategic industry clusters identified in the
state comprehensive plan and the workforce development councils' local
comprehensive plans for workforce educational training as identified in
RCW 28C.18.080 and 28C.18.150; and occupations and industries
identified by community and technical colleges in collaboration with
local workforce development councils. For purposes of this section,
health care includes long-term care.
(((3) The executive director of the college board shall appoint a
workforce training customer advisory committee by July 1, 1999, to:
(a) Assist in the development of the plan for the use of the
college board worker retraining program funds and recommend guidelines
to the college board for the operation of worker retraining programs;
(b) Recommend selection criteria for worker retraining programs and
grant applicants for receipt of worker retraining program grants;
(c) Provide advice to the college board on other workforce
development activities of the community and technical colleges;
(d) Recommend selection criteria for job skills grants, consistent
with criteria established in this chapter and chapter 121, Laws of
1999. Such criteria shall include a prioritization of job skills
applicants in rural areas;
(e) Recommend guidelines to the college board for the operation of
the job skills program; and
(f) Recommend grant applicants for receipt of job skills program
grants.
(4) Members of the workforce training customer advisory committee
shall consist of three college system representatives selected by the
executive director of the college board, three representatives of
business selected from nominations provided by statewide business
organizations, and three representatives of labor selected from
nominations provided by a statewide labor organization representing a
cross-section of workers in the state.))

Sec. 178 RCW 28C.04.420 and 2009 c 554 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The college board may, subject to appropriation from the
legislature or from funds made available from any other public or
private source and pursuant to rules adopted by the college board
((with the advice of the workforce training customer advisory committee
established in RCW 28C.04.390)), provide job skills grants to
educational institutions. The job skills grants shall be used
exclusively for programs which are consistent with the job skills
program. The college board shall work ((in collaboration with the
workforce training customer advisory committee established in RCW
28C.04.390)) to assure that:
(1) The program is within the scope of the job skills program under
this chapter and may reasonably be expected to succeed and thereby
increase employment within the state;
(2) Provision has been made to use any available alternative
funding from local, state, and federal sources;
(3) The job skills grant will only be used to cover the costs
associated with the program;
(4) The program will not unnecessarily duplicate existing programs
and could not be provided by another educational institution more
effectively or efficiently;
(5) The program involves an area of skills training and education
for which there is a demonstrable need;
(6) The applicant has made provisions for the use of existing
federal and state resources for student financial assistance;
(7) The job skills grant is essential to the success of the program
as the resources of the applicant are inadequate to attract the
technical assistance and financial support necessary for the program
from business and industry;
(8) The program represents a collaborative partnership between
business, industry, labor, educational institutions, and other
partners, as appropriate;
(9) The commitment of financial support from business and industry
shall be equal to or greater than the amount of the requested job
skills grant;
(10) The job skills program gives priority to applications:
(a) Proposing training that leads to transferable skills that are
interchangeable among different jobs, employers, or workplaces;
(b) From firms in strategic industry clusters as identified by the
state or local areas;
(c) Proposing coordination with other cluster-based programs or
initiatives including, but not limited to, industry skill panels,
centers of excellence, innovation partnership zones, state-supported
cluster growth grants, and local cluster-based economic development
initiatives;
(d) Proposing industry-based credentialing; and
(e) Proposing increased capacity for educational institutions that
can be made available to industry and students beyond the grant
recipients;
(11) Binding commitments have been made to the college board by the
applicant for adequate reporting of information and data regarding the
program to the college board, particularly information concerning the
recruitment and employment of trainees and students, and including a
requirement for an annual or other periodic audit of the books of the
applicant directly related to the program, and for such control on the
part of the college board as it considers prudent over the management
of the program, so as to protect the use of public funds, including, in
the discretion of the commission and without limitation, right of
access to financial and other records of the applicant directly related
to the programs; and
(12) A provision has been made by the applicant to work, in
cooperation with the employment security department, to identify and
screen potential trainees, and that provision has been made by the
applicant for the participation as trainees of low-income persons
including temporary assistance for needy families recipients,
dislocated workers, and persons from minority and economically
disadvantaged groups to participate in the program.
Beginning October 1, 1999, and every two years thereafter, the
college board shall provide the legislature and the governor with a
report describing the activities and outcomes of the state job skills
program.

Transfer of Appointment Authority
Sec. 179 RCW 18.106.110 and 2006 c 185 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created a state advisory board of plumbers, to be
composed of seven members appointed by the ((governor)) director. Two
members shall be journeyman plumbers, one member shall be a specialty
plumber, three members shall be persons conducting a plumbing business,
at least one of which shall be primarily engaged in a specialty
plumbing business, and one member from the general public who is
familiar with the business and trade of plumbing.
(2) The term of one journeyman plumber expires July 1, 1995; the
term of the second journeyman plumber expires July 1, 2000; the term of
the specialty plumber expires July 1, 2008; the term of one person
conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 1996; the term of the
second person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1, 2000; the
term of the third person conducting a plumbing business expires July 1,
2007; and the term of the public member expires July 1, 1997.
Thereafter, upon the expiration of said terms, the ((governor))
director shall appoint a new member to serve for a period of three
years. However, to ensure that the board can continue to act, a member
whose term expires shall continue to serve until his or her replacement
is appointed. In the case of any vacancy on the board for any reason,
the ((governor)) director shall appoint a new member to serve out the
term of the person whose position has become vacant.
(3) The advisory board shall carry out all the functions and duties
enumerated in this chapter, as well as generally advise the department
on all matters relative to this chapter.
(4) Each member of the advisory board shall receive travel expenses
in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now
existing or hereafter amended for each day in which such member is
actually engaged in attendance upon the meetings of the advisory board.

Sec. 180 RCW 49.04.010 and 2001 c 204 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The director of labor and industries shall appoint an
apprenticeship council, composed of three representatives each from
employer and employee organizations, respectively. The terms of office
of the members of the apprenticeship council first appointed by the
director of labor and industries shall be as follows: One
representative each of employers and employees shall be appointed for
one year, two years, and three years, respectively. Thereafter, each
member shall be appointed for a term of three years. The ((governor))
director of labor and industries shall also appoint a public member to
the apprenticeship council for a three-year term. ((The appointment of
the public member is subject to confirmation by the senate.)) Each
member shall hold office until a successor is appointed and has
qualified and any vacancy shall be filled by appointment for the
unexpired portion of the term. A designated representative from each
of the following: The workforce training and education coordinating
board, state board for community and technical colleges, employment
security department, and United States department of labor,
apprenticeship, training, employer, and labor services, shall be ex
officio members of the apprenticeship council. Ex officio members
shall have no vote. Each member of the council, not otherwise
compensated by public moneys, shall be reimbursed for travel expenses
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and shall be compensated
in accordance with RCW 43.03.240.
(2) The apprenticeship council is authorized to approve
apprenticeship programs, and establish apprenticeship program standards
as rules, including requirements for apprentice-related and
supplemental instruction, coordination of instruction with job
experiences, and instructor qualifications. The council shall consider
recommendations from the state board for community and technical
colleges on matters of apprentice-related and supplemental instruction,
coordination of instruction with job experiences, and instructor
qualifications. The rules for apprenticeship instructor qualifications
shall either be by reference or reasonably similar to the applicable
requirements established by or pursuant to chapter 28B.50 RCW. The
council is further authorized to issue such rules as may be necessary
to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter, including a
procedure to resolve an impasse should a tie vote of the council occur,
and perform such other duties as are hereinafter imposed.
(3) Not less than once a year the apprenticeship council shall make
a report to the director of labor and industries of its activities and
findings which shall be available to the public.

Sec. 181 RCW 36.93.051 and 1991 c 363 s 93 are each amended to
read as follows:
The boundary review board in each county with a population of one
million or more shall consist of eleven members chosen as follows:
(1) ((Three persons shall be appointed by the governor;
(2) Three)) Four persons shall be appointed by the county
appointing authority;
(((3) Three)) (2) Four persons shall be appointed by the mayors of
the cities and towns located within the county; and
(((4) Two)) (3) Three persons shall be appointed by the board from
nominees of special districts in the county.
The governor shall designate one initial appointee to serve a term
of two years, and two initial appointees to serve terms of four years,
if the appointments are made in an odd-numbered year, or one initial
appointee to serve a term of one year, and two initial appointees to
serve terms of three years, if the appointments are made in an even-numbered year, with the length of the term being calculated from the
first day of February in the year the appointment was made.
The county appointing authority shall designate one of its initial
appointees to serve a term of two years, and two of its initial
appointees to serve terms of four years, if the appointments are made
in an odd-numbered year, or one of its initial appointees to serve a
term of one year, and two of its initial appointees to serve terms of
three years, if the appointments are made in an even-numbered year,
with the length of the term being calculated from the first day of
February in the year the appointment was made.
The mayors making the initial city and town appointments shall
designate two of their initial appointees to serve terms of two years,
and one of their initial appointees to serve a term of four years, if
the appointments are made in an odd-numbered year, or two of their
initial appointees to serve terms of one year, and one of their initial
appointees to serve a term of three years, if the appointments are made
in an even-numbered year, with the length of the term being calculated
from the first day of February in the year the appointment was made.
The board shall make two initial appointments from the nominees of
special districts, with one appointee serving a term of four years and
one initial appointee serving a term of two years, if the appointments
are made in an odd-numbered year, or one initial appointee serving a
term of three years and one initial appointee serving a term of one
year if the appointments are made in an even-numbered year, with the
length of the term being calculated from the first day of March in the
year in which the appointment is made.
After the initial appointments, all appointees shall serve four-year terms.
No appointee may be an official or employee of the county or a
governmental unit in the county, or a consultant or advisor on a
contractual or regular retained basis of the county, any governmental
unit in the county, or any agency or association thereof.

Sec. 182 RCW 15.92.090 and 1999 c 247 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A commission on pesticide registration is established. The
commission shall be composed of twelve voting members appointed by the
((governor)) director as follows:
(a) Eight members from the following segments of the state's
agricultural industry as nominated by a statewide private agricultural
association or agricultural commodity commission formed under Title 15
RCW: (i) The tree fruit industry; (ii) hop growers; (iii) potato
growers; (iv) wheat growers; (v) vegetable and seed growers; (vi) berry
growers; (vii) wine grape growers; and (viii) the nursery and landscape
industry. Although members are appointed from various segments of the
agriculture industry, they are appointed to represent and advance the
interests of the industry as a whole.
(b) One member from each of the following: (i) Forest protection
industry; (ii) food processors; (iii) agricultural chemical industry;
and (iv) professional pesticide applicators. One member shall be
appointed for each such segment of the industry and shall be nominated
by a statewide, private association of that segment of the industry.
The representative of the agricultural chemical industry shall be
involved in the manufacture of agricultural crop protection products.
The following shall be ex officio, nonvoting members of the
commission: The coordinator of the interregional project number four
at Washington State University; the director of the department of
ecology or the director's designee; the director of the department of
agriculture or the director's designee; the director of the department
of labor and industries or the director's designee; and the secretary
of the department of health or the secretary's designee.
(2) Each voting member of the commission shall serve a term of
three years. ((However, the first appointments in the first year shall
be made by the governor for one, two, and three-year terms so that, in
subsequent years, approximately one-third of the voting members shall
be appointed each year. The governor shall assign the initial one,
two, and three-year terms to members by lot.)) A vacancy shall be
filled by appointment for the unexpired term in the same manner
provided for an appointment to the full term. No member of the
commission may be removed by the ((governor)) director during his or
her term of office unless for cause of incapacity, incompetence,
neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office. Each member of the
commission shall receive travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for attending meetings of the commission and
for performing special duties, in the way of official commission
business, specifically assigned to the person by the commission. The
voting members of the commission serve without compensation from the
state other than such travel expenses.
(3) ((Nominations for the initial appointments to the commission
under subsection (1) of this section shall be submitted by September 1,
1995. The governor shall make initial appointments to the commission
by October 15, 1995.
(4))) The commission shall elect a chair from among its voting
members each calendar year. After its original organizational meeting,
the commission shall meet at the call of the chair. A majority of the
voting members of the commission constitutes a quorum and an official
action of the commission may be taken by a majority vote of the quorum.

Sec. 183 RCW 43.160.030 and 2008 c 327 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The community economic revitalization board is hereby created
to exercise the powers granted under this chapter.
(2) The board shall consist of one member from each of the two
major caucuses of the house of representatives to be appointed by the
speaker of the house and one member from each of the two major caucuses
of the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate. The
board shall also consist of the following members appointed by the
((governor)) director of commerce: A recognized private or public
sector economist; one port district official; one county official; one
city official; one representative of a federally recognized Indian
tribe; one representative of the public; one representative of small
businesses each from: (a) The area west of Puget Sound, (b) the area
east of Puget Sound and west of the Cascade range, (c) the area east of
the Cascade range and west of the Columbia river, and (d) the area east
of the Columbia river; one executive from large businesses each from
the area west of the Cascades and the area east of the Cascades. The
appointive members shall initially be appointed to terms as follows:
Three members for one-year terms, three members for two-year terms, and
three members for three-year terms which shall include the chair.
Thereafter each succeeding term shall be for three years. The chair of
the board shall be selected by the ((governor)) director of commerce.
The members of the board shall elect one of their members to serve as
vice-chair. The director of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce, the director of revenue, the commissioner of
employment security, and the secretary of transportation shall serve as
nonvoting advisory members of the board.
(3) Management services, including fiscal and contract services,
shall be provided by the department to assist the board in implementing
this chapter.
(4) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) If a vacancy occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise of
appointive members of the board, the ((governor)) director of commerce
shall fill the same for the unexpired term. Members of the board may
be removed for malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific
written charges by the ((governor)) director of commerce, under chapter
34.05 RCW.
(6) A member appointed by the ((governor)) director of commerce may
not be absent from more than fifty percent of the regularly scheduled
meetings in any one calendar year. Any member who exceeds this absence
limitation is deemed to have withdrawn from the office and may be
replaced by the ((governor)) director of commerce.
(7) A majority of members currently appointed constitutes a quorum.

Sec. 184 RCW 70.94.537 and 2006 c 329 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A sixteen member state commute trip reduction board is
established as follows:
(a) The secretary of ((the department of)) transportation or the
secretary's designee who shall serve as chair;
(b) One representative from the office of ((the governor or the
governor's designee)) financial management;
(c) The director or the director's designee of one of the following
agencies, to be determined by the ((governor)) secretary of
transportation:
(i) Department of general administration;
(ii) Department of ecology;
(iii) Department of ((community, trade, and economic development))
commerce;
(d) Three representatives from cities and towns or counties
appointed by the ((governor)) secretary of transportation for staggered
four-year terms from a list recommended by the association of
Washington cities or the Washington state association of counties;
(e) Two representatives from transit agencies appointed by the
((governor)) secretary of transportation for staggered four-year terms
from a list recommended by the Washington state transit association;
(f) Two representatives from participating regional transportation
planning organizations appointed by the ((governor)) secretary of
transportation for staggered four-year terms;
(g) Four representatives of employers at or owners of major
worksites in Washington, or transportation management associations,
business improvement areas, or other transportation organizations
representing employers, appointed by the ((governor)) secretary of
transportation for staggered four-year terms; and
(h) Two citizens appointed by the ((governor)) secretary of
transportation for staggered four-year terms.
Members of the commute trip reduction board shall serve without
compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Members appointed by the ((governor))
secretary of transportation shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.220. The board has all powers necessary to carry out its duties
as prescribed by this chapter.
(2) By March 1, 2007, the department of transportation shall
establish rules for commute trip reduction plans and implementation
procedures. The commute trip reduction board shall advise the
department on the content of the rules. The rules are intended to
ensure consistency in commute trip reduction plans and goals among
jurisdictions while fairly taking into account differences in
employment and housing density, employer size, existing and anticipated
levels of transit service, special employer circumstances, and other
factors the board determines to be relevant. The rules shall include:
(a) Guidance criteria for growth and transportation efficiency
centers;
(b) Data measurement methods and procedures for determining the
efficacy of commute trip reduction activities and progress toward
meeting commute trip reduction plan goals;
(c) Model commute trip reduction ordinances;
(d) Methods for assuring consistency in the treatment of employers
who have worksites subject to the requirements of this chapter in more
than one jurisdiction;
(e) An appeals process by which major employers, who as a result of
special characteristics of their business or its locations would be
unable to meet the requirements of a commute trip reduction plan, may
obtain a waiver or modification of those requirements and criteria for
determining eligibility for waiver or modification;
(f) Establishment of a process for determining the state's affected
areas, including criteria and procedures for regional transportation
planning organizations in consultation with local jurisdictions to
propose to add or exempt urban growth areas;
(g) Listing of the affected areas of the program to be done every
four years as identified in subsection (5) of this section;
(h) Establishment of a criteria and application process to
determine whether jurisdictions that voluntarily implement commute trip
reduction are eligible for state funding;
(i) Guidelines and deadlines for creating and updating local
commute trip reduction plans, including guidance to ensure consistency
between the local commute trip reduction plan and the transportation
demand management strategies identified in the transportation element
in the local comprehensive plan, as required by RCW 36.70A.070;
(j) Guidelines for creating and updating regional commute trip
reduction plans, including guidance to ensure the regional commute trip
reduction plan is consistent with and incorporated into transportation
demand management components in the regional transportation plan;
(k) Methods for regional transportation planning organizations to
evaluate and certify that designated growth and transportation
efficiency center programs meet the minimum requirements and are
eligible for funding;
(l) Guidelines for creating and updating growth and transportation
efficiency center programs; and
(m) Establishment of statewide program goals. The goals shall be
designed to achieve substantial reductions in the proportion of
single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute trip vehicle
miles traveled per employee, at a level that is projected to improve
the mobility of people and goods by increasing the efficiency of the
state highway system.
(3) The board shall create a state commute trip reduction plan that
shall be updated every four years as discussed in subsection (5) of
this section. The state commute trip reduction plan shall include, but
is not limited to: (a) Statewide commute trip reduction program goals
that are designed to substantially improve the mobility of people and
goods; (b) identification of strategies at the state and regional
levels to achieve the goals and recommendations for how transportation
demand management strategies can be targeted most effectively to
support commute trip reduction program goals; (c) performance measures
for assessing the cost-effectiveness of commute trip reduction
strategies and the benefits for the state transportation system; and
(d) a sustainable financial plan. The board shall review and approve
regional commute trip reduction plans, and work collaboratively with
regional transportation planning organizations in the establishment of
the state commute trip reduction plan.
(4) The board shall work with affected jurisdictions, major
employers, and other parties to develop and implement a public
awareness campaign designed to increase the effectiveness of local
commute trip reduction programs and support achievement of the
objectives identified in this chapter.
(5) The board shall evaluate and update the commute trip reduction
program plan and recommend changes to the rules every four years, with
the first assessment report due July 1, 2011, to ensure that the latest
data methodology used by the department of transportation is
incorporated into the program and to determine which areas of the state
should be affected by the program. The board shall review the
definition of a major employer no later than December 1, 2009. The
board shall regularly identify urban growth areas that are projected to
be affected by chapter 329, Laws of 2006 in the next four-year period
and may provide advance planning support to the potentially affected
jurisdictions.
(6) The board shall review progress toward implementing commute
trip reduction plans and programs and the costs and benefits of commute
trip reduction plans and programs and shall make recommendations to the
legislature and the governor by December 1, 2009, and every two years
thereafter. In assessing the costs and benefits, the board shall
consider the costs of not having implemented commute trip reduction
plans and programs with the assistance of the transportation
performance audit board authorized under chapter 44.75 RCW. The board
shall examine other transportation demand management programs
nationally and incorporate its findings into its recommendations to the
legislature. The recommendations shall address the need for
continuation, modification, or termination or any or all requirements
of this chapter.
(7) The board shall invite personnel with appropriate expertise
from state, regional, and local government, private, public, and
nonprofit providers of transportation services, and employers or owners
of major worksites in Washington to act as a technical advisory group.
The technical advisory group shall advise the board on the
implementation of local and regional commute trip reduction plans and
programs, program evaluation, program funding allocations, and state
rules and guidelines.

Sec. 185 RCW 38.52.040 and 1995 c 269 s 1202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the emergency management council
(hereinafter called the council), to consist of not more than seventeen
members who shall be appointed by the ((governor)) adjutant general.
The membership of the council shall include, but not be limited to,
representatives of city and county governments, sheriffs and police
chiefs, the Washington state patrol, the military department, the
department of ecology, state and local fire chiefs, seismic safety
experts, state and local emergency management directors, search and
rescue volunteers, medical professions who have expertise in emergency
medical care, building officials, and private industry. The
representatives of private industry shall include persons knowledgeable
in emergency and hazardous materials management. The council members
shall elect a chairman from within the council membership. The members
of the council shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed
for their travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or
hereafter amended.
(2) The emergency management council shall advise the governor and
the director on all matters pertaining to state and local emergency
management. The council may appoint such ad hoc committees,
subcommittees, and working groups as are required to develop specific
recommendations for the improvement of emergency management practices,
standards, policies, or procedures. The council shall ensure that the
governor receives an annual assessment of statewide emergency
preparedness including, but not limited to, specific progress on hazard
mitigation and reduction efforts, implementation of seismic safety
improvements, reduction of flood hazards, and coordination of hazardous
materials planning and response activities. The council or a
subcommittee thereof shall periodically convene in special session and
serve during those sessions as the state emergency response commission
required by P.L. 99-499, the emergency planning and community right-to-know act. When sitting in session as the state emergency response
commission, the council shall confine its deliberations to those items
specified in federal statutes and state administrative rules governing
the coordination of hazardous materials policy. The council shall
review administrative rules governing state and local emergency
management practices and recommend necessary revisions to the director.

Sec. 186 RCW 70.168.020 and 2000 c 93 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created an emergency medical services and
trauma care steering committee composed of representatives of
individuals knowledgeable in emergency medical services and trauma
care, including emergency medical providers such as physicians, nurses,
hospital personnel, emergency medical technicians, paramedics,
ambulance services, a member of the emergency medical services
licensing and certification advisory committee, local government
officials, state officials, consumers, and persons affiliated
professionally with health science schools. The ((governor)) secretary
shall appoint members of the steering committee. Members shall be
appointed for a period of three years. The department shall provide
administrative support to the committee. All appointive members of the
committee, in the performance of their duties, may be entitled to
receive travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
The ((governor)) secretary may remove members from the committee who
have three unexcused absences from committee meetings. The
((governor)) secretary shall fill any vacancies of the committee in a
timely manner. The terms of those members representing the same field
shall not expire at the same time.
The committee shall elect a chair and a vice-chair whose terms of
office shall be for one year each. The chair shall be ineligible for
reelection after serving four consecutive terms.
The committee shall meet on call by the ((governor,)) the
secretary((,)) or the chair.
(2) The emergency medical services and trauma care steering
committee shall:
(a) Advise the department regarding emergency medical services and
trauma care needs throughout the state.
(b) Review the regional emergency medical services and trauma care
plans and recommend changes to the department before the department
adopts the plans.
(c) Review proposed departmental rules for emergency medical
services and trauma care.
(d) Recommend modifications in rules regarding emergency medical
services and trauma care.

Sec. 187 RCW 67.17.050 and 2001 c 18 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created an interstate governmental entity to be known
as the "compact committee" which shall be comprised of one official
from the racing commission or its equivalent in each party state who
shall be appointed, serve, and be subject to removal in accordance with
the laws of the party state he or she represents. Under the laws of
his or her party state, each official shall have the assistance of his
or her state's racing commission or the equivalent thereof in
considering issues related to licensing of participants in live racing
and in fulfilling his or her responsibilities as the representative
from his or her state to the compact committee. If an official is
unable to perform any duty in connection with the powers and duties of
the compact committee, the racing commission or equivalent thereof from
his or her state shall designate another of its members as an alternate
who shall serve in his or her place and represent the party state as
its official on the compact committee until that racing commission or
equivalent thereof determines that the original representative official
is able once again to perform his or her duties as that party state's
representative official on the compact committee. The designation of
an alternate shall be communicated by the affected state's racing
commission or equivalent thereof to the compact committee as the
committee's bylaws may provide.
(2) The ((governor)) horse racing commission shall appoint the
official to represent the state of Washington on the compact committee
for a term of four years. No official may serve more than three
consecutive terms. A vacancy shall be filled by the ((governor)) horse
racing commission for the unexpired term.

Sec. 188 RCW 43.365.030 and 2008 c 85 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A Washington motion picture competitiveness program under this
chapter shall be administered by a board of directors appointed by the
((governor)) director of commerce, and the appointments shall be made
within sixty days following enactment. The department, after
consulting with the board, shall adopt rules for the standards that
shall be used to evaluate the applications for funding assistance prior
to June 30, 2006.
(2) The board shall evaluate and award financial assistance to
motion picture projects under rules set forth under RCW 43.365.020.
(3) The board shall consist of the following members:
(a) One member representing the Washington motion picture
production industry;
(b) One member representing the Washington motion picture
postproduction industry;
(c) Two members representing labor unions affiliated with
Washington motion picture production;
(d) One member representing the Washington visitors and convention
bureaus;
(e) One member representing the Washington tourism industry;
(f) One member representing the Washington restaurant, hotel, and
airline industry; and
(g) A chairperson, chosen at large, shall serve at the pleasure of
the ((governor)) director of commerce.
(4) The term of the board members, other than the chair, is four
years, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section.
(5) The ((governor)) director of commerce shall appoint board
members in 2010 to two-year or four-year staggered terms. Once the
initial two-year or four-year terms expire, all subsequent terms shall
be for four years. The terms of the initial board members shall be as
follows:
(a) The board positions in subsection (3)(b), (d), and (f) of this
section, and one position from subsection (3)(c) of this section shall
be appointed to two-year terms; and
(b) The remaining board positions in subsection (3) of this section
shall be appointed to four-year terms.
(6) A board member appointed by the ((governor)) director of
commerce may be removed by the ((governor)) director of commerce for
cause under RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080.
(7) Five members of the board constitute a quorum.
(8) The board shall elect a treasurer and secretary annually, and
other officers as the board members determine necessary, and may adopt
bylaws or rules for its own government.
(9) The board shall make any information available at the request
of the department to administer this chapter.
(10) Contributions received by a board shall be deposited into the
account described in RCW 43.365.020(2).

Sec. 189 RCW 41.60.015 and 2000 c 139 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the productivity board, which may also
be known as the employee involvement and recognition board. The board
shall administer the employee suggestion program and the teamwork
incentive program under this chapter.
(2) The board shall be composed of:
(a) The secretary of state who shall act as chairperson;
(b) The director of personnel appointed under the provisions of RCW
41.06.130 or the director's designee;
(c) The director of financial management or the director's
designee;
(d) The director of general administration or the director's
designee;
(e) Three persons with experience in administering incentives such
as those used by industry, with the ((governor,)) lieutenant governor,
secretary of state, and speaker of the house of representatives each
appointing one person. The ((governor's)) secretary of state's
appointee shall be a representative of an employee organization
certified as an exclusive representative of at least one bargaining
unit of classified employees; and
(f) Two persons representing state agencies and institutions with
employees subject to chapter 41.06 RCW, and one person representing
those subject to chapter 28B.16 RCW, both appointed by the ((governor;
and
(g) In addition, the governor and board chairperson may jointly
appoint persons to the board on an ad hoc basis. Ad hoc members shall
serve in an advisory capacity and shall not have the right to vote))
secretary of state.
Members under subsection (2)(e) and (f) of this section shall be
appointed to serve three-year terms.
Members of the board appointed pursuant to subsection (2)(e) of
this section may be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240. Any
board member who is not a state employee may be reimbursed for travel
expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 190 RCW 43.20A.685 and 1981 c 151 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((The initial members of the council shall be appointed by the
governor to staggered terms such that approximately one-third of the
members serve terms of one year, one-third serve terms of two years,
and one-third serve terms of three years. Thereafter,)) Members of the
council shall be appointed ((by the governor)) to terms of three years,
except in the case of a vacancy, in which event appointment shall be
for the remainder of the unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs.
No member of the council may serve more than two consecutive three-year
terms. Each area agency on aging advisory council shall appoint one
member ((shall be appointed)) from ((each)) its state-designated
planning and service area ((from a list of names transmitted by each
area agency on aging advisory council, such list including the names of
all persons nominated within the planning and service area together
with the area agency on aging advisory council's recommendations)).
The governor shall appoint one additional member from names submitted
by the association of Washington cities and one additional member from
names submitted by the Washington state association of counties. In
addition, the governor may appoint not more than five at large members,
in order to ensure that rural areas (those areas outside of a standard
metropolitan statistical area), minority populations, and those
individuals with special skills which could assist the state council
are represented. The members of the state council on aging shall
elect, at the council's initial meeting and at the council's first
meeting each year, one member to serve as chairperson of the council
and another member to serve as secretary of the council.
(2) The speaker of the house of representatives and the president
of the senate shall each appoint two nonvoting members to the council;
one from each of the two largest caucuses in each house. The terms of
the members so appointed shall be for approximately two years and the
terms shall expire before the first day of the legislative session in
odd-numbered years. They shall be compensated by their respective
houses as provided under RCW 44.04.120, as now or hereafter amended.
(3) With the exception of the members from the Washington state
association of cities, the Washington state association of counties,
and the nonvoting legislative members, all members of the council shall
be at least fifty-five years old.

Sec. 191 RCW 79A.30.030 and 2000 c 11 s 85 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A nonprofit corporation may be formed under the nonprofit
corporation provisions of chapter 24.03 RCW to carry out the purposes
of this chapter. Except as provided in RCW 79A.30.040, the corporation
shall have all the powers and be subject to the same restrictions as
are permitted or prescribed to nonprofit corporations and shall
exercise those powers only for carrying out the purposes of this
chapter and those purposes necessarily implied therefrom. The
nonprofit corporation shall be known as the Washington state horse park
authority. The articles of incorporation shall provide that it is the
responsibility of the authority to develop, promote, operate, manage,
and maintain the Washington state horse park. The articles of
incorporation shall provide for appointment of directors and other
conduct of business consistent with the requirements of this chapter.
(2)(a) The articles of incorporation shall provide for a seven-member board of directors for the authority, all appointed by the
((governor)) commission. Board members shall serve three-year terms,
except that two of the original appointees shall serve one-year terms,
and two of the original appointees shall serve two-year terms. A board
member may serve consecutive terms.
(b) The articles of incorporation shall provide that the
((governor)) commission appoint board members as follows:
(i) One board member shall represent the interests of the
commission((. In making this appointment, the governor shall solicit
recommendations from the commission));
(ii) One board member shall represent the interests of the county
in which the park is located. In making this appointment, the
((governor)) commission shall solicit recommendations from the county
legislative authority; and
(iii) Five board members shall represent the geographic and sports
discipline diversity of equestrian interests in the state, and at least
one of these members shall have business experience relevant to the
organization of horse shows or operation of a horse show facility. In
making these appointments, the ((governor)) commission shall solicit
recommendations from a variety of active horse-related organizations in
the state.
(3) The articles of incorporation shall include a policy that
provides for the preferential use of a specific area of the horse park
facilities at nominal cost for horse groups associated with youth
groups and ((the disabled)) individuals with disabilities.
(4) The ((governor)) commission shall make appointments to fill
board vacancies for positions authorized under subsection (2) of this
section, upon additional solicitation of recommendations from the board
of directors.
(5) The board of directors shall perform their duties in the best
interests of the authority, consistent with the standards applicable to
directors of nonprofit corporations under RCW 24.03.127.

General Provisions
Sec. 192 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2009 c 565 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the director of
the state system of community and technical colleges, the director of
commerce, the secretary of corrections, the director of early learning,
the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment security, the
chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the secretary of
the state finance committee, the director of financial management, the
director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the forest
practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the
director of general administration, the secretary of health, the
administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the
executive secretary of the health care facilities authority, the
executive secretary of the higher education facilities authority, the
executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the executive
secretary of the human rights commission, ((the executive secretary of
the indeterminate sentence review board,)) the director of the
department of information services, the executive director of the state
investment board, the director of labor and industries, the director of
licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the director of the
office of minority and women's business enterprises, the director of
parks and recreation, the director of personnel, the executive director
of the public disclosure commission, the executive director of the
Puget Sound partnership, the director of the recreation and
conservation office, the director of retirement systems, the director
of revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the chief of
the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of
tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of the
utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans
affairs, the president of each of the regional and state universities
and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and
each campus president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, committee for deferred
compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees,
Washington economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State
College board of trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices
appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, life
sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, Washington health
care facilities authority, each member of the Washington health
services commission, higher education coordinating board, higher
education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing
finance commission, human rights commission, ((indeterminate sentence
review board,)) board of industrial insurance appeals, information
services board, recreation and conservation funding board, state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics
board, liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight
board, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure
commission, public pension commission, shorelines hearings board,
public employees' benefits board, ((salmon recovery funding board,))
board of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of
Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation commission,
Washington state maritime commission, Washington personnel resources
board, Washington public power supply system executive board,
Washington State University board of regents, Western Washington
University board of trustees, and fish and wildlife commission.

Sec. 193 RCW 42.17A.705 and 2010 c 204 s 902 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer"
includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind,
the director of the state system of community and technical colleges,
the director of commerce, the secretary of corrections, the director of
early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment
security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the
secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial
management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary
of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling
commission, the director of general administration, the secretary of
health, the administrator of the Washington state health care
authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the
executive secretary of the human rights commission, ((the executive
secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board,)) the director of
the department of information services, the executive director of the
state investment board, the director of labor and industries, the
director of licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the
director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises,
the director of parks and recreation, the director of personnel, the
executive director of the public disclosure commission, the executive
director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of the recreation
and conservation office, the director of retirement systems, the
director of revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the
chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the
board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of
the utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans
affairs, the president of each of the regional and state universities
and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and
each campus president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington
University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance
authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen
State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and
wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices
board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities
authority, higher education coordinating board, higher education
facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance
commission, human rights commission, ((indeterminate sentence review
board,)) board of industrial insurance appeals, information services
board, state investment board, commission on judicial conduct,
legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery fund authority board
of trustees, liquor control board, lottery commission, Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and
recreation commission, Washington personnel resources board, board of
pilotage commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public
disclosure commission, public employees' benefits board, recreation and
conservation funding board, ((salmon recovery funding board,))
shorelines hearings board, board of tax appeals, transportation
commission, University of Washington board of regents, utilities and
transportation commission, Washington State University board of
regents, and Western Washington University board of trustees.

Sec. 194 RCW 43.03.220 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 142 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any part-time board, commission, council, committee, or other
similar group which is established by the executive, legislative, or
judicial branch to participate in state government and which functions
primarily in an advisory, coordinating, or planning capacity shall be
identified as a class one group.
(2) Absent any other provision of law to the contrary, no money
beyond the customary reimbursement or allowance for expenses may be
paid by or through the state to members of class one groups for
attendance at meetings of such groups.
(3) ((Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, no person
designated as a member of a class one board, commission, council,
committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence,
lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the
state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010. Class one groups, when feasible, shall use an
alternative means of conducting a meeting that does not require travel
while still maximizing member and public participation and may use a
meeting format that requires members to be physically present at one
location only when necessary or required by law. Meetings that require
a member's physical presence at one location must be held in state
facilities whenever possible, and meetings conducted using private
facilities must be approved by the director of the office of financial
management.
(4))) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class one
groups ((that are funded by sources other than the state general fund))
are encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated
with conducting the business of the group including use of other
meeting formats that do not require travel.

Sec. 195 RCW 43.03.230 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 143 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any agricultural commodity board or commission established
pursuant to Title 15 or 16 RCW shall be identified as a class two group
for purposes of compensation.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of a
class two group is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not to
exceed one hundred dollars for each day during which the member attends
an official meeting of the group or performs statutorily prescribed
duties approved by the chairperson of the group. A person shall not
receive compensation for a day of service under this section if the
person (a) occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time in
nature, in any agency of the federal government, Washington state
government, or Washington state local government; and (b) receives any
compensation from such government for working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is authorized under the law dealing in particular with the specific
group to which the member belongs or dealing in particular with the
members of that specific group.
(4) ((Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, no person
designated as a member of a class two board, commission, council,
committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence,
lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the
state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010. Class two groups, when feasible, shall use an
alternative means of conducting a meeting that does not require travel
while still maximizing member and public participation and may use a
meeting format that requires members to be physically present at one
location only when necessary or required by law. Meetings that require
a member's physical presence at one location must be held in state
facilities whenever possible, and meetings conducted using private
facilities must be approved by the director of the office of financial
management.
(5))) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class two
groups ((that are funded by sources other than the state general fund))
are encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated
with conducting the business of the group including use of other
meeting formats that do not require travel.

Sec. 196 RCW 43.03.240 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 144 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any part-time, statutory board, commission, council, committee,
or other similar group which has rule-making authority, performs quasi
judicial functions, has responsibility for the administration or policy
direction of a state agency or program, or performs regulatory or
licensing functions with respect to a specific profession, occupation,
business, or industry shall be identified as a class three group for
purposes of compensation.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of a
class three group is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not
to exceed fifty dollars for each day during which the member attends an
official meeting of the group or performs statutorily prescribed duties
approved by the chairperson of the group. A person shall not receive
compensation for a day of service under this section if the person (a)
occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time in nature, in any
agency of the federal government, Washington state government, or
Washington state local government; and (b) receives any compensation
from such government for working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is authorized under the law dealing in particular with the specific
group to which the member belongs or dealing in particular with the
members of that specific group.
(4) ((Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, no person
designated as a member of a class three board, commission, council,
committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence,
lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the
state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010. Class three groups, when feasible, shall use
an alternative means of conducting a meeting that does not require
travel while still maximizing member and public participation and may
use a meeting format that requires members to be physically present at
one location only when necessary or required by law. Meetings that
require a member's physical presence at one location must be held in
state facilities whenever possible, and meetings conducted using
private facilities must be approved by the director of the office of
financial management.
(5))) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class three
groups ((that are funded by sources other than the state general fund))
are encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated
with conducting the business of the group including use of other
meeting formats that do not require travel.

Sec. 197 RCW 43.03.250 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 145 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A part-time, statutory board, commission, council, committee,
or other similar group shall be identified as a class four group for
purposes of compensation if the group:
(a) Has rule-making authority, performs quasi-judicial functions,
or has responsibility for the administration or policy direction of a
state agency or program;
(b) Has duties that are deemed by the legislature to be of
overriding sensitivity and importance to the public welfare and the
operation of state government; and
(c) Requires service from its members representing a significant
demand on their time that is normally in excess of one hundred hours of
meeting time per year.
(2) Each member of a class four group is eligible to receive
compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars for each
day during which the member attends an official meeting of the group or
performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the chairperson of
the group. A person shall not receive compensation for a day of
service under this section if the person (a) occupies a position,
normally regarded as full-time in nature, in any agency of the federal
government, Washington state government, or Washington state local
government; and (b) receives any compensation from such government for
working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is authorized under the law dealing in particular with the specific
group to which the member belongs or dealing in particular with the
members of that specific group.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class four
groups((, when feasible, shall use an alternative means of conducting
a meeting that does not require travel while still maximizing member
and public participation and may use a meeting format that requires
members to be physically present at one location only when necessary or
required by law. Meetings that require a member's physical presence at
one location must be held in state facilities whenever possible, and
meetings conducted using private facilities must be approved by the
director of the office of financial management)) are encouraged to
reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated with conducting the
business of the group including use of other meeting formats that do
not require travel.

Sec. 198 RCW 43.03.265 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 146 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any part-time commission that has rule-making authority,
performs quasi-judicial functions, has responsibility for the policy
direction of a health profession credentialing program, and performs
regulatory and licensing functions with respect to a health care
profession licensed under Title 18 RCW shall be identified as a class
five group for purposes of compensation.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of a
class five group is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not
to exceed two hundred fifty dollars for each day during which the
member attends an official meeting of the group or performs statutorily
prescribed duties approved by the chairperson of the group. A person
shall not receive compensation for a day of service under this section
if the person (a) occupies a position, normally regarded as full-time
in nature, in any agency of the federal government, Washington state
government, or Washington state local government; and (b) receives any
compensation from such government for working that day.
(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is necessarily incurred in the course of authorized business consistent
with the responsibilities of the commission established by law.
(4) ((Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, no person
designated as a member of a class five board, commission, council,
committee, or similar group may receive an allowance for subsistence,
lodging, or travel expenses if the allowance cost is funded by the
state general fund. Exceptions may be granted under section 605,
chapter 3, Laws of 2010. Class five groups, when feasible, shall use
an alternative means of conducting a meeting that does not require
travel while still maximizing member and public participation and may
use a meeting format that requires members to be physically present at
one location only when necessary or required by law. Meetings that
require a member's physical presence at one location must be held in
state facilities whenever possible, and meetings conducted using
private facilities must be approved by the director of the office of
financial management.
(5))) Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, class five
groups ((that are funded by sources other than the state general fund))
are encouraged to reduce travel, lodging, and other costs associated
with conducting the business of the group including use of other
meeting formats that do not require travel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 199 A new section is added to chapter 39.29
RCW to read as follows:
Except under a specific statute to the contrary, agencies are
prohibited from entering into personal service contracts with members
of any agency board, commission, council, committee, or other similar
group formed to advise the activities and management of state
government for services related to work done as a member of the agency
board, commission, council, committee, or other similar group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 200 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to any board, commission, council, committee, or other
similar group established by statute or executive order, the
superintendent of public instruction may appoint advisory groups on
subject matters within the superintendent's responsibilities or as may
be required by any federal legislation as a condition to the receipt of
federal funds by the federal department. The advisory groups shall be
constituted as required by federal law or as the superintendent may
determine.
Members of advisory groups under the authority of the
superintendent may be paid their travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
Except as provided in this section, members of advisory groups
under the authority of the superintendent are volunteering their
services and are not eligible for compensation. A person is eligible
to receive compensation in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars
for each day during which the member attends an official meeting of the
group or performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the
chairperson of the group if the person (1) occupies a position,
normally regarded as full-time in nature, as a certificated employee of
a local school district; (2) is participating as part of their
employment with the local school district; and (3) the meeting or
duties are performed outside the period in which school days as defined
by RCW 28A.150.030 are conducted. The superintendent may reimburse
local school districts for substitute certificated employees to enable
members to meet or perform duties on school days. A person is eligible
to receive compensation from federal funds in an amount to be
determined by personal service contract for groups required by federal
law.

Lieutenant Governor's Duties
Sec. 201 RCW 43.15.020 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 136 and 2010 c
271 s 704 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The lieutenant governor serves as president of the senate and is
responsible for making appointments to, and serving on, the committees
and boards as set forth in this section.
(1) The lieutenant governor serves on the following boards and
committees:
(a) Capitol furnishings preservation committee, RCW 27.48.040;
(b) Washington higher education facilities authority, RCW
28B.07.030;
(c) Productivity board, also known as the employee involvement and
recognition board, RCW 41.60.015;
(d) State finance committee, RCW 43.33.010;
(e) State capitol committee, RCW 43.34.010;
(f) Washington health care facilities authority, RCW 70.37.030;
(g) State medal of merit nominating committee, RCW 1.40.020;
(h) Medal of valor committee, RCW 1.60.020; and
(i) Association of Washington generals, RCW 43.15.030.
(2) The lieutenant governor, and when serving as president of the
senate, appoints members to the following boards and committees:
(a) Civil legal aid oversight committee, RCW 2.53.010;
(b) Office of public defense advisory committee, RCW 2.70.030;
(c) Washington state gambling commission, RCW 9.46.040;
(d) ((Sentencing guidelines commission, RCW 9.94A.860;
(e))) State building code council, RCW 19.27.070;
(((f))) (e) Financial education public-private partnership, RCW
28A.300.450;
(((g))) (f) Joint administrative rules review committee, RCW
34.05.610;
(((h))) (g) Capital projects advisory review board, RCW 39.10.220;
(((i))) (h) Select committee on pension policy, RCW 41.04.276;
(((j))) (i) Legislative ethics board, RCW 42.52.310;
(((k))) (j) Washington citizens' commission on salaries, RCW
43.03.305;
(((l))) (k) Legislative oral history committee, RCW 44.04.325;
(((m))) (l) State council on aging, RCW 43.20A.685;
(((n))) (m) State investment board, RCW 43.33A.020;
(((o) Capitol campus design advisory committee, RCW 43.34.080;
(p))) (n) Washington state arts commission, RCW 43.46.015;
(((q))) (o) Information services board, RCW 43.105.032;
(((r) Council for children and families, RCW 43.121.020;
(s))) (p) PNWER-Net working subgroup under chapter 43.147 RCW;
(((t))) (q) Community economic revitalization board, RCW
43.160.030;
(((u))) (r) Washington economic development finance authority, RCW
43.163.020;
(((v))) (s) Life sciences discovery fund authority, RCW 43.350.020;
(((w))) (t) Legislative children's oversight committee, RCW
44.04.220;
(((x))) (u) Joint legislative audit and review committee, RCW
44.28.010;
(((y))) (v) Joint committee on energy supply and energy
conservation, RCW 44.39.015;
(((z))) (w) Legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, RCW 44.48.010;
(((aa))) (x) Agency council on coordinated transportation, RCW
47.06B.020;
(((bb))) (y) Manufactured housing task force, RCW 59.22.090;
(((cc))) (z) Washington horse racing commission, RCW 67.16.014;
(((dd) Correctional industries board of directors, RCW 72.09.080;
(ee))) (aa) Joint committee on veterans' and military affairs, RCW
73.04.150;
(((ff))) (bb) Joint legislative committee on water supply during
drought, RCW 90.86.020;
(((gg))) (cc) Statute law committee, RCW 1.08.001; and
(((hh))) (dd) Joint legislative oversight committee on trade
policy, RCW 44.55.020.

Effective/Expiration Dates
NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 Section 192 of this act (RCW 42.17.2401)
expires January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 Section 193 of this act (RCW 42.17A.705)
takes effect January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 Except for sections 193, 199, and 200 of
this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

INDEX PAGE #

Achievement Gap Oversight and Accountability Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
Arts Commission . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
Athletic Training Advisory Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
Capitol Campus Design Advisory Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
Chemical Dependency Certification Advisory Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
Children of Incarcerated Parents Advisory Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
Correctional Industries Board of Directors . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
Council for Children and Families . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
Eastern State Hospital Board and Western State Hospital Board . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
Effective/Expiration Dates . . . . . . . . . . . . 207
Escrow Commission . . . . . . . . . . . . 44
Fairs Commission . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
Family Policy Council . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
Firearms Range Advisory Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
Hanford Area Economic Investment Fund Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 54
Home Inspector Advisory Licensing Board . . . . . . . . . . . . 70
Indeterminate Sentencing Review Board . . . . . . . . . . . . 75
Lieutenant Governor's Duties . . . . . . . . . . . . 206
Livestock Identification Advisory Board . . . . . . . . . . . . 87
Mental Health Counselors, Marriage and Family Therapists, and Social Workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 84
Midwifery Advisory Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 88
Migratory Waterfowl Art Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 89
Miscellaneous Statutes . . . . . . . . . . . . 196
Nonhighway and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Advisory Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 92
Orthotic and Prosthetics Advisory Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 95
Performance Agreement Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 100
Problem Gambling Advisory Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 100
Real Estate Appraiser Commission . . . . . . . . . . . . 102
Salmon Recovery Funding Board . . . . . . . . . . . . 108
Salmon Stamp Selection Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 124
Sentencing Guidelines Commission . . . . . . . . . . . . 125
State Noxious Weed Control Board . . . . . . . . . . . . 154
Transfer of Appointment Authority . . . . . . . . . . . . 179
Well Drilling Technical Advisory Group . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
Workforce Training Customer Advisory Committee . . . . . . . . . . . . 175
--- END ---