BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.205 and 2009 c 573 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School district employees shall be provided an annual salary
cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section.
(a) The cost-of-living increase shall be calculated by applying the
rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to any state-funded salary base used in state funding formulas for teachers and
other school district employees. Beginning with the 2001-02 school
year, and for each subsequent school year, except for the ((2009-10 and
2010-11)) 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, each school district shall
be provided a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to grant this cost-of-living increase.
(b) A school district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
compensation policies. No later than the end of the school year, each
school district shall certify to the superintendent of public
instruction that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living
increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.
(c) Any funded cost-of-living increase shall be included in the
salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for school
employees in subsequent years. For teachers and other certificated
instructional staff, the rate of the annual cost-of-living increase
funded for certificated instructional staff shall be applied to the
base salary used with the statewide salary allocation schedule
established under RCW 28A.150.410 and to any other salary models used
to recognize school district personnel costs.
(((d) During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, in
addition to cost-of-living allocations required by (a) of this
subsection, school districts shall receive additional cost-of-living
allocations in equal increments such that by the end of the 2014-15
school year school district employee base salaries used with the
statewide salary allocation schedule established under RCW 28A.150.410
and any other state salary models used to recognize school district
personnel costs are, at a minimum, equal to what they would have been
if cost-of-living allocations had not been suspended during the 2009-10
or 2010-11 school years.))
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any school year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.50.465 and 2009 c 573 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Academic employees of community and technical college districts
shall be provided an annual salary cost-of-living increase in
accordance with this section. For purposes of this section, "academic
employee" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 28B.52.020.
(a) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year, except as provided in (d) of this subsection,
each college district shall receive a cost-of-living allocation
sufficient to increase academic employee salaries, including mandatory
salary-related benefits, by the rate of the yearly increase in the
cost-of-living index.
(b) A college district shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with
the district's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
other compensation policies. No later than the end of the fiscal year,
each college district shall certify to the college board that it has
spent funds provided for cost-of-living increases on salaries and
salary-related benefits.
(c) The college board shall include any funded cost-of-living
increase in the salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases
for academic employees in subsequent years.
(d) Beginning with the 2001-2002 fiscal year, and for each
subsequent fiscal year except for the ((2009-2010 and 2010-2011)) 2011-2012 and 2012-2013 fiscal years, the state shall fully fund the cost-of-living increase set forth in this section.
(((e) During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, in
addition to cost-of-living allocations required by (a) of this
subsection, community and technical college districts shall receive
additional cost-of-living allocations in equal increments such that, by
the end of the 2014-15 academic year, average salaries of academic
employees of community and technical college districts will be, at a
minimum, equal to what salaries would have been if cost-of-living
allocations had not been suspended during the 2009-10 or 2010-11 school
years.))
(2) For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means,
for any fiscal year, the previous calendar year's annual average
consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the
bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the
state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more
than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index
covering the greatest number of people, covering areas exclusively
within the boundaries of the state, and including all items shall be
used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.405.415 and 2009 c 539 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Certificated instructional staff who have attained
certification from the national board for professional teaching
standards shall receive a bonus each year in which they maintain the
certification. The bonus shall be calculated as follows: The annual
bonus shall be five thousand dollars in the 2007-08 school year.
Thereafter, the annual bonus shall increase by inflation. For the
((2009-10 and 2010-11)) 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years the annual
bonus shall be subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for
this purpose. ((During the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, in
addition to annual adjustments for inflation, the bonus amount shall be
additionally increased such that, by the end of the 2014-15 school
year, national board bonus amounts are, at a minimum, equal to what
they would have been if annual adjustments for inflation had not been
suspended during the 2009-10 or 2010-11 school year.))
(2) Except for the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, certificated
instructional staff who have attained certification from the national
board for professional teaching standards shall be eligible for bonuses
in addition to that provided by subsection (1) of this section if the
individual is in an instructional assignment in a school in which at
least seventy percent of the students qualify for the free and reduced-price lunch program.
(3) The amount of the additional bonus under subsection (2) of this
section for those meeting the qualifications of subsection (2) of this
section is five thousand dollars.
(4) The bonuses provided under this section are in addition to
compensation received under a district's salary schedule adopted in
accordance with RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be included in
calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary
limitations under RCW 28A.400.200.
(5) The bonuses provided under this section shall be paid in a lump
sum amount.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---