BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.88B.020 and 2009 c 580 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, ((2011)) 2014, except as provided in RCW
18.88B.040, the department of health shall require that any person
hired as a long-term care worker for the elderly or persons with
disabilities must be certified as a home care aide within one hundred
fifty days from the date of being hired.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 18.88B.040, certification as a home
care aide requires both completion of seventy-five hours of training
and successful completion of a certification examination pursuant to
RCW 74.39A.073 and 18.88B.030.
(3) No person may practice or, by use of any title or description,
represent himself or herself as a certified home care aide without
being certified pursuant to this chapter.
(4) The department of health shall adopt rules by August 1,
((2010)) 2013, to implement this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.88B.030 and 2009 c 580 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, ((2011)) 2014, except as provided in RCW
18.88B.040, the department of health shall require that all long-term
care workers successfully complete a certification examination. Any
long-term care worker failing to make the required grade for the
examination will not be certified as a home care aide.
(2) The department of health, in consultation with consumer and
worker representatives, shall develop a home care aide certification
examination to evaluate whether an applicant possesses the skills and
knowledge necessary to practice competently. Unless excluded by RCW
18.88B.040 (1) and (2), only those who have completed the training
requirements in RCW 74.39A.073 shall be eligible to sit for this
examination.
(3) The examination shall include both a skills demonstration and
a written or oral knowledge test. The examination papers, all grading
of the papers, and records related to the grading of skills
demonstration shall be preserved for a period of not less than one
year. The department of health shall establish rules governing the
number of times and under what circumstances individuals who have
failed the examination may sit for the examination, including whether
any intermediate remedial steps should be required.
(4) All examinations shall be conducted by fair and wholly
impartial methods. The certification examination shall be administered
and evaluated by the department of health or by a contractor to the
department of health that is neither an employer of long-term care
workers or private contractors providing training services under this
chapter.
(5) The department of health has the authority to:
(a) Establish forms, procedures, and examinations necessary to
certify home care aides pursuant to this chapter;
(b) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as
needed to implement this section;
(c) Issue certification as a home care aide to any applicant who
has successfully completed the home care aide examination;
(d) Maintain the official record of all applicants and persons with
certificates;
(e) Exercise disciplinary authority as authorized in chapter 18.130
RCW; and
(f) Deny certification to applicants who do not meet training,
competency examination, and conduct requirements for certification.
(6) The department of health shall adopt rules by August 1,
((2010)) 2013, that establish the procedures, including criteria for
reviewing an applicant's state and federal background checks, and
examinations necessary to carry this section into effect.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.88B.040 and 2010 c 169 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following long-term care workers are not required to become a
certified home care aide pursuant to this chapter.
(1) Registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, certified nursing
assistants or persons who are in an approved training program for
certified nursing assistants under chapter 18.88A RCW, medicare-certified home health aides, or other persons who hold a similar health
credential, as determined by the secretary of health, or persons with
special education training and an endorsement granted by the
superintendent of public instruction, as described in RCW 28A.300.010,
if the secretary of health determines that the circumstances do not
require certification. After December 31, 2013, individuals exempted
by this subsection may obtain certification as a home care aide from
the department of health without fulfilling the training requirements
in RCW 74.39A.073 but must successfully complete a certification
examination pursuant to RCW 18.88B.030.
(2) A person already employed as a long-term care worker prior to
January 1, ((2011)) 2014, who completes all of his or her training
requirements in effect as of the date he or she was hired, is not
required to obtain certification. After December 31, 2013, individuals
exempted by this subsection may obtain certification as a home care
aide from the department of health without fulfilling the training
requirements in RCW 74.39A.073 but must successfully complete a
certification examination pursuant to RCW 18.88B.030.
(3) All long-term care workers employed by supported living
providers are not required to obtain certification under this chapter.
(4) An individual provider caring only for his or her biological,
step, or adoptive child or parent is not required to obtain
certification under this chapter.
(5) ((Prior to June 30, 2014, a person hired as an individual
provider who provides twenty hours or less of care for one person in
any calendar month is not required to obtain certification under this
chapter.
(6))) A long-term care worker exempted by this section from the
training requirements contained in RCW 74.39A.073 may not be prohibited
from enrolling in training pursuant to that section.
(((7))) (6) The department of health shall adopt rules by August 1,
((2010)) 2013, to implement this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.88B.050 and 2009 c 580 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
uncertified practice, issuance of certificates, and the discipline of
persons with certificates under this chapter. The secretary of health
shall be the disciplinary authority under this chapter.
(2) The secretary of health may take action to immediately suspend
the certification of a long-term care worker upon finding that conduct
of the long-term care worker has caused or presents an imminent threat
of harm to a functionally disabled person in his or her care.
(3) If the secretary of health imposes suspension or conditions for
continuation of certification, the suspension or conditions for
continuation are effective immediately upon notice and shall continue
in effect pending the outcome of any hearing.
(4) The department of health shall take appropriate enforcement
action related to the licensure of a private agency or facility
licensed by the state, to provide personal care services, other than an
individual provider, who knowingly employs a long-term care worker who
is not a certified home care aide as required under this chapter or, if
exempted from certification by RCW 18.88B.040, has not completed his or
her required training pursuant to this chapter.
(5) Chapter 34.05 RCW shall govern actions by the department of
health under this section.
(6) The department of health shall adopt rules by August 1,
((2010)) 2013, to implement this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.39A.050 and 2009 c 580 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department's system of quality improvement for long-term care
services shall use the following principles, consistent with applicable
federal laws and regulations:
(1) The system shall be client-centered and promote privacy,
independence, dignity, choice, and a home or home-like environment for
consumers consistent with chapter 392, Laws of 1997.
(2) The goal of the system is continuous quality improvement with
the focus on consumer satisfaction and outcomes for consumers. This
includes that when conducting licensing or contract inspections, the
department shall interview an appropriate percentage of residents,
family members, resident case managers, and advocates in addition to
interviewing providers and staff.
(3) Providers should be supported in their efforts to improve
quality and address identified problems initially through training,
consultation, technical assistance, and case management.
(4) The emphasis should be on problem prevention both in monitoring
and in screening potential providers of service.
(5) Monitoring should be outcome based and responsive to consumer
complaints and based on a clear set of health, quality of care, and
safety standards that are easily understandable and have been made
available to providers, residents, and other interested parties.
(6) Prompt and specific enforcement remedies shall also be
implemented without delay, pursuant to RCW 74.39A.080, RCW 70.128.160,
chapter 18.51 RCW, or chapter 74.42 RCW, for providers found to have
delivered care or failed to deliver care resulting in problems that are
serious, recurring, or uncorrected, or that create a hazard that is
causing or likely to cause death or serious harm to one or more
residents. These enforcement remedies may also include, when
appropriate, reasonable conditions on a contract or license. In the
selection of remedies, the safety, health, and well-being of residents
shall be of paramount importance.
(7) All long-term care workers shall be screened through background
checks in a uniform and timely manner to ensure that they do not have
a criminal history that would disqualify them from working with
vulnerable persons. Long-term care workers who are hired after January
1, ((2012)) 2014, are subject to background checks under RCW
74.39A.055. This information will be shared with the department of
health in accordance with RCW 74.39A.055 to advance the purposes of
chapter 2, Laws of 2009.
(8) No provider, or its staff, or long-term care worker, or
prospective provider or long-term care worker, with a stipulated
finding of fact, conclusion of law, an agreed order, or finding of
fact, conclusion of law, or final order issued by a disciplining
authority, a court of law, or entered into a state registry finding him
or her guilty of abuse, neglect, exploitation, or abandonment of a
minor or a vulnerable adult as defined in chapter 74.34 RCW shall be
employed in the care of and have unsupervised access to vulnerable
adults.
(9) The department shall establish, by rule, a state registry which
contains identifying information about long-term care workers
identified under this chapter who have substantiated findings of abuse,
neglect, financial exploitation, or abandonment of a vulnerable adult
as defined in RCW 74.34.020. The rule must include disclosure,
disposition of findings, notification, findings of fact, appeal rights,
and fair hearing requirements. The department shall disclose, upon
request, substantiated findings of abuse, neglect, financial
exploitation, or abandonment to any person so requesting this
information. This information will also be shared with the department
of health to advance the purposes of chapter 2, Laws of 2009.
(10) Until December 31, ((2010)) 2013, individual providers and
home care agency providers must satisfactorily complete department-approved orientation, basic training, and continuing education within
the time period specified by the department in rule. The department
shall adopt rules by March 1, 2002, for the implementation of this
section. The department shall deny payment to an individual provider
or a home care provider who does not complete the training requirements
within the time limit specified by the department by rule.
(11) Until December 31, ((2010)) 2013, in an effort to improve
access to training and education and reduce costs, especially for rural
communities, the coordinated system of long-term care training and
education must include the use of innovative types of learning
strategies such as internet resources, videotapes, and distance
learning using satellite technology coordinated through community
colleges or other entities, as defined by the department.
(12) The department shall create an approval system by March 1,
2002, for those seeking to conduct department-approved training.
(13) The department shall establish, by rule, background checks and
other quality assurance requirements for long-term care workers who
provide in-home services funded by medicaid personal care as described
in RCW 74.09.520, community options program entry system waiver
services as described in RCW 74.39A.030, or chore services as described
in RCW 74.39A.110 that are equivalent to requirements for individual
providers. Long-term care workers who are hired after January 1,
((2012)) 2014, are subject to background checks under RCW 74.39A.055.
(14) Under existing funds the department shall establish internally
a quality improvement standards committee to monitor the development of
standards and to suggest modifications.
(15) Within existing funds, the department shall design, develop,
and implement a long-term care training program that is flexible,
relevant, and qualifies towards the requirements for a nursing
assistant certificate as established under chapter 18.88A RCW. This
subsection does not require completion of the nursing assistant
certificate training program by providers or their staff. The long-term care teaching curriculum must consist of a fundamental module, or
modules, and a range of other available relevant training modules that
provide the caregiver with appropriate options that assist in meeting
the resident's care needs. Some of the training modules may include,
but are not limited to, specific training on the special care needs of
persons with developmental disabilities, dementia, mental illness, and
the care needs of the elderly. No less than one training module must
be dedicated to workplace violence prevention. The nursing care
quality assurance commission shall work together with the department to
develop the curriculum modules. The nursing care quality assurance
commission shall direct the nursing assistant training programs to
accept some or all of the skills and competencies from the curriculum
modules towards meeting the requirements for a nursing assistant
certificate as defined in chapter 18.88A RCW. A process may be
developed to test persons completing modules from a caregiver's class
to verify that they have the transferable skills and competencies for
entry into a nursing assistant training program. The department may
review whether facilities can develop their own related long-term care
training programs. The department may develop a review process for
determining what previous experience and training may be used to waive
some or all of the mandatory training. The department of social and
health services and the nursing care quality assurance commission shall
work together to develop an implementation plan by December 12, 1998.

Sec. 6 RCW 74.39A.055 and 2009 c 580 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All long-term care workers for the elderly or persons with
disabilities hired after January 1, ((2012)) 2014, shall be screened
through state and federal background checks in a uniform and timely
manner to ensure that they do not have a criminal history that would
disqualify them from working with vulnerable persons. These background
checks shall include checking against the federal bureau of
investigation fingerprint identification records system and against the
national sex offenders registry or their successor programs. The
department shall require these long-term care workers to submit
fingerprints for the purpose of investigating conviction records
through both the Washington state patrol and the federal bureau of
investigation.
(2) To allow the department of health to satisfy its certification
responsibilities under chapter 18.88B RCW, the department shall share
state and federal background check results with the department of
health. Neither department may share the federal background check
results with any other state agency or person.
(3) The department shall not pass on the cost of these criminal
background checks to the workers or their employers.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of
this section by August 1, ((2010)) 2013.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.39A.073 and 2009 c 580 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, ((2011)) 2014, except as provided in RCW
18.88B.040, all persons employed as long-term care workers for the
elderly or persons with disabilities must meet the minimum training
requirements in this section within one hundred twenty calendar days of
employment.
(2) All persons employed as long-term care workers must obtain
seventy-five hours of entry-level training approved by the department.
A long-term care worker must accomplish five of these seventy-five
hours before becoming eligible to provide care.
(3) Training required by subsection (4)(c) of this section will be
applied towards training required under RCW 18.20.270 or 70.128.230 as
well as any statutory or regulatory training requirements for long-term
care workers employed by supportive living providers.
(4) Only training curriculum approved by the department may be used
to fulfill the training requirements specified in this section. The
seventy-five hours of entry-level training required shall be as
follows:
(a) Before a long-term care worker is eligible to provide care, he
or she must complete two hours of orientation training regarding his or
her role as caregiver and the applicable terms of employment;
(b) Before a long-term care worker is eligible to provide care, he
or she must complete three hours of safety training, including basic
safety precautions, emergency procedures, and infection control; and
(c) All long-term care workers must complete seventy hours of
long-term care basic training, including training related to core
competencies and population specific competencies.
(5) The department shall only approve training curriculum that:
(a) Has been developed with input from consumer and worker
representatives; and
(b) Requires comprehensive instruction by qualified instructors on
the competencies and training topics in this section.
(6) Individual providers under RCW 74.39A.270 shall be compensated
for training time required by this section.
(7) The department of health shall adopt rules by August 1,
((2010)) 2013, to implement subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this
section.
(8) The department shall adopt rules by August 1, ((2010)) 2013, to
implement subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.39A.075 and 2009 c 580 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, ((2011)) 2014, a biological, step, or
adoptive parent who is the individual provider only for his or her
developmentally disabled son or daughter must receive twelve hours of
training relevant to the needs of adults with developmental
disabilities within the first one hundred twenty days of becoming an
individual provider.
(2) Effective January 1, ((2011)) 2014, individual providers
identified in (((a) and (b) of)) this subsection must complete
thirty-five hours of training within the first one hundred twenty days
of becoming an individual provider. Five of the thirty-five hours must
be completed before becoming eligible to provide care. Two of these
five hours shall be devoted to an orientation training regarding an
individual provider's role as caregiver and the applicable terms of
employment, and three hours shall be devoted to safety training,
including basic safety precautions, emergency procedures, and infection
control. Individual providers subject to this requirement include((:
(a))) an individual provider caring only for his or her biological,
step, or adoptive child or parent unless covered by subsection (1) of
this section((; and
(b) Before January 1, 2014, a person hired as an individual
provider who provides twenty hours or less of care for one person in
any calendar month)).
(3) Only training curriculum approved by the department may be used
to fulfill the training requirements specified in this section. The
department shall only approve training curriculum that:
(a) Has been developed with input from consumer and worker
representatives; and
(b) Requires comprehensive instruction by qualified instructors.
(4) The department shall adopt rules by August 1, ((2010)) 2013, to
implement this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.39A.085 and 2009 c 580 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall deny payment to any individual provider of
home care services who has not been certified by the department of
health as a home care aide as required under chapter 2, Laws of 2009
or, if exempted from certification by RCW 18.88B.040, has not completed
his or her required training pursuant to chapter 2, Laws of 2009.
(2) The department may terminate the contract of any individual
provider of home care services, or take any other enforcement measure
deemed appropriate by the department if the individual provider's
certification is revoked under chapter 2, Laws of 2009 or, if exempted
from certification by RCW 18.88B.040, has not completed his or her
required training pursuant to chapter 2, Laws of 2009.
(3) The department shall take appropriate enforcement action
related to the contract of a private agency or facility licensed by the
state, to provide personal care services, other than an individual
provider, who knowingly employs a long-term care worker who is not a
certified home care aide as required under chapter 2, Laws of 2009 or,
if exempted from certification by RCW 18.88B.040, has not completed his
or her required training pursuant to chapter 2, Laws of 2009.
(4) Chapter 34.05 RCW shall govern actions by the department under
this section.
(5) The department shall adopt rules by August 1, ((2010)) 2013, to
implement this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 74.39A.260 and 2009 c 580 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department must perform criminal background checks for
individual providers and prospective individual providers and ensure
that the authority has ready access to any long-term care abuse and
neglect registry used by the department. Individual providers who are
hired after January 1, ((2012)) 2014, are subject to background checks
under RCW 74.39A.055.

Sec. 11 RCW 74.39A.330 and 2009 c 478 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Long-term care workers shall be offered on-the-job training or peer
mentorship for at least one hour per week in the first ninety days of
work from a long-term care worker who has completed at least twelve
hours of mentor training and is mentoring no more than ten other
workers at any given time. This requirement applies to long-term care
workers who begin work on or after ((July 1, 2011)) January 1, 2014.

Sec. 12 RCW 74.39A.340 and 2009 c 580 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of health shall ensure that all long-term care
workers shall complete twelve hours of continuing education training in
advanced training topics each year. This requirement applies beginning
on July 1, ((2011)) 2014.
(2) Completion of continuing education as required in this section
is a prerequisite to maintaining home care aide certification under
chapter 2, Laws of 2009.
(3) Unless voluntarily certified as a home care aide under chapter
2, Laws of 2009, subsection (1) of this section does not apply to((:
(a))) an individual provider caring only for his or her biological,
step, or adoptive child((; and
(b) Before June 30, 2014, a person hired as an individual provider
who provides twenty hours or less of care for one person in any
calendar month)).
(4) Only training curriculum approved by the department may be used
to fulfill the training requirements specified in this section. The
department shall only approve training curriculum that:
(a) Has been developed with input from consumer and worker
representatives; and
(b) Requires comprehensive instruction by qualified instructors.
(5) Individual providers under RCW 74.39A.270 shall be compensated
for training time required by this section.
(6) The department of health shall adopt rules by August 1,
((2010)) 2013, to implement subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this
section.
(7) The department shall adopt rules by August 1, ((2010)) 2013, to
implement subsection (4) of this section.

Sec. 13 RCW 74.39A.350 and 2009 c 580 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall offer, directly or through contract, training
opportunities sufficient for a long-term care worker to accumulate
seventy hours of training within a reasonable time period. For
individual providers represented by an exclusive bargaining
representative under RCW 74.39A.270, the training opportunities shall
be offered through the training partnership established under RCW
74.39A.360. Training topics shall include, but are not limited to:
Client rights; personal care; mental illness; dementia; developmental
disabilities; depression; medication assistance; advanced communication
skills; positive client behavior support; developing or improving
client-centered activities; dealing with wandering or aggressive client
behaviors; medical conditions; nurse delegation core training; peer
mentor training; and advocacy for quality care training. The
department may not require long-term care workers to obtain the
training described in this section. This requirement to offer advanced
training applies beginning January 1, ((2012)) 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---