BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends that the retirement
and annuity programs of the state's institutions of higher education be
revised for future participants to reflect changes that have already
occurred in state pension plans. The legislature intends also that
newly hired employees who are eligible for participation in an annuity
or retirement income plan offered by a higher education institution
have an opportunity to participate in either (1) that plan without a
supplemental benefit under RCW 28B10.400(3), or (2) in the public
employees' retirement system plan 3 or the teachers' retirement system
plan 3. Plan 3 provides a combination of defined contribution and
defined benefit pension, which will be available for newly hired
employees. Further, the legislature intends that effective July 1,
2011, state funding for annuity or retirement income plans under RCW
28B.10.400 will not exceed six percent of salary.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.10.400 and 2010 c 21 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State
College, ((and)) the state board for community and technical colleges,
and the higher education coordinating board are authorized and
empowered:
(((1))) (a) To assist the faculties and such other employees as any
such board may designate in the purchase of old age annuities or
retirement income plans under such rules as any such board may
prescribe, subject to the restrictions in subsection (2) of this
section. County agricultural agents, home demonstration agents, 4-H
club agents, and assistant county agricultural agents paid jointly by
the Washington State University and the several counties shall be
deemed to be full time employees of the Washington State University for
the purposes hereof;
(((2))) (b) To provide, under such rules and regulations as any
such board may prescribe for the faculty members or other employees
under its supervision, for the retirement of any such faculty member or
other employee on account of age or condition of health, retirement on
account of age to be not earlier than the sixty-fifth birthday:
PROVIDED, That such faculty member or such other employee may elect to
retire at the earliest age specified for retirement by federal social
security law: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any supplemental payment
authorized by (c) of this subsection (((3) of this section)) and paid
as a result of retirement earlier than age sixty-five shall be at an
actuarially reduced rate; and shall be provided only to those persons
who are employed by a higher education institution and who participate
in an annuity or retirement income plan under (a) of this subsection
prior to July 1, 2011;
(((3))) (c) To pay ((to any such retired person)) only to those
persons who are employed by a higher education institution and who
participate in an annuity or retirement income plan under (a) of this
subsection prior to July 1, 2011, or to his or her designated
beneficiary(s), each year after his or her retirement, a supplemental
amount which, when added to the amount of such annuity or retirement
income plan, or retirement income benefit pursuant to RCW 28B.10.415,
received by the retired person or the retired person's designated
beneficiary(s) in such year, will not exceed fifty percent of the
average annual salary paid to such retired person for his or her
highest two consecutive years of full time service under an annuity or
retirement income plan established pursuant to (a) of this subsection
(((1) of this section)) at an institution of higher education:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if such retired person prior to retirement
elected a supplemental payment survivors option, any such supplemental
payments to such retired person or the retired person's designated
beneficiary(s) shall be at actuarially reduced rates: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That if a faculty member or other employee of an institution
of higher education who is a participant in a retirement plan
authorized by this section dies, or has died before retirement but
after becoming eligible for retirement on account of age, the
designated beneficiary(s) shall be entitled to receive the supplemental
payment authorized by this subsection to which such designated
beneficiary(s) would have been entitled had said deceased faculty
member or other employee retired on the date of death after electing a
supplemental payment survivors option: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the
purpose of this subsection, the designated beneficiary(s) shall be
(((a))) (i) the surviving spouse of the retiree; or, (((b))) (ii) with
the written consent of such spouse, if any, such other person or
persons as shall have an insurable interest in the retiree's life and
shall have been nominated by written designation duly executed and
filed with the retiree's institution of higher education((;)).
(((4))) (2) Boards are prohibited from offering a purchased annuity
or retirement income plan authorized under this section to employees
hired on or after July 1, 2011, who have retired or are eligible to
retire from a public employees' retirement system described in chapters
41.32, 41.35, and 41.40 RCW. The higher education coordinating board
((is also authorized and empowered as described in this section,
subject to the following: The board)) shall only offer participation
in a purchased annuity or retirement income plan authorized under this
section to employees who have previously contributed premiums to a
similar qualified plan((, and the board is prohibited from offering or
funding such a plan authorized under this section for the benefit of
any retiree who is receiving or accruing a retirement allowance from a
public employees' retirement system under Title 41 RCW or chapter 43.43
RCW)).

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.10.405 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 16 are each amended
to read as follows:
Members of the faculties and such other employees as are designated
by the boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State
College, the higher education coordinating board, or the state board
for community and technical colleges ((education)) who do not opt to
become members of the teachers' retirement system or the public
employees' retirement system under section 9 or 10 of this act, or who
are not prevented from participation in an annuity or retirement plan
under RCW 28B.10.400(2) shall be required to contribute not less than
five percent of their salaries during each year of full time service
after the first two years of such service toward the purchase of such
annuity or retirement income plan; such contributions may be in
addition to federal social security tax contributions, if any.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.10.410 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 17 are each amended
to read as follows:
The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State
College, the higher education coordinating board, or the state board
for community and technical colleges ((education)) shall pay not more
than one-half of the annual premium of any annuity or retirement income
plan established under the provisions of RCW 28B.10.400 as now or
hereafter amended. Such contribution shall not exceed ten percent of
the salary of the faculty member or other employee on whose behalf the
contribution is made. This contribution may be in addition to federal
social security tax contributions made by the boards, if any.

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.10.415 and 1979 ex.s. c 259 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
The boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of
trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State
College, the higher education coordinating board, or the state board
for community and technical colleges ((education)) shall not pay any
amount to be added to the annuity or retirement income plan of any
retired person who was first hired on or after July 1, 2011, or who has
served for less than ten years in one or more of the state institutions
of higher education. In the case of persons who have served more than
ten years but less than twenty-five years no amount shall be paid in
excess of four percent of the amount authorized in ((subdivision (3)
of)) RCW 28B.10.400(1)(c) as now or hereafter amended, multiplied by
the number of years of full time service rendered by such person:
PROVIDED, That credit for years of service at an institution of higher
education shall be limited to those years in which contributions were
made by a faculty member or other employee designated pursuant to RCW
28B.10.400(1)(a) and the institution or the state as a result of which
a benefit is being received by a retired person from any Washington
state public retirement plan: PROVIDED FURTHER, That all such benefits
that a retired person is eligible to receive shall reduce any
supplementation payments provided for in RCW 28B.10.400 as now or
hereafter amended.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.10.417 and 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 19 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) This section applies only to those persons who are first
employed by a higher education institution in a position eligible for
participation in an annuity or retirement program under RCW 28B.10.400
prior to July 1, 2011.
(2) A faculty member or other employee designated by the board of
trustees of the applicable regional university or of The Evergreen
State College as being subject to an annuity or retirement income plan
and who, at the time of such designation, is a member of the Washington
state teachers' retirement system, shall retain credit for such service
in the Washington state teachers' retirement system and except as
provided in subsection (((2))) (3) of this section, shall leave his or
her accumulated contributions in the teachers' retirement fund. Upon
his or her attaining eligibility for retirement under the Washington
state teachers' retirement system, such faculty member or other
employee shall receive from the Washington state teachers' retirement
system a retirement allowance consisting of an annuity which shall be
the actuarial equivalent of his or her accumulated contributions at his
or her age when becoming eligible for such retirement and a pension for
each year of creditable service established and retained at the time of
said designation as provided in RCW 41.32.497 ((as now or hereafter
amended)). Anyone who on July 1, 1967, was receiving pension payments
from the teachers' retirement system based on thirty-five years of
creditable service shall thereafter receive a pension based on the
total years of creditable service established with the retirement
system: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That any such faculty member or other
employee who, upon attainment of eligibility for retirement under the
Washington state teachers' retirement system, is still engaged in
public educational employment, shall not be eligible to receive
benefits under the Washington state teachers' retirement system until
he or she ceases such public educational employment. Any retired
faculty member or other employee who enters service in any public
educational institution shall cease to receive pension payments while
engaged in such service: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such service may be
rendered up to seventy-five days in a school year without reduction of
pension.
(((2))) (3) A faculty member or other employee designated by the
board of trustees of the applicable regional university or of The
Evergreen State College as being subject to the annuity and retirement
income plan and who, at the time of such designation, is a member of
the Washington state teachers' retirement system may, at his or her
election and at any time, on and after midnight June 10, 1959,
terminate his or her membership in the Washington state teachers'
retirement system and withdraw his or her accumulated contributions and
interest in the teachers' retirement fund upon written application to
the board of trustees of the Washington state teachers' retirement
system. Faculty members or other employees who withdraw their
accumulated contributions, on and after the date of withdrawal of
contributions, shall no longer be members of the Washington state
teachers' retirement system and shall forfeit all rights of membership,
including pension benefits, theretofore acquired under the Washington
state teachers' retirement system.

Sec. 7 RCW 28B.10.423 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 149 s 8 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) For employees who are first employed by an institution of
higher education in a position eligible for participation in an old age
annuities or retirement income plan under chapter 28B.10 RCW prior to
July 1, 2011, it is the intent of RCW 28B.10.400, 28B.10.405,
28B.10.410, 28B.10.415, 28B.10.420, 28B.10.423 and 83.20.030 that the
retirement income resulting from the contributions described herein
from the state of Washington and the employee shall be projected
actuarially so that it shall not exceed sixty percent of the average of
the highest two consecutive years salary. Periodic review of the
retirement systems established pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, 28B.10.405,
28B.10.410, 28B.10.415, 28B.10.420, 28B.10.423, and 83.20.030 will be
undertaken at such time and in such manner as determined by the
committees on ways and means of the senate and of the house of
representatives ((and the public pension commission)), and joint
contribution rates will be adjusted if necessary to accomplish this
intent.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2011, state funding for annuity or retirement
income plans under RCW 28B.10.400 shall not exceed six percent of
salary.
(3) By July 30, 2012, and every two years thereafter, each
institution of higher education that is responsible for payment of
supplemental amounts under RCW 28B.10.400(1)(c) shall contract with the
state actuary under chapter 41.44 RCW for an actuarial valuation of
their supplemental benefit plan. At the discretion of the state
actuary, the valuation may be performed by the state actuary or by an
outside actuarial firm under contract to the office of the state
actuary. Each institution of higher education is required to provide
the data and information required for the performance of the valuation
to the office of the state actuary or to the actuary performing the
valuation on behalf of the state actuary. The state actuary may charge
each institution for the actual cost of the valuation through an
interagency agreement. Upon completion of the valuation, the state
actuary shall provide copies of the valuation to the institution of
higher education and to the select committee on pension policy and the
pension funding council.

Sec. 8 RCW 28B.10.430 and 1979 ex.s. c 96 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This section applies only to those persons who are first
employed by an institution of higher education in a position eligible
for participation in an old age annuities or retirement income plan
under chapter 28B.10 RCW prior to July 1, 2011.
(2) For any person receiving a monthly benefit pursuant to a
program established under RCW 28B.10.400, the pension portion of such
benefit shall be the sum of the following amounts:
(a) One-half of the monthly benefit payable under such program by
a life insurance company; and
(b) The monthly equivalent of the supplemental benefit described in
RCW 28B.10.400(((3))) (1)(c).
(((2))) (3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
effective July 1, 1979, no person receiving a monthly benefit pursuant
to RCW 28B.10.400 shall receive, as the pension portion of that
benefit, less than ten dollars per month for each year of service
creditable to the person whose service is the basis of the benefit.
Portions of a year shall be treated as fractions of a year and the
decimal equivalent shall be multiplied by ten dollars. Where the
benefit was adjusted at the time benefit payments to the beneficiary
commenced, the minimum pension provided in this section shall be
adjusted in a manner consistent with that adjustment.
(((3))) (4) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
effective July 1, 1979, the monthly benefit of each person who
commenced receiving a monthly benefit under this chapter as of a date
no later than July 1, 1974, shall be permanently increased by a post-retirement adjustment. Such adjustment shall be calculated as follows:
(a) Monthly benefits to which this subsection and subsection
(((2))) (3) of this section are both applicable shall be determined by
first applying subsection (((2))) (3) and then applying this
subsection. The ((department)) institution shall determine the total
years of creditable service and the total dollar benefit base accrued
as of December 31, 1978, except that this determination shall take into
account only those persons to whom this subsection applies;
(b) The ((department)) institution shall multiply the total
benefits determined in (a) of this subsection by six percent and divide
the dollar value thus determined by the total service determined in (a)
of this subsection. The resultant figure shall then be a post-
retirement increase factor which shall be applied as specified in (c)
of this subsection;
(c) Each person to whom this subsection applies shall receive an
increase which is the product of the factor determined in (b) of this
subsection multiplied by the years of creditable service.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW
to be codified under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as
follows:
(1) All faculty members who are first employed by an institution of
higher education in a position eligible for participation in old age
annuities or retirement income plans under chapter 28B.10 RCW on or
after July 1, 2011, have a period of thirty days to make an irrevocable
choice to:
(a) Become a member of the teachers' retirement system plan 3 under
chapter 41.32 RCW; or
(b) Participate in the annuities or retirement income plan provided
by the institution.
(2) At the end of thirty days, if the member has not made a choice
to become a member of the teachers' retirement system, he or she
becomes a participant in the institutions plan under RCW 28B.10.400,
but does not become eligible for any supplemental benefit under RCW
28B.10.400(1)(c).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW
to be codified under the subchapter heading "plan 3" to read as
follows:
(1) All employees who are not qualified under section 9 of this act
and who are first employed by an institution of higher education in a
position eligible for participation in old age annuities or retirement
income plans under RCW 28B.10.400 on or after July 1, 2011, have a
period of thirty days to make an irrevocable choice to:
(a) Become a member of the public employees' retirement system plan
3 under chapter 41.40 RCW; or
(b) Participate in the annuities or retirement income plan provided
by the institution.
(2) At the end of thirty days, if the member has not made a choice
to become a member of the public employees' retirement system, he or
she becomes a participant in the institutions plan under RCW
28B.10.400, but does not become eligible for any supplemental benefit
under RCW 28B.10.400(1)(c).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---