BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.160.200 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 10 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent shall annually develop a reimbursement
schedule to pay districts for the cost of ((student transportation
vehicles)) school buses purchased ((after September 1, 1982)) by school
districts. While it is the responsibility of each district to select
and pay for each student transportation vehicle purchased by the
district, each district shall be paid ((a sum based on the category of
vehicle, anticipated lifetime of vehicles of this category, and state))
the reimbursement rate ((for the category plus inflation as recognized
by the reimbursement schedule established in this section as set by the
superintendent)) of each at the end of the anticipated lifetime of
vehicles of this category, less any reimbursement payments previously
paid by the state for the bus. Categories and reimbursement rates of
vehicles shall be those established under RCW 28A.160.195. The
((accumulated value of the payments and the potential investment return
thereon)) reimbursement rate shall be designed to be equal to the
replacement cost of the vehicle less its salvage value at the end of
its anticipated lifetime. ((The superintendent shall revise at least
annually the reimbursement payments based on the current and
anticipated future cost of comparable categories of transportation
equipment.)) Reimbursements to school districts for approved
transportation equipment shall be placed in a separate transportation
vehicle fund established for each school district under RCW
28A.160.130. However, educational service districts providing student
transportation services pursuant to RCW 28A.310.180(4) and receiving
moneys generated pursuant to this section shall establish and maintain
a separate transportation vehicle account in the educational service
district's general expense fund for the purposes and subject to the
conditions under RCW 28A.160.130 and 28A.320.300.
(2) To the extent possible, districts shall operate vehicles
acquired under this section not less than the number of years or useful
lifetime now, or hereafter, assigned to the category of vehicles by the
superintendent. School districts shall properly maintain the
transportation equipment acquired under the provisions of this section,
in accordance with ((rules established by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction)) generally accepted industry
standards. If a district fails to follow generally accepted standards
of maintenance and operation, the superintendent of public instruction
shall penalize the district by deducting from future reimbursements
under this section an amount equal to the original cost of the vehicle
multiplied by the fraction of the useful lifetime or miles the vehicle
failed to operate.
(3) The superintendent shall annually develop a depreciation
schedule to recognize the cost of depreciation to districts contracting
with private carriers for student transportation. Payments on this
schedule shall be a straight line depreciation based on the original
cost of the appropriate category of vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---