BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature continues to recognize that
providing students with rigorous mathematics and science instruction is
crucial to giving all students the opportunity to obtain the
foundational knowledge they need to be successful in college or the
career of their choice. The legislature understands that school
districts must continue to move forward with high expectations for
students and therefore each school district should have a growth target
to meet to ensure that progress is being made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.657
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By December 15, 2011, each school district board of directors
shall:
(a) At an open public meeting, establish three-year, district-wide
growth targets to increase, by the end of the 2014-15 school year, the
percentage of students who meet or exceed the performance standards
established for high school graduation on the high school mathematics
and science state assessments;
(b) Direct each high school within the district to establish a
three-year growth target. Each high school's growth target shall be
subject to approval by the district board of directors. The aggregate
of the high school growth targets must meet or exceed the district-wide
growth targets established by the board of directors in accordance with
(a) of this subsection; and
(c) At an open public meeting, establish district-wide and school-level plans to achieve the mathematics and science growth targets,
which shall include efforts to address increasing graduation rates,
dropout reduction, and school attendance. The plans may include
addressing the performance of different student groups on assessments;
strategic allocation of resources; frequency of monitoring of learning
and teaching; focused professional development; supportive learning
environments; high level of family and community involvement; and any
unique circumstances or characteristics of the school district.
(2) The district growth targets shall be submitted to the state
board of education. Using the board's accountability index, the board
shall review the district growth targets. If the board determines that
the growth targets are appropriate, the board shall approve the growth
targets. If the board determines that the targets are not appropriate,
the board shall work with the school district to develop appropriate
growth targets that can be approved by the state board.
(3) Each school district board of directors shall report annually:
(a) To parents and the community in the school performance report
under RCW 28A.655.110 and at a public meeting the following
information:
(i) District-wide and school-level three-year growth targets;
(ii) Student performance relative to the growth targets
disaggregated by at least the following subgroups of students: White,
Black, Hispanic, American Indian/Alaskan Native, Asian, Pacific
Islander/Hawaiian Native, low-income, transitional bilingual, migrant,
and special education students; and
(iii) District-wide and school-level plans to achieve the
mathematics and science growth targets;
(b) To the state board of education and in a news release to the
local media, the district's progress toward meeting the district-wide
and school-level growth targets.
(4) By December 1, 2014, the state board of education shall report
to the education committees of the house of representatives and the
senate on the progress that has been made in achieving the three-year
mathematics and science growth targets, and provide recommendations to
the legislature on setting growth targets for the next three years.
(5) If, by December 1, 2014, a school district does not meet the
district's approved growth targets, the school district must develop a
plan for improvement to be reviewed and approved by the state board of
education. The state board shall develop a process for the development
and approval of a school district's improvement plan. The process
shall be modeled after the required action process in this chapter but
shall be streamlined and focused only on the achievement of the
district growth targets. The state board of education shall develop
additional measures to assess other nonassessment school improvements
as directed in RCW 28A.305.130 to determine whether the school district
is making improvements.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.305.130 and 2009 c 548 s 502 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of the state board of education is to provide advocacy
and strategic oversight of public education; implement a standards-based accountability framework that creates a unified system of
increasing levels of support for schools in order to improve student
academic achievement; provide leadership in the creation of a system
that personalizes education for each student and respects diverse
cultures, abilities, and learning styles; and promote achievement of
the goals of RCW 28A.150.210. In addition to any other powers and
duties as provided by law, the state board of education shall:
(1) Hold regularly scheduled meetings at such time and place within
the state as the board shall determine and may hold such special
meetings as may be deemed necessary for the transaction of public
business;
(2) Form committees as necessary to effectively and efficiently
conduct the work of the board;
(3) Seek advice from the public and interested parties regarding
the work of the board;
(4) For purposes of statewide accountability:
(a) ((Adopt and revise performance improvement goals in reading,
writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level, once
assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and
technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical
education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems
appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent
with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and
shall not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the
federal elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the
requirements of the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998,
each as amended. The goals may be established for all students,
economically disadvantaged students, limited English proficient
students, students with disabilities, and students from
disproportionately academically underachieving racial and ethnic
backgrounds. The board may establish school and school district goals
addressing high school graduation rates and dropout reduction goals for
students in grades seven through twelve. The board shall adopt the
goals by rule. However, before each goal is implemented, the board
shall present the goal to the education committees of the house of
representatives and the senate for the committees' review and comment
in a time frame that will permit the legislature to take statutory
action on the goal if such action is deemed warranted by the
legislature)) (i) Using the accountability index developed by the
board, review each of the three-year, district-wide growth targets
established in accordance with section 2 of this act to increase the
percentage of students who meet or exceed the performance standards
established for high school graduation on the high school mathematics
and science state assessments. If the board determines that a
district's growth targets are reasonable, the board shall approve the
growth targets. If the board determines that the targets are not
reasonable, the board shall work with the school district to develop
reasonable growth targets that can be approved by the state board;
(ii) Beginning December 1, 2014, for those districts that do not
meet or exceed the growth target, review and, if appropriate, approve
a school district's improvement plan. The board shall develop a
process for approval of a school district's improvement plan. The
process shall be modeled after the required action process in chapter
28A.657 RCW but shall be streamlined and focused only on the
achievement of the district growth targets. The state board of
education shall develop additional measures to assess other
nonassessment school improvements to determine whether the school
district is making growth in nonassessment areas, such as dropout
reduction and attendance, to be used as part of the accountability
index or in addition to the index in the future;
(b) Identify the scores students must achieve in order to meet the
standard on the Washington assessment of student learning and, for high
school students, to obtain a certificate of academic achievement. The
board shall also determine student scores that identify levels of
student performance below and beyond the standard. The board shall
consider the incorporation of the standard error of measurement into
the decision regarding the award of the certificates. The board shall
set such performance standards and levels in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and after consideration of any
recommendations that may be developed by any advisory committees that
may be established for this purpose. The initial performance standards
and any changes recommended by the board in the performance standards
for the tenth grade assessment shall be presented to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by November
30th of the school year in which the changes will take place to permit
the legislature to take statutory action before the changes are
implemented if such action is deemed warranted by the legislature. The
legislature shall be advised of the initial performance standards and
any changes made to the elementary level performance standards and the
middle school level performance standards;
(c) Annually review the assessment reporting system to ensure
fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of opportunity, especially
with regard to schools with special circumstances and unique
populations of students, and a recommendation to the superintendent of
public instruction of any improvements needed to the system; and
(d) Include in the biennial report required under RCW 28A.305.035,
information on the progress that has been made in achieving goals
adopted by the board;
(5) Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and
procedures as may be established by the state board of education, all
private schools that apply for accreditation, and approve, subject to
the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, private schools carrying out a
program for any or all of the grades kindergarten through twelve:
PROVIDED, That no private school may be approved that operates a
kindergarten program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no private schools
shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret
societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school
officials;
(6) Articulate with the institutions of higher education, workforce
representatives, and early learning policymakers and providers to
coordinate and unify the work of the public school system;
(7) Hire an executive director and an administrative assistant to
reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
administrative purposes. Any other personnel of the board shall be
appointed as provided by RCW 28A.300.020. The board may delegate to
the executive director by resolution such duties as deemed necessary to
efficiently carry on the business of the board including, but not
limited to, the authority to employ necessary personnel and the
authority to enter into, amend, and terminate contracts on behalf of
the board. The executive director, administrative assistant, and all
but one of the other personnel of the board are exempt from civil
service, together with other staff as now or hereafter designated as
exempt in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW; and
(8) Adopt a seal that shall be kept in the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.657
RCW to read as follows:
For purposes of statewide accountability, the state board of
education may adopt and revise performance improvement goals in
reading, writing, science, and mathematics, by subject and grade level,
once assessments in these subjects are required statewide; academic and
technical skills, as appropriate, in secondary career and technical
education programs; and student attendance, as the board deems
appropriate to improve student learning. The goals shall be consistent
with student privacy protection provisions of RCW 28A.655.090(7) and
may not conflict with requirements contained in Title I of the federal
elementary and secondary education act of 1965, or the requirements of
the Carl D. Perkins vocational education act of 1998, each as amended.
The goals may be established for all students, including economically
disadvantaged students, limited English proficient students, students
with disabilities, and students from disproportionately academically
underachieving racial and ethnic backgrounds. The board may establish
school and school district goals addressing high school graduation
rates and dropout reduction goals for students in grades seven through
twelve. The board shall adopt the goals by rule. However, before each
goal is implemented, the board shall present the goal to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the
committees' review and comment in a time frame that will permit the
legislature to take statutory action on the goal if such action is
deemed warranted by the legislature.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.655.100 and 1999 c 388 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If the state board of education establishes performance
improvement goals, each school district board of directors shall:
(((1)))(a) Annually report to parents and to the community in a
public meeting and annually report in writing the following
information:
(i) District-wide and school-level performance improvement goals;
(ii) Student performance relative to the goals; and
(iii) District-wide and school-level plans to achieve the goals,
including curriculum and instruction, parental or guardian involvement,
and resources available to parents and guardians to help students meet
the state standards;
(b) Report annually in a news release to the local media the
district's progress toward meeting the district-wide and school-level
goals; and
(c) Include the school-level goals, student performance relative to
the goals, and a summary of school-level plans to achieve the goals in
each school's annual school performance report under RCW 28A.655.110.
(2) School districts in which ten or fewer students in the district
or in a school in the district are eligible to be assessed in a grade
level are not required to report numerical improvement goals and
performance relative to the goals, but are required to report to
parents and the community their plans to improve student achievement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---