BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that increasing the
use of public-private and public-public partnerships between the
state's natural resources agencies and private sector and other public
sector agencies provides a significant opportunity to increase
efficiency, reduce agency costs, encourage innovation and enterprise,
and develop partnerships that will benefit the people of Washington in
this time of limited state resources by preserving access to
recreational opportunities on state lands as well as key services
performed by natural resources agencies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79A.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The natural resources partnership office is created in order to
identify and facilitate the development of opportunities for public-private and public-public partnerships with a substantial likelihood to
increase efficiency or reduce costs in order to facilitate the
preservation of access to recreational opportunities on state lands as
well as key services performed by natural resources agencies.
(2) For administrative purposes, the natural resources partnership
office is located within the recreation and conservation office. The
staff of the natural resources partnership office may consist of no
more than two full-time equivalent positions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79A.25 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The natural resources partnership office shall:
(a) Work cooperatively with the department of natural resources,
the department of fish and wildlife, and the state parks and recreation
commission in order to identify and evaluate the current utilization of
public-private and public-public partnerships in the management of the
state's natural resources;
(b) Make recommendations to the department of natural resources,
the department of fish and wildlife, and the state parks and recreation
commission on specific functions, activities, and services for which a
partnership is likely to facilitate achievement of one or more of the
goals stated in section 2(1) of this act;
(c) Serve as a resource for the department of natural resources,
the department of fish and wildlife, and the state parks and recreation
commission to facilitate the use of partnerships in the management of
the state's natural resources, including working with relevant state
agencies to assist the natural resources agencies to resolve personnel,
contract, and issues relating to such partnerships, and by serving as
a liaison to potential private and public sector partners; and
(d) By December 1st of each year, provide a summary report to the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature containing
information including:
(i) The current utilization of partnerships in the management of
the state's natural resources, including outcomes resulting from such
partnerships;
(ii) Recommendations made that year under (b) of this subsection,
including anticipated outcomes resulting from such recommendations; and
(iii) Any recommended statutory changes in order to facilitate the
use and effectiveness of partnerships.
(2) The department of natural resources, the department of fish and
wildlife, and the state parks and recreation commission shall:
(a) Work cooperatively with the natural resources partnership
office as it carries out its duties under subsection (1) of this
section, including providing information relevant to inquiries from the
office; and
(b) Implement the recommendations of the natural resources
partnership office under subsection (1)(b) of this section.

--- END ---