BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.115.020 and 1991 c 332 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(2) "Department" means the state department of health.
(3) "Eligible education and training programs" means education and
training programs approved by the department that lead to eligibility
for a credential as a credentialed health care professional.
(4) "Eligible expenses" means reasonable expenses associated with
the costs of acquiring an education such as tuition, books, equipment,
fees, room and board, and other expenses determined by the board.
(5) "Eligible student" means a student who has been accepted into
an eligible education or training program and has a declared intention
to serve in a health professional shortage area upon completion of the
education or training program.
(6) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means to render
health care services in a health professional shortage area in the
state of Washington in lieu of monetary repayment.
(7) "Health professional shortage areas" means those areas where
credentialed health care professionals are in short supply as a result
of geographic maldistribution or as the result of a short supply of
credentialed health care professionals in specialty health care areas
and where vacancies exist in serious numbers that jeopardize patient
care and pose a threat to the public health and safety. The department
shall determine health professional shortage areas as provided for in
RCW 28B.115.070((, or until June 1, 1992, as provided for in RCW
28B.115.060)). In making health professional shortage area
designations in the state the department may be guided by applicable
federal standards for "health manpower shortage areas," and "medically
underserved areas," and "medically underserved populations."
(8) "Credentialed health care profession" means a health care
profession regulated by a disciplining authority in the state of
Washington under RCW 18.130.040 or by the state board of pharmacy under
chapter 18.64 RCW and designated by the department in RCW
28B.115.070((, or until June 1, 1992, as established in RCW
28B.115.060)) as a profession having shortages of credentialed health
care professionals in the state.
(9) "Credentialed health care professional" means a person
regulated by a disciplining authority in the state of Washington to
practice a health care profession under RCW 18.130.040 or by the state
board of pharmacy under chapter 18.64 RCW.
(10) "Loan repayment" means a loan that is paid in full or in part
if the participant renders health care services in a health
professional shortage area as defined by the department.
(11) "Nonshortage rural area" means a nonurban area of the state of
Washington that has not been designated as a rural physician shortage
area. The department shall identify the nonshortage rural areas of the
state.
(12) "Participant" means a credentialed health care professional
who has received a loan repayment award and has commenced practice as
a credentialed health care provider in a designated health professional
shortage area or an eligible student who has received a scholarship
under this program.
(13) "Program" means the health professional loan repayment and
scholarship program.
(14) "Required service obligation" means an obligation by the
participant to provide health care services in a health professional
shortage area for a period to be established as provided for in this
chapter.
(15) "Rural physician shortage area" means rural geographic areas
where primary care physicians are in short supply as a result of
geographic maldistributions and where their limited numbers jeopardize
patient care and pose a threat to public health and safety. The
department shall designate rural physician shortage areas.
(16) "Satisfied" means paid-in-full.
(17) "Scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in whole or in
part if the recipient renders health care services in a health
professional shortage area.
(18) "Sponsoring community" means a rural hospital or hospitals as
authorized in chapter 70.41 RCW, a rural health care facility or
facilities as authorized in chapter 70.175 RCW, or a city or county
government or governments.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.115.110 and 1991 c 332 s 24 and 1991 c 164 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Participants in the health professional loan repayment and
scholarship program who are awarded loan repayments shall receive
payment from the program for the purpose of repaying educational loans
secured while attending a program of health professional training which
led to a credential as a credentialed health professional in the state
of Washington.
(1) Participants shall agree to meet the required service
obligation in a designated health professional shortage area.
(2) Repayment shall be limited to eligible educational and living
expenses as determined by the board and shall include principal and
interest.
(3) Loans from both government and private sources may be repaid by
the program. Participants shall agree to allow the board access to
loan records and to acquire information from lenders necessary to
verify eligibility and to determine payments. Loans may not be
renegotiated with lenders to accelerate repayment.
(4) Repayment of loans established pursuant to this program shall
begin no later than ninety days after the individual has become a
participant. Payments shall be made quarterly, or more frequently if
deemed appropriate by the board, to the participant until the loan is
repaid or the participant becomes ineligible due to discontinued
service in a health professional shortage area or after the required
service obligation when eligibility discontinues, whichever comes
first.
(5) Should the participant discontinue service in a health
professional shortage area, payments against the loans of the
participants shall cease to be effective on the date that the
participant discontinues service.
(6) Except for circumstances beyond their control, participants who
serve less than the required service obligation shall be obligated to
repay to the program an amount equal to twice the total amount paid by
the program on their behalf ((in addition to any payments on the
unsatisfied portion of the principal and interest)). This amount is
due and payable immediately. Participants who are unable to pay the
full amount due shall enter into a payment arrangement with the board,
including an arrangement for payment of interest. The maximum period
for repayment is ten years. The board shall determine the
applicability of this subsection. The interest rate shall be
determined by the board and be established by rule.
(7) The board is responsible for the collection of payments made on
behalf of participants from the participants who discontinue service
before completion of the required service obligation. The board shall
exercise due diligence in such collection, maintaining all necessary
records to ensure that the maximum amount of payment made on behalf of
the participant is recovered. Collection under this section shall be
pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment if
necessary.
(8) The board shall not be held responsible for any outstanding
payments on principal and interest to any lenders once a participant's
eligibility expires.
(9) The board shall temporarily or, in special circumstances,
permanently defer the requirements of this section for eligible
students as defined in RCW 28B.10.017.
(10) The board shall establish an appeal process by rule.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.115.120 and 1993 c 423 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Participants in the health professional loan repayment and
scholarship program who are awarded scholarships incur an obligation to
repay the scholarship, with penalty and interest, unless they serve the
required service obligation in a health professional shortage area in
the state of Washington.
(2) The interest rate shall be ((eight percent for the first four
years of repayment and ten percent beginning with the fifth year of
repayment)) determined by the board and established by rule.
(3) The period for repayment shall coincide with the required
service obligation, with payments of principal and interest ((accruing
quarterly)) commencing no later than ((nine)) six months from the date
the participant completes or discontinues the course of study or
completes or discontinues the required ((residency)) postgraduate
training. Provisions for deferral of payment shall be determined by
the board.
(4) The entire principal and interest of each payment shall be
forgiven for each payment period in which the participant serves in a
health professional shortage area until the entire repayment obligation
is satisfied or the borrower ceases to so serve. Should the
participant cease to serve in a health professional shortage area of
this state before the participant's repayment obligation is completed,
payment((s on)) of the unsatisfied portion of the principal and
interest ((shall begin the next payment period and continue until the
remainder of the participant's repayment obligation is satisfied)) is
due and payable immediately.
(5) In addition to the amount determined in subsection (4) of this
section, except for circumstances beyond their control, participants
who serve less than the required service obligation shall be obliged to
((repay to the program)) pay a penalty of an amount equal to twice the
((total amount paid by the program on their behalf)) unsatisfied
portion of the principal.
(((5))) (6) Participants who are unable to pay the full amount due
shall enter into a payment arrangement with the board for repayment
including interest. The maximum period for repayment is ten years.
(7) The board is responsible for collection of repayments made
under this section and shall exercise due diligence in such collection,
maintaining all necessary records to ensure that maximum repayments are
made. Collection and servicing of repayments under this section shall
be pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment
if necessary, and shall be performed by entities approved for such
servicing by the Washington student loan guaranty association or its
successor agency. The board is responsible to forgive all or parts of
such repayments under the criteria established in this section and
shall maintain all necessary records of forgiven payments.
(((6))) (8) Receipts from the payment of principal or interest or
any other subsidies to which the board as administrator is entitled,
which are paid by or on behalf of participants under this section,
shall be deposited with the board and shall be used to cover the costs
of granting the scholarships, maintaining necessary records, and making
collections under subsection (((5))) (7) of this section. The board
shall maintain accurate records of these costs, and all receipts beyond
those necessary to pay such costs shall be used to grant scholarships
to eligible students.
(((7))) (9) Sponsoring communities who financially contribute to
the eligible financial expenses of eligible medical students may enter
into agreements with the student to require repayment should the
student not serve the required service obligation in the community as
a primary care physician. The board may develop criteria for the
content of such agreements with respect to reasonable provisions and
obligations between communities and eligible students.
(((8))) (10) The board may make exceptions to the conditions for
participation and repayment obligations should circumstances beyond the
control of individual participants warrant such exceptions. The board
shall establish an appeal process by rule.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.102.060 and 2004 c 58 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Participants in the conditional scholarship program incur an
obligation to repay the conditional scholarship, with interest and an
equalization fee, unless they teach for two years in an approved
education program for each year of scholarship received, under rules
adopted by the board. Participants who teach in a designated teacher
shortage area shall have one year of loan canceled for each year they
teach in the shortage area.
(2) The interest rate shall be determined ((annually)) by the
board. Participants who fail to complete the teaching service shall
incur an equalization fee based on the remaining unforgiven balance of
the loan. The equalization fee shall be added to the remaining balance
and repaid by the participant.
(3) The minimum payment shall be set by the board. The maximum
period for repayment shall be ten years, with payments of principal and
interest ((accruing quarterly)) commencing six months from the date the
participant completes or discontinues the course of study. The
interest rate shall be determined by the board and be established by
rule. Provisions for deferral of payment shall be determined by the
board. The board shall establish an appeal process by rule.
(4) The entire principal and interest of each payment shall be
forgiven for each payment period in which the participant teaches in an
approved education program until the entire repayment obligation is
satisfied. Should the participant cease to teach in an approved
education program in this state before the participant's repayment
obligation is completed, payments on the unsatisfied portion of the
principal and interest shall begin the next payment period and continue
until the remainder of the participant's repayment obligation is
satisfied.
(5) The board is responsible for collection of repayments made
under this section and shall exercise due diligence in such collection,
maintaining all necessary records to insure that maximum repayments are
made. Collection and servicing of repayments under this section shall
be pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment
if necessary. The board is responsible to forgive all or parts of such
repayments under the criteria established in this section and shall
maintain all necessary records of forgiven payments.
(6) Receipts from the payment of principal or interest or any other
subsidies to which the board as administrator is entitled, which are
paid by or on behalf of participants under this section, shall be
deposited in the future teachers conditional scholarship account and
shall be used to cover the costs of granting the conditional
scholarships, maintaining necessary records, and making collections
under subsection (5) of this section. The board shall maintain
accurate records of these costs, and all receipts beyond those
necessary to pay such costs shall be used to grant conditional
scholarships to eligible students.
(7) The board shall adopt rules to define the terms of repayment,
including applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 RCW 28B.115.060 (Eligible credentialed
health care professions -- Required service obligations) and 1991 c 332
s 19 are each repealed.

--- END ---