BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that research has
shown the importance of reducing environmental impacts through building
design. The primary focus on building designs has been an attempt to
reduce energy requirements, primarily heating and cooling, over the
course of a building's lifetime. However, what has been overlooked are
opportunities to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and other
environmental impacts at earlier stages in the building and
construction design process. The selection of building materials and
products, such as using wood and wood products in the design stage,
provides substantial opportunities to reduce lifetime greenhouse gas
emissions. A key component of life-cycle cost analysis is the energy
expended in the extraction, transportation, manufacturing, and
production of the building materials being considered in the
construction of buildings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The University of Washington, in
conjunction with a nonprofit consortium involved in research on
renewable industrial materials, in consultation with the state building
code council, shall conduct a review of other states' existing codes,
international standards, and literature on life-cycle assessment,
embodied energy, and embodied carbon in building materials.
(2) By July 2012, the University of Washington, in conjunction with
a nonprofit consortium involved in research on renewable industrial
materials, shall make recommendations to the legislature for
methodologies to: (1) Conduct an assessment and determine the amount
of embodied energy and carbon in building materials or greenhouse gas
emissions avoided by using building materials with low-embodied energy
or carbon; and (2) develop a comprehensive guideline using a common and
consistent metric for the embodied energy and carbon in building
materials. The University of Washington, in conjunction with a
nonprofit consortium involved in research on renewable industrial
materials, shall seek input from building materials industries and
other interested parties when developing its recommendations. The
department of general administration shall make recommendations for
streamlining current statutory requirements for life-cycle cost
analysis, energy conservation in design, and high performance of public
buildings.

--- END ---