BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.25.020 and 1995 c 374 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
When used in this chapter the following terms shall have the
indicated meanings, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department or his duly
authorized representative.
(3) "Person" means any natural person, firm, partnership, exchange,
association, trustee, receiver, corporation, and any member, officer,
or employee thereof, or assignee for the benefit of creditors.
(4) "Adulterated" applies to any egg or egg product under one or
more of the following circumstances:
(a) If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance
which may render it injurious to health; but in case the substance is
not an added substance, such article shall not be considered
adulterated under this clause if the quantity of such substance in or
on such article does not ordinarily render it injurious to health;
(b) If it bears or contains any added poisonous or added
deleterious substance (other than one which is: (i) A pesticide
chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity; (ii) a food additive;
or (iii) a color additive) which may, in the judgment of the director,
make such article unfit for human food;
(c) If it is, in whole or in part, a raw agricultural commodity and
such commodity bears or contains a pesticide chemical which is unsafe
within the meaning of RCW 69.04.392, as enacted or hereafter amended;
(d) If it bears or contains any food additive which is unsafe
within the meaning of RCW 69.04.394, as enacted or hereafter amended;
(e) If it bears or contains any color additive which is unsafe
within the meaning of RCW 69.04.396, as enacted or hereafter amended:
PROVIDED, That an article which is not otherwise deemed adulterated
under subsection (4)(c), (d), or (e) of this section shall nevertheless
be deemed adulterated if use of the pesticide chemical, food additive,
or color additive, in or on such article, is prohibited by regulations
of the director in official plants;
(f) If it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or
decomposed substance, or if it is otherwise unfit for human food;
(g) If it consists in whole or in part of any damaged egg or eggs
to the extent that the egg meat or white is leaking, or it has been
contacted by egg meat or white leaking from other eggs;
(h) If it has been prepared, packaged, or held under insanitary
conditions whereby it may have become contaminated with filth, or
whereby it may have been rendered injurious to health;
(i) If it is an egg which has been subjected to incubation or the
product of any egg which has been subjected to incubation;
(j) If its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any
poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents
injurious to health;
(k) If it has been intentionally subjected to radiation, unless the
use of the radiation was in conformity with a regulation or exemption
in effect pursuant to RCW 69.04.394; or
(l) If any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part
omitted or abstracted therefrom; or if any substance has been
substituted, wholly or in part therefor; or if damage or inferiority
has been concealed in any manner; or if any substance has been added
thereto or mixed or packed therewith so as to increase its bulk or
weight, or reduce its quality or strength, or make it appear better or
of greater value than it is.
(5) "Capable of use as human food" shall apply to any egg or egg
product unless it is denatured, or otherwise identified, as required by
regulations prescribed by the director, to deter its use as human food.
(6) "Intrastate commerce" means any eggs or egg products in
intrastate commerce, whether such eggs or egg products are intended for
sale, held for sale, offered for sale, sold, stored, transported, or
handled in this state in any manner and prepared for eventual
distribution in this state, whether at wholesale or retail.
(7) "Container" or "package" includes any box, can, tin, plastic,
or other receptacle, wrapper, or cover.
(8) "Immediate container" means any consumer package, or any other
container in which egg products, not consumer-packaged, are packed.
(9) "Shipping container" means any container used in packaging a
product packed in an immediate container.
(10) "Egg handler" or "dealer" means any person who produces,
contracts for or obtains possession or control of any eggs or egg
products for the purpose of sale to another dealer or retailer, or for
processing and sale to a dealer, retailer or consumer: PROVIDED, That
for the purpose of this chapter, "sell" or "sale" includes the
following: Offer for sale, expose for sale, have in possession for
sale, exchange, barter, trade, or as an inducement for the sale of
another product.
(11) "Egg product" means any dried, frozen, or liquid eggs, with or
without added ingredients, excepting products which contain eggs only
in a relatively small proportion, or historically have not been, in the
judgment of the director, considered by consumers as products of the
egg food industry, and which may be exempted by the director under such
conditions as he may prescribe to assure that the egg ingredients are
not adulterated and such products are not represented as egg products.
(12) "Egg" means the shell egg of the domesticated chicken, turkey,
duck, goose, or guinea, or any other specie of fowl.
(13) "Check" means an egg that has a broken shell or crack in the
shell but has its shell membranes intact and contents not leaking.
(14) "Clean and sound shell egg" means any egg whose shell is free
of adhering dirt or foreign material and is not cracked or broken.
(15) "Dirty egg" means an egg that has a shell that is unbroken and
has adhering dirt or foreign material.
(16) "Incubator reject" means an egg that has been subjected to
incubation and has been removed from incubation during the hatching
operations as infertile or otherwise unhatchable.
(17) "Inedible" means eggs of the following descriptions: Black
rots, yellow rots, white rots, mixed rots (addled eggs), sour eggs,
eggs with green whites, eggs with stuck yolks, moldy eggs, musty eggs,
eggs showing blood rings, and eggs containing embryo chicks (at or
beyond the blood ring stage).
(18) "Leaker" means an egg that has a crack or break in the shell
and shell membranes to the extent that the egg contents are exposed or
are exuding or free to exude through the shell.
(19) "Loss" means an egg that is unfit for human food because it is
smashed or broken so that its contents are leaking; or overheated,
frozen, or contaminated; or an incubator reject; or because it contains
a bloody white, large meat spots, a large quantity of blood, or other
foreign material.
(20) "Restricted egg" means any check, dirty egg, incubator reject,
inedible, leaker, or loss.
(21) "Inspection" means the application of such inspection methods
and techniques as are deemed necessary by the director to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.
(22) "Inspector" means any employee or official of the department
authorized to inspect eggs or egg products under the authority of this
chapter.
(23) "Misbranded" shall apply to egg products which are not labeled
and packaged in accordance with the requirements prescribed by
regulations of the director under RCW 69.25.100.
(24) "Official certificate" means any certificate prescribed by
regulations of the director for issuance by an inspector or other
person performing official functions under this chapter.
(25) "Official device" means any device prescribed or authorized by
the director for use in applying any official mark.
(26) "Official inspection legend" means any symbol prescribed by
regulations of the director showing that egg products were inspected in
accordance with this chapter.
(27) "Official mark" means the official inspection legend or any
other symbol prescribed by regulations of the director to identify the
status of any article under this chapter.
(28) "Official plant" means any plant which is licensed under the
provisions of this chapter, at which inspection of the processing of
egg products is maintained by the United States department of
agriculture or by the state under cooperative agreements with the
United States department of agriculture or by the state.
(29) "Official standards" means the standards of quality, grades,
and weight classes for eggs, adopted under the provisions of this
chapter.
(30) "Pasteurize" means the subjecting of each particle of egg
products to heat or other treatments to destroy harmful, viable micro-organisms by such processes as may be prescribed by regulations of the
director.
(31) "Pesticide chemical", "food additive", "color additive", and
"raw agricultural commodity" shall have the same meaning for purposes
of this chapter as prescribed in chapter 69.04 RCW.
(32) "Plant" means any place of business where egg products are
processed.
(33) "Processing" means manufacturing egg products, including
breaking eggs or filtering, mixing, blending, pasteurizing,
stabilizing, cooling, freezing, drying, or packaging egg products.
(34) "Retailer" means any person in intrastate commerce who sells
eggs to a consumer.
(35) "At retail" means any transaction in intrastate commerce
between a retailer and a consumer.
(36) "Consumer" means any person who purchases eggs for his or her
own family use or consumption; or any restaurant, hotel, boarding
house, bakery, or other institution or concern which purchases eggs for
serving to guests or patrons thereof, or for its own use in cooking or
baking.
(37) "Candling" means the examination of the interior of eggs by
the use of transmitted light used in a partially dark room or place.
(38) "Master license system" means the mechanism established by
chapter 19.02 RCW by which master licenses, endorsed for individual
state-issued licenses, are issued and renewed utilizing a master
application and a master license expiration date common to each
renewable license endorsement.
(39) "Ambient temperature" means the atmospheric temperature
surrounding or encircling shell eggs.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.25.050 and 1995 c 374 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall act as an egg handler or dealer without first
obtaining an annual license and permanent dealer's number from the
department; such license shall expire on the master license expiration
date. Application for an egg dealer license or egg dealer branch
license, shall be made through the master license system. The annual
egg dealer license fee shall be thirty dollars and the annual egg
dealer branch license fee shall be fifteen dollars. A copy of the
master license shall be posted at each location where such licensee
operates. Such application shall include the full name of the
applicant for the license and the location of each facility he intends
to operate.
(2) Effective August 1, 2012, new and renewal applications must
include proof that all eggs and egg products provided in intrastate
commerce by the applicant are produced by commercial egg layer
operations with a current certification under the 2010 version of the
united egg producers animal husbandry guidelines for United States egg
laying flocks for conventional cage systems or cage-free systems as
applicable, or a subsequent version as adopted, or modified and
adopted, by the director in rule.
(3) Effective August 1, 2012, all new and renewal applications must
include proof that all eggs and egg products provided in intrastate
commerce by the applicant are produced by commercial egg layer
operations whose cage systems installed after August 1, 2011, are
approved by, or convertible to, the American humane association
facility system plan for enriched colony housing in effect on January
1, 2011, or a subsequent version as adopted, or modified and adopted,
by the director in rule.
(4) Applicants with fewer than three thousand laying chickens are
exempt from the requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this
section.
(5) If such applicant is an individual, receiver, trustee, firm,
partnership, association or corporation, the full name of each member
of the firm or partnership or the names of the officers of the
association or corporation shall be given on the application. Such
application shall further state the principal business address of the
applicant in the state and elsewhere and the name of a person domiciled
in this state authorized to receive and accept service of summons of
legal notices of all kinds for the applicant and any other necessary
information prescribed by the director.
(6) Upon the approval of the application and compliance with the
provisions of this chapter, including the applicable ((regulations))
rules adopted hereunder by the department, the applicant shall be
issued a license or renewal thereof.
(7) Such license and permanent egg handler or dealer's number shall
be nontransferable.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.25.250 and 1995 c 374 s 29 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is hereby levied an assessment not to exceed three mills
per dozen eggs entering intrastate commerce, as prescribed by rules
((and regulations)) issued by the director. Such assessment shall be
applicable to all eggs entering intrastate commerce except as provided
in RCW 69.25.170 and 69.25.290. Such assessment shall be paid to the
director on a monthly basis on or before the tenth day following the
month such eggs enter intrastate commerce. The director may require
reports by egg handlers or dealers along with the payment of the
assessment fee. Such reports may include any and all pertinent
information necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The
director may, by ((regulations)) rule, require egg container
manufacturers to report on a monthly basis all egg containers sold to
any egg handler or dealer and bearing such egg handler or dealer's
permanent number.
(2) Egg products in intrastate commerce are exempt from the
assessment in subsection (1) of this section.

--- END ---