BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) Representatives from the department
of social and health services and the department of health shall
examine the best regulatory practices that will facilitate and support
integration of primary care and behavioral health care in a county
located in southwest Washington with a population between one hundred
thousand and one hundred fifty thousand. These representatives shall
form a committee with representatives of a public health agency, mental
health treatment agency, and drug abuse prevention agency in such a
county to review the regulatory practices that have an impact on
integration, including impacts on mental health, chemical dependency,
and federal qualified health centers. This review must include:
(i) Streamlined and simplified electronic data management and
reporting through a single-data management system that facilitates:
Tracking of clients across primary care and behavioral health settings
and communication across care delivery systems; caseload-based care
management and consultation; outcome tracking and evidence-based,
measurement-based care; and performance-based contracting;
(ii) Consolidation of licensing procedures across systems;
(iii) Provision of blended and flexible funding; and
(iv) Simplified and consistent administrative procedures concerning
access to care which empower treatment professionals to authorize
appropriate treatment interventions.
(b) The committee shall provide a preliminary report to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature on December 1,
2011. This report must include a description of barriers and
timetables applicable to the implementation of the best regulatory
practices to support integration in such a county, and an assessment of
whether these practices would be feasible or beneficial if they were to
be implemented across the state. The committee shall provide a final
report on December 1, 2012.
(2) The department of social and health services shall: (a)
Complete the process it has undertaken for the purpose of developing
integrated rules or legislation for chemical dependency, problem
gambling, and community mental health agencies by December 1, 2011; and
(b) expand its process to include an analysis of the barriers to
integration with rules or legislation applicable to federal qualified
health centers seeking to offer integrated primary and behavioral
health care by December 1, 2012.

--- END ---