BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the Puget
Sound region is faced with growing traffic congestion and has limited
ability to expand freeway capacity due to financial, environmental, and
physical constraints. Freeway high occupancy vehicle lanes have been
an effective means of providing transit, vanpools, and carpools with a
fast trip on congested freeway corridors, but in many cases, these
lanes operate beyond their capacity during peak commute times.
It is the intent of the legislature to improve mobility for people
and goods by maximizing the effectiveness of the freeway system. An
express toll lanes network is one approach for managing the use of
freeway high occupancy vehicle lanes and, at the same time, generating
funds to improve the Interstate 405 and state route number 167
corridor. The legislature acknowledges that as one of the most
congested freeway sections in the state, the combined Interstate 405
and state route number 167 corridor serves as an ideal candidate for
the use of an express toll lanes network. An express toll lanes
network could provide benefits for movement of vehicles and people, as
well as having the potential to generate revenue for other improvements
in the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 corridor.
The legislature also recognizes the need for geographic balance and
regional equity in decisions regarding tolling and pricing, and intends
to consider the implementation of express toll lanes on other
facilities in the region in the future. It is further the intent of
the legislature to use its evaluation of initial express toll lanes on
Interstate 405 to guide additions to the express toll lanes network,
particularly in the most congested areas of the Interstate 405 and
state route number 167 corridor, such as the Renton-to-Bellevue segment
and the Interstate 405/state route number 167 interchange, with the
ultimate goal of continuous express toll lanes from Puyallup to
Lynnwood.
Therefore, it is the intent of this act to direct the department of
transportation to develop and operate express toll lanes on Interstate
405 between the city of Bellevue on the south end and Interstate 5 on
the north end and to conduct an evaluation of that project to determine
the impacts on the movement of vehicles and people through the
Interstate 405 and state route number 167 corridor, effectiveness for
transit, carpools and single occupancy vehicles, and feasibility of
financing capacity improvements through tolls.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.56.810 and 2008 c 122 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Tolling authority" means the governing body that is legally
empowered to review and adjust toll rates. Unless otherwise delegated,
the transportation commission is the tolling authority for all state
highways.
(2) "Eligible toll facility" or "eligible toll facilities" means
portions of the state highway system specifically identified by the
legislature including, but not limited to, transportation corridors,
bridges, crossings, interchanges, on-ramps, off-ramps, approaches,
bistate facilities, and interconnections between highways.
(3) "Toll revenue" or "revenue from an eligible toll facility"
means toll receipts, all interest income derived from the investment of
toll receipts, and any gifts, grants, or other funds received for the
benefit of the eligible toll facility.
(4) "Express toll lanes" means one or more high occupancy vehicle
lanes of a highway in which the department charges tolls primarily as
a means of regulating access to or use of the lanes to maintain travel
speed and reliability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
under the subchapter heading "toll facilities created after July 1,
2008" to read as follows:
(1) The imposition of tolls for express toll lanes on Interstate
405 between the junctions with Interstate 5 on the north end and NE 6th
Street in the city of Bellevue on the south end is authorized,
Interstate 405 is designated an eligible toll facility, and toll
revenue generated in the corridor must only be expended as allowed
under RCW 47.56.820.
(2) Tolls for the express toll lanes must be set as follows:
(a) The schedule of toll rates must be set by the tolling authority
pursuant to RCW 47.56.850. Toll rates may vary in amount by time of
day, level of traffic congestion within the highway facility, or other
criteria, as the tolling authority deems appropriate.
(b) In those locations with two express toll lanes in each
direction, the toll rate must be the same in both lanes.
(c) Toll charges may not be assessed on transit buses and vanpools.
(d) The department shall establish performance standards for travel
time, speed, and reliability for the express toll lanes project. The
department must automatically adjust the toll rate within the schedule
established by the tolling authority, using dynamic tolling, to ensure
that average vehicle speeds in the lanes remain above forty-five miles
per hour at least ninety percent of the time during peak hours.
(e) The tolling authority shall periodically review the toll rates
against traffic performance of all lanes to determine if the toll rates
are effectively maintaining travel time, speed, and reliability on the
highway facilities.
(3) The department may construct and operate express toll lanes on
Interstate 405 between the city of Bellevue on the south end and
Interstate 5 on the north end. Operation of the express toll lanes may
not commence until the department has completed capacity improvements
necessary to provide a two-lane system from NE 6th Street in the city
of Bellevue to state route number 522 and the conversion of the
existing high occupancy vehicle lane to an express toll lane between
state route number 522 and the city of Lynnwood. The department shall
work with local jurisdictions to monitor impacts to local streets and,
after consultation with local jurisdictions, recommend mitigation
measures to the legislature in those locations where it is appropriate.
(4) The department shall monitor the express toll lanes project and
shall annually report to the transportation commission and the
legislature on the impacts from the project on the following
performance measures:
(a) Whether the express toll lanes maintain speeds of forty-five
miles per hour at least ninety percent of the time during peak periods;
(b) Whether the average traffic speed changed in the general
purpose lanes;
(c) Whether transit ridership changed;
(d) Whether the actual use of the express toll lanes is consistent
with the projected use;
(e) Whether the express toll lanes generated sufficient revenue to
pay for operating costs;
(f) Whether travel times and volumes have increased or decreased on
adjacent local streets and state highways; and
(g) Whether the actual gross revenues are consistent with projected
gross revenues.
(5) A violation of the lane restrictions applicable to the express
toll lanes established under this section is a traffic infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
under the subchapter heading "toll facilities created after July 1,
2008" to read as follows:
(1) The department shall conduct a traffic and revenue analysis for
the development of a forty-mile continuous express toll lane system
that includes state route number 167 and Interstate 405. The
department shall also develop a corridor-wide project management plan
to develop a strategy for phasing the completion of improvements in the
Interstate 405 and state route number 167 corridor.
(2) The department shall use the information from the traffic and
revenue analysis and the corridor-wide project management plan to
develop a finance plan to fund improvements in the Interstate 405 and
state route number 167 corridor. The department must include the
following elements in the finance plan:
(a) Current state and federal funding contributions for projects in
the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 corridor;
(b) A potential future state and federal funding contribution to
leverage toll revenues;
(c) Financing mechanisms to optimize the revenue available for
capacity improvements including, but not limited to, using the full
faith and credit of the state;
(d) An express toll lane system operating in the Interstate 405 and
state route number 167 corridor by 2014; and
(e) Completion of the capacity improvements in the Interstate 405
and state route number 167 corridor.
(3) The department must consult with a committee consisting of
local and state elected officials from the Interstate 405 and state
route number 167 corridor and representatives from the transit agencies
that operate in the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 corridor
while developing the performance standards, traffic and revenue
analysis, and finance plan.
(4) The department must provide the traffic and revenue analysis
plan and finance plan to the governor and the legislature by January
2012.
(5) The department shall conduct ongoing education and outreach to
ensure public awareness of the express toll lane system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
under the subchapter heading "toll facilities created after July 1,
2008" to read as follows:
The eastside corridor express toll lanes operations account is
created in the state treasury. All revenues received by the department
as toll charges collected from express toll lane users in the eastside
corridor must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may
be used for, but not limited to, debt service, planning,
administration, construction, maintenance, operation, repair,
rebuilding, enforcement, and the expansion of express toll lanes in the
eastside corridor.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.84.092 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 30 s 20, 2010 1st sp.s.
c 9 s 7, 2010 c 248 s 6, 2010 c 222 s 5, 2010 c 162 s 6, and 2010 c 145
s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the common
school construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the
county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use
tax equalization account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
licensing services account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the eastside corridor express toll lanes operations account,
the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account,
the election account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery
act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State
College capital projects account, the federal forest revolving account,
the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account,
the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility
multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the public
health services account, the health system capacity account, the high
capacity transportation account, the state higher education
construction account, the higher education construction account, the
highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the
highway safety account, the high occupancy toll lanes operations
account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the
judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local
real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account,
the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid
account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle fund,
the motorcycle safety education account, the multiagency permitting
team account, the multimodal transportation account, the municipal
criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the oyster
reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities
construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004, the public
health supplemental account, the public transportation systems account,
the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital
construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account,
the state route number 520 corridor account, the supplemental pension
account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the urban arterial trust account, the
volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account,
the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan
1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public
safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

--- END ---