BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.89.020 and 2006 c 330 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) (("Affected producer" means any producer who is subject to this
chapter.
(2))) "Beer" means any malt beverage or malt liquor as the terms
are defined in chapter 66.04 RCW.
(((3))) (2) "Commission" means the Washington beer commission.
(((4))) (3) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(((5))) (4) "Director" means the director of the department or the
director's duly authorized representative.
(((6))) (5) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month period beginning
with January 1st of any year and ending December 31st.
(((7))) (6) "Producer" means any person or other entity licensed
under Title 66 RCW to produce beer within Washington ((state and who
produces less than one hundred thousand barrels of beer annually per
location)).
(((8))) (7) "Referendum" means a vote by ((affected)) producers
that is conducted by secret ballot.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.89.040 and 2006 c 330 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of a petition containing the signatures of five
beer producers from a statewide Washington state craft brewing trade
association or from other ((affected)) producers to implement this
chapter and to determine producer participation in the commission and
assessment under this chapter, the director shall:
(a) Conduct a referendum of beer producers. The requirements of
assent or approval of the referendum are met if:
(i) At least fifty-one percent by numbers of ((affected)) producers
participating in the referendum vote affirmatively; and
(ii) Thirty percent of the ((affected)) producers and thirty
percent of the production have been represented in the referendum to
determine assent or approval of participation and assessment. The
referendum shall be conducted within sixty days of receipt of the
petition; and
(b) Establish a list of beer producers from information provided by
the petitioners, by obtaining information on beer producers from
applicable producer organizations or associations or other sources
identified as maintaining the information. In establishing a current
list of beer producers and their individual production, the director
shall use the beer producer's name, mailing address, and production by
the producer in the preceding fiscal year. Information on each
producer shall be mailed to each beer producer on record with the
director for verification. All corrections shall be filed with the
director within twenty days from the date of mailing. The list of
((affected)) producers shall be kept in a file by the director. The
list shall be certified as a true representation of the referendum
mailing list. Inadvertent failure to notify ((an affected)) a producer
does not invalidate a proceeding conducted under this chapter. The
director shall provide the commission the list of ((affected))
producers after assent in a referendum as provided in this section.
(2) If the director determines that the requisite assent has been
given in the referendum conducted under subsection (1) of this section,
the director shall:
(a) Within sixty days after assent of the referendum held, appoint
the members of the commission; and
(b) Direct the commission to put into force the assessment as
provided for in RCW 15.89.110.
(3) If the director determines that the requisite assent has not
been given in the referendum conducted under subsection (1) of this
section, the director shall take no further action to implement or
enforce this chapter.
(4) Upon completion of the referendum conducted under subsection
(1) of this section, the department shall tally the results of the vote
and provide the results to ((affected)) producers. If ((an affected))
a producer disputes the results of a vote, that producer within sixty
days from the announced results, shall provide in writing a statement
of why the vote is disputed and request a recount. Once the vote is
tallied and distributed, all disputes are resolved, and all matters in
a vote are finalized, the individual ballots may be destroyed.
(5) Before conducting the referendum provided for in subsection (1)
of this section, the director may require the petitioners to deposit
with him or her an amount of money as the director deems necessary to
defray the expenses of conducting the referendum. The director shall
provide the petitioners an estimate of expenses that may be incurred to
conduct a referendum before any service takes place. Petitioners shall
deposit funds with the director to pay for expenses incurred by the
department. The commission shall reimburse petitioners the amount paid
to the department when funds become available. However, if for any
reason the referendum process is discontinued, the petitioners shall
reimburse the department for expenses incurred by the department up
until the time the process is discontinued.
(6) The director is not required to hold a referendum under
subsection (1) of this section more than once in any twelve-month
period.

Sec. 3 RCW 15.89.050 and 2006 c 330 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall appoint the producer members of the
commission. In making appointments, no later than ninety days before
an expiration of a commission member's term, the director shall call
for recommendations for commission member positions, and the director
shall take into consideration recommendations made by a statewide
Washington state craft brewing trade association or other ((affected))
producers. In appointing persons to the commission, the director shall
seek a balanced representation on the commission that reflects the
composition of the beer producers throughout the state on the basis of
beer produced and geographic location. Information on beer production
by geographic location shall be provided by the commission upon the
director's request.
(2) If a position on the commission becomes vacant due to
resignation, disqualification, death, or for any other reason, the
commission shall notify the director and the unexpired term shall
immediately be filled by appointment by the director.
(3) Each member or employee of the commission shall be reimbursed
for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out this chapter as
defined by the commission in rule. Otherwise if not defined in rule,
reimbursement for travel expenses shall be at the rates allowed by RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 4 RCW 15.89.100 and 2006 c 330 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission shall prepare a list of all ((affected))
producers from information available from the liquor control board, the
department, or the producers' association. This list must contain the
names and addresses of ((affected)) producers within this state and the
amount, by barrelage, of beer produced during the period designated by
the commission. A qualified person may, at any time, have his or her
name placed upon the list by delivering or mailing the information to
the commission. This list shall be corrected and brought up-to-date in
accordance with evidence and information available to the commission by
December 31st of each year. For the purposes of giving notice and
holding referendums, the list updated before the date for issuing
notices or ballots is the list of all producers entitled to notice, to
assent or dissent, or to vote. Inadvertent failure to notify a
producer does not invalidate a proceeding conducted under this chapter.
(2) It is the responsibility of ((affected)) producers to ensure
that their correct address is filed with the commission. It is also
the responsibility of ((affected)) producers to submit production data
to the commission as prescribed by this chapter.
(3) The commission shall develop a reporting system to document
that the ((affected)) producers in this state are reporting quantities
of beer produced and are paying the assessment as provided in RCW
15.89.110.

Sec. 5 RCW 15.89.110 and 2006 c 330 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Pursuant to referendum in accordance with RCW 15.89.040, there
is levied, and the commission shall collect, upon beer produced by ((an
affected)) a producer, an annual assessment of ten cents per barrel of
beer produced, up to ten thousand barrels per location.
(2) The commission shall adopt rules prescribing the time, place,
and method for payment and collection of this assessment and provide
for the collection of assessments from ((affected)) producers who ship
directly out-of-state.
(3) The commission may reduce the assessment per ((affected))
producer based upon in-kind contributions to the commission.

--- END ---