BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may establish, in
consultation with cities, a process for authorizing the siting of new
mobile home parks and manufactured housing communities outside of urban
growth areas designated under RCW 36.70A.110.
(b) For purposes of this section, "mobile home park" or
"manufactured housing community" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
59.20.030.
(2) A county considering an application to site a new mobile home
park or manufactured housing community outside of an urban growth area
may approve the siting if the following criteria are met:
(a) The proposed site is adjacent to or in close proximity to an
urban growth area;
(b) Affordable housing will be provided within the mobile home park
or manufactured housing community for a range of income levels;
(c) Appropriate infrastructure and services for the site are
available or have been provided for;
(d) Environmental protection issues for the site, including air and
water quality issues, have been provided for;
(e) Development regulations have been established to ensure that
urban growth will not occur in adjacent nonurban areas;
(f) Provisions to mitigate adverse impacts on designated
agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands have been
made; and
(g) The siting of the mobile home park or manufactured housing
community does not conflict with development regulations adopted by the
county to protect critical areas.
(3) Final approval of an application to site a mobile home park or
manufactured housing community as provided in this section does not
constitute an adopted amendment to the comprehensive plan adopted under
RCW 36.70A.070.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.02.090 and 2010 c 86 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
definitions shall apply in RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090:
(1) "Development activity" means any construction or expansion of
a building, structure, or use, any change in use of a building or
structure, or any changes in the use of land, that creates additional
demand and need for public facilities. "Development activity" does not
include (a) buildings or structures constructed by a regional transit
authority or (b) the authorized siting of a mobile home park or
manufactured housing community under section 1 of this act.
(2) "Development approval" means any written authorization from a
county, city, or town which authorizes the commencement of development
activity.
(3) "Impact fee" means a payment of money imposed upon development
as a condition of development approval to pay for public facilities
needed to serve new growth and development, and that is reasonably
related to the new development that creates additional demand and need
for public facilities, that is a proportionate share of the cost of the
public facilities, and that is used for facilities that reasonably
benefit the new development. "Impact fee" does not include a
reasonable permit or application fee.
(4) "Owner" means the owner of record of real property, although
when real property is being purchased under a real estate contract, the
purchaser shall be considered the owner of the real property if the
contract is recorded.
(5) "Project improvements" mean site improvements and facilities
that are planned and designed to provide service for a particular
development project and that are necessary for the use and convenience
of the occupants or users of the project, and are not system
improvements. No improvement or facility included in a capital
facilities plan approved by the governing body of the county, city, or
town shall be considered a project improvement.
(6) "Proportionate share" means that portion of the cost of public
facility improvements that are reasonably related to the service
demands and needs of new development.
(7) "Public facilities" means the following capital facilities
owned or operated by government entities: (a) Public streets and
roads; (b) publicly owned parks, open space, and recreation facilities;
(c) school facilities; and (d) fire protection facilities.
(8) "Service area" means a geographic area defined by a county,
city, town, or intergovernmental agreement in which a defined set of
public facilities provide service to development within the area.
Service areas shall be designated on the basis of sound planning or
engineering principles.
(9) "System improvements" mean public facilities that are included
in the capital facilities plan and are designed to provide service to
service areas within the community at large, in contrast to project
improvements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW
to read as follows:
The authorized siting of a mobile home park or manufactured housing
community under section 1 of this act is exempted from compliance with
this chapter.

--- END ---