BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21H.020 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 117 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
The legislature finds that agency and local government decisions
can have negative economic consequences for businesses, particularly
small businesses, as well as for employees of those businesses. All
state agencies and local government entities with rule-making authority
under state law or local ordinance ((shall)) must adopt methods and
procedures which will insure that economic impacts and values will be
given appropriate consideration in the rule-making process along with
environmental, social, health, and safety considerations.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.85.030 and 2007 c 239 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In the adoption of a rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, an agency
shall prepare a small business economic impact statement: (((a))) (i)
If the proposed rule will impose more than minor costs on businesses in
an industry; or (((b))) (ii) if requested to do so by a majority vote
of the joint administrative rules review committee within forty-five
days of receiving the notice of proposed rule making under RCW
34.05.320. However, if the agency has completed the pilot rule process
as defined by RCW 34.05.313 before filing the notice of a proposed
rule, the agency is not required to prepare a small business economic
impact statement.
(b) An agency ((shall)) must prepare the small business economic
impact statement in accordance with RCW 19.85.040, and file it with the
code reviser along with the notice required under RCW 34.05.320. An
agency shall file a statement prepared at the request of the joint
administrative rules review committee with the code reviser upon its
completion before the adoption of the rule. An agency ((shall)) must
provide a copy of the small business economic impact statement to any
person requesting it.
(2) Based upon the extent of disproportionate impact on small
business identified in the statement prepared under RCW 19.85.040, the
agency shall, where legal and feasible in meeting the stated objectives
of the statutes upon which the rule is based, reduce the costs imposed
by the rule on small businesses. ((Methods to reduce the costs on
small businesses may include)) The agency must consider, without
limitation, each of the following methods of reducing the impact of the
proposed rule on small businesses:
(a) Reducing, modifying, or eliminating substantive regulatory
requirements;
(b) Simplifying, reducing, or eliminating recordkeeping and
reporting requirements;
(c) Reducing the frequency of inspections;
(d) Delaying compliance timetables;
(e) Reducing or modifying fine schedules for noncompliance; or
(f) Any other mitigation techniques including those suggested by
small businesses or small business advocates.
(3) If the agency determines it cannot reduce the costs imposed by
the rule on small businesses, the agency ((shall)) must provide a clear
explanation of why it has made that determination and include that
statement with its filing of the proposed rule pursuant to RCW
34.05.320.
(4)(a) All small business economic impact statements are subject to
selective review by the joint administrative rules review committee
pursuant to RCW 34.05.630.
(b) Any person affected by a proposed rule where there is (([a]))
a small business economic impact statement may petition the joint
administrative rules review committee for review pursuant to the
procedure in RCW 34.05.655.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.85.070 and 1992 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
When any rule is proposed for which a small business economic
impact statement is required, the adopting agency ((shall)) must
provide notice to small businesses of the proposed rule through ((any
of the following)):
(1) Direct notification of known interested small businesses or
trade organizations affected by the proposed rule; ((or))
(2) Providing information of the proposed rule making to
publications likely to be obtained by small businesses of the types
affected by the proposed rule; and
(3) Posting on the agency web site.

--- END ---