BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.72A.010 and 1996 c 87 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds and declares that privately operated
limousine transportation service is a vital part of the transportation
system within the state and provides prearranged transportation
services to state residents, tourists, and out-of-state business
people. Consequently, the safety, reliability, and stability of
privately operated limousine transportation services are matters of
statewide importance. The regulation of privately operated limousine
transportation services is thus an essential governmental function.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to permit the department
and a port district in a county with a population of one million or
more to regulate limousine transportation services without liability
under federal antitrust laws. It is further the intent of the
legislature to authorize a city with a population of five hundred
thousand or more to enforce this chapter through a joint agreement with
the department, and to direct the department to provide annual funding
from limousine regulation-related fees that provide sufficient funds to
such a city to provide delegated enforcement.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.72A.020 and 1996 c 87 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
((All limousine carriers must operate from a main office and may
have satellite offices. However, no office may be solely in a vehicle
of any type. All arrangements for the carrier's services must be made
through its offices and dispatched to the carrier's vehicles.))
(1) Contact by a customer or customer's agent to engage the
services of a carrier's limousine must be initiated by a customer or
customer's agent at a time and place different from the customer's time
and place of departure. The fare for service must be agreed upon prior
to departure. Under no circumstances may customers or customers'
agents make arrangements ((for immediate rental of a carrier's vehicle
with the driver of the vehicle)) to immediately engage the services of
a carrier's limousine with the chauffeur, even if the ((driver))
chauffeur is an owner or officer of the company, with the single
exception of stand-hail limousines only at a facility owned and
operated by a port district in a county with a population of one
million or more that are licensed and restricted by the rules and
policies set forth by the port district.
(2) At the time of the conduct of the commercial limousine
business, the chauffeur of a limousine and the limousine carrier
business must possess written or electronic records substantiating the
prearrangement of the carrier's services for any customer carried for
compensation, except for vehicles meeting the requirements of the
exception for stand-hail limousines described in subsection (1) of this
section. Limousine carriers and limousine chauffeurs operating as an
independent business must list a physical address on their master
business license where records substantiating the prearrangement of the
carrier's services may be reviewed by an enforcement officer. A
limousine carrier must retain these records for a minimum of one
calendar year, and failure to do so is a class 3 civil infraction
against the carrier for each record that is missing or fails to include
all of the information described in rules adopted under subsection (4)
of this section.
(3) Limousine carriers and limousine chauffeurs operating as an
independent business must list a telephone or pager number that is used
to prearrange the carrier's services for any customer carried for
compensation.
(4) The department shall adopt rules specifying the content and
retention schedule of the records required for compliance with
subsection (2) of this section.
(5) The failure of a chauffeur who is operating a limousine to
immediately provide, on demand by an enforcement officer, written or
electronic records required by the department substantiating the
prearrangement of the carrier's services for any customer carried for
compensation, except for limousines meeting the requirements of the
exception for stand-hail limousines described in subsection (1) of this
section, is a class 2 civil infraction and is subject to monetary
penalties under RCW 7.80.120. It is a class 1 civil infraction for a
repeat offense under this subsection during the same calendar year.
(6) The department shall define by rule conditions under which a
chauffeur is considered to be operating a limousine, including when the
limousine is parked in a designated passenger load zone.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.72A.030 and 1996 c 87 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department, in conjunction with the Washington state
patrol, shall regulate limousine carriers with respect to entry, safety
of equipment, chauffeur qualifications, and operations. The department
shall adopt rules and require such reports as are necessary to carry
out this chapter. The department may develop penalties for failure to
comply with this section.
(2) In addition, a port district in a county with a population of
one million or more may regulate limousine carriers with respect to
entry, safety of equipment, chauffeur qualifications, and operations.
The county in which the port district is located may adopt ordinances
and rules to assist the port district in enforcement of limousine
regulations only at port facilities. In no event may this be construed
to grant the county the authority to regulate limousines within its
jurisdiction. The port district may not set limousine rates, but the
limousine carriers shall file their rates and schedules with the port
district if requested.
(3) The department, a port district in a county with a population
of at least one million, or a county in which the port district is
located may enter into cooperative agreements for the joint regulation
of limousines.
(4) The department and a city with a population of five hundred
thousand or more may enter into cooperative agreements as provided in
section 12 of this act, subject to the limitations set forth in RCW
46.72A.130.
(5) The Washington state patrol shall annually conduct a vehicle
inspection of each limousine licensed under this chapter, except when
a port district ((regulates)), or a city with a population of five
hundred thousand or more, enforces limousine carrier((s)) regulations
under subsection (2) or (4) of this section, that port district or
county in which the port (([district])) district is located ((shall)),
or a city with a population of five hundred thousand or more, may
conduct the annual limousine vehicle inspection and random limousine
vehicle inspections in conjunction with limousine regulation
enforcement activities, provided that the inspection criteria and fees
are substantially the same regardless of the authority conducting the
inspection. Random limousine vehicle inspections may not be conducted
while the limousine contains customers. The state patrol, the city, or
the port district((, or the county)) conducting the annual limousine
vehicle inspection may impose an annual vehicle inspection fee and
reinspection fee. A carrier must pay a reinspection fee if a limousine
fails inspection for compliance with vehicle standards and is
reinspected. If the limousine passes the first reinspection within
thirty days of failing the original inspection, all of the reinspection
fee must be refunded to the carrier. However, refunds are not
available for subsequent reinspections. While a limousine is licensed
by the department for commercial limousine use, failure to comply with
vehicle inspection standards, established by the department by rule, is
a class 3 civil infraction against the carrier, with monetary penalties
against the carrier as specified in RCW 7.80.120, for each violation of
a safety requirement. It is a class 4 civil infraction for each
violation of other vehicle standards, with monetary penalties against
the carrier as specified in RCW 7.80.120, and the limousine vehicle
certificate must be summarily suspended until safety violations of
vehicle standards are corrected and the limousine is reinspected.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.72A.040 and 1996 c 87 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Except when a port district regulates limousine carriers under RCW
46.72A.030 or a city with a population of five hundred thousand or more
is authorized under section 12 of this act to enforce state laws or
rules applicable to limousine carriers, limousines, and chauffeurs,
subject to the limitations set forth in section 12 of this act, the
state of Washington fully occupies and preempts the entire field of
regulation over limousine carriers as regulated by this chapter.
Cities, towns, and counties or other municipalities may enact only
those laws and ordinances relating to limousine carriers that are
consistent with this chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.72A.050 and 1996 c 87 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No limousine carrier may operate a limousine upon the highways
of this state without first ((obtaining a business license from the
department. The applicant shall forward an application for a business
license to the department along with a fee established by rule. Upon
approval of the application, the department shall issue a business
license and unified business identifier authorizing the carrier to
operate limousines upon the highways of this state)) being properly
registered as a business in Washington and having been issued a unified
business identifier.
(2) In addition, a limousine carrier shall ((annually)) obtain((,
upon payment of the appropriate fee,)) from the department a limousine
carrier license for the business and a ((vehicle)) limousine vehicle
certificate for each limousine operated by the carrier. The limousine
carrier license and limousine vehicle certificates must be renewed
through the department annually or as may be required by the
department. The department shall establish by rule the procedure for
obtaining, and the fees for, the limousine carrier license and
limousine vehicle certificate. It is a class 1 civil infraction, with
monetary penalties against the carrier as specified in RCW 7.80.120,
for each day that a limousine is operated without a valid limousine
carrier license or valid limousine vehicle certificate required under
this subsection.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.72A.060 and 2003 c 53 s 251 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall require limousine carriers to obtain and
continue in effect, liability and property damage insurance from a
company licensed to sell liability insurance in this state for each
limousine used to transport persons for compensation.
(2) The department shall fix ((the amount of)) by rule coverages
and limits, and prohibit provisions that limit coverage, for the
insurance policy or policies, giving consideration to the character and
amount of traffic, the number of persons affected, and the degree of
danger that the proposed operation involves. The limousine carrier
must maintain the liability and property damage insurance in force on
each ((motor-propelled vehicle while so used)) limousine while licensed
by the department.
(3) Failure to file and maintain in effect the insurance required
under this section is a gross misdemeanor and the limousine vehicle
certificate must be summarily suspended. It is a class 1 civil
infraction, with monetary penalties against the carrier as specified in
RCW 7.80.120, for each day that a carrier operates a limousine with a
summarily suspended limousine vehicle certificate.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.72A.080 and 1997 c 193 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No limousine carrier may advertise without listing the
carrier's unified business identifier issued by the department in the
advertisement and specifying the type of service offered as provided in
RCW 46.04.274. No limousine carrier may advertise or hold itself out
to the public as providing taxicab transportation services.
(2) All advertising, contracts, correspondence, cards, signs,
posters, papers, and documents that show a limousine carrier's name or
address shall list the carrier's unified business identifier and the
type of service offered. The alphabetized listing of limousine
carriers appearing in the advertising sections of telephone books or
other directories and all advertising that shows the carrier's name or
address must show the carrier's current unified business identifier.
(3) Advertising in the alphabetical listing in a telephone
directory need not contain the carrier's certified business identifier.
(4) ((Advertising by electronic transmission need not contain the
carrier's unified business identifier if the carrier provides it to the
person selling the advertisement and it is recorded in the advertising
contract.
(5))) It is a ((gross misdemeanor)) violation, subject to a fine of
up to five thousand dollars per violation, for a person to (a) falsify
a unified business identifier or use a false or inaccurate unified
business identifier; (b) fail to specify the type of service offered;
((or)) (c) advertise or otherwise hold itself out to the public as
providing taxicab transportation services in connection with a
solicitation or identification as an authorized limousine carrier; or
(d) conduct commercial limousine business without a valid limousine
carrier license or valid limousine vehicle certificate as required
under this chapter, unless licensed as a charter party carrier under
chapter 81.70 RCW.
(5) If the basis for the violation is advertising, each
advertisement reproduced, broadcast, or displayed via a particular
medium constitutes a separate violation.
(6) In deciding the amount of penalty to be imposed per violation,
the department shall consider the following factors:
(a) The carrier's willingness to comply with the department's rules
under this chapter; and
(b) The carrier's history with respect to compliance with this
section.
(7) It is a class 1 civil infraction, with monetary penalties
against the chauffeur as specified in RCW 7.80.120, for a chauffeur to:
(a) Solicit or assign customers directly or through a third party
for immediate, nonprearranged limousine service pick up as described in
section 2(1) of this act; or
(b) Offer payment to a third party to solicit customers for
limousine service pick up without current copies of a written contract
regarding such services on file at the third party's business. Copies
of the current written contract must be stored and made available on
the third party's business premises and in any limousine engaged in the
services detailed in the contract. A written contract may not allow
for immediate, nonprearranged limousine service pick up.
(8) It is a class 1 civil infraction, with monetary penalties
against the individual as specified in RCW 7.80.120, for an individual
to:
(a) Accept payment to solicit or assign customers on the behalf of
a chauffeur for immediate, nonprearranged limousine service pick up as
described in section 2(1) of this act; or
(b) Accept payment to solicit customers for limousine service pick
up without current copies of a written contract regarding such services
on file at the third party's business. Copies of the current written
contract must be stored and made available on the third party's
business premises and in any limousine engaged in the services detailed
in the contract. A written contract may not allow for immediate,
nonprearranged limousine service pick up.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.72A.090 and 1996 c 87 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The limousine carrier shall ((certify)), before a chauffeur
operates a limousine, provide proof in a form approved by the
department to the appropriate regulating authority that each chauffeur
hired to operate a limousine meets the following criteria administered
or monitored by the department or an authority approved by the
department: (((1))) (a) Is at least twenty-one years of age; (((2)))
(b) holds a valid Washington state driver's license; (((3))) (c) has
successfully completed a training course approved by the department;
(((4))) (d) has successfully passed a written examination which, to the
greatest extent practicable, the department must administer in the
applicant's language of preference; (((5))) (e) has successfully
completed a background check performed by the Washington state patrol
or a credentialing authority approved by the department that meets
standards adopted by rule by the department; (f) has passed an initial
test and is participating in a random testing program designed to
detect the presence of any controlled substances determined by the
department; (g) has a satisfactory driving record that meets moving
accident and moving violation conviction standards adopted by rule by
the department; and (((6))) (h) has submitted a medical certificate
certifying the individual's fitness as a chauffeur. Upon initial
application and every three years thereafter, a chauffeur must file a
physician's certification with the limousine carrier validating the
individual's fitness to drive a limousine. The department shall
determine by rule the scope of the examination and standards for denial
based upon the chauffeur's physical examination. The director may
require a chauffeur to ((be reexamined at any time)) undergo an
additional controlled substance test or physical examination if the
chauffeur has failed a controlled substance test or his or her physical
fitness has been called into question.
(2) The limousine carrier shall keep on file and make available for
inspection all documents required by this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.72A.100 and 2002 c 86 s 295 are each amended to
read as follows:
The director may impose any of the sanctions specified in RCW
18.235.110 for unprofessional conduct as described in RCW 18.235.130 or
if one of the following is true of a chauffeur hired to drive a
limousine, including where such a chauffeur is also the carrier: (1)
The person has been convicted of an offense of such a nature as to
indicate that he or she is unfit to qualify as a chauffeur; (2) the
person is guilty of committing ((two or more)) an offense((s)) for
which mandatory revocation of a driver's license is provided by law;
(3) the person has been convicted of vehicular homicide or vehicular
assault; (4) the person is intemperate or addicted to narcotics; or (5)
the person, while participating in a random testing program designed to
detect the presence of any controlled substances determined by the
department under RCW 46.72A.090, is found to have taken one of the
controlled substances determined by the department without a valid and
current prescription from a licensed physician.

Sec. 10 RCW 46.72A.120 and 1996 c 87 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department may adopt and enforce such rules, including the
setting of fees, as may be consistent with and necessary to carry out
this chapter. The fees must approximate the cost of administration.
Any fee related to limousine vehicle certificates must not exceed
seventy-five dollars. Any fee related to a limousine carrier license
for a business must not exceed three hundred fifty dollars. Any fee
related to limousine vehicle inspections must not exceed twenty-five
dollars.

Sec. 11 RCW 46.72A.140 and 2002 c 86 s 296 are each amended to
read as follows:
The uniform regulation of business and professions act, chapter
18.235 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of
licenses, and the discipline of licensees under this chapter by the
department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 46.72A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The department may enter into cooperative agreements with
cities with populations of five hundred thousand or more for the
purpose of enforcing state laws or rules applicable to limousine
carriers and chauffeurs. This power to enforce includes the right to
adopt local limousine laws by city ordinance that are consistent with
this chapter and the right to impose monetary penalties by civil
infraction as provided in this chapter.
(2) In addition, the following specific authority and limitations
to city enforcement must be included:
(a) City enforcement officers may conduct street enforcement
activity consistent with this chapter;
(b) City enforcement officers may conduct inspections of limousines
to verify compliance with limousine standards adopted by rule by the
department and, if the carrier requests, conduct annual limousine
vehicle inspections in lieu of an inspection conducted by the
Washington state patrol. The city may receive all limousine inspection
or reinspection fees for inspections conducted by city enforcement
officers;
(c) A city may require that any limousine carrier dispatching a
limousine to pick up passengers within the incorporated area of the
city to maintain on file with the city insurance documents that meet
the requirements adopted by rule by the department. The city may issue
civil infractions to carriers and summarily suspend limousine vehicle
certificates for failure to maintain on file valid insurance documents
with the city.
(3) A cooperative agreement with the department for delegated
enforcement must specify the schedule and amount of funds derived from
limousine carrier license, limousine vehicle certificate, and chauffeur
license fee revenue to be provided to the city to allow the city to
provide the agreed upon level of enforcement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 The department of licensing shall convene
an internal work group regarding the issuance of chauffeur licenses.
The department shall provide a report on its recommendations on this
issue to the transportation committees of the legislature by November
15, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 46.72A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The limousine carriers account is created in the state
treasury. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all receipts
from each civil infraction and violation imposed by this chapter must
be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account must be spent
only after appropriation.
(2) Expenditures from the account may be used only for regulation
and enforcement under this chapter, including regulation and
enforcement through a cooperative agreement as described in section 12
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 1 through 12 of this act take
effect January 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Section 14 of this act takes effect July 1,
2012.

--- END ---