BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature that
those significant archaeological resources on state park lands that are
of importance to the history of our state, or its communities, be
protected for the people of the state. At the same time, the
legislature also recognizes that the recreational use of metal
detectors in state parks is a legitimate form of recreation that can be
compatible with the protection of significant archaeological resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) By September 1, 2012, the commission shall open all
developed, common, and disturbed areas of state parks for the
recreational use of metal detectors.
(b) For the purposes of this section, developed and disturbed areas
are further defined as: Campgrounds; playfields; parade grounds; boat
launches, including both beaches and the water; and similar areas that
have been subject to capital development or future development by state
parks, that would not contain significant archaeological resources.
(2) The legislature directs, that on state park lands, historic
archaeological resources, as that term is defined in RCW 27.53.030, be
managed in such a way that the integrity of those resources not be
diminished. Metal detectors may be used on the state park lands around
these resources.
(3) All federal lands leased to state parks are subject to the
archaeological protection act and the historical protection act,
including provisions that allow the use of metal detectors on federal
lands under 16 U.S.C. 470ff, 16 U.S.C. 470bb, and 16 U.S.C. 470kk.
(4) In the event an item is discovered of archaeological
significance, it must be turned over to the department of archaeology
and historic preservation.
(5) If the commission determines that all developed or disturbed
areas of a park must remain off limits to metal detecting because of
their historic archaeological resources, the commission must, by
September 1, 2012, submit a brief report to the standing committees of
the legislature as to how the commission and the department of
archaeology and historic preservation made this determination.
(6) It is the intent of this section to prohibit blanket
prohibitions to the use of metal detectors in state parks, but to
ensure the preservation of proven historic archaeological resources for
the enjoyment of the public.

--- END ---