BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the community and
technical colleges offer high quality, cost-effective instructional
programs to the citizens of the state. The legislature finds that
academic employee morale and willingness to invest in professional
development, and academic employee recruitment and retention, are
improved by consistent and predictable practices that provide salary
increases to recognize two-year college academic employees who upgrade
their skills and professional experience. It is the intent of the
legislature that state appropriations be adjusted to an amount which,
together with academic employee turnover savings, provide for
consistent and predictable funding of academic employee salary
increases for state-funded academic employees who qualify through
experience, professional development, and training pursuant to local
collective bargaining.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
sections 3 and 4 of this act unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Associated benefits" means those compensation benefits that
are based on a percent of an employee's salary, such as retirement and
old age survivors insurance.
(2) "Academic employee" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.52.020,
which means any teacher, counselor, librarian, or department head, who
is employed by any college district, whether full or part time, with
the exception of the chief administrative officer or, and any
administrator in, each college district.
(3) "General salary increase" means the salary adjustment granted
by the legislature for cost-of-living increases as provided in RCW
28B.50.465.
(4) "Increments" means an increase in the base salary of an
academic employee. Increments may be based on time, such as completing
another year of employment, completing specific requirements, such as
certification, or a combination of time and requirements.
(5) "State board" is the state board for community and technical
colleges.
(6) "Turnover savings" is the ongoing permanent difference between
the compensation level of an academic employee who is no longer
employed and the compensation level of the academic employee
replacement. Full-time faculty turnover savings may only be captured
when a full-time faculty member is replaced by a full-time faculty
member. Similarly, part-time faculty turnover savings may only be
captured when a part-time faculty member is replaced by a part-time
faculty member. Turnover savings exclude temporary savings such as
vacant positions or academic employees on leave, reassignment, or
sabbatical.
(7) "Salary base" is the prior year's total state-funded
expenditures for all academic employees' ending salary levels.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations in section 4 of this act, each
biennium, the state board shall submit in its biennial budget request
an amount of funds, which together with academic employee turnover
savings, is sufficient to cover the projected state-funded costs of
increments for the community and technical college system.
(2) The basis for the biennial budget request shall be eight-tenths
of one percent of the academic employees' salary base plus the value of
associated benefits.
(3) The state board shall determine the method of allocating to the
community and technical colleges the appropriations granted for
academic employee increments, provided that the amount of the
appropriation generated from the proportionate share of the part-time
faculty salary base shall only be accessible for part-time faculty. In
addition, all part-time faculty turnover savings, as defined in section
2(6) of this act, shall only be accessible for part-time faculty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, boards of trustees
shall award academic employee salary increments based on local
agreements developed under chapter 28B.52 RCW.
(2) Funds allocated by the college board to local boards of
trustees for part-time faculty under the provisions of section 3 of
this act may be used for general salary increases for part-time
faculty.
(3) Boards of trustees may combine appropriations allocated by the
college board for academic employee salary increments with general
salary increase funding to increase academic employee increments. To
the extent that general salary increase funding is used to pay academic
employee increments, the general salary increase shall be reduced by
the same amount.
(4) Awards of academic employee salary increments shall be
suspended if there is a:
(a) Reduction of allotments by the governor pursuant to RCW
43.88.110(3); or
(b) Reduction by the legislature from one biennium to the next or
within a biennium of appropriated funds based on constant dollars using
the implicit price deflator.

--- END ---