BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The joint legislative select committee
on health reform implementation established in section 954, chapter 37,
Laws of 2010 is reauthorized. The reauthorized joint legislative
select committee on health reform implementation shall be cochaired by
the chairs of the health committees of the senate and the house of
representatives, and leadership of the two largest caucuses in the
senate and the house of representatives shall each appoint two
additional legislators to serve on the committee.
(2) The cochairs may direct the continuation of existing advisory
groups and the addition of new groups to focus on specific topic areas,
such as insurance regulation, access to and expansion of public and
private programs, cost containment, and workforce issues. The
committee may invite interested stakeholders and additional experts to
advise the committee.
This section expires June 30, 2012.

--- END ---