BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Any child protective services worker who is directly engaged in:
(1) Investigation of reports of alleged child abuse or neglect; (2)
assessment of risk of abuse or neglect to children; or (3) either
provision of or referral to services, or both, including law
enforcement, to remedy conditions that endanger the health, safety, and
welfare of children, must be licensed in good standing in a social work
classification under chapter 18.225 RCW, and bonded.

--- END ---