BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.37.030 and 2002 c 91 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There is hereby established a public body corporate and politic,
with perpetual corporate succession, to be known as the Washington
health care facilities authority. The authority shall constitute a
political subdivision of the state established as an instrumentality
exercising essential governmental functions. The authority is a
"public body" within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010. The authority shall
consist of the governor who shall serve as chairman, the lieutenant
governor, the insurance commissioner, the secretary of health, and two
members of the public representing consumer advocacy groups and one
member of the public with no fiduciary interest or responsibility
toward any health care facility or organization within seven years
prior to appointment who shall be appointed by the governor, subject to
confirmation by the senate, on the basis of the member's interest or
expertise in health care delivery, for a term expiring on the fourth
anniversary of the date of appointment. In the event that any of the
offices referred to shall be abolished the resulting vacancy on the
authority shall be filled by the officer who shall succeed
substantially to the powers and duties thereof. The members of the
authority shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and
shall be entitled to reimbursement, solely from the funds of the
authority, for travel expenses incurred in the discharge of their
duties under this chapter, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060. A majority shall constitute a quorum.
The governor and the insurance commissioner each may designate an
employee of his or her office to act on his or her behalf during the
absence of the governor or the insurance commissioner at one or more of
the meetings of the authority. The vote of the designee shall have the
same effect as if cast by the governor or the insurance commissioner if
the designation is in writing and is presented to the person presiding
at the meetings included within the designation.
The governor may designate a member to preside during the
governor's absence.

--- END ---