BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is a
clear public interest in studying and evaluating the impact of
freestanding emergency rooms so as to make informed decisions about
whether they should be subject to certificate of need or other
regulation and, if so, the appropriate scope of that regulation.
(2) The legislature further finds that certain measures should be
implemented at existing freestanding emergency rooms to ensure patient
safety and public accountability.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.41.020 and 2010 c 94 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following
terms, whenever used in this chapter, shall be deemed to have the
following meanings:
(1) "Department" means the Washington state department of health.
(2) "Emergency care to victims of sexual assault" means medical
examinations, procedures, and services provided by a hospital emergency
room to a victim of sexual assault following an alleged sexual assault.
(3) "Emergency contraception" means any health care treatment
approved by the food and drug administration that prevents pregnancy,
including but not limited to administering two increased doses of
certain oral contraceptive pills within seventy-two hours of sexual
contact.
(4) "Freestanding emergency room" means a facility that is an
extension of an existing hospital emergency department that is
physically separate from, and not located on the same campus as, the
main hospital emergency department and that is intended to provide
comprehensive emergency service.
(5) "Hospital" means any institution, place, building, or agency
which provides accommodations, facilities and services over a
continuous period of twenty-four hours or more, for observation,
diagnosis, or care, of two or more individuals not related to the
operator who are suffering from illness, injury, deformity, or
abnormality, or from any other condition for which obstetrical,
medical, or surgical services would be appropriate for care or
diagnosis. "Hospital" as used in this chapter does not include hotels,
or similar places furnishing only food and lodging, or simply
domiciliary care; nor does it include clinics, or physician's offices
where patients are not regularly kept as bed patients for twenty-four
hours or more; nor does it include nursing homes, as defined and which
come within the scope of chapter 18.51 RCW; nor does it include
birthing centers, which come within the scope of chapter 18.46 RCW; nor
does it include psychiatric hospitals, which come within the scope of
chapter 71.12 RCW; nor any other hospital, or institution specifically
intended for use in the diagnosis and care of those suffering from
mental illness, intellectual disability, convulsive disorders, or other
abnormal mental condition. Furthermore, nothing in this chapter or the
rules adopted pursuant thereto shall be construed as authorizing the
supervision, regulation, or control of the remedial care or treatment
of residents or patients in any hospital conducted for those who rely
primarily upon treatment by prayer or spiritual means in accordance
with the creed or tenets of any well recognized church or religious
denominations.
(((5))) (6) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership,
corporation, company, association, or joint stock association, and the
legal successor thereof.
(((6))) (7) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(((7))) (8) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as in RCW
70.125.030.
(((8))) (9) "Victim of sexual assault" means a person who alleges
or is alleged to have been sexually assaulted and who presents as a
patient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature declares a moratorium on the construction of
freestanding emergency rooms if a construction review has not been
completed and construction documents have not been approved by the
department before January 1, 2011, to allow for a study and evaluation
of the impact of freestanding emergency rooms to take place.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
Any hospital that operates a freestanding emergency room as defined
in RCW 70.41.020 must conform to the following requirements to ensure
patient safety and public accountability:
(1) After services are rendered:
(a) The freestanding emergency room must notify the patient's
primary care provider within eight hours of services having been
rendered that such care was provided and the status of the patient; and
(b) To the extent a patient needs hospital inpatient services, the
freestanding emergency room must arrange and incur the full cost to
transport the patient to the patient's choice of licensed hospitals
capable of delivering the level of care required by the patient at
either:
(i) The nearest available hospital in road miles traveled; or
(ii) The nearest hospital that participates in the patient's health
plan provider network; and
(2) In meeting the requirements of RCW 43.70.052, a hospital shall
separately report financial information for any freestanding emergency
room that it operates.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.70.052 and 1995 c 267 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To promote the public interest consistent with the purposes of
chapter 492, Laws of 1993 as amended by chapter 267, Laws of 1995, the
department shall continue to require hospitals to submit hospital
financial and patient discharge information, which shall be collected,
maintained, analyzed, and disseminated by the department. The
department shall, if deemed cost-effective and efficient, contract with
a private entity for any or all parts of data collection. Data
elements shall be reported in conformance with a uniform reporting
system established by the department. This includes data elements
identifying each hospital's revenues, expenses, contractual allowances,
charity care, bad debt, other income, total units of inpatient and
outpatient services, and other financial information reasonably
necessary to fulfill the purposes of this section. Data elements
relating to use of hospital services by patients shall be the same as
those currently compiled by hospitals through inpatient discharge
abstracts and shall also include patient discharge abstracts for all
visits to a freestanding emergency room, as defined in RCW 70.41.020.
The department shall encourage and permit reporting by electronic
transmission or hard copy as is practical and economical to reporters.
(2) In identifying financial reporting requirements, the department
may require both annual reports and condensed quarterly reports from
hospitals, so as to achieve both accuracy and timeliness in reporting,
but shall craft such requirements with due regard of the data reporting
burdens of hospitals.
(3) The health care data collected, maintained, and studied by the
department shall only be available for retrieval in original or
processed form to public and private requestors and shall be available
within a reasonable period of time after the date of request. The cost
of retrieving data for state officials and agencies shall be funded
through the state general appropriation. The cost of retrieving data
for individuals and organizations engaged in research or private use of
data or studies shall be funded by a fee schedule developed by the
department that reflects the direct cost of retrieving the data or
study in the requested form.
(4) The department shall, in consultation and collaboration with
the federally recognized tribes, urban or other Indian health service
organizations, and the federal area Indian health service, design,
develop, and maintain an American Indian-specific health data,
statistics information system. The department rules regarding
confidentiality shall apply to safeguard the information from
inappropriate use or release.
(5) All persons subject to the data collection requirements of this
section shall comply with departmental requirements established by rule
in the acquisition of data.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---