BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 40.14.025 and 2003 c 163 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The secretary of state and the director of financial management
shall jointly establish a procedure and formula for allocating the
costs of services provided by the division of archives and records
management to state agencies. Beginning January 31, 2012, for
institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the
procedure and formula for allocating the costs of services provided
shall be based on actual services and service hours rendered to each
institution of higher education. The total amount allotted for
services to state agencies shall not exceed the appropriation to the
archives and records management account during any allotment period.
(2) There is created the archives and records management account in
the state treasury which shall consist of all fees and charges
collected under this section. The account shall be appropriated
exclusively for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the
operation of the division of archives and records management as
specified by law.

--- END ---