BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.67.025 and 1986 c 278 s 55 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 90.03.525 and subsection
(2) of this section, any public entity and public property, including
the state of Washington and state property, shall be subject to rates
and charges for storm water control facilities to the same extent
private persons and private property are subject to such rates and
charges that are imposed by cities and towns pursuant to RCW 35.67.020.
In setting these rates and charges, consideration may be made of in-kind services, such as stream improvements or donation of property.
(2) Because of the substantial costs incurred by secondary
permittee state research universities located in small cities in
eastern Washington to comply with the requirements of a storm water
permit issued pursuant to RCW 90.48.260, rates and charges to such
institutions may not exceed thirty percent of the rates and charges
imposed by their primary permittee. The legislature finds that these
rates are presumptively fair and equitable because of the expenditures
by the institutions for the construction, operation, and maintenance of
storm water control facilities designed to control surface water or
storm water runoff from institution property, the storm water permit
maintenance activities performed by the institution on the streets and
other facilities on campus, and the other activities needed to comply
with storm water permit requirements.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.92.021 and 1986 c 278 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in RCW 90.03.525 and subsection
(2) of this section, any public entity and public property, including
the state of Washington and state property, shall be subject to rates
and charges for storm water control facilities to the same extent
private persons and private property are subject to such rates and
charges that are imposed by cities and towns pursuant to RCW 35.92.020.
In setting these rates and charges, consideration may be made of in-kind services, such as stream improvements or donation of property.
(2) Because of the substantial costs incurred by secondary
permittee state research universities located in small cities in
eastern Washington to comply with the requirements of a storm water
permit issued pursuant to RCW 90.48.260, rates and charges to such
institutions may not exceed thirty percent of the rates and charges
imposed by their primary permittee. The legislature finds that these
rates are presumptively fair and equitable because of the expenditures
by the institutions for the construction, operation, and maintenance of
storm water control facilities designed to control surface water or
storm water runoff from institution property, the storm water permit
maintenance activities performed by the institution on the streets and
other facilities on campus, and the other activities needed to comply
with storm water permit requirements.

--- END ---