BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that approximately two
hundred thirty-one million dollars in general fund state dollars will
be spent on the child care subsidy program during the 2011-2013
biennium. Maintaining integrity in this program is of the utmost
importance in ensuring that finite state resources are being used in an
appropriate manner. The legislature further finds that thirty-two
percent of overpayments made in public assistance programs during
fiscal year 2009 were in the working connections child care program
requiring extensive state employee resources to recoup these
overpayments. The legislature believes that a number of overpayments
can be avoided in the future with the use of an electronic benefit
transfer system to track a child's attendance at child care and to pay
the subsidy to the provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
By December 31, 2011, the department, with the assistance of the
department of social and health services, shall develop and implement
an electronic benefit transfer system to be used for the delivery of
subsidized child care. The system shall be developed to allow the
department to track time and attendance for any child for whom a child
care provider is receiving a subsidy and to process subsidy payments to
providers.

--- END ---