BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.58.180 and 2010 c 210 s 37 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person aggrieved by the granting, denying, or rescinding of
a permit on shorelines of the state pursuant to RCW 90.58.140 may((,
except as otherwise provided in chapter 43.21L RCW, seek review from
the shorelines hearings board by filing a petition for review within
twenty-one days of the date of receipt of the decision as provided for
in RCW 90.58.140(6).
Within seven days of the filing of any petition for review with the
board as provided in this section pertaining to a final decision of a
local government, the petitioner shall serve copies of the petition on
the department, the office of the attorney general, and the local
government. The department and the attorney general may intervene to
protect the public interest and ensure that the provisions of this
chapter are complied with at any time within fifteen days from the date
of the receipt by the department or the attorney general of a copy of
the petition for review filed pursuant to this section. The shorelines
hearings board shall schedule review proceedings on the petition for
review without regard as to whether the period for the department or
the attorney general to intervene has or has not expired)) seek review
by following the procedures in chapter 36.70C RCW.
(2) The department or the attorney general may obtain review of any
final decision granting a permit, or granting or denying an application
for a permit issued by a local government by ((filing a written
petition with the shorelines hearings board and the appropriate local
government within twenty-one days from the date of receipt as provided
in RCW 90.58.140(6).
(3) The review proceedings authorized in subsections (1) and (2) of
this section are subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW
pertaining to procedures in adjudicative proceedings. Judicial review
of such proceedings of the shorelines hearings board is governed by
chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall issue its decision on the appeal
authorized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section within one
hundred eighty days after the date the petition is filed with the board
or a petition to intervene is filed by the department or the attorney
general, whichever is later. The time period may be extended by the
board for a period of thirty days upon a showing of good cause or may
be waived by the parties)) following the procedures in chapter 36.70C
RCW.
(((4))) (3) Any person may appeal any rules, regulations, or
guidelines adopted or approved by the department within thirty days of
the date of the adoption or approval. The board shall make a final
decision within sixty days following the hearing held thereon.
(((5))) (4) The board shall find the rule, regulation, or guideline
to be valid and enter a final decision to that effect unless it
determines that the rule, regulation, or guideline:
(a) Is clearly erroneous in light of the policy of this chapter; or
(b) Constitutes an implementation of this chapter in violation of
constitutional or statutory provisions; or
(c) Is arbitrary and capricious; or
(d) Was developed without fully considering and evaluating all
material submitted to the department during public review and comment;
or
(e) Was not adopted in accordance with required procedures.
(((6))) (5) If the board makes a determination under subsection
(((5))) (4)(a) through (e) of this section, it shall enter a final
decision declaring the rule, regulation, or guideline invalid,
remanding the rule, regulation, or guideline to the department with a
statement of the reasons in support of the determination, and directing
the department to adopt, after a thorough consultation with the
affected local government and any other interested party, a new rule,
regulation, or guideline consistent with the board's decision.
(((7))) (6) A decision of the board on the validity of a rule,
regulation, or guideline shall be subject to review in superior court,
if authorized pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. A petition for review of
the decision of the shorelines hearings board on a rule, regulation, or
guideline shall be filed within thirty days after the date of final
decision by the shorelines hearings board.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70C.030 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 38 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) This chapter replaces the writ of certiorari for appeal of land
use decisions and shall be the exclusive means of judicial review of
land use decisions, except that this chapter does not apply to:
(a) Judicial review of:
(i) Land use decisions made by bodies that are not part of a local
jurisdiction;
(ii) Land use decisions of a local jurisdiction that are subject to
review by a quasi-judicial body created by state law, such as ((the
shorelines hearings board or)) the growth management hearings board;
(b) Judicial review of applications for a writ of mandamus or
prohibition; or
(c) Claims provided by any law for monetary damages or
compensation. If one or more claims for damages or compensation are
set forth in the same complaint with a land use petition brought under
this chapter, the claims are not subject to the procedures and
standards, including deadlines, provided in this chapter for review of
the petition. The judge who hears the land use petition may, if
appropriate, preside at a trial for damages or compensation.
(2) The superior court civil rules govern procedural matters under
this chapter to the extent that the rules are consistent with this
chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.58.140 and 2010 c 210 s 36 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A development shall not be undertaken on the shorelines of the
state unless it is consistent with the policy of this chapter and,
after adoption or approval, as appropriate, the applicable guidelines,
rules, or master program.
(2) A substantial development shall not be undertaken on shorelines
of the state without first obtaining a permit from the government
entity having administrative jurisdiction under this chapter.
A permit shall be granted:
(a) From June 1, 1971, until such time as an applicable master
program has become effective, only when the development proposed is
consistent with: (i) The policy of RCW 90.58.020; and (ii) after their
adoption, the guidelines and rules of the department; and (iii) so far
as can be ascertained, the master program being developed for the area;
(b) After adoption or approval, as appropriate, by the department
of an applicable master program, only when the development proposed is
consistent with the applicable master program and this chapter.
(3) The local government shall establish a program, consistent with
rules adopted by the department, for the administration and enforcement
of the permit system provided in this section. The administration of
the system so established shall be performed exclusively by the local
government.
(4) Except as otherwise specifically provided in subsection (11) of
this section, the local government shall require notification of the
public of all applications for permits governed by any permit system
established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section by ensuring that
notice of the application is given by at least one of the following
methods:
(a) Mailing of the notice to the latest recorded real property
owners as shown by the records of the county assessor within at least
three hundred feet of the boundary of the property upon which the
substantial development is proposed;
(b) Posting of the notice in a conspicuous manner on the property
upon which the project is to be constructed; or
(c) Any other manner deemed appropriate by local authorities to
accomplish the objectives of reasonable notice to adjacent landowners
and the public.
The notices shall include a statement that any person desiring to
submit written comments concerning an application, or desiring to
receive notification of the final decision concerning an application as
expeditiously as possible after the issuance of the decision, may
submit the comments or requests for decisions to the local government
within thirty days of the last date the notice is to be published
pursuant to this subsection. The local government shall forward, in a
timely manner following the issuance of a decision, a copy of the
decision to each person who submits a request for the decision.
If a hearing is to be held on an application, notices of such a
hearing shall include a statement that any person may submit oral or
written comments on an application at the hearing.
(5) The system shall include provisions to assure that construction
pursuant to a permit ((will not begin or be authorized until)) may
commence no sooner than twenty-one days from the date of receipt as
((provided)) defined in subsection (6) of this section((; or until all
review proceedings are terminated if the proceedings were initiated
within twenty-one days from the date of receipt as defined in
subsection (6) of this section)) except as follows:
(a) In the case of any permit issued to the state of Washington,
department of transportation, for the construction and modification of
SR 90 (I-90) on or adjacent to Lake Washington, the construction may
begin after thirty days from the date of filing, and the permits are
valid until December 31, 1995;
(b) ((Construction may be commenced no sooner than thirty days
after the date of the appeal of the board's decision is filed if a
permit is granted by the local government and (i) the granting of the
permit is appealed to the shorelines hearings board within twenty-one
days of the date of receipt, (ii) the hearings board approves the
granting of the permit by the local government or approves a portion of
the substantial development for which the local government issued the
permit, and (iii) an appeal for judicial review of the hearings board
decision is filed pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. The appellant may
request, within ten days of the filing of the appeal with the court, a
hearing before the court to determine whether construction pursuant to
the permit approved by the hearings board or to a revised permit issued
pursuant to the order of the hearings board should not commence. If,
at the conclusion of the hearing, the court finds that construction
pursuant to such a permit would involve a significant, irreversible
damaging of the environment, the court shall prohibit the permittee
from commencing the construction pursuant to the approved or revised
permit until all review proceedings are final. Construction pursuant
to a permit revised at the direction of the hearings board may begin
only on that portion of the substantial development for which the local
government had originally issued the permit, and construction pursuant
to such a revised permit on other portions of the substantial
development may not begin until after all review proceedings are
terminated. In such a hearing before the court, the burden of proving
whether the construction may involve significant irreversible damage to
the environment and demonstrating whether such construction would or
would not be appropriate is on the appellant)) Work outside of the
shoreline jurisdiction may commence in advance of the issuance of the
shoreline permit if the local government finds that such work will not
interfere with the goals of the shoreline management act;
(c) In the event of a petition to superior court pursuant to RCW
90.58.180(1), a motion to stay is filed and granted in accordance with
the requirements of chapter 36.70C RCW; provided, however the court
must further find:
(i) Commencement of the work in advance of a decision on appeal is
found to substantially interfere with the goals of the shoreline
management act and restoration or mitigation is not feasible;
(ii) The reviewing court finds substantial likelihood of success on
the merits of the appeal; and
(iii) A bond is posted under conditions identified in chapter 7.16
RCW for injunctions;
(d) If the permit is for a substantial development meeting the
requirements of subsection (11) of this section, construction pursuant
to that permit may not begin or be authorized until twenty-one days
from the date of receipt as provided in subsection (6) of this section.
If a permittee begins construction pursuant to subsections (a),
(b), or (((c))) (d) of this subsection, the construction is begun at
the permittee's own risk. If, as a result of judicial review, the
courts order the removal of any portion of the construction or the
restoration of any portion of the environment involved or require the
alteration of any portion of a substantial development constructed
pursuant to a permit, the permittee is barred from recovering damages
or costs involved in adhering to such requirements from the local
government that granted the permit, the hearings board, or any
appellant or intervener.
(6) Any decision on an application for a permit under the authority
of this section, whether it is an approval or a denial, shall,
concurrently with the transmittal of the ruling to the applicant, be
transmitted to the department and the attorney general. A petition for
review of such a decision must be commenced within twenty-one days from
the date of receipt of the decision. With regard to a permit other
than a permit governed by subsection (10) of this section, "date of
receipt" as used herein refers to the date that the applicant receives
written notice from the department that the department has received the
decision. With regard to a permit for a variance or a conditional use,
"date of receipt" means the date a local government or applicant
receives the written decision of the department rendered on the permit
pursuant to subsection (10) of this section. For the purposes of this
subsection, the term "date of receipt" has the same meaning as provided
in RCW 43.21B.001.
(7) Applicants for permits under this section have the burden of
proving that a proposed substantial development is consistent with the
criteria that must be met before a permit is granted. In any review of
the granting or denial of an application for a permit as provided in
RCW 90.58.180 (1) and (2), the person requesting the review has the
burden of proof.
(8) Any permit may, after a hearing with adequate notice to the
permittee and the public, be rescinded by the issuing authority upon
the finding that a permittee has not complied with conditions of a
permit. If the department is of the opinion that noncompliance exists,
the department shall provide written notice to the local government and
the permittee. If the department is of the opinion that the
noncompliance continues to exist thirty days after the date of the
notice, and the local government has taken no action to rescind the
permit, the department may petition the hearings board for a rescission
of the permit upon written notice of the petition to the local
government and the permittee if the request by the department is made
to the hearings board within fifteen days of the termination of the
thirty-day notice to the local government.
(9) The holder of a certification from the governor pursuant to
chapter 80.50 RCW shall not be required to obtain a permit under this
section.
(10) Any permit for a variance or a conditional use by local
government under approved master programs must be submitted to the
department for its approval or disapproval.
(11)(a) An application for a substantial development permit for a
limited utility extension or for the construction of a bulkhead or
other measures to protect a single family residence and its appurtenant
structures from shoreline erosion shall be subject to the following
procedures:
(i) The public comment period under subsection (4) of this section
shall be twenty days. The notice provided under subsection (4) of this
section shall state the manner in which the public may obtain a copy of
the local government decision on the application no later than two days
following its issuance;
(ii) The local government shall issue its decision to grant or deny
the permit within twenty-one days of the last day of the comment period
specified in (i) of this subsection; and
(iii) If there is an appeal of the decision to grant or deny the
permit to the local government legislative authority, the appeal shall
be finally determined by the legislative authority within thirty days.
(b) For purposes of this section, a limited utility extension means
the extension of a utility service that:
(i) Is categorically exempt under chapter 43.21C RCW for one or
more of the following: Natural gas, electricity, telephone, water, or
sewer;
(ii) Will serve an existing use in compliance with this chapter;
and
(iii) Will not extend more than twenty-five hundred linear feet
within the shorelines of the state.

Sec. 4 RCW 34.05.461 and 1995 c 347 s 312 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) If the presiding officer is the agency head or one or more
members of the agency head, the presiding officer may enter an initial
order if further review is available within the agency, or a final
order if further review is not available;
(b) If the presiding officer is a person designated by the agency
to make the final decision and enter the final order, the presiding
officer shall enter a final order; and
(c) If the presiding officer is one or more administrative law
judges, the presiding officer shall enter an initial order.
(2) With respect to agencies exempt from chapter 34.12 RCW or an
institution of higher education, the presiding officer shall transmit
a full and complete record of the proceedings, including such comments
upon demeanor of witnesses as the presiding officer deems relevant, to
each agency official who is to enter a final or initial order after
considering the record and evidence so transmitted.
(3) Initial and final orders shall include a statement of findings
and conclusions, and the reasons and basis therefor, on all the
material issues of fact, law, or discretion presented on the record,
including the remedy or sanction and, if applicable, the action taken
on a petition for a stay of effectiveness. Any findings based
substantially on credibility of evidence or demeanor of witnesses shall
be so identified. Findings set forth in language that is essentially
a repetition or paraphrase of the relevant provision of law shall be
accompanied by a concise and explicit statement of the underlying
evidence of record to support the findings. The order shall also
include a statement of the available procedures and time limits for
seeking reconsideration or other administrative relief. An initial
order shall include a statement of any circumstances under which the
initial order, without further notice, may become a final order.
(4) Findings of fact shall be based exclusively on the evidence of
record in the adjudicative proceeding and on matters officially noticed
in that proceeding. Findings shall be based on the kind of evidence on
which reasonably prudent persons are accustomed to rely in the conduct
of their affairs. Findings may be based on such evidence even if it
would be inadmissible in a civil trial. However, the presiding officer
shall not base a finding exclusively on such inadmissible evidence
unless the presiding officer determines that doing so would not unduly
abridge the parties' opportunities to confront witnesses and rebut
evidence. The basis for this determination shall appear in the order.
(5) Where it bears on the issues presented, the agency's
experience, technical competency, and specialized knowledge may be used
in the evaluation of evidence.
(6) If a person serving or designated to serve as presiding officer
becomes unavailable for any reason before entry of the order, a
substitute presiding officer shall be appointed as provided in RCW
34.05.425. The substitute presiding officer shall use any existing
record and may conduct any further proceedings appropriate in the
interests of justice.
(7) The presiding officer may allow the parties a designated time
after conclusion of the hearing for the submission of memos, briefs, or
proposed findings.
(8)(((a) Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection,))
Initial or final orders shall be served in writing within ninety days
after conclusion of the hearing or after submission of memos, briefs,
or proposed findings in accordance with subsection (7) of this section
unless this period is waived or extended for good cause shown.
(((b) This subsection does not apply to the final order of the
shorelines hearings board on appeal under RCW 90.58.180(3).))
(9) The presiding officer shall cause copies of the order to be
served on each party and the agency.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.21C.075 and 1997 c 429 s 49 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Because a major purpose of this chapter is to combine
environmental considerations with public decisions, any appeal brought
under this chapter shall be linked to a specific governmental action.
The State Environmental Policy Act provides a basis for challenging
whether governmental action is in compliance with the substantive and
procedural provisions of this chapter. The State Environmental Policy
Act is not intended to create a cause of action unrelated to a specific
governmental action.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by this section:
(a) Appeals under this chapter shall be of the governmental action
together with its accompanying environmental determinations.
(b) Appeals of environmental determinations made (or lacking) under
this chapter shall be commenced within the time required to appeal the
governmental action which is subject to environmental review.
(3) If an agency has a procedure for appeals of agency
environmental determinations made under this chapter, such procedure:
(a) Shall allow no more than one agency appeal proceeding on each
procedural determination (the adequacy of a determination of
significance/nonsignificance or of a final environmental impact
statement);
(b) Shall consolidate an appeal of procedural issues and of
substantive determinations made under this chapter (such as a decision
to require particular mitigation measures or to deny a proposal) with
a hearing or appeal on the underlying governmental action by providing
for a single simultaneous hearing before one hearing officer or body to
consider the agency decision or recommendation on a proposal and any
environmental determinations made under this chapter, with the
exception of:
(i) An appeal of a determination of significance;
(ii) An appeal of a procedural determination made by an agency when
the agency is a project proponent, or is funding a project, and chooses
to conduct its review under this chapter, including any appeals of its
procedural determinations, prior to submitting an application for a
project permit;
(iii) An appeal of a procedural determination made by an agency on
a nonproject action; or
(iv) An appeal to the local legislative authority under RCW
43.21C.060 or other applicable state statutes;
(c) Shall provide for the preparation of a record for use in any
subsequent appeal proceedings, and shall provide for any subsequent
appeal proceedings to be conducted on the record, consistent with other
applicable law. An adequate record consists of findings and
conclusions, testimony under oath, and taped or written transcript. An
electronically recorded transcript will suffice for purposes of review
under this subsection; and
(d) Shall provide that procedural determinations made by the
responsible official shall be entitled to substantial weight.
(4) If a person aggrieved by an agency action has the right to
judicial appeal and if an agency has an administrative appeal
procedure, such person shall, prior to seeking any judicial review, use
such agency procedure if any such procedure is available, unless
expressly provided otherwise by state statute.
(5) Some statutes and ordinances contain time periods for
challenging governmental actions which are subject to review under this
chapter, such as various local land use approvals (the "underlying
governmental action"). RCW 43.21C.080 establishes an optional "notice
of action" procedure which, if used, imposes a time period for
appealing decisions under this chapter. This subsection does not
modify any such time periods. In this subsection, the term "appeal"
refers to a judicial appeal only.
(a) If there is a time period for appealing the underlying
governmental action, appeals under this chapter shall be commenced
within such time period. The agency shall give official notice stating
the date and place for commencing an appeal.
(b) If there is no time period for appealing the underlying
governmental action, and a notice of action under RCW 43.21C.080 is
used, appeals shall be commenced within the time period specified by
RCW 43.21C.080.
(6)(a) Judicial review under subsection (5) of this section of an
appeal decision made by an agency under subsection (3) of this section
shall be on the record, consistent with other applicable law.
(b) A taped or written transcript may be used. If a taped
transcript is to be reviewed, a record shall identify the location on
the taped transcript of testimony and evidence to be reviewed. Parties
are encouraged to designate only those portions of the testimony
necessary to present the issues raised on review, but if a party
alleges that a finding of fact is not supported by evidence, the party
should include in the record all evidence relevant to the disputed
finding. Any other party may designate additional portions of the
taped transcript relating to issues raised on review. A party may
provide a written transcript of portions of the testimony at the
party's own expense or apply to that court for an order requiring the
party seeking review to pay for additional portions of the written
transcript.
(c) Judicial review under this chapter shall without exception be
of the governmental action together with its accompanying environmental
determinations.
(7) Jurisdiction over the review of determinations under this
chapter in an appeal before an agency or superior court shall upon
consent of the parties be transferred in whole or part to the
shorelines hearings board. The shorelines hearings board shall hear
the matter and sign the final order expeditiously. The superior court
shall certify the final order of the shorelines hearings board and the
certified final order may only be appealed to an appellate court. ((In
the case of an appeal under this chapter regarding a project or other
matter that is also the subject of an appeal to the shorelines hearings
board under chapter 90.58 RCW, the shorelines hearings board shall have
sole jurisdiction over both the appeal under this section and the
appeal under chapter 90.58 RCW, shall consider them together, and shall
issue a final order within one hundred eighty days as provided in RCW
90.58.180.))
(8) For purposes of this section and RCW 43.21C.080, the words
"action", "decision", and "determination" mean substantive agency
action including any accompanying procedural determinations under this
chapter (except where the word "action" means "appeal" in RCW
43.21C.080(2)). The word "action" in this section and RCW 43.21C.080
does not mean a procedural determination by itself made under this
chapter. The word "determination" includes any environmental document
required by this chapter and state or local implementing rules. The
word "agency" refers to any state or local unit of government. Except
as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the word "appeal" refers
to administrative, legislative, or judicial appeals.
(9) The court in its discretion may award reasonable attorneys'
fees of up to one thousand dollars in the aggregate to the prevailing
party, including a governmental agency, on issues arising out of this
chapter if the court makes specific findings that the legal position of
a party is frivolous and without reasonable basis.

--- END ---