BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that counties
which host evaluation and treatment beds incur costs by providing
judicial services associated with civil commitments under chapters
71.05 and 71.34 RCW. Because evaluation and treatment beds are not
evenly distributed across the state, these commitments frequently occur
in a different county from the county in which the person was
originally detained. The intent of this act is to create a process for
the state to reimburse counties for their reasonable costs incurred in
providing these judicial services, and to prevent the burden of these
costs from falling disproportionately on the counties or regional
support networks in which the commitments are most likely to occur.
The legislature recognizes that the cost of judicial services may vary
across the state based on different factors and conditions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A county may apply to the department for reimbursement of its
cost in providing judicial services under this section.
(2) The department shall reimburse each county for its cost per
commitment case at a rate to be determined based on an average of the
expenditures for judicial services within the county over the past
three years. In the event that a baseline cannot be established
because there is no significant history of similar cases within the
county, the department shall approve a reasonable rate comparable to
the average costs incurred in similar counties. For the purposes of
this section, a case includes all judicial hearings related to a single
episode of hospitalization, or less restrictive alternative detention
in lieu of hospitalization, except that the filing of a petition for a
one hundred eighty-day commitment under this chapter or a petition for
a successive one hundred eighty-day commitment under chapter 71.34 RCW
shall be considered to be a new case regardless of whether there has
been a break in detention. A county may apply at reasonable intervals
for an increase in its rate of reimbursement based on a change in its
actual cost in delivering services.
(3) The department shall pay for reimbursements under this section
out of funds withheld from the annual appropriation to the regional
support networks. Any funds withheld under this subsection that are
not used for reimbursement must be distributed to the regional support
networks. Funds which are distributed to regional support networks by
the department shall not be used to reimburse counties for the cost of
judicial services.
(4) As used in this section, "judicial services" refers to a
county's reasonable cost in providing prosecution services, assigned
counsel and defense services, court services, and court clerk services
for civil commitment cases under chapters 71.05 and 71.34 RCW. To the
extent that resources have shared purpose, the state may only reimburse
counties to the extent such resources are necessary for and devoted to
judicial services as described in this section.
(5) No filing fee shall be charged or collected for any civil
commitment case subject to reimbursement under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 71.05.110 and 1997 c 112 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Attorneys appointed for persons pursuant to this chapter shall be
compensated for their services as follows: (1))) The person for whom
an attorney is appointed under this chapter shall, if he or she is
financially able pursuant to standards as to financial capability and
indigency set by the superior court of the county in which the
proceeding is held, bear the costs of such legal services((; (2) if
such person is indigent pursuant to such standards, the costs of such
services shall be borne by the county in which the proceeding is held,
subject however to the responsibility for costs provided in RCW
71.05.320(2))).

Sec. 4 RCW 71.05.230 and 2009 c 293 s 3 and 2009 c 217 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
A person detained for seventy-two hour evaluation and treatment may
be detained for not more than fourteen additional days of involuntary
intensive treatment or ninety additional days of a less restrictive
alternative to involuntary intensive treatment. ((There shall be no
fee for filing petitions for fourteen days of involuntary intensive
treatment.)) A petition may only be filed if the following conditions
are met:
(1) The professional staff of the agency or facility providing
evaluation services has analyzed the person's condition and finds that
the condition is caused by mental disorder and either results in a
likelihood of serious harm, or results in the detained person being
gravely disabled and are prepared to testify those conditions are met;
and
(2) The person has been advised of the need for voluntary treatment
and the professional staff of the facility has evidence that he or she
has not in good faith volunteered; and
(3) The facility providing intensive treatment is certified to
provide such treatment by the department; and
(4) The professional staff of the agency or facility or the
designated mental health professional has filed a petition for fourteen
day involuntary detention or a ninety day less restrictive alternative
with the court. The petition must be signed either by:
(a) Two physicians;
(b) One physician and a mental health professional;
(c) Two psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioners;
(d) One psychiatric advanced registered nurse practitioner and a
mental health professional; or
(e) A physician and a psychiatric advanced registered nurse
practitioner. The persons signing the petition must have examined the
person. If involuntary detention is sought the petition shall state
facts that support the finding that such person, as a result of mental
disorder, presents a likelihood of serious harm, or is gravely disabled
and that there are no less restrictive alternatives to detention in the
best interest of such person or others. The petition shall state
specifically that less restrictive alternative treatment was considered
and specify why treatment less restrictive than detention is not
appropriate. If an involuntary less restrictive alternative is sought,
the petition shall state facts that support the finding that such
person, as a result of mental disorder, presents a likelihood of
serious harm, or is gravely disabled and shall set forth the less
restrictive alternative proposed by the facility; and
(5) A copy of the petition has been served on the detained person,
his or her attorney and his or her guardian or conservator, if any,
prior to the probable cause hearing; and
(6) The court at the time the petition was filed and before the
probable cause hearing has appointed counsel to represent such person
if no other counsel has appeared; and
(7) The petition reflects that the person was informed of the loss
of firearm rights if involuntarily committed; and
(8) At the conclusion of the initial commitment period, the
professional staff of the agency or facility or the designated mental
health professional may petition for an additional period of either
ninety days of less restrictive alternative treatment or ninety days of
involuntary intensive treatment as provided in RCW 71.05.290; and
(9) If the hospital or facility designated to provide outpatient
treatment is other than the facility providing involuntary treatment,
the outpatient facility so designated has agreed to assume such
responsibility.

Sec. 5 RCW 71.24.160 and 2001 c 323 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The regional support networks shall make satisfactory showing to
the secretary that state funds shall in no case be used to replace
local funds from any source being used to finance mental health
services prior to January 1, 1990. Maintenance of effort funds devoted
to judicial services related to involuntary commitment reimbursed under
section 2 of this act must be expended for other purposes that further
treatment for mental health and chemical dependency disorders.

Sec. 6 RCW 71.24.300 and 2008 c 261 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the request of a tribal authority or authorities within a
regional support network the joint operating agreement or the county
authority shall allow for the inclusion of the tribal authority to be
represented as a party to the regional support network.
(2) The roles and responsibilities of the county and tribal
authorities shall be determined by the terms of that agreement
including a determination of membership on the governing board and
advisory committees, the number of tribal representatives to be party
to the agreement, and the provisions of law and shall assure the
provision of culturally competent services to the tribes served.
(3) The state mental health authority may not determine the roles
and responsibilities of county authorities as to each other under
regional support networks by rule, except to assure that all duties
required of regional support networks are assigned and that counties
and the regional support network do not duplicate functions and that a
single authority has final responsibility for all available resources
and performance under the regional support network's contract with the
secretary.
(4) If a regional support network is a private entity, the
department shall allow for the inclusion of the tribal authority to be
represented as a party to the regional support network.
(5) The roles and responsibilities of the private entity and the
tribal authorities shall be determined by the department, through
negotiation with the tribal authority.
(6) Regional support networks shall submit an overall six-year
operating and capital plan, timeline, and budget and submit progress
reports and an updated two-year plan biennially thereafter, to assume
within available resources all of the following duties:
(a) Administer and provide for the availability of all resource
management services, residential services, and community support
services.
(b) Administer and provide for the availability of all
investigation, transportation, ((court-related,)) and other services
provided by the state or counties pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW.
(c) Provide within the boundaries of each regional support network
evaluation and treatment services for at least ninety percent of
persons detained or committed for periods up to seventeen days
according to chapter 71.05 RCW. Regional support networks may contract
to purchase evaluation and treatment services from other networks if
they are unable to provide for appropriate resources within their
boundaries. Insofar as the original intent of serving persons in the
community is maintained, the secretary is authorized to approve
exceptions on a case-by-case basis to the requirement to provide
evaluation and treatment services within the boundaries of each
regional support network. Such exceptions are limited to:
(i) Contracts with neighboring or contiguous regions; or
(ii) Individuals detained or committed for periods up to seventeen
days at the state hospitals at the discretion of the secretary.
(d) Administer and provide for the availability of all other mental
health services, which shall include patient counseling, day treatment,
consultation, education services, employment services as defined in RCW
71.24.035, and mental health services to children.
(e) Establish standards and procedures for reviewing individual
service plans and determining when that person may be discharged from
resource management services.
(7) A regional support network may request that any state-owned
land, building, facility, or other capital asset which was ever
purchased, deeded, given, or placed in trust for the care of the
persons with mental illness and which is within the boundaries of a
regional support network be made available to support the operations of
the regional support network. State agencies managing such capital
assets shall give first priority to requests for their use pursuant to
this chapter.
(8) Each regional support network shall appoint a mental health
advisory board which shall review and provide comments on plans and
policies developed under this chapter, provide local oversight
regarding the activities of the regional support network, and work with
the regional support network to resolve significant concerns regarding
service delivery and outcomes. The department shall establish
statewide procedures for the operation of regional advisory committees
including mechanisms for advisory board feedback to the department
regarding regional support network performance. The composition of the
board shall be broadly representative of the demographic character of
the region and shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of
consumers and families, law enforcement, and where the county is not
the regional support network, county elected officials. Composition
and length of terms of board members may differ between regional
support networks but shall be included in each regional support
network's contract and approved by the secretary.
(9) Regional support networks shall assume all duties specified in
their plans and joint operating agreements through biennial contractual
agreements with the secretary.
(10) Regional support networks may receive technical assistance
from the housing trust fund and may identify and submit projects for
housing and housing support services to the housing trust fund
established under chapter 43.185 RCW. Projects identified or submitted
under this subsection must be fully integrated with the regional
support network six-year operating and capital plan, timeline, and
budget required by subsection (6) of this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 71.34.300 and 1985 c 354 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county or combination of counties is responsible for
development and coordination of the evaluation and treatment program
for minors, for incorporating the program into the county mental health
plan, and for coordination of evaluation and treatment services and
resources with the community mental health program required under
chapter 71.24 RCW.
(2) The county shall be responsible for maintaining its support of
involuntary treatment services for minors at its 1984 level, adjusted
for inflation, with the department responsible for additional costs to
the county resulting from this chapter. Maintenance of effort funds
devoted to judicial services related to involuntary commitment
reimbursed under section 2 of this act must be expended for other
purposes that further treatment for mental health and chemical
dependency disorders.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department of social and health services
shall establish rules and standards for the implementation of this act
in consultation with affected parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---