BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.17.710 and 2006 c 348 s 5 and 2006 c 344 s 31 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the
date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing through the
date of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on the date
a special legislative session convenes and continuing through the date
that session adjourns, no state official or a person employed by or
acting on behalf of a state official or state legislator may solicit or
accept contributions to a public office fund, to a candidate or
authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt. Contributions
received through the mail after the thirtieth day before a regular
legislative session may be accepted if the contribution is postmarked
prior to the thirtieth day before the session.
(2) The restrictions of this section also apply to any incumbent of
a local elected office who has filed for a state office, or persons
employed by or acting on behalf of the incumbent of a local elected
office.
(3) This section does not apply to activities authorized in RCW
43.07.370.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.17A.560 and 2006 c 348 s 5 and 2006 c 344 s 31 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the
date a regular legislative session convenes and continuing through the
date of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on the date
a special legislative session convenes and continuing through the date
that session adjourns, no state official or a person employed by or
acting on behalf of a state official or state legislator may solicit or
accept contributions to a public office fund, to a candidate or
authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt. Contributions
received through the mail after the thirtieth day before a regular
legislative session may be accepted if the contribution is postmarked
prior to the thirtieth day before the session.
(2) The restrictions of this section also apply to any incumbent of
a local elected office who has filed for a state office, or persons
employed by or acting on behalf of the incumbent of a local elected
office.
(3) This section does not apply to activities authorized in RCW
43.07.370.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires January 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2012.

--- END ---