BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 79A.35 RCW
to read as follows:
Participants in conservation corps programs offered by a nonprofit
organization affiliated with a national service organization
established under the authority of the national and community service
trust act of 1993, P.L. 103-82, are exempt from provisions related to
rates of compensation while performing environmental and trail
maintenance work provided:
(1) The nonprofit organization must be registered as a nonprofit
corporation pursuant to chapter 24.03 RCW;
(2) The nonprofit organization's management and administrative
headquarters must be located in Washington;
(3) Participants in the program spend at least fifteen percent of
their time in the program on education and training activities; and
(4) Participants in the program receive a stipend or living
allowance as authorized by federal or state law.
Participants are exempt from provisions related to rates of
compensation only for environmental and trail maintenance work
conducted pursuant to the conservation corps program.

--- END ---