BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds increasing incidents
of commercial sexual exploitation of children in our state, and further
protection of victims require giving law enforcement agencies the tool
to have a unified victim-centered police investigation approach to
further protect victims by ensuring their safety by prosecuting
traffickers. The one-party consent provision permitted for drug
trafficking investigation passed in the comprehensive bill to
facilitate police investigation and prosecution of drug trafficking
crimes is a helpful tool to this end. The legislature also finds that
exceptions should be allowed for minors employed for investigation when
the minor is a victim and involves only electronic communication with
the defendant.

Sec. 2 RCW 9.73.230 and 2005 c 282 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) As part of a bona fide criminal investigation, the chief law
enforcement officer of a law enforcement agency or his or her designee
above the rank of first line supervisor may authorize the interception,
transmission, or recording of a conversation or communication by
officers under the following circumstances:
(a) At least one party to the conversation or communication has
consented to the interception, transmission, or recording;
(b) Probable cause exists to believe that the conversation or
communication involves:
(i) The unlawful manufacture, delivery, sale, or possession with
intent to manufacture, deliver, or sell, controlled substances as
defined in chapter 69.50 RCW, or legend drugs as defined in chapter
69.41 RCW, or imitation controlled substances as defined in chapter
69.52 RCW;
(ii) A party engaging in the commercial sexual abuse of a minor
under RCW 9.68A.100, or promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor
under RCW 9.68A.101, or promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of
a minor under RCW 9.68A.102; and
(c) A written report has been completed as required by subsection
(2) of this section.
(2) The agency's chief officer or designee authorizing an
interception, transmission, or recording under subsection (1) of this
section, shall prepare and sign a written report at the time of
authorization indicating:
(a) The circumstances that meet the requirements of subsection (1)
of this section;
(b) The names of the authorizing and consenting parties, except
that in those cases where the consenting party is a confidential
informant, the name of the confidential informant need not be divulged;
(c) The names of the officers authorized to intercept, transmit,
and record the conversation or communication;
(d) The identity of the particular person or persons, if known, who
may have committed or may commit the offense;
(e) The details of the particular offense or offenses that may have
been or may be committed and the expected date, location, and
approximate time of the conversation or communication; and
(f) Whether there was an attempt to obtain authorization pursuant
to RCW 9.73.090(2) and, if there was such an attempt, the outcome of
the attempt.
(3) An authorization under this section is valid in all
jurisdictions within Washington state and for the interception of
communications from additional persons if the persons are brought into
the conversation or transaction by the nonconsenting party or if the
nonconsenting party or such additional persons cause or invite the
consenting party to enter another jurisdiction.
(4) The recording of any conversation or communication under this
section shall be done in such a manner that protects the recording from
editing or other alterations.
(5) An authorization made under this section is valid for no more
than twenty-four hours from the time it is signed by the authorizing
officer, and each authorization shall independently meet all of the
requirements of this section. The authorizing officer shall sign the
written report required under subsection (2) of this section,
certifying the exact date and time of his or her signature. An
authorization under this section may be extended not more than twice
for an additional consecutive twenty-four hour period based upon the
same probable cause regarding the same suspected transaction. Each
such extension shall be signed by the authorizing officer.
(6) Within fifteen days after the signing of an authorization that
results in any interception, transmission, or recording of a
conversation or communication pursuant to this section, the law
enforcement agency which made the interception, transmission, or
recording shall submit a report including the original authorization
under subsection (2) of this section to a judge of a court having
jurisdiction which report shall identify (a) the persons, including the
consenting party, who participated in the conversation, and (b) the
date, location, and approximate time of the conversation.
In those cases where the consenting party is a confidential
informant, the name of the confidential informant need not be divulged.
A monthly report shall be filed by the law enforcement agency with
the administrator for the courts indicating the number of
authorizations granted, the date and time of each authorization,
interceptions made, arrests resulting from an interception, and
subsequent invalidations.
(7)(a) Within two judicial days of receipt of a report under
subsection (6) of this section, the court shall make an ex parte review
of the authorization((, but not of the evidence,)) and shall make a
determination whether the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section were met. Evidence obtained as a result of the interception,
transmission, or recording need not be submitted to the court. If the
court determines that any of the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section were not met, the court shall order that any recording and any
copies or transcriptions of the conversation or communication be
destroyed. Destruction of recordings, copies, or transcriptions shall
be stayed pending any appeal of a finding that the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section were not met.
(b) Absent a continuation under (c) of this subsection, six months
following a determination under (a) of this subsection that probable
cause did not exist, the court shall cause a notice to be mailed to the
last known address of any nonconsenting party to the conversation or
communication that was the subject of the authorization. The notice
shall indicate the date, time, and place of any interception,
transmission, or recording made pursuant to the authorization. The
notice shall also identify the agency that sought the authorization and
shall indicate that a review under (a) of this subsection resulted in
a determination that the authorization was made in violation of this
section provided that, if the confidential informant was a minor at the
time of the recording or an alleged victim of commercial child sexual
abuse under RCW 9.68A.100 through 9.68A.102 or 9.40.100, no such notice
shall be given.
(c) An authorizing agency may obtain six-month extensions to the
notice requirement of (b) of this subsection in cases of active,
ongoing criminal investigations that might be jeopardized by sending
the notice.
(8) In any subsequent judicial proceeding, evidence obtained
through the interception or recording of a conversation or
communication pursuant to this section shall be admissible only if:
(a) The court finds that the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section were met and the evidence is used in prosecuting an offense
listed in subsection (1)(b) of this section; or
(b) The evidence is admitted with the permission of the person
whose communication or conversation was intercepted, transmitted, or
recorded; or
(c) The evidence is admitted in a prosecution for a "serious
violent offense" as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 in which a party who
consented to the interception, transmission, or recording was a victim
of the offense; or
(d) The evidence is admitted in a civil suit for personal injury or
wrongful death arising out of the same incident, in which a party who
consented to the interception, transmission, or recording was a victim
of a serious violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.
Nothing in this subsection bars the admission of testimony of a
party or eyewitness to the intercepted, transmitted, or recorded
conversation or communication when that testimony is unaided by
information obtained solely by violation of RCW 9.73.030.
(9) Any determination of invalidity of an authorization under this
section shall be reported by the court to the administrative office of
the courts.
(10) Any person who intentionally intercepts, transmits, or records
or who intentionally authorizes the interception, transmission, or
recording of a conversation or communication in violation of this
section, is guilty of a class C felony punishable according to chapter
9A.20 RCW.
(11) An authorizing agency is liable for twenty-five thousand
dollars in exemplary damages, in addition to any other damages
authorized by this chapter or by other law, to a person whose
conversation or communication was intercepted, transmitted, or recorded
pursuant to an authorization under this section if:
(a) In a review under subsection (7) of this section, or in a
suppression of evidence proceeding, it has been determined that the
authorization was made without the probable cause required by
subsection (1)(b) of this section; and
(b) The authorization was also made without a reasonable suspicion
that the conversation or communication would involve the unlawful acts
identified in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.73.210 and 1989 c 271 s 202 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a police commander or officer above the rank of first line
supervisor has reasonable suspicion that the safety of the consenting
party is in danger, law enforcement personnel may, for the sole purpose
of protecting the safety of the consenting party, intercept, transmit,
or record a private conversation or communication concerning:
(a) The unlawful manufacture, delivery, sale, or possession with
intent to manufacture, deliver, or sell, controlled substances as
defined in chapter 69.50 RCW, or legend drugs as defined in chapter
69.41 RCW, or imitation controlled substances as defined in chapter
69.52 RCW; or
(b) Person(s) engaging in the commercial sexual abuse of a minor
under RCW 9.68A.100, or promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor
under RCW 9.68A.101, or promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of
a minor under RCW 9.68A.102.
(2) Before any interception, transmission, or recording of a
private conversation or communication pursuant to this section, the
police commander or officer making the determination required by
subsection (1) of this section shall complete a written authorization
which shall include (a) the date and time the authorization is given;
(b) the persons, including the consenting party, expected to
participate in the conversation or communication, to the extent known;
(c) the expected date, location, and approximate time of the
conversation or communication; and (d) the reasons for believing the
consenting party's safety will be in danger.
(3) A monthly report shall be filed by the law enforcement agency
with the administrator for the courts indicating the number of
authorizations made under this section, the date and time of each
authorization, and whether an interception, transmission, or recording
was made with respect to each authorization.
(4) Any information obtained pursuant to this section is
inadmissible in any civil or criminal case in all courts of general or
limited jurisdiction in this state, except:
(a) With the permission of the person whose communication or
conversation was intercepted, transmitted, or recorded without his or
her knowledge;
(b) In a civil action for personal injury or wrongful death arising
out of the same incident, where the cause of action is based upon an
act of physical violence against the consenting party; or
(c) In a criminal prosecution, arising out of the same incident for
a serious violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 in which a party
who consented to the interception, transmission, or recording was a
victim of the offense.
(5) Nothing in this section bars the admission of testimony of a
participant in the communication or conversation unaided by information
obtained pursuant to this section.
(6) The authorizing agency shall immediately destroy any written,
transcribed, or recorded information obtained from an interception,
transmission, or recording authorized under this section unless the
agency determines there has been a personal injury or death or a
serious violent offense which may give rise to a civil action or
criminal prosecution in which the information may be admissible under
subsection (4)(b) or (c) of this section.
(7) Nothing in this section authorizes the interception, recording,
or transmission of a telephonic communication or conversation.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.68A.110 and 2010 c 289 s 17 and 2010 c 227 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.040, it is not a defense that
the defendant was involved in activities of law enforcement and
prosecution agencies in the investigation and prosecution of criminal
offenses. Law enforcement and prosecution agencies shall not employ
minors to aid in the investigation of a violation of RCW 9.68A.090 or
9.68A.100, except for the purpose of facilitating an investigation
where the minor is also the alleged victim and the:
(a) Investigation is authorized pursuant to RCW 9.73.230(1)(b)(ii)
or 9.73.210(2)(b); or
(b) Minor's aid in the investigation involves only telephone or
electronic communication with the defendant.
(2) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, 9.68A.070, or
9.68A.080, it is not a defense that the defendant did not know the age
of the child depicted in the visual or printed matter. It is a
defense, which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the
evidence, that at the time of the offense the defendant was not in
possession of any facts on the basis of which he or she should
reasonably have known that the person depicted was a minor.
(3) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.040, 9.68A.090, 9.68A.100,
9.68A.101, or 9.68A.102, it is not a defense that the defendant did not
know the alleged victim's age. It is a defense, which the defendant
must prove by a preponderance of the evidence, that at the time of the
offense, the defendant made a reasonable bona fide attempt to ascertain
the true age of the minor by requiring production of a driver's
license, marriage license, birth certificate, or other governmental or
educational identification card or paper and did not rely solely on the
oral allegations or apparent age of the minor.
(4) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, 9.68A.070, or
9.68A.075, it shall be an affirmative defense that the defendant was a
law enforcement officer or a person specifically authorized, in
writing, to assist a law enforcement officer and acting at the
direction of a law enforcement officer in the process of conducting an
official investigation of a sex-related crime against a minor, or that
the defendant was providing individual case treatment as a recognized
medical facility or as a psychiatrist or psychologist licensed under
Title 18 RCW. Nothing in chapter 227, Laws of 2010 is intended to in
any way affect or diminish the immunity afforded an electronic
communication service provider, remote computing service provider, or
domain name registrar acting in the performance of its reporting or
preservation responsibilities under 18 U.S.C. Secs. 2258a, 2258b, or
2258c.
(5) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, 9.68A.070, or
9.68A.075, the state is not required to establish the identity of the
alleged victim.
(6) In a prosecution under RCW 9.68A.070 or 9.68A.075, it shall be
an affirmative defense that:
(a) The defendant was employed at or conducting research in
partnership or in cooperation with any institution of higher education
as defined in RCW 28B.07.020 or 28B.10.016, and:
(i) He or she was engaged in a research activity;
(ii) The research activity was specifically approved prior to the
possession or viewing activity being conducted in writing by a person,
or other such entity vested with the authority to grant such approval
by the institution of higher ((learning)) education; and
(iii) Viewing or possessing the visual or printed matter is an
essential component of the authorized research; or
(b) The defendant was an employee of the Washington state
legislature engaged in research at the request of a member of the
legislature and:
(i) The request for research is made prior to the possession or
viewing activity being conducted in writing by a member of the
legislature;
(ii) The research is directly related to a legislative activity;
and
(iii) Viewing or possessing the visual or printed matter is an
essential component of the requested research and legislative activity.
(((c))) (7) Nothing in this section authorizes otherwise unlawful
viewing or possession of visual or printed matter depicting a minor
engaged in sexually explicit conduct.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect August 1, 2011.

--- END ---