BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a severe shortage
of primary health care providers exists in Washington, particularly in
rural and underserved areas of the state. The legislature further
finds that an over reliance on specialty health care at the expense of
primary care results in a health care system that is less efficient.
The legislature further finds that institutions of higher education
must produce more primary care providers. The legislature further
finds that the efficient use of clinical sites for rotations and
residencies will expand the supply of primary care providers. The
legislature further finds that expanding residency programs in
community health centers will increase residents' exposure to primary
care practice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.115
RCW to read as follows:
Any entity receiving state funds may not prohibit a hospital or
physician from entering into an agreement to provide student clinical
rotations or residencies to qualified osteopathic or allopathic medical
students.

--- END ---