BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79.105.060 and 2005 c 155 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout chapters 79.105
through 79.145 RCW unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aquatic lands" means all tidelands, shorelands, harbor areas,
and the beds of navigable waters.
(2) "Beds of navigable waters" means those lands lying waterward of
and below the line of navigability on rivers and lakes not subject to
tidal flow, or extreme low tide mark in navigable tidal waters, or the
outer harbor line where harbor area has been created.
(3) "First-class shorelands" means the shores of a navigable lake
or river belonging to the state, not subject to tidal flow, lying
between the line of ordinary high water and the line of navigability,
or inner harbor line where established and within or in front of the
corporate limits of any city or within two miles of either side.
(4) "First-class tidelands" means the shores of navigable tidal
waters belonging to the state, lying within or in front of the
corporate limits of any city, or within one mile of either side and
between the line of ordinary high tide and the inner harbor line; and
within two miles of the corporate limits on either side and between the
line of ordinary high tide and the line of extreme low tide.
(5) "Harbor area" means the area of navigable waters determined as
provided in Article XV, section 1 of the state Constitution, which
shall be forever reserved for landings, wharves, streets, and other
conveniences of navigation and commerce.
(6) "Improvements" when referring to state-owned aquatic lands
means anything considered a fixture in law placed within, upon, or
attached to aquatic lands that has changed the value of those lands, or
any changes in the previous condition of the fixtures that changes the
value of the land.
(7) "Inflation rate" means for a given year the percentage rate of
change in the previous calendar year's all commodity producer price
index of the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department
of commerce. If the index ceases to be published, the department shall
designate by rule a comparable substitute index.
(8) "Inner harbor line" means a line located and established in
navigable waters between the line of ordinary high tide or ordinary
high water and the outer harbor line, constituting the inner boundary
of the harbor area.
(9) "Log booming" means placing logs into and taking them out of
the water, assembling and disassembling log rafts before or after their
movement in water-borne commerce, related handling and sorting
activities taking place in the water, and the temporary holding of logs
to be taken directly into a processing facility. "Log booming" does
not include the temporary holding of logs to be taken directly into a
vessel.
(10) "Log storage" means the water storage of logs in rafts or
otherwise prepared for shipment in water-borne commerce, but does not
include the temporary holding of logs to be taken directly into a
vessel or processing facility.
(11) "Nonwater-dependent use" means a use that can operate in a
location other than on the waterfront. Examples include, but are not
limited to, hotels, condominiums, apartments, restaurants, retail
stores, and warehouses not part of a marine terminal or transfer
facility.
(12) "Outer harbor line" means a line located and established in
navigable waters as provided in Article XV, section 1 of the state
Constitution, beyond which the state shall never sell or lease any
rights whatever to private persons.
(13) "Person" means any private individual, partnership,
association, organization, cooperative, firm, corporation, the state or
any agency or political subdivision thereof, any public or municipal
corporation, or any unit of government, however designated.
(14) "Port district" means a port district created under Title 53
RCW.
(15) "Public utility lines" means pipes, conduits, and similar
facilities for distribution of water, electricity, natural gas,
telephone, other electronic communication, and sewers, including sewer
outfall lines.
(16) "Real rate of return" means the average for the most recent
ten calendar years of the average rate of return on conventional real
property mortgages as reported by the federal home loan bank board or
any successor agency, minus the average inflation rate for the most
recent ten calendar years.
(17) "Second-class shorelands" means the shores of a navigable lake
or river belonging to the state, not subject to tidal flow, lying
between the line of ordinary high water and the line of navigability,
and more than two miles from the corporate limits of any city.
(18) "Second-class tidelands" means the shores of navigable tidal
waters belonging to the state, lying outside of and more than two miles
from the corporate limits of any city, and between the line of ordinary
high tide and the line of extreme low tide.
(19) "Shorelands," where not preceded by "first-class" or "second-class," means both first-class shorelands and second-class shorelands.
(20) "State-owned aquatic lands" means all tidelands, shorelands,
harbor areas, the beds of navigable waters, and waterways owned by the
state and administered by the department or managed under RCW
79.105.420 by a port district. "State-owned aquatic lands" does not
include aquatic lands owned in fee by, or withdrawn for the use of,
state agencies other than the department.
(21) "Terminal" means a point of interchange between land and water
carriers, such as a pier, wharf, or group of such, equipped with
facilities for care and handling of either cargo or passengers, or
both.
(22) "Tidelands," where not preceded by "first-class" or "second-class," means both first-class tidelands and second-class tidelands.
(23) "Valuable materials" when referring to state-owned aquatic
lands means any product or material within or upon lands, such as
forest products, forage, stone, gravel, sand, peat, agricultural crops,
and all other materials of value except mineral, coal, petroleum, and
gas as provided for under chapter 79.14 RCW. However, RCW 79.140.190
and 79.140.200 also apply to materials provided for under chapter 79.14
RCW.
(24) "Water-dependent use" means a use that cannot logically exist
in any location but on the water. Examples include, but are not
limited to: Water-borne commerce; terminal and transfer facilities;
ferry terminals; watercraft sales in conjunction with other water-dependent uses; watercraft construction, repair, and maintenance;
moorage and launching facilities; aquaculture; log booming; and public
fishing piers and parks.
(25) "Water-oriented use" means a use that historically has been
dependent on a waterfront location, but with existing technology could
be located away from the waterfront. Examples include, but are not
limited to, wood products manufacturing, watercraft sales, fish
processing, petroleum refining, sand and gravel processing, log
storage, and house boats. For the purposes of determining rent under
this chapter, water-oriented uses shall be classified as water-dependent uses if the activity either is conducted on state-owned
aquatic lands leased on October 1, 1984, or was actually conducted on
the state-owned aquatic lands for at least three years before October
1, 1984. If, after October 1, 1984, the activity is changed to a use
other than a water-dependent use, the activity shall be classified as
a nonwater-dependent use. If continuation of the existing use requires
leasing additional state-owned aquatic lands and is permitted under the
shoreline management act of 1971, chapter 90.58 RCW, the department may
allow reasonable expansion of the water-oriented use.
(26) "Marina" means any entity occupying state-owned aquatic lands
that provides vessel moorage for a fee or includes marina slips within
the definition of a unit for condominium purposes, excluding homeowner
associations, facilities that provide moorage exclusively for floating
homes, and facilities that are entirely dedicated to providing public
use and access under a no-fee public use and access agreement.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.105.240 and 2005 c 155 s 147 are each amended to
read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, annual rent rates for
the lease of state-owned aquatic lands for water-dependent uses shall
be determined as follows:
(1)(a) The assessed land value, exclusive of improvements, as
determined by the county assessor, of the upland tax parcel used in
conjunction with the leased area or, if there are no such uplands, of
the nearest upland tax parcel used for water-dependent purposes divided
by the parcel area equals the upland value.
(b) ((The upland value times the area of leased aquatic lands times
thirty percent equals the aquatic land value.)) For marinas only, the
upland value used to calculate rent shall be as determined in (a) of
this subsection unless the upland value is not within forty-five
percent of the geographic average upland value for that marina. The
geographic average upland value for each marina is the average of the
upland values as determined in (a) of this subsection of all the
marinas within a five mile radius centered on each marina.
(i) If the upland value of a marina is more than forty-five percent
above the geographic average upland value for that marina, then the
upland value used to calculate the marina's rent will be a value that
is forty-five percent above the geographic average upland value for
that marina.
(ii) If the upland value of a marina is more than forty-five
percent below the geographic average upland value for that marina, then
the upland value used to calculate the marina's rent will be a value
that is forty-five percent below the geographic average upland value
for that marina.
(c) The upland value times the area of leased aquatic lands times
thirty percent equals the aquatic land value.
(2) As of July 1, 1989, and each July 1st thereafter, the
department shall determine the real capitalization rate to be applied
to water-dependent aquatic land leases commencing or being adjusted
under subsection (3)(a)(i) of this section in that fiscal year. The
real capitalization rate shall be the real rate of return, except that
until June 30, 1989, the real capitalization rate shall be five percent
and thereafter it shall not change by more than one percentage point in
any one year or be more than seven percent or less than three percent.
(3)(a) The annual rent shall be:
(((a))) (i) Determined initially, and redetermined every four years
or as otherwise provided in the lease, by multiplying the aquatic land
value times the real capitalization rate; and
(((b))) (ii) Adjusted by the inflation rate each year in which the
rent is not determined under (a)(i) of this subsection.
(b) For marinas only, on years when rent is initially or
redetermined under (a) of this subsection, the rent determined under
(a) of this subsection must be added to a base rent of two hundred
fifty dollars. The base rent must be deposited into the resource
management cost account created in RCW 79.64.020.
(4) If the upland parcel used in conjunction with the leased area
is not assessed or has an assessed value inconsistent with the purposes
of the lease, the nearest comparable upland parcel used for similar
purposes shall be substituted and the lease payment determined in the
same manner as provided in this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "upland tax parcel" is a tax
parcel, some portion of which has upland characteristics. Filled
tidelands or shorelands with upland characteristics which abut state-owned aquatic land shall be considered as uplands in determining
aquatic land values.
(6) The annual rent for filled state-owned aquatic lands that have
the characteristics of uplands shall be determined in accordance with
RCW 79.105.270 in those cases in which the state owns the fill and has
a right to charge for the fill.
(((7) For all new leases for other water-dependent uses, issued
after December 31, 1997, the initial annual water-dependent rent shall
be determined by the methods in subsections (1) through (6) of this
section.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.105 RCW
to read as follows:
If the initial annual rent for a marina established using RCW
79.105.240(1)(b) to calculate upland value results in an increase in
rent, the initial annual rent will be increased by twenty-five percent
of the difference of the initial annual rent and the previous rent. On
each anniversary date before the following revaluation, the annual rent
must be increased an additional twenty-five percent of the difference
of the initial rent and the previous rent. The annual rent established
on the following revaluation date is not subject to this section. If
the initial annual rent for a marina established using RCW
79.105.240(1)(b) to calculate upland value results in a decrease in
rent, the initial annual rent will be decreased by twenty-five percent
of the difference of the previous rent and the initial annual rent. On
each anniversary date before the following revaluation, the annual rent
shall be decreased an additional twenty-five percent of the difference
of the previous rent and the initial rent. The annual rent established
on the following revaluation date is not subject to this section. All
rents determined under this section are subject to an inflation rate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 79.105.060, 79.105.240, and section 3 of
this act apply to all annual rents for marinas determined initially or
redetermined on or after the effective date of this section.

--- END ---