BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.13.120 and 2004 c 102 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the state should acquire easements
primarily along riparian and other sensitive aquatic areas from
qualifying small forest landowners willing to sell or donate such
easements to the state provided that the state will not be required to
acquire such easements if they are subject to unacceptable liabilities.
The legislature therefore establishes a forestry riparian easement
program.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and RCW 76.13.100 ((and)), 76.13.110, 76.13.140, and 76.13.160
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Forestry riparian easement" means an easement covering
qualifying timber granted voluntarily to the state by a qualifying
small forest landowner.
(b) "Qualifying small forest landowner" means a landowner meeting
all of the following characteristics as of the date the department of
natural resources offers compensation for a forestry riparian easement:
(i) Is a small forest landowner as defined in (d) of this
subsection and whose interest in the land and timber is in fee prior to
July 1, 2011, or the applicant is a lineal descendant of a landowner
meeting this condition;
(ii) Is an individual, partnership, corporation, or other
nongovernmental for-profit legal entity; and
(iii) Is an enrolled participant in an internationally recognized
forest certification program, or has a forest stewardship plan that has
been approved by the department of natural resources, that includes the
land affected by the associated forestry riparian easement. Qualifying
small forest landowners with completed forestry riparian easement
applications in the queue prior to July 1, 2011, have until July 1,
2012, to meet the criteria of this subsection (2)(b)(iii).
(c) "Qualifying timber" means those forest trees for which the
small forest landowner is willing to grant the state a forestry
riparian easement and must meet all of the following:
(i) The forest trees are covered by a forest practices application
that the small forest landowner is required to leave unharvested under
the rules adopted under RCW 76.09.055 and 76.09.370 or that is made
uneconomic to harvest by those rules((, and for which the small
landowner is willing to grant the state a forestry riparian easement.
"Qualifying timber" is timber));
(ii) The forest trees are within or bordering a commercially
reasonable harvest unit as determined under rules adopted by the forest
practices board, or ((timber)) for which an approved forest practices
application for timber harvest cannot be obtained because of
restrictions under the forest practices rules;
(iii) The forest trees are located within, or affected by forest
practices rules pertaining to any one, or all, of the following:
(A) Riparian or other sensitive aquatic areas;
(B) Channel migration zones; or
(C) Areas of potentially unstable slopes or landforms, verified by
the department, and must meet all of the following:
(I) Are addressed in a forest practices application;
(II) Are adjacent to a commercially reasonable harvest area; and
(III) Have the potential to deliver sediment or debris to a public
resource.
(((c))) (d) "Small forest landowner" means a landowner meeting all
of the following characteristics:
(i) A forest landowner as defined in RCW 76.09.020 whose interest
in the land and timber is in fee or who has rights to the timber to be
included in the forestry riparian easement that extend at least fifty
years from the date the ((forest practices)) completed forestry
riparian easement application associated with the easement is
submitted;
(ii) An entity that has harvested from its own lands in this state
during the three years prior to the year of application an average
timber volume that would qualify the owner as a small harvester under
RCW 84.33.035; and
(iii) An entity that certifies at the time of application that it
does not expect to harvest from its own lands more than the volume
allowed by RCW 84.33.035 during the ten years following application.
If a landowner's prior three-year average harvest exceeds the limit of
RCW 84.33.035, or the landowner expects to exceed this limit during the
ten years following application, and that landowner establishes to the
department of natural resources' reasonable satisfaction that the
harvest limits were or will be exceeded to raise funds to pay estate
taxes or equally compelling and unexpected obligations such as court-ordered judgments or extraordinary medical expenses, the landowner
shall be deemed to be a small forest landowner. For purposes of
determining whether a person qualifies as a small forest landowner, the
small forest landowner office, created in RCW 76.13.110, shall evaluate
the landowner under this definition, pursuant to RCW 76.13.160, as of
the date that the forest practices application is submitted ((or the
date the landowner notifies the department that the harvest is to begin
with which the forestry riparian easement is associated)) and the date
that the department of natural resources offers compensation for the
forestry riparian easement. A small forest landowner can include an
individual, partnership, ((corporate)) corporation, or other
nongovernmental legal entity. If a landowner grants timber rights to
another entity for less than five years, the landowner may still
qualify as a small forest landowner under this section. If a landowner
is unable to obtain an approved forest practices application for timber
harvest for any of his or her land because of restrictions under the
forest practices rules, the landowner may still qualify as a small
forest landowner under this section.
(((d))) (e) "Completion of harvest" means that the trees have been
harvested from an area and that further entry into that area by
mechanized logging or slash treating equipment is not expected.
(3) The department of natural resources is authorized and directed
to accept and hold in the name of the state of Washington forestry
riparian easements granted by qualifying small forest landowners
covering qualifying timber and to pay compensation to such landowners
in accordance with ((subsections (6) and (7) of)) this section. The
department of natural resources may not transfer the easements to any
entity other than another state agency.
(4) Forestry riparian easements shall be effective for fifty years
from the date ((the forest practices application associated with the
qualifying timber is submitted to the department of natural resources))
of the completed forestry riparian easement, unless the easement is
voluntarily terminated earlier by the department of natural resources
((voluntarily)), based on a determination that termination is in the
best interest of the state, or under the terms of a termination clause
in the easement.
(5) Forestry riparian easements shall be restrictive only, and
shall preserve all lawful uses of the easement premises by the
landowner that are consistent with the terms of the easement and the
requirement to protect riparian functions during the term of the
easement, subject to the restriction that the leave trees required by
the rules to be left on the easement premises may not be cut during the
term of the easement. No right of public access to or across, or any
public use of the easement premises is created by this statute or by
the easement. Forestry riparian easements shall not be deemed to
trigger the compensating tax of or otherwise disqualify land from being
taxed under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW.
(6) ((Upon application of a small forest landowner for a riparian
easement that is associated with a forest practices application and the
landowner's marking of the qualifying timber on the qualifying lands,
the small forest landowner office shall determine the compensation to
be offered to the small forest landowner as provided for in this
section. The small forest landowner office shall also determine the
compensation to be offered to a small forest landowner for qualifying
timber for which an approved forest practices application for timber
harvest cannot be obtained because of restrictions under the forest
practices rules. The legislature recognizes that there is not readily
available market transaction evidence of value for easements of this
nature, and thus establishes the following methodology to ascertain the
value for forestry riparian easements. Values so determined shall not
be considered competent evidence of value for any other purpose.
The small forest landowner office shall establish the volume of the
qualifying timber. Based on that volume and using data obtained or
maintained by the department of revenue under RCW 84.33.074 and
84.33.091, the small forest landowner office shall attempt to determine
the fair market value of the qualifying timber as of the date the
forest practices application associated with the qualifying timber was
submitted or the date the landowner notifies the department that the
harvest is to begin. Removal of any qualifying timber before the
expiration of the easement must be in accordance with the forest
practices rules and the terms of the easement. There shall be no
reduction in compensation for reentry)) The small forest landowner
office shall determine what constitutes a completed application for a
forestry riparian easement. Such an application shall, at a minimum,
include documentation of the owner's status as a qualifying small
forest landowner, identification of location and the types of
qualifying timber, and notification of completion of harvest, if
applicable.
(7) ((Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the
small forest landowner office shall, subject to available funding,
offer compensation to the small forest landowner in the amount of fifty
percent of the value determined in subsection (6) of this section, plus
the compliance and reimbursement costs as determined in accordance with
RCW 76.13.140. If the landowner accepts the offer for qualifying
timber that will be harvested pursuant to an approved forest practices
application, the department of natural resources shall pay the
compensation promptly upon (a) completion of harvest in the area
covered by the forestry riparian easement; (b) verification that there
has been compliance with the rules requiring leave trees in the
easement area; and (c) execution and delivery of the easement to the
department of natural resources. If the landowner accepts the offer
for qualifying timber for which an approved forest practices
application for timber harvest cannot be obtained because of
restrictions under the forest practices rules, the department of
natural resources shall pay the compensation promptly upon (i)
verification that there has been compliance with the rules requiring
leave trees in the easement area; and (ii) execution and delivery of
the easement to the department of natural resources. Upon donation or
payment of compensation, the department of natural resources may record
the easement.
(8))) Upon receipt of the qualifying small forest landowner's
forestry riparian easement application, and subject to the availability
of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the following must
occur:
(a) The small forest landowner office shall determine the
compensation to be offered to the qualifying small forest landowner
for qualifying timber after the department accepts the completed
forestry riparian easement application and the landowner has completed
marking the boundary of the area containing the qualifying timber. The
legislature recognizes that there is not readily available market
transaction evidence of value for easements of the nature required by
this section, and thus establishes the methodology provided in this
subsection to ascertain the value for forestry riparian easements.
Values so determined may not be considered competent evidence of value
for any other purpose.
(b) The small forest landowner office, subject to the availability
of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, is responsible for
assessing the volume of qualifying timber. Based on the volume
established by the small forest landowner office and using data
obtained or maintained by the department of revenue under RCW 84.33.074
and 84.33.091, the small forest landowner office shall attempt to
determine the fair market value of the qualifying timber as of the date
the complete forestry riparian easement application is received.
Removal of any qualifying timber before the expiration of the easement
must be in accordance with the forest practices rules and the terms of
the easement. There shall be no reduction in compensation for reentry.
(8) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section and
subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific
purpose, the small forest landowner office shall offer compensation for
qualifying timber to the qualifying small forest landowner in the
amount of fifty percent of the value determined by the small forest
landowner office, plus the compliance and reimbursement costs as
determined in accordance with RCW 76.13.140. Compensation is capped to
a total of one hundred thousand dollars value for qualifying timber
located on potentially unstable slopes or landforms during any four-year period. If the landowner accepts the offer for qualifying timber,
the department of natural resources shall pay the compensation promptly
upon: (a) Completion of harvest in the area within a commercially
reasonable harvest unit with which the forestry riparian easement is
associated under an approved forest practices application, unless an
approved forest practices application for timber harvest cannot be
obtained because of restrictions under the forest practices rules; (b)
verification that the landowner has no outstanding violations under
chapter 76.09 RCW or any associated rules; and (c) execution and
delivery of the easement to the department of natural resources. Upon
donation or payment of compensation, the department of natural
resources may record the easement.
(9) For approved forest practices applications ((where)) for which
the regulatory impact is greater than the average percentage impact for
all small forest landowners as determined by an analysis by the
department of natural resources ((analysis)) under the regulatory
fairness act, chapter 19.85 RCW, the compensation offered will be
increased to one hundred percent for that portion of the regulatory
impact that is in excess of the average. Regulatory impact includes
all trees ((left in buffers, special management zones, and those
rendered uneconomic to harvest by these rules)) identified as
qualifying timber. A separate average or high impact regulatory
threshold shall be established for western and eastern Washington.
Criteria for these measurements and payments shall be established by
the small forest landowner office.
(((9))) (10) The forest practices board shall adopt rules under the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement the
forestry riparian easement program, including the following:
(a) A standard version ((or versions of all)) of a forestry
riparian easement application as well as all additional documents
necessary or advisable to create the forestry riparian easements as
provided for in this section;
(b) Standards for descriptions of the easement premises with a
degree of precision that is reasonable in relation to the values
involved;
(c) Methods and standards for cruises and valuation of forestry
riparian easements for purposes of establishing the compensation. The
department of natural resources, subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose, shall perform the timber
cruises of forestry riparian easements required under this chapter and
chapter 76.09 RCW. Any rules concerning the methods and standards for
valuations of forestry riparian easements shall apply only to the
department of natural resources, qualifying small forest landowners,
and the small forest landowner office;
(d) A method to determine that a forest practices application
involves a commercially reasonable harvest, and adopt criteria for
entering into a ((forest)) forestry riparian easement where a
commercially reasonable harvest is not possible or a forest practices
application that has been submitted cannot be approved because of
restrictions under the forest practices rules;
(e) A method to address blowdown of qualified timber falling
outside the easement premises;
(f) A formula for sharing of proceeds in relation to the
acquisition of qualified timber covered by an easement through the
exercise or threats of eminent domain by a federal or state agency with
eminent domain authority, based on the present value of the department
of natural resources' and the landowner's relative interests in the
qualified timber;
(g) High impact regulatory thresholds;
(h) A method to determine timber that is qualifying timber because
it is rendered uneconomic to harvest by the rules adopted under RCW
76.09.055 and 76.09.370; and
(i) A method for internal department of natural resources review of
small forest landowner office compensation decisions under ((subsection
(7) of)) this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.13.140 and 2002 c 120 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In order to assist small forest landowners to remain economically
viable, the legislature intends that the qualifying small forest
landowners be able to net fifty percent of the value of the trees left
in the buffer areas. The amount of compensation offered in RCW
76.13.120 shall also include the compliance costs for participation in
the forestry riparian easement program((. For purposes of this
section, "compliance costs" includes)), including the cost of preparing
and recording the forestry riparian easement, and any business and
occupation tax and real estate excise tax imposed because of entering
into the forestry riparian easement. The small forest landowner office
may contract with private consultants that the office finds qualified
to perform timber cruises of forestry riparian easements or to lay out
streamside buffers and comply with other forest ((and fish)) practices
regulatory requirements related to the ((forest)) forestry riparian
easement program. The department shall reimburse qualifying small
forest landowners for the actual costs incurred for laying out the
streamside buffers and marking the qualifying timber once a contract
has been executed for the forestry riparian easement program.
Reimbursement is subject to the work being acceptable to the
department. The small forest landowner office shall determine how the
reimbursement costs will be calculated.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.13.160 and 2004 c 102 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
When establishing a ((forest)) forestry riparian easement program
applicant's status as a qualifying small forest landowner pursuant to
RCW 76.13.120, the department shall not review the applicant's timber
harvest records, or any other tax-related documents, on file with the
department of revenue. The department of revenue may confirm or deny
an applicant's status as a small forest landowner at the request of the
department((;)). However, for the purposes of this section, the
department of revenue may not disclose more information than whether or
not the applicant has reported a harvest or harvests totaling greater
than or less than the qualifying thresholds established in RCW
76.13.120. Nothing in this section, or RCW 84.33.280, prohibits the
department from reviewing aggregate or general information provided by
the department of revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The chair of the forest practices board
shall invite relevant stakeholders to participate in a process that
investigates, and ultimately recommends, potential new long-term
funding sources for the forestry riparian easement program established
in chapter 76.13 RCW.
(2) The findings of, and recommendations from, the process required
by this section must be reported to the appropriate committees of the
legislature in the manner prescribed in RCW 43.01.036 by October 31,
2011.
(3) This section expires July 31, 2012.

--- END ---