BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.14.010 and 1987 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that serious, personal harassment through
repeated invasions of a person's privacy by acts and words showing a
pattern of harassment designed to coerce, intimidate, or humiliate the
victim is increasing. The legislature further finds that the
prevention of such harassment is an important governmental objective.
This chapter is intended to provide victims and, with respect to
harassment affecting the workplace, employers with a speedy and
inexpensive method of obtaining civil antiharassment protection orders
preventing all further unwanted contact between the victim and the
perpetrator.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.14.020 and 2001 c 260 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Unlawful harassment" means a knowing and willful course of
conduct directed at a specific person or employer which seriously
alarms, annoys, harasses, or is detrimental to such person or employer,
and which serves no legitimate or lawful purpose. The course of
conduct shall be such as would cause a reasonable person to suffer
substantial emotional distress, and shall actually cause substantial
emotional distress to the petitioner, or, when the course of conduct
would cause a reasonable parent to fear for the well-being of their
child.
(2) "Course of conduct" means a pattern of conduct composed of a
series of acts over a period of time, however short, evidencing a
continuity of purpose. "Course of conduct" includes, in addition to
any other form of communication, contact, or conduct, the sending of an
electronic communication. Constitutionally protected activity is not
included within the meaning of "course of conduct."
(3) "Employer" means an individual, partnership, association, or
corporation, or a person or group of persons who act, directly or
indirectly, on behalf of or in the interest of an employer and with the
consent of the employer. "Employer" includes the state, a political
subdivision of the state, and any school district or other special
district.
(4) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
26.50.010.
(5) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
70.125.030.
(6) "Stalking" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 9A.46.110.

Sec. 3 RCW 10.14.040 and 2002 c 117 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall exist an action known as a petition for an order for
protection in cases of unlawful harassment.
(1) A petition for relief shall allege the existence of harassment
and shall be accompanied by an affidavit made under oath stating the
specific facts and circumstances from which relief is sought.
(2) A petition for relief may be made regardless of whether or not
there is a pending lawsuit, complaint, petition, or other action
between the parties.
(3) All court clerks' offices shall make available simplified forms
and instructional brochures. Any assistance or information provided by
clerks under this section does not constitute the practice of law and
clerks are not responsible for incorrect information contained in a
petition.
(4) Filing fees are set in RCW 36.18.020, but no filing fee may be
charged for a petition filed in an existing action or under an existing
cause number brought under this chapter in the jurisdiction where the
relief is sought or as provided in RCW 10.14.055. Forms and
instructional brochures shall be provided free of charge.
(5) A person is not required to post a bond to obtain relief in any
proceeding under this section.
(6) The parent or guardian of a child under age eighteen may
petition for an order of protection to restrain a person age eighteen
years or over from contact with that child upon a showing that contact
with the person to be enjoined is detrimental to the welfare of the
child.
(7) The parent or guardian of a child under the age of eighteen may
petition in superior court for an order of protection to restrain a
person under the age of eighteen years from contact with that child
only in cases where the person to be restrained has been adjudicated of
an offense against the child protected by the order, or is under
investigation or has been investigated for such an offense. In issuing
a protection order under this subsection, the court shall consider,
among the other facts of the case, the severity of the alleged offense,
any continuing physical danger or emotional distress to the alleged
victim, and the expense, difficulty, and educational disruption that
would be caused by a transfer of the alleged offender to another
school. The court may order that the person restrained in the order
not attend the public or approved private elementary, middle, or high
school attended by the person under the age of eighteen years protected
by the order. In the event that the court orders a transfer of the
restrained person to another school, the parents or legal guardians of
the person restrained in the order are responsible for transportation
and other costs associated with the change of school by the person
restrained in the order. The court shall send notice of the
restriction on attending the same school as the person protected by the
order to the public or approved private school the person restrained by
the order will attend and to the school the person protected by the
order attends.
(8) An employer or an authorized agent of an employer may petition
for an order for protection to restrain a person from engaging in
unlawful harassment affecting the workplace. In issuing a protection
order under this subsection, the court may consider a respondent's
unlawful harassment of an employer, employee, and other persons
affecting a workplace, place of business, or persons performing
official work duties.

Sec. 4 RCW 10.14.080 and 2001 c 311 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon filing a petition for a civil antiharassment protection
order under this chapter, the petitioner may obtain an ex parte
temporary antiharassment protection order. An ex parte temporary
antiharassment protection order may be granted with or without notice
upon the filing of an affidavit which, to the satisfaction of the
court, shows reasonable proof of unlawful harassment of the petitioner
by the respondent and that great or irreparable harm will result to the
petitioner if the temporary antiharassment protection order is not
granted.
(2) An ex parte temporary antiharassment protection order shall be
effective for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days or twenty-four
days if the court has permitted service by publication under RCW
10.14.085. The ex parte order may be reissued. A full hearing, as
provided in this chapter, shall be set for not later than fourteen days
from the issuance of the temporary order or not later than twenty-four
days if service by publication is permitted. Except as provided in RCW
10.14.070 and 10.14.085, the respondent shall be personally served with
a copy of the ex parte order along with a copy of the petition and
notice of the date set for the hearing. The ex parte order and notice
of hearing shall include at a minimum the date and time of the hearing
set by the court to determine if the temporary order should be made
effective for one year or more, and notice that if the respondent
should fail to appear or otherwise not respond, an order for protection
will be issued against the respondent pursuant to the provisions of
this chapter, for a minimum of one year from the date of the hearing.
The notice shall also include a brief statement of the provisions of
the ex parte order and notify the respondent that a copy of the ex
parte order and notice of hearing has been filed with the clerk of the
court.
(3) At the hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the
evidence that unlawful harassment exists, a civil antiharassment
protection order shall issue prohibiting such unlawful harassment.
(4) An order issued under this chapter shall be effective for not
more than one year unless the court finds that the respondent is likely
to resume unlawful harassment of the petitioner when the order expires.
If so, the court may enter an order for a fixed time exceeding one year
or may enter a permanent antiharassment protection order. The court
shall not enter an order that is effective for more than one year if
the order restrains the respondent from contacting the respondent's
minor children. This limitation is not applicable to civil
antiharassment protection orders issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10, or
26.26 RCW. If the petitioner seeks relief for a period longer than one
year on behalf of the respondent's minor children, the court shall
advise the petitioner that the petitioner may apply for renewal of the
order as provided in this chapter or if appropriate may seek relief
pursuant to chapter 26.09 or 26.10 RCW.
(5) At any time within the three months before the expiration of
the order, the petitioner may apply for a renewal of the order by
filing a petition for renewal. The petition for renewal shall state
the reasons why the petitioner seeks to renew the protection order.
Upon receipt of the petition for renewal, the court shall order a
hearing which shall be not later than fourteen days from the date of
the order. Except as provided in RCW 10.14.085, personal service shall
be made upon the respondent not less than five days before the hearing.
If timely service cannot be made the court shall set a new hearing date
and shall either require additional attempts at obtaining personal
service or permit service by publication as provided by RCW 10.14.085.
If the court permits service by publication, the court shall set the
new hearing date not later than twenty-four days from the date of the
order. If the order expires because timely service cannot be made the
court shall grant an ex parte order of protection as provided in this
section. The court shall grant the petition for renewal unless the
respondent proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the
respondent will not resume harassment of the petitioner when the order
expires. The court may renew the protection order for another fixed
time period or may enter a permanent order as provided in subsection
(4) of this section.
(6) The court, in granting an ex parte temporary antiharassment
protection order or a civil antiharassment protection order, shall have
broad discretion to grant such relief as the court deems proper,
including an order:
(a) Restraining the respondent from making any attempts to contact
the petitioner;
(b) Restraining the respondent from making any attempts to keep the
petitioner under surveillance;
(c) Requiring the respondent to stay a stated distance from the
petitioner's residence ((and)), workplace, or other place of business;
and
(d) Considering the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.
(7) If the court grants a petition under this chapter based on
unlawful harassment affecting the workplace, the court may, in addition
to relief granted under subsection (6) of this section:
(a) Restrain the respondent from contacting the employer, employee,
or other person while that person is performing official work duties;
and
(b) Grant any other relief necessary for the protection of the
employer, the workplace, the employer's employees, or any other person
who is on or at the employer's property or place of business or who is
performing official work duties.
(8) A petitioner may not obtain an ex parte temporary
antiharassment protection order against a respondent if the petitioner
has previously obtained two such ex parte orders against the same
respondent but has failed to obtain the issuance of a civil
antiharassment protection order unless good cause for such failure can
be shown.
(((8))) (9) The court order shall specify the date an order issued
pursuant to subsections (4) and (5) of this section expires if any.
The court order shall also state whether the court issued the
protection order following personal service or service by publication
and whether the court has approved service by publication of an order
issued under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 10.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) When an employer has knowledge that a specific person or
persons are the target of unlawful harassment, the employer shall make
a good faith effort to provide notice to the person or persons that the
employer intends to petition the court for an order of protection under
this chapter. If the employer has knowledge that the unlawful
harassment arises from an act or acts of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking, the employer shall, before seeking an order of
protection under this chapter, provide actual notice to the person and
obtain his or her consent prior to making a petition.
(2) The ability of an employer to petition for a protective order
under RCW 10.14.020 shall not be construed to expand, diminish, alter,
or modify the duty of an employer to provide a safe workplace for its
employees and other persons.
(3) No employer may discharge, threaten to discharge, demote, deny
a promotion to, sanction, discipline, retaliate against, harass, or
otherwise discriminate against an employee because the employee is a
target of unlawful harassment affecting the workplace or does not
consent, as applicable, to the petition for an order of protection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 10.14 RCW
to read as follows:
An employer is immune from civil liability for seeking or failing
to seek a petition for relief under this chapter for unlawful
harassment in the workplace unless the employer is seeking a petition
for relief primarily to accomplish a purpose for which the petition was
not designed. An action or statement by an employer under this chapter
shall not be deemed an admission by the employer of any fact. An
action or statement by an employer under this chapter may not be used
for impeachment purposes.

--- END ---