BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The agenda of all regular meetings of
the governing body of every public agency, special purpose district,
and any municipality that owns and maintains a web site shall be posted
seventy-two hours before a meeting. The agenda of all special meetings
shall be posted twenty-four hours before a meeting. The posting shall
indicate if the agendas are in draft form.
(2) The text of any ordinance, rule, or regulation that is under
consideration at the meeting shall be included on the web site at the
same time the agenda is posted.
(3) The minutes of all regular and special meetings of the
governing body of every public agency, special purpose district, and
any municipality that owns and maintains a web site shall be posted
within fifteen business days after approval. All postings under this
section shall remain on the web site for one calendar year.
(4) Every public agency, special purpose district, and any
municipality that owns and maintains a public internet web site shall
at all times have posted to it a roster of the names of all members of
its governing body, identifying the positions, and constituency where
applicable, of all members. The web site shall at all times provide
both the start date and end date of the elective or appointed terms of
all members.
(5) Subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply to the
following public agencies, municipalities, or their respective
subagencies: (a) Counties with a population of less than thirty
thousand and the special purpose districts and school districts within
those counties; (b) special purpose districts providing service to a
population of less than one thousand; (c) cities or towns with a
population of less than eight thousand; or (d) port districts with
three or fewer staff.
(6) Any action relating to the purchase of municipal bonds is
exempt from this section.
(7) The attorney general shall develop model rules regarding the
materials that public agencies should post to the web sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act shall be known as the light of day
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 42 RCW.

--- END ---