BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.36.111 and 2009 c 414 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every ballot for a single combination of issues, offices, and
candidates shall be uniform within a precinct and shall identify the
type of primary or election, the county, and the date of the primary or
election, and the ballot or voting device shall contain instructions on
the proper method of recording a vote, including write-in votes. Each
position, together with the names of the candidates for that office,
shall be clearly separated from other offices or positions in the same
jurisdiction. The offices in each jurisdiction shall be clearly
separated from each other.
(2) No paper ballot or ballot card may ((be marked by or at the
direction of an election official in any way that would permit the
identification of the person who voted that ballot)) contain any
encrypted or unencrypted bar code or other unique identifying mark,
except as specifically authorized by this subsection. A ballot may
contain a randomly assigned unique identifying mark solely for auditing
and vote reconciliation purposes, or to determine if a particular
ballot has been previously counted. The unique identifying mark shall
not be associated at any time with an individual voter, a voter's
address, or a voter's registration number.
(((2))) (3) An ((elections [election])) election official may not
enter into or extend any contract with a vendor if such contract may
allow the vendor to acquire an ownership interest in any data
pertaining to any voter, any voter's address, registration number, or
history, or any ballot.

--- END ---