BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that one of the goals
of the juvenile justice system is to rehabilitate juvenile offenders
and promote their successful reintegration into society. Without
opportunities to reintegrate, juveniles suffer increased recidivism and
decreased economic function. The legislature further finds that the
unrestricted dissemination of juvenile records can hinder social
reintegration when inaccurate, outdated, or personal information
remains in the public realm. The legislature believes that limiting
the number of mechanisms for accessing juvenile records and the number
of places where those records may be housed can increase overall public
record accuracy while promoting the juvenile's rehabilitation and
integration and protecting public safety. It is the intent of the
legislature to balance the rehabilitative and reintegration needs of an
effective juvenile justice system with the public's need to access
personal information for public safety and research purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Consumer reporting agency" means a person, or corporation,
who, for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis,
regularly engages in whole or in part in the business of assembling,
aggregating, or evaluating information on consumers for the purpose of
furnishing consumer reports to third parties, and who uses any means or
facility of commerce for the purpose of preparing or furnishing
consumer reports. "Consumer reporting agency" does not include
offices, programs, or facilities run by the state of Washington or
their employees;
(2) "De-identified record" means any record in which the name,
address, and personally identifiable information is removed;
(3) "Disseminate" means to disclose juvenile record information or
the absence of such record information to any person;
(4) "Juvenile records" has the same meaning as "records" in chapter
13.50 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A consumer reporting agency that
collects personally identifiable information pertaining to, or
including, juvenile records about an individual residing in Washington
may not disseminate information contained within the record, including
the existence or nonexistence of such record to any third party.
(2) A consumer reporting agency that collects personally
identifiable information pertaining to, and including, juvenile records
about an individual residing in Washington may disseminate de-identified records for the purposes of social science research, trend
data, and generalized aggregation.

Sec. 4 RCW 2.68.010 and 1989 c 364 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The judicial information system committee, as established by court
rule, shall determine all matters pertaining to the delivery of
services available from the judicial information system. The committee
may establish a fee schedule for the provision of information services
and may enter into contracts with any ((person,)) public ((or private))
entity, including the state, its departments, subdivisions,
institutions, and agencies. However, no fee may be charged to county
or city governmental agencies within the state of Washington using the
judicial information system for the business of the courts.

Sec. 5 RCW 2.68.020 and 2009 c 564 s 1802 and 2009 c 564 s 918
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
There is created an account in the custody of the state treasurer
to be known as the judicial information system account. The
administrative office of the courts shall maintain and administer the
account, in which shall be deposited all moneys received from in-state
noncourt public entity users and any out-of-state public entity users
of the judicial information system and moneys as specified in RCW
2.68.040 for the purposes of providing judicial information system
access to noncourt public entity users and providing an adequate level
of automated services to the judiciary. The legislature shall
appropriate the funds in the account for the purposes of the judicial
information system. The account shall be used for the acquisition of
equipment, software, supplies, services, and other costs incidental to
the acquisition, development, operation, and administration of
information services, telecommunications, systems, software, supplies,
and equipment, including the payment of principal and interest on items
paid in installments. ((During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the judicial information system account
to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance of the account.)) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the judicial information system account
to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance of the account.

Sec. 6 RCW 2.68.030 and 1989 c 364 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The judicial information system committee shall develop a schedule
of user fees for in-state noncourt public entity users and all out-of-state public entity users of the judicial information computer system
and charges for judicial information system products and licenses for
the purpose of distributing and apportioning the full cost of operation
and continued development of the system among the users. The judicial
information system shall not be used to disseminate, nor shall fees be
charged to private entities to obtain, any juvenile record information
for the purposes of disseminating that information to credit reporting
agencies or other private entities. The schedule shall generate
sufficient revenue to cover the costs relating to (1) the payment of
salaries, wages, other costs including, but not limited to the
acquisition, operation, and administration of acquired information
services, supplies, and equipment; and (2) the development of judicial
information system products and services. As used in this section, the
term "supplies" shall not be interpreted to delegate or abrogate the
state purchasing and material control director's responsibilities and
authority to purchase supplies as provided in chapter 43.19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 13 RCW.

--- END ---