BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A task force on construction crane
safety review is established. The task force consists of the following
members:
(a) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives;
(b) One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate; and
(c) Participants or stakeholders invited by the legislative members
including, but not limited to, persons representing the following:
(i) A representative of the construction crane industry;
(ii) A representative of nonconstruction industries that use
cranes;
(iii) A representative of the department of labor and industries
selected by the director of the department of labor and industries;
(iv) A representative of construction crane operators; and
(v) A representative of construction crane manufacturers.
(2) The committee must be staffed by the senate committee services
and the house of representatives office of program research.
(3) Legislative members must be reimbursed in accordance with RCW
44.04.120.
(4) The task force must choose its chair from legislative members.
(5) The task force must review the following issues:
Implementation of the statutes concerning crane safety (RCW 49.17.400
through 49.17.440) including: Industry impact, industry safety record
to date, inspection efficiency, a review of other state crane safety
programs that have demonstrated efficacy with reduced costs, department
of labor and industries' concerns and suggestions, and effectiveness of
the statutes.
(6) The task force must report its findings and recommendations in
the form of draft legislation to the legislature by December 1, 2011.
(7) This section expires December 31, 2011.

--- END ---