BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.011 and 2009 c 537 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.
(2) "State purchased health care" or "health care" means medical
and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health
services, the department of health, the basic health plan, the state
health care authority, the department of labor and industries, the
department of corrections, the department of veterans affairs, and
local school districts.
(3) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.
(4) "Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01
RCW, a health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW,
or a health maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.
(5) "Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows
employees to choose the level of health care coverage provided and the
amount of employee contributions from among a range of choices offered
by the authority.
(6) "Employee" includes all employees of the state, whether or not
covered by civil service; elected and appointed officials of the
executive branch of government, including full-time members of boards,
commissions, or committees; justices of the supreme court and judges of
the court of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state
legislature. Pursuant to contractual agreement with the authority,
"employee" may also include: (a) Employees of a county, municipality,
or other political subdivision of the state and members of the
legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to
office after February 20, 1970, if the legislative authority of the
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state seeks
and receives the approval of the authority to provide any of its
insurance programs by contract with the authority, as provided in RCW
41.04.205 and 41.05.021(1)(g); (b) employees of employee organizations
representing state civil service employees, at the option of each such
employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of
employee organizations currently pooled with employees of school
districts for the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at the
option of each such employee organization; (c) employees of a school
district if the authority agrees to provide any of the school
districts' insurance programs by contract with the authority as
provided in RCW 28A.400.350; and (d) employees of a tribal government,
if the governing body of the tribal government seeks and receives the
approval of the authority to provide any of its insurance programs by
contract with the authority, as provided in RCW 41.05.021(1) (f) and
(g). "Employee" does not include: Adult family homeowners; unpaid
volunteers; patients of state hospitals; inmates; employees of the
Washington state convention and trade center as provided in RCW
41.05.110; students of institutions of higher education as determined
by their institution; and any others not expressly defined as employees
under this chapter or by the authority under this chapter.
(7) "Seasonal employee" means an employee hired to work during a
recurring, annual season with a duration of three months or more, and
anticipated to return each season to perform similar work.
(8) "Faculty" means an academic employee of an institution of
higher education whose workload is not defined by work hours but whose
appointment, workload, and duties directly serve the institution's
academic mission, as determined under the authority of its enabling
statutes, its governing body, and any applicable collective bargaining
agreement.
(9) "Board" means the public employees' benefits board established
under RCW 41.05.055.
(10) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a school district or
educational service district and are receiving a retirement allowance
under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district on or after October 1, 1993, and
immediately upon separation receive a retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;
(c) Persons who separate from employment with a school district or
educational service district due to a total and permanent disability,
and are eligible to receive a deferred retirement allowance under
chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW.
(11) "Premium payment plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may pay their share of group health plan premiums with
pretax dollars as provided in the salary reduction plan under this
chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the
internal revenue code.
(12) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.
(13) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility
and enrollment requirements under the salary reduction plan.
(14) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.
(15) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:
(a) RCW 41.32.010(((11))) (17) on or after July 1, 1996; or
(b) RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or
(c) RCW 41.40.010 on or after March 1, 2002;
and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(((40))) (33), the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010, or the public employees'
retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.
(16) "Emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty" means
law enforcement officers and firefighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030,
members of the Washington state patrol retirement fund as defined in
RCW 43.43.120, and reserve officers and firefighters as defined in RCW
41.24.010 who die as a result of injuries sustained in the course of
employment as determined consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department
of labor and industries.
(17) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(18) "Employing agency" means a division, department, or separate
agency of state government, including an institution of higher
education; a county, municipality, school district, educational service
district, or other political subdivision; and a tribal government
covered by this chapter.
(19) "Tribal government" means an Indian tribal government as
defined in section 3(32) of the employee retirement income security act
of 1974, as amended, or an agency or instrumentality of the tribal
government, that has government offices principally located in this
state.
(20) "Dependent care assistance program" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may pay for certain employment
related dependent care with pretax dollars as provided in the salary
reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 129 or
other sections of the internal revenue code.
(21) "Salary reduction plan" means a benefit plan whereby state and
public employees may agree to a reduction of salary on a pretax basis
to participate in the dependent care assistance program, medical
flexible spending arrangement, or premium payment plan offered pursuant
to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.
(22) "Medical flexible spending arrangement" means a benefit plan
whereby state and public employees may reduce their salary before taxes
to pay for medical expenses not reimbursed by insurance as provided in
the salary reduction plan under this chapter pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec.
125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.
(23) "Retired local government employee" means:
(a) Persons who separated from employment with a county,
municipality, or other political subdivision of the state and are
receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.40 RCW as of July 1,
2011;
(b) Persons who separate from employment with a county,
municipality, or other political subdivision of the state on or after
July 1, 2011, and immediately upon separation receive a retirement
allowance under chapter 41.40 RCW; or
(c) Members of the public employees' retirement system plan 3 as
defined in chapter 41.40 RCW who are at least fifty-five years of age
and who have at least ten years of service credit in the public
employees' retirement system and who separate from employment with a
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state on or
after July 1, 2011, and immediately upon separation elect to continue
health insurance coverage with their employer or coverage provided by
the public employees' benefits board.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.04.208 and 2004 c 173 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Disabled employee" means a person eligible to receive a
disability retirement allowance from the Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2 and the public
employees' retirement system.
(b) "Health plan" means a contract, policy, fund, trust, or other
program established jointly or individually by a county, municipality,
or other political subdivision of the state that provides for all or a
part of hospitalization or medical aid for its employees and their
dependents under RCW 41.04.180.
(c) "Retired employee" means a public employee meeting the
retirement eligibility, years of service requirements, and other
criteria of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system plan 2 and the public employees' retirement system,
except that "retired local government employee" means:
(i) Persons who separated from employment with a county,
municipality, or other political subdivision of the state and are
receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.40 RCW as of July 1,
2011;
(ii) Persons who separate from employment with a county,
municipality, or other political subdivision of the state on or after
July 1, 2011, and immediately upon separation receive a retirement
allowance under chapter 41.40 RCW;
(iii) Members of the public employees' retirement system plan 3 as
defined in chapter 41.40 RCW who are at least fifty-five years of age
and who have at least ten years of service credit in the public
employees' retirement system and who separate from employment with a
county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state on or
after July 1, 2011, and immediately upon separation elect to continue
health insurance coverage with their employer or coverage provided by
the public employees' benefits board.
(2) A county, municipality, or other political subdivision that
provides a health plan for its employees shall permit retired and
disabled employees and their dependents to continue participation in a
plan subject to the exceptions, limitations, and conditions set forth
in this section. However, this section does not apply to a county,
municipality, or other political subdivision participating in an
insurance program administered under chapter 41.05 RCW if retired and
disabled employees and their dependents of the participating county,
municipality, or other political subdivision are covered under an
insurance program administered under chapter 41.05 RCW. Nothing in
this subsection or chapter 319, Laws of 2002 precludes the local
government employer from offering retired or disabled employees a
health plan with a benefit structure, copayment, deductible,
coinsurance, lifetime benefit maximum, and other plan features which
differ from those offered through a health plan provided to active
employees. Further, nothing in this subsection precludes a local
government employer from joining with other public agency employers,
including interjurisdictional benefit pools and multi-employer
associations or consortiums, to fulfill its obligations under chapter
319, Laws of 2002.
(3) A county, municipality, or other political subdivision has full
authority to require a person who requests continued participation in
a health plan under subsection (2) of this section to pay the full cost
of such participation, including any amounts necessary for
administration. However, this subsection does not require an employer
who is currently paying for all or part of a health plan for its
retired and disabled employees to discontinue those payments.
(4) Payments for continued participation in a former employer's
health plan may be assigned to the underwriter of the health plan from
public pension benefits or may be paid to the former employer, as
determined by the former employer, so that an underwriter of the health
plan that is an insurance company, health care service contractor, or
health maintenance organization is not required to accept individual
payments from persons continuing participation in the employer's health
plan.
(5) After an initial open enrollment period of ninety days after
January 1, 2003, an employer may not be required to permit a person to
continue participation in the health plan if the person is responsible
for a lapse in coverage under the plan. In addition, an employer may
not be required to permit a person to continue participation in the
employer's health plan if the employer offered continued participation
in a health plan that meets the requirements of chapter 319, Laws of
2002.
(6) If a person continuing participation in the former employer's
health plan has medical coverage available through another employer,
the medical coverage of the other employer is the primary coverage for
purposes of coordination of benefits as provided for in the former
employer's health plan.
(7) If a person's continued participation in a health plan was
permitted because of the person's relationship to a retired or disabled
employee of the employer providing the health plan and the retired or
disabled employee dies, then that person is permitted to continue
participation in the health plan for a period of not more than six
months after the death of the retired or disabled employee. However,
the employer providing the health plan may permit continued
participation beyond that time period.
(8) An employer may offer one or more health plans different from
that provided for active employees and designed to meet the needs of
persons requesting continued participation in the employer's health
plan. An employer, in designing or offering continued participation in
a health plan, may utilize terms or conditions necessary to administer
the plan to the extent the terms and conditions do not conflict with
this section.
(9) If an employer changes the underwriter of a health plan, the
replaced underwriter has no further responsibility or obligation to
persons who continued participation in a health plan of the replaced
underwriter. However, the employer shall permit those persons to
participate in any new health plan.
(10) The benefits granted under this section are not considered a
matter of contractual right. Should the legislature, a county,
municipality, or other political subdivision of the state revoke or
change any benefits granted under this section, an affected person is
not entitled to receive the benefits as a matter of contractual right.
(11) This section does not affect any health plan contained in a
collective bargaining agreement in existence as of January 1, 2003.
However, any plan contained in future collective bargaining agreements
shall conform to this section. In addition, this section does not
affect any health plan contract or policy in existence as of January 1,
2003. However, any renewal of the contract or policy shall conform to
this section.
(12) Counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions
that make a documented good faith effort to comply with the provisions
of subsections (2) through (11) of this section and are unable to
provide access to a fully insured group health benefit plan are
discharged from any obligations under subsections (2) through (11) of
this section but shall assist disabled employees and retired employees
in applying for health insurance. Assistance may include developing
and distributing standardized information on the availability and cost
of individual health benefit plans, application packages, and health
benefit fairs.
(13) The office of the insurance commissioner shall make available
to counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions
information regarding individual health benefit plans, including a list
of carriers offering individual coverage, the rates charged, and how to
apply for coverage.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.05.022 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The health care authority is hereby designated as the single
state agent for purchasing health services.
(2) On and after January 1, 1995, at least the following state-purchased health services programs shall be merged into a single,
community-rated risk pool: Health benefits for groups of employees of
school districts and educational service districts that voluntarily
purchase health benefits as provided in RCW 41.05.011; health benefits
for state employees; health benefits for eligible retired or disabled
school employees not eligible for parts A and B of medicare; health
benefits for eligible retired local government employees not eligible
for parts A and B of medicare; and health benefits for eligible state
retirees not eligible for parts A and B of medicare.
(3) At a minimum, and regardless of other legislative enactments,
the state health services purchasing agent shall:
(a) Require that a public agency that provides subsidies for a
substantial portion of services now covered under the basic health plan
use uniform eligibility processes, insofar as may be possible, and
ensure that multiple eligibility determinations are not required;
(b) Require that a health care provider or a health care facility
that receives funds from a public program provide care to state
residents receiving a state subsidy who may wish to receive care from
them, and that an insuring entity that receives funds from a public
program accept enrollment from state residents receiving a state
subsidy who may wish to enroll with them;
(c) Strive to integrate purchasing for all publicly sponsored
health services in order to maximize the cost control potential and
promote the most efficient methods of financing and coordinating
services;
(d) Consult regularly with the governor, the legislature, and state
agency directors whose operations are affected by the implementation of
this section; and
(e) Ensure the control of benefit costs under managed competition
by adopting rules to prevent employers from entering into an agreement
with employees or employee organizations when the agreement would
result in increased utilization in public employees' benefits board
plans or reduce the expected savings of managed competition.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.05.080 and 2009 c 523 s 1 and 2009 c 522 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Under the qualifications, terms, conditions, and benefits set
by the board:
(a) Retired or disabled state employees, retired or disabled school
employees, retired or disabled employees of county, municipal, or other
political subdivisions, or retired or disabled employees of tribal
governments ((covered by this chapter)) may continue their
participation in insurance plans and contracts after retirement or
disablement; retired employees of county, municipal, or other political
subdivisions who selected participation in insurance plans provided by
their employers immediately upon retirement may elect to move to
coverage provided by the public employees' benefits board during the
open enrollment period of each year, provided that no lapse in coverage
results;
(b) Separated employees may continue their participation in
insurance plans and contracts if participation is selected immediately
upon separation from employment; separated employees of county,
municipal, or other political subdivisions who selected participation
in insurance plans provided by their employers immediately upon
separation of employment may elect to move to coverage provided by the
public employees' benefits board during the open enrollment period of
each year, provided that no lapse in coverage results;
(c) Surviving spouses, domestic partners, and dependent children of
emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty may participate
in insurance plans and contracts.
(2) Rates charged surviving spouses and domestic partners of
emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty, retired or
disabled employees, separated employees, spouses, or dependent children
who are not eligible for parts A and B of medicare shall be based on
the experience of the community rated risk pool established under RCW
41.05.022.
(3) Rates charged to surviving spouses and domestic partners of
emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty, retired or
disabled employees, separated employees, spouses, or children who are
eligible for parts A and B of medicare shall be calculated from a
separate experience risk pool comprised only of individuals eligible
for parts A and B of medicare; however, the premiums charged to
medicare-eligible retirees and disabled employees shall be reduced by
the amount of the subsidy provided under RCW 41.05.085.
(4) Surviving spouses, domestic partners, and dependent children of
emergency service personnel killed in the line of duty and retired or
disabled and separated employees shall be responsible for payment of
premium rates developed by the authority which shall include the cost
to the authority of providing insurance coverage including any amounts
necessary for reserves and administration in accordance with this
chapter. These self pay rates will be established based on a separate
rate for the employee, the spouse, and the children.
(5) The term "retired state employees" for the purpose of this
section shall include but not be limited to members of the legislature
whether voluntarily or involuntarily leaving state office.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.05.120 and 2005 c 518 s 921 and 2005 c 143 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The public employees' and retirees' insurance account is hereby
established in the custody of the state treasurer, to be used by the
administrator for the deposit of contributions, the remittance paid by
school districts and educational service districts under RCW
28A.400.410, the remittance paid by county, municipality, or other
political subdivisions under section 6 of this act, reserves,
dividends, and refunds, for payment of premiums for employee and
retiree insurance benefit contracts and subsidy amounts provided under
RCW 41.05.085, and transfers from the ((medical)) flexible spending
administrative account as authorized in RCW 41.05.123. Moneys from the
account shall be disbursed by the state treasurer by warrants on
vouchers duly authorized by the administrator. Moneys from the account
may be transferred to the medical flexible spending account to provide
reserves and start-up costs for the operation of the medical flexible
spending account program.
(2) The state treasurer and the state investment board may invest
moneys in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account. All
such investments shall be in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 or
43.84.150, whichever is applicable. The administrator shall determine
whether the state treasurer or the state investment board or both shall
invest moneys in the public employees' insurance account.
(3) During the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the public employees' and retirees' insurance account
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In a manner prescribed by the state health care authority,
counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions shall remit
to the health care authority for deposit in the public employees' and
retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120 an amount
established by the public employees' benefits board.
(2) The remittance requirements specified in this section does not
apply to employees of a county, municipality, or other political
subdivision who receive insurance benefits through contracts with the
health care authority.
(3) The health care authority has the authority to establish a
remittance amount that will cover the cost of premium subsidies for
nonmedicare and medicare retirees and administrative costs related to
their coverage.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act takes effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---