BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that parents are
responsible for the care and support of their children with
developmental disabilities. The legislature also recognizes that, in
some cases, the intense support required to care for a child with
developmental disabilities may cause undue caregiver stress and
burnout, causing the family to request an out-of-home placement.
It is the intent of the legislature that, when the sole reason for
the out-of-home placement is the child's developmental disability, such
services be offered by the department to these children and their
families through a shared parenting placement agreement. In these
cases, the parents shall retain legal custody of the child.
The legislature intends that out-of-home services assisting
children with disabilities and their families should be available in
the most integrated setting appropriate to individual needs, consistent
with the mandate of the Americans with disabilities act and the
regulations adopted thereto, as interpreted by the United States
supreme court in Olmstead v. L.C., 527 U.S. 581 (1999).
It is the intent of the legislature that all children with
developmental disabilities who are placed out of home shall receive
services through a shared parenting placement agreement, except those
children with developmental disabilities in foster care because of
abuse, neglect, or exploitation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Child" means a person age twenty-one years or younger who has
intellectual or developmental disabilities and is eligible for services
under Title 71A RCW.
(2) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(3) "Developmental disability assessment" means an annual
assessment administered to clients of the department who are eligible
and receiving services under Title 71A RCW.
(4) "Out-of-home placement" and "out-of-home care" means the
placement of a child in a foster family home or group care facility
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW, a certified resident program under
Title 71A RCW, or a residential habilitation center.
(5) "Shared parenting placement agreement" means a written
agreement between a child's parent or legal guardian and the department
authorizing the department to place the child in a licensed or
certified facility or program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Under the terms of a shared parenting
placement agreement, the parent or legal guardian shall retain legal
custody of the child. The parent or legal guardian shall share
parenting responsibilities as outlined in the shared parenting
placement agreement.
(2) The shared parenting placement agreement must, at a minimum,
specify the legal status of the child and the rights and obligations of
the parent or legal guardian, including any education and training the
parent or legal guardian needs to support the child in home, and the
rights and obligations of the department while the child is in
placement.
(3) The agreement must be signed by the child's parent or legal
guardian and the department in order to take effect, except that an
agreement regarding an Indian child is not valid unless executed in
writing before the court and filed with the court as provided in RCW
13.34.245.
(4) Any party to a shared parenting placement agreement may
terminate the agreement at any time. Upon termination of the
agreement, the child must be returned to the care of the child's parent
or legal guardian, unless the child has been taken into custody
pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or 26.44.050, placed in shelter care pursuant
to RCW 13.34.060, or placed in foster care pursuant to RCW 13.34.130.
(5) The department may undertake a shared parenting placement
agreement in cases where the child's developmental disability is such
that the parent, guardian, or legal custodian is unable to provide the
necessary care for the child, and the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian has determined that the child would benefit from placement
outside of the home. If the department does not accept the shared
parenting placement agreement signed by the parent, a petition may be
filed and an action pursued under chapter 13.34 RCW. The department
shall inform the parent, guardian, or legal custodian in writing of
their right to civil action under chapter 13.34 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Under the shared parenting placement
agreement, the department shall provide, directly or by contract, out-of-home residential services required for the child's health and
safety.
(2) The child's developmental disability assessment must determine
the level and extent of residential and other services, which must be
provided in a community setting in the least restrictive environment.
After six months in the community setting, the child must be reassessed
to determine if the community setting meets the needs of the child.
(3) If a child would have otherwise been placed at a residential
habilitation center for these services, the secretary shall transfer
the funding from the institutional budget to the community budget to
cover the costs for the child. The average rate for the services
provided in the community may not exceed eighty percent of the average
daily rate paid for placement in the residential habilitation center.
(4) If a child is transferred from a least restrictive environment
to a more restrictive environment, a planning team, within ten days of
placement, shall develop a transition plan to a less restrictive
environment that will meet the needs of the child.
(5) Before the placement is made the department shall notify the
local school district that the child is being placed within its
jurisdiction.
(6) Within thirty days of placement, the department shall convene
the planning team to develop the individual services and support plan.
This plan must be the basis for permanency planning and provide
safeguards in the best interests of the child.
(7) Whenever the parent or legal guardian requests an out-of-home
placement under a shared parenting placement agreement, the department
shall determine the level of support and services required, the
appropriate home and community based waiver on which the child will be
placed, and arrange residential services and other services the child
may need.
(8) The department shall license or certify new facilities or
programs to serve children under shared parenting placement agreements
as needed, and the licensing or certification must be done within
thirty days from the date of the determination of need for such a new
facility or program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Within the first one hundred eighty days
of the placement, the department shall obtain a judicial determination
pursuant to RCW 13.04.030(1)(j) and 13.34.270 that the placement is in
the best interests of the child. If the child's out-of-home placement
ends before one hundred eighty days have elapsed, no judicial
determination under RCW 13.04.030(1)(b) is required. The permanency
planning hearings shall review whether the child's best interests are
served by continued out-of-home placement and determine the future
legal status of the child.
(2) Nothing in this section prevents the department from filing a
dependency petition if there is reason to believe that the child is a
dependent child as defined in RCW 13.34.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department shall propose rules necessary
to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 74.13.350 (Children with developmental
disabilities -- Out-of-home placement -- Voluntary placement agreement) and
2004 c 183 s 4, 1998 c 229 s 1, & 1997 c 386 s 16 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 71A RCW.

--- END ---