BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that: (a) Pulping
liquors can be used to reduce harmful pollution and produce electricity
and thermal energy that enables pulp and paper facilities to be highly
energy efficient; (b) biomass facilities and pulp and paper mills are
typically located in communities that are disproportionately affected
by economic downturns; (c) mill closures have occurred throughout the
state for more than a decade and the remaining ones have become all the
more dependent on selling wood residuals, which are used for
electricity generation, in order to sustain their economic viability;
(d) employment at pulp and paper mills in the state has also declined
significantly, most recently in Grays Harbor and Snohomish counties;
(e) wood derived biomass is a renewable fuel for generating electricity
and considered carbon-neutral under the laws of the state of
Washington; and (f) using food processing residues, food waste, and
yard waste to generate renewable electricity can benefit rural
economies, decrease the amount of solid waste that requires disposal,
and reduce greenhouse gas emissions that result from organic decay.
(2) The legislature declares that, by promoting the generation of
renewable energy from biomass, particularly in economically distressed
communities, it intends to ensure greater economic stability for the
communities that have suffered heavy job losses and chronic
unemployment.
(3) The legislature further declares that: (a) The owners of
qualified biomass energy facilities that must comply with the renewable
energy standards under the energy independence act of 2006, either as
a matter of law or contractual obligation, should be permitted to use
qualified biomass energy credits to meet their obligations; and (b)
electricity that is generated by a biomass energy facility that entered
commercial operation after March 31, 1999, from the combustion of
organic by-products of pulping and the wood manufacturing process
should be treated as an eligible renewable resource.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.285.030 and 2009 c 565 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are
not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by
a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state
auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(4) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption resulting from increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, or distribution.
(5) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.52.030.
(6) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council within the department of labor and industries.
(7) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases electricity
for ultimate consumption and not for resale.
(8) "Department" means the department of commerce or its successor.
(9) "Distributed generation" means an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility or any integrated cluster of such
facilities has a generating capacity of not more than five megawatts.
(10) "Eligible renewable resource" means:
(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable
resource other than freshwater that commences operation after March 31,
1999, where: (i) The facility is located in the Pacific Northwest; or
(ii) the electricity from the facility is delivered into Washington
state on a real-time basis without shaping, storage, or integration
services; ((or))
(b) Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements completed after March 31, 1999, to hydroelectric
generation projects owned by a qualifying utility and located in the
Pacific Northwest or to hydroelectric generation in irrigation pipes
and canals located in the Pacific Northwest, where the additional
generation in either case does not result in new water diversions or
impoundments; and
(c) Qualified biomass energy.
(11) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 19.29A.010.
(12) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of electricity
delivered in the most recently completed year by a qualifying utility
to its Washington retail customers.
(13) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally related
characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and other
electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the
generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not
limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage,
qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided emissions
of pollutants to the air, soil, or water, and avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases.
(14) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined for the
Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific Northwest
electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698; 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 839a).
(15) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
39.35C.010.
(16) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as the term
"electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves more than
twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington. The number
of customers served may be based on data reported by a utility in form
861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the energy
information administration, United States department of energy.
(17) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable certificate of
proof of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility is not powered by freshwater((,)). The
certificate includes all of the nonpower attributes associated with
that one megawatt-hour of electricity, and the certificate is verified
by a renewable energy credit tracking system selected by the
department.
(18) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar
energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean, or
tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth or first-growth forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; ((and)) or (i) biomass energy
((based on animal waste or solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or
field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include (i) wood
pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as
creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) black
liquor by-product from paper production; (iii) wood from old growth
forests; or (iv) municipal solid waste)).
(19)(a) "Biomass energy" includes: (i) Organic by-products of
pulping and the wood manufacturing process; (ii) animal manure; (iii)
solid organic fuels from wood; (iv) forest or field residues; (v)
untreated wooden demolition or construction debris; (vi) food waste and
food processing residuals; (vii) liquors derived from algae; (viii)
dedicated energy crops; and (ix) yard waste.
(b) "Biomass energy" does not include: (i) Wood pieces that have
been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) wood from old growth
forests; or (iii) municipal solid waste.
(20) "Qualified biomass energy" means electricity produced from a
biomass energy facility that: (a) Commenced operation before March 31,
1999; (b) contributes to the qualifying utility's load; and (c) is
owned either by: (i) A qualifying utility; or (ii) an industrial
facility that is directly interconnected with electricity facilities
that are owned by a qualifying utility and capable of carrying
electricity at transmission voltage.
(21) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other entity of
Washington state government to carry out the intent and purposes of
this chapter.
(((20))) (22) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing
January 1st and ending December 31st.

Sec. 3 RCW 19.285.040 and 2007 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each qualifying utility shall pursue all available conservation
that is cost-effective, reliable, and feasible.
(a) By January 1, 2010, using methodologies consistent with those
used by the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council in its most recently published regional power plan, each
qualifying utility shall identify its achievable cost-effective
conservation potential through 2019. At least every two years
thereafter, the qualifying utility shall review and update this
assessment for the subsequent ten-year period.
(b) Beginning January 2010, each qualifying utility shall establish
and make publicly available a biennial acquisition target for cost-effective conservation consistent with its identification of achievable
opportunities in (a) of this subsection, and meet that target during
the subsequent two-year period. At a minimum, each biennial target
must be no lower than the qualifying utility's pro rata share for that
two-year period of its cost-effective conservation potential for the
subsequent ten-year period.
(c) In meeting its conservation targets, a qualifying utility may
count high-efficiency cogeneration owned and used by a retail electric
customer to meet its own needs. High-efficiency cogeneration is the
sequential production of electricity and useful thermal energy from a
common fuel source, where, under normal operating conditions, the
facility has a useful thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total energy output. The reduction in load due to
high-efficiency cogeneration shall be: (i) Calculated as the ratio of
the fuel chargeable to power heat rate of the cogeneration facility
compared to the heat rate on a new and clean basis of a
best-commercially available technology combined-cycle natural gas-fired
combustion turbine; and (ii) counted towards meeting the biennial
conservation target in the same manner as other conservation savings.
(d) The commission may determine if a conservation program
implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective based on the
commission's policies and practice.
(e) The commission may rely on its standard practice for review and
approval of investor-owned utility conservation targets.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (j) of this subsection, each
qualifying utility shall use eligible renewable resources or acquire
equivalent renewable energy credits, or ((a)) any combination of
((both)) them, to meet the following annual targets:
(i) At least three percent of its load by January 1, 2012, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2015;
(ii) At least nine percent of its load by January 1, 2016, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2019; and
(iii) At least fifteen percent of its load by January 1, 2020, and
each year thereafter.
(b) A qualifying utility may count distributed generation at double
the facility's electrical output if the utility: (i) Owns or has
contracted for the distributed generation and the associated renewable
energy credits; or (ii) has contracted to purchase the associated
renewable energy credits.
(c) In meeting the annual targets in (a) of this subsection, a
qualifying utility shall calculate its annual load based on the average
of the utility's load for the previous two years.
(d) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i) The utility's weather-adjusted load for the previous three years on average did not increase
over that time period; (ii) after December 7, 2006, the utility did not
commence or renew ownership or incremental purchases of electricity
from resources other than renewable resources other than on a daily
spot price basis and the electricity is not offset by equivalent
renewable energy credits; and (iii) the utility invested at least one
percent of its total annual retail revenue requirement that year on
eligible renewable resources, renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both.
(e) The requirements of this section may be met for any given year
with renewable energy credits produced during that year, the preceding
year, or the subsequent year. Each renewable energy credit may be used
only once to meet the requirements of this section.
(f) In complying with the targets established in (a) of this
subsection, a qualifying utility may not count:
(i) Eligible renewable resources or distributed generation where
the associated renewable energy credits are owned by a separate entity;
or
(ii) Eligible renewable resources or renewable energy credits
obtained for and used in an optional pricing program such as the
program established in RCW 19.29A.090.
(g) Where fossil and combustible renewable resources are cofired in
one generating unit located in the Pacific Northwest where the cofiring
commenced after March 31, 1999, the unit shall be considered to produce
eligible renewable resources in direct proportion to the percentage of
the total heat value represented by the heat value of the renewable
resources.
(h)(i) A qualifying utility that acquires an eligible renewable
resource or renewable energy credit may count that acquisition at one
and two-tenths times its base value:
(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility
that commenced operation after December 31, 2005; and
(B) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship
programs approved by the council during facility construction.
(ii) The council shall establish minimum levels of labor hours to
be met through apprenticeship programs to qualify for this extra
credit.
(i) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if events beyond the reasonable
control of the utility that could not have been reasonably anticipated
or ameliorated prevented it from meeting the renewable energy target.
Such events include weather-related damage, mechanical failure,
strikes, lockouts, and actions of a governmental authority that
adversely affect the generation, transmission, or distribution of an
eligible renewable resource under contract to a qualifying utility.
(j)(i) Beginning January 1, 2016, only a qualifying utility that
owns or is directly interconnected to a qualified biomass energy
facility may use qualified biomass energy to meet its compliance
obligation under RCW 19.285.040(2).
(ii) A qualifying utility may no longer use electricity and
associated renewable energy credits from a qualified biomass energy
facility if the associated industrial pulping or wood manufacturing
facility ceases operation other than for purposes of maintenance or
upgrade.
(k) An industrial facility that hosts a qualified biomass energy
facility may only transfer or sell renewable energy credits associated
with its facility to the qualifying utility with which it is directly
interconnected with facilities owned by such a qualifying utility and
that are capable of carrying electricity at transmission voltage. The
qualifying utility may only use an amount of renewable energy credits
associated with qualified biomass energy that are equivalent to the
proportionate amount of its annual targets under (a)(ii) and (iii) of
this subsection that was created by the load of the industrial
facility. A qualifying utility that owns a qualified biomass energy
facility may not transfer or sell renewable energy credits associated
with qualified biomass energy to another person, entity, or qualifying
utility.
(3) Utilities that become qualifying utilities after December 31,
2006, shall meet the requirements in this section on a time frame
comparable in length to that provided for qualifying utilities as of
December 7, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---