BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.06 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The food and beverage service worker's permit required pursuant
to RCW 69.06.010 shall be issued upon successfully passing an
examination from a program provider. The program provider must create
and administer the training adhering to all applicable provisions in
chapter 69.06 RCW.
(2) Program providers must receive approval to create and
administer a food handler program.
(3) The department of health shall have sole responsibility to
provide program approval to program providers, which includes approval
of all food handler training program materials, such as instructional
delivery methods and assessment tools based on criteria established in
chapter 69.06 RCW.
(4) In order for the department of health to designate a program
provider, the individual or organization must:
(a) Demonstrate that they have sufficient experience in food
safety, food science, or food service; and
(b) Be knowledgeable in all areas of the food handler training
curriculum.
(5) Program providers must also:
(a) Have the ability to provide training and an assessment;
(b) Have the ability to safeguard the training and assessment
materials;
(c) Offer the training and assessment materials in multiple
languages; and
(d) Ensure that a knowledgeable person is available to answer
questions about the assessment and program content. It is not
necessary that the knowledgeable person be present at all times to
answer questions.
(6) The state board of health may adopt rules necessary to
implement this section.
(7) This section does not preclude county health departments from
operating food and beverage service worker's permit programs.
(8) For purposes of this section, "program provider" means an
individual or entity approved in food safety training by the state
board of health.

--- END ---