BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.46.431 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Nursing facility medicaid payment rate allocations shall be
facility-specific and shall have ((seven)) six components: Direct
care, therapy care, support services, operations, property, and
financing allowance((, and variable return)). The department shall
establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in this
section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing
facility in this state.
(2) Component rate allocations in therapy care and support services
for all facilities shall be based upon a minimum facility occupancy of
eighty-five percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are
set up or in use. Component rate allocations in operations, property,
and financing allowance for essential community providers shall be
based upon a minimum facility occupancy of ((eighty-five)) eighty-seven
percent of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in
use. Component rate allocations in operations, property, and financing
allowance for small nonessential community providers shall be based
upon a minimum facility occupancy of ((ninety)) ninety-two percent of
licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use.
Component rate allocations in operations, property, and financing
allowance for large nonessential community providers shall be based
upon a minimum facility occupancy of ((ninety-two)) ninety-five percent
of licensed beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use.
For all facilities, the component rate allocation in direct care shall
be based upon actual facility occupancy. The median cost limits used
to set component rate allocations shall be based on the applicable
minimum occupancy percentage. In determining each facility's therapy
care component rate allocation under RCW 74.46.511, the department
shall apply the applicable minimum facility occupancy adjustment before
creating the array of facilities' adjusted therapy costs per adjusted
resident day. In determining each facility's support services
component rate allocation under RCW 74.46.515(3), the department shall
apply the applicable minimum facility occupancy adjustment before
creating the array of facilities' adjusted support services costs per
adjusted resident day. In determining each facility's operations
component rate allocation under RCW 74.46.521(3), the department shall
apply the minimum facility occupancy adjustment before creating the
array of facilities' adjusted general operations costs per adjusted
resident day.
(3) Information and data sources used in determining medicaid
payment rate allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report
periods, resident assessment instrument formats, resident assessment
methodologies, and resident classification and case mix weighting
methodologies, may be substituted or altered from time to time as
determined by the department.
(4)(a) Direct care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months.
Effective July 1, 2009, the direct care component rate allocation shall
be rebased, ((using the adjusted cost report data for the calendar year
two years immediately preceding the rate rebase period,)) so that
adjusted cost report data for calendar year 2007 is used for July 1,
2009, through June 30, ((2012)) 2013. Beginning July 1, ((2012)) 2013,
the direct care component rate allocation shall be rebased biennially
during every ((even-numbered)) odd-numbered year thereafter using
adjusted cost report data from two years prior to the rebase period, so
adjusted cost report data for calendar year ((2010)) 2011 is used for
July 1, ((2012)) 2013, through June 30, ((2014)) 2015, and so forth.
(b) Direct care component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the direct care component rate allocation established in accordance
with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or
factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations
act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any
earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or
compounded to the direct care component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter.
(5)(a) Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months.
Effective July 1, 2009, the therapy care component rate allocation
shall be cost rebased, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar
year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, ((2012)) 2013.
Beginning July 1, ((2012)) 2013, the therapy care component rate
allocation shall be rebased biennially during every ((even-numbered))
odd-numbered year thereafter using adjusted cost report data from two
years prior to the rebase period, so adjusted cost report data for
calendar year ((2010)) 2011 is used for July 1, ((2012)) 2013, through
June 30, ((2014)) 2015, and so forth.
(b) Therapy care component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the therapy care component rate allocation established in accordance
with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or
factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations
act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any
earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or
compounded to the therapy care component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter.
(6)(a) Support services component rate allocations shall be
established using adjusted cost report data covering at least six
months. Effective July 1, 2009, the support services component rate
allocation shall be cost rebased, so that adjusted cost report data for
calendar year 2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, ((2012))
2013. Beginning July 1, ((2012)) 2013, the support services component
rate allocation shall be rebased biennially during every ((even-numbered)) odd-numbered year thereafter using adjusted cost report data
from two years prior to the rebase period, so adjusted cost report data
for calendar year ((2010)) 2011 is used for July 1, ((2012)) 2013,
through June 30, ((2014)) 2015, and so forth.
(b) Support services component rate allocations established in
accordance with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic
trends and conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the support services component rate allocation established in
accordance with this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions
factor or factors for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial
appropriations act, no economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any earlier biennial appropriations act shall be applied
solely or compounded to the support services component rate allocation
established in accordance with this chapter.
(7)(a) Operations component rate allocations shall be established
using adjusted cost report data covering at least six months.
Effective July 1, 2009, the operations component rate allocation shall
be cost rebased, so that adjusted cost report data for calendar year
2007 is used for July 1, 2009, through June 30, ((2012)) 2013.
Beginning July 1, ((2012)) 2013, the operations care component rate
allocation shall be rebased biennially during every ((even-numbered))
odd-numbered year thereafter using adjusted cost report data from two
years prior to the rebase period, so adjusted cost report data for
calendar year ((2010)) 2011 is used for July 1, ((2012)) 2013, through
June 30, ((2014)) 2015, and so forth.
(b) Operations component rate allocations established in accordance
with this chapter shall be adjusted annually for economic trends and
conditions by a factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act. The economic trends and conditions factor or
factors defined in the biennial appropriations act shall not be
compounded with the economic trends and conditions factor or factors
defined in any other biennial appropriations acts before applying it to
the operations component rate allocation established in accordance with
this chapter. When no economic trends and conditions factor or factors
for either fiscal year are defined in a biennial appropriations act, no
economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any earlier
biennial appropriations act shall be applied solely or compounded to
the operations component rate allocation established in accordance with
this chapter.
(8) Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment
system shall not exceed facility rates charged to the general public
for comparable services.
(9) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions for determining component rate allocations for
facilities in circumstances not directly addressed by this chapter,
including but not limited to: Inflation adjustments for partial-period
cost report data, newly constructed facilities, existing facilities
entering the medicaid program for the first time or after a period of
absence from the program, existing facilities with expanded new bed
capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of ownership
of the nursing facility business, facilities temporarily reducing the
number of set-up beds during a remodel, facilities having less than six
months of either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under
the current contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.
(10) The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles,
and conditions, including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting
rates to reflect capital improvements or new requirements imposed by
the department or the federal government. Any such rate adjustments
are subject to the provisions of RCW 74.46.421.
(11) Effective July 1, 2010, there shall be no rate adjustment for
facilities with banked beds. For purposes of calculating minimum
occupancy, licensed beds include any beds banked under chapter 70.38
RCW.
(12) Facilities obtaining a certificate of need or a certificate of
need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW after June 30, 2001, must have
a certificate of capital authorization in order for (a) the
depreciation resulting from the capitalized addition to be included in
calculation of the facility's property component rate allocation; and
(b) the net invested funds associated with the capitalized addition to
be included in calculation of the facility's financing allowance rate
allocation.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.46.435 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The property component rate allocation for each facility shall
be determined by dividing the sum of the reported allowable prior
period actual depreciation, subject to department rule, adjusted for
any capitalized additions or replacements approved by the department,
and the retained savings from such cost center, by the greater of a
facility's total resident days in the prior period or resident days as
calculated on ((eighty-five)) eighty-seven percent facility occupancy
for essential community providers, ((ninety)) ninety-two percent
occupancy for small nonessential community providers, or ((ninety-two))
ninety-five percent facility occupancy for large nonessential community
providers. If a capitalized addition or retirement of an asset will
result in a different licensed bed capacity during the ensuing period,
the prior period total resident days used in computing the property
component rate shall be adjusted to anticipated resident day level.
(2) A nursing facility's property component rate allocation shall
be rebased annually, effective July 1st, in accordance with this
section and this chapter.
(3) When a certificate of need for a new facility is requested, the
department, in reaching its decision, shall take into consideration
per-bed land and building construction costs for the facility which
shall not exceed a maximum to be established by the secretary.
(4) The property component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 3 RCW 74.46.437 and 2001 1st sp.s. c 8 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) ((Beginning July 1, 1999,)) The department shall establish for
each medicaid nursing facility a financing allowance component rate
allocation. The financing allowance component rate shall be rebased
annually, effective July 1st, in accordance with the provisions of this
section and this chapter.
(2) ((Effective July 1, 2001,)) The financing allowance ((shall
be)) is determined by multiplying the net invested funds of each
facility by ((.10)) .04, and dividing by the greater of a nursing
facility's total resident days from the most recent cost report period
or resident days calculated on ((eighty-five)) eighty-seven percent
facility occupancy((. Effective July 1, 2002, the financing allowance
component rate allocation for all facilities, other than essential
community providers, shall be set by using the greater of a facility's
total resident days from the most recent cost report period or resident
days calculated at ninety percent facility occupancy. However, assets
acquired on or after May 17, 1999, shall be grouped in a separate
financing allowance calculation that shall be multiplied by .085. The
financing allowance factor of .085 shall not be applied to the net
invested funds pertaining to new construction or major renovations
receiving certificate of need approval or an exemption from certificate
of need requirements under chapter 70.38 RCW, or to working drawings
that have been submitted to the department of health for construction
review approval, prior to May 17, 1999)) for essential community
providers, ninety-two percent facility occupancy for small nonessential
community providers, or ninety-five percent occupancy for large
nonessential community providers. If a capitalized addition,
renovation, replacement, or retirement of an asset will result in a
different licensed bed capacity during the ensuing period, the prior
period total resident days used in computing the financing allowance
shall be adjusted to the greater of the anticipated resident day level
or ((eighty-five)) eighty-seven percent of the new licensed bed
capacity for essential community providers, ninety-two percent facility
occupancy for small nonessential community providers, or ninety-five
percent occupancy for large nonessential community providers.
((Effective July 1, 2002, for all facilities, other than essential
community providers, the total resident days used to compute the
financing allowance after a capitalized addition, renovation,
replacement, or retirement of an asset shall be set by using the
greater of a facility's total resident days from the most recent cost
report period or resident days calculated at ninety percent facility
occupancy.))
(3) In computing the portion of net invested funds representing the
net book value of tangible fixed assets, the same assets, depreciation
bases, lives, and methods referred to in ((RCW 74.46.330, 74.46.350,
74.46.360, 74.46.370, and 74.46.380)) department rule, including owned
and leased assets, shall be utilized, except that the capitalized cost
of land upon which the facility is located and such other contiguous
land which is reasonable and necessary for use in the regular course of
providing resident care ((shall)) must also be included. Subject to
provisions and limitations contained in this chapter, for land
purchased by owners or lessors before July 18, 1984, capitalized cost
of land ((shall be)) is the buyer's capitalized cost. For all partial
or whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, if the land is purchased
after July 17, 1984, capitalized cost ((shall be)) is that of the owner
of record on July 17, 1984, or buyer's capitalized cost, whichever is
lower. In the case of leased facilities where the net invested funds
are unknown or the contractor is unable to provide necessary
information to determine net invested funds, the secretary ((shall
have)) has the authority to determine an amount for net invested funds
based on an appraisal conducted according to ((RCW 74.46.360(1)))
department rule.
(4) ((Effective July 1, 2001, for the purpose of calculating a
nursing facility's financing allowance component rate, if a contractor
has elected to bank licensed beds prior to May 25, 2001, or elects to
convert banked beds to active service at any time, under chapter 70.38
RCW, the department shall use the facility's new licensed bed capacity
to recalculate minimum occupancy for rate setting and revise the
financing allowance component rate, as needed, effective as of the date
the beds are banked or converted to active service. However, in no
case shall the department use less than eighty-five percent occupancy
of the facility's licensed bed capacity after banking or conversion.
Effective July 1, 2002, in no case, other than for essential community
providers, shall the department use less than ninety percent occupancy
of the facility's licensed bed capacity after conversion.
(5))) The financing allowance rate allocation calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.46.485 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall:
(a) Employ the resource utilization group III case mix
classification methodology. The department shall use the forty-four
group index maximizing model for the resource utilization group III
grouper version 5.10, but the department may revise or update the
classification methodology to reflect advances or refinements in
resident assessment or classification, subject to federal requirements.
The department may adjust the case mix index for any of the lowest ten
resource utilization group categories beginning with PA1 through PE2 to
any case mix index that aids in achieving the purpose and intent of RCW
74.39A.007 and cost-efficient care; and
(b) Implement minimum data set 3.0 under the authority of this
section and RCW 74.46.431(3). The department must notify nursing home
contractors twenty-eight days in advance the date of implementation of
the minimum data set 3.0. In the notification, the department must
identify for all semiannual rate settings following the date of minimum
data set 3.0 implementation a previously established semiannual case
mix adjustment established for the semiannual rate settings that will
be used for semiannual case mix calculations in direct care until
minimum data set 3.0 is fully implemented. ((After the department has
fully implemented minimum data set 3.0, it must adjust any semiannual
rate setting in which it used the previously established case mix
adjustment using the new minimum data set 3.0 data.))
(2) A default case mix group shall be established for cases in
which the resident dies or is discharged for any purpose prior to
completion of the resident's initial assessment. The default case mix
group and case mix weight for these cases shall be designated by the
department.
(3) A default case mix group may also be established for cases in
which there is an untimely assessment for the resident. The default
case mix group and case mix weight for these cases shall be designated
by the department.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.46.496 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 10 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Each case mix classification group shall be assigned a case mix
weight. The case mix weight for each resident of a nursing facility
for each calendar quarter or six-month period during a calendar year
shall be based on data from resident assessment instruments completed
for the resident and weighted by the number of days the resident was in
each case mix classification group. Days shall be counted as provided
in this section.
(2) The case mix weights shall be based on the average minutes per
registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, and certified nurse aide,
for each case mix group, and using the United States department of
health and human services ((1995)) nursing facility staff time
measurement study ((stemming from its multistate nursing home case mix
and quality demonstration project)). Those minutes shall be weighted
by statewide ratios of registered nurse to certified nurse aide, and
licensed practical nurse to certified nurse aide, wages, including
salaries and benefits, which shall be based on ((1995)) cost report
data for this state.
(3) The case mix weights shall be determined as follows:
(a) Set the certified nurse aide wage weight at 1.000 and calculate
wage weights for registered nurse and licensed practical nurse average
wages by dividing the certified nurse aide average wage into the
registered nurse average wage and licensed practical nurse average
wage;
(b) Calculate the total weighted minutes for each case mix group in
the resource utilization group ((III)) classification system by
multiplying the wage weight for each worker classification by the
average number of minutes that classification of worker spends caring
for a resident in that resource utilization group ((III))
classification group, and summing the products;
(c) Assign ((a)) the lowest case mix weight ((of 1.000)) to the
resource utilization group ((III classification group)) with the lowest
total weighted minutes and calculate case mix weights by dividing the
lowest group's total weighted minutes into each group's total weighted
minutes and rounding weight calculations to the third decimal place.
(4) The case mix weights in this state may be revised if the United
States department of health and human services updates its nursing
facility staff time measurement studies. The case mix weights shall be
revised, but only when direct care component rates are cost-rebased as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, to be effective on the July
1st effective date of each cost-rebased direct care component rate.
However, the department may revise case mix weights more frequently if,
and only if, significant variances in wage ratios occur among direct
care staff in the different caregiver classifications identified in
this section.
(5) Case mix weights shall be revised when direct care component
rates are cost-rebased as provided in RCW 74.46.431(4).

Sec. 6 RCW 74.46.501 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) From individual case mix weights for the applicable quarter,
the department shall determine two average case mix indexes for each
medicaid nursing facility, one for all residents in the facility, known
as the facility average case mix index, and one for medicaid residents,
known as the medicaid average case mix index.
(2)(a) In calculating a facility's two average case mix indexes for
each quarter, the department shall include all residents or medicaid
residents, as applicable, who were physically in the facility during
the quarter in question based on the resident assessment instrument
completed by the facility and the requirements and limitations for the
instrument's completion and transmission (January 1st through March
31st, April 1st through June 30th, July 1st through September 30th, or
October 1st through December 31st).
(b) The facility average case mix index shall exclude all default
cases as defined in this chapter. However, the medicaid average case
mix index shall include all default cases.
(3) Both the facility average and the medicaid average case mix
indexes shall be determined by multiplying the case mix weight of each
resident, or each medicaid resident, as applicable, by the number of
days, as defined in this section and as applicable, the resident was at
each particular case mix classification or group, and then averaging.
(4) In determining the number of days a resident is classified into
a particular case mix group, the department shall determine a start
date for calculating case mix grouping periods as specified by rule.
(5) The cutoff date for the department to use resident assessment
data, for the purposes of calculating both the facility average and the
medicaid average case mix indexes, and for establishing and updating a
facility's direct care component rate, shall be one month and one day
after the end of the quarter for which the resident assessment data
applies.
(6)(a) Although the facility average and the medicaid average case
mix indexes shall both be calculated quarterly, the cost-rebasing
period facility average case mix index will be used throughout the
applicable cost-rebasing period in combination with cost report data as
specified by RCW 74.46.431 and 74.46.506, to establish a facility's
allowable cost per case mix unit. To allow for the transition to
minimum data set 3.0 and implementation of resource utilization group
IV for July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2013, the department shall
calculate rates using the medicaid average case mix scores effective
for January 1, 2011, rates adjusted under RCW 74.46.485(1)(a), and the
scores shall be increased each six months during the transition period
by one-half of one percent. The July 1, 2013, direct care cost per
case mix unit shall be calculated by utilizing 2011 direct care costs,
patient days, and 2011 facility average case mix indexes based on the
minimum data set 3.0 resource utilization group IV grouper 57. A
facility's medicaid average case mix index shall be used to update a
nursing facility's direct care component rate semiannually.
(b) The facility average case mix index used to establish each
nursing facility's direct care component rate shall be based on an
average of calendar quarters of the facility's average case mix indexes
from the four calendar quarters occurring during the cost report period
used to rebase the direct care component rate allocations as specified
in RCW 74.46.431.
(c) The medicaid average case mix index used to update or
recalibrate a nursing facility's direct care component rate
semiannually shall be from the calendar six-month period commencing
nine months prior to the effective date of the semiannual rate. For
example, July 1, 2010, through December 31, 2010, direct care component
rates shall utilize case mix averages from the October 1, 2009, through
March 31, 2010, calendar quarters, and so forth.

Sec. 7 RCW 74.46.506 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 12 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The direct care component rate allocation corresponds to the
provision of nursing care for one resident of a nursing facility for
one day, including direct care supplies. Therapy services and
supplies, which correspond to the therapy care component rate, shall be
excluded. The direct care component rate includes elements of case mix
determined consistent with the principles of this section and other
applicable provisions of this chapter.
(2) The department shall determine and update semiannually for each
nursing facility serving medicaid residents a facility-specific per-resident day direct care component rate allocation, to be effective on
the first day of each six-month period. In determining direct care
component rates the department shall utilize, as specified in this
section, minimum data set resident assessment data for each resident of
the facility, as transmitted to, and if necessary corrected by, the
department in the resident assessment instrument format approved by
federal authorities for use in this state.
(3) The department may question the accuracy of assessment data for
any resident and utilize corrected or substitute information, however
derived, in determining direct care component rates. The department is
authorized to impose civil fines and to take adverse rate actions
against a contractor, as specified by the department in rule, in order
to obtain compliance with resident assessment and data transmission
requirements and to ensure accuracy.
(4) Cost report data used in setting direct care component rate
allocations shall be for rate periods as specified in RCW
74.46.431(4)(a).
(5) The department shall rebase each nursing facility's direct care
component rate allocation as described in RCW 74.46.431, adjust its
direct care component rate allocation for economic trends and
conditions as described in RCW 74.46.431, and update its medicaid
average case mix index as described in RCW 74.46.496 and 74.46.501,
consistent with the following:
(a) Adjust total direct care costs reported by each nursing
facility for the applicable cost report period specified in RCW
74.46.431(4)(a) to reflect any department adjustments, and to eliminate
reported resident therapy costs and adjustments, in order to derive the
facility's total allowable direct care cost;
(b) Divide each facility's total allowable direct care cost by its
adjusted resident days for the same report period, to derive the
facility's allowable direct care cost per resident day;
(c) Divide each facility's adjusted allowable direct care cost per
resident day by the facility average case mix index for the applicable
quarters specified by RCW 74.46.501(6)(b) to derive the facility's
allowable direct care cost per case mix unit;
(d) Divide nursing facilities into at least two and, if applicable,
three peer groups: Those located in nonurban counties; those located
in high labor-cost counties, if any; and those located in other urban
counties;
(e) Array separately the allowable direct care cost per case mix
unit for all facilities in nonurban counties; for all facilities in
high labor-cost counties, if applicable; and for all facilities in
other urban counties, and determine the median allowable direct care
cost per case mix unit for each peer group;
(f) Determine each facility's semiannual direct care component rate
as follows:
(i) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is greater
than one hundred ((twelve)) ten percent of the peer group median
established under (e) of this subsection shall be assigned a cost per
case mix unit equal to one hundred ((twelve)) ten percent of the peer
group median, and shall have a direct care component rate allocation
equal to the facility's assigned cost per case mix unit multiplied by
that facility's medicaid average case mix index from the applicable
six-month period specified in RCW 74.46.501(6)(c);
(ii) Any facility whose allowable cost per case mix unit is less
than or equal to one hundred ((twelve)) ten percent of the peer group
median established under (e) of this subsection shall have a direct
care component rate allocation equal to the facility's allowable cost
per case mix unit multiplied by that facility's medicaid average case
mix index from the applicable six-month period specified in RCW
74.46.501(6)(c).
(6) The direct care component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.
(7) Costs related to payments resulting from increases in direct
care component rates, granted under authority of RCW 74.46.508 for a
facility's exceptional care residents, shall be offset against the
facility's examined, allowable direct care costs, for each report year
or partial period such increases are paid. Such reductions in
allowable direct care costs shall be for rate setting, settlement, and
other purposes deemed appropriate by the department.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.46.515 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The support services component rate allocation corresponds to
the provision of food, food preparation, dietary, housekeeping, and
laundry services for one resident for one day.
(2) The department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's
support services component rate allocation using cost report data
specified by RCW 74.46.431(6).
(3) To determine each facility's support services component rate
allocation, the department shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted support services costs per adjusted
resident day, as determined by dividing each facility's total allowable
support services costs by its adjusted resident days for the same
report period, increased if necessary to a minimum occupancy provided
by RCW 74.46.431(2), for each facility from facilities' cost reports
from the applicable report year, for facilities located within urban
counties, and for those located within nonurban counties and determine
the median adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's support services component rate at the
lower of the facility's per resident day adjusted support services
costs from the applicable cost report period or the adjusted median per
resident day support services cost for that facility's peer group,
either urban counties or nonurban counties, plus ((ten)) eight percent;
and
(c) Adjust each facility's support services component rate for
economic trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(6).
(4) The support services component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.46.521 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The operations component rate allocation corresponds to the
general operation of a nursing facility for one resident for one day,
including but not limited to management, administration, utilities,
office supplies, accounting and bookkeeping, minor building
maintenance, minor equipment repairs and replacements, and other
supplies and services, exclusive of direct care, therapy care, support
services, property, financing allowance, and variable return.
(2) The department shall determine each medicaid nursing facility's
operations component rate allocation using cost report data specified
by RCW 74.46.431(7)(a). Operations component rates for essential
community providers shall be based upon a minimum occupancy of
((eighty-five)) eighty-seven percent of licensed beds. Operations
component rates for small nonessential community providers shall be
based upon a minimum occupancy of ((ninety)) ninety-two percent of
licensed beds. Operations component rates for large nonessential
community providers shall be based upon a minimum occupancy of
((ninety-two)) ninety-five percent of licensed beds.
(3) For all calculations and adjustments in this subsection, the
department shall use the greater of the facility's actual occupancy or
an ((imputed)) occupancy equal to ((eighty-five)) eighty-seven percent
for essential community providers, ((ninety)) ninety-two percent for
small nonessential community providers, or ((ninety-two)) ninety-five
percent for large nonessential community providers. To determine each
facility's operations component rate the department shall:
(a) Array facilities' adjusted general operations costs per
adjusted resident day, as determined by dividing each facility's total
allowable operations cost by its adjusted resident days for the same
report period for facilities located within urban counties and for
those located within nonurban counties and determine the median
adjusted cost for each peer group;
(b) Set each facility's operations component rate at the lower of:
(i) The facility's per resident day adjusted operations costs from
the applicable cost report period adjusted if necessary for minimum
occupancy; or
(ii) The adjusted median per resident day general operations cost
for that facility's peer group, urban counties or nonurban counties;
and
(c) Adjust each facility's operations component rate for economic
trends and conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(7)(b).
(4) The operations component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary
to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a skilled nursing facility
safety net assessment medicaid share pass through or rate add-on to
reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net
assessment as a medicaid allowable cost consistent with section 15 of
this act. This add-on shall not be considered an allowable cost for
future year cost rebasing.
(2) As of the effective date of this section, supplemental payments
to reimburse medicaid expenditures, including an amount to reimburse
the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net
assessment, not to exceed the annual medicare upper payment limit, must
be provided for all years when the skilled nursing facility safety net
assessment is levied, consistent with section 15 of this act. These
supplemental payments, at a minimum, must be sufficient to reimburse
the medicaid share of the assessment for those paying the assessment.
The part of these supplemental payments that reimburses the medicaid
share of the assessment are not subject to the reconciliation and
settlement process provided in RCW 74.46.022(6).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) For fiscal years 2012 and 2013 and
subject to appropriation, the department of social and health services
shall do a comparative analysis of the facility-based payment rates
calculated on July 1, 2011, using the payment methodology defined in
chapter 74.46 RCW as modified by sections 1 through 9 of this act, to
the facility-based payment rates in effect June 30, 2010. If the
facility-based payment rate calculated on July 1, 2011, is smaller than
the facility-based payment rate on June 30, 2011, the difference shall
be provided to the individual nursing facilities as an add-on payment
per medicaid resident day.
(2) During the comparative analysis performed in subsection (1) of
this section, if it is found that the direct care rate for any facility
calculated under sections 1 through 9 of this act is greater than the
direct care rate in effect on June 30, 2010, then the facility shall
receive a ten percent direct care rate add-on to compensate that
facility for taking on more acute clients than they have in the past.
(3) The rate add-ons provided in subsection (2) of this section are
subject to the reconciliation and settlement process provided in RCW
74.46.022(6).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 PURPOSE, FINDINGS, AND INTENT. (1) It is
the intent of the legislature to encourage maximization of financial
resources eligible and available for medicaid services by establishing
the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund to receive skilled
nursing facility safety net assessments to use in securing federal
matching funds under federally prescribed programs available through
the state medicaid plan.
(2) The purpose of this chapter is to provide for a safety net
assessment on certain Washington skilled nursing facilities, which will
be used solely to support payments to skilled nursing facilities for
medicaid services.
(3) The legislature finds that:
(a) Washington skilled nursing facilities have proposed a skilled
nursing facility safety net assessment to generate additional state and
federal funding for the medicaid program, which will be used in part to
restore recent reductions in skilled nursing facility reimbursement
rates and provide for an increase in medicaid reimbursement rates; and
(b) The skilled nursing facility safety net assessment and skilled
nursing facility safety net trust fund created in this chapter allows
the state to generate additional federal financial participation for
the medicaid program and provides for increased reimbursement to
skilled nursing facilities.
(4) In adopting this chapter, it is the intent of the legislature:
(a) To impose a skilled nursing facility safety net assessment to
be used solely for the purposes specified in this chapter;
(b) That funds generated by the assessment, including matching
federal financial participation, shall not be used for purposes other
than as specified in this chapter;
(c) That the total amount assessed not exceed the amount needed, in
combination with all other available funds, to support the
reimbursement rates and other payments authorized by this chapter,
including payments under section 15 of this act; and
(d) To condition the assessment and use of the resulting funds on
receiving federal approval for receipt of additional federal financial
participation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Certain high volume medicaid nursing facilities" means the
fewest number of facilities necessary with the highest number of
medicaid days or total patient days annually to meet the statistical
redistribution test at 42 C.F.R. Sec. 433.68(e)(2).
(2) "Continuing care retirement community" means a facility that
provides a continuum of services by one operational entity or related
organization providing independent living services, or boarding home or
assisted living services under chapter 18.20 RCW, and skilled nursing
services under chapter 18.51 RCW in a single contiguous campus. The
number of licensed nursing home beds must be sixty percent or less of
the total number of beds available in the entire continuing care
retirement community. For purposes of this subsection "contiguous"
means land adjoining or touching other property held by the same or
related organization including land divided by a public road.
(3) "Deductions from revenue" means reductions from gross revenue
resulting from an inability to collect payment of charges. Such
reductions include bad debt, contractual adjustments, policy discounts
and adjustments, and other such revenue deductions.
(4) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(5) "Fund" means the skilled nursing facility safety net trust
fund.
(6) "Hospital based" means a nursing facility that is physically
part of, or contiguous to, a hospital. For purposes of this subsection
"contiguous" has the same meaning as in subsection (2) of this section.
(7) "Medicare patient day" means a patient day for medicare
beneficiaries on a medicare part A stay, medicare hospice stay, and a
patient day for persons who have opted for managed care coverage using
their medicare benefit.
(8) "Medicare upper payment limit" means the limitation established
by federal regulations, 42 C.F.R. Sec. 447.272, that disallows federal
matching funds when state medicaid agencies pay certain classes of
nursing facilities an aggregate amount for services that would exceed
the amount that would be paid for the same services furnished by that
class of nursing facilities under medicare payment principles.
(9) "Net resident service revenue" means gross revenue from
services to nursing facility residents less deductions from revenue.
Net resident service revenue does not include other operating revenue
or nonoperating revenue.
(10) "Nonexempt nursing facility" means a nursing facility that is
not exempt from the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment.
(11) "Nonoperating revenue" means income from activities not
relating directly to the day-to-day operations of an organization.
Nonoperating revenue includes such items as gains on disposal of a
facility's assets, dividends, and interest from security investments,
gifts, grants, and endowments.
(12) "Nursing facility," "facility," or "skilled nursing facility"
has the same meaning as "nursing home" as defined in RCW 18.51.010.
(13) "Other operating revenue" means income from nonresident care
services to residents, as well as sales and activities to persons other
than residents. It is derived in the course of operating the facility
such as providing personal laundry service for residents or from other
sources such as meals provided to persons other than residents,
personal telephones, gift shops, and vending machines.
(14) "Related organization" means an entity which is under common
ownership and/or control with, or has control of, or is controlled by,
the contractor, as defined under chapter 74.46 RCW.
(a) "Common ownership" exists when an entity is the beneficial
owner of five percent or more ownership interest in the contractor, as
defined under chapter 74.46 RCW and any other entity.
(b) "Control" exists where an entity has the power, directly or
indirectly, significantly to influence or direct the actions or
policies of an organization or institution, whether or not it is
legally enforceable and however it is exercisable or exercised.
(15) "Resident day" means a calendar day of care provided to a
nursing facility resident, excluding medicare patient days. Resident
days include the day of admission and exclude the day of discharge. An
admission and discharge on the same day count as one day of care.
Resident days include nursing facility hospice days and exclude bedhold
days for all residents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 SKILLED NURSING FACILITY SAFETY NET
ASSESSMENT FUND. (1) There is established in the state treasury the
skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund. The purpose and use of
the fund shall be to receive and disburse funds, together with accrued
interest, in accordance with this chapter. Moneys in the fund,
including interest earned, shall not be used or disbursed for any
purposes other than those specified in this chapter. Any amounts
expended from the fund that are later recouped by the department on
audit or otherwise shall be returned to the fund.
(2) The skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund must be a
separate and continuing fund, and no money in the fund reverts to the
state general fund at any time. All assessments, interest, and
penalties collected by the department under sections 15, 16, and 20 of
this act shall be deposited into the fund.
(3) Any money received under sections 15, 16, and 20 of this act
must be deposited in the state treasury for credit to the skilled
nursing facility safety net trust fund, and must be expended, to the
extent authorized by federal law, to obtain federal financial
participation in the medicaid program and to maintain and enhance
nursing facility rates in a manner set forth in subsection (4) of this
section.
(4) Disbursements from the fund may be made only as follows:
(a) As an immediate pass-through or rate add-on to reimburse the
medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment as
a medicaid allowable cost;
(b) To make medicaid payments for nursing facility services in
accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW and pursuant to this chapter;
(c) To refund erroneous or excessive payments made by skilled
nursing facilities pursuant to this chapter;
(d) To administer the provisions of this chapter the department may
expend an amount not to exceed one-half of one percent of the money
received from the assessment, and must not exceed the amount authorized
for expenditure by the legislature for administrative expenses in a
fiscal year;
(e) To repay the federal government for any excess payments made to
skilled nursing facilities from the fund if the assessments or payment
increases set forth in this chapter are deemed out of compliance with
federal statutes and regulations and all appeals have been exhausted.
In such a case, the department may require skilled nursing facilities
receiving excess payments to refund the payments in question to the
fund. The state in turn shall return funds to the federal government
in the same proportion as the original financing. If a skilled nursing
facility is unable to refund payments, the state shall either develop
a payment plan or deduct moneys from future medicaid payments, or both;
and
(f) To increase nursing facility payments to fund covered services
to medicaid beneficiaries within medicare upper limits.
(5) Any positive balance in the fund at the end of a fiscal year
shall be applied to reduce the assessment amount for the subsequent
fiscal year in accordance with section 16(1)(c)(i) of this act.
(6) Upon termination of the assessment, any amounts remaining in
the fund shall be refunded to skilled nursing facilities, pro rata
according to the amount paid by the facility, subject to limitations of
federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 ASSESSMENTS. (1) In accordance with the
redistribution method set forth in 42 C.F.R. Sec. 433.68(e)(1) and (2),
the department shall seek a waiver of the broad-based and uniform
provider assessment requirements of federal law to exclude certain
nursing facilities from the skilled nursing facility safety net
assessment and to permit certain high volume medicaid nursing
facilities or facilities with a high number of total annual resident
days to pay the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment at a
lesser amount per nonmedicare patient day.
(2) The skilled nursing facility safety net assessment shall, at no
time, be greater than the maximum percentage of the nursing facility
industry reported net patient service revenues allowed under federal
law or regulation.
(3) All skilled nursing facility safety net assessments collected
pursuant to this section by the department shall be transmitted to the
state treasurer who shall credit all such amounts to the skilled
nursing facility safety net trust fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 ADMINISTRATION AND COLLECTION. (1) The
department, in cooperation with the office of financial management,
shall develop rules for determining the amount to be assessed to
individual skilled nursing facilities, notifying individual skilled
nursing facilities of the assessed amount, and collecting the amounts
due. Such rule making shall specifically include provision for:
(a) Payment of the skilled nursing facility safety net assessment;
(b) Interest on delinquent assessments;
(c) Adjustment of the assessment amounts as follows:
(i) The assessment amounts under section 15 of this act may be
adjusted as follows:
(A) If sufficient other appropriated funds for skilled nursing
facilities, are available to support the nursing facility reimbursement
rates as authorized in the biennial appropriations act and other uses
and payments permitted by sections 14 and 15 of this act without
utilizing the full assessment authorized under section 15 of this act,
the department shall reduce the amount of the assessment to the minimum
level necessary to support those reimbursement rates and other uses and
payments.
(B) So long as none of the conditions set forth in section 18(2) of
this act have occurred, if the department's forecasts indicate that the
assessment amounts under section 15 of this act, together with all
other appropriated funds, are not sufficient to support the skilled
nursing facility reimbursement rates authorized in the biennial
appropriations act and other uses and payments authorized under
sections 14 and 15 of this act, the department shall increase the
assessment rates to the amount necessary to support those reimbursement
rates and other payments to the maximum amount allowable under federal
law.
(C) Any positive balance remaining in the fund at the end of the
fiscal year shall be applied to reduce the assessment amount for the
subsequent fiscal year.
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2012, any adjustment to the assessment
amounts pursuant to this subsection, and the data supporting such
adjustment, including but not limited to relevant data listed in
subsection (2) of this section, must be submitted to the Washington
health care association, and aging services of Washington, for review
and comment at least sixty calendar days prior to implementation of
such adjusted assessment amounts. Any review and comment provided by
the Washington health care association, and aging services of
Washington, shall not limit the ability of either association or its
members to challenge an adjustment or other action by the department
that is not made in accordance with this chapter.
(2) By November 30th of each year, the department shall provide the
following data to the office of financial management, the chair of the
fiscal committee of the senate and the house of representatives, the
Washington health care association, and aging services of Washington:
(a) The fund balance; and
(b) The amount of assessment paid by each skilled nursing facility.
(3) Assessments shall be assessed from the effective date of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 EXCEPTIONS. (1) Subject to subsection (4)
of this section the department shall exempt the following nursing
facility providers from the skilled nursing facility safety net
assessment subject to federal approval under 42 C.F.R. Sec.
433.68(e)(2):
(a) Continuing care retirement communities;
(b) Nursing facilities with thirty-five or fewer licensed beds;
(c) State, tribal, and county operated nursing facilities; and
(d) Any nursing facility operated by a public hospital district and
nursing facilities that are hospital-based.
(2) The department shall lower the skilled nursing facility safety
net assessment for either certain high volume medicaid nursing
facilities or certain facilities with high resident volumes to meet the
redistributive tests of 42 C.F.R. Sec. 433.68(e)(2).
(3) The department shall lower the skilled nursing facility safety
net assessment for any skilled nursing facility with a licensed bed
capacity in excess of two hundred three beds to the same level
described in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) To the extent necessary to obtain federal approval under 42
C.F.R. Sec. 433.68(e)(2), the exemptions prescribed in subsections (1),
(2), and (3) of this section may be amended by the department.
(5) The per resident day assessment rate shall be the same amount
for each affected facility except as prescribed in subsections (1),
(2), and (3) of this section.
(6) The department shall notify the nursing facility operators of
any skilled nursing facilities that would be exempted from the skilled
nursing facility safety net assessment pursuant to the waiver request
submitted to the United States department of health and human services
under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 CONDITIONS. (1) If the centers for
medicare and medicaid services fail to approve any state plan
amendments or waiver requests that are necessary in order to implement
the applicable sections of this chapter then the assessment authorized
in section 16 of this act shall cease to be imposed.
(2) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section prohibits the
department from working cooperatively with the centers for medicare and
medicaid services to secure approval of any needed state plan
amendments or waiver requests. As provided in sections 15 and 17 of
this act, the department shall adjust any submitted state plan
amendments or waiver requests as necessary to achieve approval.
(3) If this chapter does not take effect or ceases to be imposed,
any moneys remaining in the fund shall be refunded to skilled nursing
facilities in proportion to the amounts paid by such facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 ASSESSMENT PART OF OPERATING OVERHEAD. The
incidence and burden of assessments imposed under this chapter shall be
on skilled nursing facilities and the expense associated with the
assessments shall constitute a part of the operating overhead of the
facilities. Skilled nursing facilities shall not itemize the safety
net assessment on billings to residents or third-party payers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 ENFORCEMENT. If a nursing facility fails
to make timely payment of the safety net assessment, the department may
seek a remedy provided by law, including, but not limited to:
(1) Withholding any medical assistance reimbursement payments until
such time as the assessment amount is recovered;
(2) Suspension or revocation of the nursing facility license; or
(3) Imposition of a civil fine up to one thousand dollars per day
for each delinquent payment, not to exceed the amount of the
assessment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 QUALITY INCENTIVE PAYMENTS. (1) The
department and the department of health, in consultation with the
Washington state health care association, and aging services of
Washington, shall design a system of skilled nursing facility quality
incentive payments. The design of the system shall be submitted to the
relevant policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by December
15, 2011. The system shall be based upon the following principles:
(a) Evidence-based treatment and processes shall be used to improve
health care outcomes for skilled nursing facility residents;
(b) Effective purchasing strategies to improve the quality of
health care services should involve the use of common quality
improvement measures, while recognizing that some measures may not be
appropriate for application to facilities with high bariatric,
behaviorally challenged, or rehabilitation populations;
(c) Quality measures chosen for the system should be consistent
with the standards that have been developed by national quality
improvement organizations, such as the national quality forum, the
federal centers for medicare and medicaid services, or the federal
agency for healthcare research and quality. New reporting burdens to
skilled nursing facilities should be minimized by giving priority to
measures skilled nursing facilities that are currently required to
report to governmental agencies, such as the nursing home compare
measures collected by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid
services;
(d) Benchmarks for each quality improvement measure should be set
at levels that are feasible for skilled nursing facilities to achieve,
yet represent real improvements in quality and performance for a
majority of skilled nursing facilities in Washington state; and
(e) Skilled nursing facilities performance and incentive payments
should be designed in a manner such that all facilities in Washington
are able to receive the incentive payments if performance is at or
above the benchmark score set in the system established under this
section.
(2) Pursuant to an appropriation by the legislature, for state
fiscal year 2013 and each fiscal year thereafter, assessments may be
increased to support an additional one percent increase in skilled
nursing facility reimbursement rates for facilities that meet the
quality incentive benchmarks established under this section.

Sec. 22 RCW 43.84.092 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 30 s 20, 2010 1st
sp.s. c 9 s 7, 2010 c 248 s 6, 2010 c 222 s 5, 2010 c 162 s 6, and 2010
c 145 s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the common
school construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the
county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use
tax equalization account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
licensing services account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the energy
recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight
congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment account, the
freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective
fund, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the high capacity transportation account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure
account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy toll lanes
operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multiagency
permitting team account, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and
use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account,
the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004,
the public health supplemental account, the public transportation
systems account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account,
the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust
fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special
category C account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the
state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the
state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number
520 corridor account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma
Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1
account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3
account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account),
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain
injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the urban arterial trust account, the volunteer firefighters'
and reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer
firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health insurance
pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving
fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects account.
Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent
fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent
fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 RCW 74.46.433 (Variable return component
rate allocation) and 2010 1st sp.s. c 34 s 4, 2006 c 258 s 3, 2001 1st
sp.s. c 8 s 6, & 1999 c 353 s 9 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Except as provided in section 18 of this
act, if any provision of this act or its application to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the
application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not
affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Sections 12 through 21 and 24 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 74 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---