BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (3) of this section, a city
or town shall not enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development
regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or
administrative practice that prohibits hobby vehicle restoration.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "hobby vehicle restoration"
means the restoration of six or fewer vehicles that are thirty years or
older of which the person restoring the vehicle has title and is
actively working towards restoration of the vehicle and provided that
the vehicles being restored and used for parts are maintained and
stored by the restorer in a location that is out of ordinary public
view by means of suitable fencing, trees, shrubbery, or otherwise.
"Hobby vehicle restoration" includes the use of one of the six vehicles
for the purposes of parts salvage only. An activity qualifies as hobby
vehicle restoration when the restoration of the vehicle or vehicles is
an ancillary use of the property upon which the restoration takes
place.
(3) This section does not prohibit a city or town from enacting,
enforcing, or maintaining an ordinance, development regulation, zoning
regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice to
otherwise regulate hobby vehicle restoration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.63 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (3) of this section, a city
shall not enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development
regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or
administrative practice that prohibits hobby vehicle restoration.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "hobby vehicle restoration"
means the restoration of six or fewer vehicles that are thirty years or
older of which the person restoring the vehicle has title and is
actively working towards restoration of the vehicle and provided that
the vehicles being restored and used for parts are maintained and
stored by the restorer in a location that is out of ordinary public
view by means of suitable fencing, trees, shrubbery, or otherwise.
"Hobby vehicle restoration" includes the use of one of the six vehicles
for the purposes of parts salvage only. An activity qualifies as hobby
vehicle restoration when the restoration of the vehicle or vehicles is
an ancillary use of the property upon which the restoration takes
place.
(3) This section does not prohibit a city from enacting, enforcing,
or maintaining an ordinance, development regulation, zoning regulation,
or official control, policy, or administrative practice to otherwise
regulate hobby vehicle restoration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.63 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (3) of this section, a city
shall not enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development
regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or
administrative practice that prohibits hobby vehicle restoration.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "hobby vehicle restoration"
means the restoration of six or fewer vehicles that are thirty years or
older of which the person restoring the vehicle has title and is
actively working towards restoration of the vehicle and provided that
the vehicles being restored and used for parts are maintained and
stored by the restorer in a location that is out of ordinary public
view by means of suitable fencing, trees, shrubbery, or otherwise.
"Hobby vehicle restoration" includes the use of one of the six vehicles
for the purposes of parts salvage only. An activity qualifies as hobby
vehicle restoration when the restoration of the vehicle or vehicles is
an ancillary use of the property upon which the restoration takes
place.
(3) This section does not prohibit a city from enacting, enforcing,
or maintaining an ordinance, development regulation, zoning regulation,
or official control, policy, or administrative practice to otherwise
regulate hobby vehicle restoration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (3) of this section, a
county shall not enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development
regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or
administrative practice that prohibits hobby vehicle restoration.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "hobby vehicle restoration"
means the restoration of six or fewer vehicles that are thirty years or
older of which the person restoring the vehicle has title and is
actively working towards restoration of the vehicle and provided that
the vehicles being restored and used for parts are maintained and
stored by the restorer in a location that is out of ordinary public
view by means of suitable fencing, trees, shrubbery, or otherwise.
"Hobby vehicle restoration" includes the use of one of the six vehicles
for the purposes of parts salvage only. An activity qualifies as hobby
vehicle restoration when the restoration of the vehicle or vehicles is
an ancillary use of the property upon which the restoration takes
place.
(3) This section does not prohibit a county from enacting,
enforcing, or maintaining an ordinance, development regulation, zoning
regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice to
otherwise regulate hobby vehicle restoration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided under subsection (3) of this section, a
county shall not enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development
regulation, zoning regulation, or official control, policy, or
administrative practice that prohibits hobby vehicle restoration.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "hobby vehicle restoration"
means the restoration of six or fewer vehicles that are thirty years or
older of which the person restoring the vehicle has title and is
actively working towards restoration of the vehicle and provided that
the vehicles being restored and used for parts are maintained and
stored by the restorer in a location that is out of ordinary public
view by means of suitable fencing, trees, shrubbery, or otherwise.
"Hobby vehicle restoration" includes the use of one of the six vehicles
for the purposes of parts salvage only. An activity qualifies as hobby
vehicle restoration when the restoration of the vehicle or vehicles is
an ancillary use of the property upon which the restoration takes
place.
(3) This section does not prohibit a county from enacting,
enforcing, or maintaining an ordinance, development regulation, zoning
regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice to
otherwise regulate hobby vehicle restoration.

--- END ---