BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.08.0206 (Exemptions -- Working families -- Eligible low-income persons) and 2008 c 325 s 2; and
(2) RCW 82.08.02061 (Exemptions -- Working families -- Report to
legislature) and 2008 c 325 s 3.

--- END ---