BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.05.010 and 2008 c 282 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a court of limited jurisdiction a person charged with a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor may petition the court to be
considered for a deferred prosecution program. The petition shall be
filed with the court at least seven days before the date set for trial
but, upon a written motion and affidavit establishing good cause for
the delay and failure to comply with this section, the court may waive
this requirement subject to the defendant's reimbursement to the court
of the witness fees and expenses due for subpoenaed witnesses who have
appeared on the date set for trial.
(2) A person charged with a traffic infraction, misdemeanor, or
gross misdemeanor under Title 46 RCW shall not be eligible for a
deferred prosecution program unless the court makes specific findings
pursuant to RCW 10.05.020 ((or section 18 of this act)). Such person
shall not be eligible for a deferred prosecution program more than
once; and cannot receive a deferred prosecution under ((both)) RCW
10.05.020 ((and section 18 of this act)). Separate offenses committed
more than seven days apart may not be consolidated in a single program.
(3) A person charged with a misdemeanor or a gross misdemeanor
under chapter 9A.42 RCW shall not be eligible for a deferred
prosecution program unless the court makes specific findings pursuant
to RCW 10.05.020. Such person shall not be eligible for a deferred
prosecution program more than once.
(4) If a petitioner has successfully completed a deferred
prosecution program under this chapter, no criminal justice agency may
disseminate any criminal history or court record information pertaining
to the charges underlying the deferred prosecution petition or the fact
of the deferred prosecution. For purposes of this subsection,
"criminal justice agency" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
10.97.030.

--- END ---