BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.270 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 426 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to carry, exhibit, display,
or draw any firearm, dagger, sword, knife or other cutting or stabbing
instrument, club, or any other weapon apparently capable of producing
bodily harm, in a manner, under circumstances, and at a time and place
that ((either)):
(a) Manifests an intent to intimidate another; or ((that))
(b) Warrants alarm for the safety of other persons.
(2) Any person violating the provisions of subsection (1) ((above))
of this section shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor. If any person
is convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of this section, the
person shall lose his or her concealed pistol license, if any. The
court shall send notice of the revocation to the department of
licensing, and the city, town, or county which issued the license.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to or affect the
following:
(a) Any act committed by a person while in his or her place of
abode or fixed place of business;
(b) Any person who by virtue of his or her office or public
employment is vested by law with a duty to preserve public safety,
maintain public order, or to make arrests for offenses, while in the
performance of such duty;
(c) Any person acting for the purpose of protecting himself or
herself against the use of presently threatened unlawful force by
another, or for the purpose of protecting another against the use of
such unlawful force by a third person;
(d) Any person making or assisting in making a lawful arrest for
the commission of a felony; or
(e) Any person engaged in military activities sponsored by the
federal or state governments.
(4) Subject to the exceptions in subsection (3)(b), (d), and (e) of
this section, it is a violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section if
the person carries, exhibits, displays, or draws any firearm in or on
the premises of an institution of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.14H.010, or at a college-sponsored event.

--- END ---