BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 54.28.090 and 1980 c 154 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The county legislative authority of each county ((shall)) must
direct the county treasurer to deposit funds to the credit of each
taxing district in the county, other than school districts, according
to the manner they deem most equitable; except not less than an amount
equal to three-fourths of one percent of the gross revenues obtained by
a district from the sale of electric energy within any incorporated
city or town ((shall)) must be remitted to such city or town.
Information furnished by the district to the county legislative
authority ((shall)) must be the basis for the determination of the
amount to be paid to such cities or towns under this subsection.
(2) In the event that a county receives tax proceeds under RCW
54.28.050 because a public utility district operated by another county
owns fee title to property in a city or town in the county that
receives such tax proceeds, and that city or town adjoins a reservoir
on the Columbia river wholly or partially created by such district's
hydroelectric facility which began commercial power generation in 1967,
but the district has no sales of electrical energy in that city or
town, the county may retain sixty percent of such tax proceeds. The
county must remit the remainder of the tax proceeds to the city or town
in which the district owns fee title to property but has no sales of
electrical energy. If the district owns fee title to property in more
than one city or town in the county receiving such tax proceeds, and
has no sales of electrical energy in those cities or towns, the
remainder of the tax must be divided evenly among all such cities and
towns.
(3) The provisions of this section ((shall)) do not apply to the
distribution of taxes collected under RCW 54.28.025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies to public utility district
privilege taxes to be distributed in 2012 and each year thereafter.

--- END ---