BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.33 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An order terminating a person's parental rights that is entered
in a proceeding initiated under either chapter 13.34 RCW or this
chapter shall be automatically stayed for thirty days after entry of
the order terminating parental rights. If a notice of appeal is filed
with respect to the termination order during the thirty-day period, the
automatic stay shall continue until the appeal is complete or the stay
is lifted by the reviewing court. If a notice of appeal is not filed
within the thirty-day period, the automatic stay shall expire.
(2) The automatic stay under this section shall stay the execution
of the termination order to the extent that it would permit entry of an
order of adoption without the parent's consent or surrender, and shall
also stay the termination order with respect to any power granted to a
person or agency to consent to an adoption.

--- END ---