BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) The regulation and taxation of cannabis will generate revenue
for health care programs, including effective drug education programs.
Producing, selling, and shipping cannabis within Washington will also
help create jobs in the agricultural sector;
(b) Regulating and selling cannabis will conserve state resources
during the current period of fiscal constraint and create significant
state revenue for health care and substance abuse treatment and
prevention. Each year millions of dollars are wasted on prosecution of
cannabis-related offenses. Regulation of cannabis will eliminate these
expenses in addition to generating revenue; and
(c) The state has an effective system for the regulation and
taxation of alcohol.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to promote commerce and
competition within Washington by eliminating penalties for the
possession and consumption of cannabis, regulating and taxing the sale
of cannabis by state government, and licensing cannabis growers.

PART II
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
Sec. 2 RCW 66.04.010 and 2009 c 373 s 1 and 2009 c 271 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
In this title, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated
oxide of ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the
fermentation or distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or
other substances including all dilutions and mixtures of this
substance. The term "alcohol" does not include alcohol in the
possession of a manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described
in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel
for use in motor vehicles, farm implements, and machines or implements
of husbandry.
(2) "Authorized representative" means a person who:
(a) Is required to have a federal basic permit issued pursuant to
the federal alcohol administration act, 27 U.S.C. Sec. 204;
(b) Has its business located in the United States outside of the
state of Washington;
(c) Acquires ownership of beer or wine for transportation into and
resale in the state of Washington; and which beer or wine is produced
by a brewery or winery in the United States outside of the state of
Washington; and
(d) Is appointed by the brewery or winery referenced in (c) of this
subsection as its authorized representative for marketing and selling
its products within the United States in accordance with a written
agreement between the authorized representative and such brewery or
winery pursuant to this title.
(3) "Beer" means any malt beverage, flavored malt beverage, or malt
liquor as these terms are defined in this chapter.
(4) "Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a domestic
brewery, microbrewery, beer certificate of approval holder, or beer
importers, or who acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to
this title, or who represents such brewer or brewery as agent.
(5) "Beer importer" means a person or business within Washington
who purchases beer from a beer certificate of approval holder or who
acquires foreign produced beer from a source outside of the United
States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.
(6) "Board" means the liquor control board, constituted under this
title.
(7) "Brewer" or "brewery" means any person engaged in the business
of manufacturing beer and malt liquor. Brewer includes a brand owner
of malt beverages who holds a brewer's notice with the federal bureau
of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms at a location outside the state and
whose malt beverage is contract-produced by a licensed in-state
brewery, and who may exercise within the state, under a domestic
brewery license, only the privileges of storing, selling to licensed
beer distributors, and exporting beer from the state.
(8) "Cannabis" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether
growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of
the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture,
or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or resin. The term does not
include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks,
oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound,
manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature
stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or
the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination.
For the purposes of this title, the term "cannabis" includes cannabis
products and does not include hemp or hemp products.
(9) "Cannabis farmer" means any person engaged in the agriculture
business, licensed with the department of agriculture, and who grows
cannabis for sale in state liquor stores on behalf of the board.
(10) "Cannabis labeling" means all labels and other written,
printed, or graphic matter (a) upon any cannabis, hemp, or hemp
product, or any of its containers or wrappers, or (b) accompanying such
cannabis and hemp.
(11) "Cannabis licensed producer" means a person licensed by the
department of agriculture to produce, process, package, and offer for
sale at wholesale cannabis, hemp, and hemp products in accordance with
rules adopted by the department of agriculture pursuant to the terms of
this title.
(12) "Cannabis licensed seller" means a person licensed by the
department of health to repackage and sell at retail cannabis and hemp
in accordance with rules adopted by the department of health pursuant
to the terms of this title.
(13) "Cannabis package" means any container or receptacle used for
holding cannabis or hemp.
(14) "Cannabis products" means products containing cannabis or
cannabis extracts that have a measurable THC concentration and are
intended for human consumption or application including, but not
limited to, edible products, tinctures, and lotions. The term
"cannabis products" does not include useable cannabis or products made
from hemp.
(15) "Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated or
unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent, educational,
athletic or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.
(((9))) (16) "Confection" means a preparation of sugar, honey, or
other natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate,
fruits, nuts, dairy products, or flavorings, in the form of bars,
drops, or pieces.
(((10))) (17) "Consume" includes the putting of liquor or cannabis
to any use, whether by drinking or otherwise.
(((11))) (18) "Contract liquor store" means a business that sells
liquor or cannabis on behalf of the board through a contract with a
contract liquor store manager.
(((12))) (19) "Craft distillery" means a distillery that pays the
reduced licensing fee under RCW 66.24.140.
(((13))) (20) "Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and
regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his or her profession
within the state pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.
(((14))) (21) "Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of
distilling spirits.
(((15))) (22) "Domestic brewery" means a place where beer and malt
liquor are manufactured or produced by a brewer within the state.
(((16))) (23) "Domestic winery" means a place where wines are
manufactured or produced within the state of Washington.
(((17))) (24) "Drug store" means a place whose principal business
is, the sale of drugs, medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and
maintains a regular prescription department and employs a registered
pharmacist during all hours the drug store is open.
(((18))) (25) "Druggist" means any person who holds a valid
certificate and is a registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly
engaged in carrying on the business of pharmaceutical chemistry
pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW.
(((19))) (26) "Employee" means any person employed by the board.
(((20))) (27) "Flavored malt beverage" means:
(a) A malt beverage containing six percent or less alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than forty-nine
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content; or
(b) A malt beverage containing more than six percent alcohol by
volume to which flavoring or other added nonbeverage ingredients are
added that contain distilled spirits of not more than one and one-half
percent of the beverage's overall alcohol content.
(((21))) (28) "Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'
(((22))) (29) "Hemp" means varieties of the Cannabis plant that
have a THC concentration of less than three-tenths of one percent, the
mature stalks of the Cannabis plant, fiber produced from the stalks,
oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound,
manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature
stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or
the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination.
For purposes of this title, the term "hemp" does not include hemp
products.
(30) "Hemp products" means products made from hemp and intended for
human consumption or industrial purposes that do not contain a
measurable THC concentration.
(31) "Hotel" means buildings, structures, and grounds, having
facilities for preparing, cooking, and serving food, that are kept,
used, maintained, advertised, or held out to the public to be a place
where food is served and sleeping accommodations are offered for pay to
transient guests, in which twenty or more rooms are used for the
sleeping accommodation of such transient guests. The buildings,
structures, and grounds must be located on adjacent property either
owned or leased by the same person or persons.
(((23))) (32) "Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits
from a distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such
spirituous liquor into the state for sale to the board or for export.
(((24))) (33) "Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.
(((25))) (34) "Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein
defined (alcohol, spirits, wine and beer), and all fermented,
spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed
liquor, a part of which is fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt
liquor, or otherwise intoxicating; and every liquid or solid or
semisolid or other substance, patented or not, containing alcohol,
spirits, wine or beer, and all drinks or drinkable liquids and all
preparations or mixtures capable of human consumption, and any liquid,
semisolid, solid, or other substance, which contains more than one
percent of alcohol by weight shall be conclusively deemed to be
intoxicating. Liquor does not include confections or food products
that contain one percent or less of alcohol by weight.
(((26))) (35) "Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage
such as beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the
alcoholic fermentation of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or
pure extract of hops and pure barley malt or other wholesome grain or
cereal in pure water containing not more than eight percent of alcohol
by weight, and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by
volume. For the purposes of this title, any such beverage containing
more than eight percent of alcohol by weight shall be referred to as
"strong beer."
(((27))) (36) "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the
preparation of liquor for sale, in any form whatsoever.
(((28))) (37) "Nightclub" means an establishment that provides
entertainment and has as its primary source of revenue (a) the sale of
alcohol for consumption on the premises, (b) cover charges, or (c)
both, and has an occupancy load of one hundred or more.
(((29))) (38) "Package" means any container or receptacle used for
holding liquor or cannabis.
(((30))) (39) "Passenger vessel" means any boat, ship, vessel,
barge, or other floating craft of any kind carrying passengers for
compensation.
(((31))) (40) "Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor or
cannabis under this title.
(((32))) (41) "Person" means an individual, copartnership,
association, or corporation.
(((33))) (42) "Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and
regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his or her profession
within the state pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW.
(((34))) (43) "Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a
physician and given by him or her to a patient for the obtaining of
liquor pursuant to this title for medicinal purposes.
(((35))) (44) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of
incorporated cities and towns; state or county or township highways or
roads; buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance
halls and grounds adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments where
beer may be sold under this title, soft drink establishments, public
buildings, public meeting halls, lobbies, halls and dining rooms of
hotels, restaurants, theatres, stores, garages and filling stations
which are open to and are generally used by the public and to which the
public is permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains,
stages, and other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and
the depots and waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are
open to unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned
bathing beaches, parks, and/or playgrounds; and all other places of
like or similar nature to which the general public has unrestricted
right of access, and which are generally used by the public.
(((36))) (45) "Regulations" means regulations made by the board
under the powers conferred by this title.
(((37))) (46) "Restaurant" means any establishment provided with
special space and accommodations where, in consideration of payment,
food, without lodgings, is habitually furnished to the public, not
including drug stores and soda fountains.
(((38))) (47) "Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and
traffic; and also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by
any means whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as
beer or by any name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed
liquor or of wine, by any person to any person; and also include a sale
or selling within the state to a foreign consignee or his or her agent
in the state. "Sale" and "sell" shall not include the giving, at no
charge, of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person not licensed by
the board to a person not licensed by the board, for personal use only.
"Sale" and "sell" also does not include a raffle authorized under RCW
9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That the nonprofit organization conducting the
raffle has obtained the appropriate permit from the board.
(((39))) (48) "Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped
with apparatus for the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed
or otherwise.
(((40))) (49) "Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol
obtained by distillation, except flavored malt beverages, but including
wines exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume.
(((41))) (50) "Store" means a state liquor store established under
this title.
(((42))) (51) "Tavern" means any establishment with special space
and accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on the
premises, of beer, as herein defined.
(((43))) (52) "THC concentration" means percent of
tetrahydrocannabinol content per weight or volume of useable cannabis,
cannabis product, hemp, or hemp product.
(53) "Useable cannabis" means the harvested dried leaves and
flowers of the Cannabis plant family Moraceae. Useable cannabis
excludes stems, stalks, seeds, and roots. For the purposes of this
title, the term "useable cannabis" does not include hemp.
(54)(a) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by
fermentation of fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other
agricultural product containing sugar, to which any saccharine
substances may have been added before, during or after fermentation,
and containing not more than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume,
including sweet wines fortified with wine spirits, such as port,
sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four percent of
alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol
by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more
than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by
the manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage
containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume
when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as
"fortified wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (i)
Wines that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years
or more; and (ii) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol
by volume solely as a result of the natural fermentation process and
that have not been produced with the addition of wine spirits, brandy,
or alcohol.
(b) This subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any
wine be labeled with the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."
(((44))) (55) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from
a domestic winery, wine certificate of approval holder, or wine
importer, or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside
of the United States, for the purpose of selling the same not in
violation of this title, or who represents such vintner or winery as
agent.
(((45))) (56) "Wine importer" means a person or business within
Washington who purchases wine from a wine certificate of approval
holder or who acquires foreign produced wine from a source outside of
the United States for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this
title.
(((46))) (57) "Winery" means a business conducted by any person for
the manufacture of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.

Sec. 3 RCW 66.08.026 and 2008 c 67 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Administrative expenses of the board shall be appropriated and paid
from the liquor revolving fund and the cannabis revolving fund. These
administrative expenses shall include, but not be limited to: The
salaries and expenses of the board and its employees, the cost of
opening additional state liquor stores and warehouses, legal services,
pilot projects, annual or other audits, and other general costs of
conducting the business of the board. The administrative expenses
shall not include costs of cannabis, hemp products, liquor, and lottery
tickets purchased, the cost of transportation and delivery to the point
of distribution, the cost of operating, maintaining, relocating, and
leasing state liquor stores and warehouses, other costs pertaining to
the acquisition and receipt of cannabis, hemp products, liquor, and
lottery tickets, agency commissions for contract liquor stores,
transaction fees associated with credit or debit card purchases for
cannabis, hemp products, or liquor in state liquor stores and in
contract liquor stores pursuant to RCW 66.16.040 and 66.16.041, sales
tax, and those amounts distributed pursuant to RCW 66.08.180,
66.08.190, 66.08.200, 66.08.210 and 66.08.220. Agency commissions for
contract liquor stores shall be established by the liquor control board
after consultation with and approval by the director of the office of
financial management. All expenditures and payment of obligations
authorized by this section are subject to the allotment requirements of
chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 66.08.030 and 2002 c 119 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of this
title according to their true intent or of supplying any deficiency
therein, the board may make such regulations not inconsistent with the
spirit of this title as are deemed necessary or advisable. All
regulations so made shall be a public record and shall be filed in the
office of the code reviser, and thereupon shall have the same force and
effect as if incorporated in this title. Such regulations, together
with a copy of this title, shall be published in pamphlets and shall be
distributed as directed by the board.
(2) Without thereby limiting the generality of the provisions
contained in subsection (1) of this section, it is declared that the
power of the board to make regulations in the manner set out in that
subsection shall extend to:
(a) Regulating the equipment and management of stores and
warehouses in which state liquor and cannabis is sold or kept, and
prescribing the books and records to be kept therein and the reports to
be made thereon to the board;
(b) Prescribing the duties of the employees of the board, and
regulating their conduct in the discharge of their duties;
(c) Governing the purchase of liquor and cannabis by the state and
the furnishing of liquor and cannabis to stores established under this
title;
(d) Determining the classes, varieties, and brands of liquor and
cannabis to be kept for sale at any store;
(e) Prescribing, subject to RCW 66.16.080, the hours during which
the state liquor stores shall be kept open for the sale of liquor and
cannabis;
(f) Providing for the issuing and distributing of price lists
showing the price to be paid by purchasers for each variety of liquor
and cannabis kept for sale under this title;
(g) Prescribing an official seal and official labels and stamps and
determining the manner in which they shall be attached to every package
of liquor sold or sealed under this title, including the prescribing of
different official seals or different official labels for different
classes of liquor;
(h) Prescribing an official cannabis seal, official label, and
stamp, and determining the manner in which they shall be attached to
every package of cannabis sold or sealed under this title, including
the prescribing of different official seals or different official
labels for the different varieties of cannabis;
(i) Providing for the payment by the board in whole or in part of
the carrying charges on liquor and cannabis shipped by freight or
express;
(((i))) (j) Prescribing forms to be used for purposes of this title
or the regulations, and the terms and conditions to be contained in
permits and licenses issued under this title, and the qualifications
for receiving a permit or license issued under this title, including a
criminal history record information check. The board may submit the
criminal history record information check to the Washington state
patrol and to the identification division of the federal bureau of
investigation in order that these agencies may search their records for
prior arrests and convictions of the individual or individuals who
filled out the forms. The board shall require fingerprinting of any
applicant whose criminal history record information check is submitted
to the federal bureau of investigation;
(((j))) (k) Prescribing the fees payable in respect of permits and
licenses issued under this title for which no fees are prescribed in
this title, and prescribing the fees for anything done or permitted to
be done under the regulations;
(((k))) (l) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor which
may be kept on hand by the holder of a special permit for the purposes
named in the permit, regulating the manner in which the same shall be
kept and disposed of, and providing for the inspection of the same at
any time at the instance of the board;
(((l))) (m) Regulating the sale of liquor kept by the holders of
licenses which entitle the holder to purchase and keep liquor for sale;
(((m))) (n) Prescribing the records of purchases or sales of liquor
kept by the holders of licenses, and the reports to be made thereon to
the board, and providing for inspection of the records so kept;
(((n))) (o) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor and
cannabis for which a prescription may be given, and the number of
prescriptions which may be given to the same patient within a stated
period;
(((o))) (p) Prescribing the manner of giving and serving notices
required by this title or the regulations, where not otherwise provided
for in this title;
(((p))) (q) Regulating premises in which liquor is kept for export
from the state, or from which liquor is exported, prescribing the books
and records to be kept therein and the reports to be made thereon to
the board, and providing for the inspection of the premises and the
books, records and the liquor so kept;
(((q))) (r) Prescribing the conditions and qualifications requisite
for the obtaining of club licenses and the books and records to be kept
and the returns to be made by clubs, prescribing the manner of
licensing clubs in any municipality or other locality, and providing
for the inspection of clubs;
(((r))) (s) Prescribing the conditions, accommodations and
qualifications requisite for the obtaining of licenses to sell beer and
wines, and regulating the sale of beer and wines thereunder;
(((s))) (t) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when,
and the manner, methods, and means by which manufacturers shall deliver
liquor within the state; and the time and periods when, and the manner,
methods, and means by which liquor may lawfully be conveyed or carried
within the state;
(((t))) (u) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when,
and the manner, methods, and means by which authorized cannabis farmers
and authorized transporters shall deliver cannabis within the state;
and the time and periods when, and the manner, methods, and means by
which cannabis may lawfully be conveyed or carried within the state;
(v) Providing for the making of returns by brewers of their sales
of beer shipped within the state, or from the state, showing the gross
amount of such sales and providing for the inspection of brewers' books
and records, and for the checking of the accuracy of any such returns;
(((u))) (w) Providing for the making of returns by the wholesalers
of beer whose breweries are located beyond the boundaries of the state;
(((v))) (x) Providing for the making of returns by any other liquor
manufacturers, showing the gross amount of liquor produced or
purchased, the amount sold within and exported from the state, and to
whom so sold or exported, and providing for the inspection of the
premises of any such liquor manufacturers, their books and records, and
for the checking of any such return;
(((w))) (y) Providing forms to be used for purposes of providing
for the inspection of the premises of any cannabis farmer, and his or
her books and records;
(z) Providing forms to be used by cannabis farmers for reporting
the gross amount of cannabis produced, sold, transferred, and
distributed to each state liquor store and contract liquor store;
(aa) Providing for the giving of fidelity bonds by any or all of
the employees of the board: PROVIDED, That the premiums therefor shall
be paid by the board;
(((x))) (bb) Providing for the shipment by mail or common carrier
of liquor to any person holding a permit and residing in any unit which
has, by election pursuant to this title, prohibited the sale of liquor
therein;
(((y))) (cc) Prescribing methods of manufacture, conditions of
sanitation, standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of
alcoholic beverages manufactured, sold, bottled, or handled by
licensees and the board; and conducting from time to time, in the
interest of the public health and general welfare, scientific studies
and research relating to alcoholic beverages and the use and effect
thereof;
(((z))) (dd) Working in conjunction with the department of
agriculture in prescribing methods of growing, conditions of
sanitation, standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of cannabis
produced, sold, packaged, or handled by licensed cannabis farmers and
the board;
(ee) Seizing, confiscating, and destroying all alcoholic beverages
manufactured, sold, or offered for sale within this state which do not
conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this title or
the regulations of the board: PROVIDED, Nothing herein contained shall
be construed as authorizing the liquor board to prescribe, alter, limit
or in any way change the present law as to the quantity or percentage
of alcohol used in the manufacturing of wine or other alcoholic
beverages;
(ff) Seizing, confiscating, and destroying all illegal cannabis
produced, sold, or offered for sale within this state which do not
conform in all respect to the standards prescribed by this title or the
regulations of the board.

Sec. 5 RCW 66.08.050 and 2005 c 151 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, subject to the provisions of this title and the rules,
shall:
(1) Determine the localities within which state liquor stores shall
be established throughout the state, and the number and situation of
the stores within each locality;
(2) Appoint in cities and towns and other communities, in which no
state liquor store is located, contract liquor stores.
In addition, the board may appoint, in its discretion, a
manufacturer that also manufactures liquor or cannabis products other
than wine under a license under this title, as a contract liquor store
for the purpose of sale of liquor or cannabis products of its own
manufacture on the licensed premises only.
((Such)) (a) Contract liquor stores shall be (i) authorized to sell
liquor under the guidelines provided by law, rule, or contract, and
((such contract liquor stores shall be)) (ii) subject to ((such))
additional rules and regulations consistent with this title as the
board may require.
(b) Contract liquor stores shall be (i) authorized to sell cannabis
under the guidelines provided by law, rules, or contract, and subject
to additional rules and regulations consistent with this title as the
board may require;
(3) Establish all necessary warehouses for the storing and
bottling, diluting, and rectifying of stocks of liquors for the
purposes of this title;
(4) Establish all necessary warehouses for the storing and
packaging of cannabis for the purposes of this title;
(5) Provide for the leasing for periods not to exceed ten years of
all premises required for the conduct of the business; and for
remodeling the same, and the procuring of their furnishings, fixtures,
and supplies; and for obtaining options of renewal of such leases by
the lessee. The terms of such leases in all other respects shall be
subject to the direction of the board;
(((5))) (6) Determine the nature, form, and capacity of all
packages to be used for containing liquor and cannabis kept for sale
under this title;
(((6))) (7) Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers,
and documents in the name of the board, under such regulations as the
board may fix;
(((7))) (8) Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges, and
obligations whatsoever relating to the business of the board;
(((8))) (9) Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of
the board, and to determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such
employee;
(((9))) (10) Perform services for the state lottery commission to
such extent, and for such compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon
between the board and the commission;
(((10))) (11) Accept and deposit into the general fund-local
account and disburse, subject to appropriation, federal grants or other
funds or donations from any source for the purpose of improving public
awareness of the health risks associated with alcohol consumption by
youth and the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington state. The
board's alcohol awareness program shall cooperate with federal and
state agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an
active public beverage alcohol awareness program;
(((11))) (12) Perform all other matters and things, whether similar
to the foregoing or not, to carry out the provisions of this title, and
shall have full power to do each and every act necessary to the conduct
of its business, including all buying, selling, preparation, and
approval of forms, and every other function of the business whatsoever,
subject only to audit by the state auditor: PROVIDED, That the board
shall have no authority to regulate the content of spoken language on
licensed premises where wine and other liquors are served and where
there is not a clear and present danger of disorderly conduct being
provoked by such language.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The board shall adopt rules by December 31,
2011, that establishes the procedures and criteria necessary to
implement the following:
(1) Authorizing and implementing the sale of cannabis, cannabis
products, hemp, and hemp products in state liquor stores and state
contracted liquor stores;
(2) Establishing agency commissions for contract liquor stores to
purchase and sell cannabis after consultation with and approval by the
director of the office of financial management;
(3) Licensing cannabis farmers to grow cannabis crops and sell,
distribute, and transport such cannabis to state liquor stores and
state contracted liquor stores;
(4) Establishing rules, regulations, permits, and fees for
cannabis farmers;
(5) Determining the quantity of cannabis each cannabis farmer may
cultivate, grow, and store annually;
(6) Determining how cannabis and hemp products shall be packaged
and labeled with an official state seal prior to transporting and
distributing to each state liquor store;
(7) Working in conjunction with the department of agriculture in
prescribing methods of growing, conditions of sanitation, standards of
ingredients, quality, and identity of cannabis sold, packaged, or
handled by licensed cannabis farmers, the board, and liquor stores,
while providing for an exemption for persons cultivating cannabis for
personal home use which and would not be subject to the same rules,
regulations, permits, and fees as required for cannabis farmers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Every order for the purchase of cannabis
shall be authorized by the board, and no order for cannabis shall be
valid or binding unless it is so authorized and signed by the board or
its authorized designee.
(2) A duplicate of every such order shall be kept on file in the
office of the board.
(3) All cancellations of such orders made by the board shall be
signed in the same manner and duplicates of such cancellations kept on
file in the office of the board. Nothing in this title shall be
construed as preventing the board from accepting cannabis on
consignment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Except as provided by chapter 42.52 RCW, no
member of the board and no employee of the board shall have any
interest, directly or indirectly, in the manufacture or growing of
cannabis, or in any cannabis sold under this title, or derive any
profit or remuneration from the sale of cannabis, other than the salary
or wages payable to him or her in respect of his or her office or
position, and shall receive no gratuity from any person in connection
with such business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 No employee shall sell cannabis in any other
place, nor at any other time, nor otherwise than as authorized by the
board under this title and the regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The liquor control board may provide
cannabis at no charge, including cannabis forfeited under chapter 66.32
RCW, to recognized law enforcement agencies within the state when the
law enforcement agency will be using the cannabis for bona fide law
enforcement training or investigation purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) The board shall not advertise cannabis
in any form or through any medium whatsoever.
(2) In-store cannabis merchandising is not advertising for the
purposes of this section.
(3) The board shall have power to adopt any and all reasonable
rules as to the kind, character, and location of advertising of
cannabis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 No municipality or county shall have power
to license the sale of, or impose an excise tax upon, cannabis as
defined in RCW 66.04.010, or to license the sale or distribution
thereof in any manner; and any power now conferred by law on any
municipality or county to license premises which may be licensed under
this section, or to impose an excise tax upon cannabis, or to license
the sale and distribution thereof, as defined in this title, shall be
suspended and shall be of no further effect: PROVIDED, That
municipalities and counties shall have power to adopt police ordinances
and regulations not in conflict with this title or with the regulations
made by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 For the purpose of obtaining information
concerning any matter relating to the administration or enforcement of
this title, the board, or any person appointed by it in writing for the
purpose, may inspect the books and records of any cannabis farmer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) Every order for the purchase of
cannabis and hemp products shall be authorized by the board, and no
order for cannabis or hemp products shall be valid or binding unless it
is so authorized and signed by the board or its authorized designee.
(2) A duplicate of every such order shall be kept on file in the
office of the board.
(3) All cancellations of such orders made by the board shall be
signed in the same manner and duplicates thereof kept on file in the
office of the board. Nothing in this title shall be construed as
preventing the board from accepting liquor on consignment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 No official or employee of the liquor
control board of the state of Washington shall, during his or her term
of office or employment, or for a period of two years immediately
following his or her termination thereof, represent directly or
indirectly any manufacturer or wholesaler of cannabis in the sale of
cannabis to the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Nothing in this title shall apply to or
prevent the sale of cannabis by any person to the board.

Sec. 17 RCW 66.16.010 and 2005 c 518 s 935 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be established at such places throughout the state
as the liquor control board, constituted under this title, shall deem
advisable, stores to be known as "state liquor stores," for the sale of
liquor and cannabis in accordance with the provisions of this title and
the regulations: PROVIDED, That the prices of all liquor and cannabis
shall be fixed by the board from time to time so that the net annual
revenue received by the board therefrom shall not exceed thirty-five
percent. ((Effective no later than July 1, 2005, the liquor control
board shall add an equivalent surcharge of $0.42 per liter on all
retail sales of spirits, excluding licensee, military, and tribal
sales. The intent of this surcharge is to raise revenue for the
general fund-state for the 2003-2005 and 2005-2007 bienniums. The
board shall remove the surcharge June 30, 2007.))
(2) The liquor control board may, from time to time, fix the
special price at which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to physicians and
dentists and institutions regularly conducted as hospitals, for use or
consumption only in such hospitals; and may also fix the special price
at which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to schools, colleges and
universities within the state for use for scientific purposes.
Regularly conducted hospitals may have right to purchase pure ethyl
alcohol on a federal permit.
(3) The liquor control board may also fix the special price at
which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to any department, branch or
institution of the state of Washington, federal government, or to any
person engaged in a manufacturing or industrial business or in
scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein.
(4) The liquor control board may also fix a special price at which
pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to any private individual, and shall
make regulations governing such sale of alcohol to private individuals
as shall promote, as nearly as may be, the minimum purchase of such
alcohol by such persons.

Sec. 18 RCW 66.16.040 and 2005 c 206 s 1, 2005 c 151 s 5, and
2005 c 102 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided by law, an employee in a state liquor
store or contract liquor store may sell liquor and cannabis to any
person of legal age to purchase alcoholic beverages and cannabis and
may also sell to holders of permits such liquor and cannabis as may be
purchased under such permits.
Where there may be a question of a person's right to purchase
liquor or cannabis by reason of age, such person shall be required to
present any one of the following officially issued cards of
identification which shows his/her correct age and bears his/her
signature and photograph:
(1) Driver's license, instruction permit or identification card of
any state or province of Canada, or "identicard" issued by the
Washington state department of licensing pursuant to RCW 46.20.117.
(2) United States armed forces identification card issued to active
duty, reserve, and retired personnel and the personnel's dependents,
which may include an imbedded, digital signature in lieu of a visible
signature.
(3) Passport.
(4) Merchant Marine identification card issued by the United States
Coast Guard.
(5) Enrollment card issued by the governing authority of a
federally recognized Indian tribe located in Washington, if the
enrollment card incorporates security features comparable to those
implemented by the department of licensing for Washington drivers'
licenses. At least ninety days prior to implementation of an
enrollment card under this subsection, the appropriate tribal authority
shall give notice to the board. The board shall publish and
communicate to licensees regarding the implementation of each new
enrollment card.
The board may adopt such regulations as it deems proper covering
the cards of identification listed in this section.
No liquor or cannabis sold under this section shall be delivered
until the purchaser has paid for the liquor or cannabis in cash, except
as allowed under RCW 66.16.041. The use of a personal credit card does
not rely upon the credit of the state as prohibited by Article VIII,
section 5 of the state Constitution.

Sec. 19 RCW 66.16.041 and 2005 c 151 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state liquor control board shall accept bank credit card
and debit cards for purchases in state liquor stores, under such rules
as the board may adopt. The board shall authorize contract liquor
stores appointed under RCW 66.08.050 to accept bank credit cards and
debit cards for liquor and cannabis purchases under this title, under
such rules as the board may adopt.
(2) If a contract liquor store chooses to use credit or debit cards
for liquor and cannabis purchases, the board shall provide equipment
and installation and maintenance of the equipment necessary to
implement the use of credit and debit cards. Any equipment provided by
the board to a contract liquor store for this purpose may be used only
for the purchase of liquor and cannabis.

Sec. 20 RCW 66.16.060 and 1943 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board may in its discretion by regulation prescribe that
any or all liquors other than malt liquor shall be delivered to any
purchaser at a state liquor store only in a package sealed with the
official seal.
(2) The board may in its discretion by rule prescribe that all
cannabis shall be delivered to any purchaser at a state liquor store in
a packaged sealed with the official cannabis label or seal.

Sec. 21 RCW 66.16.070 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 10 are each amended
to read as follows:
No employee in a state liquor store shall open or consume, or allow
to be opened or consumed any liquor or cannabis on the store premises.

Sec. 22 RCW 66.16.090 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 89 are each amended
to read as follows:
All records whatsoever of the board showing purchases by any
individual of liquor or cannabis shall be deemed confidential, and,
except subject to audit by the state auditor, shall not be permitted to
be inspected by any person whatsoever, except by employees of the board
to the extent permitted by the regulations; and no member of the board
and no employee whatsoever shall give out any information concerning
such records and neither such records nor any information relative
thereto which shall make known the name of any individual purchaser
shall be competent to be admitted as evidence in any court or courts
except in prosecutions for illegal possession of and/or sale of liquor
or cannabis. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 23 RCW 66.16.120 and 2005 c 231 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
Employees in state liquor stores, including agency vendor liquor
stores, may not be required to work on their Sabbath for the purpose of
selling liquor or cannabis if doing so would violate their religious
beliefs.

PART III
LICENSE PROCEDURES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 Pursuant to section 25 of this act, there
shall be a license for farmers of cannabis and manufacturers of hemp
products. The license shall provide authorization for cannabis farmers
and manufacturers to produce, manufacture, grow, cultivate, transport,
and sell cannabis and hemp products within the state of Washington.
The annual fee for a cannabis farmer's license shall be five thousand
dollars. For the purposes of chapter 66.28 RCW, a grower licensee
shall be deemed a manufacturer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 (1) There shall be a license for persons to
produce cannabis, cannabis products, hemp, and hemp products regulated
by the board.
(2) Every producer's license shall be issued in the name of the
applicant, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to
use the license.
(3) For the purpose of considering any application for a producer's
license, or the renewal of a license, the board may cause an inspection
of the applicant's or licensee's production facilities to be made, and
may inquire into all matters in connection with the construction and
operation of the facilities. For the purpose of reviewing any
application for a license and for considering the denial, suspension,
revocation, or renewal or denial thereof, the board may consider any
prior criminal conduct of the applicant including an administrative
violation history record with the board and a criminal history record
information check. The board may submit the criminal history record
information check to the Washington state patrol and to the
identification division of the federal bureau of investigation in order
that these agencies may search their records for prior arrests and
convictions of the individual or individuals who filled out the forms.
The board shall require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal
history record information check is submitted to the federal bureau of
investigation. The provisions of RCW 9.95.240, 9.94A.640, and chapter
9.96A RCW shall not apply to such cases. Subject to the provisions of
this section, the board may, in its discretion, grant or deny the
renewal or license applied for. Denial may be based on, without
limitation, the existence of chronic illegal activity documented in
objections submitted pursuant to subsections (9)(c) and (12) of this
section. The board may grant authority to approve an uncontested or
unopposed license to any staff member the department designates in
writing. Conditions for granting such authority shall be adopted by
rule. No license to produce cannabis, cannabis products, hemp, and
hemp products may be issued to:
(a) A person doing business as a sole proprietor who has not
resided in the state for at least one month prior to receiving a
license;
(b) A partnership, unless all of the members thereof are qualified
to obtain a license, as provided in this section;
(c) A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or
agent, unless such manager or agent possesses the same qualifications
required of the licensee; or
(d) A corporation or a limited liability company, unless it was
created under the laws of the state of Washington or holds a
certificate of authority to transact business in the state of
Washington.
(4)(a) The board may, in its discretion, suspend or cancel any
license to produce cannabis, hemp, and hemp products; and all rights of
the licensee to produce, process, package, or offer for sale at
wholesale cannabis, hemp, and hemp products thereunder shall be
suspended or terminated, as the case may be. The decision to suspend
or cancel the license shall be an adjudicative proceeding and subject
to the applicable provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(b) The board shall immediately suspend the license of a person who
has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of
social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a
support order. If the person has continued to meet all other
requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the
license shall be automatic upon the board's receipt of a release issued
by the department of social and health services stating that the
licensee is in compliance with the order.
(c) The board may request the appointment of administrative law
judges under chapter 34.12 RCW who shall have power to administer
oaths, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the
production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony,
examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry,
investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under
such rules and regulations as the board may adopt.
(d) Witnesses shall be allowed fees and mileage each way to and
from any such inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the
rate authorized by RCW 34.05.446. Fees need not be paid in advance of
appearance of witnesses to testify or to produce books, records, or
other legal evidence.
(e) In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order
of the liquor control board or a subpoena issued by the board, or any
of its members, or administrative law judges, or on the refusal of a
witness to testify to any matter regarding which he or she may be
lawfully interrogated, the judge of the superior court of the county in
which the person resides, on application of any member of the board or
administrative law judge, shall compel obedience by contempt
proceedings, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a
subpoena issued from said court or a refusal to testify therein.
(5) Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a
license to produce cannabis, cannabis products, hemp, and hemp products
the licensee shall forthwith deliver up the license to the board.
Where the license has been suspended only, the board shall return the
license to the licensee at the expiration or termination of the period
of suspension. The board shall notify the department of health, and
the department of health shall notify all licensed sellers of cannabis
and hemp in the state of the suspension or cancellation of the license;
and no employee or agent of any licensed seller may allow or cause any
cannabis or hemp to be delivered to the premises of a licensed seller's
shop from or on behalf of the producer whose license has been suspended
or canceled.
(6)(a) At the time of the original issuance of a license to produce
cannabis, cannabis products, hemp, and hemp products, the board shall
prorate the license fee charged to the new licensee according to the
number of calendar quarters, or portion thereof, remaining until the
first renewal of that license is required.
(b) Unless sooner canceled, every license to produce cannabis,
cannabis products, hemp, and hemp products issued by the board shall
expire at midnight of the thirtieth day of June of the fiscal year for
which it was issued. However, if the board deems it feasible and
desirable to do so, it may establish, by rule pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW, a system for staggering the annual renewal dates for licenses to
cannabis, cannabis products, hemp, and hemp products. If such a system
of staggered annual renewal dates is established by the board, the
license fees provided by this chapter shall be appropriately prorated
during the first year that the system is in effect.
(7) Every license issued under this section shall be subject to all
conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by rules adopted
by the board. All conditions and restrictions imposed by the board in
the issuance of an individual license shall be listed on the face of
the individual license along with the trade name, address, and
expiration date.
(8) Every licensed cannabis producer shall post and keep posted its
license, or licenses, in a conspicuous place on the premises of its
production facility or facilities.
(9)(a) Before the board issues a new or renewal license to produce
cannabis, hemp, and hemp products to an applicant it shall give notice
of such application to the chief executive officer of the incorporated
city or town, if the application is for a license within an
incorporated city or town, or to the county legislative authority, if
the application is for a license outside the boundaries of incorporated
cities or towns.
(b) The incorporated city or town through the official or employee
selected by it, or the county legislative authority or the official or
employee selected by it, shall have the right to file with the board
within twenty days after the date of transmittal of such notice for
applications, or at least thirty days prior to the expiration date for
renewals, written objections against the applicant or against the
premises for which the new or renewal license is asked. The board may
extend the time period for submitting written objections.
(c) The written objections shall include a statement of all facts
upon which such objections are based, and in case written objections
are filed, the city or town or county legislative authority may request
and the board may in its discretion hold a hearing subject to the
applicable provisions of Title 34 RCW. If the board makes an initial
decision to deny a license or renewal based on the written objections
of an incorporated city or town or county legislative authority, the
applicant may request a hearing subject to the applicable provisions of
Title 34 RCW. If such a hearing is held at the request of the
applicant, board representatives shall present and defend the board's
initial decision to deny a license or renewal.
(d) Upon the granting of a license to produce cannabis, hemp, and
hemp products under this title the board shall send written
notification to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or
town in which the license is granted, or to the county legislative
authority if the license is granted outside the boundaries of
incorporated cities or towns.
(10)(a) Before the board issues a license to produce cannabis,
hemp, and hemp products to any applicant, it shall give (i) due
consideration to the location of the business to be conducted under
such license with respect to the proximity of churches, schools, and
public institutions and (ii) written notice, with receipt verification,
of the application to public institutions identified by the board as
appropriate to receive such notice, churches, and schools within five
hundred feet of the premises to be licensed. The board shall not issue
a license to produce cannabis, hemp, and hemp products covering any
premises within five hundred feet of the premises of any tax supported
public elementary or secondary school measured along the most direct
route over or across established public walks, streets, or other public
passageway from the main entrance of the school to the nearest public
entrance of the premises proposed for license if, after receipt by the
school of the notice as provided in this subsection, the board receives
written objection, within twenty days after receiving such notice, from
an official representative or representatives of the school indicating
to the board that there is an objection to the issuance of such license
because of proximity to the school. The board may extend the time
period for submitting objections. For the purpose of this subsection,
"church" means a building erected for and used exclusively for
religious worship and schooling or other activity in connection
therewith and "public institution" means institutions of higher
education, parks, community centers, libraries, and transit centers.
(b) It is the intent under this subsection (10) that a license to
produce cannabis, hemp, and hemp products shall not be issued by the
board where doing so would, in the judgment of the board, adversely
affect a private school meeting the requirements for private schools
under Title 28A RCW, which is within five hundred feet of the proposed
licensee. The board shall fully consider and give substantial weight
to objections filed by private schools. If a license to produce
cannabis, hemp, and hemp products is issued despite the proximity of a
private school, the board shall state in a letter addressed to the
private school the board's reasons for issuing the license.
(11)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits the board, in its
discretion, from issuing a temporary license to produce cannabis, hemp,
and hemp products to an applicant to operate a production facility
during the period the application for the license is pending. The
board may establish a fee for a temporary license by rule.
(b) A temporary license issued by the board under this section
shall be for a period not to exceed one hundred twenty days. A
temporary license may be extended at the discretion of the board for
additional periods of sixty days upon payment of an additional fee and
upon compliance with all conditions required in this section.
(c) Refusal by the board to issue or extend a temporary license
shall not entitle the applicant to request a hearing. A temporary
license may be canceled or suspended summarily at any time if the board
determines that good cause for cancellation or suspension exists. For
the purpose of obtaining information relating to the issuance of a
temporary license, the board, or any person appointed by it in writing
for the purpose, may inspect the books and records of the holder of the
temporary license.
(d) Application for a temporary license shall be on such form as
the board shall prescribe. If an application for a temporary license
is withdrawn before issuance or is refused by the board, the fee that
accompanied such application shall be refunded in full.
(12) In determining whether to grant or deny a license to produce
cannabis, hemp, and hemp products or renewal of any license to produce
cannabis, hemp, and hemp products the board shall give substantial
weight to objections from an incorporated city or town or county
legislative authority based upon chronic illegal activity associated
with the applicant's operation of the premises proposed to be licensed
or the applicant's operation of any other licensed premises, or the
conduct of the applicant's employees, agents, or business contacts
inside or outside the licensed premises. "Chronic illegal activity"
means a pervasive pattern of activity that threatens the public health,
safety, and welfare of the city, town, or county including, but not
limited to, assaults, robberies, disturbances, disorderly conduct, or
other criminal law violations, or as documented in crime statistics,
police reports, emergency medical response data, calls for service,
field data, or similar records of a law enforcement agency for the
city, town, county, or any other municipal corporation or any state
agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 The action, order, or decision of the board
as to any denial of an application for the issuance or reissuance of a
producer's license or as to any revocation, suspension, or modification
of any producer's license shall be an adjudicative proceeding and
subject to the applicable provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(1) An opportunity for a hearing may be provided an applicant for
the issuance or reissuance of a producer's license prior to the
disposition of the application, and if no such opportunity for a prior
hearing is provided then an opportunity for a hearing to reconsider the
application must be provided the applicant.
(2) An opportunity for a hearing must be provided a licensed
producer prior to a cancellation or modification of any producer's
license and, except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,
prior to the suspension of any producer's license.
(3) No hearing shall be required until demanded by the applicant or
licensed producer.
(4) The board may summarily suspend a producer's license for a
period of up to one hundred eighty days without a prior hearing if it
finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively require
emergency action, and it incorporates a finding to that effect in its
order. Proceedings for cancellation or other action must be promptly
instituted and determined. An administrative law judge may extend the
summary suspension period for up to one calendar year in the event the
proceedings for cancellation or other action cannot be completed during
the initial one hundred eighty day period due to actions by the
licensed producer. The board's enforcement division shall complete a
preliminary staff investigation of the violation before requesting an
emergency suspension by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 The director of the board, and every
employee authorized by the director to issue licenses under this title
may administer any oath and take and receive any affidavit or
declaration required under this title or the regulations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 (1) For the purpose of carrying into effect
the provisions of this title according to their true intent or of
supplying any deficiency therein, the board may make such regulations
not inconsistent with this title as are deemed necessary or advisable.
The adoption of such rules shall be undertaken in accordance with the
procedures set forth in chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) Without thereby limiting the generality of the provisions
contained in subsection (1) of this section, the board is directed to
work in conjunction with the department of health and the department of
agriculture to adopt rules by December 31, 2012:
(a) Prescribing and regulating the necessary equipment, containers,
sanitary conditions, safety and security measures, production methods,
processing methods, and management of production facilities in which
cannabis, hemp, or hemp products are planted, grown, harvested,
processed, or packaged, prescribing the books and records to be kept
therein and the reports to be made thereon to the board, and providing
for inspection of production facilities and the books and records kept
therein;
(b) Prescribing the kinds, quantities, and forms of cannabis, hemp,
and hemp products which may be produced and offered for sale at
wholesale by licensed producers, regulating the manner in which the
same shall be produced, processed, packaged, sold, and disposed of, and
providing for the inspection, sampling, and testing of the same at any
time at the instance of the board;
(c) Prescribing labeling requirements and determining the manner in
which labeling shall be attached to every package of cannabis, hemp, or
hemp product packaged and offered for sale at wholesale by a licensed
producer under this title, including the prescribing of different
labels for different grades, strains, and THC concentrations of
cannabis;
(d) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the
manner, methods, and means by which, licensed producers shall deliver
cannabis, hemp, and hemp products within the state; and the time and
periods when, and the manner, methods, and means by which, cannabis,
hemp, and hemp products may lawfully be conveyed or carried within the
state;
(e) Seizing, confiscating, and destroying all cannabis, hemp, and
hemp products produced, processed, packaged, or offered for sale at
wholesale within this state which do not conform in all respects to the
standards prescribed by this title or the regulations of the board;
(f) Prescribing forms to be used for purposes of this title or
regulations adopted to carry out its purposes, and the terms and
conditions to be contained in producers' licenses issued under this
title, and the qualifications for receiving a producer's license issued
under this title, including a criminal history record information
check. The board may submit the criminal history record information
check to the Washington state patrol and to the identification division
of the federal bureau of investigation in order that these agencies may
search their records for prior arrests and convictions of the
individual or individuals who filled out the forms. The board shall
require fingerprinting of any applicant whose criminal history record
information check is submitted to the federal bureau of investigation;
(g) Prescribing application and renewal fees for producers'
licenses adequate to recapture the cost to the state of implementing,
maintaining, and enforcing those provisions of this title and related
regulations regarding producers' licenses, and prescribing the fees for
anything done or permitted to be done under the regulations;
(h) Prescribing the manner of giving and serving notices required
by this title or the regulations, where not otherwise provided for in
this title; and
(i) Prescribing the duties of the employees of the board regarding
implementation and enforcement of this title and regulations adopted to
carry out its purposes, and regulating their conduct in the discharge
of their duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 A licensed cannabis farmer who wishes to
produce, process, or package cannabis products intended for human
consumption must, in addition to complying with all requirements set
forth in this act and rules adopted to enforce and carry out its
purposes, comply with the requirements of the Washington food
processing act, chapter 69.07 RCW, and all rules adopted to enforce and
carry out that act's purposes.

CANNABIS REPACKAGING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 A state or contracted liquor store who
wishes to repackage cannabis products intended for human consumption
must, in addition to complying with all requirements set forth in this
act and rules adopted to enforce and carry out its purposes, comply
with the requirements of the Washington food processing act, chapter
69.07 RCW, and all rules adopted to enforce and carry out that act's
purposes.

CANNABIS PERMITS, LICENSES, AND ID'S
Sec. 31 RCW 66.20.150 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 41 are each amended
to read as follows:
No person shall purchase or attempt to purchase liquor or cannabis
under a permit which is suspended, or which has been canceled, or of
which he or she is not the holder.

Sec. 32 RCW 66.20.170 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
A card of identification may for the purpose of this title and for
the purpose of procuring liquor or cannabis, be accepted as an
identification card by any licensee or store employee and as evidence
of legal age of the person presenting such card, provided the licensee
or store employee complies with the conditions and procedures
prescribed herein and such regulations as may be made by the board.

Sec. 33 RCW 66.20.180 and 2005 c 151 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
A card of identification shall be presented by the holder thereof
upon request of any licensee, store employee, contract liquor store
manager, contract liquor store employee, peace officer, or enforcement
officer of the board for the purpose of aiding the licensee, store
employee, contract liquor store manager, contract liquor store
employee, peace officer, or enforcement officer of the board to
determine whether or not such person is of legal age to purchase liquor
or cannabis when such person desires to procure liquor or cannabis from
a licensed establishment or state liquor store or contract liquor
store.

Sec. 34 RCW 66.20.190 and 1981 1st ex.s. c 5 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
In addition to the presentation by the holder and verification by
the licensee or store employee of such card of identification, the
licensee or store employee who is still in doubt about the true age of
the holder shall require the person whose age may be in question to
sign a certification card and record an accurate description and serial
number of his or her card of identification thereon. Such statement
shall be upon a five-inch by eight-inch file card, which card shall be
filed alphabetically by the licensee or store employee at or before the
close of business on the day on which the statement is executed, in the
file box containing a suitable alphabetical index and the card shall be
subject to examination by any peace officer or agent or employee of the
board at all times. The certification card shall also contain in bold-face type a statement stating that the signer understands that
conviction for unlawful purchase of alcoholic beverages and cannabis or
misuse of the certification card may result in criminal penalties
including imprisonment or fine or both.

Sec. 35 RCW 66.20.200 and 2003 c 53 s 295 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for the owner of a card of identification
to transfer the card to any other person for the purpose of aiding such
person to procure alcoholic beverages or cannabis from any licensee or
store employee. Any person who shall permit his or her card of
identification to be used by another or transfer such card to another
for the purpose of aiding such transferee to obtain alcoholic beverages
or cannabis from a licensee or store employee or gain admission to a
premises or portion of a premises classified by the board as off-limits
to persons under twenty-one years of age, shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a
minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any
sentence requiring community restitution shall require not fewer than
twenty-five hours of community restitution.
(2) Any person not entitled thereto who unlawfully procures or has
issued or transferred to him or her a card of identification, and any
person who possesses a card of identification not issued to him or her,
and any person who makes any false statement on any certification card
required by RCW 66.20.190, to be signed by him or her, shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that
a minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any
sentence requiring community restitution shall require not fewer than
twenty-five hours of community restitution.

Sec. 36 RCW 66.20.210 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 9 are each
amended to read as follows:
No licensee or the agent or employee of the licensee, or store
employee, shall be prosecuted criminally or be sued in any civil action
for serving liquor or distributing cannabis to a person under legal age
to purchase liquor or cannabis if such person has presented a card of
identification in accordance with RCW 66.20.180, and has signed a
certification card as provided in RCW 66.20.190.
Such card in the possession of a licensee may be offered as a
defense in any hearing held by the board for serving liquor or
providing cannabis to the person who signed the card and may be
considered by the board as evidence that the licensee acted in good
faith.

PART IV
PUBLIC NUISANCE
Sec. 37 RCW 66.36.010 and 1939 c 172 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any ground, farm, room, house, building, boat, vehicle, structure,
or place, except premises licensed under this title, where liquor or
cannabis, as defined in this title, is manufactured, kept, sold,
bartered, exchanged, given away, furnished, or otherwise disposed of in
violation of the provisions of this title or of the laws of this state
relating to the growing, manufacture, importation, transportation,
possession, distribution, and sale of liquor or cannabis, and all
property kept in and used in maintaining such a place, are hereby
declared to be a common nuisance. The prosecuting attorney of the
county in which such nuisance is situated shall institute and maintain
an action in the superior court of such county in the name of the state
of Washington to abate and perpetually enjoin such nuisance. The
plaintiff shall not be required to give bond in such action, and
restraining orders, temporary injunctions and permanent injunctions may
be granted in said cause as in other injunction proceedings, and upon
final judgment against the defendant, such court may also order that
said ground, farm, room, house, building, boat, vehicle, structure, or
place, shall be closed for a period of one year; or until the owner,
lessee, tenant, or occupant thereof shall give bond with sufficient
surety, to be approved by the court making the order, in the penal sum
of not less than one thousand dollars payable to the state of
Washington, and conditioned that liquor or cannabis will not thereafter
be grown, manufactured, kept, sold, bartered, exchanged, given away,
furnished, or otherwise disposed of thereon or therein in violation of
the provisions of this title or of the laws of this state relating to
the growing, manufacture, importation, transportation, possession,
distribution, and sale of liquor and cannabis, and that he or she will
pay all fines, costs, and damages assessed against him or her for any
violation of this title or of the laws of this state relating to the
growing, manufacture, importation, transportation, possession,
distribution, and sale of liquor or cannabis. If any condition of such
bond be violated, the whole amount may be recovered as a penalty for
the use of the county wherein the premises are situated.
In all cases where any person has been convicted of a violation of
this title or the laws of this state relating to the growing,
manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution, and
sale of liquor or cannabis an action may be brought in the superior
court of the county in which the premises are situated, to abate as a
nuisance any real estate or other property involved in the commission
of said offense, and in any such action a certified copy of the record
of such conviction shall be admissible in evidence and prima facie
evidence that the ground, farm, room, house, building, boat, vehicle,
structure, or place against which such action is brought is a public
nuisance.

DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 A new section is added to chapter 43.23 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall work in conjunction with the liquor control
board:
(1) In prescribing methods of growing, conditions of sanitation,
standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of cannabis sold,
packaged, or handled by licensed cannabis farmers, the board, and
liquor stores;
(2) To license farmers to grow cannabis crops and sell, distribute,
and transport such cannabis to state liquor stores and state contracted
liquor stores;
(3) In establishing rules, regulations, permits, licenses, and fees
for cannabis farmers;
(4) In determining the quantity of cannabis and hemp products each
cannabis farmer may cultivate, grow, and store annually;
(5) In establishing rules and regulations for the cultivation of
cannabis for personal home use and industrial hemp.

CANNABIS STORAGE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 A new section is added to chapter 66.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this title shall prevent any person licensed to grow
cannabis from keeping cannabis in his or her warehouse or place of
business.

PART V
FUNDING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 (1) In addition to any required local sales
tax, there is hereby a state tax imposed on the sale of cannabis. The
state tax shall be set at a rate of fifteen percent per gram of
cannabis sold within Washington to any member of the public over the
age of twenty-one and to the Washington state liquor control board.
(2) All revenues collected from the state tax imposed under this
section shall be deposited in the cannabis revolving fund with the
state treasurer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 A new section is added to chapter 70.96A
RCW to read as follows:
To be eligible to receive its share of cannabis taxes and profits,
each city and county shall devote no less than two percent of its share
of cannabis taxes and profits to the support of an approved treatment
program for chemical dependency treatment authorized by RCW 70.96A.300
and the secretary.

CANNABIS REVOLVING FUND
NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 (1) There shall be a fund, known as the
"cannabis revolving fund" which shall consist of all license fees,
permit fees, penalties, forfeitures, taxes, and all other moneys,
income, or revenue received by the board from cannabis. The state
treasurer shall be custodian of the fund.
(2) Moneys in the cannabis revolving fund shall be distributed by
the board every three months. Seventy-seven percent of the funds shall
be transferred to the department of health, twenty percent of the funds
shall be transferred to the division of alcohol and substance abuse of
the department of social and health services for evidence-based
substance abuse treatment and prevention programs, two percent to the
department of agriculture for administration, and the remaining one
percent shall be retained by the board for administration.

PART VI
CRIMES, ENFORCEMENT, AND PENALTIES
Sec. 43 RCW 69.50.101 and 2010 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, definitions of terms
shall be as indicated where used in this chapter:
(a) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by
injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the
body of a patient or research subject by:
(1) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the
practitioner's authorized agent); or
(2) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the
presence of the practitioner.
(b) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at
the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does
not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or
employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.
(c) "Board" means the state board of pharmacy.
(d) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate
precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or
state laws, or federal or board rules, except the Cannabis plant and
all of its parts and derivatives.
(e)(1) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical
structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure
of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:
(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on
the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant,
depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of
a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or
(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual
represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially
similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule
I or II.
(2) The term does not include:
(i) a controlled substance;
(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug
application;
(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect
for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the
federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, to the extent
conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or
(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption
before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.
(f) "Deliver" or "delivery," means the actual or constructive
transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not
there is an agency relationship.
(g) "Department" means the department of health.
(h) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order
for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order,
the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging
necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.
(i) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.
(j) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a controlled substance.
(k) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.
(l) "Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in
the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the
official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any
supplement to them; (2) controlled substances intended for use in the
diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in
individuals or animals; (3) controlled substances (other than food)
intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of
individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended for use
as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this
subsection. The term does not include devices or their components,
parts, or accessories.
(m) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement
administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its
successor agency.
(n) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:
(1) that the state board of pharmacy has found to be and by rule
designates as being the principal compound commonly used, or produced
primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled substance;
(2) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be
used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and
(3) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit
the manufacture of the controlled substance.
(o) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in RCW 69.50.101(((r)))
(q)(5), 69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and 69.50.206(b)(4), the term
includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and
69.50.210(c) the term includes any positional isomer; and in RCW
69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and 69.50.208(a) the term includes any
positional or geometric isomer.
(p) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation,
compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance,
either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of
natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by
a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any
packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of
its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding,
packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled
substance:
(1) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's
administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of
the practitioner's professional practice; or
(2) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent
under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an
incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(q) (("Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant
Cannabis, whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin
extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture,
salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or
resin. The term does not include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber
produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant,
any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted
therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant
which is incapable of germination.
(r))) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced
directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable
origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a
combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:
(1) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium
derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers,
whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not
include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.
(2) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate,
including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers,
esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters,
ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.
(3) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.
(4) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves
from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their
salts have been removed.
(5) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.
(6) Cocaine base.
(7) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer
thereof.
(8) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity
of any substance referred to in subparagraphs (1) through (7).
(((s))) (r) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being
capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or
addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium, substances
derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The
term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled
under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes
the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.
(((t))) (s) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver
somniferum L., except its seeds.
(((u))) (t) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government,
governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial
entity.
(((v))) (u) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the
opium poppy, after mowing.
(((w))) (v) "Practitioner" means:
(1) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant
under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.57 RCW; an osteopathic physician assistant under chapter
18.57A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.57A.020 subject to any
limitations in RCW 18.57A.040; an optometrist licensed under chapter
18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010
subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter
18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW;
a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced
registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under
chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW
who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW
18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific
investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise
permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to
distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a
controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or
research in this state.
(2) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered,
or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with
respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of
professional practice or research in this state.
(3) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a
physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a
dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and
surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, or a
veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any state of
the United States.
(((x))) (w) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances
issued by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of
Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his
or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.
(((y))) (x) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting,
cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.
(((z))) (y) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.
(((aa))) (z) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means
a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the
Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession
subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.
(((bb))) (aa) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully
possesses a controlled substance for the individual's own use or for
the use of a member of the individual's household or for administering
to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's
household.
(((cc))) (bb) "Electronic communication of prescription
information" means the communication of prescription information by
computer, or the transmission of an exact visual image of a
prescription by facsimile, or other electronic means for original
prescription information or prescription refill information for a
Schedule III-V controlled substance between an authorized practitioner
and a pharmacy or the transfer of prescription information for a
controlled substance from one pharmacy to another pharmacy.

Sec. 44 RCW 69.50.201 and 1998 c 245 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(a) The state board of pharmacy shall enforce this chapter and may
add substances to or delete or reschedule substances listed in RCW
69.50.204, 69.50.206, 69.50.208, 69.50.210, or 69.50.212 pursuant to
the procedures of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(1) In making a determination regarding a substance, the board
shall consider the following:
(i) the actual or relative potential for abuse;
(ii) the scientific evidence of its pharmacological effect, if
known;
(iii) the state of current scientific knowledge regarding the
substance;
(iv) the history and current pattern of abuse;
(v) the scope, duration, and significance of abuse;
(vi) the risk to the public health;
(vii) the potential of the substance to produce psychic or
physiological dependence liability; and
(viii) whether the substance is an immediate precursor of a
controlled substance.
(2) The board may consider findings of the federal Food and Drug
Administration or the Drug Enforcement Administration as prima facie
evidence relating to one or more of the determinative factors.
(b) After considering the factors enumerated in subsection (a) of
this section, the board shall make findings with respect thereto and
adopt and cause to be published a rule controlling the substance upon
finding the substance has a potential for abuse.
(c) The board, without regard to the findings required by
subsection (a) of this section or RCW 69.50.203, 69.50.205, 69.50.207,
69.50.209, and 69.50.211 or the procedures prescribed by subsections
(a) and (b) of this section, may place an immediate precursor in the
same schedule in which the controlled substance of which it is an
immediate precursor is placed or in any other schedule. If the board
designates a substance as an immediate precursor, substances that are
precursors of the controlled precursor are not subject to control
solely because they are precursors of the controlled precursor.
(d) If a substance other than the Cannabis plant or any of its
parts or derivatives is designated, rescheduled, or deleted as a
controlled substance under federal law, the board shall similarly
control the substance under this chapter after the expiration of thirty
days from the date of publication in the federal register of a final
order designating the substance as a controlled substance or
rescheduling or deleting the substance or from the date of issuance of
an order of temporary scheduling under Section 508 of the federal
Dangerous Drug Diversion Control Act of 1984, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 811(h),
unless within that thirty-day period, the board or an interested party
objects to inclusion, rescheduling, temporary scheduling, or deletion.
If no objection is made, the board shall adopt and cause to be
published, without the necessity of making determinations or findings
as required by subsection (a) of this section or RCW 69.50.203,
69.50.205, 69.50.207, 69.50.209, and 69.50.211, a final rule, for which
notice of proposed rule making is omitted, designating, rescheduling,
temporarily scheduling, or deleting the substance. If an objection is
made, the board shall make a determination with respect to the
designation, rescheduling, or deletion of the substance as provided by
subsection (a) of this section. Upon receipt of an objection to
inclusion, rescheduling, or deletion under this chapter by the board,
the board shall publish notice of the receipt of the objection, and
control under this chapter is stayed until the board adopts a rule as
provided by subsection (a) of this section.
(e) The board, by rule and without regard to the requirements of
subsection (a) of this section, may schedule a substance other than the
Cannabis plant or any of its parts or derivatives in Schedule I
regardless of whether the substance is substantially similar to a
controlled substance in Schedule I or II if the board finds that
scheduling of the substance on an emergency basis is necessary to avoid
an imminent hazard to the public safety and the substance is not
included in any other schedule or no exemption or approval is in effect
for the substance under Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug, and
Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355. Upon receipt of notice under RCW
69.50.214, the board shall initiate scheduling of the controlled
substance analog on an emergency basis pursuant to this subsection.
The scheduling of a substance under this subsection expires one year
after the adoption of the scheduling rule. With respect to the finding
of an imminent hazard to the public safety, the board shall consider
whether the substance has been scheduled on a temporary basis under
federal law or factors set forth in subsection (a)(1)(iv), (v), and
(vi) of this section, and may also consider clandestine importation,
manufacture, or distribution, and, if available, information concerning
the other factors set forth in subsection (a)(1) of this section. A
rule may not be adopted under this subsection until the board initiates
a rule-making proceeding under subsection (a) of this section with
respect to the substance. A rule adopted under this subsection must be
vacated upon the conclusion of the rule-making proceeding initiated
under subsection (a) of this section with respect to the substance.
(((g) [(f)])) (f) Authority to control under this section does not
extend to distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, cannabis, or tobacco
as those terms are defined or used in Titles 66 and 26 RCW and in this
act.

Sec. 45 RCW 69.50.204 and 2010 c 177 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless specifically excepted by state or federal law or regulation
or more specifically included in another schedule, the following
controlled substances are listed in Schedule I:
(a) Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters,
ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers whenever the
existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible
within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide);
(2) Acetylmethadol;
(3) Allylprodine;
(4) Alphacetylmethadol, except levo-alphacetylmethadol, also known
as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM;
(5) Alphameprodine;
(6) Alphamethadol;
(7) Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl) ethyl-4-piperidyl] propionanilide); (1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido) piperidine);
(8) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(9) Benzethidine;
(10) Betacetylmethadol;
(11) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(12) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl, some trade or other names: N-[1-(2-hydrox-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide;
(13) Betameprodine;
(14) Betamethadol;
(15) Betaprodine;
(16) Clonitazene;
(17) Dextromoramide;
(18) Diampromide;
(19) Diethylthiambutene;
(20) Difenoxin;
(21) Dimenoxadol;
(22) Dimepheptanol;
(23) Dimethylthiambutene;
(24) Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
(25) Dipipanone;
(26) Ethylmethylthiambutene;
(27) Etonitazene;
(28) Etoxeridine;
(29) Furethidine;
(30) Hydroxypethidine;
(31) Ketobemidone;
(32) Levomoramide;
(33) Levophenacylmorphan;
(34) 3-Methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylprop anamide);
(35) 3-Methylthiofentanyl (N-[(3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(36) Morpheridine;
(37) MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);
(38) Noracymethadol;
(39) Norlevorphanol;
(40) Normethadone;
(41) Norpipanone;
(42) Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl] propanamide);
(43) PEPAP(1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine);
(44) Phenadoxone;
(45) Phenampromide;
(46) Phenomorphan;
(47) Phenoperidine;
(48) Piritramide;
(49) Proheptazine;
(50) Properidine;
(51) Propiram;
(52) Racemoramide;
(53) Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-propanaminde);
(54) Tilidine;
(55) Trimeperidine.
(b) Opium derivatives. Unless specifically excepted or unless
listed in another schedule, any of the following opium derivatives,
including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the
existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible
within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Acetorphine;
(2) Acetyldihydrocodeine;
(3) Benzylmorphine;
(4) Codeine methylbromide;
(5) Codeine-N-Oxide;
(6) Cyprenorphine;
(7) Desomorphine;
(8) Dihydromorphine;
(9) Drotebanol;
(10) Etorphine, except hydrochloride salt;
(11) Heroin;
(12) Hydromorphinol;
(13) Methyldesorphine;
(14) Methyldihydromorphine;
(15) Morphine methylbromide;
(16) Morphine methylsulfonate;
(17) Morphine-N-Oxide;
(18) Myrophine;
(19) Nicocodeine;
(20) Nicomorphine;
(21) Normorphine;
(22) Pholcodine;
(23) Thebacon.
(c) Hallucinogenic substances. Unless specifically excepted or
unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or
preparation which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic
substances, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers
whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation. For the purposes of
this subsection only, the term "isomer" includes the optical, position,
and geometric isomers:
(1) Alpha-ethyltryptamine: Some trade or other names:
Etryptamine; monase; a-ethyl-1H-indole-3-ethanamine; 3-(2-aminobutyl)
indole; a-ET; and AET;
(2) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine: Some trade or other names:
4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; 4-bromo-2,5-DMA;
(3) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine: Some trade or other
names: 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-1-aminoethane; alpha-desmethyl
DOB; 2C-B, nexus;
(4) 2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine: Some trade or other names: 2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; 2,5-DMA;
(5) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine (DOET);
(6) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine: Other name:
2C-T-7;
(7) 4-methoxyamphetamine: Some trade or other names: 4-methoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; paramethoxyamphetamine, PMA;
(8) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine;
(9) 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine: Some trade and other
names: 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; "DOM"; and
"STP";
(10) 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
(11) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);
(12) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine, also known as N-ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, MDE, MDEA;
(13) N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine also known as
N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine,N-hydroxy MDA;
(14) 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine;
(15) Alpha-methyltryptamine: Other name: AMT;
(16) Bufotenine: Some trade or other names: 3-(beta-Dimethylaminoethyl)-5-hydroxindole; 3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl)-5-indolol;
N, N-dimethylserotonin; 5-hydroxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine; mappine;
(17) Diethyltryptamine: Some trade or other names: N,N-Diethyltryptamine; DET;
(18) Dimethyltryptamine: Some trade or other names: DMT;
(19) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine: Other name: 5-MeO-DIPT;
(20) Ibogaine: Some trade or other names: 7-Ethyl-6,6
beta,7,8,9,10,12,13,-octahydro-2-methoxy-6,9-methano-5H-pyndo (1',2'
1,2) azepino (5,4-b) indole; Tabernanthe iboga;
(21) Lysergic acid diethylamide;
(22) ((Marihuana or marijuana;
(23))) Mescaline;
(((24))) (23) Parahexyl-7374: Some trade or other names: 3-Hexyl-1-hydroxy-7, 8, 9, 10-tetrahydro-6, 6, 9-trimethyl-6H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran; synhexyl;
(((25))) (24) Peyote, meaning all parts of the plant presently
classified botanically as Lophophora Williamsii Lemaire, whether
growing or not, the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of such
plant, and every compound, manufacture, salts, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of such plant, its seeds, or extracts; (interprets 21
U.S.C. Sec. 812 (c), Schedule I (c)(12));
(((26))) (25) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
(((27))) (26) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
(((28))) (27) Psilocybin;
(((29))) (28) Psilocyn;
(((30) Tetrahydrocannabinols, meaning tetrahydrocannabinols
naturally contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis (cannabis plant),
as well as synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the
plant, or in the resinous extractives of Cannabis, species, and/or
synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar
chemical structure and pharmacological activity such as the following:
(i) 1 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical
isomers, excluding tetrahydrocannabinol in sesame oil and encapsulated
in a soft gelatin capsule in a drug product approved by the United
States Food and Drug Administration;
(ii) 6 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical
isomers;
(iii) 3,4 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical
isomers;
(Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally
standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical
designation of atomic positions covered.)
(31))) (29) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine: Some trade or
other names: N-ethyl-1phenylcyclohexalymine, (1-phenylcyclohexl)
ethylamine; N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)ethylamine; cyclohexamine; PCE;
(((32))) (30) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine: Some trade or
other names: 1-(1-phencyclohexyl)pyrrolidine; PCPy; PHP;
(((33))) (31) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine: Some trade or
other names: 1-(1-[2-thenyl]-cyclohexly)-pipendine; 2-thienylanalog of
phencyclidine; TPCP; TCP;
(((34))) (32) 1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrrolidine: A trade or
other name is TCPy.
(d) Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant
effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation.
(1) Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid: Some other names include GHB;
gamma-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutanoic acid;
sodium oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate;
(2) Mecloqualone;
(3) Methaqualone.
(e) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant
effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers:
(1) Aminorex: Some other names: aminoxaphen; 2-amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline; or 4, 5-dihydro-5-phenly-2-oxazolamine;
(2) N-Benzylpiperazine: Some other names: BZP,1-benzylpiperazine;
(3) Cathinone, also known as 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone,
alpha-aminopropiophenone, 2-aminopropiophenone and norephedrone;
(4) Fenethylline;
(5) Methcathinone: Some other names: 2-(methylamino)-propiophenone; alpha-(methylamino)propiophenone; 2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpropan-1-one; alpha-N-methylaminopropiophenone;
monomethylpropion; ephedrone; N-methylcathinone; methylcathinone; AL-464; AL-422; AL-463 and UR1432, its salts, optical isomers, and salts
of optical isomers;
(6) (+-)cis-4-methylaminorex ((+-)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine);
(7) N-ethylamphetamine;
(8) N,N-dimethylamphetamine: Some trade or other names: N,N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine; N,N-alpha-trimethylphenoethylene.
The controlled substances in this section may be added,
rescheduled, or deleted as provided for in RCW 69.50.201.

Sec. 46 RCW 69.50.4013 and 2003 c 53 s 334 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to possess a controlled substance
unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a
valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the
course of his or her professional practice, or except as otherwise
authorized by this chapter.
(2) ((Except as provided in RCW 69.50.4014,)) Any person who
violates this section is guilty of a class C felony punishable under
chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 47 RCW 69.50.410 and 2003 c 53 s 342 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as authorized by this chapter it is a class C felony for
any person to sell for profit any controlled substance or counterfeit
substance classified in Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204((, except leaves and
flowering tops of marihuana)).
For the purposes of this section only, the following words and
phrases shall have the following meanings:
(a) "To sell" means the passing of title and possession of a
controlled substance from the seller to the buyer for a price whether
or not the price is paid immediately or at a future date.
(b) "For profit" means the obtaining of anything of value in
exchange for a controlled substance.
(c) "Price" means anything of value.
(2)(a) Any person convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of
this section shall receive a sentence of not more than five years in a
correctional facility of the department of social and health services
for the first offense.
(b) Any person convicted on a second or subsequent cause, the sale
having transpired after prosecution and conviction on the first cause,
of subsection (1) of this section shall receive a mandatory sentence of
five years in a correctional facility of the department of social and
health services and no judge of any court shall suspend or defer the
sentence imposed for the second or subsequent violation of subsection
(1) of this section.
(3)(a) Any person convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of
this section by selling heroin shall receive a mandatory sentence of
two years in a correctional facility of the department of social and
health services and no judge of any court shall suspend or defer the
sentence imposed for such violation.
(b) Any person convicted on a second or subsequent sale of heroin,
the sale having transpired after prosecution and conviction on the
first cause of the sale of heroin shall receive a mandatory sentence of
ten years in a correctional facility of the department of social and
health services and no judge of any court shall suspend or defer the
sentence imposed for this second or subsequent violation: PROVIDED,
That the indeterminate sentence review board under RCW 9.95.040 shall
not reduce the minimum term imposed for a violation under this
subsection.
(4) Whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an
offender serving a sentence under this section may be granted an
extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW
9.94A.728(((4))) (3).
(5) In addition to the sentences provided in subsection (2) of this
section, any person convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of this
section shall be fined in an amount calculated to at least eliminate
any and all proceeds or profits directly or indirectly gained by such
person as a result of sales of controlled substances in violation of
the laws of this or other states, or the United States, up to the
amount of five hundred thousand dollars on each count.
(6) Any person, addicted to the use of controlled substances, who
voluntarily applies to the department of social and health services for
the purpose of participating in a rehabilitation program approved by
the department for addicts of controlled substances shall be immune
from prosecution for subsection (1) offenses unless a filing of an
information or indictment against such person for a violation of
subsection (1) of this section is made prior to his or her voluntary
participation in the program of the department of social and health
services. All applications for immunity under this section shall be
sent to the department of social and health services in Olympia. It
shall be the duty of the department to stamp each application received
pursuant to this section with the date and time of receipt.
(7) This section shall not apply to offenses defined and punishable
under the provisions of RCW 69.50.401 through 69.50.4015.

Sec. 48 RCW 69.50.435 and 2003 c 53 s 346 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person who violates RCW 69.50.401 by manufacturing,
selling, delivering, or possessing with the intent to manufacture,
sell, or deliver a controlled substance listed under RCW 69.50.401 or
who violates RCW 69.50.410 by selling for profit any controlled
substance or counterfeit substance classified in schedule I, RCW
69.50.204((, except leaves and flowering tops of marihuana to a
person)):
(a) In a school;
(b) On a school bus;
(c) Within one thousand feet of a school bus route stop designated
by the school district;
(d) Within one thousand feet of the perimeter of the school
grounds;
(e) In a public park;
(f) In a public housing project designated by a local governing
authority as a drug-free zone;
(g) On a public transit vehicle;
(h) In a public transit stop shelter;
(i) At a civic center designated as a drug-free zone by the local
governing authority; or
(j) Within one thousand feet of the perimeter of a facility
designated under (i) of this subsection, if the local governing
authority specifically designates the one thousand foot perimeter
may be punished by a fine of up to twice the fine otherwise authorized
by this chapter, but not including twice the fine authorized by RCW
69.50.406, or by imprisonment of up to twice the imprisonment otherwise
authorized by this chapter, but not including twice the imprisonment
authorized by RCW 69.50.406, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
The provisions of this section shall not operate to more than double
the fine or imprisonment otherwise authorized by this chapter for an
offense.
(2) It is not a defense to a prosecution for a violation of this
section that the person was unaware that the prohibited conduct took
place while in a school or school bus or within one thousand feet of
the school or school bus route stop, in a public park, in a public
housing project designated by a local governing authority as a drug-free zone, on a public transit vehicle, in a public transit stop
shelter, at a civic center designated as a drug-free zone by the local
governing authority, or within one thousand feet of the perimeter of a
facility designated under subsection (1)(i) of this section, if the
local governing authority specifically designates the one thousand foot
perimeter.
(3) It is not a defense to a prosecution for a violation of this
section or any other prosecution under this chapter that persons under
the age of eighteen were not present in the school, the school bus, the
public park, the public housing project designated by a local governing
authority as a drug-free zone, or the public transit vehicle, or at the
school bus route stop, the public transit vehicle stop shelter, at a
civic center designated as a drug-free zone by the local governing
authority, or within one thousand feet of the perimeter of a facility
designated under subsection (1)(i) of this section, if the local
governing authority specifically designates the one thousand foot
perimeter at the time of the offense or that school was not in session.
(4) It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution for a violation
of this section that the prohibited conduct took place entirely within
a private residence, that no person under eighteen years of age or
younger was present in such private residence at any time during the
commission of the offense, and that the prohibited conduct did not
involve delivering, manufacturing, selling, or possessing with the
intent to manufacture, sell, or deliver any controlled substance in RCW
69.50.401 for profit. The affirmative defense established in this
section shall be proved by the defendant by a preponderance of the
evidence. This section shall not be construed to establish an
affirmative defense with respect to a prosecution for an offense
defined in any other section of this chapter.
(5) In a prosecution under this section, a map produced or
reproduced by any municipality, school district, county, transit
authority engineer, or public housing authority for the purpose of
depicting the location and boundaries of the area on or within one
thousand feet of any property used for a school, school bus route stop,
public park, public housing project designated by a local governing
authority as a drug-free zone, public transit vehicle stop shelter, or
a civic center designated as a drug-free zone by a local governing
authority, or a true copy of such a map, shall under proper
authentication, be admissible and shall constitute prima facie evidence
of the location and boundaries of those areas if the governing body of
the municipality, school district, county, or transit authority has
adopted a resolution or ordinance approving the map as the official
location and record of the location and boundaries of the area on or
within one thousand feet of the school, school bus route stop, public
park, public housing project designated by a local governing authority
as a drug-free zone, public transit vehicle stop shelter, or civic
center designated as a drug-free zone by a local governing authority.
Any map approved under this section or a true copy of the map shall be
filed with the clerk of the municipality or county, and shall be
maintained as an official record of the municipality or county. This
section shall not be construed as precluding the prosecution from
introducing or relying upon any other evidence or testimony to
establish any element of the offense. This section shall not be
construed as precluding the use or admissibility of any map or diagram
other than the one which has been approved by the governing body of a
municipality, school district, county, transit authority, or public
housing authority if the map or diagram is otherwise admissible under
court rule.
(6) As used in this section the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(a) "School" has the meaning under RCW 28A.150.010 or 28A.150.020.
The term "school" also includes a private school approved under RCW
28A.195.010;
(b) "School bus" means a school bus as defined by the
superintendent of public instruction by rule which is owned and
operated by any school district and all school buses which are
privately owned and operated under contract or otherwise with any
school district in the state for the transportation of students. The
term does not include buses operated by common carriers in the urban
transportation of students such as transportation of students through
a municipal transportation system;
(c) "School bus route stop" means a school bus stop as designated
by a school district;
(d) "Public park" means land, including any facilities or
improvements on the land, that is operated as a park by the state or a
local government;
(e) "Public transit vehicle" means any motor vehicle, streetcar,
train, trolley vehicle, or any other device, vessel, or vehicle which
is owned or operated by a transit authority and which is used for the
purpose of carrying passengers on a regular schedule;
(f) "Transit authority" means a city, county, or state
transportation system, transportation authority, public transportation
benefit area, public transit authority, or metropolitan municipal
corporation within the state that operates public transit vehicles;
(g) "Stop shelter" means a passenger shelter designated by a
transit authority;
(h) "Civic center" means a publicly owned or publicly operated
place or facility used for recreational, educational, or cultural
activities;
(i) "Public housing project" means the same as "housing project" as
defined in RCW 35.82.020.

Sec. 49 RCW 66.44.010 and 1998 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All county and municipal peace officers are hereby charged with
the duty of investigating and prosecuting all violations of this title,
and the penal laws of this state relating to (a) the manufacture,
importation, transportation, possession, distribution, and sale of
liquor, and (b) the cultivation, transportation, possession,
distribution, importation, and sale of cannabis. All fines imposed for
violations of this title and the penal laws of this state relating to
the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution,
and sale of liquor and the cultivation, transportation, possession,
distribution, importation, and sale of cannabis shall belong to the
county, city, or town wherein the court imposing the fine is located,
and shall be placed in the general fund for payment of the salaries of
those engaged in the enforcement of the provisions of this title and
the penal laws of this state relating to the cultivation,
transportation, possession, distribution, importation, and sale of
cannabis, or the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession,
distribution, and sale of liquor: PROVIDED, That all fees, fines,
forfeitures, and penalties collected or assessed by a district court
because of the violation of a state law shall be remitted as provided
in chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is later amended.
(2) In addition to any and all other powers granted, the board
shall have the power to enforce the penal provisions of this title and
the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture, importation,
transportation, possession, distribution, and sale of liquor and the
cultivation, transportation, possession, distribution, importation, and
sale of cannabis.
(3) In addition to the other duties under this section, the board
shall enforce chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW.
(4) The board may appoint and employ, assign to duty and fix the
compensation of, officers to be designated as liquor enforcement
officers. Such liquor enforcement officers shall have the power, under
the supervision of the board, to enforce the penal provisions of this
title and the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture,
importation, transportation, possession, distribution, and sale of
liquor and the cultivation, transportation, possession, distribution,
importation, and sale of cannabis. They shall have the power and
authority to serve and execute all warrants and process of law issued
by the courts in enforcing the penal provisions of this title or of any
penal law of this state relating to the manufacture, importation,
transportation, possession, distribution, and sale of liquor and the
cultivation, transportation, possession, distribution, importation, and
sale of cannabis, and the provisions of chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW.
They shall have the power to arrest without a warrant any person or
persons found in the act of violating any of the penal provisions of
this title or of any penal law of this state relating to the
manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution, and
sale of liquor, the cultivation, transportation, possession,
distribution, importation, and sale of cannabis, and the provisions of
chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW.

Sec. 50 RCW 10.31.100 and 2010 c 274 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has
committed or is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest
the person without a warrant. A police officer may arrest a person
without a warrant for committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
only when the offense is committed in the presence of the officer,
except as provided in subsections (1) through (10) of this section.
(1) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor, involving physical harm or threats of harm to any person
or property or the unlawful taking of property ((or involving the use
or possession of cannabis)), or involving the acquisition, possession,
or consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one years
under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070
or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(2) A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that:
(a) An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge
under RCW 26.44.063, or chapter 7.90, 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26,
26.50, or 74.34 RCW restraining the person and the person has violated
the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or threats of
violence, or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or
entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting
the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly remaining within,
a specified distance of a location or, in the case of an order issued
under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other restrictions or conditions upon
the person; or
(b) A foreign protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has
been issued of which the person under restraint has knowledge and the
person under restraint has violated a provision of the foreign
protection order prohibiting the person under restraint from contacting
or communicating with another person, or excluding the person under
restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or
prohibiting the person from knowingly coming within, or knowingly
remaining within, a specified distance of a location, or a violation of
any provision for which the foreign protection order specifically
indicates that a violation will be a crime; or
(c) The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding
four hours has assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and the officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has
occurred; (ii) an assault has occurred which has resulted in bodily
injury to the victim, whether the injury is observable by the
responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical action has
occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to fear
imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical
pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the
officer has probable cause to believe that family or household members
have assaulted each other, the officer is not required to arrest both
persons. The officer shall arrest the person whom the officer believes
to be the primary physical aggressor. In making this determination,
the officer shall make every reasonable effort to consider: (i) The
intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW 10.99.010;
(ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats
creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of domestic
violence of each person involved, including whether the conduct was
part of an ongoing pattern of abuse.
(3) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of any of the
following traffic laws shall have the authority to arrest the person:
(a) RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car
or other property;
(b) RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;
(c) RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or
racing of vehicles;
(d) RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;
(e) RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while
operator's license is suspended or revoked;
(f) RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a
negligent manner.
(4) A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor
vehicle accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in
the accident if the officer has probable cause to believe that the
driver has committed in connection with the accident a violation of any
traffic law or regulation.
(5) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing a violation of RCW 79A.60.040
shall have the authority to arrest the person.
(6) An officer may act upon the request of a law enforcement
officer in whose presence a traffic infraction was committed, to stop,
detain, arrest, or issue a notice of traffic infraction to the driver
who is believed to have committed the infraction. The request by the
witnessing officer shall give an officer the authority to take
appropriate action under the laws of the state of Washington.
(7) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has committed or is committing any act of indecent exposure, as
defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may arrest the person.
(8) A police officer may arrest and take into custody, pending
release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, a person
without a warrant when the officer has probable cause to believe that
an order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under
chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated the terms of that order.
(9) Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person has, within twenty-four hours of the alleged violation,
committed a violation of RCW 9A.50.020 may arrest such person.
(10) A police officer having probable cause to believe that a
person illegally possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm or
other dangerous weapon on private or public elementary or secondary
school premises shall have the authority to arrest the person.
For purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).
(11) Except as specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4),
and (6) of this section, nothing in this section extends or otherwise
affects the powers of arrest prescribed in Title 46 RCW.
(12) No police officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for
making an arrest pursuant to subsection (2) or (8) of this section if
the police officer acts in good faith and without malice.

Sec. 51 RCW 66.44.040 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 57 are each amended
to read as follows:
In describing the offense respecting the sale, or keeping for sale
or other disposal, of liquor or cannabis, or the having, keeping,
giving, purchasing, or consumption of liquor or cannabis in any
information, summons, conviction, warrant, or proceeding under this
title, it shall be sufficient to simply state the sale, or keeping for
sale or disposal, having, keeping, giving, purchasing, or consumption
of liquor or cannabis, without stating the name or kind of such liquor
or cannabis or the price thereof, or to whom it was sold or disposed
of, or by whom consumed, or from whom it was purchased or received; and
it shall not be necessary to state the quantity of liquor so sold, kept
for sale, disposed of, had, kept, given, purchased, or consumed, except
in the case of offenses where the quantity is essential, and then it
shall be sufficient to allege the sale or disposal of more or less than
such quantity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 52 No licensed seller or employee or agent of
a licensed seller shall consume cannabis, or allow any person to open
a package containing cannabis or consume any cannabis, on shop
premises. A violation of this section is a class 3 civil infraction as
provided for in chapter 7.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 53 (1) It is unlawful to open a package
containing cannabis or consume cannabis in a public place in a manner
that presents a reasonably foreseeable risk that another person would
see and be able to identify the substance contained in the package or
being consumed as cannabis.
(2) A violation of this section is a class 3 civil infraction
punishable according to chapter 7.80 RCW.

SELLING AND PURCHASING OF CANNABIS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 54 Every person who shall sell or offer for
sale cannabis, without an official government stamp or seal attached
thereto, or who shall operate a cannabis business without a valid
license is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof
shall upon his or her first conviction be fined not less than five
hundred dollars and confined in the county jail not less than six
months, and upon second and subsequent conviction shall be fined not
less than one thousand dollars and confined in the county jail not less
than one year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 55 Any person that buys cannabis from any
person other than the board, a state or contract liquor store, or some
person authorized by the board to sell cannabis is guilty of a
misdemeanor.

Sec. 56 RCW 66.44.170 and 1955 c 289 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any person who keeps or possesses liquor or cannabis upon his or
her person or in any place, or on premises conducted or maintained by
him or her as principal or agent with the intent to sell it contrary to
provisions of this title, shall be guilty of a violation of this title.
The possession of liquor or cannabis by the principal or agent on
premises conducted or maintained, under federal authority, as a retail
dealer in liquors or cannabis, shall be prima facie evidence of the
intent to sell liquor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 57 Except in the case of cannabis administered
by a physician or dentist or sold upon a prescription in accordance
with the provisions of this title, no person shall procure or supply,
or assist directly or indirectly in procuring or supplying, cannabis
for or to anyone whose permit or license is suspended or has been
canceled.

Sec. 58 RCW 66.44.240 and 1983 c 165 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every person engaged wholly or in part in the business of carrying
passengers for hire, and every agent, servant, or employee of such
person, who knowingly permits any person to smoke or consume cannabis
or drink any intoxicating liquor in any public conveyance, except in
the compartment where such liquor is sold or served under the authority
of a license lawfully issued, is guilty of a misdemeanor. This section
does not apply to a public conveyance that is commercially chartered
for group use or a for-hire vehicle licensed under city, county, or
state law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 59 Every person who smokes or consumes
cannabis in any public conveyance is guilty of a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 60 (1) It is unlawful for any person to sell,
give, or otherwise supply cannabis to any person under the age of
twenty-one years or permit any person under that age to consume liquor
or to consume or smoke cannabis on his or her premises or on any
premises under his or her control. For the purposes of this
subsection, "premises" includes real property, houses, buildings, and
other structures, and motor vehicles and watercraft. A violation of
this subsection is a gross misdemeanor punishable as provided for in
chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2) It is unlawful for any person under the age of twenty-one years
to possess, consume, or otherwise acquire any cannabis.
(a) A violation of this subsection is a class I civil infraction
punishable as provided for in chapter 7.80 RCW if the violation
involves less than fifteen plants or less than one pound of cannabis.
(b) A violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor
punishable under RCW 9A.20.021 if the violation involves fifteen or
more plants or one pound or more of cannabis.
(c) In addition to the penalties set forth in (a) and (b) of this
subsection, the court shall require each person under the age of
twenty-one years to participate in alcohol and drug information school.
(3) This section does not apply to cannabis given for medicinal
purposes to a person under the age of twenty-one years by a parent,
guardian, physician, or dentist.
(4) This section does not apply to cannabis given to a person under
the age of twenty-one years when such cannabis is being used in
connection with religious services and the amount consumed is the
minimal amount necessary for the religious service.
(5) Conviction or forfeiture of bail for a violation of this
section by a person under the age of twenty-one years at the time of
such conviction or forfeiture shall not be a disqualification of that
person to acquire a license to cultivate or sell cannabis after that
person has attained the age of twenty-one years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 61 A new section is added to chapter 66.44 RCW
to read as follows:
Every person under the age of twenty-one years who purchases or
attempts to purchase cannabis shall be guilty of a class I civil
infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 62 The Washington state liquor control board
shall furnish notification of any hearing or hearings held, wherein any
licensee or his or her employee is found to have sold cannabis to a
minor, to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the sale took
place, upon which the prosecuting attorney may formulate charges
against said minor or minors for such cannabis violation of section 60
of this act as may appear.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 63 Every person under the age of twenty-one
years who represents his or her age as being twenty-one or more years
for the purpose of purchasing cannabis or securing admission to or
remaining in any area classified by the board as off-limits to such a
person is guilty of a class I civil infraction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 64 Any person who transfers in any manner an
identification of age to a minor for the purpose of permitting such
minor to obtain cannabis shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as
provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of two hundred
fifty dollars shall be imposed and any sentence requiring community
restitution shall require not fewer than twenty-five hours of community
restitution: PROVIDED, That corroborative testimony of a witness other
than the minor shall be a condition precedent to conviction.

HOME GROWN CANNABIS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 65 A new section is added to chapter 66.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for a person not licensed as a valid cannabis
farmer under section 25 of this act to produce cannabis except in
compliance with the following requirements:
(a) The person is twenty-one years of age or older;
(b) The cannabis is produced in the home or yard that is not
visible from any public place, excluding air space;
(c) The person possesses no more than one cannabis garden;
(d) The homegrown cannabis garden or the square footage of the
total combined plant canopy area does not exceed fifty square feet in
size;
(e) The cannabis or hemp is produced on property owned or lawfully
leased by the person producing it;
(f) Any useable cannabis gratuitously transferred from the person
who owns, leases, or otherwise exerts control over the real property on
which the cannabis or hemp is being produced does not exceed one ounce
in weight; and
(g) The cannabis or hemp plants are not produced in a manner or
place that a reasonable person would know to be open to the view of a
member of the general public positioned in or moving through a public
place.
(2) A violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor offense.

INTRASTATE TRANSPORTING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 66 A new section is added to chapter 66.44 RCW
to read as follows:
A person is guilty of intrastate transporting of cannabis if he or
she transports illegal cannabis within the state that involves fifteen
or more plants or one pound or more of cannabis. A violation of this
section is a class C felony.

INTERSTATE TRANSPORTING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 67 A new section is added to chapter 66.44 RCW
to read as follows:
A person is guilty of interstate transporting of cannabis if he or
she imports cannabis into Washington from any other state or country.
A violation of this section is a class C felony and is subject to a
fine of no less than five thousand dollars.

INVOLVING A MINOR IN DRUG DEALING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 68 (1) It is unlawful to compensate, threaten,
solicit, or in any other manner involve a person under the age of
twenty-one years in a transaction unlawfully to produce, sell, or
otherwise supply cannabis.
(2) A violation of this section is a class C felony punishable
according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec. 69 RCW 9.94A.518 and 2003 c 53 s 57 are each amended to read
as follows:

TABLE 4

DRUG OFFENSES
INCLUDED WITHIN EACH
SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

III Any felony offense under chapter 69.50
RCW with a deadly weapon
special verdict under RCW
((9.94A.602)) 9.94A.825

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW
69.50.415)

Delivery of imitation controlled
substance by person eighteen or
over to person under eighteen
(RCW 69.52.030(2))

Involving a minor in drug dealing
(RCW 69.50.4015 and section 68
of this act)

Manufacture of methamphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(2)(b))

Over 18 and deliver heroin,
methamphetamine, a narcotic from
Schedule I or II, or flunitrazepam
from Schedule IV to someone
under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or a
nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam
or methamphetamine, from
Schedule I-V to someone under 18
and 3 years junior (RCW
69.50.406)

Possession of Ephedrine,
Pseudoephedrine, or Anhydrous
Ammonia with intent to
manufacture
methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.440)

Selling for profit (controlled or
counterfeit) any controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.410)

II Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.4011)

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver
methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(2)(b))

Delivery of a material in lieu of a
controlled substance (RCW
69.50.4012)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for
Controlled Substances (RCW
69.50.402(1)(f))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver amphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(2)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam
from Schedule IV (RCW
69.50.401(2)(a))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver narcotics from
Schedule III, IV, or V or
nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except ((marijuana,))
amphetamine, methamphetamines,
or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(2) (c) through (e))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with
intent to distribute an imitation
controlled substance (RCW
69.52.030(1))

I Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled
Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

((Manufacture, deliver, or possess with
intent to deliver marijuana (RCW
69.50.401(2)(c)))) Interstate
Transporting of Cannabis (section
67 of this act)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a
Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or
V or Nonnarcotic from Schedule I-V (RCW 69.50.4013)

Possession of Controlled Substance
that is either heroin or narcotics
from Schedule I or II (RCW
69.50.4013)

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug
Purposes (RCW 69.53.010)

Sec. 70 RCW 9A.16.120 and 2003 c 219 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a criminal action brought against the detainer by reason of
a person having been detained on or in the immediate vicinity of the
premises of an outdoor music festival or related campground for the
purpose of pursuing an investigation or questioning by a law
enforcement officer as to the lawfulness of the consumption or
possession of alcohol, cannabis, or illegal drugs, it is a defense that
the detained person was detained in a reasonable manner and for not
more than a reasonable time to permit the investigation or questioning
by a law enforcement officer, and that a peace officer, owner,
operator, employee, or agent of the outdoor music festival had
reasonable grounds to believe that the person so detained was
unlawfully consuming or attempting to unlawfully consume or possess,
alcohol, cannabis, or illegal drugs on the premises.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Illegal drug" means a controlled substance under chapter 69.50
RCW for which the person detained does not have a valid prescription or
that is not being consumed in accordance with the prescription
directions and warnings, or a legend drug under chapter 69.41 RCW for
which the person does not have a valid prescription or that is not
being consumed in accordance with the prescription directions and
warnings.
(b) "Outdoor music festival" has the same meaning as in RCW
70.108.020, except that no minimum time limit is required.
(c) "Reasonable grounds" include, but are not limited to:
(i) Exhibiting the effects of having consumed liquor or cannabis,
which means that a person has the odor of liquor or cannabis on his or
her breath or person, or that by speech, manner, appearance, behavior,
lack of coordination, or otherwise exhibits that he or she has consumed
liquor or cannabis, and either:
(A) Is in possession of or in close proximity to a container that
has or recently had liquor or cannabis in it; or
(B) Is shown by other evidence to have recently consumed liquor or
cannabis; or
(ii) Exhibiting the effects of having consumed an illegal drug,
which means that a person by speech, manner, appearance, behavior, lack
of coordination, or otherwise exhibits that he or she has consumed an
illegal drug, and either:
(A) Is in possession of an illegal drug; or
(B) Is shown by other evidence to have recently consumed an illegal
drug.
(d) "Reasonable time" means the time necessary to permit the person
detained to make a statement or to refuse to make a statement, and the
time necessary to allow a law enforcement officer to determine the
lawfulness of the consumption or possession of alcohol, cannabis, or
illegal drugs. "Reasonable time" may not exceed one hour.

Sec. 71 RCW 9.94A.650 and 2008 c 231 s 29 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This section applies to offenders who have never been
previously convicted of a felony in this state, federal court, or
another state, and who have never participated in a program of deferred
prosecution for a felony, and who are convicted of a felony that is
not:
(a) Classified as a violent offense or a sex offense under this
chapter;
(b) Manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture
or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II that
is a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV;
(c) Manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to deliver a
methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers as
defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2);
(d) The selling for profit of any controlled substance or
counterfeit substance classified in Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204((, except
leaves and flowering tops of marihuana)); or
(e) Felony driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or felony physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(2) In sentencing a first-time offender the court may waive the
imposition of a sentence within the standard sentence range and impose
a sentence which may include up to ninety days of confinement in a
facility operated or utilized under contract by the county and a
requirement that the offender refrain from committing new offenses.
(3) The court may impose up to one year of community custody unless
treatment is ordered, in which case the period of community custody may
include up to the period of treatment, but shall not exceed two years.
(4) As a condition of community custody, in addition to any
conditions authorized in RCW 9.94A.703, the court may order the
offender to pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations and/or
perform community restitution work.

Sec. 72 RCW 9.94A.660 and 2009 c 389 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An offender is eligible for the special drug offender
sentencing alternative if:
(a) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent
offense or sex offense and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4);
(b) The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a felony
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug
under RCW 46.61.502(6) or felony physical control of a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug under RCW
46.61.504(6);
(c) The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex
offense at any time or violent offense within ten years before
conviction of the current offense, in this state, another state, or the
United States;
(d) For a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act under
chapter 69.50 RCW or a cannabis violation, or a criminal solicitation
to commit such a violation under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the offense
involved only a small quantity of the particular controlled substance
or cannabis as determined by the judge upon consideration of such
factors as the weight, purity, packaging, sale price, and street value
of the controlled substance or cannabis;
(e) The offender has not been found by the United States attorney
general to be subject to a deportation detainer or order and does not
become subject to a deportation order during the period of the
sentence;
(f) The end of the standard sentence range for the current offense
is greater than one year; and
(g) The offender has not received a drug offender sentencing
alternative more than once in the prior ten years before the current
offense.
(2) A motion for a special drug offender sentencing alternative may
be made by the court, the offender, or the state.
(3) If the sentencing court determines that the offender is
eligible for an alternative sentence under this section and that the
alternative sentence is appropriate, the court shall waive imposition
of a sentence within the standard sentence range and impose a sentence
consisting of either a prison-based alternative under RCW 9.94A.662 or
a residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative under RCW
9.94A.664. The residential chemical dependency treatment-based
alternative is only available if the midpoint of the standard range is
twenty-four months or less.
(4) To assist the court in making its determination, the court may
order the department to complete either or both a risk assessment
report and a chemical dependency screening report as provided in RCW
9.94A.500.
(5)(a) If the court is considering imposing a sentence under the
residential chemical dependency treatment-based alternative, the court
may order an examination of the offender by the department. The
examination shall, at a minimum, address the following issues:
(i) Whether the offender suffers from drug addiction;
(ii) Whether the addiction is such that there is a probability that
criminal behavior will occur in the future;
(iii) Whether effective treatment for the offender's addiction is
available from a provider that has been licensed or certified by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and
health services; and
(iv) Whether the offender and the community will benefit from the
use of the alternative.
(b) The examination report must contain:
(i) A proposed monitoring plan, including any requirements
regarding living conditions, lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by
family members and others; and
(ii) Recommended crime-related prohibitions and affirmative
conditions.
(6) When a court imposes a sentence of community custody under this
section:
(a) The court may impose conditions as provided in RCW 9.94A.703
and may impose other affirmative conditions as the court considers
appropriate. In addition, an offender may be required to pay thirty
dollars per month while on community custody to offset the cost of
monitoring for alcohol or controlled substances.
(b) The department may impose conditions and sanctions as
authorized in RCW 9.94A.704 and RCW 9.94A.737.
(7)(a) The court may bring any offender sentenced under this
section back into court at any time on its own initiative to evaluate
the offender's progress in treatment or to determine if any violations
of the conditions of the sentence have occurred.
(b) If the offender is brought back to court, the court may modify
the conditions of the community custody or impose sanctions under (c)
of this subsection.
(c) The court may order the offender to serve a term of total
confinement within the standard range of the offender's current offense
at any time during the period of community custody if the offender
violates the conditions or requirements of the sentence or if the
offender is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment.
(d) An offender ordered to serve a term of total confinement under
(c) of this subsection shall receive credit for any time previously
served under this section.
(8) In serving a term of community custody imposed upon failure to
complete, or administrative termination from, the special drug offender
sentencing alternative program, the offender shall receive no credit
for time served in community custody prior to termination of the
offender's participation in the program.
(9) An offender sentenced under this section shall be subject to
all rules relating to earned release time with respect to any period
served in total confinement.
(10) Costs of examinations and preparing treatment plans under a
special drug offender sentencing alternative may be paid, at the option
of the county, from funds provided to the county from the criminal
justice treatment account under RCW 70.96A.350.

Sec. 73 RCW 9.94A.734 and 2010 c 224 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Home detention may not be imposed for offenders convicted of
the following offenses, unless imposed as partial confinement in the
department's parenting program under RCW 9.94A.6551:
(a) A violent offense;
(b) Any sex offense;
(c) Any drug offense;
(d) Reckless burning in the first or second degree as defined in
RCW 9A.48.040 or 9A.48.050;
(e) Assault in the third degree as defined in RCW 9A.36.031;
(f) Assault of a child in the third degree;
(g) Unlawful imprisonment as defined in RCW 9A.40.040; or
(h) Harassment as defined in RCW 9A.46.020.
Home detention may be imposed for offenders convicted of possession of
a controlled substance under RCW 69.50.4013 ((or)), possession of a
forged prescription for a controlled substance under RCW 69.50.403, or
possession of cannabis if the offender fulfills the participation
conditions set forth in this section and is monitored for drug use by
a treatment alternatives to street crime program or a comparable court
or agency-referred program.
(2) Home detention may be imposed for offenders convicted of
burglary in the second degree as defined in RCW 9A.52.030 or
residential burglary conditioned upon the offender:
(a) Successfully completing twenty-one days in a work release
program;
(b) Having no convictions for burglary in the second degree or
residential burglary during the preceding two years and not more than
two prior convictions for burglary or residential burglary;
(c) Having no convictions for a violent felony offense during the
preceding two years and not more than two prior convictions for a
violent felony offense;
(d) Having no prior charges of escape; and
(e) Fulfilling the other conditions of the home detention program.
(3) Home detention may be imposed for offenders convicted of taking
a motor vehicle without permission in the second degree as defined in
RCW 9A.56.075, theft of a motor vehicle as defined under RCW 9A.56.065,
or possession of a stolen motor vehicle as defined under RCW 9A.56.068
conditioned upon the offender:
(a) Having no convictions for taking a motor vehicle without
permission, theft of a motor vehicle or possession of a stolen motor
vehicle during the preceding five years and not more than two prior
convictions for taking a motor vehicle without permission, theft of a
motor vehicle or possession of a stolen motor vehicle;
(b) Having no convictions for a violent felony offense during the
preceding two years and not more than two prior convictions for a
violent felony offense;
(c) Having no prior charges of escape; and
(d) Fulfilling the other conditions of the home detention program.
(4) Participation in a home detention program shall be conditioned
upon:
(a) The offender obtaining or maintaining current employment or
attending a regular course of school study at regularly defined hours,
or the offender performing parental duties to offspring or minors
normally in the custody of the offender;
(b) Abiding by the rules of the home detention program; and
(c) Compliance with court-ordered legal financial obligations. The
home detention program may also be made available to offenders whose
charges and convictions do not otherwise disqualify them if medical or
health-related conditions, concerns or treatment would be better
addressed under the home detention program, or where the health and
welfare of the offender, other inmates, or staff would be jeopardized
by the offender's incarceration. Participation in the home detention
program for medical or health-related reasons is conditioned on the
offender abiding by the rules of the home detention program and
complying with court-ordered restitution.

Sec. 74 RCW 9.92.070 and 1987 c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
((Hereafter)) Whenever any judge of any superior court or a
district or municipal judge shall sentence any person to pay any fine
and costs, the judge may, in the judge's discretion, provide that such
fine and costs may be paid in certain designated installments, or
within certain designated period or periods; and if such fine and costs
shall be paid by the defendant in accordance with such order no
commitment or imprisonment of the defendant shall be made for failure
to pay such fine or costs. ((PROVIDED, that)) The provisions of this
section shall not apply to any sentence given for the violation of any
of the liquor or cannabis laws of this state.

Sec. 75 RCW 13.04.155 and 2000 c 27 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a minor enrolled in any common school is convicted in
adult criminal court, or adjudicated or entered into a diversion
agreement with the juvenile court on any of the following offenses, the
court must notify the principal of the student's school of the
disposition of the case, after first notifying the parent or legal
guardian that such notification will be made:
(a) A violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) A sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;
(c) Inhaling toxic fumes under chapter 9.47A RCW;
(d) A controlled substances violation under chapter 69.50 RCW;
(e) A liquor violation under RCW 66.44.270; ((and))
(f) A cannabis violation under RCW 66.44.270; and
(g) Any crime under chapters 9.41, 9A.36, 9A.40, 9A.46, and 9A.48
RCW.
(2) The principal must provide the information received under
subsection (1) of this section to every teacher of any student who
qualifies under subsection (1) of this section and any other personnel
who, in the judgment of the principal, supervises the student or for
security purposes should be aware of the student's record. The
principal must provide the information to teachers and other personnel
based on any written records that the principal maintains or receives
from a juvenile court administrator or a law enforcement agency
regarding the student.
(3) Any information received by a principal or school personnel
under this section is confidential and may not be further disseminated
except as provided in RCW 28A.225.330, other statutes or case law, and
the family and educational and privacy rights act of 1994, 20 U.S.C.
Sec. 1232g et seq.

Sec. 76 RCW 13.40.0357 and 2008 c 230 s 3 and 2008 c 158 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

JUVENILE
DISPOSITION
OFFENSE
CATEGORY DESCRIPTION (RCW CITATION) JUVENILE DISPOSITION
CATEGORY FOR
ATTEMPT, BAILJUMP,
CONSPIRACY, OR
SOLICITATION

. . . . . . . . . . . .

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090(2) (a) and
(c)) E

E Malicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090(2)(b)) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus
(9.40.100) E

E Tampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus with
Intent to Commit Arson (9.40.105) E

A Possession of Incendiary Device (9.40.120)
B+

Assault and Other Crimes Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential Burglary (9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools (Possession of) (9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Mineral Trespass (78.44.330) C

C Vehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption of Alcohol
(66.44.270) E

C Illegally Obtaining Legend Drug
(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug
with Intent to Sell (69.41.030(2)(a)) D+

E Possession of Legend Drug
(69.41.030(2)(b)) E

B+ Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or
Flunitrazepam Sale (69.50.401(2) (a) or
(b)) B+

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic Sale (69.50.401(2)(c)) C

((E Possession of Marihuana <40 grams
(69.50.4014) E))

C Fraudulently Obtaining Controlled
Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit
(69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or
Flunitrazepam Counterfeit Substances
(69.50.4011(2) (a) or (b)) B

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit Substances
(69.50.4011(2) (c), (d), or (e)) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance
(69.50.4013) C

C Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances
Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance
(69.50.4012)
C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of Stolen Firearm (9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit
(9.41.050) E

C Possession of Firearms by Minor (<18)
(9.41.040(2)(a)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of Dangerous Weapon
(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating Another Person by use of
Weapon (9.41.270)
E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)
D+

Obstructing Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a Law Enforcement Officer
(9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140) C

C Introducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150) D

E Introducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)
C+

Public Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(b)) D+

D+ Riot Without Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(a)) E

E Failure to Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent Exposure (Victim <14)
(9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over)
(9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

C Failure to Register as a Sex Offender
(9A.44.130)
D

Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock 1 and 2 (9A.56.080 and
9A.56.083) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

C Identity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2)) D

D Identity Theft 2 (9.35.020(3)) E

D Improperly Obtaining Financial Information
(9.35.010) E

B Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (9A.56.068) C

B Possession of Stolen Property 1
(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of Stolen Property 2
(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of Stolen Property 3
(9A.56.170) E

B Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
1 (9A.56.070) C

C Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission
2 (9A.56.075) D

B Theft of a Motor Vehicle (9A.56.065) C

Motor Vehicle Related Crimes

E Driving Without a License (46.20.005) E

B+ Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to Elude Pursuing Police
Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502 and 46.61.504) E

B+ Felony Driving While Under the Influence
(46.61.502(6)) B

B+ Felony Physical Control of a Vehicle While
Under the Influence (46.61.504(6))
B

Other

B Animal Cruelty 1 (16.52.205) C

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape 21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape 3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls
(9.61.230) E

A Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
A Felony B+

B Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
B Felony C

C Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class
C Felony D

D Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult Gross
Misdemeanor E

E Other Offense Equivalent to an Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation of Order of Restitution,
Community Supervision, or Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses
and the standard range is established as follows:

1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks
confinement
2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks
confinement
3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month
period - 12 weeks confinement

2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order,
it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may
select sentencing option A, B, C, D, or RCW 13.40.167.

OPTION A
JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID
STANDARD RANGE

A+
180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

EXCEPT

30-40

WEEKS FOR

15-17

YEAR OLDS

Current B+ 15-36 52-65 80-100 103-129

Offense WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL 52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) 15-36 WEEKS WEEKS

C+ LS

15-36 WEEKS

C LS 15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions:

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Restitution

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4
or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of
confinement.
(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category.
The current offense category is determined by the offense of
adjudication.
(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior
adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior
felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation,
misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4
point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.
(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined
by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications
and the row defined by the current offense category.
(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for
more than one offense.
(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an
offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall
not include confinement.

OR

OPTION B
SUSPENDED DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

(1) If the offender is subject to a standard range disposition
involving confinement by the department, the court may impose the
standard range and suspend the disposition on condition that the
offender comply with one or more local sanctions and any educational or
treatment requirement. The treatment programs provided to the offender
must be either research-based best practice programs as identified by
the Washington state institute for public policy or the joint
legislative audit and review committee, or for chemical dependency
treatment programs or services, they must be evidence-based or
research-based best practice programs. For the purposes of this
subsection:
(a) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had
multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations
demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the
population; and
(b) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some
research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the
standard of evidence-based practices.
(2) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition,
the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke
the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.
(3) An offender is ineligible for the suspended disposition option
under this section if the offender is:
(a) Adjudicated of an A+ offense;
(b) Fourteen years of age or older and is adjudicated of one or
more of the following offenses:
(i) A class A offense, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation
to commit a class A offense;
(ii) Manslaughter in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.060); or
(iii) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021), extortion in
the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120), kidnapping in the second degree (RCW
9A.40.030), robbery in the second degree (RCW 9A.56.210), residential
burglary (RCW 9A.52.025), burglary in the second degree (RCW
9A.52.030), drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045), vehicular homicide (RCW
46.61.520), hit and run death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a)), intimidating a
witness (RCW 9A.72.110), violation of the uniform controlled substances
act (RCW 69.50.401 (2)(a) and (b)), or manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070),
when the offense includes infliction of bodily harm upon another or
when during the commission or immediate withdrawal from the offense the
respondent was armed with a deadly weapon;
(c) Ordered to serve a disposition for a firearm violation under
RCW 13.40.193; or
(d) Adjudicated of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

OR

OPTION C
CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition
of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not
committed an A- or B+ offense, the court may impose a disposition under
RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION D
MANIFEST INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under option A, B, or C
would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a
disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

COURT MARTIAL
Sec. 77 RCW 38.38.762 and 2009 c 378 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any person subject to this code who wrongfully uses, possesses,
distributes, or introduces into an installation, vessel, vehicle, or
aircraft used by or under the control of the armed forces or organized
militia a substance described in subsection (2) of this section shall
be punished as a court-martial may direct.
(2) The substances referred to in subsection (1) of this section
are the following:
(a) Opium, heroin, cocaine, amphetamine, lysergic acid
diethylamide, methamphetamine, phencyclidine, barbituric acid, and
((marijuana and)) any compound or derivative of any such substance;
(b) Any substance not specified in (a) of this subsection that is
listed on a schedule of controlled substances prohibited by the United
States army; or
(c) Any other substance not specified in this subsection that is
listed in Schedules I through V of section 202 of the federal
controlled substances act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 812, as amended, except the
Cannabis plant or any of its parts or derivatives.

Sec. 78 RCW 36.27.020 and 1995 c 194 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The prosecuting attorney shall:
(1) Be legal adviser of the legislative authority, giving ((them
[it])) it his or her written opinion when required by the legislative
authority or the chairperson thereof touching any subject which the
legislative authority may be called or required to act upon relating to
the management of county affairs;
(2) Be legal adviser to all county and precinct officers and school
directors in all matters relating to their official business, and when
required draw up all instruments of an official nature for the use of
said officers;
(3) Appear for and represent the state, county, and all school
districts subject to the supervisory control and direction of the
attorney general in all criminal and civil proceedings in which the
state or the county or any school district in the county may be a
party;
(4) Prosecute all criminal and civil actions in which the state or
the county may be a party, defend all suits brought against the state
or the county, and prosecute actions upon forfeited recognizances and
bonds and actions for the recovery of debts, fines, penalties, and
forfeitures accruing to the state or the county;
(5) Attend and appear before and give advice to the grand jury when
cases are presented to it for consideration and draw all indictments
when required by the grand jury;
(6) Institute and prosecute proceedings before magistrates for the
arrest of persons charged with or reasonably suspected of felonies when
the prosecuting attorney has information that any such offense has been
committed and the prosecuting attorney shall for that purpose attend
when required by them if the prosecuting attorney is not then in
attendance upon the superior court;
(7) Carefully tax all cost bills in criminal cases and take care
that no useless witness fees are taxed as part of the costs and that
the officers authorized to execute process tax no other or greater fees
than the fees allowed by law;
(8) Receive all cost bills in criminal cases before district judges
at the trial of which the prosecuting attorney was not present, before
they are lodged with the legislative authority for payment, whereupon
the prosecuting attorney may retax the same and the prosecuting
attorney must do so if the legislative authority deems any bill
exorbitant or improperly taxed;
(9) Present all violations of the election laws which may come to
the prosecuting attorney's knowledge to the special consideration of
the proper jury;
(10) Examine once in each year the official bonds of all county and
precinct officers and report to the legislative authority any defect in
the bonds of any such officer;
(11) Make an annual report to the governor as of the 31st of
December of each year setting forth the amount and nature of business
transacted by the prosecuting attorney in that year with such other
statements and suggestions as the prosecuting attorney may deem useful;
(12) Send to the state liquor control board at the end of each year
a written report of all prosecutions brought under the state liquor and
cannabis laws pursuant to Title 66 RCW in the county during the
preceding year, showing in each case, the date of trial, name of
accused, nature of charges, disposition of case, and the name of the
judge presiding;
(13) Seek to reform and improve the administration of criminal
justice and stimulate efforts to remedy inadequacies or injustice in
substantive or procedural law.

Sec. 79 RCW 46.09.470 and 2006 c 212 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, it is a
traffic infraction for any person to operate any nonhighway vehicle:
(a) In such a manner as to endanger the property of another;
(b) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without a lighted headlight and taillight between the hours of
dusk and dawn, or when otherwise required for the safety of others
regardless of ownership;
(c) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without an adequate braking device or when otherwise required
for the safety of others regardless of ownership;
(d) Without a spark arrester approved by the department of natural
resources;
(e) Without an adequate, and operating, muffling device which
effectively limits vehicle noise to no more than eighty-six decibels on
the "A" scale at fifty feet as measured by the Society of Automotive
Engineers (SAE) test procedure J 331a, except that a maximum noise
level of one hundred and five decibels on the "A" scale at a distance
of twenty inches from the exhaust outlet shall be an acceptable
substitute in lieu of the Society of Automotive Engineers test
procedure J 331a when measured:
(i) At a forty-five degree angle at a distance of twenty inches
from the exhaust outlet;
(ii) With the vehicle stationary and the engine running at a stea

--- END ---