BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state loses
over one hundred million dollars a year in taxes due to underground
economy construction activity, causing great inequity to law-abiding
businesses and taxpayers. The legislature further finds that an
employer in construction is required to pay industrial insurance and
unemployment taxes for a worker unless a seven-part independent
contractor test is met, which test includes that the worker is free
from direction and control and has his or her own books and records.
The legislature finds that some contractors avoid taxes by engaging
multiple contractors to work on the same task and treating the
contractors as exempt independent contractors rather than hiring and
paying taxes on these persons as covered workers. The legislature
finds, however, that if multiple contractors are working on the same
task on a job site, the contractors must be working under direction and
control such that they are not exempt independent contractors but are,
in fact, covered workers.
The legislature finds that the seven-part test is and should
continue to be applied in investigations of underground economy
activity in the construction industry. However, the legislature also
finds that prohibiting up front certain contracting which by its nature
creates a situation in which taxes due are not paid will provide
clarity to contractors and provide an additional cost-effective means
to reduce the underground economy. By enacting section 2 of this act,
the legislature intends to define the prohibited contracting narrowly
to assure no legitimate contracting is prohibited. The legislature
intends that nothing in section 2 of this act prohibits a contractor
from engaging more than two independent contractors who have no covered
workers to work on the same task so long as those contractors are
treated as covered workers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A contractor commits a violation under this chapter and is
subject to an infraction if the contractor engages more than two
independent contractors to work on a single job site who:
(a) Are working on the same task;
(b) Bring no workers to that job site subject to the mandatory
coverage of Title 51 RCW; and
(c) Are not being treated by the contractor as covered workers
under Title 51 RCW.
(2) A contractor has the burden of proof to show that independent
subcontractors engaged by the contractor working in the same trade or
occupation on a single job site are not working on the same task.
(3)(a) A contractor found to have committed an infraction under
this section shall be assessed a fine of:
(i) Five hundred dollars for a first offense;
(ii) Two thousand five hundred dollars for a second offense; and
(iii) Five thousand dollars for a third or subsequent offense.
(b) For a third or subsequent offense under this section, the
director shall also suspend the contractor's certificate of
registration for one year.
(c) In addition to any other penalty, the director shall suspend
the registration of the contractor until payment of penalties assessed
under this section that have become final and are paid in full.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Job site" means: (i) A single physical address; or (ii)
multiple buildings or addresses or both, if the addresses or buildings
are under the same contract with the general contractor.
(b) "Trade or occupation" means a trade or occupation as determined
by the department of labor and industries under chapter 39.12 RCW.

--- END ---