BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.250.005 and 2009 c 542 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that online learning provides tremendous
opportunities for students to access curriculum, courses, and a unique
learning environment that might not otherwise be available. The
legislature supports and encourages online learning opportunities.
(2) However, the legislature also finds that there is a need to
assure quality in online learning, both for the programs and the
administration of those programs. The legislature is the steward of
public funds that support students enrolled in online learning and must
ensure an appropriate accountability system at the state level.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to take a first step in
improving oversight and quality assurance of online learning programs,
and intends to examine possible additional steps that may need to be
taken to improve financial accountability.
(4) The first step in improving quality assurance is to:
(a) Provide objective information to students, parents, and
educators regarding available online learning opportunities, including
program and course content, how to register for programs and courses,
teacher qualifications, student-to-teacher ratios, prior course
completion rates, and other evaluative information;
(b) Create an approval process for multidistrict online providers;
(c) Enhance statewide equity of student access to high quality
online learning opportunities; and
(d) Require school district boards of directors to develop policies
and procedures for student access to online learning opportunities.
(5) Further, the legislature finds that online learning provides
the opportunity to offer quality education economically to students and
provide students choices in their courses.
(6) The legislature also finds that when a K-12 student chooses to
take approved online courses, a school district has no obligation to
provide funding for the online courses nor recognize the grades on a
student's transcript. Therefore, the legislature intends to require
school districts to offer approved online courses, excluding similar
courses otherwise offered by the resident school district, to students,
for credit, coordinated through the office of online learning.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.250.030 and 2009 c 542 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall create an office of
online learning. In the initial establishment of the office, the
superintendent shall hire staff who have been employed by the digital
learning commons to the extent such hiring is in accordance with state
law and to the extent funds are available. The office shall:
(1) Develop and maintain a web site that provides objective
information for students, parents, and educators regarding online
learning opportunities offered by multidistrict online providers that
have been approved in accordance with RCW 28A.250.020. The web site
shall include information regarding the online course provider's
overall instructional program, specific information regarding the
content of individual online courses and online school programs, a
direct link to each online course provider's web site, how to register
for online learning programs and courses, teacher qualifications,
student-to-teacher ratios, course completion rates, and other
evaluative and comparative information. The web site shall also
provide information regarding the process and criteria for approving
multidistrict online providers. To the greatest extent possible, the
superintendent shall use the framework of the course offering component
of the web site developed by the digital learning commons;
(2) Develop model agreements with approved multidistrict online
providers that address standard contract terms and conditions that may
apply to contracts between a school district and the approved provider.
The purpose of the agreements is to provide a template to assist
individual school districts, at the discretion of the district, in
contracting with multidistrict online providers to offer the
multidistrict online provider's courses and programs to students in the
district. The agreements may address billing, fees, responsibilities
of online course providers and school districts, and other issues;
(3) Develop a process whereby approved individual online courses
are made available to all students statewide;
(4) Develop and implement a model contract between the office of
online learning and approved online course providers;
(5) Develop and implement a process for reporting online course
completion information and grades to school districts;
(6) Work in conjunction with the superintendent of public
instruction to develop processes and procedures for reporting and
funding online courses; and
(((3))) (7) In collaboration with the educational service
districts:
(a) Provide technical assistance and support to school district
personnel through the educational technology centers in the development
and implementation of online learning programs in their districts; and
(b) To the extent funds are available, provide online learning
tools for students, teachers, administrators, and other educators.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.250.050 and 2009 c 542 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By August 31, 2010, all school district boards of directors
shall develop policies and procedures regarding student access to
online courses and online learning programs. The policies and
procedures shall include but not be limited to: Student eligibility
criteria; the types of online courses available to students through the
school district; the methods districts will use to support student
success, which may include a local advisor; when the school district
will and will not pay course fees and other costs; the granting of high
school credit; and a process for students and parents or guardians to
formally acknowledge any course taken for which no credit is given.
The policies and procedures shall take effect beginning with the 2010-11 school year. School districts shall submit their policies to the
superintendent of public instruction by September 15, 2010. By
December 1, 2010, the superintendent of public instruction shall
summarize the school district policies regarding student access to
online courses and submit a report to the legislature.
(2) School districts may not prevent students from taking
individual approved online courses for credit, as specified in RCW
28A.250.020, unless a similar course is offered by the resident school
district or the course is for credit recovery purposes.
(3) School districts shall provide students with information
regarding online courses that are available through the school
district. The information shall include the types of information
described in subsection (1) of this section.
(((3))) (4) When developing local or regional online learning
programs, school districts shall incorporate into the program design
the approval criteria developed by the superintendent of public
instruction under RCW 28A.250.020.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.250.060 and 2009 c 542 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2011-12 school year, school districts may
claim state basic education funding, to the extent otherwise allowed by
state law, for students enrolled in online courses or programs only if
the online courses or programs are:
(a) Offered by a multidistrict online provider approved under RCW
28A.250.020 by the superintendent of public instruction;
(b) Offered by a school district online learning program if the
program serves students who reside within the geographic boundaries of
the school district, including school district programs in which fewer
than ten percent of the program's students reside outside the school
district's geographic boundaries; or
(c) Offered by a regional online learning program where courses are
jointly developed and offered by two or more school districts or an
educational service district through an interdistrict cooperative
program agreement.
(2)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate to the office of online learning an amount per each full-time
equivalent at statewide uniform rates for basic education, less twenty
percent. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
separately calculate and allocate moneys appropriated for basic
education under RCW 28A.150.260 for purposes of making such payments
less fifteen percent, for approved online courses, excluding small high
school enhancements. The superintendent of public instruction shall
specify, by August 1, 2011, the process by which funds are allocated.
(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt rules to implement this subsection (2).
(3) Criteria shall be established by the superintendent of public
instruction to allow online courses that have not been approved by the
superintendent of public instruction to be eligible for state funding
if the course is in a subject matter in which no courses have been
approved and, if it is a high school course, the course meets
Washington high school graduation requirements.

--- END ---