BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) There is a crisis in health care
accessibility, affordability, and choice in Washington state. Health
care through insurance companies has failed to control costs, increase
access, or preserve choice. More than six hundred thousand Washington
residents have no health care coverage. Individual plans are
unavailable or unaffordable in most counties. Many clinics, physician
practices, and emergency departments, especially in rural areas, are
failing. Employers, faced with fewer choices and more expensive
premiums, are reducing employment-based health care coverage.
Simplifying health care financing and eliminating administrative waste
inherent in multiple insurance plans can create sufficient savings to
extend health care coverage to all residents and enhance fairness in
the system.
(2) The people of the state of Washington declare their intention
to create a single health financing entity called the Washington health
security trust. Through public hearings, research, and consensus
building, the trust will: (a) Provide fair, simple, and accountable
health care financing for all Washington residents using a single
health care financing entity; (b) cover a comprehensive package of
effective and necessary personal health services; (c) make health care
coverage independent from employment; (d) eliminate excessive
administrative costs resulting from the current fragmented system of
multiple insurers; (e) generate savings sufficient to ensure coverage
for all Washington residents; (f) integrate current publicly sponsored
health programs into the health security trust; (g) preserve choice of
providers for Washington residents; (h) protect patient rights; (i)
keep clinical decisions in the hands of health professionals and
patients, rather than administrative personnel; (j) promote health care
quality; and (k) control excessive health care costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Board" means the board of trustees of the Washington health
security trust, created in section 3 of this act.
(2) "Capitation" means a mechanism of payment in which a provider
is paid a negotiated monthly sum and is obliged to provide all covered
services for specific patients who enroll with that provider.
(3) "Case rate" means a method of payment based on diagnosis. Case
rate assumes that a given set of services shall be provided and the
rate is based on the total compensation for those services.
(4) "Chair" means the presiding officer of the board.
(5) "Employer" means any person, partnership, corporation,
association, joint venture, or public or private entity operating in
Washington state and employing for wages, salary, or other
compensation, one or more residents.
(6) "Federal poverty level" means the federal poverty guidelines
determined annually by the United States department of health and human
services or its successor agency.
(7) "Group practice" or "group" means a group of practitioners
voluntarily joined into an organization for the purpose of sharing
administrative costs, negotiating with payers and controlling the
circumstances of their medical practice, and, in some cases, sharing
revenues. The group may be of a single specialty or include more than
one specialty.
(8) "Health care facility" or "facility" includes any of the
following appropriately accredited entities: Hospices licensed
pursuant to chapter 70.127 RCW; hospitals licensed pursuant to chapter
70.41 RCW; rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020;
psychiatric hospitals licensed pursuant to chapter 71.12 RCW; nursing
homes licensed pursuant to chapter 18.51 RCW; community mental health
centers licensed pursuant to chapter 71.05 or 71.24 RCW; kidney disease
treatment centers licensed pursuant to chapter 70.41 RCW; ambulatory
diagnostic, treatment, or surgical facilities licensed pursuant to
chapter 70.41 RCW; approved drug and alcohol treatment facilities
certified by the department of social and health services; home health
agencies licensed pursuant to chapter 70.127 RCW; and such facilities
if owned and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of
the state and such other facilities as required by federal law and
implementing regulations.
(9) "Health care practitioner" or "practitioner" means a person
licensed or certified under Title 18 RCW or chapter 70.127 RCW, and
covered by the all categories of provider law, RCW 48.43.045, providing
health care services in Washington state consistent with their lawful
scope of practice.
(10) "Health care provider" or "provider" means any health care
facility, or health care practitioner or group practice licensed or
certified under Washington state law to provide health or
health-related services in Washington state.
(11) "Income" means the adjusted gross household income for federal
income tax purposes.
(12) "Long-term care" means institutional, residential, outpatient,
or community-based services that meet the individual needs of persons
of all ages who are limited in their functional capacities or have
disabilities and require assistance with performing two or more
activities of daily living for an extended or indefinite period of
time. These services include case management, protective supervision,
in-home care, nursing services, convalescent, custodial, chronic, and
terminally ill care.
(13) "Native American" means an American Indian or Alaska native as
defined under 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1603.
(14) "Payroll" means any amount paid to Washington state residents
and defined as "wages" under section 3121 of the internal revenue code.
(15) "Resident" means an individual who presents evidence of
established, permanent residency in the state of Washington, who did
not enter the state for the primary purpose of obtaining health
services. "Resident" also includes people and their accompanying
family members who are residing in the state for the purpose of
engaging in employment for at least one month. The confinement of a
person in a nursing home, hospital, or other medical institution in the
state may not by itself be sufficient to qualify such person as a
resident.
(16) "Trust" means the Washington health security trust created in
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 An agency of state government known as the
Washington health security trust is created. The purpose of the trust
is to provide coverage for a set of health services for all residents.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The trust shall be governed by a board
of trustees. The board consists of nine trustees selected for
expertise in health care financing and delivery, and representing
Washington citizens, business, labor, and health professions. The
initial trustees shall be appointed by the governor, subject to
confirmation by the senate. The governor shall appoint the initial
board by December 31, 2011. Of the initial trustees, three shall be
appointed to terms of two years, three shall be appointed to terms of
four years, and three shall be appointed to terms of six years.
Thereafter, trustees shall be elected to six-year terms, one trustee
from each congressional district; the first class of trustees shall be
elected from the first, second, and ninth congressional districts; the
second class from the third, seventh, and eighth congressional
districts; and the third class from the fourth, fifth, and sixth
congressional districts. The governor shall appoint a trustee to serve
the remaining term for a vacancy from any cause. The initial board
shall convene no later than March 15, 2012.
(2) Members of the board shall have no pecuniary interest in any
business subject to regulation by the board. Members of the board are
subject to chapter 42.52 RCW.
(3) The initial, appointed members of the board shall occupy their
positions on a full-time basis and are exempt from the provisions of
chapter 41.06 RCW. The elected trustees shall occupy their positions
according to the bylaws, rules, and relevant governing documents of the
board. The board and its professional staff are subject to the public
disclosure provisions of chapter 42.17 RCW. Trustees shall be paid a
salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.
Five trustees constitute a quorum for the conduct of business.
(4) One member of the board shall be designated by the governor as
chair, subject to confirmation by a majority of the other trustees.
The chair shall serve in this capacity, subject to continuing
confidence of a majority of the board.
(5) If convinced by a preponderance of the evidence in a due
process hearing that a trustee has failed to perform required duties or
has a conflict with the public interest, the governor may remove that
trustee and appoint another to serve the unexpired term.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Subject to the approval of the board,
the chair shall appoint three standing committees:
(a) A financial advisory committee consisting of financial experts
from the office of financial management, the office of the state
treasurer, and the office of the insurance commissioner. The financial
advisory committee shall recommend specific details for major budget
decisions and for appropriations, taxes, and other funding legislation
necessary to conduct the operations of the Washington health security
trust;
(b) A citizens' advisory committee consisting of balanced
representation from health experts, business, labor, and consumers.
The citizens' advisory committee shall hold public hearings on
priorities for inclusion in the set of health services, survey public
satisfaction, investigate complaints, and identify and report on health
care access and other priority issues for residents; and
(c) A technical advisory committee consisting of members with broad
experience in and knowledge of health care delivery, research, and
policy, as well as public and private funding of health care services.
The technical advisory committee shall make recommendations to the
board on technical issues related to covered benefits, quality
assurance, utilization, and other issues as requested by the board.
(2) The board shall consult with the citizens' advisory committee
at least quarterly, receive its reports and recommendations, and then
report to the governor and legislature at least annually on board
actions in response to citizens' advisory committee input. The board
shall also seek financially sound recommendations from the financial
advisory committee whenever the board requests funding legislation
necessary to operate the Washington health security trust and whenever
the board considers major budget decisions.
(3) Subject to approval of the board, the chair may appoint other
committees and task forces as needed.
(4) Members of committees shall serve without compensation for
their services but shall be reimbursed for their expenses while
attending meetings on behalf of the board in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The chair is the presiding officer of the
board and has the following powers and duties:
(1) Appoint an executive director with the approval of the board.
The executive director, with approval of the board, shall employ staff
in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW necessary to execute the policies
and decisions of the board;
(2) Enter into contracts on behalf of the board. All contracts are
subject to review and binding legal opinions by the attorney general's
office if disputed in a due process hearing by a party to such a
contract;
(3) Subject to explicit approval of a majority of the board, accept
and expend gifts, donations, grants, and other funds received by the
board; and
(4) Delegate administrative functions of the board to the executive
director and staff of the trust as necessary to ensure efficient
administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The board shall: (a) With advice from
the citizens' advisory committee and the technical advisory committee,
establish and keep current a set of health services to be financed by
the trust, as provided in section 11 of this act; (b) seek all
necessary waivers so that (i) current federal and state payments for
health services to residents will be paid directly to the trust, and
(ii) the trust complies with the federal patient protection and
affordable care act; (c) request legislation authorizing the health
security assessments and premiums necessary to operate the trust and
make rules, policies, guidelines, and timetables needed for the trust
to finance the set of health services for all residents starting May
15, 2013; (d) develop or contract for development of a statewide,
anonymous health care data system to use for quality assurance and cost
containment; (e) with advice from the technical advisory committee,
develop health care practice guidelines and quality standards; (f)
develop policies to protect confidentiality of patient records
throughout the health care delivery system and the claims payment
system; (g) make eligibility rules, including eligibility for residents
temporarily out-of-state; (h) develop or contract for development of a
streamlined uniform claims processing system that must pay providers in
a timely manner for covered health services; (i) develop appeals
procedures for residents and providers; (j) integrate functions with
other state agencies; (k) work with the citizens' advisory committee
and the technical advisory committee to balance benefits and provider
payments with revenues, and develop effective measures to control
excessive and unnecessary health care costs; (l) address nonfinancial
barriers to health care access; (m) monitor population migration into
Washington state to detect any trends related to availability of
universal health care coverage; (n) develop an annual budget for the
trust; and (o) comply with all insurance related provisions of the
federal patient protection and affordable care act.
(2) To the extent that the exercise of any of the powers and duties
specified in this section may be inconsistent with the powers and
duties of other state agencies, offices, or commissions, the authority
of the board supersedes that of such other state agency, office, or
commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Beginning May 15, 2014, the board shall
adopt, in consultation with the office of financial management, an
annual Washington health security trust budget. Except by legislative
approval, each annual budget shall not exceed the budget for the
preceding year by more than the Washington state consumer price index.
If operations expenses exceed revenues generated in two consecutive
years, the board shall recommend adjustments in either benefits or
revenues, or both, to the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The board shall report annual changes in
total Washington health care costs, along with the financial position
and the status of the trust, to the governor and legislature at least
once a year.
(2) The board shall seek audits annually from the state auditor.
(3) The board shall contract with the state auditor for a
performance audit every two years.
(4) The board shall adopt bylaws, rules, and other appropriate
governance documents to assure accountable, open, fair, effective
operations of the trust, including methods for electing trustees and
rules under which reserve funds may be prudently invested subject to
advice of the state treasurer and the director of the department of
financial management.
(5) The board shall submit any internal rules or policies it adopts
to the secretary of state. The internal rules or policies must be made
available by the secretary of state for public inspection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) All residents are eligible for coverage
through the trust.
(2) If a resident has health insurance coverage for any health
services provided in the state, the benefits provided in this act are
secondary to that insurance. Nonresidents are covered for emergency
services and emergency transportation only.
(3) Until federal waivers are accomplished, residents covered under
federal health programs shall continue to use that coverage, and
benefits provided by the trust shall extend only to costs not covered
by the federal health programs unless: (a) The resident voluntarily
elects to participate in the trust; (b) the resident's pay is
considered in calculating the employer's health security assessment
defined under section 16 of this act; and (c) either the employer or
the employee pays the health security premium under section 17 of this
act.
(4) The board shall make provisions for determining eligibility for
coverage for residents while they are temporarily out of the state.
(5) Pending integration of federally qualified trusts into the
health security trust, employees covered under the trusts are not
eligible for coverage through the health security trust unless: (a)
The employee's pay is considered in calculating the employer's health
security assessment defined under section 16 of this act; and (b)
either the employer or the employee pays the health security premium
under section 17 of this act.
(6) Pending integration of federally qualified trusts into the
health security trust, residents who are retirees covered under the
trusts are not eligible for coverage through the health security trust
unless they pay the health security premium under section 17 of this
act.
(7) Pending integration into the health security trust of
applicable federal programs described in section 21 of this act, Native
American residents are not eligible for coverage through the health
security trust unless: (a) The resident's pay is considered in
calculating the employer's health security assessment under section 16
of this act; and (b) either the employer or the resident pays any
health security premium due under section 17 of this act.
(8) Nothing in this act shall be construed to limit a resident's
right to seek health care from any provider he or she chooses, or from
obtaining coverage for health care benefits in excess of those
available under the trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) With advice from the citizens' advisory
committee and the technical advisory committee, the board shall
establish a single benefits package covering health services that are
effective and necessary for the good health of residents and that
emphasize preventive and primary health care. The board shall ensure
that the benefits package constitutes minimum essential coverage for
purposes of the federal patient protection and affordable care act.
(2) The benefits package shall include, but is not limited to: (a)
Inpatient and outpatient hospital care, including twenty-four hour a
day emergency services and emergency ambulance services; (b)
outpatient, home-based, and office-based care; (c) rehabilitation
services, including speech, occupational, and physical therapy; (d)
inpatient and outpatient mental health services and substance abuse
treatment; (e) hospice care; (f) prescription drugs and prescribed
medical nutrition; (g) vision and hearing care; (h) diagnostic tests;
(i) durable medical equipment; (j) preventive care; and (k) any other
benefits defined as "essential health benefits" by the United States
department of health and human services pursuant to the federal patient
protection and affordable care act.
(3) Subject to a financial analysis demonstrating ongoing
sufficient funds in the trust, long-term care shall be a covered
benefit as of May 15, 2014. Long-term care coverage shall include a
uniform initial assessment and coordination between home health, adult
day care, and nursing home services, and other treatment alternatives.
The board shall establish a copayment for long-term nursing home care,
to cover some costs of room and board, for residents with incomes above
one hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level.
(4) The board, in coordination with the office of the insurance
commissioner, shall examine by May 15, 2014, possible remedies for
residents who have made previous payments for long-term care insurance.
(5) Except where otherwise prohibited by federal law, the board
shall establish copayments for outpatient visits, emergency room
visits, and prescription drugs for residents with incomes above one
hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level. There shall be an
annual cap of five hundred dollars per family.
(6) The board shall submit to the legislature by July 1, 2014, a
plan to incorporate dental care coverage in the benefits package, to be
effective January 1, 2015.
(7) The board shall submit to the governor and legislature by
December 1, 2012, and by December 1st of the following years: (a) The
benefits package, and (b) an actuarial analysis of the cost of the
package.
(8) The board shall consider the extent to which medical research
and health professions training activities should be included in the
scope of covered activities set forth in this act. The board shall
make a report to the governor and the legislature by July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1) When consistent with existing federal
law, the board shall require pharmaceutical and durable medical
equipment manufacturers to provide their products in Washington state
at the lowest rate offered to federal and other government entities.
(2) The board may seek other means of financing drugs and durable
medical equipment at the lowest possible cost, including bulk
purchasing agreements with Washington state tribes.
(3) The board may enact drug formularies that do not interfere with
treatments necessary for appropriate standards of care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) The board shall adopt rules permitting
providers to collectively negotiate budgets, payment schedules, and
other terms and conditions of trust participation.
(2) The board shall annually negotiate with each hospital and each
facility a prospective global budget for operational and other costs to
be covered by the trust. Group practices may also negotiate on a
global budget basis. Hospitals and other facilities shall be paid on
a fee-for-service or case rate basis, within the limits of their
prospective annual budget.
(3) Payment to individual practitioners shall be by fee-for-service
or on a case rate basis or on a combination of bases. The board shall
study the feasibility of paying by capitation to providers, and how
resident enrollment would take place under capitation.
(4) Individual practitioners who are employed by a group, facility,
clinic, or hospital may be paid by salary.
(5) The board shall adopt rules ensuring that payment schedules and
procedures for mental health services are comparable to other health
care services.
(6) The board shall study and seek to develop provider payment
methods that: (a) Encourage an integrated multispecialty approach to
disease management; (b) reward education time spent with patients; and
(c) include a medical risk adjustment formula for providers whose
practices serve patients with higher than average health risks.
(7) Nothing in this act shall be construed to limit a provider's
right to receive payments from sources other than the trust. However,
any provider who does accept payment from the trust for a service must
accept that payment, along with applicable copayments, as payment in
full.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 (1) The intent of this section is to exempt
activities approved under this act from state antitrust laws and to
provide immunity from federal antitrust laws through the state action
doctrine.
(2) Activities that might otherwise be constrained by antitrust
laws, including: (a) Containing the aggregate cost of health care
services; (b) promoting cooperative activities among health care
providers to develop cost-effective health care delivery systems; and
(c) any other lawful actions taken under this act by any person or
entity created or regulated by this act, are declared to be pursuant to
state statute and for the public purposes of the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) Administrative expenses to operate and
maintain the trust shall not exceed eleven percent of the trust's
annual budget. The board shall not shift administrative costs or
duties of the trust to providers or to resident beneficiaries.
(2) The board shall work with providers to develop and apply
scientifically based utilization standards, to use encounter and
prescribing data to detect excessive utilization, to develop due
processes for enforcing appropriate utilization standards, and to
identify and prosecute fraud.
(3) The board may institute other cost-containment measures in
order to maintain a balanced budget. The board shall pursue due
diligence to ensure that cost-containment measures do not limit access
to clinically necessary care, nor infringe upon legitimate clinical
decision making by practitioners.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
In addition to and not in lieu of taxes imposed at the rates
established under chapter 82.04 RCW, all Washington state employers
shall pay a health security assessment to the department of revenue to
fund the Washington health security trust created in section 3 of this
act.
(1) Effective May 15, 2013, all employers in Washington state shall
pay in quarterly installments a health security assessment on aggregate
gross payroll paid to Washington state residents. Except as provided
in this section, the health security assessment shall be: (a) A first
step percentage of aggregate gross quarterly payroll up to, and
including, one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars; (b) a second step
percentage of the amount of aggregate gross quarterly payroll above one
hundred twenty-five thousand dollars; and (c) the first step percentage
rate shall be one-tenth of the rate of the second step percentage.
(2) The tax rates under subsection (1) of this section may be
adjusted annually by the office of financial management to reflect
changes in the Washington state consumer price index, or other cost-of-living index deemed appropriate by the office of financial management.
(3) The department of revenue shall assess a penalty at the rate of
two percent per month, or a fraction thereof, on any employer whose
applicable health security payroll assessment is not postmarked by the
last day of the month following the quarter in which it is due.
(4) The federal government, when an employer of Washington state
residents, is exempt from the health security assessment prior to the
repeal, amendment, or waiver of existing state and federal laws
delineated in section 21 of this act.
(5) Beginning May 15, 2013, until May 15, 2019, employers that face
financial hardship in paying the health security assessment, may, upon
application to the board of trustees created in section 4 of this act,
be eligible for waivers or reductions in the health security
assessment. The board shall establish rules and procedures governing
all aspects of the business assistance program, including application
procedures, thresholds regarding firm size, wages, profits, age of
firm, and duration of assistance.
(6) Pending integration of any federally qualified trusts, the
payroll of employees covered under these trusts is exempt from the
health security assessment, although the employer may pay it
voluntarily.
(7) Pending repeal, amendment, or waiver of applicable state and
federal laws delineated in section 21 of this act, payroll of Native
American residents who do not elect to participate in the health
security trust is exempt from the health security assessment.
(8) Eighty percent of the revenue collected under this section must
be deposited in the benefits account created in section 24 of this act.
(9) For the purposes of this section, the terms "employer,"
"payroll," and "resident" have the same meaning as defined in section
2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective May 15, 2013, all Washington residents eighteen years
and older, except medicare and medicaid beneficiaries, with incomes
over one hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level shall pay
a standard monthly flat rate health security premium. The board shall
recommend the amount of this premium, and the legislature shall
establish the exact amount in separate legislation.
(2) Medicare and medicaid beneficiaries with incomes over one
hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level who elect to
participate in the trust shall pay reduced, monthly, flat rate health
security premium. The board shall recommend the amount of this
premium, and the legislature shall establish the exact amount in
separate legislation.
(3) All premiums may be adjusted annually by the office of
financial management to reflect changes in the Washington state
consumer price index, or other cost-of-living index deemed appropriate
by the office of financial management.
(4) By May 15, 2013, the board of trustees of the Washington health
security trust, created in section 3 of this act, shall develop and
implement specific rules and procedures to subsidize the health
security premiums of residents, including medicare and medicaid
eligible residents, whose household incomes are less than two hundred
fifty percent of the federal poverty level.
(5) Federal employees and retirees are exempt from the health
security premium prior to the repeal, amendment, or waiver of existing
federal laws delineated in section 21 of this act, although they may
elect to participate in the trust and pay it voluntarily.
(6) Pending integration of any federally qualified trusts,
employees and retirees covered under these trusts are exempt from the
health security premium, although they may elect to participate in the
trust and the employee or the employer may pay it voluntarily.
(7) Pending repeal, amendment, or waiver of applicable state and
federal laws delineated in section 21 of this act, Native American
residents are exempt from paying the health security premium, although
they may elect to participate in the trust and they or their employer
may pay it voluntarily.
(8) Employers shall collect the health security premiums of their
employees through payroll deduction. An employee may also make the
premium payment for a nonworking spouse through payroll deduction.
Self-employed and nonemployed individuals shall pay their health
security premiums monthly to the department of revenue. The department
shall assess a penalty at the rate of two percent per month, or
fraction thereof, on all self-employed and nonemployed individuals
whose health security premium is not postmarked by the twentieth day
following the month it is due. Employers reserve the right to provide
private health care coverage to employees; notwithstanding, employers
must pay the health security assessment as provided in section 16 of
this act.
(9) Retirees who receive retirement benefits from a former employer
or a successor to the employer, other than in federally qualified
trusts or through federal employment, may claim a credit against the
health security premium otherwise due under this section, if all or a
portion of the retirement benefits consists of health care benefits
arising from a contract of health insurance entered into between the
employer, or successor, and a health insurance provider.
(10) For the purposes of this section, the terms "employer,"
"federal poverty level," "income," and "resident" have the same meaning
as defined in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Revenue derived from the health security
assessment, created in section 16 of this act, and the health security
premium, created in section 17 of this act, shall not be used to pay
for medical assistance currently provided under chapter 74.09 RCW or
other existing federal and state health care programs. If existing
federal and state sources of payment for health services are reduced or
terminated after the effective date of this section, the legislature
shall replace these appropriations from the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 (1) The health care authority is hereby
abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred
to the Washington health security trust. All references to the
administrator or the health care authority in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the chair or the Washington
health security trust.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the health care
authority shall be delivered to the custody of the Washington health
security trust. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the health care
authority shall be made available to the Washington health security
trust. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the health care
authority shall be assigned to the Washington health security trust.
(b) Any appropriations made to the health care authority shall, on
the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the
Washington health security trust.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the health care authority are transferred to
the jurisdiction of the Washington health security trust. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are assigned to the Washington health security trust to perform
their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the health care
authority shall be continued and acted upon by the Washington health
security trust. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in
full force and shall be performed by the Washington health security
trust.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the health care authority shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the affected agencies,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Effective January 1, 2013, until April 30,
2013, all employers in Washington state shall pay reduced start-up
health security assessments that are thirty percent of the standard
monthly flat rate assessment amount to be established by separate
legislation. The department of revenue will collect these moneys.
Twenty percent of these revenues must be deposited in the reserve
account, created in section 22 of this act. Eighty percent of these
revenues must be deposited in the benefits account, created in section
24 of this act. Employers who pay this assessment may be eligible for
partial or full rebates within two years, if there are sufficient
surpluses in the trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 (1) The board, in consultation with
sovereign tribal governments as called for by the centennial accord,
shall determine the state and federal laws that need to be repealed,
amended, or waived to implement this act, and report its
recommendations, with proposed revisions to the Revised Code of
Washington, to the governor and the appropriate committees of the
legislature by October 1, 2012.
(2) The governor, in consultation with the board and sovereign
tribal governments as called for by the centennial accord, shall take
the following steps in an effort to receive waivers or exemptions from
federal statutes necessary to fully implement this act:
(a) Negotiate with the federal department of health and human
services, health care financing administration, to obtain a statutory
or regulatory waiver of provisions of the medical assistance statute,
Title XIX of the federal social security act and the children's health
insurance program;
(b) Negotiate with the federal department of health and human
services to obtain a statutory or regulatory waiver of provisions of
the medicare statute, Title XVIII of the federal social security act,
that currently constitute barriers to full implementation of this act;
(c) Negotiate with the federal department of health and human
services to obtain any statutory or regulatory waivers of provisions of
the United States public health services act necessary to ensure
integration of federally funded community and migrant health clinics
and other health services funded through the public health services act
into the trust system under this act;
(d) Negotiate with the federal office of personnel management for
the inclusion of federal employee health benefits in the trust under
this act;
(e) Negotiate with the federal department of veterans' affairs for
the inclusion of veterans' medical benefits in the trust under this
act;
(f) Negotiate with the federal department of defense and other
federal agencies for the inclusion of the civilian health and medical
program of the uniformed services (CHAMPUS) in the trust under this
act;
(g) Negotiate with the Indian health services and sovereign tribal
governments for inclusion and adequate reimbursement of Indian health
benefits under the trust created by this act; and
(h) Request that the United States congress amend the internal
revenue code to treat the employer health security assessment, created
in section 16 of this act, and the individual health security premiums,
created in section 17 of this act, as fully deductible from adjusted
gross income.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 (1) The reserve account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. The reserve account will accumulate
moneys until its value equals ten percent of the total annual budgeted
expenditures of the trust and then will be considered fully funded,
unless the legislature determines that a different level of reserve is
necessary and prudent. Whenever the reserve account is fully funded,
additional moneys shall be transferred to the benefits account created
in section 24 of this act.
(2) Receipts from the following sources must be deposited into the
reserve account: (a) Twenty percent of the health security assessments
paid by employers under section 20 of this act between January 1, 2013,
and April 30, 2013; (b) effective May 15, 2013, seven percent of
receipts from the health security assessment created under section 16
of this act and seven percent of the receipts from the health security
premium created under section 17 of this act; and (c) ten percent of
all moneys received pursuant to RCW 41.05.120, 41.05.130, 66.24.290,
82.24.020, 82.26.020, 82.08.150, 43.79.480, 41.05.220, and section 33
of this act.
(3) Expenditures from the reserve account may be used only for the
purposes of health care services and maintenance of the trust. Only
the board or the board's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 (1) The displaced worker training account
is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Between May 15,
2013, and January 1, 2015, three percent of the receipts from the
health security assessment created in section 16 of this act and three
percent of the health security premium created in section 17 of this
act must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for retraining and job placement of workers displaced
by the transition to the trust. Only the board or the board's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.
(2) Any funds remaining in the account on December 31, 2015, must
be deposited into the benefits account created in section 24 of this
act.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 The benefits account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the health security
assessment created under section 16 of this act and the health security
premium created under section 17 of this act that are not dedicated to
the reserve account created in section 22 of this act or the displaced
worker training account created in section 23 of this act, as well as
receipts from other sources, must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for health care services
and maintenance of the trust. Only the board or the board's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

Sec. 25 RCW 41.05.120 and 2005 c 518 s 921 and 2005 c 143 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(((1))) Contributions from RCW 41.05.050, and reserves, dividends,
and refunds currently in the public employees' and retirees' insurance
account ((is hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer,
to be used by the administrator for the deposit of contributions, the
remittance paid by school districts and educational service districts
under RCW 28A.400.410, reserves, dividends, and refunds, for payment of
premiums for employee and retiree insurance benefit contracts and
subsidy amounts provided under RCW 41.05.085, and transfers from the
medical flexible spending account as authorized in RCW 41.05.123.
Moneys from the account shall be disbursed by the state treasurer by
warrants on vouchers duly authorized by the administrator. Moneys from
the account may be transferred to the medical flexible spending account
to provide reserves and start-up costs for the operation of the medical
flexible spending account program.
(2) The state treasurer and the state investment board may invest
moneys in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account. All
such investments shall be in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 or
43.84.150, whichever is applicable. The administrator shall determine
whether the state treasurer or the state investment board or both shall
invest moneys in the public employees' insurance account.
(3) During the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the public employees' and retirees' insurance account
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund)) shall be
deposited in the reserve account pursuant to section 22 of this act and
the benefits account pursuant to section 24 of this act.

Sec. 26 RCW 41.05.130 and 1988 c 107 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state health care authority administrative account is ((hereby
created in the state treasury)) transferred to the reserve account
created in section 22 of this act and the benefits account created in
section 24 of this act. Moneys in the account, including unanticipated
revenues under RCW 43.79.270, ((may be spent only after appropriation
by statute, and may be used only for operating expenses of the
authority)) are transferred to the reserve account created in section
22 of this act and the benefits account created in section 24 of this
act.

Sec. 27 RCW 66.24.290 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 1301 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any microbrewer or domestic brewery or beer distributor
licensed under this title may sell and deliver beer and strong beer to
holders of authorized licenses direct, but to no other person, other
than the board. Any certificate of approval holder authorized to act
as a distributor under RCW 66.24.270 shall pay the taxes imposed by
this section.
(a) Every such brewery or beer distributor shall report all sales
to the board monthly, pursuant to the regulations, and shall pay to the
board as an added tax for the privilege of manufacturing and selling
the beer and strong beer within the state a tax of one dollar and
thirty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons on sales to licensees
within the state and on sales to licensees within the state of bottled
and canned beer, including strong beer, shall pay a tax computed in
gallons at the rate of one dollar and thirty cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons.
(b) Any brewery or beer distributor whose applicable tax payment is
not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of sale will be
assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent per month or fraction
thereof. Beer and strong beer shall be sold by breweries and
distributors in sealed barrels or packages.
(c) The moneys collected under this subsection shall be distributed
as follows: (i) Three-tenths of a percent shall be distributed to
border areas under RCW 66.08.195; and (ii) of the remaining moneys:
(A) Twenty percent shall be distributed to counties in the same manner
as under RCW 66.08.200; and (B) eighty percent shall be distributed to
incorporated cities and towns in the same manner as under RCW
66.08.210.
(d) Any licensed retailer authorized to purchase beer from a
certificate of approval holder with a direct shipment endorsement or a
brewery or microbrewery shall make monthly reports to the liquor
control board on beer purchased during the preceding calendar month in
the manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board.
(2) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to two dollars per barrel of thirty-one gallons. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month.
(3)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer
subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section. The additional
tax is equal to ninety-six cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons
through June 30, 1995, two dollars and thirty-nine cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and four dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons thereafter.
(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply
to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by
breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may
be provided by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of this
exemption.
(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection (3) shall be deposited in the ((state general fund))
reserve account created in section 22 of this act and the benefits
account created in section 24 of this act.
(4) An additional tax is imposed on all beer and strong beer that
is subject to tax under subsection (1) of this section that is in the
first sixty thousand barrels of beer and strong beer by breweries that
are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as
existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by
the board by rule consistent with the purposes of the exemption under
subsection (3)(b) of this section. The additional tax is equal to one
dollar and forty-eight and two-tenths cents per barrel of thirty-one
gallons. By the twenty-fifth day of the following month, three percent
of the revenues collected from this additional tax shall be distributed
to border areas under RCW 66.08.195 and the remaining moneys shall be
transferred to the state general fund.
(5)(a) From June 1, 2010, through June 30, 2013, an additional tax
is imposed on all beer and strong beer subject to tax under subsection
(1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to fifteen dollars
and fifty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons.
(b) The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply
to the sale of the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by
breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051 of the federal internal revenue code, as existing on July 1,
1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule
consistent with the purposes of this exemption.
(c) All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under
this subsection shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(6) The board may make refunds for all taxes paid on beer and
strong beer exported from the state for use outside the state.
(7) The board may require filing with the board of a bond to be
approved by it, in such amount as the board may fix, securing the
payment of the tax. If any licensee fails to pay the tax when due, the
board may forthwith suspend or cancel his or her license until all
taxes are paid.

Sec. 28 RCW 82.24.020 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 22 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected as provided in this chapter((,))
a tax upon the sale, use, consumption, handling, possession, or
distribution of all cigarettes, in an amount equal to 12.125 cents per
cigarette.
(2) Wholesalers subject to the payment of this tax may, if they
wish, absorb five one-hundredths cents per cigarette of the tax and not
pass it on to purchasers without being in violation of this section or
any other act relating to the sale or taxation of cigarettes.
(3) For purposes of this chapter, "possession" means both (a)
physical possession by the purchaser, and((,)) (b) when cigarettes are
being transported to or held for the purchaser or his or her designee
by a person other than the purchaser, constructive possession by the
purchaser or his or her designee, which constructive possession is
deemed to occur at the location of the cigarettes being so transported
or held.
(4) In accordance with federal law and rules prescribed by the
department, an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe
may purchase cigarettes from an Indian tribal organization under the
jurisdiction of the member's tribe for the member's own use exempt from
the applicable taxes imposed by this chapter. Except as provided in
subsection (5) of this section, any person, who purchases cigarettes
from an Indian tribal organization and who is not an enrolled member of
the federally recognized Indian tribe within whose jurisdiction the
sale takes place, is not exempt from the applicable taxes imposed by
this chapter.
(5) If the state enters into a cigarette tax contract or agreement
with a federally recognized Indian tribe under chapter 43.06 RCW, the
terms of the contract or agreement take precedence over any conflicting
provisions of this chapter while the contract or agreement is in
effect. The revenue collected under this section must be deposited in
the reserve account created in section 22 of this act and the benefits
account created in section 24 of this act.

Sec. 29 RCW 82.26.020 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 22 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected a tax upon the sale, handling, or
distribution of all tobacco products in this state at the following
rate:
(a) For cigars except little cigars, ninety-five percent of the
taxable sales price of cigars, not to exceed sixty-five cents per
cigar;
(b) For all tobacco products except those covered under separate
provisions of this subsection, ninety-five percent of the taxable sales
price;
(c) For moist snuff, as established in this subsection (1)(c) and
computed on the net weight listed by the manufacturer:
(i) On each single unit consumer-sized can or package whose net
weight is one and two-tenths ounces or less, a rate per single unit
that is equal to the greater of 2.526 dollars or eighty-three and one-half percent of the cigarette tax under chapter 82.24 RCW multiplied by
twenty; or
(ii) On each single unit consumer-sized can or package whose net
weight is more than one and two-tenths ounces, a proportionate tax at
the rate established in (c)(i) of this subsection (1) on each ounce or
fractional part of an ounce; and
(d) For little cigars, an amount per cigar equal to the cigarette
tax under chapter 82.24 RCW.
(2) Taxes under this section must be imposed at the time the
distributor (a) brings, or causes to be brought, into this state from
without the state tobacco products for sale, (b) makes, manufactures,
fabricates, or stores tobacco products in this state for sale in this
state, (c) ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this
state, to be sold by those retailers, or (d) handles for sale any
tobacco products that are within this state but upon which tax has not
been imposed.
(3) The moneys collected under this section must be deposited into
the ((state general fund)) reserve account created in section 22 of
this act and the benefits account created in section 24 of this act.

Sec. 30 RCW 82.08.150 and 2009 c 479 s 65 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each retail
sale of spirits in the original package at the rate of fifteen percent
of the selling price. The tax imposed in this subsection shall apply
to all such sales including sales by the Washington state liquor stores
and agencies, but excluding sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
licensees.
(2) There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each sale of
spirits in the original package at the rate of ten percent of the
selling price on sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies
to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(3) There is levied and shall be collected an additional tax upon
each retail sale of spirits in the original package at the rate of one
dollar and seventy-two cents per liter. The additional tax imposed in
this subsection shall apply to all such sales including sales by
Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(4) An additional tax is imposed equal to fourteen percent
multiplied by the taxes payable under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of
this section.
(5) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of seven cents per liter. The
additional tax imposed in this subsection shall apply to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and
including sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
deposited in the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month.
(6)(a) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in
the original package at the rate of one and seven-tenths percent of the
selling price through June 30, 1995, two and six-tenths percent of the
selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, and
three and four-tenths of the selling price thereafter. This additional
tax applies to all such sales including sales by Washington state
liquor stores and agencies, but excluding sales to spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant licensees.
(b) An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in the
original package at the rate of one and one-tenth percent of the
selling price through June 30, 1995, one and seven-tenths percent of
the selling price for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997,
and two and three-tenths of the selling price thereafter. This
additional tax applies to all such sales to spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant licensees.
(c) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits
in the original package at the rate of twenty cents per liter through
June 30, 1995, thirty cents per liter for the period July 1, 1995,
through June 30, 1997, and forty-one cents per liter thereafter. This
additional tax applies to all such sales including sales by Washington
state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to spirits, beer,
and wine restaurant licensees.
(d) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this subsection shall be deposited in the ((state general fund))
reserve account created in section 22 of this act and the benefits
account created in section 24 of this act by the twenty-fifth day of
the following month.
(7)(a) An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of
spirits in the original package at the rate of one dollar and thirty-
three cents per liter. This additional tax applies to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, but
excluding sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.
(b) All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes
under this subsection shall be deposited by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month into the ((general fund)) reserve account created in
section 22 of this act and the benefits account created in section 24
of this act.
(8) The tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
spirits in the original package.
(9) The taxes imposed in this section shall be paid by the buyer to
the seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the full
amount of the tax payable in respect to each taxable sale under this
section. The taxes required by this section to be collected by the
seller shall be stated separately from the selling price and for
purposes of determining the tax due from the buyer to the seller, it
shall be conclusively presumed that the selling price quoted in any
price list does not include the taxes imposed by this section.
(10) As used in this section, the terms, "spirits" and "package"
shall have the meaning ascribed to them in chapter 66.04 RCW.

Sec. 31 RCW 43.79.480 and 2009 c 564 s 937 and 2009 c 479 s 30
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Moneys received by the state of Washington in accordance with
the settlement of the state's legal action against tobacco product
manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys' fees, shall be
deposited in the tobacco settlement account created in this section
except as these moneys are sold or assigned under chapter 43.340 RCW.
(2) The tobacco settlement account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the tobacco settlement account may only be
transferred to the ((state general fund)) reserve account created in
section 22 of this act and the benefits account created in section 24
of this act, and to the tobacco prevention and control account for
purposes set forth in this section. ((The legislature shall transfer
amounts received as strategic contribution payments as defined in RCW
43.350.010 to the life sciences discovery fund created in RCW
43.350.070. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer less than the entire strategic contribution payments.))
(3) The tobacco prevention and control account is created in the
state treasury. The source of revenue for this account is moneys
transferred to the account from the tobacco settlement account,
investment earnings, donations to the account, and other revenues as
directed by law. Expenditures from the account are subject to
appropriation. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the tobacco prevention and control account to the
state general fund such amounts as represent the excess fund balance of
the account.

Sec. 32 RCW 41.05.220 and 1998 c 245 s 38 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) State general funds appropriated to the department of
health for the purposes of funding community health centers to provide
primary health and dental care services, migrant health services, and
maternity health care services shall be transferred to the ((state
health care authority)) reserve account created in section 22 of this
act and the benefits account created in section 24 of this act. Any
related administrative funds expended by the department of health for
this purpose shall also be transferred to the ((health care authority))
reserve account created in section 22 of this act and the benefits
account created in section 24 of this act. The Washington health
((care authority)) security trust shall exclusively expend these funds
through contracts with community health centers to provide primary
health and dental care services, migrant health services, and maternity
health care services. The ((administrator)) chair of the Washington
health ((care authority)) security trust shall establish requirements
necessary to assure community health centers provide quality health
care services that are appropriate and effective and are delivered in
a cost-efficient manner. The ((administrator)) chair of the Washington
health security trust shall further assure that community health
centers have appropriate referral arrangements for acute care and
medical specialty services not provided by the community health
centers.
(((2) The authority, in consultation with the department of health,
shall work with community and migrant health clinics and other
providers of care to underserved populations, to ensure that the number
of people of color and underserved people receiving access to managed
care is expanded in proportion to need, based upon demographic data.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 Following the repeal, amendment, or waiver
of existing state and federal laws delineated in section 21 of this
act, all other revenues currently deposited in the health services
account for personal health care services shall be deposited to the
reserve account created in section 22 of this act and the benefits
account created in section 24 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 Nothing in this act shall be construed to
limit an employer's right to maintain employee benefit plans under the
federal employee retirement income security act of 1974.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 No later than January 1, 2014, the board
shall submit to the legislature a proposal to integrate those current
and future federally qualified trusts that choose to participate in the
trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 On or before January 1, 2014, the board, in
coordination with the department of labor and industries, shall study
and make a report to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature on the provision of medical benefits for injured workers
under the trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 An appropriation by separate act of the
legislature may be necessary for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2013,
from the general fund to the benefits account of the Washington health
security trust for start-up moneys for purposes of this act during the
period of July 1, 2012, through June 30, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.04.260 (Tax on manufacturers and processors of various
foods and by-products -- Research and development organizations -- Travel
agents -- Certain international activities -- Stevedoring and associated
activities -- Low-level waste disposers -- Insurance producers, surplus
line brokers, and title insurance agents--Hospitals -- Commercial
airplane activities -- Timber product activities -- Canned salmon
processors) and 2011 c 2 s 203 (Initiative Measure No. 1107), 2010 1st
sp.s. c 23 s 506, & 2010 c 114 s 107; and
(2) RCW 48.14.0201 (Premiums and prepayments tax -- Health care
services -- Exemptions -- State preemption) and 2009 c 479 s 41.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 Sections 1 through 15, 18, 19, 21 through
24, and 33 through 35 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 (1) Sections 22 through 24 of this act take
effect January 1, 2013.
(2) Sections 19, 25 through 34, and 38 of this act take effect May
15, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

--- END ---