BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that approximately
thirty-five percent of seniors in Washington high schools take less
than a full load of classes during their senior year. The legislature
further finds that many high schools provide students opportunities to
take advanced courses in career and technical or academic fields that
give students a head start when they begin their career or enter a
technical training program or a college or university. The legislature
also finds that since each individual institution of higher education
adopts its own rules for awarding credit for advanced high school work,
students can encounter unanticipated barriers to advancing their
dreams. Students can also be discouraged from putting in that extra
effort in high school if they are not certain whether their extra work
will be appropriately credited toward a certificate or degree.
The legislature intends to help students progress from high school
to a certificate or degree by increasing opportunities and providing a
clear pathway. Twelfth grade will truly be the launch year as high
schools increase the opportunities for students to take more advanced
classes. In addition, this act provides for community and technical
colleges and four-year institutions of higher education to publish a
list of high school courses and adopt uniform scores for proficiency
exams or competency requirements that will be given credit toward
certificate or degree requirements.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.130 and 2009 c 212 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program,
directly or in cooperation with a community college or another school
district, for students whose educational plans include application for
entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a
high school diploma. The program shall help these students to meet at
least the minimum entrance requirements under RCW 28B.10.050.
(2) All public high schools of the state shall provide a program,
directly or in cooperation with a community or technical college, a
skills center, an apprenticeship committee, or another school district,
for students who plan to pursue career or work opportunities other than
entrance to a baccalaureate-granting institution after being granted a
high school diploma. These programs may:
(a) Help students demonstrate the application of essential academic
learning requirements to the world of work, occupation-specific skills,
knowledge of more than one career in a chosen pathway, and
employability and leadership skills; and
(b) Help students demonstrate the knowledge and skill needed to
prepare for industry certification, and/or have the opportunity to
articulate to postsecondary education and training programs.
(3) Within existing resources, all public high schools in the state
shall:
(a) Work towards the goal of offering a sufficient number of high
school courses that give students the opportunity to earn the
equivalent of a year's worth of postsecondary credit towards a
certificate, apprenticeship program, technical degree, or associate or
baccalaureate degree. These high school courses are those advanced
courses that have accompanying advanced placement, international
baccalaureate, or other recognized college-level proficiency exams or
demonstrated competencies that are used to demonstrate postsecondary
knowledge and skills; and
(b) Inform students and their families, emphasizing communication
to underrepresented groups, about the program offerings and the
opportunities to take courses that qualify for postsecondary credit if
the student earns the qualifying score on the college-level proficiency
exam or through the demonstrated competency. This information shall
encourage students to use the twelfth grade as the launch year for an
advance start on their career and postsecondary education.
(4) A middle school that receives approval from the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to provide a career and technical
program in science, technology, engineering, or mathematics directly to
students shall receive funding at the same rate as a high school
operating a similar program. Additionally, a middle school that
provides a hands-on experience in science, technology, engineering, or
mathematics with an integrated curriculum of academic content and
career and technical education, and includes a career and technical
education exploratory component shall also qualify for the career and
technical education funding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2011, and by June of each odd-numbered year
thereafter, the institutions of higher education shall collaboratively
develop a master list of postsecondary courses that can be fulfilled by
taking the advanced placement, international baccalaureate, or other
recognized college-level proficiency examinations and meeting the
agreed-upon examination score or demonstrated competencies for lower
division general education requirements. The master list of
postsecondary courses fulfilled by proficiency examinations or
demonstrated competencies are those that fulfill lower division general
education requirements or career and technical education requirements
and qualify for postsecondary credit. From the master list, each
institution shall create and publish a list of its courses that can be
satisfied by successful proficiency examination scores or demonstrated
competencies for lower division general education requirements or
postsecondary professional technical requirements. The requirements to
develop a master list under this section do not apply if an institution
has a clearly published policy of awarding credit for the advanced
placement, international baccalaureate, or other recognized
college-level placement exams and does not require those credits to
meet specific course requirements but generally applies those credits
towards degree requirements.
(2) Institutions of higher education shall agree on examination
qualifying scores and demonstrated competencies. Each institution
shall use the same examination qualifying score and demonstrated
competencies. The examination qualifying scores and demonstrated
competencies shall be included in the published list under subsection
(1) of this section.
(3) Each institution of higher education, in designing its
certificate, technical degree program, two-year academic transfer
program, or freshman and sophomore courses of a baccalaureate program,
must recognize the equivalencies of at least one year of course credit
that can be earned through successfully demonstrating proficiency on
examinations, including but not limited to advanced placement and
international baccalaureate examinations. The successful completion of
the examination and the award of credit shall be noted on the student's
college transcript.
(4) Each institution of higher education must clearly include in
its admissions materials and on its web site the institution's list of
postsecondary courses that can be fulfilled by proficiency examinations
or demonstrated competencies and the agreed-upon examination scores and
demonstrated competencies that qualify for postsecondary credit. Each
institution must provide the information to the higher education
coordinating board and state board for community and technical colleges
in a form that the superintendent of public instruction is able to
distribute to school districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall annually publish on
its web site the agreed-upon list of high school courses qualifying for
postsecondary credit under section 3 of this act and examination
qualifying scores and demonstrated competencies meeting the
postsecondary requirements for a certificate or technical degree, a
two-year academic transfer degree, or the lower division requirements
for a baccalaureate degree.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act may be known and cited as the
launch year act.

--- END ---