BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.46.020 and 2001 c 299 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Bond" means any agreement which may or may not be represented
by a physical instrument, including notes, warrants, or certificates of
indebtedness, that evidences an indebtedness of the state or a local
government or a fund thereof, where the state or local government
agrees to pay a specified amount of money, with or without interest, at
a designated time or times to either registered owners or bearers,
including debt issued under chapter 39.50 RCW.
(2) "Host approval" means an approval of an issue of bonds by an
applicable elected representative of the state or local government,
having jurisdiction, for purposes of section 147(f)(2)(A)(ii) of the
internal revenue code, over the area in which a facility is located
that is to be financed with bonds issued by an issuer that is not the
state or a local government.
(3) "Local government" means any county, city, town, special
purpose district, political subdivision, municipal corporation, or
quasi municipal corporation, including any public corporation created
by such an entity.
(((3))) (4) "Obligation" means an agreement that evidences an
indebtedness of the state or a local government, other than a bond, and
includes, but is not limited to, conditional sales contracts, lease
obligations, and promissory notes.
(((4))) (5) "State" includes the state, agencies of the state, and
public corporations created by the state or agencies of the state.
(((5))) (6) "Treasurer" means the state treasurer, county
treasurer, city treasurer, or treasurer of any other municipal
corporation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.46 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is the policy of this state that in order to maintain an
effective system of monitoring the use of federal subsidies within the
state, facilities within the state proposed to be financed with bonds
issued by an issuer formed or organized under the laws of another state
must receive prior approval from the statewide issuer authorized by the
laws of Washington to issue bonds for the proposed project in
accordance with this section.
(2)(a) At least one hundred twenty days prior to the public hearing
for the proposed issuance of bonds for a project located in this state
by an issuer formed or organized under the laws of another state, the
issuer must notify the statewide issuer authorized under the laws of
Washington to issue bonds for the proposed project and provide the
information required under (b) of this subsection.
(b) The following items and information must be received by the
statewide issuer authorized under the laws of Washington to issue bonds
for the proposed project:
(i) A copy of the proposed notice of public hearing pertaining to
the facilities, providing the date and location of the proposed
hearing;
(ii) The maximum stated principal amount of the bonds;
(iii) A description of the facility, including its location;
(iv) A description of the plan of finance;
(v) The name of the issuer of the bonds;
(vi) The name of the initial owner or principal user of the
facility;
(vii) A description of how the project will meet the public policy
requirements and objectives of this state including the policies of the
statewide issuer under Washington law; and
(viii) A check in the amount established by the statewide issuer
under Washington law to perform the review.
(c) If the statewide issuer authorized to issue the bonds under
Washington law determines that the facility and the items and
information submitted under (b) of this subsection are consistent with
the laws and public policy of the state and are in the best interest of
the state, then the statewide issuer shall issue a written approval
under this section authorizing the governmental unit to grant its host
approval of the public hearing in its discretion.
(d) If the statewide issuer authorized to issue the bonds under
Washington law determines that the facility and the items and
information submitted under (b) of this subsection are not consistent
with the laws and public policy of the state and are not in the best
interest of the state, then the public hearing may not proceed and the
bonds may not be issued by an issuer formed or organized under the laws
of another state.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.86.140 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 6 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) No issuer may receive an allocation of the state ceiling
without a certificate of approval from the agency. The agency may not
make an allocation of the state ceiling to an issuer formed or
organized under the laws of another state.
(2) For each state ceiling allocation request, an issuer shall
submit to the agency, no sooner than ninety days prior to the beginning
of a calendar year for which an allocation of the state ceiling is
being requested, a form identifying:
(a) The amount of the allocation sought;
(b) The bond use category from which the allocation sought would be
made;
(c) The project or program for which the allocation is requested;
(d) The financing schedule for which the allocation is needed; and
(e) Any other such information required by the agency, including
information which corresponds to the allocation criteria of RCW
39.86.130.
(3) The agency may approve or deny an allocation for all or a
portion of the issuer's request. Any denied request, however, shall
remain on file with the agency for the remainder of the calendar year
and shall be considered for receiving any allocation, reallocation, or
carryforward of unused portions of the state ceiling during that
period.
(4) After receiving an allocation request, the agency shall mail to
the requesting issuer a written certificate of approval or notice of
denial for an allocation amount, by a date no later than the latest of
the following:
(a) February 1st of the calendar year for which the request is
made;
(b) Fifteen days from the date the agency receives an allocation
request; or
(c) Fifteen days from the date the agency receives a recommendation
by the board with regard to a small issue allocation request, should
the board choose to review individual requests.
(5)(a) For requests of the state ceiling of any calendar year, the
following applies to all bond use categories except housing and student
loans:
(i) Except for housing and student loans, any allocations granted
prior to April 1st, for which bonds have not been issued by July 1st of
the same calendar year, shall revert to the agency on July 1st of the
same calendar year for reallocation unless an extension or carryforward
is granted;
(ii) Except for housing and student loans, any allocations granted
on or after April 1st, for which bonds have not been issued by October
15th of the same calendar year, shall revert to the agency on October
15th of the same calendar year for reallocation unless an extension or
carryforward is granted.
(b) For each calendar year, any housing or student loan
allocations, for which bonds have not been issued by December 15th of
the same calendar year, shall revert to the agency on December 15th of
the same calendar year for reallocation unless an extension or
carryforward is granted.
(6) An extension of the deadlines provided by subsection (5) of
this section may be granted by the agency for the approved allocation
amount or a portion thereof, based on:
(a) Firm and convincing evidence that the bonds will be issued
before the end of the calendar year if the extension is granted; and
(b) Any other criteria the agency deems appropriate.
(7) If an issuer determines that bonds subject to the state ceiling
will not be issued for the project or program for which an allocation
was granted, the issuer shall promptly notify the agency in writing so
that the allocation may be canceled and the amount may be available for
reallocation.
(8) Bonds subject to the state ceiling may be issued only to
finance the project or program for which a certificate of approval is
granted.
(9) Within three business days of the date that bonds for which an
allocation of the state ceiling is granted have been delivered to the
original purchasers, the issuer shall mail to the agency a written
notification of the bond issuance. In accordance with chapter 39.44
RCW, the issuer shall also complete bond issuance information on the
form provided by the agency.
(10) If the total amount of bonds issued under the authority of a
state ceiling for a project or program is less than the amount
allocated, the remaining portion of the allocation shall revert to the
agency for reallocation in accordance with the criteria in RCW
39.86.130. If the amount of bonds actually issued under the authority
of a state ceiling is greater than the amount allocated, the entire
allocation shall be disallowed.

--- END ---