BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.230.010 and 2007 c 273 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Ambulatory surgical facility" means any distinct entity that
operates for the primary purpose of providing specialty or
multispecialty outpatient surgical services in which patients are
admitted to and discharged from the facility within twenty-four hours
and do not require inpatient hospitalization, whether or not the
facility is certified under Title XVIII of the federal social security
act. An ambulatory surgical facility includes one or more surgical
suites that are adjacent to and within the same building as, but not
in, the office of a practitioner in an individual or group practice, if
the primary purpose of the one or more surgical suites is to provide
specialty or multispecialty outpatient surgical services, irrespective
of the type of anesthesia administered in the one or more surgical
suites. An ambulatory surgical facility that is adjacent to and within
the same building as the office of a practitioner in an individual or
group practice may include a surgical suite that shares a reception
area, restroom, waiting room, or wall with the office of the
practitioner in an individual or group practice.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "General anesthesia" means a state of unconsciousness
intentionally produced by anesthetic agents, with absence of pain
sensation over the entire body, in which the patient is without
protective reflexes and is unable to maintain an airway.
(4) "Person" means an individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, joint stock association, and the legal successor
thereof.
(5) "Practitioner" means any physician or surgeon licensed under
chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician or surgeon licensed under
chapter 18.57 RCW, or a podiatric physician or surgeon licensed under
chapter 18.22 RCW.
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(7) "Surgical services" means invasive medical procedures that:
(a) Utilize a knife, laser, cautery, cryogenics, or chemicals; and
(b) Remove, correct, or facilitate the diagnosis or cure of a
disease, process, or injury through that branch of medicine that treats
diseases, injuries, and deformities by manual or operative methods by
a practitioner.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.230.040 and 2007 c 273 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter:
(1) Applies to an ambulatory surgical facility that is maintained
and operated by a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW;
(2) Applies to an office maintained for the practice of dentistry;
(3) Applies to outpatient specialty or multispecialty surgical
services routinely and customarily performed in the office of a
practitioner in an individual or group practice ((that do not require
general anesthesia)), where the primary purpose of the office is not as
set forth in RCW 70.230.010(1), provided that any surgical services in
which general anesthesia is a planned event must be performed only in
an ambulatory surgical facility as defined in this chapter or in a
hospital or hospital-associated surgical center licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW; or
(4) Limits an ambulatory surgical facility to performing only
surgical services.

--- END ---