BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.320.400 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.520 are each
amended to read as follows:
Qualifications of electors above the age of eighteen at all school
elections shall be the same as at a general state or county election.
Except as otherwise provided by law, only those electors residing
within the district shall be entitled to vote((, and)). Students
having attained the age of fourteen as of the date of the election
shall be entitled to vote in school board elections for the district in
which they are enrolled and in good standing. An elector may vote only
at the polling place designated by the proper election official.

--- END ---