BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.260 and 2006 c 265 s 307 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each agency shall make application for a license or ((renewal
of)) the continuation of a full license to the department on forms
prescribed by the department. Upon receipt of such application, the
department shall either grant or deny a license or continuation of a
full license within ninety days. A license or continuation shall be
granted if the agency meets the minimum requirements set forth in this
chapter and the departmental requirements consistent with ((the
[this])) this chapter, except that an initial license may be issued as
provided in RCW 43.215.280. Full licenses provided for in this chapter
shall ((be issued for a period of three years)) continue to remain
valid so long as the licensee meets the requirements for a nonexpiring
license in subsection (2) of this section. The licensee, however,
shall advise the director of any material change in circumstances which
might constitute grounds for reclassification of license as to
category. The license issued under this chapter is not transferable
and applies only to the licensee and the location stated in the
application. For licensed family day care homes having an acceptable
history of child care, the license may remain in effect for two weeks
after a move.
(2) In order to qualify for a nonexpiring full license, a licensee
must meet the following requirements on an annual basis as established
from the date of initial licensure:
(a) Submit the annual licensing fee;
(b) Submit a declaration to the department indicating the
licensee's intent to continue operating a licensed child care program,
or the intent to cease operation on a date certain;
(c) Submit a declaration of compliance with all licensing rules;
and
(d) Submit background check applications on the schedule
established by the department.
(3) A licensee who fails to meet the requirements in subsection (2)
of this section for continuation of a full license will cause the
license to expire and must submit a new application for licensure under
this chapter.

--- END ---