BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.04.331 and 1986 c 203 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a theater or other commercial food service establishment
prepares and sells popcorn for human consumption, the establishment, at
the point of sale, shall disclose by posting a sign in a conspicuous
manner to prospective consumers a statement as to whether the butter or
butter-like flavoring added to or attributed to the popcorn offered for
sale is butter ((as defined in RCW 15.32.010)) or is some other
product. If the flavoring is some other product, the establishment
shall also disclose the ingredients of the product.
The director of agriculture shall adopt rules prescribing the size
and content of the sign upon which the disclosure is to be made. Any
popcorn sold by or offered for sale by such an establishment to a
consumer in violation of this section or the rules of the director
implementing this section shall be deemed to be misbranded for the
purposes of this chapter.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section do not apply
to packaged popcorn labeled so as to disclose ingredients as required
by law for prepackaged foods.
(3) For purposes of this section, "butter" is defined as the food
product usually known as butter, and which is made exclusively from
milk or cream, or both, with or without common salt, and with or
without additional coloring matter, and containing not less than eighty
percent by weight or milkfat, all tolerance having been allowed for.

Sec. 2 RCW 15.53.902 and 2005 c 40 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is unlawful for any person to distribute an adulterated feed.
A commercial feed is deemed to be adulterated:
(1) If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance
which may render it injurious to health; but in case the substance is
not an added substance, such commercial feed shall not be considered
adulterated under this subsection if the quantity of such substance in
such commercial feed does not ordinarily render it injurious to health;
or
(2) If it bears or contains any added poisonous, added deleterious,
or added nonnutritive substance which is unsafe within the meaning of
section 406 of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act (other than one
which is (a) a pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural
commodity; or (b) a food additive); or
(3) If it is, or it bears, or contains any food additive which is
unsafe within the meaning of section 409 of the federal food, drug, and
cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 348); or
(4) If it is ruminant feed and is, bears, or contains any animal
protein prohibited in ruminant feed that is unsafe within the meaning
of federal regulations promulgated under section 409 of the federal
food, drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 348); or
(5) If it is a raw agricultural commodity and it bears or contains
a pesticide chemical which is unsafe within the meaning of section
408(a) of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act: PROVIDED, That
where a pesticide chemical has been used in or on a raw agricultural
commodity in conformity with an exemption granted or a tolerance
prescribed under section 408 of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic
act and such raw agricultural commodity has been subjected to
processing such as canning, cooking, freezing, dehydrating, or milling,
the residue of such pesticide chemical remaining in or on such
processed feed shall not be deemed unsafe if such residue in or on the
raw agricultural commodity has been removed to the extent possible in
good manufacturing practice and the concentration of such residue in
the processed feed is not greater than the tolerance prescribed for the
raw agricultural commodity unless the feeding of such processed feed
will result or is likely to result in a pesticide residue in the edible
product of the animal, which is unsafe within the meaning of section
408(a) of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act; or
(6) If it is, or it bears or contains any color additive which is
unsafe within the meaning of section ((706)) 721 of the federal food,
drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 379e); or
(7) If it is, or it bears or contains any new animal drug that is
unsafe within the meaning of section 512 of the federal food, drug, and
cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 360b); or
(8) If any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part
omitted or abstracted therefrom or any less valuable substance
substituted therefor; or
(9) If its composition or quality falls below or differs from that
which it is purported or is represented to possess by its labeling; or
(10) If it contains a drug and the methods used in or the
facilities or controls used for its manufacture, processing, or
packaging do not conform to current good manufacturing practice rules
adopted by the department to assure that the drug meets the
requirements of this chapter as to safety and has the identity and
strength and meets the quality and purity characteristics that it
purports or is represented to possess. In adopting such rules, the
department shall adopt the current good manufacturing practice
regulations for type A medicated articles and type B and type C
medicated feeds established under authority of the federal food, drug,
and cosmetic act, unless the department determines that they are not
appropriate to the conditions that exist in this state; or
(11) If it contains viable, prohibited (primary) noxious weed seeds
in excess of one per pound, or if it contains viable, restricted
(secondary) noxious weed seeds in excess of twenty-five per pound. The
primary and secondary noxious weed seeds shall be those as named
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 15.49 RCW and rules adopted
thereunder.

Sec. 3 RCW 16.65.440 and 2003 c 326 s 89 and 2003 c 53 s 116 are
each reenacted to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any
person who violates any provisions or requirements of this chapter or
rules adopted by the director pursuant to this chapter is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(2) A second or subsequent violation is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec. 4 RCW 22.09.830 and 1994 sp.s. c 6 s 901 and 1994 c 46 s 6
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All moneys collected as fees for weighing, grading, and
inspecting commodities and all other fees collected under the
provisions of this chapter, except as provided in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section, shall be deposited in the grain inspection
revolving fund, which is hereby established. The state treasurer is
the custodian of the revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving
fund shall be on authorization of the director of the department of
agriculture. The revolving fund is subject to the allotment procedure
provided in chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
disbursements from the fund. The fund shall be used for all expenses
directly incurred by the grain inspection program in carrying out the
provisions of this chapter ((and for departmental administrative
expenses during the 1993-95 biennium. The department may use so much
of such fund not exceeding five percent thereof as the director of
agriculture may determine necessary for research and promotional work,
including rate studies, relating to wheat and wheat products)).
(2) All fees collected for the inspection, grading, and testing of
hops shall be deposited into the hop inspection fund, which is hereby
established, and shall be retained by the department for the purpose of
inspecting, grading, and testing hops. Any moneys in any fund retained
by the department on July 1, 1963, and derived from hop inspection and
grading shall be deposited to this hop inspection fund. For the
purposes of research which would contribute to the development of
superior hop varieties and to improve hop production and harvest
practices, the department may expend up to twenty percent of the moneys
deposited in the hop inspection fund during the fiscal year ending June
30th immediately preceding the year in which such expenditures are to
be made. No expenditures shall be made under the provisions of this
subsection when the hop inspection fund is, or the director may
reasonably anticipate that it will be, reduced below twenty thousand
dollars as the result of such expenditure or other necessary
expenditures made to carry out the inspection, grading, and testing of
hops.
(3) All moneys collected by the grain warehouse audit program,
including grain warehouse license fees pursuant to RCW 22.09.050 and
22.09.055, shall be deposited by the director into the grain warehouse
audit account, hereby created within the agricultural local fund
established in RCW 43.23.230. Moneys collected shall be used to
support the grain warehouse audit program.

Sec. 5 RCW 16.24.120 and 2011 c 336 s 419 and 2011 c 103 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Upon taking possession of any livestock at large contrary to the
provisions of this chapter ((16.24 RCW)), or any unclaimed livestock
submitted or impounded, by any person, at any public livestock market
or any other facility approved by the director, the sheriff or brand
inspector shall cause it to be transported to and impounded at the
nearest public livestock market licensed under chapter 16.65 RCW or at
such place as approved by the director. If the sheriff has impounded
an animal in accordance with this section, he or she shall forthwith
notify the nearest brand inspector of the department of agriculture,
who shall examine the animal and, by brand, tattoo, or other
identifying characteristic, shall attempt to ascertain the ownership
thereof.

Sec. 6 RCW 15.58.150 and 2003 c 212 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful for any person to distribute within the state or
deliver for transportation or transport in intrastate commerce or
between points within this state through any point outside this state
any of the following:
(a) Any pesticide which has not been registered pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter;
(b) Any pesticide if any of the claims made for it or any of the
directions for its use or other labeling differs from the
representations made in connection with its registration, or if the
composition of a pesticide differs from its composition as represented
in connection with its registration: PROVIDED, That at the discretion
of the director, a change in the labeling or formula of a pesticide may
be made within a registration period without requiring reregistration
of the product;
(c) Any pesticide unless it is in the registrant's or the
manufacturer's unbroken immediate container and there is affixed to
such container, and to the outside container or wrapper of the retail
package, if there is one through which the required information on the
immediate container cannot be clearly read, a label bearing the
information required in this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter;
(d) Any pesticide ((including arsenicals, fluorides, fluosilicates,
and/or any other white powdered pesticides)) unless ((they have)) it
has been distinctly denatured as to color, taste, odor, or form if so
required by rule;
(e) Any pesticide which is adulterated or misbranded, or any device
which is misbranded;
(f) Any pesticide in containers, violating rules adopted pursuant
to RCW 15.58.040(2)(f) or pesticides found in containers which are
unsafe due to damage.
(2) It shall be unlawful:
(a) To sell or deliver any pesticide to any person who is required
by law or rules promulgated under such law to be certified, licensed,
or have a permit to use or purchase the pesticide unless such person or
the person's agent, to whom sale or delivery is made, has a valid
certification, license, or permit to use or purchase the kind and
quantity of such pesticide sold or delivered: PROVIDED, That, subject
to conditions established by the director, such permit may be obtained
immediately prior to sale or delivery from any person designated by the
director;
(b) For any person to detach, alter, deface or destroy, wholly or
in part, any label or labeling provided for in this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter, or to add any substance to, or take any
substance from, a pesticide in a manner that may defeat the purpose of
this chapter or the rules adopted thereunder;
(c) For any person to use or cause to be used any pesticide
contrary to label directions or to regulations of the director if those
regulations differ from or further restrict the label directions:
PROVIDED, The compliance to the term "contrary to label directions" is
enforced by the director consistent with the intent of this chapter;
(d) For any person to use for his or her own advantage or to
reveal, other than to the director or proper officials or employees of
the state, or to the courts of the state in response to a subpoena, or
to physicians, or in emergencies to pharmacists and other qualified
persons for use in the preparation of antidotes, any information
relative to formulas of products acquired by authority of RCW
15.58.060;
(e) For any person to make false, misleading, or erroneous
statements or reports concerning any pest during or after a pest
inspection or to fail to comply with criteria established by rule for
structural pest inspections;
(f) For any person to make false, misleading, or erroneous
statements or reports in connection with any pesticide complaint or
investigation;
(g) For any person to act as, or advertise that they perform the
services of, a structural pest inspector without having a license to
act as a structural pest inspector;
(h) For a business to conduct one or more complete wood destroying
organism inspections without first having obtained a structural pest
inspection company license from the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 15.58.370 (Results of analyses to be published) and 1971
ex.s. c 190 s 37; and
(2) RCW 19.94.505 (Gasoline containing alcohol -- Dispensing device
label required -- Carbon monoxide nonattainment area -- Penalty) and 2000
c 171 s 65, 1992 c 237 s 34, & 1984 c 61 s 1.

--- END ---