BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) A pharmaceutical manufacturer that sells
or distributes medication in this state that is usually intended to be
self-injected at home through the use of hypodermic needles, syringes
with needles attached, intravenous tubing with needles attached,
lancets, or any other similar devices shall submit a plan to the
department of health that describes specific actions the manufacturer
will take on and after January 1, 2013, to provide a free and
convenient service for the safe collection and proper disposal of
residential sharps waste to all consumers who use the manufacturer's
self-injected medications.
(2) The plan required under subsection (1) of this section must be
submitted to the department of health by July 1, 2012, and updated and
submitted annually thereafter by July 1st.
(3) Every pharmaceutical manufacturer required to submit a plan
under this section shall pay a filing fee to the department of health
at the time the plan is submitted. The department of health shall
determine the amount of the filing fee based on the estimated cost to
the department in reviewing the manufacturer's plan and monitoring
compliance with the plan.
(4) The department of health is responsible for collecting the
filing fees authorized under subsection (3) of this section. The
department of health shall deposit all filing fees collected under this
section into the state toxics control account under RCW 70.105D.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The plan required under section 1 of
this act must be submitted in an electronic format prescribed by the
department of health. The plan must identify by name all of the
pharmaceutical manufacturer's medications that are usually intended to
be self-injected. The plan must also include, at a minimum, a
description of the actions the manufacturer will take to do the
following:
(a) Provide patient starter kits or other educational materials on
safe needle disposal to new patients;
(b) Provide, at no cost to the consumer, sharps waste containers
approved by the United States postal service for use in a mail program;
and
(c) Provide consumer information about the safe management and
proper disposal of needles through literature, web sites, DVDs, or
toll-free numbers.
(2) If a plan submitted by a manufacturer does not provide for a
free mail program, the plan must include and describe a free and
convenient network of retail businesses, such as pharmacies, that the
manufacturer will establish to safely collect and dispose of
residential sharps waste. The manufacturer shall also describe in its
plan how it intends to support efforts by retailers, local governments,
health care organizations, public health officers, and solid waste
service providers to ensure the public is aware of the free and
convenient collection network established by the manufacturer.
(3) The department of health shall post and maintain all copies of
all plans submitted by pharmaceutical manufacturers on its web site.
(4) Pharmaceutical manufacturers shall post and maintain a copy of
the plan required under section 1 of this act on their web sites.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2)
of this section, a pharmaceutical manufacturer that fails to submit or
implement a plan as required under section 1 of this act, or post a
copy of the plan on the pharmaceutical manufacturer's web site as
required under section 2 of this act, is subject to a civil penalty of:
(i) Five thousand dollars per day for every day the plan is late; (ii)
five thousand dollars per day for every day the manufacturer fails to
fully implement its plan; and (iii) five thousand dollars per day for
every day the plan is not posted on the pharmaceutical manufacturer's
web site.
(b) The department of health is responsible for collecting the
penalties authorized under (a) of this subsection. The department of
health shall deposit all penalties collected under this section into
the state toxics control account under RCW 70.105D.070.
(2) Neither this section nor section 1 or 2 of this act apply to a
pharmaceutical manufacturer that provides a written notification to the
department of health by July 1, 2012, and each year thereafter, stating
that the manufacturer: (a) Has previously submitted a plan to an
agency of state government that documents that the manufacturer has
arranged to provide, at no cost to the consumer, a sharps waste
container that has been approved by the United States postal service
for use in a mail program; and (b) is continuing to provide a free and
convenient mail program to residents of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Expenses to cover the cost of administering
sections 1 through 3 and 5 of this act must be paid from the state
toxics control account under RCW 70.105D.070.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The department of health may adopt rules as
necessary for the purpose of implementing, administering, and enforcing
sections 1 through 4 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 942, 2009 c 564
s 951, and 2009 c 187 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship;
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150;
(xiii) Reimbursement for expenses as authorized under section 4 of
this act;
(xiv) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, shoreline update
technical assistance; and
(((xiv))) (xv) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium,
multijurisdictional permitting teams.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Remedial actions;
(ii) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(iii) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(iv) Funds for a program to assist in the assessment and cleanup of
sites of methamphetamine production, but not to be used for the initial
containment of such sites, consistent with the responsibilities and
intent of RCW 69.50.511; and
(v) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment.
(b) Funds for plans and programs shall be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW, except that any applicant that
is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, along with any
project that is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget
Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, shall, except as conditioned by
RCW 70.105D.120, receive priority for any available funding for any
grant or funding programs or sources that use a competitive bidding
process. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account
may also be used for grants to local governments to retrofit public
sector diesel equipment and for storm water planning and implementation
activities.
(c) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department shall
partner with local communities and liable parties for cleanups. The
department is authorized to use the following additional strategies in
order to ensure a healthful environment for future generations:
(i) The director may alter grant-matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational, or habitat restoration opportunities that would
not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of vacant, orphaned, or abandoned property under RCW
70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;
(ii) The use of outside contracts to conduct necessary studies;
(iii) The purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance, when
necessary to expedite multiparty clean-up efforts.
(d) To facilitate and expedite cleanups using funds from the local
toxics control account, during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium the
director may establish grant-funded accounts to hold and disperse local
toxics control account funds and funds from local governments to be
used for remedial actions.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) Except during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, one percent of the
moneys deposited into the state and local toxics control accounts shall
be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be
adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous
substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The
primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by
persons and organizations in the investigation and remedying of
releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances and to
implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management priorities.
No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed
annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from either
account which are not expended at the close of any biennium shall
revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation, or, after January 1,
2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound,
funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the
action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2007-2009 and 2009-2011 fiscal biennia, the
legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to
either the state general fund or the oil spill prevention account, or
both such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the account.
(9) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control
account may also be used for a standby rescue tug at Neah Bay, local
government shoreline update grants, private and public sector diesel
equipment retrofit, and oil spill prevention, preparedness, and
response activities.
(10) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state toxics control account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 70.95K RCW.

--- END ---