BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.41.047 and 2009 c 293 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time a person is convicted or found not guilty by reason
of insanity of an offense making the person ineligible to possess a
firearm, or at the time a person is committed by court order under RCW
71.05.240, 71.05.320, 71.34.740, 71.34.750, or chapter 10.77 RCW for
mental health treatment, the convicting or committing court shall
notify the person, orally and in writing, that the person must
immediately surrender any concealed pistol license and that the person
may not possess a firearm unless his or her right to do so is restored
by a court of record. For purposes of this section a convicting court
includes a court in which a person has been found not guilty by reason
of insanity.
The convicting or committing court shall forward within three
judicial days after conviction or entry of the commitment order a copy
of the person's driver's license or identicard, or comparable
information, along with the date of conviction or commitment, to the
department of licensing. When a person is committed by court order
under RCW 71.05.240, 71.05.320, 71.34.740, 71.34.750, or chapter 10.77
RCW, for mental health treatment, the committing court also shall
forward, within three judicial days after entry of the commitment
order, a copy of the person's driver's license, or comparable
information, along with the date of commitment, to the national instant
criminal background check system index, denied persons file, created by
the federal Brady handgun violence prevention act (P.L. 103-159).
(2) Upon receipt of the information provided for by subsection (1)
of this section, the department of licensing shall determine if the
convicted or committed person has a concealed pistol license. If the
person does have a concealed pistol license, the department of
licensing shall immediately notify the license-issuing authority which,
upon receipt of such notification, shall immediately revoke the
license.
(3)(a) A person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm, by
reason of having been involuntarily committed for mental health
treatment under RCW 71.05.240, 71.05.320, 71.34.740, 71.34.750, chapter
10.77 RCW, or equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction may, upon
discharge, petition the superior court to have his or her right to
possess a firearm restored.
(b) The petition may be brought in the superior court that ordered
the involuntary commitment or the superior court of the county in which
the petitioner resides.
(c) Except as provided in (d) of this subsection, the court shall
restore the petitioner's right to possess a firearm if the petitioner
proves by a preponderance of the evidence that:
(i) The petitioner is no longer required to participate in court-ordered inpatient or outpatient treatment;
(ii) The petitioner has successfully managed the condition related
to the commitment;
(iii) The petitioner no longer presents a substantial danger to
himself or herself, or the public; and
(iv) The symptoms related to the commitment are not reasonably
likely to recur.
(d) If a preponderance of the evidence in the record supports a
finding that the person petitioning the court has engaged in violence
and that it is more likely than not that the person will engage in
violence after his or her right to possess a firearm is restored, the
person shall bear the burden of proving by clear, cogent, and
convincing evidence that he or she does not present a substantial
danger to the safety of others.
(e) When a person's right to possess a firearm has been restored
under this subsection, the court shall forward, within three judicial
days after entry of the restoration order, notification that the
person's right to possess a firearm has been restored to the department
of licensing((, the department of social and health services,)) and the
national instant criminal background check system index, denied persons
file.
(4) No person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity
may petition a court for restoration of the right to possess a firearm
unless the person meets the requirements for the restoration of the
right to possess a firearm under RCW 9.41.040(4).

Sec. 2 RCW 9.41.070 and 2009 c 216 s 5 and 2009 c 59 s 1 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a
county shall within thirty days after the filing of an application of
any person, issue a license to such person to carry a pistol concealed
on his or her person within this state for five years from date of
issue, for the purposes of protection or while engaged in business,
sport, or while traveling. However, if the applicant does not have a
valid permanent Washington driver's license or Washington state
identification card or has not been a resident of the state for the
previous consecutive ninety days, the issuing authority shall have up
to sixty days after the filing of the application to issue a license.
The issuing authority shall not refuse to accept completed applications
for concealed pistol licenses during regular business hours.
The applicant's constitutional right to bear arms shall not be
denied, unless:
(a) He or she is ineligible to possess a firearm under the
provisions of RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045;
(b) The applicant's concealed pistol license is in a revoked
status;
(c) He or she is under twenty-one years of age;
(d) He or she is subject to a court order or injunction regarding
firearms pursuant to RCW 9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045,
26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.50.060,
26.50.070, or 26.26.590;
(e) He or she is free on bond or personal recognizance pending
trial, appeal, or sentencing for a felony offense;
(f) He or she has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from
any court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor; or
(g) He or she has been ordered to forfeit a firearm under RCW
9.41.098(1)(e) within one year before filing an application to carry a
pistol concealed on his or her person.
No person convicted of a felony may have his or her right to
possess firearms restored or his or her privilege to carry a concealed
pistol restored, unless the person has been granted relief from
disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c), or
RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.
(2) The issuing authority shall ((check with the national crime
information center, the Washington state patrol electronic database,
the department of social and health services electronic database))
conduct a check through the national instant criminal background check
system, the Washington crime information center, the department of
licensing, and ((with)) other agencies or resources as appropriate, to
determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or
9.41.045 to possess a firearm and therefore ineligible for a concealed
pistol license. Until June 30, 2012, the issuing authority may but
need not make an additional check with the department of social and
health services. This subsection applies whether the applicant is
applying for a new concealed pistol license or to renew a concealed
pistol license.
(3) Any person whose firearms rights have been restricted and who
has been granted relief from disabilities by the attorney general under
18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c) or who is exempt under 18 U.S.C. Sec.
921(a)(20)(A) shall have his or her right to acquire, receive,
transfer, ship, transport, carry, and possess firearms in accordance
with Washington state law restored except as otherwise prohibited by
this chapter.
(4) The license application shall bear the full name, residential
address, telephone number at the option of the applicant, date and
place of birth, race, gender, description, a complete set of
fingerprints, and signature of the licensee, and the licensee's
driver's license number or state identification card number if used for
identification in applying for the license. A signed application for
a concealed pistol license shall constitute a waiver of confidentiality
and written request that the department of social and health services,
mental health institutions, and other health care facilities release
information relevant to the applicant's eligibility for a concealed
pistol license to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.
The application for an original license shall include two complete
sets of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol.
The license and application shall contain a warning substantially
as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal
law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you
are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you
may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a
defense to a federal prosecution.

The license shall contain a description of the major differences
between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local
laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be
consistent with state law. The application shall contain questions
about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a
pistol, the applicant's place of birth, and whether the applicant is a
United States citizen. The applicant shall not be required to produce
a birth certificate or other evidence of citizenship. A person who is
not a citizen of the United States shall, if applicable, meet the
additional requirements of RCW 9.41.173 and produce proof of compliance
with RCW 9.41.173 upon application. The license may be in triplicate
or in a form to be prescribed by the department of licensing.
The original thereof shall be delivered to the licensee, the
duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the director of licensing
and the triplicate shall be preserved for six years, by the authority
issuing the license.
The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement
and corrections agencies, in an on-line format, all information
received under this subsection.
(5) The nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the original
five-year license shall be thirty-six dollars plus additional charges
imposed by the federal bureau of investigation that are passed on to
the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit of government
may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the issuance of
the license.
The fee shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;
(b) Four dollars shall be paid to the agency taking the
fingerprints of the person licensed;
(c) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the
purpose of enforcing this chapter; and
(d) Three dollars to the firearms range account in the general
fund.
(6) The nonrefundable fee for the renewal of such license shall be
thirty-two dollars. No other branch or unit of government may impose
any additional charges on the applicant for the renewal of the license.
The renewal fee shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;
(b) Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the
purpose of enforcing this chapter; and
(c) Three dollars to the firearms range account in the general
fund.
(7) The nonrefundable fee for replacement of lost or damaged
licenses is ten dollars to be paid to the issuing authority.
(8) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option
of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the
option of the issuing authority.
(9) A licensee may renew a license if the licensee applies for
renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the
license. A license so renewed shall take effect on the expiration date
of the prior license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of
the license must pay a late renewal penalty of ten dollars in addition
to the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this section. The
fee shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Three dollars shall be deposited in the state wildlife account
and used exclusively first for the printing and distribution of a
pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms safety,
and the preemptive nature of state law, and subsequently the support of
volunteer instructors in the basic firearms safety training program
conducted by the department of fish and wildlife. The pamphlet shall
be given to each applicant for a license; and
(b) Seven dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the
purpose of enforcing this chapter.
(10) Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (1) through
(9) of this section, the chief of police of the municipality or the
sheriff of the county of the applicant's residence may issue a
temporary emergency license for good cause pending review under
subsection (1) of this section. However, a temporary emergency license
issued under this subsection shall not exempt the holder of the license
from any records check requirement. Temporary emergency licenses shall
be easily distinguishable from regular licenses.
(11) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the
requirements of this section or chapter, nor may a political
subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any information not
required by this section.
(12) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding
citizenship or identity on an application for a concealed pistol
license is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition
to any other penalty provided for by law, the concealed pistol license
of a person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be revoked, and
the person shall be permanently ineligible for a concealed pistol
license.
(13) A person may apply for a concealed pistol license:
(a) To the municipality or to the county in which the applicant
resides if the applicant resides in a municipality;
(b) To the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant
resides in an unincorporated area; or
(c) Anywhere in the state if the applicant is a nonresident.
(14) Any person who, as a member of the armed forces, including the
national guard and armed forces reserves, is unable to renew his or her
license under subsections (6) and (9) of this section because of the
person's assignment, reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state
military service may renew his or her license within ninety days after
the person returns to this state from out-of-state military service, if
the person provides the following to the issuing authority no later
than ninety days after the person's date of discharge or assignment,
reassignment, or deployment back to this state: (a) A copy of the
person's original order designating the specific period of assignment,
reassignment, or deployment for out-of-state military service, and (b)
if appropriate, a copy of the person's discharge or amended or
subsequent assignment, reassignment, or deployment order back to this
state. A license so renewed under this subsection (14) shall take
effect on the expiration date of the prior license. A licensee
renewing after the expiration date of the license under this subsection
(14) shall pay only the renewal fee specified in subsection (6) of this
section and shall not be required to pay a late renewal penalty in
addition to the renewal fee.

Sec. 3 RCW 9.41.090 and 1996 c 295 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the other requirements of this chapter, no
dealer may deliver a pistol to the purchaser thereof until:
(a) The purchaser produces a valid concealed pistol license and the
dealer has recorded the purchaser's name, license number, and issuing
agency, such record to be made in triplicate and processed as provided
in subsection (5) of this section. For purposes of this subsection
(1)(a), a "valid concealed pistol license" does not include a temporary
emergency license, and does not include any license issued before July
1, 1996, unless the issuing agency conducted a records search for
disqualifying crimes under RCW 9.41.070 at the time of issuance;
(b) The dealer is notified in writing by the chief of police or the
sheriff of the jurisdiction in which the purchaser resides that the
purchaser is eligible to possess a pistol under RCW 9.41.040 and that
the application to purchase is approved by the chief of police or
sheriff; or
(c) Five business days, meaning days on which state offices are
open, have elapsed from the time of receipt of the application for the
purchase thereof as provided herein by the chief of police or sheriff
designated in subsection (5) of this section, and, when delivered, the
pistol shall be securely wrapped and shall be unloaded. However, if
the purchaser does not have a valid permanent Washington driver's
license or state identification card or has not been a resident of the
state for the previous consecutive ninety days, the waiting period
under this subsection (1)(c) shall be up to sixty days.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, in determining
whether the purchaser meets the requirements of RCW 9.41.040, the chief
of police or sheriff, or the designee of either, shall ((check with the
national crime information center, the Washington state patrol
electronic database, the department of social and health services
electronic database)) conduct a check through the national instant
criminal background check system, the Washington crime information
center, the department of licensing, and ((with)) other agencies or
resources as appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is
ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm. Until June 30,
2012, an additional check may but need not be made with the department
of social and health services.
(b) Once the system is established, a dealer shall use the state
system and national instant criminal background check system, provided
for by the Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act (18 U.S.C. Sec. 921 et
seq.), to make criminal background checks of applicants to purchase
firearms. However, a chief of police or sheriff, or a designee of
either, shall continue to check ((the department of social and health
services' electronic database and)) with other agencies or resources as
appropriate, to determine whether applicants are ineligible under RCW
9.41.040 to possess a firearm.
(3) In any case under subsection (1)(c) of this section where the
applicant has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any
court of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor, the dealer
shall hold the delivery of the pistol until the warrant for arrest is
served and satisfied by appropriate court appearance. The local
jurisdiction for purposes of the sale shall confirm the existence of
outstanding warrants within seventy-two hours after notification of the
application to purchase a pistol is received. The local jurisdiction
shall also immediately confirm the satisfaction of the warrant on
request of the dealer so that the hold may be released if the warrant
was for an offense other than an offense making a person ineligible
under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a pistol.
(4) In any case where the chief or sheriff of the local
jurisdiction has reasonable grounds based on the following
circumstances: (a) Open criminal charges, (b) pending criminal
proceedings, (c) pending commitment proceedings, (d) an outstanding
warrant for an offense making a person ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to
possess a pistol, or (e) an arrest for an offense making a person
ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a pistol, if the records of
disposition have not yet been reported or entered sufficiently to
determine eligibility to purchase a pistol, the local jurisdiction may
hold the sale and delivery of the pistol beyond five days up to thirty
days in order to confirm existing records in this state or elsewhere.
After thirty days, the hold will be lifted unless an extension of the
thirty days is approved by a local district court or municipal court
for good cause shown. A dealer shall be notified of each hold placed
on the sale by local law enforcement and of any application to the
court for additional hold period to confirm records or confirm the
identity of the applicant.
(5) At the time of applying for the purchase of a pistol, the
purchaser shall sign in triplicate and deliver to the dealer an
application containing his or her full name, residential address, date
and place of birth, race, and gender; the date and hour of the
application; the applicant's driver's license number or state
identification card number; a description of the pistol including the
make, model, caliber and manufacturer's number if available at the time
of applying for the purchase of a pistol. If the manufacturer's number
is not available, the application may be processed, but delivery of the
pistol to the purchaser may not occur unless the manufacturer's number
is recorded on the application by the dealer and transmitted to the
chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county in
which the purchaser resides; and a statement that the purchaser is
eligible to possess a pistol under RCW 9.41.040.
The application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal
law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you
are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you
may be prosecuted in federal court. State permission to
purchase a firearm is not a defense to a federal prosecution.

The purchaser shall be given a copy of the department of fish and
wildlife pamphlet on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms
safety, and the fact that local laws and ordinances on firearms are
preempted by state law and must be consistent with state law.
The dealer shall, by the end of the business day, sign and attach
his or her address and deliver a copy of the application and such other
documentation as required under subsection (1) of this section to the
chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county of
which the purchaser is a resident. The triplicate shall be retained by
the dealer for six years. The dealer shall deliver the pistol to the
purchaser following the period of time specified in this section unless
the dealer is notified of an investigative hold under subsection (4) of
this section in writing by the chief of police of the municipality or
the sheriff of the county, whichever is applicable, denying the
purchaser's application to purchase and the grounds thereof. The
application shall not be denied unless the purchaser is not eligible to
possess a pistol under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045, or federal law.
The chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the
county shall retain or destroy applications to purchase a pistol in
accordance with the requirements of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 922.
(6) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding
identity or eligibility requirements on the application to purchase a
pistol is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040.
(7) This section does not apply to sales to licensed dealers for
resale or to the sale of antique firearms.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.41.173 and 2009 c 216 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to obtain an alien firearm license, a nonimmigrant
alien residing in Washington must apply to the sheriff of the county in
which he or she resides.
(2) The sheriff of the county shall within sixty days after the
filing of an application of a nonimmigrant alien residing in the state
of Washington, issue an alien firearm license to such person to carry
or possess a firearm for the purposes of hunting and sport shooting.
The license shall be good for two years. The issuing authority shall
not refuse to accept completed applications for alien firearm licenses
during regular business hours. An application for a license may not be
denied, unless the applicant's alien firearm license is in a revoked
status, or the applicant:
(a) Is ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions of RCW
9.41.040 or 9.41.045;
(b) Is subject to a court order or injunction regarding firearms
pursuant to RCW 9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050,
26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.50.060, 26.50.070, or
26.26.590;
(c) Is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal,
or sentencing for a felony offense; or
(d) Has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any court
of competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor.
No license application shall be granted to a nonimmigrant alien
convicted of a felony unless the person has been granted relief from
disabilities by the attorney general under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c), or
unless RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.
(3) The sheriff shall ((check with the national crime information
center, the Washington state patrol electronic database, the department
of social and health services electronic database)) conduct a check
through the national instant criminal background check system, the
Washington crime information center, the department of licensing, and
((with)) other agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine
whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to
possess a firearm. Until June 30, 2012, the sheriff may but need not
make an additional check with the department of social and health
services.
(4) The license application shall bear the full name, residential
address, telephone number at the option of the applicant, date and
place of birth, race, gender, description, not more than two complete
sets of fingerprints, and signature of the applicant, a copy of the
applicant's passport and visa showing the applicant is in the country
legally, and a valid Washington hunting license or documentation that
the applicant is a member of a sport shooting club.
A signed application for an alien firearm license shall constitute
a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the department of
social and health services, mental health institutions, and other
health care facilities release information relevant to the applicant's
eligibility for an alien firearm license to an inquiring court or law
enforcement agency.
The application for an original license shall include a complete
set of fingerprints to be forwarded to the Washington state patrol.
The license and application shall contain a warning substantially
as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ, federal
law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you
are prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you
may be prosecuted in federal court. A state license is not a
defense to a federal prosecution.

The license shall contain a description of the major differences
between state and federal law and an explanation of the fact that local
laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be
consistent with state law. The application shall contain questions
about the applicant's eligibility under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a
firearm. The nonimmigrant alien applicant shall be required to produce
a passport and visa as evidence of being in the country legally.
The license may be in triplicate or in a form to be prescribed by
the department of licensing. The original thereof shall be delivered
to the licensee, the duplicate shall within seven days be sent to the
director of licensing and the triplicate shall be preserved for six
years, by the authority issuing the license.
The department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement
and corrections agencies, in an online format, all information received
under this section.
(5) The sheriff has the authority to collect a nonrefundable fee,
paid upon application, for the two-year license. The fee shall be
fifty dollars plus additional charges imposed by the Washington state
patrol and the federal bureau of investigation that are passed on to
the applicant. No other state or local branch or unit of government
may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the issuance of
the license. The fee shall be retained by the sheriff.
(6) Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option
of the applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the
option of the sheriff.
(7) A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the
requirements of this section, nor may a political subdivision ask the
applicant to voluntarily submit any information not required by this
section.
(8) A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding
citizenship or identity on an application for an alien firearm license
is guilty of false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition to any
other penalty provided for by law, the alien firearm license of a
person who knowingly makes a false statement shall be revoked, and the
person shall be permanently ineligible for an alien firearm license.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 By December 31, 2011, a regional support
network shall transfer information it retains regarding persons who
became ineligible to possess a firearm as a result of civil commitment
before July 26, 2009, to the national instant criminal background check
database.

--- END ---