BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.397 and 1999 c 232 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may approve a change of the point of diversion
prescribed in a permit to appropriate surface water for a beneficial
use if the ownership, purpose of use, season of use, and place of use
of the permit remain the same to an approved intake structure with
capacity to transport the additional diversion to either: (a) A point
of diversion that is located downstream ((and is an existing approved
intake structure with capacity to transport the additional diversion,
if the ownership, purpose of use, season of use, and place of use of
the permit remain the same)); or (b) a point of diversion located
between Columbia river miles 215.6 and 292, if the existing point of
diversion is contained therein.
(2) This section may not be construed as limiting in any manner
whatsoever other authorities of the department under RCW 90.03.380 or
other changes that may be approved under RCW 90.03.380 under
authorities existing before July 25, 1999.

--- END ---