BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.14.090 and 2006 c 307 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A health technology clinical committee is established, to
include the following eleven members appointed by the administrator in
consultation with participating state agencies:
(((a) Six)) (i) Five practicing physicians licensed under chapter
18.57 or 18.71 RCW; ((and
(b))) (ii) Five other practicing licensed health professionals who
use health technology in their scope of practice; and
(iii) One member who shall rotate according to the technology under
review by the committee pursuant to RCW 70.14.110.
(b) At least two members of the committee must have professional
experience treating women, children, elderly persons, and people with
diverse ethnic and racial backgrounds.
(c) At least two members shall have experience with evidence-based
medicine, clinical research, or technology assessment.
(d) The rotating member shall: Be a practicing physician who
regularly uses the technology under review in the care and treatment of
patients; be board-certified, if applicable, in the therapy under
review; and shall serve as a voting member of the committee during its
review and coverage determination for that technology. Except where no
available nominations are received, the rotating member shall be
appointed from nominations solicited by the administrator as follows:
(i) Upon finalizing the list of health technologies to be reviewed
by the committee under RCW 70.14.110, the administrator shall publish
a notice soliciting at least two nominations from the relevant
specialty medical societies for the technologies subject to review.
(ii) The most relevant medical societies may be Washington state-based or a state chapter of a relevant national society. National
societies may also submit names for a rotating member for a particular
technology.
(iii) The administrator shall receive nominations for at least
thirty days following publication of the notice required by this
subsection.
(2) Members of the committee:
(a) Shall not contract with or be employed by a health technology
manufacturer or a participating agency during their term or for
eighteen months before their appointment. As a condition of
appointment, each person shall agree to the terms and conditions
imposed by the administrator regarding conflicts of interest except
that the rotating member shall disclose such relationship but shall not
be disqualified so long as the rotating member suspends any financial
relationship during the term of the review of the technology;
(b) Are immune from civil liability for any official acts performed
in good faith as members of the committee; and
(c) Shall be compensated for participation in the work of the
committee in accordance with a personal services contract to be
executed after appointment and before commencement of activities
related to the work of the committee.
(3) Meetings of the committee and any advisory group are subject to
chapter 42.30 RCW, the open public meetings act, including RCW
42.30.110(1)(l), which authorizes an executive session during a regular
or special meeting to consider proprietary or confidential nonpublished
information.
(4) Neither the committee nor any advisory group is an agency for
purposes of chapter 34.05 RCW.
(5) The health care authority shall provide administrative support
to the committee and any advisory group, and may adopt rules governing
their operation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.14 RCW
to read as follows:
The administrator shall provide the following minimum opportunities
for public comment:
(1) Before any health technology can be selected for review or
rereview, there shall be a thirty-day public comment period once a year
during which, interested parties shall be encouraged to comment on the
need for the review of a specific technology. The thirty-day period
shall commence with publication of a detailed explanation of the
technology under consideration and the rationale for its selection.
The administrator shall make every reasonable effort to solicit
comments from appropriate medical, patient, and disease organizations
for each technology subject to review.
(2) Upon the publication of the draft key questions to be used by
the evidence reviewer for each health technology, there shall be a
thirty-day comment period including a publicly accessible conference
call with interested stakeholders to discuss the merits of each key
question for the specific technology.
(3) Upon the publication of the final key questions, there shall be
a thirty-day comment period to allow stakeholders the opportunity to
submit any evidence that may be of use in the assessment and any
studies that are currently underway.
(4) Upon publication of the draft assessment report for any health
technology, there shall be a thirty-day comment period. All comments
submitted during this period shall be submitted to the evidence
reviewer for timely consideration before publication of the final
report.
(5) Upon publication of the final report, there shall be a fifteen-
day comment period. Any evidence-based comments received during the
period shall be provided to the committee members at least fifteen days
in advance of the meeting where the technology will be considered.
(6) Upon publication of the draft findings and decision by the
committee on any technology, there shall be a thirty-day comment
period. All comments shall be provided to the committee members at
least fifteen days in advance of the next meeting.
(7) After the presentation by the agency medical directors and the
evidence reviewer, there shall be an opportunity for public testimony
at committee meetings for each technology scheduled for review.
Organizations and experts who request time for testimony in advance of
the meeting, subject only to overall standard public testimony time
limitations, shall be allowed a minimum of ten minutes for their
presentation and should be notified thirty days in advance of their
time allocation and approximate time on the agenda. Where applicable,
medical or patient societies that agree to conduct a coordinated
presentation, the presentation shall be allocated a minimum of twenty
minutes.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.14.110 and 2006 c 307 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The committee shall determine, for each health technology
selected for review under RCW 70.14.100: (a) The conditions, if any,
under which the health technology will be included as a covered benefit
in health care programs of participating agencies; and (b) if covered,
the criteria which the participating agency administering the program
must use to decide whether the technology is medically necessary, or
proper and necessary treatment.
(2) In making a determination under subsection (1) of this section,
the committee:
(a) Shall consider, in an open and transparent process, evidence
regarding the safety, efficacy, ((and)) cost-effectiveness, and
clinical practice patterns of the technology as set forth in the
systematic assessment conducted under RCW 70.14.100(4);
(b) Shall provide an opportunity for public comment; and
(c) May establish ad hoc temporary advisory groups if specialized
expertise is needed to review a particular health technology or group
of health technologies, or to seek input from enrollees or clients of
state purchased health care programs. Advisory group members are
immune from civil liability for any official act performed in good
faith as a member of the group. As a condition of appointment, each
person shall agree to the terms and conditions imposed by the
administrator regarding conflicts of interest.
(3) Determinations of the committee under subsection (1) of this
section shall be consistent with decisions made under the federal
medicare program and ((in)) with evidence-based expert treatment
guidelines((, including those)) from national specialty physician
organizations and patient advocacy organizations, unless the committee
concludes, based on its review of the systematic assessment, that
substantial evidence regarding the safety, efficacy, and cost-effectiveness of the technology supports a contrary determination. The
committee shall issue a written report when medicare decisions or
expert treatment guidelines are not followed and shall cite the
specific evidence and reasons for not following those decisions or
guidelines.

--- END ---