BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that it is
critically important that scientific information used to inform public
policy be of the highest quality and integrity.
(2) The legislature further finds that the scientific information
used in support of or in justification for public policy actions in the
state of Washington can be of varying quality and integrity.
(3) The legislature further finds that a perceived lack of quality
and integrity of scientific information is a key factor leading to
litigation.
(4) The legislature further finds that the generally accepted
approach to assuring the quality and integrity of scientific
information is the conduct of independent peer review by qualified
experts.
(5) The legislature further finds that the state of Washington has
not previously adopted a uniform standard for the use of independent
peer review by qualified experts.
(6) The legislature further finds that the only way to ensure that
agencies use scientifically credible information is for all agencies to
use the generally accepted practice of peer review.
(7) The legislature therefore declares that all government agencies
operating within the state must use the standards for peer review
established in sections 2 through 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Prior to taking agency action of any
kind, including the provision of technical assistance, related to
environmental, natural resources, access to and use of water, or land
use management, an agency must use peer-reviewed science.
(2) For purposes of this section, "peer-reviewed science" means
information developed using the scientific method for which the
following factors are true:
(a) The scientific information is provided by a qualified,
scientific professional or professionals with issue-appropriate
expertise based on the professional's credentials, certifications,
earned advanced degrees, years of experience, recognized leadership in
an appropriate scholarly area, formal training, and recognized ability
to produce peer-reviewed professional literature;
(b) The scientific information has been subjected to independent
peer review by at least three reviewers who are qualified and are
independent with no conflict of interest. Independent peer review may
be performed by reputable scientific journals, scholarly organizations
such as the national academies, commissioned by the relevant agency, or
commissioned by qualified entities whose interests will be affected by
the action;
(c) The methods used to obtain the information are clearly stated,
standardized for the pertinent scientific discipline, and are able to
be replicated;
(d) The conclusions underlying the information are based on
reasonable and logical assumptions supported by other studies and
consistent with the data presented;
(e) The data underlying the information have been analyzed using
the appropriate statistical or quantitative methods;
(f) The information has been placed in a proper context and is
appropriately framed with respect to the prevailing body of pertinent
scientific knowledge; and
(g) The information is based on assumptions, analytical techniques,
and conclusions that are clearly stated and well-referenced with
citations to credible literature and other pertinent existing
information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Scientific studies may be brought
forward for consideration in support of an agency action under section
2 of this act by a participating governmental entity, academic
institution, qualified participating stakeholder group, or
participating individual. These studies must be demonstrated to meet
the requirements of section 2 of this act prior to being relied upon by
an agency for an agency action.
(2) For scientific studies where the information has not been
critically reviewed by other persons with qualified, relevant
scientific expertise, the agency implementing the provisions of section
2 of this act shall obtain and document fully independent, rigorous
peer review by other persons with qualified, relevant scientific
expertise.
(3) Reviews conducted in compliance with this section may not be
performed by an employee of an agency responsible for the provisions or
enforcement of the policy informed by the science being reviewed, or an
employee of or an affiliate of the entity that performed or helped fund
the science being reviewed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 In order to demonstrate that an agency
action meets the requirements of sections 2 through 5 of this act, an
agency must maintain a public record that identifies:
(1) The scientific literature or other sources relied upon by the
agency; and
(2) Any scientific information reviewed by the agency that does not
meet the requirements of sections 2 through 5 of this act. The public
record must include a narrative explanation of why that information was
or was not included.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) If an agency cannot meet the
requirements of section 2 of this act for a critical agency action, the
agency may only proceed with an action if it fully documents:
(a) A critical public health and safety need requiring action prior
to the development of peer-reviewed science satisfying the provisions
of sections 2 through 4 of this act;
(b) The lack of peer-reviewed science; and
(c) An established timeline for developing peer-reviewed science to
remove the uncertainty.
(2) Any agency action made using the provisions of subsection (1)
of this section must be strictly limited in scope and effect until the
necessary peer-reviewed science is available to comply with the
provisions of section 2 of this act. Additionally, the agency action
must be:
(a) Designed to accommodate adaptive management principles;
(b) Deemed experimental;
(c) Monitored and evaluated to determine effectiveness; and
(d) Improved to increase effectiveness over time or eliminated from
future application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 34.05 RCW and codified with the subchapter heading of
"standards for the use of science to support public policy."

--- END ---