BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 15.36 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to milk sold directly to the
consumer at the premises where produced if:
(a) The milk is produced on a small scale farm; and
(b) The milk is not advertised for sale.
(2) As used in this section, "small scale farm" means a location
where there are no more than two producing dairy cows, nine producing
sheep, or nine producing goats on the premises where milk is produced.

--- END ---