BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) An owner may be charged with unlawful tethering if the owner
leaves a dog restrained or tied outside by use of a tether, chain,
rope, cord, pulley, trolley system, or other device under any of the
following circumstances:
(i) For more than ten consecutive hours within any twenty-four hour
period;
(ii) In a manner that prevents the dog from lying, sitting,
standing comfortably and without the restraint becoming taut;
(iii) In a manner that results, or could reasonably result, in the
dog becoming entangled on the restraint or another object;
(iv) In a manner that does not allow the dog to have access to
necessary manmade or natural shelter;
(v) In a manner that causes injury to the dog;
(vi) On the same chain, tether, rope, cord, pulley, trolley system,
or fixed point as another animal;
(vii) If the dog is sick, injured, in the advanced stages of
pregnancy, or under six months of age; or
(viii) In a manner that allows the dog to be within ten feet of any
active public right-of-way.
(b) All devices used to tie or restrain the dog must meet the
following specifications:
(i) Any tether, fastener, chain, tie, or other restraint must be
attached to a properly fitted buckle-type harness or collar, not less
than one inch in width, that provides enough room between the collar or
harness and the dog's throat to allow normal breathing and swallowing.
(ii) Choke, pinch, or prong-type collars may not be used in
tethering, fastening, chaining, or tying a dog.
(2) The provisions of this section do not apply to a dog:
(a) Tethered, chained, tied, or otherwise restrained or placed in
a pen or enclosure by a licensed veterinarian while the dog is
receiving veterinary care or treatment, except as provided in
subsection (1)(b)(i) and (ii) of this section;
(b) That is an arctic breed that is used for sled dog activities;
(c) Participating temporarily in an exhibition, show, contest, or
other event in which the skill, breeding, or stamina of the dog is
judged or examined;
(d) Being kept temporarily in a boarding kennel or facility or at
a camping or recreation area;
(e) Being cared for temporarily after having been picked up as a
stray or as part of a rescue operation; or
(f) Being trained or used by a federal, state, or local law
enforcement agency or military or national guard unit.
(3) Each violation of this section is a separate offense. A person
who violates this section is subject to the following penalties:
(a) For a first violation, the owner must be given a written notice
of warning, which specifies the applicable subsection of this section
that has been violated.
(i) The notice must give the owner fourteen days to remedy the
violation.
(ii) Whenever possible, the owner must also be provided with
educational information about the dangers of tethering, as well as
information about humane and safe restraint methods, and referrals to
organizations able to offer assistance with establishing humane and
safe restraint methods. Pamphlets or other information prepared by
local or national nonprofit organizations may be used for this purpose.
(b) A second violation, or a failure to remedy the conditions noted
in a written notice of warning within fourteen days, is a class 2 civil
infraction under RCW 7.80.120(1)(b).
(c) Third and subsequent violations are misdemeanors under RCW
16.52.165.
(4) This section does not preempt ordinances enacted by local
jurisdictions that establish greater civil penalties or criminal
penalties for unlawful tethering.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An exemption to the proscriptions in section 1(1) of this act
may be granted at the discretion of the animal control authority in
each jurisdiction, either before or after a written notice of warning
has been issued, upon an owner's showing of the following
circumstances:
(a) The existence of unusual circumstances that make the tethering
of a dog necessary for a duration, or during a time period, otherwise
prohibited by section 1 of this act;
(b) That the dog is not tethered for more than sixteen hours in any
twenty-four hour period and that the dog receives adequate exercise and
socialization while not tethered; and
(c) That adequate precautions have been taken to safeguard the
health and safety of the dog and prevent the dog from being a nuisance
or danger to the public.
(2) An exemption issued under this section may be revoked at any
time by the animal control authority under the following circumstances:
(a) The animal control authority determines in its discretion that
the conditions required to obtain the exemption no longer exist; or
(b) A well-founded complaint has been made alleging that the dog is
abused or neglected, has created a public nuisance, or poses a threat
to the safety of humans.

--- END ---