BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.145 and 2012 c 2 s 205 (Initiative Measure No.
1183) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Any craft distillery may sell spirits of its own production for
consumption off the premises, up to two liters per person per day. A
craft distillery selling spirits under this subsection must comply with
the applicable laws and rules relating to retailers.
(2) Any craft distillery may contract distill spirits for, and sell
contract distilled spirits to, holders of distillers' or manufacturers'
licenses, including licenses issued under RCW 66.24.520, or for export.
(3) Any craft distillery licensed under this section may provide,
free of charge, one-half ounce or less samples of spirits of its own
production to persons on the premises of the distillery. The maximum
total per person per day is two ounces. Every person who participates
in any manner in the service of samples must obtain a class 12 alcohol
server permit.
(4) The board must adopt rules to implement the alcohol server
permit requirement and may adopt additional rules to implement this
section.
(5) Distilling is an agricultural practice.
(6)(a) A craft distillery licensed under RCW 66.24.140(1) may apply
to the board for an endorsement to sell bottled spirits of its own
production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying
farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five
dollars.
(b) For each month during which a craft distillery will sell
spirits at a qualifying farmers market, the craft distillery must
provide the board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and
locations at which bottled spirits may be offered for sale. This list
must be received by the board before the craft distillery may offer
spirits for sale at a qualifying farmers market.
(c) The spirits sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced
in Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the craft distillery license for the purpose of this
title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this
subsection (6) do not constitute the tasting or sampling privilege of
a craft distillery. The craft distillery may not store spirits at a
farmers market beyond the hours that the craft distillery offers
bottled spirits for sale. The craft distillery may not act as a
distributor from a farmers market location.
(e) Before a craft distillery may sell bottled spirits at a
qualifying farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board
for authorization for any craft distillery with an endorsement approved
under this subsection (6) to sell bottled spirits at retail at the
farmers market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A
map of the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other
designated locations at which an approved craft distillery may sell
bottled spirits; and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee
to verify the locations at which bottled spirits may be sold. Before
authorizing a qualifying farmers market to allow an approved craft
distillery to sell bottled spirits at retail at its farmers market
location, the board shall notify the persons or entities of the
application for authorization pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9).
An authorization granted under this subsection (6)(e) may be withdrawn
by the board for any violation of this title or any rules adopted under
this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and any additional rules necessary
to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection (6):
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.

--- END ---