BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Washington state recognizes that it has
a role in protecting and improving the nutritional health of its
citizens and has made multiple efforts to promote healthy eating and
active living, especially among the state's most vulnerable
populations. In this role, the state government is often the employer,
food purchaser, and caregiver. The legislature finds that as an
employer, food purchaser, and caregiver, the state government should
model its behavior in these capacities after contemporary practices for
the purchase and service of food.
(2) By setting standards for state food procurement, the
legislature seeks to:
(a) Make state government the model for efficient and healthy food
purchasing;
(b) Protect and support local and small business producers and
distributors of healthier foods in Washington state;
(c) Improve the nutritional quality of foods served to thousands of
Washington residents each day, especially to our most vulnerable
populations;
(d) Decrease the impact of diseases related to poor nutrition in
turn to cultivate national and global competitiveness for Washington
residents and governmental employees; and
(e) Generate a more capable, productive, and valuable workforce
that pays dividends to Washington's economy.
(3) The legislature further finds that obesity is a growing
epidemic and that action must be taken to curb future health care costs
and improve the health and well-being of our citizens. Healthy eating
is a critical component to this effort and establishing stronger
standards to all state government food purchasing should be examined in
the future.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) By July 1, 2012, the department of
general administration, in consultation with the department of health,
must adopt a model food purchasing policy for all agencies to establish
standards for all food:
(a) Purchased by state agencies for their employees and guests at
meetings; and
(b) Made available to employees of state agencies in vending
machines or through on-site vendors.
(2)(a) By July 1, 2012, the department of social and health
services and the department of corrections must each develop a food
purchasing policy for all food served to persons: (i) In the direct
custody of their respective department; and (ii) who reside at a
department of social and health services' or department of corrections'
institution.
(b)(i) Policies developed under this subsection (2) must meet the
requirements in section 3 of this act.
(ii) To the extent possible, state agencies that are subject to
this subsection are strongly encouraged to include the procurement of
Washington grown food, as defined in RCW 15.64.060, in the policies
developed under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Food purchasing policies adopted under
section 2 of this act must at a minimum meet the requirements provided
in subsections (2) through (10) of this section.
(2) Meal standards must incorporate the following guidance:
(a) Fruits and vegetables must:
(i) Be fresh, frozen, or canned in their own juice or water;
(ii) Have no added sugar; and
(iii) Be very low in sodium;
(b) Protein must come primarily from seafood, fish, and lean meats
with no more than ten percent fat by body weight. Washington fish
products must be offered whenever possible and highlighted on the menu.
If offered, processed meats must be limited and contain no more than
four hundred eighty milligrams of sodium per two ounces. Poultry may
only be served without skin;
(c) Dairy products must be either fat-free or low-fat with one
percent dairy products or less;
(d) Whole grain and high fiber options must be offered with respect
to pasta, rice, breads, cereals, and snack foods. When available,
whole grain must be the first or second ingredient and the product must
contain at least two grams or more of fiber per serving;
(e) Fried foods must be limited and healthy oils, such as canola,
olive, sunflower, soybean, and safflower, must be prioritized;
(f) Priority must be given to roasted, baked, microwaved, steamed,
poached, or grilled food preparation.
(3) Foods must limit added sugars.
(4) Portion sizes must be reduced as a way to reduce calorie
intake.
(5) The lowest serving size must be chosen when possible or halved-serving sizes must be offered.
(6) Meals must offer at least one vegetable choice and one fruit
choice at each eating occasion.
(7) Snacks served must contain:
(a) No more than two hundred calories per serving;
(b) No more than two hundred thirty milligrams of sodium per
serving;
(c) No more than ten percent saturated fat per serving; and
(d) No trans fats.
(8) By January 1, 2012, at least fifty percent, and by January 1,
2015, at least eighty percent, of the beverages sold in all vending
machines or through on-site vendors must be:
(a) Water;
(b) Coffee;
(c) Tea;
(d) Reduced fat milk; and
(e) One hundred percent fruit or vegetable juice.
(9) By January 1, 2012, at least fifty percent of the snacks sold
in all vending machines or through on-site vendors must contain no more
than:
(a) Thirty-five percent calories from fat;
(b) Ten percent calories from saturated fat;
(c) Thirty-five percent sugar by weight; and
(d) Two hundred fifty calories or less.
(10) By January 1, 2013, all vending machines must contain at least
eighty percent healthy food choices.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department of general administration
by November 15, 2013, must submit a report to the legislature
summarizing the implementation of the model food purchasing policy
developed under section 2 of this act, changes needed to the food
purchasing practices of the department of general administration, any
costs or savings realized through the policy, efforts made to create
pricing incentives and disincentives, and recommendations for
modifications to the policy requirements or food standards.
(2) The department of corrections and the department of social and
health services must each respectively submit to the legislature:
(a) By January 1, 2013, a food policy as required to be developed
under this chapter;
(b) By September 1, 2013, a report of any revisions to the
department's food policy developed under this chapter since the
policy's initial implementation, efforts made to create pricing
incentives and disincentives, and any costs or savings realized through
the policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of general administration, in conjunction with the
department of health, must assist agencies attempting to implement food
purchasing policies and food standards for people in the agency's
custody by coordinating the purchase and delivery of food pursuant to
the provisions of chapter 70.-- RCW (the new chapter created in section
5 of this act).

--- END ---