BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 29A.84 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person who knowingly makes or allows to be made on his or
her behalf a false statement of material fact in a voters' pamphlet is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.
(2) For purposes of this section, a "false statement of material
fact" includes a statement that would lead a person of ordinary
intelligence to reasonably understand the statement as conveying
information that is false.
(3) The public disclosure commission may impose a civil penalty not
to exceed five thousand dollars for each violation under subsection (1)
of this section.

--- END ---