BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.12.063 and 2010 c 157 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((It is the intent of the legislature to continue the
department's policy giving priority consideration to abutting property
owners in agricultural areas when disposing of property through its
surplus property program under this section.
(2))) Whenever the department determines that any real property
owned by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the
department is no longer required for transportation purposes and that
it is in the public interest to do so, the department may sell the
property or exchange it in full or part consideration for land or
improvements or for construction of improvements at fair market value
to any person through the solicitation of written bids through public
advertising in the manner prescribed under RCW 47.28.050 or in the
manner prescribed under RCW 47.12.283.
(2) The department may forego the processes prescribed by RCW
47.28.050 and 47.12.283 and sell the real property to any of the
following ((governmental)) entities or persons at fair market value:
(a) Any other state agency;
(b) The city or county in which the property is situated;
(c) Any other municipal corporation;
(d) Regional transit authorities created under chapter 81.112 RCW;
(e) The former owner of the property from whom the state acquired
title;
(f) In the case of residentially improved property, a tenant of the
department who has resided thereon for not less than six months and who
is not delinquent in paying rent to the state;
(g) Any abutting private owner but only after each other abutting
private owner (if any), as shown in the records of the county assessor,
is notified in writing of the proposed sale. If more than one abutting
private owner requests in writing the right to purchase the property
within fifteen days after receiving notice of the proposed sale, the
property shall be sold at public auction in the manner provided in RCW
47.12.283;
(h) ((To any person through the solicitation of written bids
through public advertising in the manner prescribed by RCW 47.28.050;
(i))) To any other owner of real property required for
transportation purposes;
(((j))) (i) In the case of property suitable for residential use,
any nonprofit organization dedicated to providing affordable housing to
very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined
in RCW 43.63A.510 and is eligible to receive assistance through the
Washington housing trust fund created in chapter 43.185 RCW;
(((k))) (j) A federally qualified community health center as
defined in RCW 82.04.4311; or
(((l))) (k) A federally recognized Indian tribe within whose
reservation boundary the property is located.
(3) When selling real property pursuant to RCW 47.12.283, the
department may withhold or withdraw the property from an auction when
requested by one of the entities or persons listed in subsection (2) of
this section and only after the receipt of a nonrefundable deposit
equal to ten percent of the fair market value of the real property or
five thousand dollars, whichever is less. This subsection does not
prohibit the department from exercising its discretion to withhold or
withdraw the real property from an auction if the department determines
that the property is no longer surplus or chooses to sell the property
through one of the other means listed in subsection (1) of this
section. If a transaction under this subsection is not completed
within sixty days, the real property must be put back up for sale.
(4) Sales to purchasers may at the department's option be for cash,
by real estate contract, or exchange of land or improvements.
Transactions involving the construction of improvements must be
conducted pursuant to chapter 47.28 RCW ((or)) and Title 39 RCW, as
applicable, and must comply with all other applicable laws and rules.
(((4))) (5) Conveyances made pursuant to this section shall be by
deed executed by the secretary of transportation and shall be duly
acknowledged.
(((5))) (6) Unless otherwise provided, all moneys received pursuant
to the provisions of this section less any real estate broker
commissions paid pursuant to RCW 47.12.320 shall be deposited in the
motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.12.063 and 2006 c 17 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((It is the intent of the legislature to continue the
department's policy giving priority consideration to abutting property
owners in agricultural areas when disposing of property through its
surplus property program under this section.
(2))) Whenever the department determines that any real property
owned by the state of Washington and under the jurisdiction of the
department is no longer required for transportation purposes and that
it is in the public interest to do so, the department may sell the
property or exchange it in full or part consideration for land or
improvements or for construction of improvements at fair market value
to any person through the solicitation of written bids through public
advertising in the manner prescribed under RCW 47.28.050 or in the
manner prescribed under RCW 47.12.283.
(2) The department may forego the processes prescribed by RCW
47.28.050 and 47.12.283 and sell the real property to any of the
following ((governmental)) entities or persons at fair market value:
(a) Any other state agency;
(b) The city or county in which the property is situated;
(c) Any other municipal corporation;
(d) Regional transit authorities created under chapter 81.112 RCW;
(e) The former owner of the property from whom the state acquired
title;
(f) In the case of residentially improved property, a tenant of the
department who has resided thereon for not less than six months and who
is not delinquent in paying rent to the state;
(g) Any abutting private owner but only after each other abutting
private owner (if any), as shown in the records of the county assessor,
is notified in writing of the proposed sale. If more than one abutting
private owner requests in writing the right to purchase the property
within fifteen days after receiving notice of the proposed sale, the
property shall be sold at public auction in the manner provided in RCW
47.12.283;
(h) ((To any person through the solicitation of written bids
through public advertising in the manner prescribed by RCW 47.28.050;
(i))) To any other owner of real property required for
transportation purposes;
(((j))) (i) In the case of property suitable for residential use,
any nonprofit organization dedicated to providing affordable housing to
very low-income, low-income, and moderate-income households as defined
in RCW 43.63A.510 and is eligible to receive assistance through the
Washington housing trust fund created in chapter 43.185 RCW; or
(((k))) (j) A federally recognized Indian tribe within whose
reservation boundary the property is located.
(3) When selling real property pursuant to RCW 47.12.283, the
department may withhold or withdraw the property from an auction when
requested by one of the entities or persons listed in subsection (2) of
this section and only after the receipt of a nonrefundable deposit
equal to ten percent of the fair market value of the real property or
five thousand dollars, whichever is less. This subsection does not
prohibit the department from exercising its discretion to withhold or
withdraw the real property from an auction if the department determines
that the property is no longer surplus or chooses to sell the property
through one of the other means listed in subsection (1) of this
section. If a transaction under this subsection is not completed
within sixty days, the real property must be put back up for sale.
(4) Sales to purchasers may at the department's option be for cash,
by real estate contract, or exchange of land or improvements.
Transactions involving the construction of improvements must be
conducted pursuant to chapter 47.28 RCW ((or)) and Title 39 RCW, as
applicable, and must comply with all other applicable laws and rules.
(((4))) (5) Conveyances made pursuant to this section shall be by
deed executed by the secretary of transportation and shall be duly
acknowledged.
(((5))) (6) Unless otherwise provided, all moneys received pursuant
to the provisions of this section less any real estate broker
commissions paid pursuant to RCW 47.12.320 shall be deposited in the
motor vehicle fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 2 of this act takes effect June 30,
2012.

--- END ---