BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The director or the director's designee and another director's
designee shall meet once a year with two county auditors nominated by
the Washington association of county officials and two representatives
of subagents nominated by an association of vehicle subagents. This
meeting must be held at the department's headquarters in Olympia and be
a minimum of four hours, but a maximum of eight hours, in duration.
The purpose of the meeting is to provide an opportunity for a dialogue
to occur to express concerns and ideas. If all six attendees agree, a
second meeting may be held, but no more than two meetings may be held
in one year. The department must not incur any costs associated with
these meetings.

--- END ---