BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The full amount of the temporary assistance for needy families
block grant, plus qualifying state expenditures shall be appropriated
to the department each year in the omnibus appropriations act subject
to the following restrictions:
(a) The amount appropriated to the department for cash assistance
shall not be exceeded and shall be spent only for cash assistance;
(b) The amount appropriated for WorkFirst activities shall not be
exceeded and may be transferred within the WorkFirst activities,
including to other state agencies that provide some of those
activities;
(c) No more than fifteen percent of the total amount in subsections
(1) and (2) of this section may be spent for administrative purposes.
For purposes of this section, "administrative purposes" does not
include expenditures for information technology and computerization
needed for tracking and monitoring required by P.L. 104-193.
(2) The full amount of the child care development fund shall be
appropriated to the department of early learning each year in the
omnibus appropriations act to carry out the provisions of the working
connections child care program, child care quality programs, and child
care licensing functions. The department of early learning shall
transfer to the department sufficient funds to perform working
connections child care eligibility determinations, service
authorizations, and child care provider payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
The department and the department of early learning shall operate
the programs under section 1 (1) and (2) of this act within
appropriated levels. Each department shall monitor expenditures
against appropriation levels provided in the omnibus appropriations act
and shall quarterly report its findings to the appropriate committees
of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall implement strategies that accomplish the
outcome measures identified in RCW 74.08A.410 that are within the
funding constraints in section 1 of this act. Specifically the
department shall implement strategies that will cause the number of
cases in the program authorized in RCW 74.08A.210 through 74.08A.330
and 43.330.145 and chapter 74.12 RCW to decrease by at least five
percent each biennium starting with the 2011-2013 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature believes that the foundation of a successful
temporary assistance for needy families program is an individualized
assessment of the strengths and needs of each family, and the matching
of appropriate resources to serve them. The legislature finds that it
is critical to identify participants early in the process who have
serious barriers to employment, such as chemical dependency or learning
disabilities, and connect them with appropriately tailored services.
It is important that the services to which recipients are matched meet
the goals of assisting needy families so that children can be cared for
in their own homes and an individualized plan is developed for the
recipients to assist them in attaining the skills and training
necessary for them to achieve self-sufficiency. The department,
through its redesign of temporary assistance for needy families
process, made several recommendations with regard to assessments and
predictive tools that are reflected in subsections (2) through (4) of
this section.
(2) The department shall conduct an initial comprehensive family
assessment at program entry. The assessment shall be designed to be
used by other agencies which may provide services to the recipient and
his or her family. One of the major objectives of the assessment shall
be to identify families for whom barrier resolution is appropriate.
After the assessment is complete, the department shall engage the
family in a subsequent evaluation designed to identify the appropriate
work preparation activity and service level for the recipient.
(3) The department shall also explore the use of a predictive
modeling tool to be used to identify risk factors affecting a
recipient's employability. This tool should be designed to assist the
department in identifying families who are at high risk of long stays
on temporary assistance for needy families and those who are likely to
exit relatively quickly from the program. The information produced by
this tool should be combined with the information produced by the
assessment in subsection (2) of this section to place recipients in the
most appropriate services and activities and move them more quickly to
self-sufficiency.
(4) The department shall continuously monitor the progress of each
recipient in completing his or her plan. The department shall also
monitor the outcomes produced by the skills training or services a
recipient receives to determine whether the skills training and
services purchased by the department to serve recipients is achieving
the outcomes set by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
During the 2011-2013 biennium, the income eligibility limit for the
working connections child care program shall be at one hundred seventy-five percent of the federal poverty level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
During the 2011-2013 biennium, the grant standard for temporary
assistance for needy families shall remain at the standard set by
chapter 1, Laws of 2010 2nd sp. sess., which represents a fifteen
percent reduction from the 2009 grant level.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW
to read as follows:
In determining the income eligibility of an applicant or recipient
for temporary assistance for needy families or WorkFirst, the
department shall not count the federal supplemental security income
received by a household member.

Sec. 8 RCW 74.08A.010 and 2004 c 54 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A family that includes an adult who has received temporary
assistance for needy families for sixty months after July 27, 1997,
shall be ineligible for further temporary assistance for needy families
assistance.
(2) For the purposes of applying the rules of this section, the
department shall count any month in which an adult family member
received a temporary assistance for needy families cash assistance
grant unless the assistance was provided when the family member was a
minor child and not the head of the household or married to the head of
the household.
(3) The department shall refer recipients who require specialized
assistance to appropriate department programs, crime victims' programs
through the department of community, trade, and economic development,
or the crime victims' compensation program of the department of labor
and industries.
(4) The department may exempt a recipient and the recipient's
family from the application of subsection (1) of this section by reason
of hardship or if the recipient meets the family violence options of
section 402(A)(7) of Title IVA of the federal social security act as
amended by P.L. 104-193. ((The number of recipients and their families
exempted from subsection (1) of this section for a fiscal year shall
not exceed twenty percent of the average monthly number of recipients
and their families to which assistance is provided under the temporary
assistance for needy families program.))
(5) The department shall not exempt a recipient and his or her
family from the application of subsection (1) of this section until
after the recipient has received fifty-two months of assistance under
this chapter.
(6) Beginning on October 31, 2005, the department shall provide
transitional food stamp assistance for a period of five months to a
household that ceases to receive temporary assistance for needy
families assistance and is not in sanction status. If necessary, the
department shall extend the household's food stamp certification until
the end of the transition period.

Sec. 9 RCW 74.08A.260 and 2009 c 85 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each recipient shall be assessed after determination of program
eligibility and before referral to job search. Assessments shall be
based upon factors that are critical to obtaining employment, including
but not limited to education, availability of child care, history of
family violence, history of substance abuse, and other factors that
affect the ability to obtain employment. Assessments may be performed
by the department or by a contracted entity. The assessment shall be
based on a uniform, consistent, transferable format that will be
accepted by all agencies and organizations serving the recipient.
Based on the assessment, an individual responsibility plan shall be
prepared that: (a) Sets forth an employment goal and a plan for
maximizing the recipient's success at meeting the employment goal; (b)
considers WorkFirst educational and training programs from which the
recipient could benefit; (c) contains the obligation of the recipient
to participate in the program by complying with the plan; (d) moves the
recipient into full-time WorkFirst activities as quickly as possible;
and (e) describes the services available to the recipient either during
or after WorkFirst to enable the recipient to obtain and keep
employment and to advance in the workplace and increase the recipient's
wage earning potential over time.
(2) Recipients who are not engaged in work and work activities, and
do not qualify for a good cause exemption under RCW 74.08A.270, shall
engage in self-directed service as provided in RCW 74.08A.330.
(3) If a recipient refuses to engage in work and work activities
required by the department, the family's grant shall be reduced by the
recipient's share, and may, if the department determines it
appropriate, be terminated.
(4) The department may waive the penalties required under
subsection (3) of this section, subject to a finding that the recipient
refused to engage in work for good cause provided in RCW 74.08A.270.
(5) Recipients with children under the age of six who are required
to participate in a work activity shall be required to participate in
that work activity for no more than twenty hours per week.
(6) In implementing this section, the department shall assign the
highest priority to the most employable clients, including adults in
two-parent families and parents in single-parent families that include
older preschool or school-age children to be engaged in work
activities.
(((6))) (7) In consultation with the recipient, the department or
contractor shall place the recipient into a work activity that is
available in the local area where the recipient resides.
(((7))) (8) Assessments conducted under this section shall include
a consideration of the potential benefit to the recipient of engaging
in financial literacy activities. The department shall consider the
options for financial literacy activities available in the community,
including information and resources available through the financial
((literacy)) education public-private partnership created under RCW
28A.300.450. The department may authorize up to ten hours of financial
literacy activities as a core activity or an optional activity under
WorkFirst.

Sec. 10 RCW 43.215.135 and 2010 c 273 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish and implement policies in the
working connections child care program to promote stability and quality
of care for children from low-income households. Policies for the
expenditure of funds constituting the working connections child care
program must be consistent with the outcome measures defined in RCW
74.08A.410 and the standards established in this section intended to
promote continuity of care for children.
(2) Beginning in fiscal year 2011, for families with children
enrolled in an early childhood education and assistance program, a head
start program, or an early head start program, authorizations for the
working connections child care subsidy shall be effective for twelve
months unless a change in circumstances necessitates reauthorization
sooner than twelve months.
(3) During the 2011-2013 biennium, the income eligibility limit for
the working connections child care program shall be at one hundred
seventy-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(4) The department, in consultation with the department of social
and health services, shall report to the legislature by September 1,
2011, with:
(a) An analysis of the impact of the twelve-month authorization
period on the stability of child care, program costs, and
administrative savings; and
(b) Recommendations for expanding the application of the twelve-month authorization period to additional populations of children in
care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 A new section is added to chapter 43.215
RCW to read as follows:
By December 31, 2011, the department, with the assistance of the
department of social and health services, shall develop and implement
an electronic benefit transfer system to be used for the delivery of
subsidized child care. The system shall be developed to allow the
department to track time and attendance for any child for whom a child
care provider is receiving a subsidy and to process subsidy payments to
providers.

Sec. 12 RCW 74.08.580 and 2002 c 252 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person receiving public assistance is prohibited from using
electronic benefit cards or cash obtained with electronic benefit
cards:
(a) For the purpose of participating in any of the activities
authorized under chapter 9.46 RCW;
(b) For the purpose of parimutuel wagering authorized under chapter
67.16 RCW; ((or))
(c) To purchase lottery tickets or shares authorized under chapter
67.70 RCW;
(d) For the purpose of participating in or purchasing any
activities located in a tattoo, body piercing, or body art shop
licensed under chapter 18.300 RCW;
(e) To purchase cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010 or tobacco
products as defined in RCW 82.26.010;
(f) To purchase any items regulated under Title 66 RCW;
(g) For the purpose of participating in or purchasing any
activities located in an adult entertainment venue with performances
that contain erotic material where minors under the age of eighteen are
prohibited under RCW 9.68A.150; or
(h) For the purpose of participating in or purchasing any
activities or items located in an establishment where persons under the
age of eighteen are not permitted.
(2)(a) The department shall notify, in writing, all recipients of
electronic benefit cards that any violation of subsection (1) of this
section could result in legal proceedings and forfeiture of all cash
public assistance.
(b) Whenever the department receives notice that a person has
violated subsection (1) of this section, the department shall notify
the person in writing that the violation could result in legal
proceedings and forfeiture of all cash public assistance.
(c) The department shall assign a protective payee to the person
receiving public assistance who violates subsection (1) of this
section.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.88C.010 and 2000 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The caseload forecast council is hereby created. The council
shall consist of two individuals appointed by the governor and four
individuals, one of whom is appointed by the chairperson of each of the
two largest political caucuses in the senate and house of
representatives. The chair of the council shall be selected from among
the four caucus appointees. The council may select such other officers
as the members deem necessary.
(2) The council shall employ a caseload forecast supervisor to
supervise the preparation of all caseload forecasts. As used in this
chapter, "supervisor" means the caseload forecast supervisor.
(3) Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the
council is required for any decisions regarding employment of the
supervisor. Employment of the supervisor shall terminate after each
term of three years. At the end of the first year of each three-year
term the council shall consider extension of the supervisor's term by
one year. The council may fix the compensation of the supervisor. The
supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the purposes of
this section.
(4) The caseload forecast council shall oversee the preparation of
and approve, by an affirmative vote of at least four members, the
official state caseload forecasts prepared under RCW 43.88C.020. If
the council is unable to approve a forecast before a date required in
RCW 43.88C.020, the supervisor shall submit the forecast without
approval and the forecast shall have the same effect as if approved by
the council.
(5) A council member who does not cast an affirmative vote for
approval of the official caseload forecast may request, and the
supervisor shall provide, an alternative forecast based on assumptions
specified by the member.
(6) Members of the caseload forecast council shall serve without
additional compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council
or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative
members of the council shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(7) "Caseload," as used in this chapter, means the number of
persons expected to meet entitlement requirements and require the
services of public assistance programs, state correctional
institutions, state correctional noninstitutional supervision, state
institutions for juvenile offenders, the common school system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, and adoption support.
(8) The council shall provide the legislature with a courtesy
caseload forecast of the temporary assistance for needy families
program.
(9) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
provided in RCW 43.88.020 apply to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The auditor shall appoint a fraud ombudsman to oversee and
quarterly audit the work of the division of fraud investigation, or its
successor, at the department of social and health services. The
ombudsman shall review the fraud investigative work done by the
division including cases filed with local prosecuting authorities. The
ombudsman shall also have authority to investigate citizen complaints
made to the auditor's office related to fraud or abuse in the temporary
assistance for needy families program. The department of social and
health services shall provide the ombudsman with access to any relevant
records it has in its possession related to a fraud or abuse
investigation.
(2) The ombudsman must submit a report summarizing its auditing
activities of the division to the appropriate committees of the senate
and house of representatives by November 30, 2012, and biennially
thereafter. The division of fraud investigation shall assist the
ombudsman in producing this report. The report shall contain only
disclosable information, including:
(a) A description of significant fraud or abuse, and of
vulnerabilities or deficiencies relating to the prevention and
detection of fraud or abuse, discovered as a result of investigations
completed during the reporting period;
(b) A description of corrective action taken by the department
regarding fraud and abuse discovered as a result of investigations
conducted by the division of fraud investigation;
(c) Recommendations for improving the activities of the division
with respect to the vulnerabilities or deficiencies identified under
(a) of this subsection;
(d) An identification of each significant recommendation described
in the previous reports on which corrective action has or has not been
completed; and
(e) A summary of matters referred to prosecuting authorities during
the reporting period and the charges filed and convictions entered
during the reporting period that have resulted from referrals by the
division.

Sec. 15 RCW 74.04.012 and 2008 c 74 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is established a unit within the department for the
purpose of detection, investigation, and prosecution of any act
prohibited or declared to be unlawful in the programs administered by
the department. The secretary will employ qualified supervisory,
legal, and investigative personnel for the program. Program staff must
be qualified by training and experience.
(2) This unit shall assist the fraud ombudsman in the state
auditor's office with his or her responsibilities in auditing and
overseeing the fraud investigations in the temporary assistance for
needy families program under section 14 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Section 1 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 8 of this act expires June 30,
2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 RCW 74.08A.340 (Funding restrictions) and
2009 c 564 s 953, 2008 c 329 s 922, 2007 c 522 s 957, 2006 c 265 s 209,
& 1997 c 58 s 321 are each repealed.

--- END ---