BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of general administration shall survey the fifty
states to determine if that state provides any advantage for its own
in-state contractors bidding on public works projects. The survey
shall initially include states where contractors have often bid on
public works projects in Washington state. The initial survey shall be
completed by January 1, 2012. The survey of the remaining states must
be completed by January 1, 2013.
(2) The department of general administration shall distribute the
results of the survey described in subsection (1) of this section to
all state and local agencies with authority to procure public works.
The department must also notify each agency of the requirements of this
section.
(3) In any bidding process for public works in which a bid is
received from a contractor from a state that provides a bidding
advantage identified in the survey completed in subsection (1) of this
section, a comparable advantage must be given to contractors from
Washington state only with respect to comparing in-state contractor
bids to the bids received from contractors from that state.
(4) The department of general administration must adopt rules to
implement these reciprocity provisions. The department must recommend
draft legislation by December 1, 2011, to conform other provisions of
law to the intent of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---