BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.50.1401 and 1991 c 238 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is hereby created a board of trustees for district twenty-six
and Lake Washington Vocational-Technical Institute, hereafter known as
Lake Washington ((Technical College)) Institute of Technology. The
members of the board shall be appointed pursuant to the provisions of
RCW 28B.50.100.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.45.0201 and 1994 c 217 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that population growth in north King and
south Snohomish counties has created a need to expand higher education
and workforce training programs for the people living and working in
those areas. In keeping with the recommendations of the higher
education coordinating board, the legislature intends to help address
those education and training needs through the creation of Cascadia
Community College, expansion of educational opportunities at Lake
Washington ((Technical College)) Institute of Technology, and support
of the University of Washington's branch campus at Bothell-Woodinville.
It is further the intention of the legislature, in keeping with the
higher education coordinating board recommendations, that the Cascadia
Community College and the University of Washington branch campus be
collocated, and that the new community college and the University of
Washington's branch campus work in partnership to ensure that properly
prepared students from community colleges and other institutions are
able to transfer smoothly to the branch campus.
The legislature further finds that a governing board for Cascadia
Community College needs to be appointed and confirmed as expeditiously
as possible. The legislature intends to work cooperatively with the
governor to facilitate the appointment and confirmation of trustees for
the college.

--- END ---