BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.60.049 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 16 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Eligible area" also means a designated community empowerment
zone approved under RCW 43.31C.020 or a county containing a community
empowerment zone.
(b) "Eligible investment project" also means an investment project
in an eligible area as defined in this section.
(2) In addition to the provisions of RCW 82.60.040, the department
((shall)) must issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for state
and local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and
82.14 RCW, on each eligible investment project that is located in an
eligible area, if the applicant establishes that at the time the
project is operationally complete:
(a) The applicant will hire at least one qualified employment
position for each seven hundred fifty thousand dollars of investment
for which a deferral is requested; and
(b) The positions will be filled by persons who at the time of hire
are residents of the community empowerment zone. As used in this
subsection, "resident" means the person makes his or her home in the
community empowerment zone or the county in which the zone is located.
A mailing address alone is insufficient to establish that a person is
a resident for the purposes of this section. The persons must be hired
after the date the application is filed with the department.
(3) All other provisions and eligibility requirements of this
chapter apply to applicants eligible under this section.
(4) The qualified employment position must be filled by the end of
the calendar year following the year in which the project is certified
as operationally complete. If a person does not meet the requirements
for qualified employment positions by the end of the second calendar
year following the year in which the project is certified as
operationally complete, all deferred taxes are immediately due.

--- END ---