BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that public service
law is a benefit to both state and local communities. In order to
promote its practice it is important to make such a career affordable
for those individuals who are employed in public service and the
governmental entities that seek to employ them. Therefore, the
legislature intends that public agency attorneys shall be exempt from
paying bar dues during their periods of government service.

Sec. 2 RCW 2.48.130 and 1957 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The annual membership fees for active members shall be payable
on or before February 1st of each year. Except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, the board of governors may establish
the amount of such annual membership fee to be effective each year:
PROVIDED, That written notice of any proposed increase in membership
fee shall be sent to active members not less than sixty days prior to
the effective date of such increase: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the board
of governors may establish the fee at a reduced rate for those who have
been active members for less than five years in this state or
elsewhere.
(2) The membership fee shall be waived for active members employed
by a public agency. For purposes of this section, "public agency"
means any agency of the state government, or any agency, political
subdivision, or unit of local government of this state including, but
not limited to, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations,
special purpose districts, and local service districts.

--- END ---