BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.37.020 and 1977 ex.s. c 355 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
Every vehicle upon a highway within this state at any time from a
half hour after sunset to a half hour before sunrise, at any time when
the vehicle's windshield wipers are in use, and at any other time when,
due to insufficient light or unfavorable atmospheric conditions,
persons and vehicles on the highway are not clearly discernible at a
distance of one thousand feet ahead shall display lighted headlights,
other lights, and illuminating devices as hereinafter respectively
required for different classes of vehicles, subject to exceptions with
respect to parked vehicles, and such stop lights, turn signals, and
other signaling devices shall be lighted as prescribed for the use of
such devices.

--- END ---