BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.41.440 and 2009 c 359 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A hospital shall report to a local law enforcement authority as
soon as reasonably possible, taking into consideration a patient's
emergency care needs, when the hospital (a) provides treatment for a
bullet wound, gunshot wound, or stab wound to a patient who is
unconscious; or (b) receives or provides treatment to a patient who is
deceased or dies after admission from a drug-related overdose. ((A))
Hospitals shall establish a written policy to identify the person or
persons responsible for making the report.
(2) Any emergency service personnel shall report to a local law
enforcement authority as soon as reasonably possible, taking into
consideration a patient's emergency care needs, when the emergency
service personnel is called to the aid of a patient who is already
deceased or dies prior to transport from a drug-related overdose.
Emergency service personnel shall establish a written policy to
identify the person or persons responsible for making the report.
(3) The report required under subsection (1) of this section must
include the following information, if known:
(a) The name, residence, sex, and age of the patient;
(b) Whether the patient has received a bullet wound, gunshot wound,
((or)) stab wound, or has died as the result of a drug-related
overdose; and
(c) The name of the health care provider providing treatment for
the bullet wound, gunshot wound, ((or)) stab wound, or drug-related
overdose.
(((3))) (4) Nothing in this section shall limit a person's duty to
report under RCW 26.44.030 or 74.34.035.
(((4))) (5) Any bullets, clothing, or other foreign objects that
are removed from a patient for whom a hospital is required to make a
report pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be preserved
and kept in custody in such a way that the identity and integrity
thereof are reasonably maintained until the bullets, clothing, or other
foreign objects are taken into possession by a law enforcement
authority or the hospital's normal period for retention of such items
expires, whichever occurs first.
(((5))) (6) Any hospital, emergency service personnel, or person
who in good faith, and without gross negligence or willful or wanton
misconduct, makes a report required by this section, cooperates in an
investigation or criminal or judicial proceeding related to such
report, or maintains bullets, clothing, or other foreign objects, or
provides such items to a law enforcement authority as described in
subsection (((4))) (5) of this section, is immune from civil or
criminal liability or professional licensure action arising out of or
related to the report and its contents or the absence of information in
the report, cooperation in an investigation or criminal or judicial
proceeding, and the maintenance or provision to a law enforcement
authority of bullets, clothing, or other foreign objects under
subsection (((4))) (5) of this section.
(((6))) (7) The physician-patient privilege described in RCW
5.60.060(4), the registered nurse-patient privilege described in RCW
5.62.020, and any other health care provider-patient privilege created
or recognized by law are not a basis for excluding as evidence in any
criminal proceeding any report, or information contained in a report
made under this section.
(((7))) (8) All reporting, preservation, or other requirements of
this section are secondary to patient care needs and may be delayed or
compromised without penalty to the hospital or person required to
fulfill the requirements of this section.

--- END ---