BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aerospace training or educational program" means a course in
the aerospace industry as offered by the Washington aerospace training
and research center, Spokane aerospace technology center.
(2) "Aerospace worker" means a worker whose employment
qualifications require training as offered at the Washington aerospace
training and research center.
(3) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board.
(4) "Eligible student" means a student who is registered for an
aerospace training or educational program, is making satisfactory
progress as defined by the program, and has a declared intention to
work in the aerospace industry in the state of Washington.
(5) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received an
aerospace training student loan.
(6) "Student loan" means a loan that is approved by the board and
awarded to an eligible student.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The aerospace training student loan program
is established. The program shall be administered by the board. In
administering the program, the board has the following powers and
duties:
(1) To screen and select, in coordination with the Aerospace
Futures Alliance, eligible students to receive an aerospace training
student loan;
(2) To adopt necessary rules;
(3) To collect and manage repayments from students who do not meet
their obligations under this chapter; and
(4) To solicit and accept grants and donations from public and
private sources for the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 To remain an eligible student and receive
continuing disbursements under the program, a participant must be
considered by the aerospace training or educational program to be
making satisfactory progress.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The board may award aerospace training
student loans to eligible students from the funds appropriated to the
board for this purpose, or any other funds given to the board for this
program. The amount of the student loan awarded an individual may not
exceed one year of tuition and fees for the program of study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A participant incurs an obligation to
repay the student loan, with interest, within thirty-six months after
completing the program.
(2) The interest rate shall be determined annually by the board.
(3) The minimum payment shall be set by the board. Payments of
principal and interest shall accrue quarterly commencing six months
from the date the participant completes or discontinues the course of
study. Provisions for deferral of payment shall be determined by the
board.
(4) The board is responsible for collection of repayments made
under this section and must exercise due diligence in such collection,
maintaining all necessary records to ensure that maximum repayments are
made. Collection and servicing of repayments under this section must
be pursued using the full extent of the law, including wage garnishment
if necessary.
(5) Receipts from the payment of principal or interest or any other
subsidies to which the board as administrator is entitled, that are
paid by or on behalf of participants under this section, must be
deposited in the aerospace training student loan account and must be
used to cover the costs of granting the student loans, maintaining
necessary records, and making collections under subsection (4) of this
section. The board must maintain accurate records of these costs, and
all receipts beyond those necessary to pay such costs must be used to
grant student loans to eligible students.
(6) The board shall adopt rules to define the terms of repayment,
including applicable interest rates, fees, and deferments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The aerospace training student loan
account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. No
appropriation is required for expenditures of funds from the account.
The account is not subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW except for moneys used for program administration.
(2) The board shall deposit into the account all moneys received
for the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of
funds appropriated by the legislature for the aerospace training
student loan program, and receipts from participant repayments.
(3) Expenditures from the account may be used solely for student
loans to participants in the program established by this chapter and
costs associated with program administration by the board.
(4) Disbursements from the account may be made only on the
authorization of the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---