BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 84.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Physical inspection" means examination of conditions present on
property by direct observation or by indirect observation of
photographs or aerial imagery.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 84.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, whenever the
assessor is required by the provisions of this title to send any
assessment, notice, or any other information to persons by regular
mail, the assessor may instead provide the assessment, notice, or other
information electronically. Electronic transmittal may be by
electronic mail or other electronic means reasonably calculated to
apprise the person of the information that is being provided.
(2) If the assessment, notice, or other information is subject to
the confidentiality provisions of RCW 82.32.330, 84.08.210, or
84.40.340, the assessor must use methods reasonably designed to protect
the information from unauthorized disclosure. The provisions of this
subsection (2) may be waived by a taxpayer. The waiver must be in
writing and may be provided to the assessor electronically. A person
may provide a waiver with respect to a particular item of information
or may give a blanket waiver with respect to any item of information or
certain items of information to be provided electronically. A blanket
waiver will continue until revoked in writing by the taxpayer. Such
revocation may be provided to the assessor electronically in a manner
provided or approved by the assessor.
(3) Any assessment, notice, or other information provided by the
assessor electronically to a person is deemed to have been mailed by
the assessor and received by the person on the date that the assessor
electronically sends the information to the person or electronically
notifies the person that the information is available to be accessed by
the person.
(4) This section also applies to any information that is not
expressly required by statute to be sent by regular mail, but is
customarily sent by the assessor using regular mail, to persons
entitled to receive the information.
(5) Assessor procedures for electronic notice under this section
shall include provisions authorizing a person to receive nonelectronic
notice upon request where: (a) The person does not have the equipment
or software necessary to enable the person to receive or otherwise
obtain or access information from the assessor electronically; (b) the
person does not have access to the internet using the taxpayer's own
equipment; or (c) some other circumstance or condition exists that, in
the assessor's judgment, prevents the person from receiving or
otherwise obtaining information from the assessor electronically.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.36.383 and 2010 c 106 s 307 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, except where the
context clearly indicates a different meaning:
(1) The term "residence" means a single family dwelling unit
whether such unit be separate or part of a multiunit dwelling,
including the land on which such dwelling stands not to exceed one
acre, except that a residence includes any additional property up to a
total of five acres that comprises the residential parcel if this
larger parcel size is required under land use regulations. The term
also includes a share ownership in a cooperative housing association,
corporation, or partnership if the person claiming exemption can
establish that his or her share represents the specific unit or portion
of such structure in which he or she resides. The term also includes
a single family dwelling situated upon lands the fee of which is vested
in the United States or any instrumentality thereof including an Indian
tribe or in the state of Washington, and notwithstanding the provisions
of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a residence is deemed real
property.
(2) The term "real property" also includes a mobile home which has
substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being
fixed in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile
home and placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe,
connections with sewer, water, or other utilities. A mobile home
located on land leased by the owner of the mobile home is subject, for
tax billing, payment, and collection purposes, only to the personal
property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.
(3) "Department" means the state department of revenue.
(4) "Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the
person claiming the exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her
spouse or domestic partner, and the disposable income of each cotenant
occupying the residence for the assessment year, less amounts paid by
the person claiming the exemption or his or her spouse or domestic
partner during the assessment year for:
(a) Drugs supplied by prescription of a medical practitioner
authorized by the laws of this state or another jurisdiction to issue
prescriptions;
(b) The treatment or care of either person received in the home or
in a nursing home, boarding home, or adult family home; and
(c) Health care insurance premiums for medicare under Title XVIII
of the social security act.
(5) "Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in
the federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989,
or such subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent
with the purpose of this section, plus all of the following items to
the extent they are not included in or have been deducted from adjusted
gross income:
(a) Capital gains, other than gain excluded from income under
section 121 of the federal internal revenue code to the extent it is
reinvested in a new principal residence;
(b) Amounts deducted for loss;
(c) Amounts deducted for depreciation;
(d) Pension and annuity receipts;
(e) Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and
medical-aid payments;
(f) Veterans benefits, other than:
(i) Attendant-care payments;
(ii) Medical-aid payments;
(iii) Disability compensation, as defined in Title 38, part 3,
section 3.4 of the code of federal regulations, as of January 1, 2008;
and
(iv) Dependency and indemnity compensation, as defined in Title 38,
part 3, section 3.5 of the code of federal regulations, as of January
1, 2008;
(g) Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;
(h) Dividend receipts; ((and))
(i) Interest received on state and municipal bonds; and
(j) Gifts or other payments benefiting the applicant or applicant's
household.
(6) "Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming
the exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.
(7) "Disability" has the same meaning as provided in 42 U.S.C. Sec.
423(d)(1)(A) as amended prior to January 1, 2005, or such subsequent
date as the department may provide by rule consistent with the purpose
of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.36.385 and 2010 c 106 s 308 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A claim for exemption under RCW 84.36.381 as now or hereafter
amended, may be made and filed at any time during the year for
exemption from taxes payable the following year and thereafter and
solely upon forms as prescribed and furnished by the department ((of
revenue)). However, an exemption from tax under RCW 84.36.381
continues for no more than six years unless a renewal application is
filed as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The county
assessor may also require, by written notice, a renewal application
following an amendment of the income requirements set forth in RCW
84.36.381. Renewal applications must be on forms prescribed and
furnished by the department ((of revenue)). Applications under this
section are subject to audit and verification by the assessor.
(2) A person granted an exemption under RCW 84.36.381 must inform
the county assessor of any change in status affecting the person's
entitlement to the exemption on forms prescribed and furnished by the
department ((of revenue)).
(3) Each person exempt from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 in 1993 and
thereafter, must file with the county assessor a renewal application
not later than December 31st of the year the assessor notifies such
person of the requirement to file the renewal application.
(4) ((Beginning in 1992 and in each of the three succeeding years))
Not later than July 1st of the sixth year of the applicable exemption
period, the county assessor must notify ((approximately one-fourth of))
those persons exempt from taxes under RCW 84.36.381 ((in the current
year who have not filed a renewal application within the previous four
years,)) of the requirement to file a renewal application.
(5) If the assessor finds that the applicant does not meet the
qualifications as set forth in RCW 84.36.381, as now or hereafter
amended, the claim or exemption must be denied but such denial is
subject to appeal under the provisions of RCW 84.48.010 and in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. If the applicant had
received exemption in prior years based on erroneous information, the
taxes must be collected subject to penalties as provided in RCW
84.40.130 for a period of not to exceed five years.
(6) The department and each local assessor is hereby directed to
publicize the qualifications and manner of making claims under RCW
84.36.381 through 84.36.389, through communications media, including
such paid advertisements or notices as it deems appropriate. Notice of
the qualifications, method of making applications, the penalties for
not reporting a change in status, and availability of further
information must be included on or with property tax statements and
revaluation notices for all residential property including mobile
homes, except rental properties.
(7) Assessors may authorize any applications or notices under this
section to be submitted electronically.

Sec. 5 RCW 84.40.038 and 2001 c 185 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The owner or person responsible for payment of taxes on any
property may petition the county board of equalization for a change in
the assessed valuation placed upon such property by the county assessor
or for any other reason specifically authorized by statute. Such
petition must be made on forms prescribed or approved by the department
of revenue and any petition not conforming to those requirements or not
properly completed shall not be considered by the board. The petition
must be filed with the board on or before July 1st of the year of the
assessment or determination, within thirty days after the date an
assessment, value change notice, or other notice has been mailed, or
within a time limit of up to sixty days adopted by the county
legislative authority, whichever is later. If a county legislative
authority sets a time limit, the authority may not change the limit for
three years from the adoption of the limit. In order to offset
processing costs, the county legislative authority may require that a
petition challenging the assessed valuation of a commercial property be
accompanied by a filing fee, which may be waived in the event of
indigency, that does not exceed the sum of five hundred dollars.
Filing fees imposed by a county under this section must be awarded as
costs to a petitioner that substantially prevails in proceedings before
the board.
(2) The board of equalization may waive the filing deadline if the
petition is filed within a reasonable time after the filing deadline
and the petitioner shows good cause for the late filing. The decision
of the board of equalization regarding a waiver of the filing deadline
is final and not appealable under RCW 84.08.130. Good cause may be
shown by one or more of the following events or circumstances:
(a) Death or serious illness of the taxpayer or his or her
immediate family;
(b) The taxpayer was absent from the address where the taxpayer
normally receives the assessment or value change notice, was absent for
more than fifteen days of the days allowed in subsection (1) of this
section before the filing deadline, and the filing deadline is after
July 1st;
(c) Incorrect written advice regarding filing requirements received
from board of equalization staff, county assessor's staff, or staff of
the property tax advisor designated under RCW 84.48.140;
(d) Natural disaster such as flood or earthquake;
(e) Delay or loss related to the delivery of the petition by the
postal service, and documented by the postal service; or
(f) Other circumstances as the department may provide by rule.
(3) Within thirty days from the filing of a petition challenging
the assessed value of a commercial property, the appellant must provide
the assessor with income and expense statements for three years prior
to the assessment date and any evidence that the appellant intends to
submit as part of the appeal.
(4) The owner or person responsible for payment of taxes on any
property may request that the appeal be heard by the state board of tax
appeals without a hearing by the county board of equalization when the
assessor, the owner or person responsible for payment of taxes on the
property, and a majority of the county board of equalization agree that
a direct appeal to the state board of tax appeals is appropriate. The
state board of tax appeals may reject the appeal, in which case the
county board of equalization ((shall)) must consider the appeal under
RCW 84.48.010. Notice of such a rejection, together with the reason
therefor, ((shall)) must be provided to the affected parties and the
county board of equalization within thirty days of receipt of the
direct appeal by the state board.
(5) For purposes of this section, commercial property includes any
property except:
(a) A single-family residential lot; and
(b) A single-family residential unit within a condominium,
townhouse, or manufactured home, including those that have been
declared, never sold or sparsely sold, and operated as apartments.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.40.045 and 2001 c 187 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The assessor ((shall)) must give notice of any change in the
true and fair value of real property for the tract or lot of land and
any improvements thereon no later than thirty days after appraisal((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, no such notice ((shall)) may be mailed
during the period from January 15th to February 15th of each year((:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). Furthermore, no notice need be sent with
respect to changes in valuation of publicly owned property exempt from
taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010 or of forest land made
pursuant to chapter 84.33 RCW.
(2) The notice ((shall)) must contain a statement of both the prior
and the new true and fair value, stating separately land and
improvement values, and a brief statement of the procedure for appeal
to the board of equalization and the time, date, and place of the
meetings of the board.
(3) The notice ((shall)) must be mailed by the assessor to the
taxpayer.
(4) If any taxpayer, as shown by the tax rolls, holds solely a
security interest in the real property which is the subject of the
notice, pursuant to a mortgage, contract of sale, or deed of trust,
such taxpayer ((shall)) must, upon written request of the assessor,
supply, within thirty days of receipt of such request, to the assessor
the name and address of the person making payments pursuant to the
mortgage, contract of sale, or deed of trust, and thereafter such
person ((shall)) must also receive a copy of the notice provided for in
this section. Willful failure to comply with such request within the
time limitation provided for ((herein shall make)) in this section
makes such taxpayer subject to a maximum civil penalty of five thousand
dollars. The penalties provided for ((herein shall be)) in this
section are recoverable in an action by the county prosecutor, and when
recovered ((shall)) must be deposited in the county current expense
fund. The assessor ((shall)) must make the request provided for by
this section during the month of January.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.40.175 and 1994 c 124 s 24 are each amended to read
as follows:
At the time of making the assessment of real property, the assessor
((shall)) must enter each description of property exempt under the
provisions of chapter 84.36 RCW, and value and list the same in the
manner and subject to the same rule as the assessor is required to
assess all other property, designating in each case to whom such
property belongs. ((However, with respect to publicly owned)) The
valuation requirements of this section do not apply to property exempt
from taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010((, the assessor shall
value only such property as is leased to or occupied by a private
person under an agreement allowing such person to occupy or use such
property for a private purpose when a request for such valuation is
received from the department of revenue or the lessee of such property
for use in determining the taxable rent as provided for in chapter
82.29A RCW: PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section shall not prohibit any
assessor from valuing any public property leased to or occupied by a
private person for private purposes)). However, where the exempt
status of such property no longer applies as a result of a sale or
change in use, the assessor must value and list such property as of the
January 1st assessment date. The owner or person responsible for
payment of taxes may thereafter petition the county board of
equalization for a change in the assessed value in accordance with the
timing and procedures set forth in RCW 84.40.038.

--- END ---