BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that citizen
participation is an essential element of representative government, and
that encouraging volunteer efforts to engage citizens' voices in local
decision making processes enhances the efficiency and effectiveness of
government's role. The legislature further finds that citizen
volunteers should be valued as partners in conducting business of
government. The legislature, therefore, intends to clarify that the
public records act was not intended to be a tool to be misused to
discourage volunteerism through lawsuits, threats of lawsuits, or any
form of harassment.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.010 and 2007 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(b) Unincorporated area councils and their volunteer members are
neither state nor local agencies.
(2) "Public record" includes any writing containing information
relating to the conduct of government or the performance of any
governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained
by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(3) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.

Sec. 3 RCW 42.56.010 and 2010 c 204 s 1005 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1)(a) "Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or
other local public agency.
(b) Unincorporated area councils and their volunteer members are
neither state nor local agencies.
(2) "Person in interest" means the person who is the subject of a
record or any representative designated by that person, except that if
that person is under a legal disability, "person in interest" means and
includes the parent or duly appointed legal representative.
(3) "Public record" includes any writing containing information
relating to the conduct of government or the performance of any
governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained
by any state or local agency regardless of physical form or
characteristics. For the office of the secretary of the senate and the
office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives, public
records means legislative records as defined in RCW 40.14.100 and also
means the following: All budget and financial records; personnel
leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative sessions;
reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.
(4) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any
form of communication or representation including, but not limited to,
letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof,
and all papers, maps, magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and
prints, motion picture, film and video recordings, magnetic or punched
cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound recordings, and other documents
including existing data compilations from which information may be
obtained or translated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Unincorporated area councils and their volunteer members are immune
from lawsuits under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act expires January 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 3 of this act takes effect January
1, 2012.

--- END ---