BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2010 c 20 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2)(a) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
((2012-13)) 2010-11 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time
tuition fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the
omnibus appropriations act.
(b) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year, reductions or
increases in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduates at the
community and technical colleges shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(c) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year, increases in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduates shall be set by the state
universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College,
with reference to total per-student funding, which is state funding
combined with tuition fees, at each institution for the 2009-10
academic year. If total per-student funding at that institution is
equal to or greater than that for the 2009-10 academic year, tuition
fees may increase no greater than two percent over the previous
academic year. If state funding falls below that provided in the
operating budget for fiscal year 2009, tuition fees may increase so
that total per-student funding at that institution is equal to that for
the 2009-10 academic year plus a two percent annual increment.
(3)(a) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Governing boards shall be required to
provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial
aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of
attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
each college in the state board for community and technical college
system shall consult with existing student associations or
organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the
impacts of potential tuition increases. Colleges shall provide data
regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the
sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid
for by aid.
(4) ((Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2015-16, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2014-15 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5))) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not
apply to high school students enrolling in participating institutions
of higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(((6))) (5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall
not apply to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement
program through an interlocal agreement between a school district and
a community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through
28A.175.110.
(((7))) (6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall
not apply to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical
college participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the
purpose of obtaining a high school diploma.
(((8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the
University of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent
of all revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases
beginning in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to
assist needy low and middle-income resident law students.
(9) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, institutions of
higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of graduate academic school tuition
increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through academic year
2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.
(10))) (7) Any tuition increases above seven percent shall fund
costs of instruction, library and student services, utilities and
maintenance, other costs related to instruction as well as
institutional financial aid. ((Through 2010-11, any funding reductions
to instruction, library and student services, utilities and maintenance
and other costs related to instruction shall be proportionally less
than other program areas including administration.))

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.068 and 2009 c 540 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Beginning with the 2007-08 academic year and ending with the
2016-17 academic year,)) Tuition fees charged to full-time resident
undergraduate students((, except in academic years 2009-10 and 2010-11,)) may increase no greater than seven percent over the previous
academic year ((in any institution of higher education)) at community
and technical colleges. Annual reductions or increases in full-time
tuition fees for resident undergraduate students shall be as provided
in the omnibus appropriations act, within the seven percent increase
limit established in this section. ((For academic years 2009-10 and
2010-11 the omnibus appropriations act may provide tuition increases
greater than seven percent.)) To the extent that state appropriations
combined with tuition and fee revenues are insufficient to achieve the
total per-student funding goals established in subsection (2) of this
section, the legislature may revisit state appropriations, authorized
enrollment levels, and changes in tuition fees for any given fiscal
year.
(2) The state shall adopt as its goal total per-student funding
levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and fees, of at least
the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding at similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states. In
defining comparable per-student funding levels, the office of financial
management shall adjust for regional cost-of-living differences; for
differences in program offerings and in the relative mix of lower
division, upper division, and graduate students; and for accounting and
reporting differences among the comparison institutions. The office of
financial management shall develop a funding trajectory for each four-year institution of higher education and for the community and
technical college system as a whole that when combined with tuition and
fees revenue allows the state to achieve its funding goal for each
four-year institution and the community and technical college system as
a whole no later than fiscal year 2017. The state shall not reduce
enrollment levels below fiscal year 2007 budgeted levels in order to
improve or alter the per-student funding amount at any four-year
institution of higher education or the community and technical college
system as a whole. The state recognizes that each four-year
institution of higher education and the community and technical college
system as a whole have different funding requirements to achieve
desired performance levels, and that increases to the total per-student
funding amount may need to exceed the minimum funding goal.
(3) By September 1st of each year beginning in 2008, the office of
financial management shall report to the governor, the higher education
coordinating board, and appropriate committees of the legislature with
updated estimates of the total per-student funding level that
represents the sixtieth percentile of funding for comparable
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states, and
the progress toward that goal that was made for each of the public
institutions of higher education.
(4) As used in this section, "global challenge states" are the top
performing states on the new economy index published by the progressive
policy institute as of July 22, 2007. The new economy index ranks
states on indicators of their potential to compete in the new economy.
At least once every five years, the office of financial management
shall determine if changes to the list of global challenge states are
appropriate. The office of financial management shall report its
findings to the governor and the legislature.
(5) ((During the 2009-10 and the 2010-11 academic years,)) The
institutions of higher education shall include information on their
billing statements notifying students of available federal tax credits
((available through the American opportunity tax credit provided in the
American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009)).

--- END ---