BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.91.170 and 2003 c 53 s 52 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Any person who:
(i) Has received notice that his or her behavior is interfering
with the use of a ((dog guide or)) service animal who continues with
reckless disregard to interfere with the use of a ((dog guide or))
service animal by obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise jeopardizing
the safety of the ((dog guide or)) service animal user or his or her
((dog guide or)) service animal; or
(ii) Prevents a service animal user and his or her service animal
from entering a business where food for human consumption is sold or
served is guilty of a misdemeanor, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection.
(b) A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a gross
misdemeanor.
(2)(a) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her
dog to interfere with the use of a ((dog guide or)) service animal by
obstructing, intimidating, or otherwise jeopardizing the safety of the
((dog guide or)) service animal user or his or her ((dog guide or))
service animal is guilty of a misdemeanor, except as provided in (b) of
this subsection.
(b) A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a gross
misdemeanor.
(3) Any person who, with reckless disregard, injures, disables, or
causes the death of a ((dog guide or)) service animal is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor.
(4) Any person who, with reckless disregard, allows his or her dog
to injure, disable, or cause the death of a ((dog guide or)) service
animal is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(5) Any person who intentionally injures, disables, or causes the
death of a ((dog guide or)) service animal is guilty of a class C
felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(6) Any person who wrongfully obtains or exerts unauthorized
control over a ((dog guide or)) service animal with the intent to
deprive the ((dog guide or)) service animal user of his or her ((dog
guide or)) service animal is guilty of theft in the first degree, RCW
9A.56.030.
(7)(a) In any case in which the defendant is convicted of a
violation of this section, he or she shall also be ordered to make full
restitution for all damages, including incidental and consequential
expenses incurred by the ((dog guide or)) service animal user and the
((dog guide or)) service animal which arise out of or are related to
the criminal offense.
(b) Restitution for a conviction under this section shall include,
but is not limited to:
(i) The value of the replacement of an incapacitated or deceased
((dog guide or)) service animal, the training of a replacement ((dog
guide or)) service animal, or retraining of the affected ((dog guide
or)) service animal and all related veterinary and care expenses; and
(ii) Medical expenses of the ((dog guide or)) service animal user,
training of the ((dog guide or)) service animal user, and compensation
for wages or earned income lost by the ((dog guide or)) service animal
user.
(8) Nothing in this section shall affect any civil remedies
available for violation of this section.
(9) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) (("Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of
guiding blind persons or a dog trained for the purpose of assisting
hearing impaired persons.
(b))) "Service animal" means ((an animal that is trained for the
purposes of assisting or accommodating a disabled person's sensory,
mental, or physical disability)) any dog that is individually trained
to do work or perform tasks for the benefit of an individual with a
disability, including a physical, sensory, psychiatric, intellectual,
or other mental disability. Other species of animals, whether wild or
domestic, trained or untrained, are not service animals. The work or
tasks performed by a service animal must be directly related to the
individual's disability. Examples of work or tasks include, but are
not limited to, assisting individuals who are blind or have low vision
with navigation and other tasks, alerting individuals who are deaf or
hard of hearing to the presence of people or sounds, providing
nonviolent protection or rescue work, pulling a wheelchair, assisting
an individual during a seizure, alerting individuals to the presence of
allergens, retrieving items such as medicine or the telephone,
providing physical support and assistance with balance and stability to
individuals with mobility disabilities, and helping persons with
psychiatric and neurological disabilities by preventing or interrupting
impulsive or destructive behaviors. The crime deterrent effects of an
animal's presence and the provision of emotional support, well-being,
comfort, or companionship do not constitute work or tasks.
(((c))) (b) "Notice" means a verbal or otherwise communicated
warning prescribing the behavior of another person and a request that
the person stop their behavior.
(((d))) (c) "Value" means the value to the ((dog guide or)) service
animal user and does not refer to cost or fair market value.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.60.040 and 2009 c 187 s 3 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aggrieved person" means any person who: (a) Claims to have
been injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction; or (b)
believes that he or she will be injured by an unfair practice in a real
estate transaction that is about to occur.
(2) "Any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or
amusement" includes, but is not limited to, any place, licensed or
unlicensed, kept for gain, hire, or reward, or where charges are made
for admission, service, occupancy, or use of any property or
facilities, whether conducted for the entertainment, housing, or
lodging of transient guests, or for the benefit, use, or accommodation
of those seeking health, recreation, or rest, or for the burial or
other disposition of human remains, or for the sale of goods,
merchandise, services, or personal property, or for the rendering of
personal services, or for public conveyance or transportation on land,
water, or in the air, including the stations and terminals thereof and
the garaging of vehicles, or where food or beverages of any kind are
sold for consumption on the premises, or where public amusement,
entertainment, sports, or recreation of any kind is offered with or
without charge, or where medical service or care is made available, or
where the public gathers, congregates, or assembles for amusement,
recreation, or public purposes, or public halls, public elevators, and
public washrooms of buildings and structures occupied by two or more
tenants, or by the owner and one or more tenants, or any public library
or educational institution, or schools of special instruction, or
nursery schools, or day care centers or children's camps: PROVIDED,
That nothing contained in this definition shall be construed to include
or apply to any institute, bona fide club, or place of accommodation,
which is by its nature distinctly private, including fraternal
organizations, though where public use is permitted that use shall be
covered by this chapter; nor shall anything contained in this
definition apply to any educational facility, columbarium, crematory,
mausoleum, or cemetery operated or maintained by a bona fide religious
or sectarian institution.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington state human rights
commission.
(4) "Complainant" means the person who files a complaint in a real
estate transaction.
(5) "Covered multifamily dwelling" means: (a) Buildings consisting
of four or more dwelling units if such buildings have one or more
elevators; and (b) ground floor dwelling units in other buildings
consisting of four or more dwelling units.
(6) "Credit transaction" includes any open or closed end credit
transaction, whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment
transaction, credit card issue or charge, or otherwise, and whether for
personal or for business purposes, in which a service, finance, or
interest charge is imposed, or which provides for repayment in
scheduled payments, when such credit is extended in the regular course
of any trade or commerce, including but not limited to transactions by
banks, savings and loan associations or other financial lending
institutions of whatever nature, stock brokers, or by a merchant or
mercantile establishment which as part of its ordinary business permits
or provides that payment for purchases of property or service therefrom
may be deferred.
(7)(a) "Disability" means the presence of a sensory, mental, or
physical impairment that:
(i) Is medically cognizable or diagnosable; or
(ii) Exists as a record or history; or
(iii) Is perceived to exist whether or not it exists in fact.
(b) A disability exists whether it is temporary or permanent,
common or uncommon, mitigated or unmitigated, or whether or not it
limits the ability to work generally or work at a particular job or
whether or not it limits any other activity within the scope of this
chapter.
(c) For purposes of this definition, "impairment" includes, but is
not limited to:
(i) Any physiological disorder, or condition, cosmetic
disfigurement, or anatomical loss affecting one or more of the
following body systems: Neurological, musculoskeletal, special sense
organs, respiratory, including speech organs, cardiovascular,
reproductive, digestive, genitor-urinary, hemic and lymphatic, skin,
and endocrine; or
(ii) Any mental, developmental, traumatic, or psychological
disorder, including but not limited to cognitive limitation, organic
brain syndrome, emotional or mental illness, and specific learning
disabilities.
(d) Only for the purposes of qualifying for reasonable
accommodation in employment, an impairment must be known or shown
through an interactive process to exist in fact and:
(i) The impairment must have a substantially limiting effect upon
the individual's ability to perform his or her job, the individual's
ability to apply or be considered for a job, or the individual's access
to equal benefits, privileges, or terms or conditions of employment; or
(ii) The employee must have put the employer on notice of the
existence of an impairment, and medical documentation must establish a
reasonable likelihood that engaging in job functions without an
accommodation would aggravate the impairment to the extent that it
would create a substantially limiting effect.
(e) For purposes of (d) of this subsection, a limitation is not
substantial if it has only a trivial effect.
(8) (("Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of
guiding blind persons or a dog that is trained for the purpose of
assisting hearing impaired persons.
(9))) "Dwelling" means any building, structure, or portion thereof
that is occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a
residence by one or more families, and any vacant land that is offered
for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of any such
building, structure, or portion thereof.
(((10))) (9) "Employee" does not include any individual employed by
his or her parents, spouse, or child, or in the domestic service of any
person.
(((11))) (10) "Employer" includes any person acting in the interest
of an employer, directly or indirectly, who employs eight or more
persons, and does not include any religious or sectarian organization
not organized for private profit.
(((12))) (11) "Employment agency" includes any person undertaking
with or without compensation to recruit, procure, refer, or place
employees for an employer.
(((13))) (12) "Families with children status" means one or more
individuals who have not attained the age of eighteen years being
domiciled with a parent or another person having legal custody of such
individual or individuals, or with the designee of such parent or other
person having such legal custody, with the written permission of such
parent or other person. Families with children status also applies to
any person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal
custody of any individual who has not attained the age of eighteen
years.
(((14))) (13) "Full enjoyment of" includes the right to purchase
any service, commodity, or article of personal property offered or sold
on, or by, any establishment to the public, and the admission of any
person to accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges of any
place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement,
without acts directly or indirectly causing persons of any particular
race, creed, color, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, or with
any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained
((dog guide or)) service animal by a person with a disability, to be
treated as not welcome, accepted, desired, or solicited.
(((15))) (14) "Honorably discharged veteran or military status"
means a person who is:
(a) A veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007; or
(b) An active or reserve member in any branch of the armed forces
of the United States, including the national guard, coast guard, and
armed forces reserves.
(((16))) (15) "Labor organization" includes any organization which
exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers
concerning grievances or terms or conditions of employment, or for
other mutual aid or protection in connection with employment.
(((17))) (16) "Marital status" means the legal status of being
married, single, separated, divorced, or widowed.
(((18))) (17) "National origin" includes "ancestry."
(((19))) (18) "Person" includes one or more individuals,
partnerships, associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives,
legal representatives, trustees and receivers, or any group of persons;
it includes any owner, lessee, proprietor, manager, agent, or employee,
whether one or more natural persons; and further includes any political
or civil subdivisions of the state and any agency or instrumentality of
the state or of any political or civil subdivision thereof.
(((20))) (19) "Premises" means the interior or exterior spaces,
parts, components, or elements of a building, including individual
dwelling units and the public and common use areas of a building.
(((21))) (20) "Real estate transaction" includes the sale,
appraisal, brokering, exchange, purchase, rental, or lease of real
property, transacting or applying for a real estate loan, or the
provision of brokerage services.
(((22))) (21) "Real property" includes buildings, structures,
dwellings, real estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, interests in real
estate cooperatives, condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and
incorporeal, or any interest therein.
(((23))) (22) "Respondent" means any person accused in a complaint
or amended complaint of an unfair practice in a real estate
transaction.
(((24))) (23) "Service animal" means ((an animal that is trained
for the purpose of assisting or accommodating a sensory, mental, or
physical disability of a person with a disability)) any dog that is
individually trained to do work or perform tasks for the benefit of an
individual with a disability, including a physical, sensory,
psychiatric, intellectual, or other mental disability. Other species
of animals, whether wild or domestic, trained or untrained, are not
service animals. The work or tasks performed by a service animal must
be directly related to the individual's disability. Examples of work
or tasks include, but are not limited to, assisting individuals who are
blind or have low vision with navigation and other tasks, alerting
individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing to the presence of people
or sounds, providing nonviolent protection or rescue work, pulling a
wheelchair, assisting an individual during a seizure, alerting
individuals to the presence of allergens, retrieving items such as
medicine or the telephone, providing physical support and assistance
with balance and stability to individuals with mobility disabilities,
and helping persons with psychiatric and neurological disabilities by
preventing or interrupting impulsive or destructive behaviors. The
crime deterrent effects of an animal's presence and the provision of
emotional support, well-being, comfort, or companionship do not
constitute work or tasks.
(((25))) (24) "Sex" means gender.
(((26))) (25) "Sexual orientation" means heterosexuality,
homosexuality, bisexuality, and gender expression or identity. As used
in this definition, "gender expression or identity" means having or
being perceived as having a gender identity, self-image, appearance,
behavior, or expression, whether or not that gender identity, self-image, appearance, behavior, or expression is different from that
traditionally associated with the sex assigned to that person at birth.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.60.215 and 2009 c 164 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It shall be an unfair practice for any person or the person's
agent or employee to commit an act which directly or indirectly results
in any distinction, restriction, or discrimination, or the requiring of
any person to pay a larger sum than the uniform rates charged other
persons, or the refusing or withholding from any person the admission,
patronage, custom, presence, frequenting, dwelling, staying, or lodging
in any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement,
except for conditions and limitations established by law and applicable
to all persons, regardless of race, creed, color, national origin,
sexual orientation, sex, honorably discharged veteran or military
status, status as a mother breastfeeding her child, the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained ((dog
guide or)) service animal by a person with a disability: PROVIDED,
That this section shall not be construed to require structural changes,
modifications, or additions to make any place accessible to a person
with a disability except as otherwise required by law: PROVIDED, That
behavior or actions constituting a risk to property or other persons
can be grounds for refusal and shall not constitute an unfair practice.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement" includes, but is not limited
to, businesses where food for human consumption is sold or served.

--- END ---