BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2011, a federally designated rural health
clinic must be paid the cost-based encounter rate for prenatal and
well-child visits whether delivered under a managed care contract or
fee-for-service.
(2) In reconciling managed care enhancement payments for calendar
years 2009 and 2010, the department must treat well-child and prenatal
care visits delivered by federally designated rural health clinics as
encounters subject to the clinic's encounter rate for purposes of the
rate reconciliation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---