BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislative authority of a city that has a population of
less than seven thousand five hundred inhabitants and that operates
either a municipal water or sewer system, or both, prior to January 1,
2011, may impose a sales and use tax as provided in this chapter. The
tax imposed under this section is in addition to any other taxes
authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the local jurisdiction. The
sales and use tax may be imposed by resolution or ordinance following
a public hearing before the city's governing body. The rate of tax may
not exceed 0.1 percent of the selling price, in case of a sales tax, or
the value of the article used in case of a use tax.
(2) The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section must be
deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or
paid to the department under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The
department must perform the collection of tax on behalf of the city at
no expense to the city.
(3) The amounts received under this section may only be used to
construct or rehabilitate improvements that are directly related to the
water or sewer system operated by the city.
(4) This section expires January 1, 2031.

--- END ---