BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.104.030 and 1993 c 387 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is unlawful:
(1) For any person to supervise, construct, alter, or decommission
a well without complying with the provisions of this chapter and the
rules for well construction adopted pursuant to this chapter;
(2) For any person to cause a well to be constructed in violation
of the standards for well construction established by this chapter and
rules adopted by the department pursuant to this chapter;
(3) For a prospective water well owner to have a water well
constructed without first obtaining a water right permit, if a permit
is required;
(4) For any person to construct, alter, or decommission a well
unless the fees required by RCW 18.104.055 have been paid;
(5) For a person to tamper with or remove a well identification tag
except during well alteration; ((and))
(6) Except as provided in RCW 18.104.180, for any person to
contract to engage in the construction of a well or to act as a well
operator without first obtaining a license pursuant to this chapter;
and
(7) For any person to commence construction of a water well without
complying with well construction notification requirements adopted by
a municipal water supplier under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.119A
RCW to read as follows:
A municipal water supplier, as defined in RCW 90.03.015 and with no
fewer than one thousand customers, may adopt requirements regarding
notification of proposed water well construction within the retail
service area of the municipal water supplier, specifically requiring
that a well driller provide the municipal water supplier with a copy of
the notice of intent at least seventy-two hours in advance of
commencing work as required under RCW 18.104.048. A municipal water
supplier adopting such requirements shall make the requirements known
by publication on the supplier's web site or by other means readily
available to a property owner or owner's agent.

--- END ---