BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.25.090 and 2006 c 327 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of not less than one year if a report has been
received by the department pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 or 46.25.120, or
if the person has been convicted of a first violation, within this or
any other jurisdiction, of:
(a) Driving a motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol or any
drug;
(b) Driving a commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol
concentration in the person's system is 0.04 or more, or driving a
noncommercial motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration in the
person's system is 0.08 or more, or is 0.02 or more if the person is
under age twenty-one, as determined by any testing methods approved by
law in this state or any other state or jurisdiction;
(c) Leaving the scene of an accident involving a motor vehicle
driven by the person;
(d) Using a motor vehicle in the commission of a felony;
(e) Refusing to submit to a test or tests to determine the driver's
alcohol concentration or the presence of any drug while driving a motor
vehicle;
(f) Driving a commercial motor vehicle when, as a result of prior
violations committed while operating a commercial motor vehicle, the
driver's commercial driver's license is revoked, suspended, or
canceled, or the driver is disqualified from operating a commercial
motor vehicle;
(g) Causing a fatality through the negligent operation of a
commercial motor vehicle, including but not limited to the crimes of
vehicular homicide and negligent homicide.
If any of the violations set forth in this subsection occurred
while transporting hazardous material, the person is disqualified for
a period of not less than three years.
(2) A person is disqualified for life if it has been determined
that the person has committed or has been convicted of two or more
violations of any of the offenses specified in subsection (1) of this
section, or any combination of those offenses, arising from two or more
separate incidents.
(3) The department may adopt rules, in accordance with federal
regulations, establishing guidelines, including conditions, under which
a disqualification for life under subsection (2) of this section may be
reduced to a period of not less than ten years.
(4) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for life who uses a motor vehicle in the commission of a felony
involving the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled
substance, as defined by chapter 69.50 RCW, or possession with intent
to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance, as
defined by chapter 69.50 RCW.
(5)(a) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(i) Not less than sixty days if:
(A) Convicted of or found to have committed a second serious
traffic violation while driving a commercial motor vehicle; or
(B) Convicted of reckless driving, where there has been a prior
serious traffic violation; or
(ii) Not less than one hundred twenty days if:
(A) Convicted of or found to have committed a third or subsequent
serious traffic violation while driving a commercial motor vehicle; or
(B) Convicted of reckless driving, where there has been two or more
prior serious traffic violations.
(b) The disqualification period under (a)(ii) of this subsection
must be in addition to any other previous period of disqualification.
(c) For purposes of determining prior serious traffic violations
under this subsection, each conviction of or finding that a driver has
committed a serious traffic violation while driving a commercial motor
vehicle or noncommercial motor vehicle, arising from a separate
incident occurring within a three-year period, must be counted.
(6) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(a) Not less than ((ninety)) one hundred eighty days nor more than
one year if convicted of or found to have committed a first violation
of an out-of-service order while driving a commercial vehicle;
(b) Not less than ((one)) two years nor more than five years if,
during a ten-year period, the person is convicted of or is found to
have committed two violations of out-of-service orders while driving a
commercial motor vehicle in separate incidents;
(c) Not less than three years nor more than five years if, during
a ten-year period, the person is convicted of or is found to have
committed three or more violations of out-of-service orders while
driving commercial motor vehicles in separate incidents;
(d) Not less than one hundred eighty days nor more than two years
if the person is convicted of or is found to have committed a first
violation of an out-of-service order while transporting hazardous
materials, or while operating motor vehicles designed to transport
sixteen or more passengers, including the driver. A person is
disqualified for a period of not less than three years nor more than
five years if, during a ten-year period, the person is convicted of or
is found to have committed subsequent violations of out-of-service
orders, in separate incidents, while transporting hazardous materials,
or while operating motor vehicles designed to transport sixteen or more
passengers, including the driver.
(7) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle if a report has been received by the department under RCW
46.25.125 that the person has received a verified positive drug test or
positive alcohol confirmation test as part of the testing program
conducted under 49 C.F.R. 40. A disqualification under this subsection
remains in effect until the person undergoes a drug and alcohol
assessment by a substance abuse professional meeting the requirements
of 49 C.F.R. 40, and the person presents evidence of satisfactory
participation in or successful completion of a drug or alcohol
treatment and/or education program as recommended by the substance
abuse professional, and until the person has met the requirements of
RCW 46.25.100. The substance abuse professional shall forward a
diagnostic evaluation and treatment recommendation to the department of
licensing for use in determining the person's eligibility for driving
a commercial motor vehicle. Persons who are disqualified under this
subsection more than twice in a five-year period are disqualified for
life.
(8)(a) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for the period of time specified in (b) of this subsection if
he or she is convicted of or is found to have committed one of the
following six offenses at a railroad-highway grade crossing while
operating a commercial motor vehicle in violation of a federal, state,
or local law or regulation:
(i) For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to
slow down and check that the tracks are clear of an approaching train;
(ii) For drivers who are not required to always stop, failing to
stop before reaching the crossing, if the tracks are not clear;
(iii) For drivers who are always required to stop, failing to stop
before driving onto the crossing;
(iv) For all drivers, failing to have sufficient space to drive
completely through the crossing without stopping;
(v) For all drivers, failing to obey a traffic control device or
the directions of an enforcement officer at the crossing;
(vi) For all drivers, failing to negotiate a crossing because of
insufficient undercarriage clearance.
(b) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for a period of:
(i) Not less than sixty days if the driver is convicted of or is
found to have committed a first violation of a railroad-highway grade
crossing violation;
(ii) Not less than one hundred twenty days if the driver is
convicted of or is found to have committed a second railroad-highway
grade crossing violation in separate incidents within a three-year
period;
(iii) Not less than one year if the driver is convicted of or is
found to have committed a third or subsequent railroad-highway grade
crossing violation in separate incidents within a three-year period.
(9) A person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor
vehicle for not more than one year if a report has been received by the
department from the federal motor carrier safety administration that
the person's driving has been determined to constitute an imminent
hazard as defined by 49 C.F.R. 383.5. A person who is simultaneously
disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle under this
subsection and under other provisions of this chapter, or under 49
C.F.R. 383.52, shall serve those disqualification periods concurrently.
(10) Within ten days after suspending, revoking, or canceling a
commercial driver's license or disqualifying a driver from operating a
commercial motor vehicle, the department shall update its records to
reflect that action.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.32.100 and 2010 c 161 s 1116 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to all other penalties provided by law, and
except as provided otherwise in (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection, a commercial motor vehicle that is subject to compliance
reviews under this chapter and an officer, agent, or employee of a
company operating a commercial motor vehicle who violates or who
procures, aids, or abets in the violation of this title or any order or
rule of the state patrol is liable for a penalty of one hundred dollars
for each violation.
(i) It is a violation of this chapter for a person operating a
commercial motor vehicle to fail to comply with the requirements of 49
C.F.R. Pt. 382, controlled substances and alcohol use and testing, 49
C.F.R. Sec. 391.15, disqualification of drivers, and 49 C.F.R. Sec.
396.9(c)(2), moving a vehicle placed out of service before the out of
service defects have been satisfactorily repaired. For each violation
the person is liable for a penalty of five hundred dollars.
(ii) The driver of a commercial motor vehicle who ((violates)) is
convicted of violating an out-of-service order is liable for a penalty
of at least ((one)) two thousand ((one)) five hundred dollars ((but not
more than two thousand seven hundred fifty dollars for each)) for a
first violation, and not less than five thousand dollars for second or
subsequent violation.
(iii) An employer who allows ((a driver to operate)) the operation
of a commercial motor vehicle when there is an out-of-service order is
liable for a penalty of at least two thousand seven hundred fifty
dollars but not more than ((eleven)) twenty-five thousand dollars for
each violation.
(iv) Each violation under this subsection (1)(a) is a separate and
distinct offense, and in case of a continuing violation every day's
continuance is a separate and distinct violation.
(b) In addition to all other penalties provided by law, any motor
carrier, company, or any officer or agent of a motor carrier or company
operating a commercial motor vehicle subject to compliance reviews
under this chapter who refuses entry or to make the required records,
documents, and vehicles available to a duly authorized agent of the
state patrol is liable for a penalty of at least five thousand dollars
as well as an out-of-service order being placed on the department of
transportation number, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010, and vehicle
registration to operate. Each violation is a separate and distinct
offense, and in case of a continuing violation every day's continuance
is a separate and distinct violation.
(c) A motor carrier operating a commercial motor vehicle after
receiving a final unsatisfactory rating or being placed out of service
is liable for a penalty of not more than eleven thousand dollars for
each violation. Each violation is a separate and distinct offense, and
in case of a continuing violation every day's continuance is a separate
and distinct violation.
(d) A high-risk carrier is liable for double the amount of the
penalty of a prior violation if the high-risk carrier repeats the same
violation during a follow-up compliance review. Each repeat violation
is a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a repeat continuing
violation every day's continuance is a separate and distinct violation.
(2) The Washington state patrol may place an out-of-service order
on a department of transportation number, as defined in RCW 46.16A.010,
for violations of this chapter or for nonpayment of any monetary
penalties assessed by the state patrol or the utilities and
transportation commission, as a result of compliance reviews, or for
violations of cease and desist orders issued by the utilities and
transportation commission. The state patrol shall notify the
department of licensing when an out-of-service order has been placed on
a motor carrier's department of transportation number. The state
patrol shall notify the motor carrier when there has been an out-of-service order placed on the motor carrier's department of
transportation number and the vehicle registrations have been revoked
by sending a notice by first-class mail using the last known address
for the registered or legal owner or owners, and recording the
transmittal on an affidavit of first-class mail. Notices under this
section fulfill the requirements of RCW 46.12.550. Motor carriers may
not be eligible for a new department of transportation number, vehicle
registration, or temporary permits to operate unless the violations
that resulted in the out-of-service order have been corrected.
(3) Any penalty provided in this section is due and payable when
the person incurring it receives a notice in writing from the state
patrol describing the violation and advising the person that the
penalty is due.
(a)(i) Any motor carrier who incurs a penalty as provided in this
section, except for a high-risk carrier that incurs a penalty for a
repeat violation during a follow-up compliance review, may, upon
written application, request that the state patrol mitigate the
penalty. An application for mitigation must be received by the state
patrol within twenty days of the receipt of notice.
(ii) The state patrol may decline to consider any application for
mitigation.
(b) Any motor carrier who incurs a penalty as provided in this
section has a right to an administrative hearing under chapter 34.05
RCW to contest the violation or the penalty imposed, or both. In all
such hearings, the procedure and rules of evidence are as specified in
chapter 34.05 RCW except as otherwise provided in this chapter. Any
request for an administrative hearing must be made in writing and must
be received by the state patrol within twenty days after the later of
(i) receipt of the notice imposing the penalty, or (ii) disposition of
a request for mitigation, or the right to a hearing is waived.
(c) All penalties recovered under this section shall be paid into
the state treasury and credited to the state patrol highway account of
the motor vehicle fund.

--- END ---