BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW
to read as follows:
Until a reservation system is in place at the San Juan inner island
ferry route, the department shall provide the same preferential
boarding benefits to home health care workers on the San Juan inner
island ferry route that are provided to patients traveling for medical
treatment.

--- END ---