BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.240.010 and 2004 c 168 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Artistic and cultural organization" has the same meaning as in
RCW 82.04.4328.
(2) "Charitable organization" means an organization exempt from tax
under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C.
Sec. 501(c)(3)).
(3) "Fund-raising activity" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.3651.
(4)(a) "Gift card" means a record as described in subsection (5) of
this section in the form of a card, or a stored value card or other
physical medium, containing stored value primarily intended to be
exchanged for consumer goods and services.
(b) "Gift card" does not include prepaid telephone calling cards or
prepaid commercial mobile radio services as defined in 47 C.F.R. 20.3.
(5)(a) "Gift certificate" means an instrument evidencing a promise
by the seller or issuer of the record that consumer goods or services
will be provided to the bearer of the record to the value or credit
shown in the record and includes gift cards.
(b) "Gift certificate" does not include prepaid telephone calling
cards or prepaid commercial mobile radio services as defined in 47
C.F.R. 20.3.
(6) "Bearer" means a person with a right to receive consumer goods
and services under the terms of a gift certificate, without regard to
any fee, expiration date, or dormancy or inactivity charge.
(7) "Issue" means to sell or otherwise provide a gift certificate
to any person, and includes reloading or adding value to an existing
gift certificate.
(8) "Stored value" has the same meaning as the term "closed loop
stored value device" defined in RCW 19.230.010.

--- END ---