BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1)(a) If a governmental agency chooses to
purchase, use, or issue a firearms safety device or gun safe, that
device or safe must meet the minimum standards for gun safes and
firearms safety devices as provided in subsection (2) of this section
on the date of purchase.
(b) Nothing in this section shall require any governmental agency
to purchase, possess, use, or issue firearms safety devices or gun
safes.
(2) The devices identified by the California department of justice
pursuant to Title 2, sections 12087-12088.9 of the California penal
code, effective July 1, 2012, meet the minimum standards for gun safes
and firearms safety devices.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Firearm" means a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010.
(b) "Firearms safety device" means a device other than a gun safe
that locks and is designed to prevent children and unauthorized users
from firing a firearm. The device may be installed on a firearm, be
incorporated into the design of the firearm, or prevent access to the
firearm.
(c) "Governmental agency" means any department or agency of state,
county, or local government.
(d) "Gun safe" means a locking container that fully contains and
secures one or more firearms.
(4) A governmental agency or government agent shall not be liable
for civil damages resulting directly or indirectly from the purchase,
possession, or proper use of a firearms safety device or gun safe
identified as appropriate for that firearm identified under subsection
(2) of this section or for the purchase, possession, or proper use of
a firearms safety device or gun safe identified as appropriate for that
firearm that was purchased prior to July 1, 2012.
(5) A governmental agency that has purchased or issued a firearms
safety device or gun safe prior to July 1, 2012, must replace any
firearms safety device or gun safe or remove any requirement that a
government agent use any firearms safety device or gun safe, if it is
not included on the roster identified under subsection (2) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act constitutes a new
chapter in Title 42 RCW.

--- END ---