BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that Washington
voters strongly supported Initiative Measure No. 1053 during the 2010
general election, which indicates the clear desire on the part of the
state's citizens that legislators approve any new fees or increases to
existing fees. The legislature further recognizes that during the 2009
legislative session tolling was authorized on the state route number
520 corridor, bonds were authorized to finance construction of corridor
projects, and the legislature committed to continue imposing tolls on
the corridor in amounts sufficient to pay the principal and interest on
those bonds. As tolling is scheduled to begin on the corridor in early
April 2011, the legislature intends to honor the voters' clear
direction as identified in Initiative Measure No. 1053 by reviewing the
transportation commission's recommended schedule for tolling charges
and explicitly approving those rates applicable to the state route
number 520 corridor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Consistent with RCW 43.135.055 and 47.56.805 through 47.56.876,
the legislature approves the action taken by the transportation
commission on January 5, 2011, adopting amended rules to set the
schedule of toll rates applicable to the state route number 520
corridor. The legislature approves the delegation to the
transportation commission, as the tolling authority for the state, of
the authority to set and adjust toll rates on the state route number
520 corridor in accordance with the requirements and guidelines set
forth in RCW 47.56.830, 47.56.850, and 47.56.870. The transportation
commission may adjust the toll rates, as identified in the adopted
schedule of toll rates, only in amounts not greater than those
sufficient to meet (a) the operating costs of the state route number
520 corridor, including necessary maintenance, preservation, renewal,
replacement, administration, and toll enforcement by public law
enforcement and (b) obligations for the timely payment of debt service
on bonds issued under chapter 498, Laws of 2009 and this act, and any
other associated financing costs including, but not limited to,
required reserves, minimum debt coverage or other appropriate
contingency funding, insurance, and compliance with all other financial
and other covenants made by the state in the bond proceedings. Prior
to the convening of each regular session of the legislature, the
transportation commission must provide the transportation committees of
the legislature with a detailed report regarding any increase or
decrease in any toll rate approved by the commission that has not been
described in a previous report provided pursuant to this subsection
(1), along with a detailed justification for each such increase or
decrease.
(2) Consistent with RCW 43.135.055 and 47.46.100, the legislature
approves the action taken by the transportation commission on January
25, 2011, adopting amended rules to set the schedule of photo toll, or
"pay by mail," charges applicable to the Tacoma Narrows bridge.
(3) Consistent with RCW 43.135.055 and 47.56.795(6), the
legislature approves the action taken by the transportation commission
on January 5, 2011, adopting amended rules concerning the assessment of
administrative fees for toll collection processes. The administrative
fees must not exceed toll collection costs.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.10.882 and 2009 c 498 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
The toll facility bond retirement account is created in the state
treasury for the purpose of payment of the principal of and interest
and premium on bonds. Both principal of and interest on the bonds
issued for the purposes of chapter 498, Laws of 2009 and this act shall
be payable from the toll facility bond retirement account. The state
finance committee may provide that special subaccounts be created in
the account to facilitate payment of the principal of and interest on
the bonds. The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th
of each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount required for
principal and interest on the bonds in accordance with the bond
proceedings.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.10.886 and 2009 c 498 s 16 are each reenacted to
read as follows:
If and to the extent that the state finance committee determines,
in consultation with the department of transportation and the tolling
authority, that it will be beneficial for the state to issue any bonds
authorized in RCW 47.10.879 and 47.10.883 through 47.10.885 as toll
revenue bonds rather than as general obligation bonds, the state
finance committee is authorized to issue and sell, upon the request of
the department of transportation, such bonds as toll revenue bonds and
not as general obligation bonds. Notwithstanding RCW 47.10.883, each
such bond shall contain a recital that payment or redemption of the
bond and payment of the interest and any premium thereon is payable
solely from and secured solely by a direct pledge, charge, and lien
upon toll revenue and is not a general obligation of the state to which
the full faith and credit of the state is pledged.
Toll revenue is hereby pledged to the payment of any bonds and the
interest thereon issued under the authority of this section, and the
legislature agrees to continue to impose these toll charges on the
state route number 520 corridor, and on any other eligible toll
facility designated by the legislature and on which the imposition of
tolls is authorized by the legislature in respect of the bonds, in
amounts sufficient to pay, when due, the principal and interest on all
bonds issued under the authority of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 47.10.887 and 2009 c 498 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state finance committee may determine and include in any
resolution authorizing the issuance of any bonds under chapter 498,
Laws of 2009 and this act, such terms, provisions, covenants, and
conditions as it may deem appropriate in order to assist with the
marketing and sale of the bonds, confer rights upon the owners of
bonds, and safeguard rights of the owners of bonds including, among
other things:
(1) Provisions regarding the maintenance and operation of eligible
toll facilities;
(2) The pledges, uses, and priorities of application of toll
revenue;
(3) Provisions that bonds shall be payable from and secured solely
by toll revenue as provided by RCW 47.10.886, or shall be payable from
and secured by both toll revenue and by a pledge of excise taxes on
motor vehicle and special fuels and the full faith and credit of the
state as provided in RCW 47.10.879 and 47.10.883 through 47.10.885;
(4) In consultation with the department of transportation and the
tolling authority, financial covenants requiring that the eligible toll
facilities must produce specified coverage ratios of toll revenue to
debt service on bonds;
(5) The purposes and conditions that must be satisfied prior to the
issuance of any additional bonds that are to be payable from and
secured by any toll revenue on an equal basis with previously issued
and outstanding bonds payable from and secured by toll revenue;
(6) Provisions that bonds for which any toll revenue are pledged,
or for which a pledge of any toll revenue may be reserved, may be
structured on a senior, parity, subordinate, or special lien basis in
relation to any other bonds for which toll revenue is pledged, with
respect to toll revenue only; and
(7) Provisions regarding reserves, credit enhancement, liquidity
facilities, and payment agreements with respect to bonds.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, covenants and conditions detailing
the character of management, maintenance, and operation of eligible
toll facilities, insurance for eligible toll facilities, financial
management of toll revenue, and disposition of eligible toll facilities
must first be approved by the department of transportation.
The owner of any bond may by mandamus or other appropriate
proceeding require and compel performance of any duties imposed upon
the tolling authority and the department of transportation and their
respective officials, including any duties imposed upon or undertaken
by them or by their respective officers, agents, and employees, in
connection with the construction, maintenance, and operation of
eligible toll facilities and in connection with the collection,
deposit, investment, application, and disbursement of the proceeds of
the bonds and toll revenue.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.10.888 and 2009 c 498 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of chapter 498, Laws of 2009 and this act,
"toll revenue" means all toll receipts, all interest income derived
from the investment of toll receipts, and any gifts, grants, or other
funds received for the benefit of transportation facilities in the
state, including eligible toll facilities. However, for the purpose of
any pledge of toll revenue to the payment of particular bonds issued
under chapter 498, Laws of 2009 and this act, "toll revenue" means and
includes only such toll revenue or portion thereof that is pledged to
the payment of those bonds in the resolution authorizing the issuance
of such bonds. Toll revenue constitutes "fees and revenues derived
from the ownership or operation of any undertaking, facility, or
project" as that phrase is used in Article VIII, section 1(c)(1) of the
state Constitution.
(2) For the purposes of chapter 498, Laws of 2009 and this act,
"tolling authority" has the same meaning as in RCW 47.56.810.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.56.810 and 2008 c 122 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Tolling authority" means the governing body that is legally
empowered to review and adjust toll rates. Unless otherwise delegated,
the transportation commission is the tolling authority for all state
highways.
(2) "Eligible toll facility" or "eligible toll facilities" means
portions of the state highway system specifically identified by the
legislature including, but not limited to, transportation corridors,
bridges, crossings, interchanges, on-ramps, off-ramps, approaches,
bistate facilities, and interconnections between highways.
(3) "Toll revenue" or "revenue from an eligible toll facility"
means toll receipts, all interest income derived from the investment of
toll receipts, and any gifts, grants, or other funds received for the
benefit of ((the)) transportation facilities in the state, including
eligible toll ((facility)) facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---