BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.88.020 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 3 are each amended
to read as follows:
As used in this chapter the following terms have the following
meanings unless a different meaning is clearly indicated by the
context:
(1) "Apportionment district" means the geographic area, within an
urban area or within an unincorporated area within the boundaries of a
port district, from which ((regular)) special property taxes are to be
((apportioned)) levied and collected to finance a public improvement
contained therein.
(2) (("Assessed value of real property" means the valuation of real
property as placed on the last completed assessment roll of the county.
(3))) "City" means any city or town.
(((4))) (3) "County" means any county of the state of Washington.
(4) "Ordinance" means an ordinance, resolution, or any other
appropriate method of taking a legislative action by the legislative
authority of a county ((or)), port district, or city, whether known as
a statute, resolution, ordinance, or otherwise.
(5) "Port district" means a port district established under chapter
53.04 RCW.
(6) "Public improvements" means ((an undertaking to provide public
facilities in an urban area which the sponsor has authority to
provide)):
(a) Infrastructure improvements within the revitalization area that
include:
(i) Street, road, bridge, and rail construction and maintenance;
(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;
(iii) Sidewalks, streetlights, landscaping, and streetscaping;
(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;
(v) Park and ride facilities;
(vi) Park facilities, recreational areas, and environmental
remediation;
(vii) Storm water and drainage management systems; and
(viii) Electric, gas, fiber, and other utility infrastructures; and
(b) Expenditures for any of the following purposes:
(i) Providing maintenance and security for common or public areas
or facilities in the revitalization area; or
(ii) Historic preservation assets and activities authorized under
RCW 35.21.395.
(((6))) (7) "Public improvement costs" means capital expenditures
with respect to public improvements, including without limitation the
costs of design, planning, acquisition, site preparation, construction,
reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, and installation of the
public improvement; costs of relocation, maintenance, and operation of
property pending construction of the public improvement; costs of
relocating utilities ((relocated as a result of)) in connection with
undertaking the public improvement; costs of financing, including
interest during construction, legal and other professional services,
taxes, and insurance; ((costs incurred by the assessor to revalue real
property for the purpose of determining the tax allocation base value
that are in excess of costs incurred by the assessor in accordance with
his revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW, and the)) costs of
((apportioning the)) levying and collecting the special property taxes
and complying with this chapter and other applicable law; and
administrative costs reasonably necessary and related to these costs.
These costs may include costs incurred prior to the adoption of the
public improvement ordinance, but subsequent to July 10, 1982.
(((7))) (8) "Public improvement ordinance" means the ordinance
passed under RCW 39.88.040(4).
(((8))) (9) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes
as now or hereafter defined in RCW 84.04.140((, except regular property
taxes levied by port districts or public utility districts specifically
for the purpose of making required payments of principal and interest
on general indebtedness)).
(((9))) (10) "Special property taxes" means the special property
taxes authorized to be levied and collected within an apportionment
district under RCW 39.88.070. Special property taxes are not regular
property taxes for any purpose under this chapter or under any other
provision of law, but special property taxes are "excess real property
taxes" for purposes of RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, are "real
property taxes" for purposes of chapters 84.37 and 84.38 RCW, are
"property taxes" for purposes of chapter 84.39 RCW, and also constitute
"ad valorem taxation" as that term is used in RCW 84.33.040.
(11) "Sponsor" means any county ((or)), city, or port district
initiating and undertaking a public improvement under this chapter.
(((10))) (12) "Tax allocation base value ((of real property))"
means the ((true and fair)) value of ((real)) taxable property within
an apportionment district for the year in which the apportionment
district was established.
(((11))) (13) "Tax allocation bonds" means any bonds, notes, or
other obligations issued or incurred by a sponsor pursuant to ((section
10 of this act)) RCW 39.88.100.
(((12))) (14) "Tax allocation increment value" means, as of any
time of calculation, the value of taxable property in an apportionment
district in excess of the tax allocation base value within that
apportionment district.
(15) "Tax allocation revenues" means those special property tax
revenues ((allocated to)) levied and collected by a sponsor under RCW
39.88.070(1)(((b))).
(((13))) (16) "Taxing districts" means any governmental entity
which levies or has levied for it regular property taxes upon real
property located within a proposed or approved apportionment district.
(((14))) (17) "Value of taxable property" means value of taxable
property as defined in RCW 39.36.015.
(((15))) (18) "Urban area" means an area in a city or located
((outside of a city that is characterized by intensive use of the land
for the location of structures and receiving such urban services as
sewers, water, and other public utilities and services normally
associated with urbanized areas. Not more than twenty-five percent of
the area within the urban area proposed apportionment district may be
vacant land)) in an urban growth area as defined in RCW 36.70A.030.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.88.030 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Only public improvements which are determined by the
legislative authority of the sponsor to meet the following criteria are
eligible to be financed under this chapter:
(a) The public improvement is located within an urban area or,
where a port district is a sponsor, in an unincorporated area within
the boundaries of that port district;
(b) The public improvement will encourage private development
within the apportionment district;
(c) The public improvement will increase the ((fair market))
assessed value of the real property located within the apportionment
district;
(d) The private development which is anticipated to occur within
the apportionment district as a result of the public improvement is
consistent with an existing comprehensive land use plan and approved
growth policies of the jurisdiction within which it is located;
(e) A public improvement located within a city has been approved by
the legislative authority of such city; and
(f) A public improvement located ((within an urban area)) in an
unincorporated area has been approved by the legislative authority of
the county within whose boundaries the area lies, and a public
improvement located within the urban growth area of a city, as defined
in RCW 36.70A.030, has also been approved by the legislative authority
of that city.
(2) ((Apportionment of regular)) The levying and collection of
special property tax revenues to finance the public improvements ((is
subject to the following limitations:
(a) No apportionment of regular property tax revenues)) may take
place within a previously established apportionment district where
((regular property taxes are still apportioned)) special property taxes
are still levied and collected to finance public improvements without
the concurrence of the sponsor which established the previously
established district((;
(b) No apportionment district may be established which includes any
geographic area included within a previously established apportionment
district which has outstanding bonds payable in whole or in part from
tax allocation revenues;
(c) The total amount of outstanding bonds payable in whole or in
part from tax allocation revenues arising from property located within
a city shall not exceed two percent of the value of taxable property
within the city, and the total amount of outstanding bonds payable in
whole or in part from tax allocation revenues arising from property
located within the unincorporated areas of a county shall not exceed
two percent of the value of taxable property within the entire
unincorporated area of the county; and
(d) No taxes other than regular property taxes may be apportioned
under this chapter)).
(3) Public improvements may be undertaken and coordinated with
other programs or efforts undertaken by the sponsor or others and may
be funded in whole or in part from sources other than those provided by
this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.88.040 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 5 are each amended
to read as follows:
Public improvements funded by tax allocation revenues may only be
located within ((an urban area. In order to secure an allocation of
regular)) or serve an apportionment district. In order to levy and
collect special property taxes to finance a public improvement, a
sponsor ((shall)) must:
(1)(a) Propose by ordinance a plan for the public improvement which
includes a description of the contemplated public improvement, the
estimated cost thereof, the maximum total amount of the estimated cost
to be paid from special property taxes or from tax allocation bonds,
the boundaries of the apportionment district, the ((estimated period
during which tax revenue apportionment is contemplated)) maximum period
(not to exceed thirty years) during which the special property tax is
to be levied and collected, and the ways in which the sponsor plans to
use ((tax allocation)) special property tax revenues to finance the
public improvement((, and which sets at least three)).
(b) The ordinance must include the following findings:
(i) The public improvements proposed to be financed in whole or in
part using apportionment district financing are expected to encourage
private development within the apportionment district and to increase
the fair market value of real property within the apportionment
district, including improving the viability of existing business
entities and increasing employment within the apportionment district;
(ii) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the
apportionment area as a result of the public improvements is consistent
with: (A) The countywide planning policy adopted by the county under
RCW 36.70A.210; (B) the local government's comprehensive plan; and (C)
development regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;
(iii) The apportionment district is not being used to finance the
costs associated with the financing, design, acquisition, construction,
equipping, operating, maintaining, remodeling, repairing, and
reequipping of public facilities funded with taxes collected under RCW
82.14.048 or 82.14.390;
(iv) The use of apportionment financing will promote economic
development or redevelopment within the apportionment district; and
(v) The proposed apportionment district will not be used for the
purpose of encouraging the relocation of a business from outside the
apportionment district, but within the state, into the apportionment
district, unless the governing body of the sponsor finds, based on
evidence provided to the apportionment district, that the firm being
relocated would otherwise be likely to leave the state.
(c) The ordinance must provide for at least one public hearing((s))
thereon before the legislative authority of the sponsor or a committee
thereof((: PROVIDED, That)). However, public hearings for the public
improvement that is undertaken in combination or coordination by two or
more sponsors may be held jointly; and public hearings, held before the
legislative authority or a committee of a majority thereof may be
combined with public hearings held for other purposes;
(2) At least fifteen days in advance of the hearing:
(a) Deliver notice of the hearing to all taxing districts, the
county treasurer, ((and)) the county assessor, ((which)) and the owners
or reputed owners of all lots, tracts, and parcels of land within the
proposed apportionment district, as shown on the rolls of the county
assessor and directed to the address shown thereon. The notice must
include((s)) a map or drawing showing the location of the contemplated
public improvement and the boundaries of the proposed apportionment
district, a brief description of the public improvement, the estimated
cost thereof, the maximum total amount of the estimated cost to be paid
from special property taxes or from tax allocation bonds, the maximum
period during which the special property tax is to be levied and
collected, the anticipated increase in ((property)) assessed values
within the apportionment district, the location of the sponsor's
principal business office where it will maintain information concerning
the public improvement for public inspection, and the date and place of
hearing; and
(b) Post notice in at least ((six)) three public places located in
the proposed apportionment district and publish notice in a legal
newspaper of general circulation within the sponsor's jurisdiction
briefly describing the public improvement, the proposed
((apportionment)) special property taxes, the boundaries of the
proposed apportionment district, the location where additional
information concerning the public improvement may be inspected, and the
date and place of hearing;
(3) At the time and place fixed for the hearing under subsection
(1) of this section, and at such times to which the hearing may be
adjourned, receive and consider all statements and materials as may be
submitted, and objections and letters filed before or within ten days
thereafter;
(4) ((Within)) Not earlier than ten days and not more than one
hundred twenty days after completion of the public hearing or hearings,
pass an ordinance establishing the apportionment district and
authorizing the proposed public improvement, including any
modifications which ((in the sponsor's opinion the hearings indicated
should be made)) the legislative authority of the sponsor deems
appropriate as a result of public comments received, which includes the
boundaries of the apportionment district, a description of the public
improvement, the estimated cost thereof, ((the portion)) the maximum
total amount of the estimated cost thereof to be ((reimbursed from tax
allocation revenues, the estimated time during which regular property
taxes are to be apportioned, the date upon which apportionment of the
regular)) paid from special property taxes or from tax allocation
bonds, the date upon which the levying and collection of the special
property taxes will commence, the maximum period during which the
special property tax is to be levied and collected, and a finding that
the public improvement meets the conditions of RCW 39.88.030.
(5) The jurisdiction of the sponsor to proceed with the levying and
collection of special property taxes within an apportionment district
will be divested by a protest, filed with the legislative authority of
the sponsor within thirty days after the date of passage of the
ordinance, signed by the owners of the property within the
apportionment district representing more than fifty percent of the
value of taxable property within that apportionment district as
reflected on rolls of the county assessor for the year in which the
ordinance is passed.

Sec. 4 RCW 39.88.070 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Upon the date established in the public improvement ordinance,
but not ((sooner)) earlier than the first day of the calendar year
following the passage of the ordinance((, the)) and no earlier than
would be permitted under RCW 84.09.030;
(a) Regular property taxes levied upon the ((assessed value of
real)) property within the apportionment district ((shall be divided as
follows:
(a) That portion of the regular property taxes produced by the rate
of tax levied each year by or for each of the taxing districts upon the
tax allocation base value of real property, or upon the assessed value
of real property in each year, whichever is smaller, shall be allocated
to and paid to the respective taxing districts; and
(b) That portion of the regular property taxes levied each year by
or for each of the taxing districts upon the assessed value of real
property within an apportionment district which is in excess of the tax
allocation base value of real property shall be allocated and paid to
the sponsor, or the sponsor's designated agent, until all public
improvement costs to be paid from the tax allocation revenues have been
paid, except that the sponsor may agree to receive less than the full
amount of such portion as long as bond debt service, reserve, and other
bond covenant requirements are satisfied, in which case the balance of
the taxes shall be allocated to the respective taxing districts as the
sponsor and the taxing districts may agree.
(2) The county assessor shall revalue the real)) by taxing
districts must continue to be collected in accordance with applicable
law, without regard to the existence of the apportionment district or
the special property taxes levied or collected therein; and
(b) The sponsor may levy upon the value of taxable property within
the apportionment district, and collect special property taxes in
amounts not in excess of the amounts the legislative authority of the
sponsor deems necessary to provide for the purposes set forth in RCW
39.88.080, but in annual amounts not in excess of one percent of the
tax allocation increment value within the apportionment district.
Special property taxes collected within an apportionment district must
be paid to the sponsor, or the sponsor's designated agent, until all
public improvement costs and tax allocation bonds issued or incurred to
be paid from the tax allocation revenues have been paid, but in no
event may special property taxes be collected longer than the maximum
period set forth in the ordinance establishing the apportionment
district.
(2) Special property taxes are not subject to the limitations
imposed by Article VII, section 2 of the Washington state Constitution
and are in excess of all statutory and charter limitations otherwise
applicable to property taxes levied and collected by any county, city,
or port district.
(3) The county assessor must determine the value of the taxable
property within the apportionment district as of January 1st of the
year in which the ordinance establishing the district is enacted for
the purpose of determining the tax allocation base value for the
apportionment district and ((shall)) must certify to the sponsor the
tax allocation base value as soon as practicable after the assessor
receives notice of the public improvement ordinance and ((shall)) must
certify to the sponsor the total ((assessed)) value of ((real)) taxable
property within thirty days after the property values for each
succeeding year have been established, except that the assessed value
of state-assessed real property within the apportionment district
((shall)) must be certified as soon as the values are provided to the
assessor by the department of revenue. Nothing in this section
authorizes revaluations of real property by the assessor for property
taxation that are not made in accordance with the assessor's
revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW.
(((3))) (4) The date upon which the apportionment district was
established ((shall be)) is considered the date upon which the public
improvement ordinance was enacted by the sponsor.
(((4) The apportionment of regular property taxes)) (5) The
collection of special property taxes within an apportionment district
under this section ((shall)) must cease when tax allocation revenues
are no longer necessary or obligated to pay public improvement costs or
to pay ((principal of and interest on bonds issued)) tax allocation
bonds issued or incurred to finance public improvement costs and
payable in whole or in part from tax allocation revenues, but in no
event may special property taxes be collected longer than the maximum
period set forth in the ordinance establishing the apportionment
district. At the time of termination of the ((apportionment))
collection of those special property taxes, any excess money and any
earnings thereon held by the sponsor ((shall be returned to the county
treasurer and distributed to the taxing districts which were subject to
the allocation in proportion to their regular property tax levies due
for the year in which the funds are returned)) must be spent on costs
of public improvements.
(6) For purposes of Title 84 RCW, an apportionment district is
deemed a "taxing district" and any special property tax levy is deemed
a levy of the apportionment district, separate from any other tax levy
of the sponsor.

Sec. 5 RCW 39.88.080 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 9 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Tax allocation revenues may be applied, in no particular order,
as follows:
(((1))) (a) To pay for public improvements including public
improvement costs;
(((2))) (b) To ((pay)) provide for payments with respect to
principal of and interest on, and to fund any necessary reserves for,
tax allocation bonds; or
(((3) To pay into bond funds established to pay the principal of
and interest on general obligation bonds issued pursuant to law to
finance public facilities that are specified in the public improvement
ordinance and constructed following the establishment of and within the
apportionment district; or
(4))) (c) To pay any combination of the foregoing.
(2) In the event that the legislative authority of a sponsor
determines that public improvements specified in the ordinance
establishing an apportionment district are impracticable to carry out,
or if unspent tax allocation bond proceeds or tax allocation revenues
remain after the completion of the public improvements specified in the
ordinance, the legislative authority may by ordinance spend the
remaining bond proceeds and tax allocation revenues to retire or
defease those bonds or on the costs of other public improvements, after
holding a hearing with public notice given substantially in accordance
with the procedure described in RCW 39.88.040(2). No such change of
use of tax allocation revenues or the proceeds of tax allocation bonds
may permit an increase in the maximum period of time during which the
special property tax is to be levied and collected, or permit an
increase in the total amount of the estimated cost to be paid from
special property taxes or from tax allocation bonds as set forth in the
ordinance establishing the apportionment district. Upon the retirement
or defeasance of all tax allocation bonds secured by special property
taxes levied and collected within an apportionment district, any
remaining tax allocation revenues must be spent on costs of public
improvements.

Sec. 6 RCW 39.88.100 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 11 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) A sponsor may issue such tax allocation bonds as it may deem
appropriate for the financing of public improvement costs and a
reasonable bond reserve and for the refunding of any outstanding tax
allocation bonds.
(2) The principal and interest of tax allocation bonds may be made
payable from:
(a) Tax allocation revenues;
(b) Project revenues which may include (i) nontax income, revenues,
fees, and rents from the public improvement financed with the proceeds
of the bonds, or portions thereof, and (ii) contributions, grants, and
nontax money available to the sponsor for payment of costs of the
public improvement or the debt service of the bonds issued therefor;
(c) The full faith and credit of the sponsor or of any other taxing
district (provision of which is declared to be a proper purpose for any
such taxing district) payable from annual ad valorem taxes to be levied
within the constitutional and statutory tax limitations provided by law
without a vote of the electors of the sponsor or other taxing district
on all of the taxable property within the boundaries of that sponsor or
other taxing district;
(d) Any combination of the foregoing.
(3) Except and to the extent that a sponsor or other taxing
district has expressly pledged its full faith and credit to the payment
of tax allocation bonds, tax allocation bonds ((shall)) may not be the
general obligation of or guaranteed by all or any part of the full
faith and credit of the sponsor or any other state or local government,
or any tax revenues other than tax allocation revenues, and shall not
be considered a debt of the sponsor or other state or local government
for general indebtedness limitation purposes.
(4) The terms and conditions of tax allocation bonds may include
provisions for the following matters, among others:
(a) The date of issuance, maturity date or dates, denominations,
form, series, negotiability, registration, rank or priority, place of
payment, interest rate or rates which may be fixed or may vary over the
life of the tax allocation bonds, bond reserve, coverage, and such
other terms related to repayment of the tax allocation bonds;
(b) The application of tax allocation bond proceeds; the use, sale,
or disposition of property acquired; consideration or rents and fees to
be charged in the sale or lease of property acquired; consideration or
rents and fees to be charged in the sale or lease of property within a
public improvement; the application of rents, fees, and revenues within
a public improvement; the maintenance, insurance, and replacement of
property within a public improvement; other encumbrances, if any, upon
all or part of property within a public improvement, then existing or
thereafter acquired; and the type of debts that may be incurred;
(c) The creation of special funds; the money to be so applied; and
the use and disposition of the money;
(d) The securing of the tax allocation bonds by a pledge of
property and property rights, by assignment of income generated by the
public improvement, or by pledging such additional specifically
described resources other than tax revenues as are available to the
sponsor;
(e) The terms and conditions for redemption;
(f) The replacement of lost and destroyed bond instruments;
(g) Procedures for amendment of the terms and conditions of the tax
allocation bonds;
(h) The powers of a trustee to enforce covenants and take other
actions in event of default; the rights, liabilities, powers, and
duties arising upon the breach of any covenant, condition, or
obligation; and
(i) When consistent with the terms of this chapter, such other
terms, conditions, and provisions which may make the tax allocation
bonds more marketable and further the purposes of this chapter.
(5) Tax allocation bonds may be issued and sold in such manner as
the legislative authority of the sponsor ((shall)) determines. Tax
allocation bonds may also be issued and sold in accordance with chapter
39.46 RCW.
(6) The sponsor may also issue or incur obligations in anticipation
of the receipt of tax allocation bond proceeds or other money available
to pay public improvement costs.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.52.043 and 2009 c 551 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as
amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal
property by the taxing districts hereafter named ((shall be)) are as
follows:
(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts ((shall be)) are as
follows: (a) The levy by the state ((shall)) may not exceed three
dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted
to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio
fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the
support of the common schools; (b) the levy by any county ((shall)) may
not exceed one dollar and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value; (c) the levy by any road district ((shall)) may not exceed two
dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value;
and (d) the levy by any city or town ((shall)) may not exceed three
dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value. However any county is hereby authorized to increase
its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two
dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value for general county purposes if the total levies for both
the county and any road district within the county do not exceed four
dollars and five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, and no
other taxing district has its levy reduced as a result of the increased
county levy.
(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior
taxing districts, other than the state, ((shall)) may not exceed five
dollars and ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation.
The term "junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other
than the state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, apportionment
districts established under chapter 39.88 RCW, port districts, and
public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection
shall not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law
by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution;
(c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW
84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical
services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable
housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f)
the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are
protected under RCW 84.52.120; (g) levies imposed by ferry districts
under RCW 36.54.130; (h) levies for criminal justice purposes under RCW
84.52.135; (i) the portions of levies by fire protection districts that
are protected under RCW 84.52.125; ((and)) (j) levies by counties for
transit-related purposes under RCW 84.52.140; and (k) levies by or for
apportionment districts established under chapter 39.88 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.52.050 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 194 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as ((hereinafter)) provided otherwise in this section,
the aggregate of all tax levies upon real and personal property by the
state and all taxing districts, now existing or hereafter created,
((shall)) may not in any year exceed one percentum of the true and fair
value of such property in money((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). Nothing
((herein shall)) in this section prevents levies at the rates now
provided by law by or for any port or public utility district or any
apportionment district established under chapter 39.88 RCW. The term
"taxing district" for the purposes of this section ((shall)) means any
political subdivision, municipal corporation, district, or other
governmental agency authorized by law to levy, or have levied for it,
ad valorem taxes on property, other than a port or public utility
district or any apportionment district established under chapter 39.88
RCW. Such aggregate limitation or any specific limitation imposed by
law in conformity therewith may be exceeded only as authorized by law
and in conformity with the provisions of Article VII, section 2(a),
(b), or (c) of the Constitution of the state of Washington, or in
conformity with any other provision of Article VII of the Constitution
of the state of Washington.
(2) Nothing ((herein contained shall)) in this section prohibits
the legislature from allocating or reallocating the authority to levy
taxes between the taxing districts of the state and its political
subdivisions in a manner which complies with the aggregate tax
limitation set forth in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 39.88.060 (Disagreements between taxing districts) and 1989
c 378 s 1 & 1982 1st ex.s. c 42 s 7; and
(2) RCW 39.88.090 (General obligation bonds) and 1982 1st ex.s. c
42 s 10.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---