BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.244 and 2008 c 248 s 2 and 2008 c 41 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for microbreweries; fee to be one
hundred dollars for production of less than sixty thousand barrels of
malt liquor, including strong beer, per year.
(2) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also act as a
distributor and/or retailer for beer and strong beer of its own
production. Strong beer may not be sold at a farmers market or under
any endorsement which may authorize microbreweries to sell beer at
farmers markets. Any microbrewery operating as a distributor and/or
retailer under this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws
and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers, except that a
microbrewery operating as a distributor may maintain a warehouse off
the premises of the microbrewery for the distribution of beer provided
that (a) the warehouse has been approved by the board under RCW
66.24.010 and (b) the number of warehouses off the premises of the
microbrewery does not exceed one. A microbrewery holding a spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license may sell beer of its own production
for off-premises consumption from its restaurant premises in kegs or in
a sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser or
furnished by the licensee and filled at the tap by the licensee at the
time of sale.
(3) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may also sell beer
of another domestic breweries' production for on and off-premises
consumption from its premises as long as the other breweries' brands do
not exceed twenty-five percent of the microbrewery's on-tap offering of
their own brands.
(4) The board may issue up to two retail licenses allowing a
microbrewery to operate an on or off-premise tavern, beer and/or wine
restaurant, or spirits, beer, and wine restaurant.
(((4))) (5) A microbrewery that holds a tavern license, spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant license, or a beer and/or wine restaurant
license shall hold the same privileges and endorsements as permitted
under RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, and 66.24.420.
(((5))) (6)(a) A microbrewery licensed under this section may apply
to the board for an endorsement to sell bottled beer of its own
production at retail for off-premises consumption at a qualifying
farmers market. The annual fee for this endorsement is seventy-five
dollars.
(b) For each month during which a microbrewery will sell beer at a
qualifying farmers market, the microbrewery must provide the board or
its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at which bottled
beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received by the board
before the microbrewery may offer beer for sale at a qualifying farmers
market.
(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the microbrewery license for the purpose of this title.
The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this
subsection (((5))) (6) do not constitute the tasting or sampling
privilege of a microbrewery. The microbrewery may not store beer at a
farmers market beyond the hours that the microbrewery offers bottled
beer for sale. The microbrewery may not act as a distributor from a
farmers market location.
(e) Before a microbrewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying
farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for
authorization for any microbrewery with an endorsement approved under
this subsection (((5))) (6) to sell bottled beer at retail at the
farmers market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A
map of the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other
designated locations at which an approved microbrewery may sell bottled
beer; and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market
managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify
the locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved microbrewery to sell
bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board shall
notify the persons or entities of the application for authorization
pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under
this subsection (((5))) (6)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any
violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and any additional rules necessary
to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection (((5))) (6):
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.
(((6))) (7) Any microbrewery licensed under this section may
contract-produce beer for another microbrewer. This contract-production is not a sale for the purposes of RCW 66.28.170 and
66.28.180.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.24.240 and 2008 c 41 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a license for domestic breweries; fee to be two
thousand dollars for production of sixty thousand barrels or more of
malt liquor per year.
(2) Any domestic brewery, except for a brand owner of malt
beverages under RCW 66.04.010(((6))) (7), licensed under this section
may also act as a distributor and/or retailer for beer of its own
production. Any domestic brewery operating as a distributor and/or
retailer under this subsection shall comply with the applicable laws
and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers. A domestic
brewery holding a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license may sell
beer of its own production for off-premises consumption from its
restaurant premises in kegs or in a sanitary container brought to the
premises by the purchaser or furnished by the licensee and filled at
the tap by the licensee at the time of sale.
(3) Any domestic brewery licensed under this section may also sell
beer of another domestic breweries' production for on and off-premises
consumption from its premises as long as the other breweries' brands do
not exceed twenty-five percent of the domestic brewery's on-tap
offering of their own brands.
(4) A domestic brewery may hold up to two retail licenses to
operate an on or off-premise tavern, beer and/or wine restaurant, or
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant. This retail license is separate
from the brewery license. A brewery that holds a tavern license, a
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license, or a beer and/or wine
restaurant license shall hold the same privileges and endorsements as
permitted under RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, and 66.24.420.
(((4))) (5) Any domestic brewery licensed under this section may
contract-produce beer for a brand owner of malt beverages defined under
RCW 66.04.010(((6))) (7), and this contract-production is not a sale
for the purposes of RCW 66.28.170 and 66.28.180.
(((5))) (6)(a) A domestic brewery licensed under this section and
qualified for a reduced rate of taxation pursuant to RCW
66.24.290(3)(b) may apply to the board for an endorsement to sell
bottled beer of its own production at retail for off-premises
consumption at a qualifying farmers market. The annual fee for this
endorsement is seventy-five dollars.
(b) For each month during which a domestic brewery will sell beer
at a qualifying farmers market, the domestic brewery must provide the
board or its designee a list of the dates, times, and locations at
which bottled beer may be offered for sale. This list must be received
by the board before the domestic brewery may offer beer for sale at a
qualifying farmers market.
(c) The beer sold at qualifying farmers markets must be produced in
Washington.
(d) Each approved location in a qualifying farmers market is deemed
to be part of the domestic brewery license for the purpose of this
title. The approved locations under an endorsement granted under this
subsection do not include the tasting or sampling privilege of a
domestic brewery. The domestic brewery may not store beer at a farmers
market beyond the hours that the domestic brewery offers bottled beer
for sale. The domestic brewery may not act as a distributor from a
farmers market location.
(e) Before a domestic brewery may sell bottled beer at a qualifying
farmers market, the farmers market must apply to the board for
authorization for any domestic brewery with an endorsement approved
under this subsection to sell bottled beer at retail at the farmers
market. This application shall include, at a minimum: (i) A map of
the farmers market showing all booths, stalls, or other designated
locations at which an approved domestic brewery may sell bottled beer;
and (ii) the name and contact information for the on-site market
managers who may be contacted by the board or its designee to verify
the locations at which bottled beer may be sold. Before authorizing a
qualifying farmers market to allow an approved domestic brewery to sell
bottled beer at retail at its farmers market location, the board shall
notify the persons or entities of such application for authorization
pursuant to RCW 66.24.010 (8) and (9). An authorization granted under
this subsection (((5))) (6)(e) may be withdrawn by the board for any
violation of this title or any rules adopted under this title.
(f) The board may adopt rules establishing the application and
approval process under this section and such additional rules as may be
necessary to implement this section.
(g) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Qualifying farmers market" means an entity that sponsors a
regular assembly of vendors at a defined location for the purpose of
promoting the sale of agricultural products grown or produced in this
state directly to the consumer under conditions that meet the following
minimum requirements:
(A) There are at least five participating vendors who are farmers
selling their own agricultural products;
(B) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers exceeds the total combined gross annual sales of vendors who
are processors or resellers;
(C) The total combined gross annual sales of vendors who are
farmers, processors, or resellers exceeds the total combined gross
annual sales of vendors who are not farmers, processors, or resellers;
(D) The sale of imported items and secondhand items by any vendor
is prohibited; and
(E) No vendor is a franchisee.
(ii) "Farmer" means a natural person who sells, with or without
processing, agricultural products that he or she raises on land he or
she owns or leases in this state or in another state's county that
borders this state.
(iii) "Processor" means a natural person who sells processed food
that he or she has personally prepared on land he or she owns or leases
in this state or in another state's county that borders this state.
(iv) "Reseller" means a natural person who buys agricultural
products from a farmer and resells the products directly to the
consumer.

--- END ---