BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.360 and 2007 c 226 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a grocery store license to sell beer, strong beer, and/or
wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original containers, not to be
consumed upon the premises where sold, at any store other than the
state liquor stores.
(1) Licensees obtaining a written endorsement from the board may
also sell malt liquor in kegs or other containers capable of holding
less than five and one-half gallons of liquid.
(2) The annual fee for the grocery store license is one hundred
fifty dollars for each store.
(3) Upon approval by the board, the grocery store licensee may also
receive an endorsement to permit the sale of beer to a purchaser in a
sanitary container brought to the premises by the purchaser, or
provided by the licensee or manufacturer, and fill at the tap by the
licensee at the time of sale.
(4) The board shall issue a restricted grocery store license
authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table wine, if the board
finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that the sale of strong
beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest. In
determining the public interest, the board shall consider at least the
following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it
shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable.
The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified
wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.
(((4))) (5) Licensees holding a grocery store license must maintain
a minimum three thousand dollar inventory of food products for human
consumption, not including pop, beer, strong beer, or wine.
(((5))) (6) Upon approval by the board, the grocery store licensee
may also receive an endorsement to permit the international export of
beer, strong beer, and wine.
(a) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this endorsement must
have been purchased from a licensed beer or wine distributor licensed
to do business within the state of Washington.
(b) Any beer, strong beer, and wine sold under this endorsement
must be intended for consumption outside the state of Washington and
the United States and appropriate records must be maintained by the
licensee.
(c) A holder of this special endorsement to the grocery store
license shall be considered not in violation of RCW 66.28.010.
(d) Any beer, strong beer, or wine sold under this license must be
sold at a price no less than the acquisition price paid by the holder
of the license.
(e) The annual cost of this endorsement is five hundred dollars and
is in addition to the license fees paid by the licensee for a grocery
store license.
(((6))) (7) A grocery store licensee holding a snack bar license
under RCW 66.24.350 may receive an endorsement to allow the sale of
confections containing more than one percent but not more than ten
percent alcohol by weight to persons twenty-one years of age or older.
(8) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---