BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.371 and 2009 c 373 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a beer and/or wine specialty shop license to sell beer,
strong beer, and/or wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original
containers, not to be consumed upon the premises where sold, at any
store other than the state liquor stores. Licensees obtaining a
written endorsement from the board may also sell malt liquor in kegs or
other containers capable of holding four gallons or more of liquid.
The annual fee for the beer and/or wine specialty shop license is one
hundred dollars for each store. The sale of any container holding four
gallons or more must comply with RCW 66.28.200 and 66.28.220.
(2) Licensees under this section may provide, free or for a charge,
single-serving samples of two ounces or less to customers for the
purpose of sales promotion. Sampling activities of licensees under
this section are subject to RCW 66.28.010 and 66.28.040 and the cost of
sampling under this section may not be borne, directly or indirectly,
by any manufacturer, importer, or distributor of liquor.
(3) Upon approval by the board, the beer and/or wine specialty shop
licensee may also receive an endorsement to permit the sale of beer to
a purchaser in a sanitary container brought to the premises by the
purchaser, or provided by the licensee or manufacturer, and fill at the
tap by the licensee at the time of sale.
(4) The board shall issue a restricted beer and/or wine specialty
shop license, authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table
wine, if the board finds upon issuance or renewal of the license that
the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public
interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider
at least the following factors:
(a) The likelihood that the applicant will sell strong beer or
fortified wine to persons who are intoxicated;
(b) Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's
establishment that may arise from persons purchasing strong beer or
fortified wine at the establishment; and
(c) Whether the sale of strong beer or fortified wine would be
detrimental to or inconsistent with a government-operated or funded
alcohol treatment or detoxification program in the area.
If the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of
strong beer or fortified wine would be against the public interest, it
shall issue or renew the license without restriction, as applicable.
The burden of establishing that the sale of strong beer or fortified
wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on those
persons objecting.
(((4))) (5) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop
license must maintain a minimum three thousand dollar wholesale
inventory of beer, strong beer, and/or wine.
(6) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.

--- END ---