BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the mission of
the Washington state conservation commission is: To provide for the
conservation of the renewable resources of this state; for the control
and prevention of soil erosion; for the prevention of flood water and
sediment damages; and for furthering agricultural and nonagricultural
phases of conservation, development, utilization, and disposal of
water, and thereby to preserve natural resources, control floods,
prevent impairment of dams and reservoirs, assist in maintaining
navigability of rivers and harbors, preserve wildlife, protect the tax
bases, protect public lands, and protect and promote the health,
safety, and general welfare of the people of this state. The
legislature further finds that the state conservation commission is an
efficient agency that delivers on-the-ground improvements with low
overhead costs, modest staffing demands, and in a timely fashion. The
legislature finds that a consolidation of the Puget Sound partnership
into the Washington state conservation commission would be beneficial
to the citizens of the state by providing opportunities to increase
state government efficiency and improve the protection and conservation
of Puget Sound. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to
transfer the duties and personnel of the Puget Sound partnership to the
Washington state conservation commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 89.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On July 1, 2012, the Washington state conservation commission
assumes the authority and responsibility to enforce the provisions of
chapter 90.71 RCW and the rules adopted thereunder.
(2) On July 1, 2012, all Puget Sound partnership personnel are
transferred to and become employees of the Washington state
conservation commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.71 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All Puget Sound partnership personnel are employed, supervised,
and controlled by the Washington state conservation commission.
(2) All references to the executive director or the council in this
chapter means the Washington state conservation commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 89.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The Puget Sound partnership is hereby abolished and its powers,
duties, and functions are hereby transferred to the Washington state
conservation commission. All references to the executive director or
the Puget Sound partnership in the Revised Code of Washington shall be
construed to mean the chair or the Washington state conservation
commission.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the Puget Sound
partnership shall be delivered to the custody of the Washington state
conservation commission. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment,
motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the Puget Sound
partnership shall be made available to the Washington state
conservation commission. All funds, credits, or other assets held by
the Puget Sound partnership shall be assigned to the Washington state
conservation commission.
(b) Any appropriations made to the Puget Sound partnership shall,
on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to
the Washington state conservation commission.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the Puget Sound partnership are transferred to
the jurisdiction of the Washington state conservation commission. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service
law, are assigned to the Washington state conservation commission to
perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any
loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil
service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the Puget Sound
partnership shall be continued and acted upon by the Washington state
conservation commission. All existing contracts and obligations shall
remain in full force and shall be performed by the Washington state
conservation commission.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the Puget Sound partnership shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The Washington state conservation
commission must:
(a) Establish a transition plan for the orderly implementation of
this act, including: Addressing personnel issues relating to the
transfer and facilitating the transfer of property and equipment,
records, contracts, and funding from the Puget Sound partnership to the
Washington state conservation commission. The Washington state
conservation commission must consult with the Puget Sound partnership,
department of personnel, and office of financial management in
developing the transition plan; and
(b) Present recommendations to the legislature, in the form of
draft legislation, regarding any statutory changes necessary to
implement this act.
(2) The transition plan and recommendations required by subsection
(1) of this section must be presented to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by November 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 2 through 4 of this act take effect
July 1, 2012.

--- END ---