BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.010 and 2007 c 415 s 2 and 2007 c 394 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility that provides child care and early learning
services outside a child's own home and includes the following
irrespective of whether there is compensation to the agency:
(a) "Child day care center" means an agency that regularly provides
child day care and early learning services for a group of children for
periods of less than twenty-four hours;
(b) "Early learning" includes but is not limited to programs and
services for child care; state, federal, private, and nonprofit
preschool; child care subsidies; child care resource and referral;
parental education and support; and training and professional
development for early learning professionals;
(c) "Family day care provider" means a child day care provider who
regularly provides child day care and early learning services for not
more than twelve children in the provider's home in the family living
quarters;
(d) "Nongovernmental private-public partnership" means an entity
registered as a nonprofit corporation in Washington state with a
primary focus on early learning, school readiness, and parental
support, and an ability to raise a minimum of five million dollars in
contributions;
(e) "Service provider" means the entity that operates a community
facility.
(2) "Agency" does not include the following:
(a) Persons related to the child in the following ways:
(i) Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and
including first cousins, nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding
generations as denoted by prefixes of grand, great, or great-great;
(ii) Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;
(iii) A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as
well as the natural and other legally adopted children of such persons,
and other relatives of the adoptive parents in accordance with state
law; or
(iv) Spouses of any persons named in (i), (ii), or (iii) of this
subsection (2)(a), even after the marriage is terminated;
(b) Persons who are legal guardians of the child;
(c) Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or
children, with or without compensation, where the person providing care
for periods of less than twenty-four hours does not conduct such
activity on an ongoing, regularly scheduled basis for the purpose of
engaging in business, which includes, but is not limited to,
advertising such care;
(d) Parents on a mutually cooperative basis exchange care of one
another's children;
(e) Nursery schools or kindergartens that are engaged primarily in
educational work with preschool children and in which no child is
enrolled on a regular basis for more than four hours per day;
(f) Schools, including boarding schools, that are engaged primarily
in education, operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a
stated academic curriculum, accept only school-age children, and do not
accept custody of children;
(g) Seasonal camps of three months' or less duration engaged
primarily in recreational or educational activities;
(h) Facilities providing care to children for periods of less than
twenty-four hours whose parents remain on the premises to participate
in activities other than employment;
(i) Any agency having been in operation in this state ten years
before June 8, 1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or assistance
from any state or federal agency, and is supported in part by an
endowment or trust fund;
(j) An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or federal
government or an agency, located within the boundaries of a federally
recognized Indian reservation, licensed by the Indian tribe;
(k) An agency located on a federal military reservation, except
where the military authorities request that such agency be subject to
the licensing requirements of this chapter;
(l) An agency that offers early learning and support services, such
as parent education, and does not provide child care services on a
regular basis.
(3) "Applicant" means a person who requests or seeks employment in
an agency.
(4) "Department" means the department of early learning.
(5) "Director" means the director of the department.
(6) "Employer" means a person or business that engages the services
of one or more people, especially for wages or salary to work in an
agency.
(7) "Enforcement action" means denial, suspension, revocation,
modification, or nonrenewal of a license pursuant to RCW 43.215.300(1)
or assessment of civil monetary penalties pursuant to RCW
43.215.300(3).
(8) "Probationary license" means a license issued as a disciplinary
measure to an agency that has previously been issued a full license but
is out of compliance with licensing standards.
(9) "Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard of care
to be maintained by an agency.
(10) "Conviction information" means criminal history record
information relating to an incident that has led to a conviction or
other disposition adverse to the subject.
(11) "Negative action" means a court order, court judgment, or an
adverse action taken by an agency, in any state, federal, tribal, or
foreign jurisdiction, that results in a finding against the applicant
reasonably related to the individual's character, suitability, and
competence to care for or have unsupervised access to children in child
care. This may include but is not limited to:
(a) A decision issued by an administrative law judge;
(b) A final determination, decision, or finding made by an agency
following an investigation;
(c) An adverse agency action, including termination, revocation, or
denial of a license or certification, or if pending adverse agency
action, the voluntary surrender of a license, certification, or
contract in lieu of the adverse action;
(d) A revocation, denial, or restriction placed on any professional
license; and
(e) A final decision of a disciplinary board.
(12) "Nonconviction information" means arrest, founded allegations
of child abuse or neglect pursuant to chapter 26.44 RCW, or other
negative action adverse to the applicant.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.215 and 2007 c 415 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In determining whether an individual is of appropriate
character, suitability, and competence to provide child care and early
learning services to children, the department may consider the history
of past involvement of child protective services or law enforcement
agencies with the individual for the purpose of establishing a pattern
of conduct, behavior, or inaction with regard to the health, safety, or
welfare of a child. No report of child abuse or neglect that has been
destroyed or expunged under RCW 26.44.031 may be used for such
purposes. No unfounded or inconclusive allegation of child abuse or
neglect as defined in RCW 26.44.020 may be disclosed to a provider
licensed under this chapter.
(2) In order to determine the suitability of applicants for an
agency license, licensees, their employees, and other persons who have
unsupervised access to children in care, and who have not resided in
the state of Washington during the three-year period before being
authorized to care for children, shall be fingerprinted.
(a) The fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Washington state
patrol and federal bureau of investigation for a criminal history
record check.
(b) ((The fingerprint criminal history record checks shall be at
the expense of the licensee. The licensee may not pass this cost on to
the employee or prospective employee, unless the employee is determined
to be unsuitable due to his or her criminal history record)) The
applicant must pay for the costs of obtaining the fingerprint criminal
history record check.
(c) The director shall use the information solely for the purpose
of determining eligibility for a license and for determining the
character, suitability, and competence of those persons or agencies,
excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are authorized to
care for children.
(d) Criminal justice agencies shall provide the director such
information as they may have and that the director may require for such
purpose.
(e) The department shall issue a background check clearance card or
certificate to the applicant if after the completion of a background
check the department concludes the applicant is qualified for
unsupervised access to children in care. The background check
clearance card or certificate is valid for one year from the date of
issuance. The card or certificate must be renewed annually. In
renewing the card or certificate, the department need not conduct
another extensive fingerprint-based background check unless it receives
a complaint that when investigated indicates another fingerprint-based
background check is warranted.
(f) The applicant and agency must maintain on-site for inspection
a copy of the background check clearance card or certificate.
(g) Individuals who have been issued a background check clearance
card or certificate must report nonconviction and conviction
information to the department within twenty-four hours of the event
constituting the nonconviction or conviction information.
(h) The department shall investigate and conduct a redetermination
of an applicant's or licensee's background clearance if the department
receives a complaint or information from individuals, a law enforcement
agency, or other federal, state, or local government agency. Subject
to the requirements in RCW 43.215.300 and 43.215.305, and based on a
determination that an individual lacks the appropriate character,
suitability, or competence to provide child care or early learning
services to children, the department may invalidate the background card
or certificate, or suspend, modify, or revoke any license authorized by
this chapter.

--- END ---