BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that adopting
statewide core competencies for early care and education professionals
and child and youth development professionals is important because the
competencies:
(1) Define what early care and education professionals and child
and youth development professionals need to know and be able to do to
provide quality care and education for children;
(2) Serve as the foundation for decisions and practices carried out
by professionals in all early care and education settings and school
age child care settings;
(3) Establish a set of standards for early care and education
professionals and child and youth development professionals that
support the professionalism for the field;
(4) Are an integral part of a comprehensive professional
development system; and
(5) Recognize existing standards met by nationally chartered
nonprofit youth development agencies providing facility-based after
school services for school age children as relevant and sufficient
standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
By December 31, 2012, the department shall adopt core competencies
for early care and education professionals and child and youth
development professionals and develop an implementation plan. The
department shall incorporate the core competencies into all appropriate
professional development opportunities including, but not limited to,
the quality rating and improvement system, the early childhood
education and assistance program, child care licensing, and the early
support for infants and toddlers program. The purpose of the core
competencies is to serve as a foundation for what early care and
education professionals and child and youth development professionals
need to know and do to provide quality care for children. The core
competencies must be reviewed and updated every five years.

--- END ---