BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.63 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a county, city, or other local authority has established
one or more automated traffic safety camera programs including, without
limitation, any programs adopted before the effective date of this
section, all such programs must terminate immediately upon the
effective date of this section.
(2) Any notice of infraction issued by any county, city, or other
local authority in connection with an automated traffic safety camera
program for a violation occurring on or after the effective date of
this section is null and void.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Automated traffic safety camera" means a device that uses a
vehicle sensor installed to work in conjunction with an intersection
traffic control system, a railroad grade crossing control system, or a
speed measuring device, and a camera synchronized to automatically
record one or more sequenced photographs, microphotographs, or
electronic images of the rear of a motor vehicle at the time the motor
vehicle fails to stop when facing a steady red traffic control signal
or an activated railroad grade crossing control signal, or exceeds a
speed limit in a school speed zone as detected by a speed measuring
device.
(b) "Local authority" or "local authorities" includes every county,
municipal, or other local public board or body that has the authority
to adopt local police regulations under the Constitution and laws of
this state.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.12.655 and 2010 c 161 s 310 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An owner is relieved of civil or criminal liability for the
operation of a vehicle by another person when the owner has:
(a) Made a bona fide sale or transfer of a vehicle;
(b) Delivered possession of the vehicle to the person acquiring
ownership;
(c) Released interest in the vehicle and provided the certificate
of title and registration certificate to the person acquiring
ownership; and
(d) Filed a report of sale that meets all the requirements in RCW
46.12.650(2).
(2) A person acquiring a vehicle assumes civil or criminal
liability for any traffic violation under this title, whether
designated as a traffic infraction or classified as a criminal offense,
that occurs after the date of sale or transfer of ownership based on
the vehicle's identification including, but not limited to:
(a) Parking infractions; and
(b) High occupancy toll lane violations((; and
(c) Violations recorded by automated traffic safety cameras)).
(3) A person shown as the buyer of a vehicle on an abandoned
vehicle report submitted to the department by a registered tow truck
operator assumes liability for the vehicle. Any previous owner is
relieved of civil or criminal liability for the operation of the
vehicle from the date of sale.
(4) A person who had no knowledge of the filing of the report of
sale is relieved of civil or criminal liability for the operation of
the vehicle. Liability is then transferred to the seller shown on the
report of sale.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.16A.120 and 2010 c 161 s 430 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Each court and government agency located in this state having
jurisdiction over standing, stopping, and parking violations((,)) and
the use of a photo enforcement system under RCW 46.63.160((, and the
use of automated traffic safety cameras under RCW 46.63.170)) may
forward to the department any outstanding:
(a) Standing, stopping, and parking violations; and
(b) Photo enforcement infractions issued under RCW
46.63.030(1)(d)((; and
(c) Automated traffic safety camera infractions issued under RCW
46.63.030(1)(e))).
(2) Violations and infractions described in subsection (1) of this
section must be reported to the department in the manner described in
RCW 46.20.270(3).
(3) The department shall:
(a) Record the violations and infractions on the matching vehicle
records; and
(b) Send notice approximately one hundred twenty days in advance of
the current vehicle registration expiration date to the registered
owner listing the dates and jurisdictions in which the violations
occurred, the amounts of unpaid fines and penalties, and the surcharge
to be collected. Only those violations and infractions received by the
department one hundred twenty days or more before the current vehicle
registration expiration date will be included in the notice.
Violations and infractions received by the department later than one
hundred twenty days before the current vehicle registration expiration
date that are not satisfied will be delayed until the next vehicle
registration expiration date.
(4) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall not renew a vehicle registration if
there are any outstanding standing, stopping, and parking violations,
and other infractions issued under RCW 46.63.030(1)(d) for the vehicle
unless:
(a) The outstanding((,)) standing, (([stopping,])) stopping, or
parking violations were received by the department within one hundred
twenty days before the current vehicle registration expiration;
(b) There is a change in registered ownership; or
(c) The registered owner presents proof of payment of each
violation and infraction provided in this section and the registered
owner pays the surcharge required under RCW 46.17.030.
(5) The department shall:
(a) Forward a change in registered ownership information to the
court or government agency who reported the outstanding violations or
infractions; and
(b) Remove the outstanding violations and infractions from the
vehicle record.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.16A.120 and 2010 c 249 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1) To renew a vehicle license, an applicant shall satisfy all
listed standing, stopping, and parking violations, and civil penalties
issued under RCW 46.63.160 for the vehicle incurred while the vehicle
was registered in the applicant's name and forwarded to the department
pursuant to RCW 46.20.270(3). For the purposes of this section,
"listed" standing, stopping, and parking violations, and civil
penalties issued under RCW 46.63.160 include only those violations for
which notice has been received from state or local agencies or courts
by the department one hundred twenty days or more before the date the
vehicle license expires and that are placed on the records of the
department. Notice of such violations received by the department later
than one hundred twenty days before that date that are not satisfied
shall be considered by the department in connection with any
applications for license renewal in any subsequent license year. The
renewal application may be processed by the department or its agents
only if the applicant:
(a) Presents a preprinted renewal application showing no listed
standing, stopping, or parking violations, or civil penalties issued
under RCW 46.63.160, or in the absence of such presentation, the agent
verifies the information that would be contained on the preprinted
renewal application; or
(b) If listed standing, stopping, or parking violations, or civil
penalties issued under RCW 46.63.160 exist, presents proof of payment
and pays a fifteen dollar surcharge.
(2) The surcharge shall be allocated as follows:
(a) Ten dollars shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund to be
used exclusively for the administrative costs of the department of
licensing; and
(b) Five dollars shall be retained by the agent handling the
renewal application to be used by the agent for the administration of
this section.
(3) If there is a change in the registered owner of the vehicle,
the department shall forward the information regarding the change to
the state or local charging jurisdiction and release any hold on the
renewal of the vehicle license resulting from parking violations or
civil penalties issued under RCW 46.63.160 incurred while the
certificate of license registration was in a previous registered
owner's name.
(4) The department shall send to all registered owners of vehicles
who have been reported to have outstanding listed parking violations or
civil penalties issued under RCW 46.63.160, at the time of renewal, a
statement setting out the dates and jurisdictions in which the
violations occurred as well as the amounts of unpaid fines and
penalties relating to them and the surcharge to be collected.))
(1) Each court and government agency located in this state having
jurisdiction over standing, stopping, and parking violations and the
use of a photo toll system under RCW 46.63.160 may forward to the
department any outstanding:
(a) Standing, stopping, and parking violations; and
(b) Civil penalties for toll nonpayment detected through the use of
photo toll systems issued under RCW 46.63.160.
(2) Violations, civil penalties, and infractions described in
subsection (1) of this section must be reported to the department in
the manner described in RCW 46.20.270(3).
(3) The department shall:
(a) Record the violations, civil penalties, and infractions on the
matching vehicle records; and
(b) Send notice approximately one hundred twenty days in advance of
the current vehicle registration expiration date to the registered
owner listing the dates and jurisdictions in which the violations,
civil penalties, and infractions occurred, the amounts of unpaid fines
and penalties, and the surcharge to be collected. Only those
violations, civil penalties, and infractions received by the department
one hundred twenty days or more before the current vehicle registration
expiration date will be included in the notice. Violations, civil
penalties, and infractions received by the department later than one
hundred twenty days before the current vehicle registration expiration
date that are not satisfied will be delayed until the next vehicle
registration expiration date.
(4) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall not renew a vehicle registration if
there are any outstanding standing, stopping, and parking violations,
and other civil penalties issued under RCW 46.63.160 for the vehicle
unless:
(a) The outstanding standing, stopping, or parking violations and
civil penalties were received by the department within one hundred
twenty days before the current vehicle registration expiration;
(b) There is a change in registered ownership; or
(c) The registered owner presents proof of payment of each
violation, civil penalty, and infraction provided in this section and
the registered owner pays the surcharge required under RCW 46.17.030.
(5) The department shall:
(a) Forward a change in registered ownership information to the
court or government agency who reported the outstanding violations,
civil penalties, or infractions; and
(b) Remove the outstanding violations, civil penalties, and
infractions from the vehicle record.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.63.030 and 2007 c 101 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A law enforcement officer has the authority to issue a notice
of traffic infraction:
(a) When the infraction is committed in the officer's presence;
(b) When the officer is acting upon the request of a law
enforcement officer in whose presence the traffic infraction was
committed;
(c) If an officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle
accident has reasonable cause to believe that the driver of a motor
vehicle involved in the accident has committed a traffic infraction; or
(d) When the infraction is detected through the use of a photo
enforcement system under RCW 46.63.160((; or
(e) When the infraction is detected through the use of an automated
traffic safety camera under RCW 46.63.170)).
(2) A court may issue a notice of traffic infraction upon receipt
of a written statement of the officer that there is reasonable cause to
believe that an infraction was committed.
(3) If any motor vehicle without a driver is found parked,
standing, or stopped in violation of this title or an equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution, the officer finding the vehicle shall take its registration
number and may take any other information displayed on the vehicle
which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to the
vehicle a notice of traffic infraction.
(4) In the case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle under RCW
46.55.120, upon receiving a complaint by a registered tow truck
operator that has incurred costs in removing, storing, and disposing of
an abandoned vehicle, an officer of the law enforcement agency
responsible for directing the removal of the vehicle shall send a
notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known address of the
person responsible under RCW 46.55.105. The notice must be entitled
"Littering -- Abandoned Vehicle" and give notice of the monetary penalty.
The officer shall append to the notice of infraction, on a form
prescribed by the department of licensing, a notice indicating the
amount of costs incurred as a result of removing, storing, and
disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at
auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction
will not be considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty
payable under this chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied
that the person has made restitution in the amount of the deficiency
remaining after disposal of the vehicle.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.63.030 and 2010 c 249 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A law enforcement officer has the authority to issue a notice
of traffic infraction:
(a) When the infraction is committed in the officer's presence;
(b) When the officer is acting upon the request of a law
enforcement officer in whose presence the traffic infraction was
committed; or
(c) If an officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle
accident has reasonable cause to believe that the driver of a motor
vehicle involved in the accident has committed a traffic infraction((;
or
(d) When the infraction is detected through the use of an automated
traffic safety camera under RCW 46.63.170)).
(2) A court may issue a notice of traffic infraction upon receipt
of a written statement of the officer that there is reasonable cause to
believe that an infraction was committed.
(3) If any motor vehicle without a driver is found parked,
standing, or stopped in violation of this title or an equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution, the officer finding the vehicle shall take its registration
number and may take any other information displayed on the vehicle
which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to the
vehicle a notice of traffic infraction.
(4) In the case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle under RCW
46.55.120, upon receiving a complaint by a registered tow truck
operator that has incurred costs in removing, storing, and disposing of
an abandoned vehicle, an officer of the law enforcement agency
responsible for directing the removal of the vehicle shall send a
notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known address of the
person responsible under RCW 46.55.105. The notice must be entitled
"Littering -- Abandoned Vehicle" and give notice of the monetary penalty.
The officer shall append to the notice of infraction, on a form
prescribed by the department of licensing, a notice indicating the
amount of costs incurred as a result of removing, storing, and
disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at
auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction
will not be considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty
payable under this chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied
that the person has made restitution in the amount of the deficiency
remaining after disposal of the vehicle.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.63.073 and 2007 c 372 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event a traffic infraction is based on a vehicle's
identification, and the registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car
business, the law enforcement agency shall, before a notice of
infraction may be issued, provide a written notice to the rental car
business that a notice of infraction may be issued to the rental car
business if the rental car business does not, within thirty days of
receiving the written notice, provide to the issuing agency by return
mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction.
A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a
copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft.
Timely mailing of this statement to the issuing law enforcement
agency relieves a rental car business of any liability under this
chapter for the notice of infraction. In lieu of identifying the
vehicle operator, the rental car business may pay the applicable
penalty. For the purpose of this subsection, a "traffic infraction
based on a vehicle's identification" includes, but is not limited to,
parking infractions((,)) and high occupancy toll lane violations((, and
violations recorded by automated traffic safety cameras)).
(2) In the event a parking infraction is issued by a private
parking facility and is based on a vehicle's identification, and the
registered owner of the vehicle is a rental car business, the parking
facility shall, before a notice of infraction may be issued, provide a
written notice to the rental car business that a notice of infraction
may be issued to the rental car business if the rental car business
does not, within thirty days of receiving the written notice, provide
to the parking facility by return mail:
(a) A statement under oath stating the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the
infraction occurred; or
(b) A statement under oath that the business is unable to determine
who was driving or renting the vehicle at the time the infraction
occurred because the vehicle was stolen at the time of the infraction.
A statement provided under this subsection must be accompanied by a
copy of a filed police report regarding the vehicle theft.
Timely mailing of this statement to the parking facility relieves
a rental car business of any liability under this chapter for the
notice of infraction. In lieu of identifying the vehicle operator, the
rental car business may pay the applicable penalty. For the purpose of
this subsection, a "parking infraction based on a vehicle's
identification" is limited to parking infractions occurring on a
private parking facility's premises.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.63.075 and 2005 c 167 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In a traffic infraction case involving an infraction detected
through the use of a photo enforcement system under RCW 46.63.160((, or
detected through the use of an automated traffic safety camera under
RCW 46.63.170)), proof that the particular vehicle described in the
notice of traffic infraction was in violation of any such provision of
RCW 46.63.160 ((or 46.63.170)), together with proof that the person
named in the notice of traffic infraction was at the time of the
violation the registered owner of the vehicle, constitutes in evidence
a prima facie presumption that the registered owner of the vehicle was
the person in control of the vehicle at the point where, and for the
time during which, the violation occurred.
(2) This presumption may be overcome only if the registered owner
states, under oath, in a written statement to the court or in testimony
before the court that the vehicle involved was, at the time, stolen or
in the care, custody, or control of some person other than the
registered owner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 2010 c 249 s 7 is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is not intended to restrict,
limit, or expand the ability of local authorities to operate toll
systems in accordance with RCW 46.63.160.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 RCW 46.63.170 (Automated traffic safety
cameras -- Definition) and 2010 c 161 s 1127, 2009 c 470 s 714, 2007 c
372 s 3, & 2005 c 167 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 4, 6, and 9 of this act take
effect upon certification by the secretary of transportation that the
new statewide tolling operations center and photo toll system are fully
operational. A notice of certification must be filed with the code
reviser for publication in the state register. If a certificate is not
issued by the secretary of transportation by December 1, 2012, sections
4, 6, and 9 of this act are null and void.

--- END ---