BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GOALS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year, the four-year
institutions of higher education, while maintaining quality, shall work
toward achieving the following initial degree completion targets by
2018:
(a) Increasing the number of bachelor's degrees earned by
Washington's resident students from the 2010 levels by at least six
thousand degrees completed or by twenty-seven percent;
(b) Consistent with the priority for growing the number of
enrollments and degrees in the fields of engineering, technology,
biotechnology, sciences, computer sciences, and mathematics, at least
two thousand of the additional degrees in (a) of this subsection would
be awarded in the areas of science, which includes the health sciences,
technology, engineering, and mathematics; and
(c) Attaining parity in degree attainment for students from
underrepresented groups, which would mean that at least nineteen
percent of the degrees awarded would include students who are low
income or are the first in their families to attend college.
(2) The bachelor degree completion targets in subsection (1) of
this section shall be updated by the higher education coordinating
board by September 1, 2012, and by September 1st every two years
thereafter based upon the state's changing population and economic
needs. Targets shall be set for five-year periods following the 2018
target.

PART II
FUNDING
Sec. 201 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2010 c 20 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2)(a) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) Beginning with the 2013-14 academic year, reductions or
increases in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduates at the
community and technical colleges shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(c) Beginning with the 2013-14 academic year, the governing boards
of the state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen
State College may set tuition for resident undergraduates as follows:
(i) If state funding for a college or university falls below the
state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year 2011,
the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in (d) of
this subsection, reduce enrollments, or both;
(ii) If state funding for a college or university is at least at
the level of state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal
year 2011, the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits
set in (d) of this subsection and shall continue to at least maintain
the actual enrollment levels for fiscal year 2011 or increase
enrollments as required in the omnibus appropriations act; and
(iii) If state funding is increased so that combined with tuition
the sixtieth percentile of the total per-student funding at similar
public institutions of higher education in the global challenge states
under RCW 28B.15.068 is exceeded, the governing board shall decrease
tuition by the amount needed for the total per-student funding to be at
the sixtieth percentile under RCW 28B.15.068.
(d) The amount of tuition for resident undergraduate students set
by the governing board for an institution under this subsection (2) may
not exceed the sixtieth percentile of the tuition for resident
undergraduate students of similar public institutions of higher
education in the global challenge states.
(3)(a) ((Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with
the 2012-13 academic year,)) The governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College,
and the state board for community and technical colleges may reduce or
increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident
undergraduates, including summer school students and students in other
self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time
tuition fees may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or
increases may be made for all or portions of an institution's programs,
campuses, courses, or students.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Governing boards shall be required to
provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial
aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of
attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
each college in the state board for community and technical college
system shall consult with existing student associations or
organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the
impacts of potential tuition increases. Colleges shall provide data
regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the
sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid
for by aid.
(4) ((Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2015-16, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2014-15 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5))) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not
apply to high school students enrolling in participating institutions
of higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(((6))) (5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall
not apply to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement
program through an interlocal agreement between a school district and
a community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through
28A.175.110.
(((7))) (6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall
not apply to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical
college participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the
purpose of obtaining a high school diploma.
(((8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the
University of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent
of all revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases
beginning in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to
assist needy low and middle-income resident law students.
(9) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, institutions of
higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of graduate academic school tuition
increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through academic year
2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.
(10))) (7) Any tuition increases above seven percent shall fund
costs of instruction, library and student services, utilities and
maintenance, other costs related to instruction as well as
institutional financial aid. ((Through 2010-11, any funding reductions
to instruction, library and student services, utilities and maintenance
and other costs related to instruction shall be proportionally less
than other program areas including administration.))

Sec. 202 RCW 28B.15.068 and 2009 c 540 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) ((Beginning with the 2007-08 academic year and ending with the
2016-17 academic year,)) Tuition fees charged to full-time resident
undergraduate students((, except in academic years 2009-10 and 2010-11,)) may increase no greater than seven percent over the previous
academic year ((in any institution of higher education)) at community
and technical colleges. Annual reductions or increases in full-time
tuition fees for resident undergraduate students shall be as provided
in the omnibus appropriations act, within the seven percent increase
limit established in this section. ((For academic years 2009-10 and
2010-11 the omnibus appropriations act may provide tuition increases
greater than seven percent.)) To the extent that state appropriations
combined with tuition and fee revenues are insufficient to achieve the
total per-student funding goals established in subsection (2) of this
section, the legislature may revisit state appropriations, authorized
enrollment levels, and changes in tuition fees for any given fiscal
year.
(2) The state shall adopt as its goal total per-student funding
levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and fees, of at least
the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding at similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states. In
defining comparable per-student funding levels, the office of financial
management shall adjust for regional cost-of-living differences; for
differences in program offerings and in the relative mix of lower
division, upper division, and graduate students; and for accounting and
reporting differences among the comparison institutions. The office of
financial management shall develop a funding trajectory for each four-year institution of higher education and for the community and
technical college system as a whole that when combined with tuition and
fees revenue allows the state to achieve its funding goal for each
four-year institution and the community and technical college system as
a whole no later than fiscal year 2017. ((The state shall not reduce
enrollment levels below fiscal year 2007 budgeted levels in order to
improve or alter the per-student funding amount at any four-year
institution of higher education or the community and technical college
system as a whole.)) The state recognizes that each four-year
institution of higher education and the community and technical college
system as a whole have different funding requirements to achieve
desired performance levels, and that increases to the total per-student
funding amount may need to exceed the minimum funding goal.
(3) By September 1st of each year beginning in 2008, the office of
financial management shall report to the governor, the higher education
coordinating board, and appropriate committees of the legislature with
updated estimates of the total per-student funding level that
represents the sixtieth percentile of funding for comparable
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states, and
the progress toward that goal that was made for each of the public
institutions of higher education.
(4) By September 1st of each year beginning in 2011, the office of
financial management shall report to the governor, the higher education
coordinating board, the boards of regents or trustees of the four-year
institutions of higher education, and appropriate committees of the
legislature with updated estimates of the undergraduate resident
tuition that represents the sixtieth percentile of tuition for the
comparable institutions of higher education in the global challenge
states.
(5) As used in this section, "global challenge states" are the top
performing states on the new economy index published by the progressive
policy institute as of July 22, 2007. The new economy index ranks
states on indicators of their potential to compete in the new economy.
At least once every five years, the office of financial management
shall determine if changes to the list of global challenge states are
appropriate. The office of financial management shall report its
findings to the governor and the legislature.
(((5) During the 2009-10 and the 2010-11 academic years,)) The
institutions of higher education shall include information on their
billing statements notifying students of available federal tax credits
((available through the American opportunity tax credit provided in the
American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009)).

PART III
PERFORMANCE AND ACCOUNTABILITY
Sec. 301 RCW 28B.76.270 and 2004 c 275 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall establish an accountability monitoring and
reporting system as part of a continuing effort to make meaningful and
substantial progress towards the achievement of long-term performance
goals in higher education.
(2) ((Based on guidelines prepared by the board,)) To provide
consistent easily understood data among the public four-year
institutions of higher education within Washington and in other states,
the following data must be reported annually and at a minimum include
data recommended by a national organization representing state chief
executives. This data must include the following for the four-year
institutions of higher education and the board may change the data
requirements to be consistent with best practices across the country:
(a) Bachelor's degrees awarded;
(b) Graduation rates: The number and percentage of students who
graduate within four years for bachelor's degrees and within the
extended time, which is six years for bachelor's degrees;
(c) Transfer rates: The annual number and percentage of students
who transfer from a two-year to a four-year institution of higher
education;
(d) Time and credits to degree: The average length of time in
years and average number of credits that graduating students took to
earn a bachelor's degree;
(e) Enrollment in remedial education: The number and percentage of
entering first-time undergraduate students who place into and enroll in
remedial mathematics, English, or both;
(f) Success beyond remedial education: The number and percentage
of entering first-time undergraduate students who complete entry
college-level math and English courses within the first two consecutive
academic years;
(g) Credit accumulation: The number and percentage of first-time
undergraduate students completing two quarters or one semester worth of
credit during their first academic year;
(h) Retention rates: The number and percentage of entering
undergraduate students who enroll consecutively from fall-to-spring and
fall-to-fall at an institution of higher education;
(i) Course completion: The percentage of credit hours completed
out of those attempted during an academic year;
(j) Enrollment: Total first-time undergraduate students enrolled
in an institution of higher education;
(k) Completion ratio: Annual ratio of certificates and degrees
awarded per one hundred full-time equivalent undergraduate students;
and
(l) Market penetration: Annual ratio of certificates and degrees
awarded relative to the state's population with a high school diploma.
(3) Each four-year institution ((and the state board for community
and technical colleges shall submit a biennial plan to achieve
measurable and specific improvements each academic year on statewide
and institution-specific performance measures. Plans shall be
submitted to the board along with the biennial budget requests from the
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges.
Performance measures established for the community and technical
colleges shall reflect the role and mission of the colleges)) of higher
education shall report the data required under this section to the
board and submit the plans required under section 303 of this act.
(((3) The board shall approve biennial performance targets for each
four-year institution and for the community and technical college
system and shall review actual achievements annually. The state board
for community and technical colleges shall set biennial performance
targets for each college or district, where appropriate.))
(4) The board shall review the data, analyze the data including
changes over time, and prepare reports based upon that data. The board
shall report on each institution's performance improvement under the
baccalaureate degree incentive program under section 302 of this act.
(5) The board shall submit a report on progress towards the
statewide goals, with recommendations for the ensuing biennium, to the
fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature along with
the board's biennial budget recommendations.
(((5))) (6) The board, in collaboration with the four-year
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges,
shall periodically review and update the accountability monitoring and
reporting system.
(((6))) (7) The board shall develop measurable indicators and
benchmarks for its own performance regarding cost, quantity, quality,
and timeliness and including the performance of committees and advisory
groups convened under this chapter to accomplish such tasks as
improving transfer and articulation, improving articulation with the K-12 education system, measuring educational costs, or developing data
protocols. The board shall submit its accountability plan to the
legislature concurrently with the biennial report on institution
progress.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76
RCW to read as follows:
The board shall establish a baccalaureate degree incentive program.
To the extent funds are available, awards shall be made beginning with
the 2012-2013 fiscal year. The board, in collaboration with the
institutions, the council of presidents, and the education data center,
shall design the program to provide awards for four-year institutions
of higher education based upon each institution's individual
performance improvement on a set of measures. The measures must
initially include:
(1) The total number of undergraduate degrees completed;
(2) Increases in the number of degrees awarded in the physical and
health sciences, technology, engineering, and mathematics;
(3) Increases in the retention of first-year students receiving
need-based assistance not including students who transfer to another
institution of higher education; and
(4) The number of excess credits taken beyond what is required to
earn a bachelor's degree.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10
RCW to read as follows:
Each four-year institution of higher education must develop
specific action plans to reach the goals under section 101 of this act
to improve cost-effectiveness and efficiency. The individual
institutions must develop their campus plans recognizing the role of
their campus as part of the system of public higher education. The
plan and the results shall be reported biennially to the governor, the
legislature, and the higher education coordinating board. Institutions
must report on innovations, which may include but are not limited to:
(1) The innovative use of technology in instruction, particularly
for large introductory courses;
(2) Increasing administrative efficiencies among the four-year
institutions and campuses;
(3) Eliminating underused majors and courses;
(4) Creating three-year bachelor degree programs;
(5) Increasing tuition for students taking credits beyond those
needed to earn a degree;
(6) Recognizing prior learning experiences based on competency
assessments; and
(7) Recognizing transfer credits, particularly credits earned in
academic programs at two-year and four-year institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A graduate of a community or technical college in this state
who has earned a transferrable associate of arts or sciences degree
when admitted to a four-year institution of higher education shall have
junior standing and shall be deemed to have met the lower division
general education requirements of that institution.
(2) A student who has earned the equivalent of ninety quarter
credit hours and has completed the general education requirements at
that four-year institution of higher education in Washington when
admitted to another four-year institution of higher education shall
have junior standing and shall be deemed to have met the lower division
general education requirements of the institution to which the student
transfers.
(3) The community and technical colleges, jointly with the four-year institutions of higher education, must develop a list of academic
courses that are equivalent to one-year's worth of general education
credit and that would transfer for that purpose to any other two or
four-year institution of higher education. If a student completes one-year's worth of general education credits, that student may be issued
a one-year academic completion certificate. This certificate shall be
accepted at any transferring two or four-year institution of higher
education.
(4) Each institution of higher education must develop a minimum of
one degree within the arts and sciences disciplines that can be
completed within the equivalent of ninety quarter upper division
credits by any student who enters an institution of higher education
with junior status and lower division general education requirements
completed.
(5) Each four-year institution of higher education must publish a
list of recommended courses for each academic major designed to help
students who are planning to transfer design their course of study.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Community and technical colleges must identify and publish in
their admissions materials the college level courses that are
recognized by all four-year institutions of higher education as
transferring to the four-year institutions of higher education.
Publication of the list of courses must be easily identified and
accessible on the college's web site.
(2) Community and technical colleges must create a list of courses
that satisfy the basic requirements, distribution requirements, and
approved electives for:
(a) A one-year academic completion certificate as provided for
under section 304 of this act; and
(b) A transferrable associate of arts or sciences degree as
provided for under section 304 of this act.
(3) To the extent possible, each community and technical college
must develop links between the lists in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section and its list of courses, and develop methods to encourage
students to check the lists in subsections (1) and (2) of this section
when the students are registering for courses.

PART IV
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.10.920 (Performance agreements--Generally) and 2008 c
160 s 2;
(2) RCW 28B.10.921 (Performance agreements -- Contents) and 2008 c
160 s 3; and
(3) RCW 28B.10.922 (Performance agreements -- State committee--Development of final proposals -- Implementation -- Updates) and 2008 c 160
s 4.

--- END ---