BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that educational
opportunity is a human right that is often denied to individuals with
disabilities as they encounter significant financial obstacles while
attempting to gain access to the postsecondary educational
opportunities available at Washington's institutions of higher
education. The legislature further finds that, when given equal
educational opportunities, individuals with disabilities make
significant contributions to the state's social fiber and economic
well-being. The legislature intends to mitigate the financial burden
encountered by individuals with disabilities as they progress through
the state's educational system.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2010 c 20 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(3)(a) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, the governing boards of the state universities,
the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made
for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or
students.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Governing boards shall be required to
provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial
aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of
attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
each college in the state board for community and technical college
system shall consult with existing student associations or
organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the
impacts of potential tuition increases. Colleges shall provide data
regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the
sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid
for by aid.
(4) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2015-16, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2014-15 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement program
through an interlocal agreement between a school district and a
community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through
28A.175.110.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose
of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the University
of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases beginning
in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to assist needy
low and middle-income resident law students.
(9) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, institutions of
higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of graduate academic school tuition
increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through academic year
2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.
(10) Any tuition increases above seven percent shall fund costs of
instruction, library and student services, utilities and maintenance,
other costs related to instruction as well as institutional financial
aid. Through 2010-11, any funding reductions to instruction, library
and student services, utilities and maintenance and other costs related
to instruction shall be proportionally less than other program areas
including administration.
(11)(a) Beginning with the 2010-11 academic year, for the duration
of each qualified student's enrollment and full-time attendance at a
college or university, tuition fees for each qualified student shall
remain fixed at the rate in effect on the first day of the first
academic term in which that student is enrolled. Colleges and
universities may only make annual inflation adjustments to tuition fees
charged to each qualified student.
(b) For qualified students who have attended colleges or
universities before the 2010-11 academic year, tuition fees for each
qualified student shall remain fixed at the rate in effect on the first
day of the first academic term of the 2010-11 academic year. Colleges
and universities may only make annual inflation adjustments to tuition
fees charged to each qualified student.
(12)(a) Subsection (11) of this section does not apply when a
qualified student withdraws from a college or university, or transfers
to a different college or university. When a former qualified student
later reenrolls, tuition fees shall remain fixed at the rate in effect
on the first day of the first academic term of reenrollment. When a
qualified student transfers to a different college or university,
tuition fees shall remain fixed at the rate in effect on the first day
of the first academic term that the student is enrolled at that college
or university.
(b) However, (a) of this subsection does not apply if a qualified
student withdraws from a college or university because of serious
medical illness or personal injury. Upon later reenrollment, the
qualified student's tuition fees under this subsection (12)(b) shall
remain fixed at the rate in effect on the first day of the first
academic term following the 2010-11 academic year that the student was
enrolled at that college or university, pursuant to subsection (11) of
this section.
(13) Subsection (11) of this section does not apply when a
qualified student who has received an undergraduate degree at a college
or university is immediately enrolled as a student in a graduate degree
program at the same college or university. When a qualified student
who has received an undergraduate degree at a college or university is
immediately enrolled as a student in a graduate degree program at the
same college or university, tuition fees shall remain fixed at the rate
in effect on the first day of the first academic term that the student
is enrolled in any graduate program at that college or university.
Colleges and universities may only make annual inflation adjustments to
tuition fees charged to each qualified student.
(14) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Qualified student" means a student who is identified as a
qualified individual with a disability under the federal Americans with
disability act of 1990 as amended.
(b) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for the United States for each fiscal year as published by the
federal bureau of labor statistics.

--- END ---