BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.28.131 and 2006 c 185 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
Until July 1, 2007, the department shall issue a written warning to
any specialty contractor, performing the scope of work defined by rule
for the pump and irrigation or domestic pump specialties, not having a
valid electrical contractor license. The warning will state that the
contractor must be qualified for and apply for a specialty electrical
contractor license under the requirements in RCW 19.28.041 within
thirty calendar days of the warning. Only one warning will be issued
to any contractor. If the contractor fails to comply with this
section, the department shall issue a penalty or penalties as
authorized in this section to the contractor. Any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the
provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through
19.28.361 shall be assessed a penalty of not less than fifty dollars or
more than ten thousand dollars. No individual may be assessed more
than one penalty for a single violation. The department shall set by
rule a schedule of penalties for violating RCW 19.28.010 through
19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361. The department shall notify
the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating
any of the provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311
through 19.28.361 of the amount of the penalty and of the specific
violation by certified mail, return receipt requested, sent to the last
known address of the assessed party. Any penalty is subject to review
by an appeal to the board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of
the penalty until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall be
filed within twenty days after notice of the penalty is given to the
assessed party by certified mail, return receipt requested, sent to the
last known address of the assessed party and shall be made by filing a
written notice of appeal with the department. The notice shall be
accompanied by a certified check for two hundred dollars, which shall
be returned to the assessed party if the decision of the department is
not sustained by the board. If the board sustains the decision of the
department, the two hundred dollars shall be applied by the department
to the payment of the per diem and expenses of the members of the board
incurred in the matter, and any balance remaining after payment of per
diem and expenses shall be paid into the electrical license fund. The
hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall assign its hearings to an
administrative law judge to conduct the hearing and issue a proposed
decision and order. The board shall be allowed a minimum of twenty
days to review a proposed decision and shall issue its decision no
later than the next regularly scheduled board meeting.

--- END ---