BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.460 and 2010 c 127 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A county legislative authority may authorize, fix, and
impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this
chapter.
(b) If a county with a population over eight hundred thousand has
not imposed the tax authorized under this subsection by January 1,
2011, any city with a population over thirty thousand located in that
county may authorize, fix, and impose the sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter. The county must provide a
credit against its tax for the full amount of tax imposed under this
subsection (1)(b) by any city located in that county if the county
imposes the tax after January 1, 2011.
(2) The tax authorized in this section is in addition to any other
taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county for a county's tax
and within a city for a city's tax. The rate of tax equals one-tenth
of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.
(3) Moneys collected under this section must be used solely for the
purpose of providing for the operation or delivery of chemical
dependency or mental health treatment programs and services and for the
operation or delivery of therapeutic court programs and services. For
the purposes of this section, "programs and services" includes, but is
not limited to, treatment services, case management, and housing that
are a component of a coordinated chemical dependency or mental health
treatment program or service.
(4) All moneys collected under this section must be used solely for
the purpose of providing new or expanded programs and services as
provided in this section, except as follows:
(a) A portion of moneys collected under this section may be used to
supplant existing funding for these purposes in any county or city as
follows: Up to fifty percent may be used to supplant existing funding
in calendar year 2010; up to forty percent may be used to supplant
existing funding in calendar year 2011; up to thirty percent may be
used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2012; up to twenty
percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2013;
and up to ten percent may be used to supplant existing funding in
calendar year 2014;
(b) For a county with a population larger than twenty-five thousand
that imposes the tax authorized by this section after December 1, 2010,
or a city with a population over thirty thousand that imposes the tax
authorized by subsection (1)(b) of this section after December 1, 2010,
a portion of moneys collected under this section may be used to
supplant existing funding for these purposes as follows: Up to fifty
percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar years
2011-2012; up to forty percent may be used to supplant existing funding
in calendar year 2013; up to thirty percent may be used to supplant
existing funding in calendar year 2014; up to twenty percent may be
used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2015; and up to ten
percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2016;
(c) For a county with a population of less than twenty-five
thousand that imposes the tax authorized by this section after December
1, 2010, a portion of moneys collected under this section may be used
to supplant existing funding for these purposes as follows: Up to
eighty percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar
years 2011-2012; up to sixty percent may be used to supplant existing
funding in calendar year 2013; up to forty percent may be used to
supplant existing funding in calendar year 2014; up to twenty percent
may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar year 2015; and up
to ten percent may be used to supplant existing funding in calendar
year 2016; and
(d) Notwithstanding (a) through (c) of this subsection, moneys
collected under this section may be used to support the cost of the
judicial officer and support staff of a therapeutic court.
(5) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to prohibit the use
of moneys collected under this section for the replacement of lapsed
federal funding previously provided for the operation or delivery of
services and programs as provided in this section.

--- END ---