BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The conservation commission shall
coordinate a process to examine the issue of achieving the state's
water quality objectives relating to livestock operations. The
directors of the department of agriculture, the department of ecology,
and the conservation commission shall determine what personnel are
assigned to this activity and may provide oversight to the process. In
implementing this process, the commission shall involve representatives
of involved agencies, stakeholders, and tribes. The topics to be
considered include:
(a) The appropriate background and training for personnel that
conduct inspections of and provide technical assistance to livestock
operators and whether personnel need to be specifically trained and
assigned to serve this function;
(b) The roles and relationships between technical assistance,
inspection, and enforcement, and the concept of customer service;
(c) The use, availability, and limitations of DNA testing as a
water quality diagnosis tool;
(d) The availability and constraints of state and federal programs
for planning, installation, maintenance of conservation and pollution
control practices, and review of alternative practices;
(e) The extent of known water quality problems relating to
livestock operations;
(f) Best methods to achieve state water quality objectives in the
context of a system that includes both regulatory and incentive-based
approaches;
(g) A review of considerations used to determine water quality
standards including those applicable to the shellfish industry; and
(h) The availability of state and federal funding and whether it is
being appropriately allocated.
(2) The conservation commission shall develop recommendations for
the administration and improvement of the program. The commission
shall provide a written summary of its activities and recommendations
to the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2011.
(3) The activities under this section shall be completed to the
extent feasible from within existing fiscal resources available to the
involved state agencies.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2011.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.48.144 and 1995 c 403 s 636 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 43.05.060 through 43.05.080 and
43.05.150, every person who:
(((1))) (a) Violates the terms or conditions of a waste discharge
permit issued pursuant to RCW 90.48.180 or 90.48.260 through 90.48.262,
or
(((2))) (b) Conducts a commercial or industrial operation or other
point source discharge operation without a waste discharge permit as
required by RCW 90.48.160 or 90.48.260 through 90.48.262, or
(((3))) (c) Violates the provisions of RCW 90.48.080, or other
sections of this chapter or chapter 90.56 RCW or rules or orders
adopted or issued pursuant to either of those chapters, shall incur, in
addition to any other penalty as provided by law, a penalty in an
amount of up to ten thousand dollars a day for every such violation.
Each and every such violation shall be a separate and distinct offense,
and in case of a continuing violation, every day's continuance shall be
and be deemed to be a separate and distinct violation. Every act of
commission or omission which procures, aids or abets in the violation
shall be considered a violation under the provisions of this section
and subject to the penalty herein provided for. The penalty amount
shall be set in consideration of the previous history of the violator
and the severity of the violation's impact on public health and/or the
environment in addition to other relevant factors. The penalty herein
provided for shall be imposed pursuant to the procedures set forth in
RCW 43.21B.300.
(2) The department may not impose a civil penalty under this
chapter to a livestock operation as a nonpoint source until it has
received testing results for: (a) A sample taken from above and from
below the livestock operation for determination of the total level of
fecal coliform in each sample; and (b) a sample from the stream segment
that flows adjacent to the livestock operation for DNA testing using
the best currently available technology.

--- END ---