BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The quality education council recommended that the legislature
should ensure excellence in science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics (STEM). One of the recommendations is to encourage and
support partnerships with the business community to develop and
continue innovative STEM programs.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
create a pilot program and identify two school districts in which to
implement STEM teacher certification
(3) School districts may apply to participate in the STEM teacher
certificate pilot program. Application shall be in a form developed by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(4)(a) Beginning July 1, 2011, notwithstanding other requirements
for eligibility for teacher certification, a certificate may be issued
by the superintendent of public instruction to individuals in two pilot
school districts in accordance with the principles and requirements of
this subsection (4).
(b) The purpose of the STEM teacher certificate pilot program is to
assist school districts in meeting the state's educational goals by
giving districts flexibility in recruiting decisions based on shortages
or the opportunity to secure the services of unusually talented
individuals. Whenever practicable, the legislature encourages the
hiring of regularly certificated teachers.
(c) Pilot school districts must adopt a written policy establishing
the process for hiring STEM teachers before they are hired.
(d) Pilot school districts must maintain records of procedures
followed and decisions made pursuant to the policy, and provide those
records in the event of an audit.
(e) STEM teacher certificates may be issued by the superintendent
of public instruction upon application by a pilot school district to
persons who meet age, good moral character, and personal fitness
requirements established in rule, if the following conditions are
established in the application:
(i) The applicant is highly qualified and experienced in the
subject matter to be taught or has unusual distinction or exceptional
talent;
(ii) The district has verified that no regularly certificated
teachers are available to fill the STEM teacher position;
(iii) The teacher is hired through the established process for the
position;
(iv) The teacher is hired into a position for which there is a
justifiable need to hire a STEM teacher;
(v) The individual has been determined to be competent for the
assignment based on a process established by the district
superintendent;
(vi) The individual is being certificated for a limited assignment
and responsibility in a specified STEM program area; and
(vii) The individual shall receive orientation and be prepared for
the specific assignment and will be apprised of any legal liability,
the lines of authority, and the duration of the assignment if
applicable.
(f) Within the first sixty working days a STEM teacher is employed
by a pilot school district:
(i) A full-time STEM teacher must complete sixty clock hours (six
quarter hours or four semester hours) of coursework in pedagogy and
child/adolescent development appropriate to the assigned grade levels
as approved by the pilot school district;
(ii) A part-time STEM teacher must complete an appropriate training
plan of coursework in pedagogy and child/adolescent development
appropriate to the assigned grade levels as approved by the pilot
school district;
(g) Thereafter, a STEM certificated teacher must complete sixty
clock hours (six quarter hours or four semester hours) of coursework
every two years in pedagogy and child/adolescent development
appropriate to the assigned grade levels as approved by the pilot
school district.
(h) A STEM teacher certificate issued under this section is valid
only for the STEM activity or field specified in the certificate. The
certificate may be withdrawn upon application by the pilot school
district if the conditions in this section are not met or as
circumstances merit.
(5)(a) The professional educator standards board shall review the
pilot program and submit a report to the legislature evaluating: (i)
The success of the pilot program in assisting school districts to find
qualified teachers for STEM programs; (ii) recommendations, if
necessary, on how to improve the pilot program; and (iii)
recommendations on whether an alternative route program for teacher
certification could be adapted or created to provide STEM
certification.
(b) An initial report is due by December 1, 2012, and a final
report is due December 1, 2014. The report shall include
recommendations to the legislature regarding whether the pilot program
should be continued, discontinued, or expanded. If it is recommended
that the pilot program be expanded then the report shall include cost
estimates to scale the program statewide.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules
establishing reporting, recordkeeping, and accounting requirements
necessary to ensure accountability of participants in the pilot
program.
(7) This section expires December 31, 2014.

--- END ---