BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.17 RCW
to read as follows:
If the department sends a physical renewal notice for vehicle
registration, the department may charge the applicant a nonrefundable
fee of five dollars to help defray the cost of mailing the renewal
notice. The renewal notice fee must be deposited to the credit of the
motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.01.230 and 2010 c 161 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may accept checks and money orders for the
payment of drivers' licenses, certificates of title and vehicle
registrations, vehicle excise taxes, gross weight fees, and other fees
and taxes collected by the department. Whenever registrations,
licenses, or permits have been paid for by checks or money orders that
have been dishonored by nonacceptance or nonpayment, the department
shall:
(a) Cancel the registration, license, or permit;
(b) Send a notice of cancellation by first-class mail using the
last known address in department records for the holder of the
certificate, license, or permit, and complete an affidavit of first-class mail; and
(c) Assess a handling fee, set by rule.
(2) It is a traffic infraction to fail to surrender a certificate
of title, registration certificate, or permit to the department or to
an authorized agent within ten days of being notified that the
certificate, registration, or permit has been canceled.
(3) County auditors, agents, and subagents appointed by the
director may collect restitution for dishonored checks and money orders
and keep the handling fee.
(4) A person who has recently acquired a vehicle by purchase,
exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal action is not liable or
responsible for the payment of uncollected fees and taxes that were
paid for by a predecessor's check or money order that was subsequently
dishonored. The department may not deny an application to transfer
ownership for the uncollected amount.
(5) The director may adopt rules to implement this section. The
rules must provide for the public's convenience consistent with sound
business practice and encourage annual renewal of vehicle registrations
by mail or electronic means, authorizing checks and money orders or the
use of credit cards, debit cards, or electronic means for payment.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.01.235 and 2010 c 161 s 207 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department may adopt necessary rules and procedures to allow
use of credit ((and)) cards, debit cards, or electronic means for
payment of fees and excise taxes to the department and its agents or
subagents related to the licensing of drivers, the issuance of
identicards, and vehicle and vessel certificates of title and
registration. The department may establish a convenience fee to be
paid by ((the)) credit or debit card users whenever a credit or debit
card is chosen as the payment method. The fee must be sufficient to
offset the charges imposed on the department and its agents and
subagents by credit and debit card companies. In no event may the use
of credit or debit cards authorized by this section create a loss of
revenue to the state.
The use of a personal credit card does not rely upon the credit of
the state as prohibited by Article VIII, section 5 of the state
Constitution.

--- END ---