BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.80.010 and 2010 c 104 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of negotiating collective bargaining agreements
under this chapter, the employer shall be represented by the governor
or governor's designee, except as provided for institutions of higher
education in subsection (4) of this section.
(2)(a) If an exclusive bargaining representative represents more
than one bargaining unit, the exclusive bargaining representative shall
negotiate with each employer representative as designated in subsection
(1) of this section one master collective bargaining agreement on
behalf of all the employees in bargaining units that the exclusive
bargaining representative represents. For those exclusive bargaining
representatives who represent fewer than a total of five hundred
employees each, negotiation shall be by a coalition of all those
exclusive bargaining representatives. The coalition shall bargain for
a master collective bargaining agreement covering all of the employees
represented by the coalition. The governor's designee and the
exclusive bargaining representative or representatives are authorized
to enter into supplemental bargaining of agency-specific issues for
inclusion in or as an addendum to the master collective bargaining
agreement, subject to the parties' agreement regarding the issues and
procedures for supplemental bargaining. This section does not prohibit
cooperation and coordination of bargaining between two or more
exclusive bargaining representatives.
(b) This subsection (2) does not apply to exclusive bargaining
representatives who represent employees of institutions of higher
education, except when the institution of higher education has elected
to exercise its option under subsection (4) of this section to have its
negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under the
procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections (1)
through (3) of this section.
(c) If five hundred or more employees of an independent state
elected official listed in RCW 43.01.010 are organized in a bargaining
unit or bargaining units under RCW 41.80.070, the official shall be
consulted by the governor or the governor's designee before any
agreement is reached under (a) of this subsection concerning
supplemental bargaining of agency specific issues affecting the
employees in such bargaining unit.
(3) The governor shall submit a request for funds necessary to
implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions in the master
collective bargaining agreement or for legislation necessary to
implement the agreement. Requests for funds necessary to implement the
provisions of bargaining agreements shall not be submitted to the
legislature by the governor unless such requests:
(a) Have been submitted to the director of the office of financial
management by October 1 prior to the legislative session at which the
requests are to be considered; and
(b) Have been certified by the director of the office of financial
management as being feasible financially for the state.
The legislature shall approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. The legislature shall not consider a
request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement unless
the request is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's
budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060. If the
legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, either party may
reopen all or part of the agreement or the exclusive bargaining
representative may seek to implement the procedures provided for in RCW
41.80.090.
(4)(a)(i) For the purpose of negotiating agreements for
institutions of higher education, the employer shall be the respective
governing board of each of the universities, colleges, or community
colleges or a designee chosen by the board to negotiate on its behalf.
(ii) A governing board of a university or college may elect to have
its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under
the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections
(1) through (3) of this section, except that:
(A) The governor or the governor's designee and an exclusive
bargaining representative shall negotiate one master collective
bargaining agreement for all of the bargaining units of employees of a
university or college that the representative represents; or
(B) If the parties mutually agree, the governor or the governor's
designee and an exclusive bargaining representative shall negotiate one
master collective bargaining agreement for all of the bargaining units
of employees of more than one university or college that the
representative represents.
(iii) A governing board of a community college may elect to have
its negotiations conducted by the governor or governor's designee under
the procedures provided for general government agencies in subsections
(1) through (3) of this section.
(b) Prior to entering into negotiations under this chapter, the
institutions of higher education or their designees shall consult with
the director of the office of financial management regarding financial
and budgetary issues that are likely to arise in the impending
negotiations.
(c)(i) If appropriations are necessary to implement the
compensation and fringe benefit provisions of the bargaining agreements
reached between institutions of higher education and exclusive
bargaining representatives agreed to under the provisions of this
chapter, the governor shall submit a request for such funds to the
legislature according to the provisions of subsection (3) of this
section, except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection.
(ii) In the case of a bargaining unit of employees of institutions
of higher education in which the exclusive bargaining representative is
certified during or after the conclusion of a legislative session, the
legislature may act upon the compensation and fringe benefit provisions
of the unit's initial collective bargaining agreement if those
provisions are agreed upon and submitted to the office of financial
management and legislative budget committees before final legislative
action on the biennial or supplemental operating budget by the sitting
legislature.
(5) There is hereby created a joint committee on employment
relations, which consists of two members with leadership positions in
the house of representatives, representing each of the two largest
caucuses; the chair and ranking minority member of the house
appropriations committee, or its successor, representing each of the
two largest caucuses; two members with leadership positions in the
senate, representing each of the two largest caucuses; and the chair
and ranking minority member of the senate ways and means committee, or
its successor, representing each of the two largest caucuses. The
governor shall periodically consult with the committee regarding
appropriations necessary to implement the compensation and fringe
benefit provisions in the master collective bargaining agreements, and
upon completion of negotiations, advise the committee on the elements
of the agreements and on any legislation necessary to implement the
agreements.
(6) If, after the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of an
agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, the
compensation and fringe benefit provisions specified in the law shall
be null and void, and both parties shall immediately enter into
collective bargaining for ((a)) mutually agreed ((upon modification of
the agreement)) compensation and fringe benefit provisions. Any
compensation and fringe benefit provisions agreed upon shall be
submitted to the legislature for approval and shall not take effect
until approved. Prior to legislative approval of a new agreement
pursuant to this subsection, the employer may implement compensation
and fringe benefit provisions according to law.
(((7) After the expiration date of a collective bargaining
agreement negotiated under this chapter, all of the terms and
conditions specified in the collective bargaining agreement remain in
effect until the effective date of a subsequently negotiated agreement,
not to exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the
agreement. Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement
according to law.))

Sec. 2 RCW 41.80.020 and 2010 c 283 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the matters
subject to bargaining include wages, hours, and other terms and
conditions of employment, and the negotiation of any question arising
under a collective bargaining agreement.
(2) The employer is not required to bargain over matters pertaining
to:
(a) Health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits((,
except as required in subsection (3) of this section));
(b) Any retirement system or retirement benefit; or
(c) Rules of the director of personnel or the Washington personnel
resources board adopted under section 203, chapter 354, Laws of 2002.
(3) Matters subject to bargaining include the number of names to be
certified for vacancies((,)) and promotional preferences((, and the
dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee for health care
benefits. However, except as provided otherwise in this subsection for
institutions of higher education, negotiations regarding the number of
names to be certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the
dollar amount expended on behalf of each employee for health care
benefits shall be conducted between the employer and one coalition of
all the exclusive bargaining representatives subject to this chapter.
The exclusive bargaining representatives for employees that are subject
to chapter 47.64 RCW shall bargain the dollar amount expended on behalf
of each employee for health care benefits with the employer as part of
the coalition under this subsection. Any such provision agreed to by
the employer and the coalition shall be included in all master
collective bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties)). For
institutions of higher education, promotional preferences and the
number of names to be certified for vacancies shall be bargained under
the provisions of RCW 41.80.010(4).
(4) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not agree to any proposal that would prevent the implementation of
approved affirmative action plans or that would be inconsistent with
the comparable worth agreement that provided the basis for the salary
changes implemented beginning with the 1983-1985 biennium to achieve
comparable worth.
(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not bargain over matters pertaining to management rights established in
RCW 41.80.040.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict
exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency
policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment
and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter,
the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a
statute is invalid and unenforceable.
(7) This section does not prohibit bargaining that affects
contracts authorized by RCW 41.06.142.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.80.040 and 2002 c 354 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
The employer shall not bargain over rights of management which, in
addition to all powers, duties, and rights established by
constitutional provision or statute, shall include but not be limited
to the following:
(1) The functions and programs of the employer, the use of
technology, and the structure of the organization;
(2) The employer's budget and the size of the agency workforce,
including determining the ((financial)) basis for layoffs;
(3) The right to direct and supervise employees;
(4) The right to take whatever actions are deemed necessary to
carry out the mission of the state and its agencies during emergencies;
and
(5) Retirement plans and retirement benefits.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.06.142 and 2008 c 267 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any department, agency, or institution of higher education may
purchase services, including services that have been customarily and
historically provided by employees in the classified service under this
chapter, by contracting with individuals, nonprofit organizations,
businesses, employee business units, or other entities if the following
criteria are met:
(a) The invitation for bid or request for proposal contains
measurable standards for the performance of the contract;
(b) Displaced employees in the classified service ((whose positions
or work would be displaced by the contract)) are provided an
opportunity to offer alternatives to purchasing services by contract
and, if these alternatives are not accepted, compete for the contract
under competitive contracting procedures in subsection (4) of this
section;
(c) The contract with an entity other than an employee business
unit includes a provision requiring the entity to consider employment
of state employees who may be displaced by the contract;
(d) The department, agency, or institution of higher education has
established a contract monitoring process to measure contract
performance, costs, service delivery quality, and other contract
standards, and to cancel contracts that do not meet those standards;
and
(e) The department, agency, or institution of higher education has
determined that the contract results in savings or efficiency
improvements. The contracting agency must consider the consequences
and potential mitigation of improper or failed performance by the
contractor.
(2) Any provision contrary to or in conflict with this section in
any collective bargaining agreement in effect on July 1, 2005, is not
effective beyond the expiration date of the agreement.
(3) Contracting for services that is expressly mandated by the
legislature or was authorized by law prior to July 1, 2005, including
contracts and agreements between public entities, shall not be subject
to the processes set forth in subsections (1), (4), and (5) of this
section.
(4) Competitive contracting shall be implemented as follows:
(a) At least ninety days prior to the date the contracting agency
requests bids from private entities for a contract for services
provided by classified employees, the contracting agency shall notify
the ((classified)) displaced employees whose positions or work would be
displaced by the contract. The displaced employees shall have sixty
days from the date of notification to offer alternatives to purchasing
services by contract, and the agency shall consider the alternatives
before requesting bids.
(b) If the displaced employees decide to compete for the contract,
they shall notify the contracting agency of their decision. Displaced
employees must form one or more employee business units for the purpose
of submitting a bid or bids to perform the services.
(c) The director of personnel, with the advice and assistance of
the department of general administration, shall develop and make
available to employee business units training in the bidding process
and general bid preparation.
(d) The director of general administration, with the advice and
assistance of the department of personnel, shall, by rule, establish
procedures to ensure that bids are submitted and evaluated in a fair
and objective manner and that there exists a competitive market for the
service, and to adopt rules as may be reasonably necessary to carry out
the purposes of this section. Such rules shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) Prohibitions against participation in the bid
evaluation process by displaced employees who prepared the business
unit's bid or who perform any of the services to be contracted; (ii)
provisions to ensure no bidder receives an advantage over other bidders
and that bid requirements are applied equitably to all parties; and
(iii) procedures that require the contracting agency to receive
complaints regarding the bidding process and to consider them before
awarding the contract. Appeal of an agency's actions under this
subsection is an adjudicative proceeding and subject to the applicable
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act, with
the final decision to be rendered by an administrative law judge
assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW.
(e) An employee business unit's bid must include the fully
allocated costs of the service, including the cost of the employees'
salaries and benefits, space, equipment, materials, and other costs
necessary to perform the function. An employee business unit's cost
shall not include the state's indirect overhead costs unless those
costs can be attributed directly to the function in question and would
not exist if that function were not performed in state service.
(f) A department, agency, or institution of higher education may
contract with the department of general administration to conduct the
bidding process.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Employee business unit" means a group of employees who perform
services to be contracted under this section and who submit a bid for
the performance of those services under subsection (4) of this section.
(b) "Indirect overhead costs" means the pro rata share of existing
agency administrative salaries and benefits, and rent, equipment costs,
utilities, and materials associated with those administrative
functions.
(c) "Competitive contracting" means the process by which classified
employees of a department, agency, or institution of higher education
compete with businesses, individuals, nonprofit organizations, or other
entities for contracts authorized by subsection (1) of this section.
(d) "Displaced employee" means an employee in the classified
service whose position is eliminated by the contract resulting in the
employee being laid off or assigned to a lower job class.
(6) The requirements of this section do not apply to RCW
74.13.031(5).
(7) There is no private right of action under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 3 of this act apply only
to collective bargaining agreements entered into or extended after the
effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---