BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 24.50.010 and 2006 c 34 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Washington manufacturing services is organized as a private,
nonprofit corporation in accordance with chapter 24.03 RCW and this
section. The mission of the ((center)) corporation is to operate a
modernization extension system, coordinate a network of public and
private modernization resources, and stimulate the competitiveness of
small and midsize manufacturers in Washington.
(2) ((Washington manufacturing services shall)) The corporation
must be governed by a board of directors. A majority of the board of
directors shall be representatives of small and medium-sized
manufacturing firms and industry associations, networks, or consortia.
The board ((shall)) must also include at least one member representing
labor unions or labor councils and, as ex officio members, the director
of the department of ((community, trade, and economic development))
commerce, the executive director of the state board for community and
technical colleges, and the director of the workforce training and
education coordinating board, or their respective designees.
(3) ((Washington manufacturing services)) The corporation may be
known as impact Washington and may:
(a) Charge fees for services, make and execute contracts with any
individual, corporation, association, public agency, or any other
entity, and employ all other legal instruments necessary or convenient
for the performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers and
functions under this chapter; and
(b) Receive funds from federal, state, or local governments,
private businesses, foundations, or any other source for purposes
consistent with this chapter.
(4) ((Washington manufacturing services shall)) The corporation
must:
(a) Develop policies, plans, and programs to assist in the
modernization of businesses in targeted sectors of Washington's economy
and coordinate the delivery of modernization services;
(b) Provide information about the advantages of modernization and
the modernization services available in the state to federal, state,
and local economic development officials, state colleges and
universities, and private providers;
(c) Collaborate with the Washington quality initiative in the
development of manufacturing quality standards and quality
certification programs;
(d) Serve as an information clearinghouse and provide access for
users to the federal manufacturing extension partnership national
research and information system; and
(e) Provide, either directly or through contracts, assistance to
industry or cluster associations, networks, or consortia, that would be
of value to their member firms in:
(i) Adopting advanced business management practices such as
strategic planning and total quality management;
(ii) Developing mechanisms for interfirm collaboration and
cooperation;
(iii) Appraising, purchasing, installing, and effectively using
equipment, technologies, and processes that improve the quality of
goods and services and the productivity of the firm;
(iv) Improving human resource systems and workforce training in a
manner that moves firms toward flexible, high-performance work
organizations;
(v) Developing new products;
(vi) Conducting market research, analysis, and development of new
sales channels and export markets;
(vii) Improving processes to enhance environmental, health, and
safety compliance; and
(viii) Improving credit, capital management, and business finance
skills.
(5) A minimum of fifty percent of the funds received by the
corporation from the state must be used by the corporation for carrying
out the duties under subsection (4)(e) of this section, consistent with
the intent of RCW 24.50.005(2).
(6) In conjunction with industry sector and cluster associations,
the corporation shall conduct workshops on, and provide assistance to
manufacturers affected by import competition in, applying for federal
trade adjustment assistance financing.

--- END ---