BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that knowledge of worldwide business
contacts, government contacts, cultural contacts, and international
friends is critical to building a solid network of opportunities for
developing trade relations for our state.
(2) The legislature also finds that knowledge of international
exchange students who have studied in Washington state institutions of
higher education, especially those from key trading partner countries,
and knowledge of Washington state students, interns, and citizens
working and studying abroad, is critical to the ability of Washington
businesses and citizens to establish contacts and networks in the
competitive world market.
(3)(a) The department may develop and maintain a database, to be
known as the international contact database, listing, in addition to
any other information:
(i) International business contacts of those people interested in
doing business with Washington business;
(ii) International government contacts, particularly with our key
trading partners;
(iii) Washington students, interns, and citizens working and
studying overseas;
(iv) International students who have studied at Washington
educational institutions; and
(v) Exchange opportunities for Washington residents wishing to
participate in education, internships, or technical assistance programs
in the areas of agriculture, hydroelectric power, aerospace, computers
and technology, academics, medicine, and communications.
(b) The database may be designed to be used as a resource for
Washington citizens, businesses, and other entities seeking contacts in
international trade markets overseas.
(4) The department of agriculture, the governor's office of
protocol, the lieutenant governor's office, and the secretary of state
may assist the department in designing and developing the database and
in obtaining data for inclusion in the database. Four-year educational
institutions and their alumni associations are encouraged to maintain
data concerning students studying or working abroad, international
students attending their institutions, and exchange opportunities
available to their students and other citizens, and to make such data
freely available to the department for inclusion in the database.
(5) The information contained in the database may be made available
on request for inspection or copying for free or at cost. The
department may not distinguish among persons requesting information
from the database, though the department may request information from
requesters for purposes of monitoring trade contacts and evaluating the
uses and effectiveness of the database.
(6) Any person listed in the database may request in writing that
his or her name, address, telephone number, or other identifying
information be omitted from the database.
(7) Nothing in this section prohibits the department from refusing
to disclose information exempt from disclosure under RCW 42.56.230.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.230 and 2010 c 106 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following personal information is exempt from public inspection
and copying under this chapter:
(1) Personal information in any files maintained for students in
public schools, patients or clients of public institutions or public
health agencies, or welfare recipients;
(2) Personal information in files maintained for employees,
appointees, or elected officials of any public agency to the extent
that disclosure would violate their right to privacy;
(3) Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the
assessment or collection of any tax if the disclosure of the
information to other persons would: (a) Be prohibited to such persons
by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020, 84.40.340, or any ordinance
authorized under RCW 35.102.145; or (b) violate the taxpayer's right to
privacy or result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer;
(4) Credit card numbers, debit card numbers, electronic check
numbers, card expiration dates, or bank or other financial account
numbers, except when disclosure is expressly required by or governed by
other law;
(5) Personal and financial information related to a small loan or
any system of authorizing a small loan in RCW 31.45.093; ((and))
(6) Documents and related materials and scanned images of documents
and related materials used to prove identity, age, residential address,
social security number, or other personal information required to apply
for a driver's license or identicard; and
(7) Personal information in files maintained in a database created
under section 1 of this act.

--- END ---