BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.20.287 and 2004 c 151 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout RCW 28B.20.285 and 28B.20.289 through
28B.20.295 and sections 2 through 4 of this act.
(1) "Technology center" means the Washington technology center or
successor organization, including the affiliated staff, faculty,
facilities, and research centers operated by the technology center.
(2) "Board" means the board of directors of the Washington
technology center or successor organization.
(3) "High technology" or "technology" includes but is not limited
to the modernization, miniaturization, integration, and computerization
of electronic, hydraulic, pneumatic, laser, mechanical, robotics,
nuclear, chemical, telecommunication, and other technological
applications to enhance productivity in areas including but not limited
to manufacturing, communications, medicine, bioengineering, renewable
energy and energy efficiency, and commerce.
(4) "Innovation database" means a database of in-state technologies
and inventions available for commercialization and licensing.
(5) "Enewsletter" means an electronically published newsletter that
is accessible and distributable via the internet.
(6) "Collaborative funding mechanism" means a technology center-managed financing campaign assisted by institutions of higher education
and private organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The technology center, in conjunction
with institutions of higher education and private organizations, shall:
(a) Develop, maintain, and provide access to the innovation
database;
(b) Publish a quarterly enewsletter to promote the innovation
database and commercialization and licensing activities;
(c) Develop a collaborative funding mechanism to finance the
innovation database project; and
(d) Report to the legislature on an annual basis on the impact of
the innovation database, enewsletter, and related commercialization and
licensing activities.
(2) The technology center may charge a fee for service in this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The technology center, in collaboration
with institutions of higher education, shall solicit gifts, grants, and
endowments from public or private sources that are made in trust or
otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the innovation
database.
(2) The board or the board's designee shall:
(a) Deposit moneys received under this section and section 2 of
this act into the innovation database account created in section 4 of
this act;
(b) Disburse the funds for development and maintenance of the
innovation database and enewsletter, and for related commercialization
and licensing activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The innovation database account is created
in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from public and
private contributions to the innovation database must be deposited into
the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
purposes of section 3 of this act. The department of commerce, upon
receipt of the board's recommendation, shall authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each
added to chapter 28B.20 RCW.

--- END ---