BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Subject to available funds, the department must:
(a) Develop, maintain, and update a centralized state trade web
portal;
(b) Collaborate with state and federal agencies, trade experts, and
representatives of the business community to acquire relevant trade
content to include in the centralized state trade web portal; and
(c) Collaborate with public and private organizations, trade
experts, and representatives of the business community to promote the
centralized state trade web portal.
(2) The department may:
(a) Derive revenue from the centralized state trade web portal.
Sources of revenue may include, but need not be limited to,
advertisements placed on the centralized state trade web portal by
third parties; and
(b) Commercialize and license the centralized state trade web
portal technology.
(3) Any organization that receives state funding to develop trade-related content must collaborate with the department to develop and
provide relevant trade content for inclusion in the centralized state
trade web portal. The department may also create a direct link from
the centralized state trade web portal to the trade web portal
developed independently by the organization receiving state funding.

--- END ---