BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department is authorized to:
(a) Collaborate with private sector organizations and sector
associations in order to implement its economic development,
innovation, and trade promotion activities within Washington state; and
(b) Assemble and seek recommendations from a private sector
advisory committee on: (i) The feasibility of economic development
activities; (ii) the availability of nonstate resources to complete
economic development activities; and (iii) any other purpose the
department deems appropriate.
(2) The private sector advisory committee created under this
section includes, but is not limited to, representatives from the
following private sectors: Manufacturing, advanced technology,
information technology and computer software, finance, construction,
and supply chain logistics. At least one of the members on the
advisory committee must represent a small or medium-sized enterprise.
(3) Upon the establishment of the private sector advisory
committee, the department must assemble the committee to meet no less
than one time per calendar year.
(4) The department must measure the effectiveness of its
public-private collaboration by evaluating factors such as:
(a) The number of public improvements financed by public-private
collaboration;
(b) The application of public-private funds to sectors and regions
of the state economy evidencing need for economic development, capital
markets, and funding resources;
(c) The benefits, cost avoidance, and cost savings generated by
public-private collaboration;
(d) The cumulative number of permanent jobs created as a result of
public-private collaboration;
(e) Any cumulative increase in trade as a result of public-private
collaboration;
(f) An assessment of progress made toward implementing the state's
economic development strategy through public-private collaboration; and
(g) An assessment of state regulations that may be impeding
successful public-private collaboration and recommendations for
amending or repealing such regulations.
(5) The department may, in carrying out its public-private
collaboration efforts, solicit and receive gifts, grants, funds, fees,
and endowments, in trust or otherwise, from public and private sources,
and may expend the same or any income therefrom for the implementation
of collaborative activities related to economic development,
innovation, and trade. All revenue received for such purpose must be
deposited into a public depositary account as provided in section 2 of
this act.
(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to limit the
department's authority to meet with, or seek advice from, private
organizations in order to carry out its economic development,
innovation, and trade promotion activities under statutory or common
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
The department must maintain an account with one or more public
depositaries, and may deposit moneys in the depositary and expend
moneys for purposes authorized by section 1 of this act. The
department must keep accurate records of all receipts, disbursements,
and other financial transactions in accordance with generally accepted
principles of accounting, available for audit by the state auditor.

--- END ---