BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The commission shall consider proposing a draft uniform law
that would enable the several states to contract among themselves and
in their mutual interest, for the provision of state services so as to
accomplish savings that accrue from economies of scale.
(2) The commission shall propose any draft uniform laws that result
from their consideration to the national conference of commissioners on
uniform state laws, or its successors, for approval and adoption by the
several states. If the commission finds after due consideration that
a draft uniform law is not feasible, the commission shall so report to
the committees of the legislature having within their purview matters
related to governmental efficiency and effectiveness.
(3) For purposes of this section, "state services" includes any and
all services that facilitate the administration of government and the
provision of governmental services, including, but not limited to,
information technology.

--- END ---