BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 19.02 RCW
to read as follows:
A person seeking a minor work permit under RCW 49.12.121 is not
required to complete an entirely new master application if there are no
changes to any other information submitted on the most recent master
application. Such a person need only complete a new master application
to the extent necessary to provide information relevant to hiring a
minor and to identify the employer seeking the permit, including the
address and contact information for the employer.

--- END ---