BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.155.010 and 1996 c 168 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that ((there exists in the state of
Washington over four billion dollars)) a 1998 local government
infrastructure study documented that local governments in the state of
Washington had a total funding need of over eight billion dollars worth
of critical projects for the planning, acquisition, construction,
repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets and
roads, bridges, water systems, and storm and sanitary sewage systems.
((The December, 1983 Washington state public works report prepared by
the planning and community affairs agency documented that local
governments expect to be capable of financing over two billion dollars
worth of the costs of those critical projects but will not be able to
fund nearly half of the documented needs.))
(2) The legislature further finds that Washington's local
governments have unmet financial needs for solid waste disposal,
including recycling, and encourages the board to make an equitable
geographic distribution of the funds.
(3) The legislature further finds that local governments face
financial challenges as they try to make needed infrastructure
improvements, and that depositing certain utility and solid waste tax
revenue into county-level local infrastructure assistance accounts will
expand financing to be secured with those taxes.
(4) Therefore, the legislature intends to provide financing
assistance to local governments to help them respond to the demands for
infrastructure improvement, repair, and expansion related to health,
safety, and the environment by creating an "infrastructure bank." The
infrastructure bank will provide local government with credit support
through contingent loan agreements between the state and local
governments that will lower the borrowing cost for local governments
that have the ability to borrow but do not have access to the highest
credit ratings. In addition, a grant and loan program will benefit
small or distressed local governments by reducing burdens on taxpayers'
and ratepayers' while improving the health and safety of the residents
and the environment.
(5) It is the policy of the state of Washington to encourage self-reliance by local governments in meeting their ((public works))
infrastructure needs and to assist in the financing of critical
((public works)) infrastructure projects by making loans, ((financing
guarantees)) grants, credit support, and technical assistance available
to local governments for these projects.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.155.020 and 2009 c 565 s 33 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section shall apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Board" means the ((public works)) infrastructure financing
board created in RCW 43.155.030.
(2) "Capital facility plan" means a capital facility plan required
by the growth management act under chapter 36.70A RCW or, for local
governments not fully planning under the growth management act, a plan
required by the ((public works)) infrastructure financing board.
(3) "Contingent loan agreement" means an agreement between the
state and a local government in which the state provides an absolute
and unconditional commitment to make a loan to a local government from
the infrastructure financing account in order to enhance the credit of
local government borrowing.
(4) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(((4) "Financing guarantees" means the pledge of money in the
public works assistance account, or money to be received by the public
works assistance account, to the repayment of all or a portion of the
principal of or interest on obligations issued by local governments to
finance public works projects.))
(5) "Infrastructure project" means a project of a local government
for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets and roads,
bridges, water systems, storm and sanitary sewage systems, solid waste
facilities, including recycling facilities, and flood control levees.
A planning project may include the compilation of biological,
hydrological, or other data on a county, drainage basin, or region
necessary to develop a base of information for a capital facility plan.
(6) "Local governments" means cities, towns, counties, special
purpose districts, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state excluding school districts and port
districts.
(((6) "Public works project" means a project of a local government
for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets and roads,
bridges, water systems, or storm and sanitary sewage systems and solid
waste facilities, including recycling facilities. A planning project
may include the compilation of biological, hydrological, or other data
on a county, drainage basin, or region necessary to develop a base of
information for a capital facility plan.))
(7) "Solid waste or recycling project" means remedial actions
necessary to bring abandoned or closed landfills into compliance with
regulatory requirements and the repair, restoration, and replacement of
existing solid waste transfer, recycling facilities, and landfill
projects limited to the opening of landfill cells that are in existing
and permitted landfills.
(8) "Technical assistance" means training and other services
provided to local governments to: (a) Help such local governments
plan, apply, and qualify for loans, grants, and ((financing
guarantees)) contingent loan agreements from the board, and (b) help
local governments improve their ability to plan for, finance, acquire,
construct, repair, replace, rehabilitate, and maintain public
facilities.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.155.030 and 1999 c 153 s 58 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The ((public works)) infrastructure financing board is hereby
created.
(2) The board shall be composed of thirteen members appointed by
the governor for terms of four years, except that five members
initially shall be appointed for terms of two years. The board shall
include: (a) ((Three)) One member from the house of representatives to
be appointed by the speaker of the house; (b) one member from the
senate to be appointed by the president of the senate; (c) two members,
((two)) one of whom shall be an elected official((s)) and one shall be
a public works manager, appointed from a list of at least six persons
nominated by the association of Washington cities or its successor;
(((b) three)) (d) two members, ((two)) one of whom shall be an elected
official((s)) and one shall be a public works manager, appointed from
a list of at least six persons nominated by the Washington state
association of counties or its successor; (((c) three)) (e) two members
appointed from a list of at least six persons nominated jointly by the
Washington public utility districts association and a state association
of water-sewer districts, or their successors; (f) the chair of the
community economic revitalization board, pursuant to RCW 43.160.030;
(g) one community economic revitalization board member chosen by the
community economic revitalization board members; and (((d) four)) (h)
three members appointed from the general public. In appointing the
((four)) general public members, the governor shall endeavor to balance
the geographical composition of the board and to include members with
special expertise in relevant fields such as public finance,
architecture and civil engineering, and public works or infrastructure
construction. The governor shall appoint one of the general public
members of the board as chair. The term of the chair shall coincide
with the term of the governor.
(3) Staff support to the board shall be provided by the department.
(4) Members of the board shall receive no compensation but shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) If a vacancy on the board occurs by death, resignation, or
otherwise, the governor shall fill the vacant position for the
unexpired term. Each vacancy in a position appointed from lists
provided by the associations under subsection (2) of this section shall
be filled from a list of at least three persons nominated by the
relevant association or associations. Any members of the board,
appointive or otherwise, may be removed by the governor for cause in
accordance with RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.155.050 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 932 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The ((public works assistance)) infrastructure financing
account is hereby established in the state treasury. Money may be
placed in the ((public works assistance)) infrastructure financing
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Moneys from the account may be
expended only after appropriation.
(2) Money in the ((public works assistance)) infrastructure
financing account shall be used ((to make loans and to give financial
guarantees to local governments for public works projects.)) for the
following types of assistance:
(a) Loans and grants for preconstruction and emergency activities,
capital facility planning, and infrastructure projects. The loans and
grants must be based on costs to taxpayers and ratepayers in relation
to median household income; and
(b) Payments required under contingent loan agreements for
infrastructure projects.
(3) Moneys in the account may also be appropriated to provide for
state match requirements under federal law for projects and activities
conducted and financed by the board under the drinking water assistance
account and for state match requirements under federal law for the
water pollution control revolving fund program administered by the
department of ecology.
(4) Not more than fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget
appropriation to the ((public works)) infrastructure financing board
from this account may be expended or obligated for preconstruction
loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility planning under
this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent of the biennial
capital budget appropriation may be expended for emergency loans and
not more than one percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation
may be expended for capital facility planning loans. For the 2007-2009
biennium, moneys in the account may be used for grants for projects
identified in section 138, chapter 488, Laws of 2005 and section 1033,
chapter 520, Laws of 2007. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, sums
in the public works assistance account may be used for the water
pollution control revolving fund program match in section 3013, chapter
36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may transfer from the job development fund to the
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
fund.
(5) Moneys in the account may be appropriated to provide financial
assistance through the water system acquisition and rehabilitation
program created in chapter 70.119A RCW.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.155.055 and 2003 c 330 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A subaccount is created in the ((public works assistance))
infrastructure financing account to receive money to fund the following
projects: (a) Water storage projects; and (b) water systems
facilities.
(2) The projects listed in subsection (1) of this section must
comply with the competitive bid requirements of RCW 43.155.060.
(3) The subaccount created in subsection (1) of this section shall
receive amounts appropriated to it for purposes of distributing these
moneys as grants for water storage projects and water systems
facilities projects as provided in the appropriation and this section.
This subaccount shall be administered by the board and shall be
separate from the other programs managed by the board under this
chapter.
(4) The subaccount created in this section shall be known as the
water storage projects and water systems facilities subaccount of the
((public works assistance)) infrastructure financing account.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.155.060 and 1988 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In order to aid the financing of ((public works))
infrastructure projects, the board may:
(((1))) (i) Make low-interest or interest-free loans and make
grants to local governments from the ((public works assistance))
infrastructure financing account or other funds and accounts for the
purpose of assisting local governments in financing ((public works))
infrastructure projects. The board may require such terms and
conditions and may charge such rates of interest on its loans as it
deems necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this
chapter. Money received from local governments in repayment of loans
made under this section shall be paid into the ((public works
assistance)) infrastructure financing account for uses consistent with
this chapter.
(ii) Make loans to local governments to assist those local
governments to pay all or a portion of the principal of or interest on
obligations issued to finance infrastructure projects pursuant to
contingent loan agreements; and
(iii) Coordinate with the Washington state treasurer, who, on
behalf of the state of Washington, may prescribe the terms of and enter
into a contingent loan agreement between the state and a local
government if the state treasurer determines that such a contingent
loan agreement is financially prudent and is consistent with the
provisions of this chapter. Contingent loan agreements may be entered
into by the state treasurer only with local governments whose limited
tax general obligations or senior revenue obligations, as applicable to
the obligations concerned, are rated not higher than A1 or A+ by at
least one of the nationally recognized rating agencies. The state's
obligation to make any loan to a local government pursuant to the terms
of a contingent loan agreement shall be subject to appropriation from
the infrastructure financing account. The office of the state
treasurer may charge a fee to local governments to recover the costs of
creating the contingent loan agreements.
(b) In order to provide for the state of Washington's obligations
under the terms of contingent loan agreements, the legislature shall
make provision, from time to time in appropriations acts, for such
amounts as may be required to make timely payments from the
infrastructure financing account.
(2) ((Pledge money in the public works assistance account, or money
to be received by the public works assistance account, to the repayment
of all or a portion of the principal of or interest on obligations
issued by local governments to finance public works projects. The
board shall not pledge any amount greater than the sum of money in the
public works assistance account plus money to be received from the
payment of the debt service on loans made from that account, nor shall
the board)) Neither the board nor the state treasurer may pledge the
faith and credit or the taxing power of the state or any agency or
subdivision thereof to the repayment of obligations issued by any local
government.
(3) In order to aid the financing of infrastructure projects, the
board may:
(a) Create such subaccounts in the ((public works assistance))
infrastructure financing account as the board deems necessary to carry
out the purposes of this chapter((.
(4))); and
(b) Provide a method for the allocation of loans ((and financing
guarantees)), grants, and contingent loan agreements and the provision
of technical assistance under this chapter.
(4) The board shall consult with the community economic
revitalization board established under chapter 43.160 RCW to explore
opportunities for coordination and consistency.
(5) All local ((public works)) infrastructure projects aided in
whole or in part under the provisions of this chapter shall be put out
for competitive bids, except for emergency ((public works))
infrastructure projects under RCW 43.155.065 for which the recipient
jurisdiction shall comply with this requirement to the extent feasible
and practicable. The competitive bids called for shall be administered
in the same manner as all other ((public works)) infrastructure
projects put out for competitive bidding by the local governmental
entity aided under this chapter.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.155.065 and 2001 c 131 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board may make low-interest or interest-free loans and grants
to local governments for emergency ((public works)) infrastructure
projects. Emergency ((public works)) infrastructure projects shall
include the construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards and is being operated by a
local government on a temporary basis. The loans and grants may be
used to help fund all or part of an emergency ((public works))
infrastructure project less any reimbursement from any of the following
sources: (1) Federal disaster or emergency funds, including funds from
the federal emergency management agency; (2) state disaster or
emergency funds; (3) insurance settlements; or (4) litigation.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.155.068 and 2001 c 131 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board may make low-interest or interest-free loans and
grants to local governments for preconstruction activities on ((public
works)) infrastructure projects ((before the legislature approves the
construction phase of the project)). Preconstruction activities
include design, engineering, bid-document preparation, environmental
studies, right-of-way acquisition, and other preliminary phases of
((public works)) infrastructure projects as determined by the board.
(2) The purpose of the loans and grants authorized in this section
is to accelerate the completion of ((public works)) infrastructure
projects by allowing preconstruction activities to be performed before
((the approval of the construction phase of the project by the
legislature)) full financing is obtained.
(((2))) (3) Projects receiving loans and grants for preconstruction
activities under this section must be evaluated using the priority
process and factors in RCW 43.155.070(((2))) (4). The receipt of a
loan or grant for preconstruction activities does not ensure the
receipt of a construction loan or grant for the project under this
chapter. ((Construction loans for projects receiving a loan for
preconstruction activities under this section are subject to
legislative approval under RCW 43.155.070 (4) and (5).)) The board
shall adopt a single application process for local governments seeking
both a loan and grant for preconstruction activities under this section
and a construction loan and grant for the project.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.155.070 and 2009 c 518 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To qualify for ((loans or pledges)) a loan, grant, or
contingent loan agreement under this chapter the board must determine
that a local government meets all of the following conditions:
(a) The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46
RCW at a rate of at least one-quarter of one percent;
(b) The local government must have developed a capital facility
plan; ((and))
(c) The local government must be using all local revenue sources
which are reasonably available for funding ((public works))
infrastructure, taking into consideration local employment and economic
factors;
(d) The local government must have an equitable sewer user charge
system for residential, commercial, and industrial users that the
governing body of the local government determines will provide for the
maintenance and operation of that system and for the timely payment of
all financial obligations of the planned sewer utility;
(e) The connection fees for new connections to a sewer system must
reflect a fair share cost of infrastructure from which new connections
will benefit;
(f) The local government must have a capital wastewater facilities
reserve fund dedicated to paying for wastewater infrastructure and
equipment replacement; and
(g) A sewer use ordinance must restrict certain connections and
wastes to protect a local government's investment and enhance the
wastewater treatment's process stability and effluent quality. The
ordinance must, at a minimum:
(i) Require new sewers and connections to be properly designed and
constructed;
(ii) Require a provision with a timeline and proximity in which
existing and future residences must connect to the sewer system;
(iii) Prohibit inflow sources into the sewer system; and
(iv) Prohibit introduction of toxic or hazardous wastes into the
sewer system in an amount or concentration that endangers the public's
safety or the physical integrity of the system which may cause
violations of the national pollutant discharge elimination system
permit or state waste discharge permit.
(2) Except where necessary to address a public health need or
substantial environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan, including
a capital facilities plan element, and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or
receiving a loan or ((loan guarantee)) grant or from entering into a
contingent loan agreement under this chapter if such request is made
before the expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040.
A county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 which has not
adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations within the
time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited from
receiving a loan or ((loan guarantee)) grant or from entering into a
contingent loan agreement under this chapter if the comprehensive plan
and development regulations are adopted as required by RCW 36.70A.040
before submitting a request for a loan ((or loan guarantee)), grant, or
contingent loan agreement.
(3) In considering awarding loans ((for public facilities to)) or
grants, or entering into contingent loan agreements with a special
district((s)) requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040, the board shall
consider whether the county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is
located has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040.
(4) The board shall develop a priority process for ((public works))
infrastructure projects as provided in this section. The intent of the
priority process is to maximize the value of ((public works))
infrastructure projects accomplished with assistance under this
chapter. The board shall attempt to assure a geographical balance in
assigning priorities to projects. The board shall consider at least
the following factors in assigning a priority to a project:
(a) Whether the local government receiving assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency ((public works)) infrastructure needs;
(b) ((Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.110, whether
the entity receiving assistance is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in
RCW 90.71.010;
(c))) If the project is located in the Puget Sound region, whether
the project is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget
Sound partnership ((under RCW 90.71.310)) and any project designed to
address the effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may
receive assistance under this section only if the project is not in
conflict with the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound
partnership under RCW 90.71.310;
(((d))) (c) Whether the project is critical in nature and would
affect the health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(((e))) (d) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to
guidelines regarding its permitting process for those applying for
development permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of
2007;
(((f))) (e) The cost of the project compared to the size of the
local government and amount of loan money available;
(((g))) (f) The number of communities served by or funding the
project;
(((h))) (g) Whether the project is located in an area of high
unemployment, compared to the average state unemployment;
(((i))) (h) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion,
improvement, or renovation by a local government of a public water
system that is in violation of health and safety standards, including
the cost of extending existing service to such a system;
(((j))) (i) Except as otherwise conditioned by RCW 43.155.120, and
effective one calendar year following the development of model
evergreen community management plans and ordinances under RCW
35.105.050, whether the entity receiving assistance has been
recognized, and what gradation of recognition was received, in the
evergreen community recognition program created in RCW 35.105.030;
(((k))) (j) The relative benefit of the project to the community,
considering the present level of economic activity in the community and
the existing local capacity to increase local economic activity in
communities that have low economic growth;
(k) Whether the project is energy efficient, is leadership in
energy and environmental design certified, or is a green building
defined under an established program; and
(l) Other criteria that the board considers advisable.
(5) Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments
shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each local government
applicant shall provide documentation of attempts to secure additional
local or other sources of funding for each ((public works))
infrastructure project for which financial assistance is sought under
this chapter.
(6) Before November 1st of each even-numbered year, the board shall
develop and submit to the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate
and house of representatives a description of the loans, grants, and
contingent loan agreements, including those made under RCW
43.155.065((,)) and 43.155.068((, and subsection (9) of this section))
during the preceding fiscal year ((and a prioritized list of projects
which are recommended for funding by the legislature)), including one
copy to the staff of each of the committees. The list shall include,
but not be limited to, a description of each project and recommended
financing, the terms and conditions of the loan ((or financial
guarantee)), grant, or contingent loan agreement, the local government
jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration of the jurisdiction's
critical need for the project and documentation of local funds being
used to finance the ((public works)) infrastructure project. The list
shall also include measures of fiscal capacity for each jurisdiction
((recommended for)) that received financial assistance, compared to
authorized limits and state averages, including local government sales
taxes; real estate excise taxes; property taxes; and charges for or
taxes on sewerage, water, garbage, and other utilities.
(7) ((The board shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially
obligate funds from the public works assistance account before the
legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of public works
projects. The legislature may remove projects from the list
recommended by the board. The legislature shall not change the order
of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section does not apply to loans made
under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (9) of this section.
(9) Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans shall be
exempted from subsection (7) of this section.
(10))) To qualify for ((loans or pledges)) a loan, grant, or
contingent loan agreement for solid waste or recycling facilities under
this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that the solid waste or
recycling facility is consistent with and necessary to implement the
comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by the city or county
under chapter 70.95 RCW.
(((11) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
effects of storm water or wastewater on Puget Sound may be funded under
this section only if the project is not in conflict with the action
agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.))

Sec. 10 RCW 43.155.075 and 2001 c 227 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
In providing loans or grants for ((public works)) infrastructure
projects, the board shall require recipients to incorporate the
environmental benefits of the project into their applications, and the
board shall utilize the statement of environmental benefits in its
prioritization and selection process. The board shall also develop
appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to be used both for
management and performance assessment of the loan or grant program. To
the extent possible, the department should coordinate its performance
measure system with other natural resource-related agencies as defined
in RCW 43.41.270. The board shall consult with affected interest
groups in implementing this section.

Sec. 11 RCW 43.155.090 and 1987 c 19 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Loans from the ((public works assistance)) infrastructure financing
account under this chapter shall be made by loan agreement under
chapter 39.69 RCW.

Sec. 12 RCW 43.155.100 and 2002 c 329 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The water conservation account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from federal funding dedicated to water
conservation under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 3831 shall be deposited in the
account. In addition, the legislature may appropriate money to the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.
Expenditures from the account shall be used for the development and
support of water conservation as defined by 16 U.S.C. Sec. 3831. Only
the ((public works)) infrastructure financing board or its designee may
make expenditures from the account.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.160.030 and 2008 c 327 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The community economic revitalization board is hereby created
to exercise the powers granted under this chapter.
(2) The board shall consist of one member from ((each of the two
major caucuses of)) the house of representatives to be appointed by the
speaker of the house and one member from ((each of the two major
caucuses of)) the senate to be appointed by the president of the
senate. The board shall also consist of the following members
appointed by the governor: A recognized private or public sector
economist; one port district official; one county official; one city
official; one representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe;
one representative of the public; one representative of small
businesses each from: (a) The area west of Puget Sound, (b) the area
east of Puget Sound and west of the Cascade range, (c) the area east of
the Cascade range and west of the Columbia river, and (d) the area east
of the Columbia river; one executive from large businesses each from
the area west of the Cascades and the area east of the Cascades. The
appointive members shall initially be appointed to terms as follows:
Three members for one-year terms, three members for two-year terms, and
three members for three-year terms which shall include the chair.
Thereafter each succeeding term shall be for three years. The chair of
the board shall be selected by the governor. The members of the board
shall elect one of their members to serve as vice chair. The director
of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce, the
director of revenue, the commissioner of employment security, and the
secretary of transportation shall serve as nonvoting advisory members
of the board.
(3) Management services, including fiscal and contract services,
shall be provided by the department to assist the board in implementing
this chapter.
(4) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(5) If a vacancy occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise of
appointive members of the board, the governor shall fill the same for
the unexpired term. Members of the board may be removed for
malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges by
the governor, under chapter 34.05 RCW.
(6) A member appointed by the governor may not be absent from more
than fifty percent of the regularly scheduled meetings in any one
calendar year. Any member who exceeds this absence limitation is
deemed to have withdrawn from the office and may be replaced by the
governor.
(7) A majority of members currently appointed constitutes a quorum.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.160.035 and 2003 c 151 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Each)) (1) The member of the house of representatives who is
appointed to the community economic revitalization board under RCW
43.160.030 may designate another member from the house of
representatives to take his or her place on the board for meetings at
which the member will be absent((, as long as the designated member
belongs to the same caucus. The designee shall have all powers to vote
and participate in board deliberations as have the other board
members)). ((Each)) The member of the senate who is appointed to the
community economic revitalization board under RCW 43.160.030 may
designate another member from the senate to take his or her place on
the board for meetings at which the member will be absent((, as long as
the designated member belongs to the same caucus. The designee shall
have all powers to vote and participate in board deliberations as have
the other board members)). Each agency head of an executive agency who
is appointed to serve as a nonvoting advisory member of the community
economic revitalization board under RCW 43.160.030 may designate an
agency employee to take his or her place on the board for meetings at
which the agency head will be absent.
((The)) (2) Designees ((will)) under this section have all powers
to participate in board deliberations as have the other board members
but shall not have voting powers.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.160.060 and 2008 c 327 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board is authorized to make direct loans to political
subdivisions of the state and to federally recognized Indian tribes for
the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions and federally
recognized Indian tribes in financing the cost of public facilities,
including development of land and improvements for public facilities,
project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility, and marketing studies and plans; project
design, site planning, and analysis; project debt and revenue impact
analysis; as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration,
expansion, or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be
authorized for purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and
to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the
limited resources of the political subdivision or the federally
recognized Indian tribe and the finding by the board that financial
circumstances require grant assistance to enable the project to move
forward. However, no more than twenty-five percent of all financial
assistance approved by the board in any biennium may consist of grants
to political subdivisions and federally recognized Indian tribes.
(2) Application for funds shall be made in the form and manner as
the board may prescribe. In making grants or loans the board shall
conform to the following requirements:
(((1))) (a) The board shall not provide financial assistance:
(((a))) (i) For a project the primary purpose of which is to
facilitate or promote a retail shopping development or expansion.
(((b))) (ii) For any project that evidence exists would result in
a development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any
other community in the state.
(((c))) (iii) For a project the primary purpose of which is to
facilitate or promote gambling.
(((d))) (iv) For a project located outside the jurisdiction of the
applicant political subdivision or federally recognized Indian tribe.
(((2))) (b) The board shall only provide financial assistance:
(((a))) (i) For a project demonstrating convincing evidence that a
specific private development or expansion is ready to occur and will
occur only if the public facility improvement is made that:
(((i))) (A) Results in the creation of significant private sector
jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by
the board and is consistent with the state comprehensive economic
development plan developed by the Washington economic development
commission pursuant to chapter 43.162 RCW, once the plan is adopted;
and
(((ii))) (B) Will improve the opportunities for the successful
maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial
plants or will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities;
(((b))) (ii) For a project that cannot meet the requirement of
(((a))) (b)(i) of this subsection but is a project that:
(((i))) (A) Results in the creation of significant private sector
jobs or significant private sector capital investment as determined by
the board and is consistent with the state comprehensive economic
development plan developed by the Washington economic development
commission pursuant to chapter 43.162 RCW, once the plan is adopted;
(((ii))) (B) Is part of a local economic development plan
consistent with applicable state planning requirements;
(((iii))) (C) Can demonstrate project feasibility using standard
economic principles; and
(((iv))) (D) Is located in a rural community as defined by the
board, or a rural county;
(((c))) (iii) For site-specific plans, studies, and analyses that
address environmental impacts, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility, marketing, project engineering, design, site
planning, and project debt and revenue impacts, as grants not to exceed
fifty thousand dollars.
(((3))) (c) The board shall consult with the infrastructure
financing board established under chapter 43.155 RCW to explore
opportunities for coordination and consistency.
(d) The board shall develop guidelines for local participation and
allowable match and activities.
(((4))) (e) An application must demonstrate local match and local
participation, in accordance with guidelines developed by the board.
(((5))) (f) An application must be approved by the political
subdivision and supported by the local associate development
organization or local workforce development council or approved by the
governing body of the federally recognized Indian tribe.
(((6))) (g) The board may allow de minimis general system
improvements to be funded if they are critically linked to the
viability of the project.
(((7))) (h) An application must demonstrate convincing evidence
that the median hourly wage of the private sector jobs created after
the project is completed will exceed the countywide median hourly wage.
(((8))) (i) The board shall prioritize each proposed project
according to:
(((a))) (i) The relative benefits provided to the community by the
jobs the project would create, not just the total number of jobs it
would create after the project is completed, but also giving
consideration to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs
would be located;
(((b))) (ii) The rate of return of the state's investment,
including, but not limited to, the leveraging of private sector
investment, anticipated job creation and retention, and expected
increases in state and local tax revenues associated with the project;
(((c))) (iii) Whether the proposed project offers a health
insurance plan for employees that includes an option for dependents of
employees;
(((d))) (iv) Whether the public facility investment will increase
existing capacity necessary to accommodate projected population and
employment growth in a manner that supports infill and redevelopment of
existing urban or industrial areas that are served by adequate public
facilities. Projects should maximize the use of existing
infrastructure and provide for adequate funding of necessary
transportation improvements; and
(((e))) (v) Whether the applicant has developed and adhered to
guidelines regarding its permitting process for those applying for
development permits consistent with section 1(2), chapter 231, Laws of
2007.
(((9))) (j) A responsible official of the political subdivision or
the federally recognized Indian tribe shall be present during board
deliberations and provide information that the board requests.
Before any financial assistance application is approved, the
political subdivision or the federally recognized Indian tribe seeking
the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is
available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from
the community economic revitalization board.

Sec. 16 RCW 36.135.010 and 2009 c 45 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Capital facilities plan" means a capital facilities plan
required under chapter 36.70A RCW.
(2) "Local government" means cities, towns, counties, special
purpose districts, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state, excluding school districts and
port districts.
(3) "((Public works project)) Infrastructure" means a project of a
local government for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair,
reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets
and roads, bridges, water systems, or storm and sanitary sewage
systems, flood control levees, and solid waste facilities, including
recycling facilities.

Sec. 17 RCW 36.135.020 and 2009 c 45 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) County legislative authorities may establish local ((public
works)) infrastructure assistance funds and local infrastructure boards
for the purpose of funding ((public works)) infrastructure projects
located wholly or partially within the county. Counties may form
multicounty local infrastructure funds for the purpose of funding
infrastructure projects located in more than one county and are
authorized to contract with the infrastructure financing board,
pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW, to administer the fund. Moneys may be
deposited in local ((public works)) infrastructure assistance funds
from existing revenue sources of the county and from the local
infrastructure account created in section 23 of this act.
(2) The county legislative authorities must appoint members of the
local infrastructure boards, which must be composed of a county
official, two officials from the different cities or towns within the
county, and one official from a utility district that operates within
the county.
(3) Moneys deposited in local ((public works)) infrastructure
assistance funds, and interest earned on balances from the funds, may
only be used:
(a) To make loans to the county and to other local governments for
funding ((public works)) infrastructure projects as provided in this
chapter; ((and))
(b) To make grants to the county and to other local governments.
(i) When a project owner has entered into a contingent loan
agreement with the state with respect to financing an infrastructure
project, if the project owner is obligated to repay a loan from the
state that has been made pursuant to a contingent loan agreement, then
the first use of any grant award payments thereafter must be used to
repay the state before being applied to any other purpose; or
(ii) When a project owner has entered into a contingent loan
agreement with the state with respect to financing an infrastructure
project, and if the project owner is not obligated to repay a loan from
the state that has been made pursuant to a contingent loan agreement,
the first use of any grant award payments thereafter must be used to
repay the infrastructure loan before being applied to any other
purpose; and
(c) For costs incurred in the administration of funds.
(((3))) (4) No more than fifty percent of the moneys loaned or
granted from a fund in a calendar year may be loaned or granted to the
county providing local ((public works)) infrastructure assistance
funds. At least twenty-five percent of the moneys anticipated to be
loaned or granted from a fund in a calendar year must be made available
for funding ((public works)) infrastructure projects in cities or
towns.
(((4))) (5) No more than one percent of the average annual balance
of a county's fund, including interest earned on balances from the
fund, may be used annually for administrative costs.

Sec. 18 RCW 36.135.030 and 2009 c 45 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Counties, in consultation with cities and towns within the
county,)) Local infrastructure boards may make loans and grants to
local governments from funds established under RCW 36.135.020 for the
purpose of assisting local governments in funding ((public works))
infrastructure projects. ((Counties)) Local infrastructure boards may
require terms and conditions and may charge rates of interest on its
loans as they deem necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of
this chapter. ((Counties)) Local infrastructure boards may not pledge
any amount greater than the sum of money in their local ((public
works)) infrastructure assistance fund plus money to be received from
the payment of the debt service on loans made from that fund. Money
received from local governments in repayment of loans made under this
chapter must be paid into the fund of the lending county for uses
consistent with this chapter.
(2) Prior to receiving moneys from a fund established under RCW
36.135.020, a local government applying for financial assistance under
this chapter must demonstrate to the lending ((county)) local
infrastructure board:
(a) Utilization of all local revenue sources that are reasonably
available for funding ((public works)) infrastructure projects;
(b) Compliance with applicable requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW;
and
(c) Consistency between the proposed project and applicable capital
facilities plans.
(3) ((Counties)) Local infrastructure boards may not make loans or
grants under this chapter prior to completing the initial collaboration
and prioritization requirements of RCW 36.135.040(1).

Sec. 19 RCW 36.135.040 and 2009 c 45 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((County legislative authorities)) Local infrastructure boards
utilizing or providing money under this chapter must develop a
prioritization process for funding ((public works)) infrastructure
projects that gives priority to projects necessary to address public
health needs, substantial environmental degradation, or increases
existing capacity necessary to accommodate projected population and
employment growth. This prioritization process must be:
(a) Completed collaboratively with public works directors of local
governments within the county;
(b) Documented in the form of written findings produced by the
county; and
(c) Revised periodically according to a schedule developed by the
county and the public works directors.
(2) In addition to the requirements under subsection (1) of this
section, ((legislative authorities)) local infrastructure boards
providing funding to other local governments under this chapter must
consider, through a competitive application process, the following
factors in assigning a priority to and funding a project:
(a) Whether the local government applying for assistance has
experienced severe fiscal distress resulting from natural disaster or
emergency ((public works)) infrastructure needs;
(b) Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the
health and safety of a great number of citizens;
(c) The cost of the project compared to the size of the local
government and amount of loan money available;
(d) The number of communities served by or funding the project;
(e) Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement,
or renovation by a local government of a public water system that is in
violation of health and safety standards;
(f) The number of additional housing units estimated to be achieved
by funding the project;
(g) The additional jobs estimated to be achieved by funding the
project; ((and))
(h) Whether the project is subject to a contingent loan agreement
with the state; and
(i) Other criteria the ((county legislative authority)) local
infrastructure board deems appropriate.

Sec. 20 RCW 82.18.040 and 2000 c 103 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Taxes collected under this chapter ((shall)) must be held in
trust until paid to the state. Taxes received by the state ((shall))
must be deposited in the ((public works)) local infrastructure
assistance account created in ((RCW 43.155.050)) section 23 of this
act. Any person collecting the tax who appropriates or converts the
tax collected ((shall be)) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the
money required to be collected is not available for payment on the date
payment is due. If a taxpayer fails to pay the tax imposed by this
chapter to the person charged with collection of the tax and the person
charged with collection fails to pay the tax to the department, the
department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the
taxpayer for collection of the tax.
(2) The tax ((shall be)) is due from the taxpayer within twenty-five days from the date the taxpayer is billed by the person collecting
the tax.
(3) The tax ((shall be)) is due from the person collecting the tax
at the end of the tax period in which the tax is received from the
taxpayer. If the taxpayer remits only a portion of the total amount
billed for taxes, consideration, and related charges, the amount
remitted ((shall)) must be applied first to payment of the solid waste
collection tax and this tax ((shall have)) has priority over all other
claims to the amount remitted.

Sec. 21 RCW 82.16.020 and 2009 c 469 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected from every
person a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in
any one or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax ((shall
be)) is equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate set out after the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent;
(h) Log transportation business: One and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses ((shall)) must be deposited in the ((public
works)) local infrastructure assistance account created in ((RCW
43.155.050)) section 23 of this act.

Sec. 22 RCW 82.16.020 and 1996 c 150 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is levied and ((there shall be)) collected from every
person a tax for the act or privilege of engaging within this state in
any one or more of the businesses herein mentioned. The tax ((shall
be)) is equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the
rate set out after the business, as follows:
(a) Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three
and six-tenths percent;
(b) Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths
percent;
(c) Gas distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;
(d) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;
(e) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats,
operating upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;
(f) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned
above: One and eight-tenths of one percent;
(g) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent.
(2) An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW
82.02.030 multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of
this section on water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the
moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on sewerage
collection businesses ((shall)) must be deposited in the ((public
works)) local infrastructure assistance account created in ((RCW
43.155.050)) section 23 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 36.135
RCW to read as follows:
The local infrastructure assistance account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from taxes allocated to the account under RCW
82.16.020(3) and 82.18.040 must be deposited in the account. Money
placed in the account may be spent only after appropriation. At least
twice a year, the state treasurer must distribute money in the account
to all counties on the basis of population. Counties must place any
funds received under this section into a local infrastructure fund and
must use the money in accordance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 This act applies to tax collections
received by the state on or after August 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 Section 21 of this act expires June 30,
2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 Section 22 of this act takes effect June
30, 2013.

--- END ---