BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.16.105 and 2010 c 39 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Licensees of race meets that are nonprofit in nature and are of
ten days or less ((shall be)) are exempt from payment of a parimutuel
tax.
(2) Licensees that do not fall under subsection (1) of this section
((shall)) must withhold and pay to the commission daily for each
authorized day of parimutuel wagering the following applicable
percentage of all daily gross receipts from its in-state parimutuel
machines:
(a) If the gross receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines
are more than fifty million dollars in the previous calendar year, the
licensee ((shall)) must withhold and pay to the commission daily 1.30
percent of the daily gross receipts; and
(b) If the gross receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines
are fifty million dollars or less in the previous calendar year, the
licensee ((shall)) must withhold and pay to the commission daily 1.803
percent of the daily gross receipts.
(3)(a) In addition to those amounts in subsection (2) of this
section, a licensee ((shall)) must forward one-tenth of one percent of
the daily gross receipts of all its in-state parimutuel machines to the
commission for payment to those nonprofit race meets as set forth in
RCW 67.16.130 and subsection (1) of this section, but ((said)) the
percentage ((shall)) may not be charged against the licensee.
(b) Payments to nonprofit race meets under this subsection
((shall)) must be distributed on a per-race-day basis and used only for
purses at race tracks that have been operating under RCW 67.16.130 and
subsection (1) of this section in 2010 or for the five consecutive
years immediately preceding the year of payment.
(c) As provided in this subsection, the commission ((shall)) must
distribute funds ((equal)) up to fifteen thousand eight hundred dollars
per race day from funds generated under this subsection (3).
(4) ((If the funds generated under subsection (3) of this section
are not sufficient to fund purses equal to fifteen thousand eight
hundred dollars per race day, the commission is authorized to fund
these purses from the following in the order provided below:
(a) First from fines imposed by the board of stewards and the
commission in a calendar year;
(b) Second from a commission approved percentage of any source
market fee generated from advance deposit wagering as authorized in RCW
67.16.260;
(c) Third from interest earned from the Washington horse racing
commission operating account created in RCW 67.16.280; and
(d) Fourth from the Washington horse racing commission operating
account created in RCW 67.16.280.
(5) Funds generated under subsection (3) of this section that are
in excess of fifteen thousand eight hundred dollars per race day must
be returned to the licensee or licensees from which the funds were
collected.
(6) Funds generated from any of the sources listed in subsection
(4) of this section that are not needed in a calendar year to fund
purses under subsection (3) of this section must be deposited in the
Washington horse racing commission operating account.
(7))) Beginning July 1, 1999, at the conclusion of each authorized
race meet, the commission ((shall)) must calculate the mathematical
average daily gross receipts of parimutuel wagering that is conducted
only at the physical location of the live race meet at those race meets
of licensees with gross receipts of all their in-state parimutuel
machines of more than fifty million dollars. Such calculation shall
include only the gross parimutuel receipts from wagering occurring on
live racing dates, including live racing receipts and receipts derived
from one simulcast race card that is conducted only at the physical
location of the live racing meet, which, for the purposes of this
subsection, is "the handle." If the calculation exceeds eight hundred
eighty-six thousand dollars, the licensee ((shall)) must within ten
days of receipt of written notification by the commission forward to
the commission a sum equal to the product obtained by multiplying 0.6
percent by the handle. Sums collected by the commission under this
subsection ((shall)) must be forwarded on the next business day
following receipt thereof to the state treasurer to be deposited in the
fair fund created in RCW 15.76.115.

Sec. 2 RCW 67.16.280 and 2006 c 174 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington horse racing commission operating account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts collected
by the commission under RCW 67.16.105(2) must be deposited into the
account. The commission has the authority to receive such gifts,
grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made
from time to time in trust or otherwise for the use and purpose of
regulating or supporting nonprofit race meets as set forth in RCW
67.16.130 and 67.16.105(1); such gifts, grants, and endowments must
also be deposited into the account and expended according to the terms
of such gift, grant, or endowment. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, expenditures from the account may be used only for operating
expenses of the commission. Investment earnings from the account
((must be distributed to)) will be retained in the Washington horse
racing commission ((class C purse fund)) operating account, ((created
in RCW 67.16.285,)) pursuant to RCW 43.79A.040.
(2) In order to provide funding in support of the legislative
findings in RCW 67.16.101 (1) through (3), and to provide additional
necessary support to the nonprofit race meets beyond the funding
provided by RCW 67.16.101(4) and 67.16.102(2), the commission is
authorized to spend up to three hundred thousand dollars per fiscal
year from its operating account for the purpose of developing the
equine industry, maintaining and upgrading racing facilities, and
assisting equine health research. When determining how to allocate the
funds available for these purposes, the commission ((shall)) must give
first consideration to uses that regulate and assist the nonprofit race
meets and equine health research. These expenditures may occur only
when sufficient funds remain for the continued operations of the horse
racing commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---