BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 69.07 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A cottage food operation licensed by the department is exempt
from prohibitions against the use of a home kitchen under provisions of
rules adopted by the department or the Washington state food service
code.
(2) A cottage food operation licensed by the department is not
subject to permitting and inspection by local health jurisdictions
under the Washington state food service code except in response to a
foodborne outbreak or other public health emergency.
(3) A cottage food operation must package and properly label for
sale to the consumer any food it produces, and the food may not be
repackaged or used as an ingredient in other foods by a food processing
plant or food service establishment.
(4) A cottage food operation must place on the label of any food it
produces or packages, at a minimum, the following information:
(a) The name and address of the business of the cottage food
operation;
(b) The name of the cottage food product;
(c) The ingredients of the cottage food product, in descending
order of predominance by weight;
(d) The net weight or net volume of the cottage food product;
(e) Allergen labeling as specified by federal labeling
requirements;
(f) If any nutritional claim is made, appropriate labeling as
specified by federal labeling requirements;
(g) The following statement printed in at least the equivalent of
eleven-point font size in a color that provides a clear contrast to the
background: "Made in a home kitchen."
(5) Cottage food products may not be sold by internet or mail order
or for resale outside the state.
(6) The gross sales of cottage food products may not exceed ten
thousand dollars annually. The determination of the ten thousand
dollar annual gross sales shall be computed on the basis of the amount
of gross sales within or at a particular domestic residence and shall
not be computed on a per person basis within or at that domestic
residence. The department may request in writing documentation to
verify the annual gross sales figure.
(7) Cottage food products must be stored only in the primary
domestic residence.
(8) This section does not affect the application of any other state
or federal laws or any applicable ordinances enacted by any local unit
of government.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.07.010 and 1992 c 34 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
((For the purposes of)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter((:)) unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state
of Washington((;)).
(2) "Director" means the director of the department((;)).
(3) "Food" means any substance used for food or drink by any
person, including ice, bottled water, and any ingredient used for
components of any such substance regardless of the quantity of such
component((;)).
(4) "Sale" means selling, offering for sale, holding for sale,
preparing for sale, trading, bartering, offering a gift as an
inducement for sale of, and advertising for sale in any media((;)).
(5) "Food processing" means the handling or processing of any food
in any manner in preparation for sale for human consumption: PROVIDED,
That it shall not include fresh fruit or vegetables merely washed or
trimmed while being prepared or packaged for sale in their natural
state((;)).
(6) "Food processing plant" includes but is not limited to any
premises, plant, establishment, building, room, area, facilities and
the appurtenances thereto, in whole or in part, where food is prepared,
handled or processed in any manner for distribution or sale for resale
by retail outlets, restaurants, and any such other facility selling or
distributing to the ultimate consumer: PROVIDED, That, as set forth
herein, establishments processing foods in any manner for resale shall
be considered a food processing plant as to such processing((;)).
(7) "Food service establishment" shall mean any fixed or mobile
restaurant, coffee shop, cafeteria, short order cafe, luncheonette,
grill, tearoom, sandwich shop, soda fountain, tavern, bar, cocktail
lounge, night club, roadside stand, industrial-feeding establishment,
retail grocery, retail food market, retail meat market, retail bakery,
private, public, or nonprofit organization routinely serving food,
catering kitchen, commissary or similar place in which food or drink is
prepared for sale or for service on the premises or elsewhere, and any
other eating or drinking establishment or operation where food is
served or provided for the public with or without charge.
For the purpose of this chapter any custom cannery or processing
plant where raw food products, food, or food products are processed for
the owner thereof, or the food processing facilities are made available
to the owners or persons in control of raw food products or food or
food products for processing in any manner, shall be considered to be
food processing plants((;)).
(8) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, or
association.
(9) "Cottage food operation" means a person who produces cottage
food products only in the home kitchen of that person's primary
domestic residence in Washington and only for sale directly to the
consumer.
(10) "Cottage food products" means nonpotentially hazardous baked
goods; jams, jellies, preserves, and fruit butters as defined in 21
C.F.R. Sec. 150; and other nonpotentially hazardous foods identified by
the department in rule.
(11) "Domestic residence" means a single-family dwelling or an area
within a rental unit where a single person or family actually resides.
Domestic residence does not include:
(a) A group or communal residential setting within any type of
structure; or
(b) An outbuilding, shed, barn, or other similar structure.
(12) "Home kitchen" means a kitchen primarily intended for use by
the residents of a home. It may contain one stove or oven, which may
be a double oven, designed for residential use.
(13) "Potentially hazardous food" means foods requiring temperature
control for safety because they are capable of supporting the rapid
growth of pathogenic or toxigenic microorganisms, or the growth and
toxin production of Clostridium botulinum.
(14) "Washington state food service code" means food safety rules
adopted by the state board of health under the authority of chapter
43.20 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.07.040 and 1995 c 374 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a food processing
plant or process foods in the state without first having obtained an
annual license from the department, which shall expire on a date set by
rule by the director. License fees shall be prorated where necessary
to accommodate staggering of expiration dates. Application for a
license shall be on a form prescribed by the director and accompanied
by the license fee. The license fee is determined by computing the
gross annual sales for the accounting year immediately preceding the
license year. If the license is for a new operator, the license fee
shall be based on an estimated gross annual sales for the initial
license period.

If gross annual sales are: The license fee is:
$0 to $10,000, Cottage food
operation only $30.00
$0 to $50,000 $55.00
$50,001 to $500,000 $110.00
$500,001 to $1,000,000 $220.00
$1,000,001 to $5,000,000 $385.00
$5,000,001 to $10,000,000 $550.00
Greater than $10,000,000 $825.00

Such application shall include the full name of the applicant for the
license and the location of the food processing plant he or she intends
to operate. If such applicant is an individual, receiver, trustee,
firm, partnership, association or corporation, the full name of each
member of the firm or partnership, or names of the officers of the
association or corporation shall be given on the application. Such
application shall further state the principal business address of the
applicant in the state and elsewhere and the name of a person domiciled
in this state authorized to receive and accept service of summons of
legal notices of all kinds for the applicant. The application shall
also specify the type of food to be processed and the method or nature
of processing operation or preservation of that food and any other
necessary information. Upon the approval of the application by the
director and compliance with the provisions of this chapter, including
the applicable regulations adopted hereunder by the department, the
applicant shall be issued a license or renewal thereof.
Licenses shall be issued to cover only those products, processes,
and operations specified in the license application and approved for
licensing. Wherever a license holder wishes to engage in processing a
type of food product that is different than the type specified on the
application supporting the licensee's existing license and processing
that type of food product would require a major addition to or
modification of the licensee's processing facilities or has a high
potential for harm, the licensee shall submit an amendment to the
current license application. In such a case, the licensee may engage
in processing the new type of food product only after the amendment has
been approved by the department.
If upon investigation by the director, it is determined that a
person is processing food for retail sale and is not under permit,
license, or inspection by a local health authority, then that person
may be considered a food processor and subject to the provisions of
this chapter. The director may waive the licensure requirements of
this chapter for a person's operations at a facility if the person has
obtained a milk processing plant license under chapter 15.36 RCW to
conduct the same or a similar operation at the facility.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.07.080 and 1969 c 68 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For purpose of determining whether the rules adopted pursuant
to RCW 69.07.020, as now or hereafter amended are complied with, the
department shall have access for inspection purposes to any part,
portion or area of a food processing plant or cottage food operation,
and any records required to be kept under the provisions of this
chapter or rules ((and regulations)) adopted hereunder. Such
inspection shall, when possible, be made during regular business hours
or during any working shift of said food processing plant or cottage
food operation. The department may, however, inspect such food
processing plant or cottage food operation at any time when it has
received information that an emergency affecting the public health has
arisen and such food processing plant or cottage food operation is or
may be involved in the matters causing such emergency.
(2) The department may apply for an administrative inspection
warrant to a court of competent jurisdiction and an administrative
inspection warrant may be issued where:
(a) The department has attempted an inspection under this chapter
and access to all or part of the regulated business or entity has been
actually or constructively denied; or
(b) There is reasonable cause to believe that a violation of this
chapter or of rules adopted under this chapter is occurring or has
occurred.

--- END ---