BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.95.020 and 2007 c 405 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Academic year" means the regular nine-month, three-quarter, or
two-semester period annually occurring between August 1st and July
31st.
(2) "Account" means the Washington advanced college tuition payment
program account established for the deposit of all money received by
the board from eligible purchasers and interest earnings on investments
of funds in the account, as well as for all expenditures on behalf of
eligible beneficiaries for the redemption of tuition units and for the
development of any authorized college savings program pursuant to RCW
28B.95.150.
(3) "Board" means the higher education coordinating board as
defined in chapter 28B.76 RCW.
(4) "Committee on advanced tuition payment" or "committee" means a
committee of the following members: The state treasurer, the director
of the office of financial management, the executive director of the
higher education coordinating board, or their designees((,)); and
((two)) four members to be appointed by the governor and confirmed by
the senate for four-year terms, one representing program participants
and ((one)) three private business representatives with marketing,
public relations, or financial expertise. Beginning with appointments
made after the effective date of this section, in making the three
appointments representing private business, the governor must consider
names from a list provided by the president of the senate and the
speaker of the house of representatives. Appointment of the two
additional members representing private business as provided for in
chapter . . ., Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. (this act) must be made by
June 30, 2011, and shall be confirmed by the senate by June 30, 2012.
(5) "Governing body" means the committee empowered by the
legislature to administer the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program.
(6) "Contractual obligation" means a legally binding contract of
the state with the purchaser and the beneficiary establishing that
purchases of tuition units will be worth the same number of tuition
units at the time of redemption as they were worth at the time of the
purchase.
(7) "Eligible beneficiary" means the person for whom the tuition
unit will be redeemed for attendance at an institution of higher
education. The beneficiary is that person named by the purchaser at
the time that a tuition unit contract is accepted by the governing
body. Qualified organizations, as allowed under section 529 of the
federal internal revenue code, purchasing tuition unit contracts as
future scholarships need not designate a beneficiary at the time of
purchase.
(8) "Eligible purchaser" means an individual or organization that
has entered into a tuition unit contract with the governing body for
the purchase of tuition units for an eligible beneficiary. The state
of Washington may be an eligible purchaser for purposes of purchasing
tuition units to be held for granting Washington college bound
scholarships.
(9) "Full-time tuition charges" means resident tuition charges at
a state institution of higher education for enrollments between ten
credits and eighteen credit hours per academic term.
(10) "Institution of higher education" means an institution that
offers education beyond the secondary level and is recognized by the
internal revenue service under chapter 529 of the internal revenue
code.
(11) "Investment board" means the state investment board as defined
in chapter 43.33A RCW.
(12) "State institution of higher education" means institutions of
higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.
(13) "Tuition and fees" means undergraduate tuition and services
and activities fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and 28B.15.041 rounded
to the nearest whole dollar. For purposes of this chapter, services
and activities fees do not include fees charged for the payment of
bonds heretofore or hereafter issued for, or other indebtedness
incurred to pay, all or part of the cost of acquiring, constructing, or
installing any lands, buildings, or facilities.
(14) "Tuition unit contract" means a contract between an eligible
purchaser and the governing body, or a successor agency appointed for
administration of this chapter, for the purchase of tuition units for
a specified beneficiary that may be redeemed at a later date for an
equal number of tuition units.
(15) "Unit purchase price" means the minimum cost to purchase one
tuition unit for an eligible beneficiary. Generally, the minimum
purchase price is one percent of the undergraduate tuition and fees for
the current year, rounded to the nearest whole dollar, adjusted for the
costs of administration and adjusted to ensure the actuarial soundness
of the account. The analysis for price setting shall also include, but
not be limited to consideration of past and projected patterns of
tuition increases, program liability, past and projected investment
returns, and the need for a prudent stabilization reserve.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.95.030 and 2005 c 272 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program shall
be administered by the committee on advanced tuition payment which
shall be chaired by the executive director of the board. The committee
shall be supported by staff of the board.
(2)(a) The Washington advanced college tuition payment program
shall consist of the sale of tuition units, which may be redeemed by
the beneficiary at a future date for an equal number of tuition units
regardless of any increase in the price of tuition, that may have
occurred in the interval.
(b) Each purchase shall be worth a specific number of or fraction
of tuition units at each state institution of higher education as
determined by the governing body.
(c) The number of tuition units necessary to pay for a full year's,
full-time undergraduate tuition and fee charges at a state institution
of higher education shall be set by the governing body at the time a
purchaser enters into a tuition unit contract.
(d) The governing body may limit the number of tuition units
purchased by any one purchaser or on behalf of any one beneficiary,
however, no limit may be imposed that is less than that necessary to
achieve four years of full-time, undergraduate tuition charges at a
state institution of higher education. The governing body also may, at
its discretion, limit the number of participants, if needed, to ensure
the actuarial soundness and integrity of the program.
(e) While the Washington advanced college tuition payment program
is designed to help all citizens of the state of Washington, the
governing body may determine residency requirements for eligible
purchasers and eligible beneficiaries to ensure the actuarial soundness
and integrity of the program.
(3)(a) No tuition unit may be redeemed until two years after the
purchase of the unit. Units may be redeemed for enrollment at any
institution of higher education that is recognized by the internal
revenue service under chapter 529 of the internal revenue code.
(b) Units redeemed at a nonstate institution of higher education or
for graduate enrollment shall be redeemed at the rate for state public
institutions in effect at the time of redemption.
(4) The governing body shall determine the conditions under which
the tuition benefit may be transferred to another family member. In
permitting such transfers, the governing body may not allow the tuition
benefit to be bought, sold, bartered, or otherwise exchanged for goods
and services by either the beneficiary or the purchaser.
(5) The governing body shall administer the Washington advanced
college tuition payment program in a manner reasonably designed to be
actuarially sound, such that the assets of the trust will be sufficient
to defray the obligations of the trust including the costs of
administration. The governing body may, at its discretion, discount
the minimum purchase price for certain kinds of purchases such as those
from families with young children, as long as the actuarial soundness
of the account is not jeopardized.
(6) The governing body shall annually determine current value of a
tuition unit.
(7) The governing body shall promote, advertise, and publicize the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program.
(8) In addition to any other powers conferred by this chapter, the
governing body may:
(a) Impose reasonable limits on the number of tuition units or
units that may be used in any one year;
(b) Determine and set any time limits, if necessary, for the use of
benefits under this chapter;
(c) Impose and collect administrative fees and charges in
connection with any transaction under this chapter;
(d) Appoint and use advisory committees and the state actuary as
needed to provide program direction and guidance;
(e) Formulate and adopt all other policies and rules necessary for
the efficient administration of the program;
(f) Consider the addition of an advanced payment program for room
and board contracts and also consider a college savings program;
(g) Purchase insurance from insurers licensed to do business in the
state, to provide for coverage against any loss in connection with the
account's property, assets, or activities or to further insure the
value of the tuition units;
(h) Make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and other
instruments necessary to the exercise and discharge of its powers and
duties under this chapter;
(i) Contract for the provision for all or part of the services
necessary for the management and operation of the program with other
state or nonstate entities authorized to do business in the state;
(j) Contract for other services or for goods needed by the
governing body in the conduct of its business under this chapter;
(k) Contract with financial consultants, actuaries, auditors, and
other consultants as necessary to carry out its responsibilities under
this chapter;
(l) Solicit and accept cash donations and grants from any person,
governmental agency, private business, or organization; and
(m) Perform all acts necessary and proper to carry out the duties
and responsibilities of this program under this chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.95.080 and 1997 c 289 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The governing body shall annually evaluate, and cause to be
evaluated by ((a nationally recognized)) the state actuary, the
soundness of the account and determine the additional assets needed, if
any, to defray the obligations of the account. The governing body may,
at its discretion, consult with a nationally recognized actuary for
periodic assessments of the account.
If funds are ((not sufficient)) determined by the governing body,
based on actuarial analysis to be insufficient to ensure the actuarial
soundness of the account, the governing body shall adjust the price of
subsequent tuition credit purchases to ensure its soundness.
If there are insufficient numbers of new purchases to ensure the
actuarial soundness of the account, the governing body shall request
such funds from the legislature as are required to ensure the integrity
of the program. Funds may be appropriated directly to the account or
appropriated under the condition that they be repaid at a later date.
The repayment shall be made at such time that the account is again
determined to be actuarially sound.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.95.150 and 2001 c 184 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The committee may establish a college savings program. If such
a program is established, the college savings program shall be
established, in such form as may be determined by the committee, to be
a qualified state tuition program as defined by the internal revenue
service under section 529 of the internal revenue code, and shall be
administered in a manner consistent with the Washington advanced
college tuition payment program. The committee, in planning and
devising the program, shall consult with the state investment board,
the state treasurer, ((a qualified actuarial consulting firm with
appropriate expertise to evaluate such plans)) the state actuary, the
legislative fiscal and higher education committees, and the
institutions of higher education. The governing body may, at its
discretion, consult with a qualified actuarial consulting firm with
appropriate expertise to evaluate such plans for periodic assessments
of the program.
(2) Up to two hundred thousand dollars of administrative fees
collected from guaranteed education tuition program participants may be
applied as a loan to fund the development of a college savings program.
This loan must be repaid with interest before the conclusion of the
biennium in which the committee draws funds for this purpose from the
advanced college tuition payment program account.
(3) If such a college savings program is established, the college
savings program account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer for the purpose of administering the college savings program.
If created, the account shall be a discrete nontreasury account in the
custody of the state treasurer. Interest earnings shall be retained in
accordance with RCW 43.79A.040. Disbursements from the account, except
for program administration, are exempt from appropriations and the
allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW. Money used for program
administration is subject to the allotment provisions, but without
appropriation.
(4) The committee, after consultation with the state investment
board, shall determine the investment policies for the college savings
program. Program contributions may be invested by the state investment
board or the committee may contract with an investment company licensed
to conduct business in this state to do the investing. The committee
shall keep or cause to be kept full and adequate accounts and records
of the assets of each individual participant in the college savings
program.
(5) Neither the state nor any eligible educational institution may
be considered or held to be an insurer of the funds or assets of the
individual participant accounts in the college savings program created
under this section nor may any such entity be held liable for any
shortage of funds in the event that balances in the individual
participant accounts are insufficient to meet the educational expenses
of the institution chosen by the student for which the individual
participant account was intended.
(6) The committee shall adopt rules to implement this section.
Such rules shall include but not be limited to administration,
investment management, promotion, and marketing; compliance with
internal revenue service standards; application procedures and fees;
start-up costs; phasing in the savings program and withdrawals
therefrom; deterrents to early withdrawals and provisions for hardship
withdrawals; and reenrollment in the savings program after withdrawal.
(7) The committee may, at its discretion, determine to cease
operation of the college savings program if it determines the
continuation is not in the best interest of the state. The committee
shall adopt rules to implement this section addressing the orderly
distribution of assets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Pursuant to passage of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1795 (the higher education opportunity act),
and to maintain the actuarial soundness of the account and to lower the
risk to the state of incurring additional unfunded liability, the
governing body as defined in RCW 28B.95.020 shall, with the assistance
of the state actuary, assess the financial solvency of the advanced
college tuition payment program and shall determine if any changes
should be made to the program for units purchased on or after September
1, 2011, including, but not limited to:
(a) Establishing a unit payout value that increases predictability
and affordability to consumers;
(b) Modifying the tuition unit price;
(c) Modifying the contracting of tuition unit purchases to better
align the tuition unit price paid throughout the length of the contract
with the price established for each enrollment period; and
(d) Modifying the enrollment period.
(2) The governing body shall submit a report of these efforts to
the governor and the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature
no later than October 1, 2011.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28B.95 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A legislative advisory committee to the committee on
advanced tuition payment is established. The advisory committee shall
consist of the following members:
(i) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house
of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives. At least one member from each caucus shall be a
member of the house of representatives ways and means committee and at
least one member from each caucus shall be a member of the house of
representatives higher education committee; and
(ii) Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the
senate appointed by the president of the senate. At least one member
from each caucus shall be a member of the senate ways and means
committee and at least one member from each caucus shall be a member of
the senate higher education and workforce development committee.
(b) All members must be appointed by June 30, 2011, and must serve
a term of no less than two years.
(c) Vacancies on the advisory committee shall be filled by
appointment by either the president of the senate or the speaker of the
house of representatives. All such vacancies shall be filled from the
same political party and from the same house as the member whose seat
was vacated.
(d) The members of the advisory committee shall serve without
additional compensation, but shall be reimbursed in accordance with RCW
44.04.120 while attending meetings of the advisory committee and of the
committee on advanced tuition payment.
(e) The advisory committee shall appoint its own chair and vice
chair and shall meet at least once annually.
(2) The advisory committee shall provide advice to the committee on
advanced tuition payment and the state actuary regarding the
administration of the program including, but not limited to, pricing
guidelines, the tuition unit price, and the unit payout value.
(3) Staff support for the advisory committee must be jointly
provided by the senate committee services and the house of
representatives office of program research.

Sec. 7 RCW 44.44.040 and 2003 c 295 s 4 and 2003 c 92 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The office of the state actuary shall have the following powers and
duties:
(1) Perform all actuarial services for the department of retirement
systems, including all studies required by law.
(2) Advise the legislature and the governor regarding pension
benefit provisions, and funding policies and investment policies of the
state investment board.
(3) Consult with the legislature and the governor concerning
determination of actuarial assumptions used by the department of
retirement systems.
(4) Prepare a report, to be known as the actuarial fiscal note, on
each pension bill introduced in the legislature which briefly explains
the financial impact of the bill. The actuarial fiscal note shall
include: (a) The statutorily required contribution for the biennium
and the following twenty-five years; (b) the biennial cost of the
increased benefits if these exceed the required contribution; and (c)
any change in the present value of the unfunded accrued benefits. An
actuarial fiscal note shall also be prepared for all amendments which
are offered in committee or on the floor of the house of
representatives or the senate to any pension bill. However, a majority
of the members present may suspend the requirement for an actuarial
fiscal note for amendments offered on the floor of the house of
representatives or the senate.
(5) Provide such actuarial services to the legislature as may be
requested from time to time.
(6) Provide staff and assistance to the committee established under
RCW 41.04.276.
(7) Provide actuarial assistance to the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' plan 2 retirement board as provided in chapter 2,
Laws of 2003. Reimbursement for services shall be made to the state
actuary under RCW 39.34.130 and section 5(5), chapter 2, Laws of 2003.
(8) Provide actuarial assistance to the committee on advanced
tuition payment pursuant to chapter 28B.95 RCW, including recommending
a tuition unit price to the committee on advanced tuition payment to be
used in the ensuing enrollment period. Reimbursement for services
shall be made to the state actuary under RCW 39.34.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 and 6 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---