BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.330 and 2010 c 112 s 13 and 2010 c 106 s 104 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Disclose" means to make known to any person in any manner
whatever a return or tax information;
(b) "Return" means a tax or information return or claim for refund
required by, or provided for or permitted under, the laws of this state
which is filed with the department of revenue by, on behalf of, or with
respect to a person, and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists that are supplemental to,
or part of, the return so filed;
(c) "Tax information" means (i) a taxpayer's identity, (ii) the
nature, source, or amount of the taxpayer's income, payments, receipts,
deductions, exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax
liability deficiencies, overassessments, or tax payments, whether taken
from the taxpayer's books and records or any other source, (iii)
whether the taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be examined or
subject to other investigation or processing, (iv) a part of a written
determination that is not designated as a precedent and disclosed
pursuant to RCW 82.32.410, or a background file document relating to a
written determination, and (v) other data received by, recorded by,
prepared by, furnished to, or collected by the department of revenue
with respect to the determination of the existence, or possible
existence, of liability, or the amount thereof, of a person under the
laws of this state for a tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or
other imposition, or offense. However, data, material, or documents
that do not disclose information related to a specific or identifiable
taxpayer do not constitute tax information under this section. Except
as provided by RCW 82.32.410, nothing in this chapter requires any
person possessing data, material, or documents made confidential and
privileged by this section to delete information from such data,
material, or documents so as to permit its disclosure;
(d) "State agency" means every Washington state office, department,
division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency;
(e) "Taxpayer identity" means the taxpayer's name, address,
telephone number, registration number, or any combination thereof, or
any other information disclosing the identity of the taxpayer; and
(f) "Department" means the department of revenue or its officer,
agent, employee, or representative.
(2) Returns and tax information are confidential and privileged,
and except as authorized by this section, neither the department of
revenue nor any other person may disclose any return or tax
information.
(3) This section does not prohibit the department of revenue from:
(a) Disclosing such return or tax information in a civil or
criminal judicial proceeding or an administrative proceeding:
(i) In respect of any tax imposed under the laws of this state if
the taxpayer or its officer or other person liable under this title or
chapter 83.100 RCW is a party in the proceeding;
(ii) In which the taxpayer about whom such return or tax
information is sought and another state agency are adverse parties in
the proceeding; or
(iii) Brought by the department under RCW 18.27.040 or 19.28.071;
(b) Disclosing, subject to such requirements and conditions as the
director prescribes by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW,
such return or tax information regarding a taxpayer to such taxpayer or
to such person or persons as that taxpayer may designate in a request
for, or consent to, such disclosure, or to any other person, at the
taxpayer's request, to the extent necessary to comply with a request
for information or assistance made by the taxpayer to such other
person. However, tax information not received from the taxpayer must
not be so disclosed if the director determines that such disclosure
would compromise any investigation or litigation by any federal, state,
or local government agency in connection with the civil or criminal
liability of the taxpayer or another person, or that such disclosure
would identify a confidential informant, or that such disclosure is
contrary to any agreement entered into by the department that provides
for the reciprocal exchange of information with other government
agencies which agreement requires confidentiality with respect to such
information unless such information is required to be disclosed to the
taxpayer by the order of any court;
(c) Disclosing the name of a taxpayer against whom a warrant under
RCW 82.32.210 has been either issued or filed and remains outstanding
for a period of at least ten working days. The department is not
required to disclose any information under this subsection if a
taxpayer has entered a deferred payment arrangement with the department
for the payment of a warrant that has not been filed and is making
payments upon such deficiency that will fully satisfy the indebtedness
within twelve months;
(d) Publishing statistics ((so classified as to prevent the)) of
any number of taxpayers in a classification as long as the publication
makes no identification of particular returns or reports or items
thereof other than the amount of taxpayer savings;
(e) Disclosing such return or tax information, for official
purposes only, to the governor or attorney general, or to any state
agency, or to any committee or subcommittee of the legislature dealing
with matters of taxation, revenue, trade, commerce, the control of
industry or the professions;
(f) Permitting the department of revenue's records to be audited
and examined by the proper state officer, his or her agents and
employees;
(g) Disclosing any such return or tax information to a peace
officer as defined in RCW 9A.04.110 or county prosecuting attorney, for
official purposes. The disclosure may be made only in response to a
search warrant, subpoena, or other court order, unless the disclosure
is for the purpose of criminal tax enforcement. A peace officer or
county prosecuting attorney who receives the return or tax information
may disclose that return or tax information only for use in the
investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court
proceeding for which the return or tax information originally was
sought;
(h) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the proper
officer of the internal revenue service of the United States, the
Canadian government or provincial governments of Canada, or to the
proper officer of the tax department of any state or city or town or
county, for official purposes, but only if the statutes of the United
States, Canada or its provincial governments, or of such other state or
city or town or county, as the case may be, grants substantially
similar privileges to the proper officers of this state;
(i) Disclosing any such return or tax information to the United
States department of justice, including the bureau of alcohol, tobacco,
firearms and explosives, the department of defense, the immigration and
customs enforcement and the customs and border protection agencies of
the United States department of homeland security, the United States
coast guard, the alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau of the United
States department of treasury, and the United States department of
transportation, or any authorized representative of these federal
agencies, for official purposes;
(j) Publishing or otherwise disclosing the text of a written
determination designated by the director as a precedent pursuant to RCW
82.32.410;
(k) Disclosing, in a manner that is not associated with other tax
information, the taxpayer name, entity type, business address, mailing
address, revenue tax registration numbers, reseller permit numbers and
the expiration date and status of such permits, North American industry
classification system or standard industrial classification code of a
taxpayer, and the dates of opening and closing of business. This
subsection may not be construed as giving authority to the department
to give, sell, or provide access to any list of taxpayers for any
commercial purpose;
(l) Disclosing such return or tax information that is also
maintained by another Washington state or local governmental agency as
a public record available for inspection and copying under the
provisions of chapter 42.56 RCW or is a document maintained by a court
of record and is not otherwise prohibited from disclosure;
(m) Disclosing such return or tax information to the United States
department of agriculture for the limited purpose of investigating food
stamp fraud by retailers;
(n) Disclosing to a financial institution, escrow company, or title
company, in connection with specific real property that is the subject
of a real estate transaction, current amounts due the department for a
filed tax warrant, judgment, or lien against the real property;
(o) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted
liability as a successor under RCW 82.32.140 return or tax information
pertaining to the specific business of the taxpayer to which the person
has succeeded;
(p) Disclosing real estate excise tax affidavit forms filed under
RCW 82.45.150 in the possession of the department, including real
estate excise tax affidavit forms for transactions exempt or otherwise
not subject to tax;
(q) Disclosing to local taxing jurisdictions the identity of
sellers granted relief under RCW 82.32.430(5)(b)(i) and the period for
which relief is granted;
(r) Disclosing such return or tax information to the court in
respect to the department's application for a subpoena under RCW
82.32.115;
(s) Disclosing to a person against whom the department has asserted
liability under RCW 83.100.120 return or tax information pertaining to
that person's liability for tax under chapter 83.100 RCW;
(t) Disclosing such return or tax information to the streamlined
sales tax governing board, member states of the streamlined sales tax
governing board, or authorized representatives of such board or states,
for the limited purposes of:
(i) Conducting on behalf of member states sales and use tax audits
of taxpayers; or
(ii) Auditing certified service providers or certified automated
systems providers; or
(u) Disclosing any such return or tax information when the
disclosure is specifically authorized under any other section of the
Revised Code of Washington.
(4)(a) The department may disclose return or taxpayer information
to a person under investigation or during any court or administrative
proceeding against a person under investigation as provided in this
subsection (4). The disclosure must be in connection with the
department's official duties relating to an audit, collection activity,
or a civil or criminal investigation. The disclosure may occur only
when the person under investigation and the person in possession of
data, materials, or documents are parties to the return or tax
information to be disclosed. The department may disclose return or tax
information such as invoices, contracts, bills, statements, resale or
exemption certificates, or checks. However, the department may not
disclose general ledgers, sales or cash receipt journals, check
registers, accounts receivable/payable ledgers, general journals,
financial statements, expert's workpapers, income tax returns, state
tax returns, tax return workpapers, or other similar data, materials,
or documents.
(b) Before disclosure of any tax return or tax information under
this subsection (4), the department must, through written
correspondence, inform the person in possession of the data, materials,
or documents to be disclosed. The correspondence must clearly identify
the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed. The department may
not disclose any tax return or tax information under this subsection
(4) until the time period allowed in (c) of this subsection has expired
or until the court has ruled on any challenge brought under (c) of this
subsection.
(c) The person in possession of the data, materials, or documents
to be disclosed by the department has twenty days from the receipt of
the written request required under (b) of this subsection to petition
the superior court of the county in which the petitioner resides for
injunctive relief. The court must limit or deny the request of the
department if the court determines that:
(i) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure are
cumulative or duplicative, or are obtainable from some other source
that is more convenient, less burdensome, or less expensive;
(ii) The production of the data, materials, or documents sought
would be unduly burdensome or expensive, taking into account the needs
of the department, the amount in controversy, limitations on the
petitioner's resources, and the importance of the issues at stake; or
(iii) The data, materials, or documents sought for disclosure
contain trade secret information that, if disclosed, could harm the
petitioner.
(d) The department must reimburse reasonable expenses for the
production of data, materials, or documents incurred by the person in
possession of the data, materials, or documents to be disclosed.
(e) Requesting information under (b) of this subsection that may
indicate that a taxpayer is under investigation does not constitute a
disclosure of tax return or tax information under this section.
(5) Service of a subpoena issued under RCW 82.32.115 does not
constitute a disclosure of return or tax information under this
section. Notwithstanding anything else to the contrary in this
section, a person served with a subpoena under RCW 82.32.115 may
disclose the existence or content of the subpoena to that person's
legal counsel.
(6) Any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information
in the course of his or her employment with the department of revenue
and any person acquiring knowledge of any return or tax information as
provided under subsection (3) (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), or (m) of this
section, who discloses any such return or tax information to another
person not entitled to knowledge of such return or tax information
under the provisions of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If
the person guilty of such violation is an officer or employee of the
state, such person must forfeit such office or employment and is
incapable of holding any public office or employment in this state for
a period of two years thereafter.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.08.210 and 2005 c 274 s 363 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "tax information" means
confidential income data and proprietary business information obtained
by the department in the course of carrying out the duties now or
hereafter imposed upon it in this title that has been communicated in
confidence in connection with the assessment of property and that has
not been publicly disseminated by the taxpayer, the disclosure of which
would be either highly offensive to a reasonable person and not a
legitimate concern to the public or would result in an unfair
competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer.
(2) Tax information is confidential and privileged, and except as
authorized by this section, neither the department nor any other person
may disclose tax information.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section, however, does not prohibit the
department from:
(a) Disclosing tax information to any county assessor or county
treasurer;
(b) Disclosing tax information in a civil or criminal judicial
proceeding or an administrative proceeding in respect to taxes or
penalties imposed under this title or Title 82 RCW or in respect to
assessment or valuation for tax purposes of the property to which the
information or facts relate;
(c) Disclosing tax information with the written permission of the
taxpayer;
(d) Disclosing tax information to the proper officer of the tax
department of any state responsible for the imposition or collection of
property taxes, or for the valuation of property for tax purposes, if
the other state grants substantially similar privileges to the proper
officers of this state;
(e) Disclosing tax information that is also maintained by another
Washington state or local governmental agency as a public record
available for inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW or is a
document maintained by a court of record not otherwise prohibited from
disclosure;
(f) Disclosing tax information to a peace officer as defined in RCW
9A.04.110 or county prosecutor, for official purposes. The disclosure
may be made only in response to a search warrant, subpoena, or other
court order, unless the disclosure is for the purpose of criminal tax
enforcement. A peace officer or county prosecutor who receives the tax
information may disclose the tax information only for use in the
investigation and a related court proceeding, or in the court
proceeding for which the tax information originally was sought; ((or))
(g) Disclosing information otherwise available under chapter 42.56
RCW; or
(h) Publishing the statistics of any number of taxpayers in a
classification as long as the publication makes no identification of
particular tax information other than the amount of taxpayer savings.
(4) A violation of this section constitutes a gross misdemeanor.

--- END ---