BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state's
groundwater resources provide vital environmental and economic benefits
for all the citizens of the state. Increasing demands for utilization
of groundwater resources and increased understanding of the
interrelationship of the state's groundwaters and surface waters
requires adequate funding for monitoring and analyzing groundwater
levels and programs relating to managing groundwater uses. It is
appropriate that all new well users contribute some of the funding for
these management programs. Therefore, the purpose of this act is to
authorize an additional fee upon the construction of certain new wells
to help fund groundwater data management and mapping, as well as other
groundwater management activities.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.104.055 and 2005 c 84 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A fee is hereby imposed on each well constructed in this state
on or after July 1, 2005.
(2)(a) The fee for one water well, other than a dewatering well,
with a minimum top casing diameter of less than twelve inches is two
hundred dollars, plus the surcharge imposed by subsection (4) of this
section. This fee does not apply to a ground source heat pump boring
or a grounding well.
(b) The fee for one water well, other than a dewatering well, with
a minimum top casing diameter of twelve inches or greater is three
hundred dollars, plus the surcharge imposed by subsection (4) of this
section.
(c) The fee for a resource protection well, except for an
environmental investigation well, a ground source heat pump boring, or
a grounding well, is forty dollars for each well.
(d) The fee for an environmental investigation well in which
groundwater is sampled or measured is forty dollars for construction of
up to four environmental investigation wells per project, ten dollars
for each additional environmental investigation well constructed on a
project with more than four wells. There is no fee for soil or vapor
sampling purposes.
(e) The fee for a ground source heat pump boring or a grounding
well is forty dollars for construction of up to four ground source heat
pump borings or grounding wells per project and ten dollars for each
additional ground source heat pump boring or grounding well constructed
on a project with more than four wells.
(f) The combined fee for construction and decommissioning of a
dewatering well system shall be forty dollars for each two hundred
horizontal lineal feet, or portion thereof, of the dewatering well
system.
(g) The fee to decommission a water well is fifty dollars.
(h) The fee to decommission a resource protection well, except for
an environmental investigation well, is twenty dollars. There is no
fee to decommission an environmental investigation well or a
geotechnical soil boring.
(i) The fee to decommission a ground source heat pump boring or a
grounding well is twenty dollars.
(3) The fees imposed by this section shall be paid at the time the
notice of well construction is submitted to the department as provided
by RCW 18.104.048. The department by rule may adopt procedures to
permit the fees required for resource protection wells to be paid after
the number of wells actually constructed has been determined. The
department shall refund the amount of any fee collected for wells,
borings, probes, or excavations as long as construction has not started
and the department has received a refund request within one hundred
eighty days from the time the department received the fee. The refund
request shall be made on a form provided by the department.
(4) A surcharge of two hundred dollars is imposed upon each water
well subject to the fees in subsections (2)(a) and (b) of this section.
The fees paid under this subsection must be deposited in the
groundwater management account created in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW
to read as follows:
The groundwater management account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from fees paid under RCW 18.104.055(4) must be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used by the
department for programs relating to the management of groundwater
resources of the state, including groundwater mapping and resource
assessment.

--- END ---