BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.35.370 and 2009 c 499 s 5 and 2009 c 497 s 6021
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
((Within thirty-five days from the date of collection thereof all
building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State
College shall be paid into the state treasury and these together with
such normal school fund revenues as provided in RCW 28B.35.751 as are
received by the state treasury shall be credited as follows:
(1) On or before June 30th of each year the board of trustees of
each regional university and The Evergreen State College, if issuing
bonds payable out of its building fees and above described normal
school fund revenues, shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts
required in the ensuing twelve months to pay and secure the payment of
the principal of and interest on such bonds. The amounts so certified
by each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall be a
prior lien and charge against all building fees and above described
normal school fund revenues of such institution. The state treasurer
shall thereupon deposit the amounts so certified in the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the Central Washington
University capital projects account, the Western Washington University
capital projects account, or The Evergreen State College capital
projects account respectively, which accounts are hereby created in the
state treasury. The amounts deposited in the respective capital
projects accounts shall be used to pay and secure the payment of the
principal of and interest on the building bonds issued by such regional
universities and The Evergreen State College as authorized by law. If
in any twelve month period it shall appear that the amount certified by
any such board of trustees is insufficient to pay and secure the
payment of the principal of and interest on the outstanding building
and above described normal school fund revenue bonds of its
institution, the state treasurer shall notify the board of trustees and
such board shall adjust its certificate so that all requirements of
moneys to pay and secure the payment of the principal of and interest
on all such bonds then outstanding shall be fully met at all times.
(2))) (1) All normal school fund revenue pursuant to RCW 28B.35.751
and building fees of each regional university and The Evergreen State
College shall be deposited in the Eastern Washington University capital
projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the Western Washington University capital projects account, or
The Evergreen State College capital projects account respectively,
which accounts are hereby created ((in the state treasury)) as local
accounts. The sums deposited in the respective capital projects
accounts shall be ((appropriated and)) expended to pay and secure the
payment of the principal of and interest on bonds payable out of the
building fees and normal school revenue and for the construction,
reconstruction, erection, equipping, maintenance, demolition and major
alteration of buildings and other capital assets, and the acquisition
of sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances in
relation thereto except for any sums transferred therefrom as
authorized by law. During the 2009-2011 biennium, sums in the
respective capital accounts shall also be used for routine facility
maintenance and utility costs.
(((3))) (2) Funds available in the respective capital projects
accounts may also be used for certificates of participation under
chapter 39.94 RCW.
(3) Each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall
continue to support minor capital works and deferred maintenance from
building fees at the level appropriated from the Eastern Washington
University capital projects account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the Western Washington University capital
projects account, and The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, in chapter 520, Laws of 2007, and chapter 328, Laws of 2008,
adjusted annually by the rate of inflation as measured by the consumer
price index.
(4) Each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall
continue to fund high priority major and minor capital projects and
continue to assign high priority to deferred maintenance projects.
(5) Funds available in the Eastern Washington University capital
projects account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the Western Washington University capital projects account,
and The Evergreen State College capital projects account shall not be
used for auxiliary facilities paid from fees, charges, and other income
derived from the ownership and use of such auxiliary facilities.
(6) Each regional university and The Evergreen State College shall
submit an annual report by January 15th each year to relevant policy
and fiscal committees of the legislature, legislative staff, and the
office of financial management that details expenditures by project
funded by the Eastern Washington University capital projects account,
the Central Washington University capital projects account, the Western
Washington University capital projects account, and The Evergreen State
College capital projects account.
(7) Local capital projects accounts are not subject to
appropriation by the legislature or allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act expires June 30, 2023.

--- END ---