BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 16.36.023 and 2008 c 285 s 28 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director may adopt rules establishing fees for:
(a) The establishment and inspection of animal holding facilities
authorized under this chapter;
(b) The inspection and monitoring of animals in authorized animal
holding facilities; ((and))
(c) Special inspections of animals or animal facilities that the
director may provide at the request of the animal owner or interested
persons; and
(d) Providing services and support related to the provision of
regulatory forms and supplies distributed by the department including
official individual identification device or method, such as official
tags and radio frequency identification devices, that are approved by
the department for animals or groups of animals. In addition to any
amount collected for the actual cost of the device, a fee may be
collected for each official individual identification device or method
that is supplied. These fees shall be used to fund the cost of
services and program support for the animal disease traceability
functions of the department.
(2) The fees shall, as closely as practicable, cover the cost of
the service provided.
(3) All fees collected under this section shall be deposited in an
account in the agricultural local fund and used to carry out the
purposes of this chapter and chapter 16.57 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 16.36.025 and 1998 c 8 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
The director may collect moneys to recover the reasonable costs of
purchasing, printing, and distributing ((certificates)) official
individual identification devices or methods, regulatory forms, and
other supplies ((to veterinarians)). All funds collected under this
section shall be deposited in an account in the agricultural local fund
and used to carry out the purposes of this chapter and chapter 16.57
RCW.

--- END ---