BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that railroads
operating within the state of Washington are critical to the state's
competiveness in moving freight and trade-related cargo.
(2) The legislature also finds that maintenance and upgrading of
rail infrastructure is a necessary and desirable function to preserve
interstate transportation opportunities that are important to the
state's ports and major manufacturing industries.
(3) The legislature recognizes that many aspects of maintenance of
rail right-of-way and railway operation fall under the auspices of the
federal government, including the general outlines of safe and
efficient maintenance of our rail corridors. The legislature also
recognizes that railroad operations and governance generally fall to
the federal government and that congress has generally assumed
responsibility of such in order to streamline governance and to
discourage state-based regulation that invites different state-by-state
operating and maintenance requirements on railroads important to
interstate commerce.
(4) In recognition of the necessity to maintain efficient,
uninterrupted rail service and maintenance functions, the legislature
advances the changes in this act to ensure efficient regulation and to
prevent duplication of regulatory activity.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.17.400 and 2007 c 27 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 49.17.400
through 49.17.430 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Apprentice operator or trainee" means a crane operator who has
not met requirements established by the department under RCW 49.17.430.
(2) "Attachments" includes, but is not limited to, crane-attached
or suspended hooks, magnets, grapples, clamshell buckets, orange peel
buckets, concrete buckets, drag lines, personnel platforms, augers, or
drills and pile-driving equipment.
(3) "Certified crane inspector" means a crane inspector who has
been certified by the department.
(4) "Construction" means all or any part of excavation,
construction, erection, alteration, repair, demolition, and dismantling
of buildings and other structures and all related operations; the
excavation, construction, alteration, and repair of sewers, trenches,
caissons, conduits, pipelines, roads, and all related operations; the
moving of buildings and other structures, and the construction,
alteration, repair, or removal of wharfs, docks, bridges, culverts,
trestles, piers, abutments, or any other related construction,
alteration, repair, or removal work. "Construction" does not include
manufacturing facilities or powerhouses.
(5) "Crane" means power-operated equipment used in construction
that can hoist, lower, and horizontally move a suspended load. "Crane"
includes, but is not limited to: Articulating cranes, such as knuckle-boom cranes; crawler cranes; floating cranes; cranes on barges;
((locomotive cranes;)) mobile cranes, such as wheel-mounted, rough-terrain, all-terrain, commercial truck mounted, and boom truck cranes;
multipurpose machines when configured to hoist and lower by means of a
winch or hook and horizontally move a suspended load; industrial
cranes, such as carry-deck cranes; dedicated pile drivers;
service/mechanic trucks with a hoisting device; a crane on a monorail;
tower cranes, such as fixed jib, hammerhead boom, luffing boom, and
self-erecting; pedestal cranes; portal cranes; overhead and gantry
cranes; straddle cranes; side-boom tractors; derricks; and variations
of such equipment.
(6) "Crane operator" means an individual engaged in the operation
of a crane.
(7) "Professional engineer" means a professional engineer as
defined in RCW 18.43.020.
(8) "Qualified crane operator" means a crane operator who meets the
requirements established by the department under RCW 49.17.430.
(9) "Safety or health standard" means a standard adopted under this
chapter.

Sec. 3 RCW 49.17.410 and 2007 c 27 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) RCW 49.17.400 through 49.17.430 apply to cranes used with or
without attachments.
(2) RCW 49.17.400 through 49.17.430 do not apply to:
(a) A crane while it has been converted or adapted for a
nonhoisting or nonlifting use including, but not limited to, power
shovels, excavators, and concrete pumps;
(b) Power shovels, excavators, wheel loaders, backhoes, loader
backhoes, and track loaders when used with or without chains, slings,
or other rigging to lift suspended loads;
(c) Automotive wreckers and tow trucks when used to clear wrecks
and haul vehicles;
(d) Service trucks with mobile lifting devices designed
specifically for use in the power line and electric service industries,
such as digger derricks (radial boom derricks), when used in the power
line and electric service industries for auguring holes to set power
and utility poles, or handling associated materials to be installed or
removed from utility poles;
(e) Equipment originally designed as vehicle-mounted aerial devices
(for lifting personnel) and self-propelled elevating work platforms;
(f) Hydraulic jacking systems, including telescopic/hydraulic
gantries;
(g) Stacker cranes;
(h) Powered industrial trucks (forklifts);
(i) Mechanic's truck with a hoisting device when used in activities
related to equipment maintenance and repair;
(j) Equipment that hoists by using a come-along or chainfall;
(k) Dedicated drilling rigs;
(l) Gin poles used for the erection of communication towers;
(m) Tree trimming and tree removal work;
(n) Anchor handling with a vessel or barge using an affixed A-frame;
(o) Roustabouts;
(p) Cranes used on-site in manufacturing facilities or powerhouses
for occasional or routine maintenance and repair work; ((and))
(q) Crane operators operating cranes on-site in manufacturing
facilities or powerhouses for occasional or routine maintenance and
repair work; and
(r) Cranes used for railroad operations and maintenance functions
on railroad property and crane operators operating cranes for railroad
operations and maintenance functions. Federal railroad administration
regulations for railroad crane equipment certification fulfill
requirements of this section. Existing railroad training programs and
certification procedures for railroad crane operators shall fulfill the
requirements of this section.

--- END ---