BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
CREATING THE OFFICE OF CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 Information technology is a tool used by
state agencies to improve their ability to deliver public services
efficiently and effectively. Advances in information technology -including advances in hardware, software, and business processes for
implementing and managing these resources - offer new opportunities to
improve the level of support provided to citizens and state agencies
and to reduce the per-transaction cost of these services. These
advances are one component in the process of reengineering how
government delivers services to citizens.
To fully realize the service improvements and cost efficiency from
the effective application of information technology to its business
processes, state government must establish decision-making structures
that connect business processes and information technology in an
operating model. Many of these business practices transcend individual
agency processes and should be worked at the enterprise level. To do
this requires an effective partnership of executive management,
business processes owners, and providers of support functions necessary
to efficiently and effectively deliver services to citizens.
To maximize the potential for information technology to contribute
to government business process reengineering the state must establish
clear central authority to plan, set enterprise standards, and provide
project oversight and management analysis of the various aspects of a
business process.
Establishing the office of chief information officer and partnering
it with the director of financial management and the director of
personnel will provide state government with the cohesive structure
necessary to develop improved operating models with agency directors
and reengineer business process to enhance service delivery while
capturing savings.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 (1) The office of the chief information
officer is created within the office of financial management.
(2) Powers, duties, and functions assigned to the department of
information services as specified in this chapter shall be transferred
to the office of chief information officer as provided in this chapter.
(3) The primary duties of the office are:
(a) To prepare and lead the implementation of a strategic direction
and enterprise architecture for information technology for state
government;
(b) To enable the standardization and consolidation of information
technology infrastructure to support enterprise-based system
development and improve and maintain service delivery;
(c) To establish standards and policies for the consistent and
efficient operation of information technology services throughout state
government;
(d) To establish statewide enterprise architecture that will serve
as the organizing standard for information technology for state
agencies;
(e) Educate and inform state managers and policymakers on
technological developments, industry trends and best practices,
industry benchmarks that strengthen decision making and professional
development, and industry understanding for public managers and
decision makers.
(4) In the case of institutions of higher education, the powers of
the office and the provisions of this chapter apply to business and
administrative applications but do not apply to academic and research
applications.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 103 (1) The executive head and appointing
authority of the office is the chief information officer. The chief
information officer shall be appointed by the governor, subject to
confirmation by the senate. The chief information officer shall serve
at the pleasure of the governor. The chief information officer shall
be paid a salary fixed by the governor. If a vacancy occurs in the
position of chief information officer while the senate is not in
session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next
meeting of the senate at which time he or she shall present to that
body his or her nomination for the position.
(2) The chief information officer may employ staff members, who
shall be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff
members as are necessary to administer this chapter, and such other
duties as may be authorized by law. The chief information officer may
delegate any power or duty vested in him or her by this chapter or
other law.
(3) The internal affairs of the office shall be under the control
of the chief information officer in order that the chief information
officer may manage the office in a flexible and intelligent manner as
dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless specifically
limited by law, the chief information officer shall have complete
charge and supervisory powers over the office. The chief information
officer may create such administrative structures as the chief
information officer deems appropriate, except as otherwise specified by
law, and the chief information officer may employ such personnel as may
be necessary in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise
provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 104 The chief information officer shall:
(1) Supervise and administer the activities of the office of chief
information officer;
(2) Exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed
by law with respect to the administration of this chapter including:
(a) Appoint such professional, technical, and clerical assistants
and employees as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed by this
chapter; and
(b) Report to the governor any matters relating to abuses and
evasions of this chapter.
(3) In addition to other powers and duties granted, the chief
information officer has the following powers and duties:
(a) Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the
purposes of this chapter;
(b) Accept and expend gifts and grants that are related to the
purposes of this chapter, whether such grants be of federal or other
funds;
(c) Apply for grants from public and private entities, and receive
and administer any grant funding received for the purpose and intent of
this chapter;
(d) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform
all other functions necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of
this chapter;
(e) Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the chief information
officer deems necessary for efficient administration, but the chief
information officer shall be responsible for the official acts of the
officers and employees of the office; and
(f) Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 105 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Backbone network" means the shared high-density portions of
the state's telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes
specially conditioned high-speed communications carrier lines,
multiplexors, switches associated with such communications lines, and
any equipment and software components necessary for management and
control of the backbone network.
(2) "Board" means the information technology advisory board.
(3) "Committee" means the state interoperability executive
committee.
(4) "Educational sectors" means those institutions of higher
education, school districts, and educational service districts that use
the network for distance education, data transmission, and other uses
permitted by the board.
(5) "Enterprise architecture" means an ongoing program for
translating business vision and strategy into effective enterprise
change. It is a continuous activity. Enterprise architecture creates,
communicates, and improves the key principles and models that describe
the enterprise's future state and enable its evolution. The intent of
enterprise architecture is to provide guidance to projects that will
improve the reliability, interoperability, and sustainability of the
information, services, and business processes that Washington
government uses, assisted where appropriate by common and standardized
technologies.
(6) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission
facilities used in information processing, including but not limited to
computers, terminals, telephones, wireless communications system
facilities, cables, and any physical facility necessary for the
operation of such equipment.
(7) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data, text,
voice, and video.
(8) "Information technology" includes, but is not limited to, all
electronic technology systems and services, automated information
handling, system design and analysis, conversion of data, computer
programming, information storage and retrieval, telecommunications,
requisite system controls, simulation, electronic commerce, and all
related interactions between people and machines.
(9) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a
strategic management process documenting relationships between agency
missions and information technology and telecommunications investments.
(10) "K-20 network" means the network established in section 117 of
this act.
(11) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi-municipal
corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such
corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately.
(12) "Office" means the office of the chief information officer.
(13) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk analysis and
management designed to ensure optimum use of information technology
resources and telecommunications.
(14) "Proprietary software" means that software offered for sale or
license.
(15) "State agency" or "agency" means every state office,
department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency,
including offices headed by a statewide elected official.
(16) "Telecommunications" includes, but is not limited to, wireless
or wired systems for transport of voice, video, and data
communications, network systems, requisite facilities, equipment,
system controls, simulation, electronic commerce, and all related
interactions between people and machines. "Telecommunications" does
not include public safety communications.

STANDARDS AND POLICIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 (1) The chief information officer shall
establish standards and policies to govern information technology in
the state of Washington.
(2) The office shall have the following powers and duties related
to information services:
(a) To develop standards and policies governing the acquisition and
disposition of equipment, software, and personal and purchased
services, licensing of the radio spectrum by or on behalf of state
agencies, and confidentiality of computerized data;
(b) To develop statewide or interagency technical policies,
standards, and procedures;
(c) To review and approve standards and common specifications for
new or expanded telecommunications networks proposed by agencies,
public postsecondary education institutions, educational service
districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 information
technology services;
(d) To provide direction concerning strategic planning goals and
objectives for the state. The office shall seek input from the
legislature and the judiciary; and
(e) To establish policies for the periodic review by the office of
agency performance which may include but are not limited to analysis
of:
(i) Planning, management, control, and use of information services;
(ii) Training and education; and
(iii) Project management.
(3) Statewide technical standards to promote and facilitate
electronic information sharing and access are an essential component of
acceptable and reliable public access service and complement content-related standards designed to meet those goals. The office shall:
(a) Establish technical standards to facilitate electronic access
to government information and interoperability of information systems,
including wireless communications systems; and
(b) Require agencies to consider electronic public access needs
when planning new information systems or major upgrades of systems.
In developing these standards, the office is encouraged to include
the state library, state archives, and appropriate representatives of
state and local government.
(4) The office shall perform other matters and things necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

STRATEGIC PLANNING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 (1) The office shall prepare a state
strategic information technology plan which shall establish a statewide
mission, goals, and objectives for the use of information technology,
including goals for electronic access to government records,
information, and services. The plan shall be developed in accordance
with the standards and policies established by the office. The office
shall seek the advice of the board in the development of this plan.
The plan shall be updated as necessary and submitted to the
governor and the legislature.
(2) The office shall prepare a biennial state performance report on
information technology based on agency performance reports required
under section 110 of this act and other information deemed appropriate
by the office. The report shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) An analysis, based upon agency portfolios, of the state's
information technology infrastructure, including its value, condition,
and capacity;
(b) An evaluation of performance relating to information
technology;
(c) An assessment of progress made toward implementing the state
strategic information technology plan, including progress toward
electronic access to public information and enabling citizens to have
two-way access to public records, information, and services; and
(d) An analysis of the success or failure, feasibility, progress,
costs, and timeliness of implementation of major information technology
projects under section 112 of this act. At a minimum, the portion of
the report regarding major technology projects must include:
(i) The total cost data for the entire life-cycle of the project,
including capital and operational costs, broken down by staffing costs,
contracted service, hardware purchase or lease, software purchase or
lease, travel, and training. The original budget must also be shown
for comparison;
(ii) The original proposed project schedule and the final actual
project schedule;
(iii) Data regarding progress towards meeting the original goals
and performance measures of the project;
(iv) Discussion of lessons learned on the project, performance of
any contractors used, and reasons for project delays or cost increases;
and
(v) Identification of benefits generated by major information
technology projects developed under section 112 of this act.
Copies of the report shall be distributed biennially to the
governor and the legislature. The major technology section of the
report must examine major information technology projects completed in
the previous biennium.

PORTFOLIO MANAGEMENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 Management of information technology
across state government requires managing resources and business
processes across multiple agencies. It is no longer sufficient to
pursue efficiencies within agency or individual business process
boundaries. The state must manage the business process changes and
information technology in support of business processes as a statewide
portfolio. The chief information officer will use agency information
technology portfolio planning to build a statewide portfolio to guide
resource allocation and prioritization decisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 109 An agency information technology portfolio
shall serve as the basis for making information technology decisions
and plans including:
(1) System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;
(2) Setting goals and objectives for using information technology;
(3) Assessments of information processing performance, resources,
and capabilities;
(4) Ensuring the appropriate transfer of technological expertise
for the operation of new systems developed using external resources;
and
(5) Progress toward providing electronic access to public
information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 110 (1) Each agency shall develop an
information technology portfolio consistent with RCW 43.105.172 (as
recodified by this act). The superintendent of public instruction
shall develop its portfolio in conjunction with educational service
districts and statewide or regional providers of K-12 education
information technology services.
(2) Agency portfolios shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(a) A baseline assessment of the agency's information technology
resources and capabilities that will serve as the benchmark for
subsequent planning and performance measures;
(b) A statement of the agency's mission, goals, and objectives for
information technology, including goals and objectives for achieving
electronic access to agency records, information, and services;
(c) An explanation of how the agency's mission, goals, and
objectives for information technology support and conform to the state
strategic information technology plan developed under section 107 of
this act;
(d) An implementation strategy to provide electronic access to
public records and information. This implementation strategy must be
assembled to include:
(i) Compliance with Title 40 RCW;
(ii) Adequate public notice and opportunity for comment;
(iii) Consideration of a variety of electronic technologies,
including those that help transcend geographic locations, standard
business hours, economic conditions of users, and disabilities;
(iv) Methods to educate both state employees and the public in the
effective use of access technologies;
(e) Projects and resources required to meet the objectives of the
portfolio; and
(f) Where feasible, estimated schedules and funding required to
implement identified projects.
(3) Portfolios developed under subsection (1) of this section shall
be submitted to the office for review and approval. The chief
information officer may reject, require modification to, or approve
portfolios as deemed appropriate. Portfolios submitted under this
subsection shall be updated and submitted for review and approval as
necessary.
(4) Each agency shall prepare and submit to the office a biennial
performance report that evaluates progress toward the objectives
articulated in its information technology portfolio. The
superintendent of public instruction shall develop its portfolio in
conjunction with educational service districts and statewide or
regional providers of K-12 education information technology services.
The report shall include:
(a) An evaluation of the agency's performance relating to
information technology;
(b) An assessment of progress made toward implementing the agency
information technology portfolio;
(c) Progress toward electronic access to public information and
enabling citizens to have two-way interaction for obtaining information
and services from agencies; and
(d) An inventory of agency information services, equipment, and
proprietary software.
(5) The office shall establish standards, elements, form, and
format for plans and reports developed under this section.
(6) Agency activities to increase electronic access to public
records and information, as required by this section, must be
implemented within available resources and existing agency planning
processes.
(7) The office may exempt any agency from any or all of the
requirements of this section.

BUDGET REVIEW
NEW SECTION. Sec. 111 (1) At the request of the director of
financial management, the office shall evaluate state agency
information technology budget requests, including those proposed by the
superintendent of public instruction, in conjunction with educational
service districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 education
information technology services. The office shall submit
recommendations for funding all or part of such requests to the
director of financial management. The office shall also submit
recommendations regarding consolidation and coordination of similar
proposals or other efficiencies it finds in reviewing proposals.
(2) The office shall establish criteria, consistent with portfolio-based information technology management, for the evaluation of agency
budget requests under this section. These budget requests shall be
made in the context of an agency's information technology portfolio;
technology initiatives underlying budget requests are subject to review
by the office. Criteria shall include, but not be limited to:
Feasibility of the proposed projects, consistency with the state
strategic information technology plan and the state enterprise
architecture, consistency with information technology portfolios,
appropriate provision for public electronic access to information,
evidence of business process streamlining and gathering of business and
technical requirements, and services, costs, and benefits.

PROJECT MANAGEMENT OVERSIGHT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 112 (1) The office shall establish standards
and policies governing the planning, implementation, and evaluation of
major information technology projects, including those proposed by the
superintendent of public instruction, in conjunction with educational
service districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 education
information technology services. The standards and policies shall:
(a) Establish criteria to identify projects which are subject to
this section. Such criteria shall include, but not be limited to,
significant anticipated cost, complexity, or statewide significance of
the project; and
(b) Establish a model process and procedures which state agencies
shall follow in developing and implementing projects within their
information technology portfolios. This process may include project
oversight experts or panels, as appropriate. Agencies may propose, for
approval by the office, a process and procedures unique to the agency.
The office may accept or require modification of such agency proposals
or the office may reject such agency proposals and require use of the
model process and procedures established under this subsection. Any
process and procedures developed under this subsection shall require
(i) distinct and identifiable phases upon which funding may be based,
(ii) user validation of products through system demonstrations and
testing of prototypes and deliverables, and (iii) other elements
identified by the board.
The chief information officer may suspend or terminate a major
project, and direct that the project funds be placed into unallotted
reserve status, if the chief information officer determines that the
project is not meeting or is not expected to meet anticipated
performance standards.
(2) The office of financial management shall establish policies and
standards consistent with portfolio-based information technology
management to govern the funding of projects developed under this
section. The policies and standards shall provide for:
(a) Funding of a project under terms and conditions mutually agreed
to by the chief information officer, the director of financial
management, and the head of the agency proposing the project. However,
the office of financial management may require incremental funding of
a project on a phase-by-phase basis whereby funds for a given phase of
a project may be released only when the office of financial management
determines, with the advice of the office, that the previous phase is
satisfactorily completed; and
(b) Other elements deemed necessary by the office of financial
management.

ENTERPRISE ARCHITECTURE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 113 (1) The office shall develop an
enterprise-based strategy for information technology in state
government informed by portfolio management planning and information
technology expenditure information collected from state agencies
pursuant to RCW 43.88.092.
(2)(a) The office shall develop an ongoing enterprise architecture
program for translating business vision and strategy into effective
enterprise change. This program will create, communicate, and improve
the key principles and models that describe the enterprise's future
state and enable its evolution, in keeping with the priorities of
government and the information technology strategic plan.
(b) The enterprise architecture program will facilitate business
process specific collaboration subject matter experts from agencies
statewide; improving the reliability, interoperability, and
sustainability of the business processes that state agencies use.
In developing an enterprise-based strategy for the state, the
office is encouraged to consider the following strategies as possible
opportunities for achieving greater efficiency:
(i) Developing evaluation criteria for deciding which common
enterprise-wide business processes should become managed as enterprise
systems;
(ii) Developing a roadmap of priorities for creating enterprise
systems;
(iii) Developing decision criteria for determining implementation
criteria for centralized or decentralized enterprise systems;
(iv) Developing evaluation criteria for deciding which technology
investments to continue, hold, or drop; and
(v) Performing such other duties as may be assigned by the office
to promote effective enterprise change.
(c) The program will establish performance measurement criteria for
each of its initiatives; will measure the success of those initiatives;
and will assess its quarterly results with the chief information
officer to determine whether to continue, revise, or disband the
initiative.

ADVISORY BOARD--CREATION AND DUTIES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 114 (1) The information technology advisory
board is created within the office of chief information officer. The
board shall be composed of nine members appointed by the governor. The
board members shall consist of:
(a) The chief information officer, who shall serve as the board
chair;
(b) No more than four members who are representatives of state
agencies, at least one of whom must have direct experience using the
software projects overseen by the office or reasonably expects to use
the new software developed under the oversight of the office; and
(c) At least four members who are representatives of the private
sector.
(2)(a) Members shall serve three-year terms. Members may not serve
more than two consecutive terms.
(b) Of the initial members, two must be appointed for a one-year
term, three must be appointed for a two-year term, and three must be
appointed for a three-year term. Thereafter, members must be appointed
for three-year terms.
(c) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner that the original
appointments were made for the remainder of the member's term.
(3) Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(4) The office shall provide staff support to the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 115 The board shall advise the chief
information officer on information technology related matters and:
(1) Review policies and standards brought by the chief information
officer or requested by a board member, receive comments from agency
executives on the implications of proposed policies and standards, and
provide recommendations to the chief information officer;
(2) Provide a forum to solicit external expertise and perspective
on developments in information technology, enterprise architecture,
standards, and policy development; and
(3) Provide a forum where ideas and issues related to information
technology plans, policies, and standards can be reviewed.

INTEROPERABILITY COMMITTEE--TRANSFER FROM DEPARTMENT OF
INFORMATION SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 116 (1) The chief information officer shall
appoint a state interoperability executive committee, the membership of
which must include, but not be limited to, representatives of the
military department, the Washington state patrol, the department of
transportation, the department of information services, the department
of natural resources, city and county governments, state and local fire
chiefs, police chiefs, and sheriffs, and state and local emergency
management directors. The chair and legislative members of the board
will serve as nonvoting ex officio members of the committee. Voting
membership may not exceed fifteen members.
(2) The chief information officer shall appoint the chair of the
committee from among the voting members of the committee.
(3) The state interoperability executive committee has the
following responsibilities:
(a) Develop policies and make recommendations to the office for
technical standards for state wireless radio communications systems,
including emergency communications systems. The standards must
address, among other things, the interoperability of systems, taking
into account both existing and future systems and technologies;
(b) Coordinate and manage on behalf of the board the licensing and
use of state-designated and state-licensed radio frequencies, including
the spectrum used for public safety and emergency communications, and
serve as the point of contact with the federal communications
commission on matters relating to allocation, use, and licensing of
radio spectrum;
(c) Coordinate the purchasing of all state wireless radio
communications system equipment to ensure that:
(i) After the transition from a radio over internet protocol
network, any new trunked system shall be, at a minimum, project-25;
(ii) Any new system that requires advanced digital features shall
be, at a minimum, project-25; and
(iii) Any new system or equipment purchases shall be, at a minimum,
upgradeable to project-25;
(d) Seek support, including possible federal or other funding, for
state-sponsored wireless communications systems;
(e) Develop recommendations for legislation that may be required to
promote interoperability of state wireless communications systems;
(f) Foster cooperation and coordination among public safety and
emergency response organizations;
(g) Work with wireless communications groups and associations to
ensure interoperability among all public safety and emergency response
wireless communications systems; and
(h) Perform such other duties as may be assigned by the office to
promote interoperability of wireless communications systems.
(4) The office shall provide administrative support to the
committee.

K-20 GOVERNANCE AND OPERATIONS OVERSIGHT--TRANSFER FROM
DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION SERVICES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 117 (1) The office has the duty to govern,
operate, and oversee the technical design, implementation, and
operation of the K-20 network including, but not limited to, the
following duties: Establishment and implementation of K-20 network
technical policy, including technical standards and conditions of use;
review and approval of network design; procurement of shared network
services and equipment; and resolving user/provider disputes concerning
technical matters.
(2) The office has the following powers and duties:
(a) In cooperation with the educational sectors and other
interested parties, to establish goals and measurable objectives for
the network;
(b) To ensure that the goals and measurable objectives of the
network are the basis for any decisions or recommendations regarding
the technical development and operation of the network;
(c) To adopt, modify, and implement policies to facilitate network
development, operation, and expansion. Such policies may include but
need not be limited to the following issues: Quality of educational
services; access to the network by recognized organizations and
accredited institutions that deliver educational programming, including
public libraries; prioritization of programming within limited
resources; prioritization of access to the system and the sharing of
technological advances; network security; identification and evaluation
of emerging technologies for delivery of educational programs; future
expansion or redirection of the system; network fee structures; and
costs for the development and operation of the network;
(d) To prepare and submit to the governor and the legislature a
coordinated budget for network development, operation, and expansion.
The budget shall include the chief information officer's
recommendations on (i) any state funding requested for network
transport and equipment, distance education facilities and hardware or
software specific to the use of the network, and proposed new network
end sites, (ii) annual copayments to be charged to public educational
sector institutions and other public entities connected to the network,
and (iii) charges to nongovernmental entities connected to the network;
(e) To adopt and monitor the implementation of a methodology to
evaluate the effectiveness of the network in achieving the educational
goals and measurable objectives;
(f) To establish by rule acceptable use policies governing user
eligibility for participation in the K-20 network, acceptable uses of
network resources, and procedures for enforcement of such policies.
The office shall set forth appropriate procedures for enforcement of
acceptable use policies, that may include suspension of network
connections and removal of shared equipment for violations of network
conditions or policies. The office shall have sole responsibility for
the implementation of enforcement procedures relating to technical
conditions of use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 118 The office shall maintain, in consultation
with the K-20 network users and the board, the K-20 operations
cooperative, which shall be responsible for day-to-day network
management, technical network status monitoring, technical problem
response coordination, and other duties as agreed to by the department
of information services, the educational sectors, and the information
services board. Funding for the K-20 operations cooperative shall be
provided from the education technology revolving fund under RCW
43.105.835 (as recodified by this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 119 The chief information officer shall
delegate the maintenance of the technical plan of the K-20
telecommunications system and ongoing system enhancements to the
department of information services. The office shall ensure that the
technical plan adheres to the goals and objectives established under
section 106 of this act. The technical plan shall provide for:
(1) A telecommunications backbone connecting educational service
districts, the main campuses of public baccalaureate institutions, the
branch campuses of public research institutions, and the main campuses
of community colleges and technical colleges.
(2)(a) Connection to the K-20 network by entities that include, but
need not be limited to: School districts, public higher education off-campus and extension centers, and branch campuses of community colleges
and technical colleges, as prioritized by the chief information
officer; (b) distance education facilities and components for entities
listed in this subsection and subsection (1) of this section; and (c)
connection for independent nonprofit institutions of higher education,
provided that:
(i) The chief information officer and each independent nonprofit
institution of higher education to be connected agree in writing to
terms and conditions of connectivity. The terms and conditions shall
ensure, among other things, that the provision of K-20 services does
not violate Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution and that
the institution shall adhere to K-20 network policies; and
(ii) The chief information officer determines that inclusion of the
independent nonprofit institutions of higher education will not
significantly affect the network's eligibility for federal universal
service fund discounts or subsidies.
(3) Subsequent phases may include, but need not be limited to,
connections to public libraries, state and local governments, community
resource centers, and the private sector.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 120 (1) In overseeing the technical aspects of
the K-20 network, the office is not intended to duplicate the statutory
responsibilities of the higher education coordinating board, the
superintendent of public instruction, the state librarian, or the
governing boards of the institutions of higher education.
(2) The office may not interfere in any curriculum or legally
offered programming offered over the K-20 network.
(3) The responsibility to review and approve standards and common
specifications for the K-20 network remains the responsibility of the
office under section 106 of this act.
(4) The coordination of telecommunications planning for the common
schools remains the responsibility of the superintendent of public
instruction. Except as set forth in section 106(2)(e) of this act, the
office may recommend, but not require, revisions to the
superintendent's telecommunications plans.

Sec. 121 RCW 43.105.835 and 2004 c 276 s 910 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The education technology revolving fund is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from billings under
subsection (2) of this section must be deposited in the revolving fund.
Only the ((director of the department of information services or the
director's designee)) chief information officer or the chief
information officer's designee may authorize expenditures from the
fund. The revolving fund shall be used to pay for K-20 network
operations, transport, equipment, software, supplies, and services,
maintenance and depreciation of on-site data, and shared
infrastructure, and other costs incidental to the development,
operation, and administration of shared educational information
technology services, telecommunications, and systems. The revolving
fund shall not be used for the acquisition, maintenance, or operations
of local telecommunications infrastructure or the maintenance or
depreciation of on-premises video equipment specific to a particular
institution or group of institutions.
(2) The revolving fund and all disbursements from the revolving
fund are subject to the allotment procedure under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but an appropriation is not required for expenditures. The
((department of information services)) office shall, ((in consultation
with entities connected to the network under RCW 43.105.820 and))
subject to the review and approval of the office of financial
management, establish and implement a billing structure for network
services identified in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The ((department)) office shall charge those public entities
connected to the K-20 ((telecommunications [telecommunication system]
under RCW 43.105.820)) telecommunications system under section 119 of
this act an annual copayment per unit of transport connection as
determined by the legislature after consideration of the ((K-20))
board's recommendations. This copayment shall be deposited into the
revolving fund to be used for the purposes in subsection (1) of this
section. It is the intent of the legislature to appropriate to the
revolving fund such moneys as necessary to cover the costs for
transport, maintenance, and depreciation of data equipment located at
the individual public institutions, maintenance and depreciation of the
K-20 network backbone, and services provided to the network under ((RCW
43.105.815.
(4) During the 2003-05 biennium, the legislature may transfer
moneys from the education technology revolving fund to the state
general fund and the data processing revolving fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the account)) section 119 of this
act.

GENERAL PROVISIONS RELATED TO OFFICE OF CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER
NEW SECTION. Sec. 122 A new section is added to chapter 41.06
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions
of this chapter do not apply in the office of the chief information
officer to the chief information officer, the chief information
officer's confidential secretary, assistant directors, and any other
exempt staff members provided for in section 104 of this act.

Sec. 123 RCW 42.17A.705 and 2010 c 204 s 902 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17A.700, "executive state officer"
includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the director of the department of services for the blind,
the chief information officer of the office of the chief information
officer, the director of the state system of community and technical
colleges, the director of commerce, the secretary of corrections, the
director of early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner
of employment security, the chair of the energy facility site
evaluation council, the secretary of the state finance committee, the
director of financial management, the director of fish and wildlife,
the executive secretary of the forest practices appeals board, the
director of the gambling commission, the director of general
administration, the secretary of health, the administrator of the
Washington state health care authority, the executive secretary of the
health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of the higher
education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse
racing commission, the executive secretary of the human rights
commission, the executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence
review board, the director of the department of information services,
the executive director of the state investment board, the director of
labor and industries, the director of licensing, the director of the
lottery commission, the director of the office of minority and women's
business enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the
director of personnel, the executive director of the public disclosure
commission, the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership, the
director of the recreation and conservation office, the director of
retirement systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social
and health services, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the
executive secretary of the board of tax appeals, the secretary of
transportation, the secretary of the utilities and transportation
commission, the director of veterans affairs, the president of each of
the regional and state universities and the president of The Evergreen
State College, and each district and each campus president of each
state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, Eastern Washington
University board of trustees, Washington economic development finance
authority, Washington energy northwest executive board, The Evergreen
State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, fish and
wildlife commission, forest practices appeals board, forest practices
board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities
authority, higher education coordinating board, higher education
facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance
commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review
board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information services
board, state investment board, commission on judicial conduct,
legislative ethics board, life sciences discovery fund authority board
of trustees, liquor control board, lottery commission, Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and
recreation commission, Washington personnel resources board, board of
pilotage commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public
disclosure commission, public employees' benefits board, recreation and
conservation funding board, salmon recovery funding board, shorelines
hearings board, board of tax appeals, transportation commission,
University of Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation
commission, Washington State University board of regents, and Western
Washington University board of trustees.

Sec. 124 RCW 42.17.2401 and 2009 c 565 s 24 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state
officer" includes:
(1) The chief administrative law judge, the director of
agriculture, the administrator of the Washington basic health plan, the
director of the department of services for the blind, the chief
information officer of the office of the chief information officer, the
director of the state system of community and technical colleges, the
director of commerce, the secretary of corrections, the director of
early learning, the director of ecology, the commissioner of employment
security, the chair of the energy facility site evaluation council, the
secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial
management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary
of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling
commission, the director of general administration, the secretary of
health, the administrator of the Washington state health care
authority, the executive secretary of the health care facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the higher education facilities
authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing commission, the
executive secretary of the human rights commission, the executive
secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of
the department of information services, the executive director of the
state investment board, the director of labor and industries, the
director of licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the
director of the office of minority and women's business enterprises,
the director of parks and recreation, the director of personnel, the
executive director of the public disclosure commission, the executive
director of the Puget Sound partnership, the director of the recreation
and conservation office, the director of retirement systems, the
director of revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the
chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the
board of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of
the utilities and transportation commission, the director of veterans
affairs, the president of each of the regional and state universities
and the president of The Evergreen State College, and each district and
each campus president of each state community college;
(2) Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;
(3) Each professional staff member of the legislature; and
(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, the boards of
trustees of each community college and each technical college, each
member of the state board for community and technical colleges, state
convention and trade center board of directors, committee for deferred
compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees,
Washington economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State
College board of trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices
appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission, life
sciences discovery fund authority board of trustees, Washington health
care facilities authority, each member of the Washington health
services commission, higher education coordinating board, higher
education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing
finance commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence
review board, board of industrial insurance appeals, information
services board, recreation and conservation funding board, state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics
board, liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight
board, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure
commission, public pension commission, shorelines hearings board,
public employees' benefits board, salmon recovery funding board, board
of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of Washington
board of regents, utilities and transportation commission, Washington
state maritime commission, Washington personnel resources board,
Washington public power supply system executive board, Washington State
University board of regents, Western Washington University board of
trustees, and fish and wildlife commission.

Sec. 125 RCW 43.105.290 and 1996 c 171 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
The state library, with the assistance of the ((department of
information services)) office and the state archives, shall establish
a pilot project to design and test an electronic information locator
system, allowing members of the public to locate and access electronic
public records. In designing the system, the following factors shall
be considered: (1) Ease of operation by citizens; (2) access through
multiple technologies, such as direct dial and toll-free numbers,
kiosks, and the internet; (3) compatibility with private online
services; and (4) capability of expanding the electronic public records
included in the system. The pilot project may restrict the type and
quality of electronic public records that are included in the system to
test the feasibility of making electronic public records and
information widely available to the public.

PART II
CREATING THE CONSOLIDATED TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AGENCY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 43.105
RCW to read as follows:
To achieve maximum benefit from advances in information technology
the state establishes a centralized provider and procurer of certain
information technology services agency to support the needs of state
agencies. This agency shall be known as the consolidated technology
services agency. To ensure maximum benefit to the state, state
agencies shall rely on the consolidated technology services agency for
those services with a business case of broad use, uniformity,
scalability, and price sensitivity to aggregation and volume.
To successfully meet agency needs and meet its obligation as the
primary service provider for these services, the consolidated
technology services agency must offer high quality services at the
lowest possible price. It must be able to attract an adaptable and
competitive workforce, be authorized to procure services where the
business case justifies it, and be accountable to its customers for the
efficient and effective delivery of critical business services.
The consolidated technology services agency is established as an
agency in state government. The agency is established with clear
accountability to the agencies it serves and to the public. This
accountability will come through enhanced transparency in the agency's
operation and performance. The agency is also established with broad
flexibility to adapt its operations and service catalog to address the
needs of customer agencies, and to do so in the most cost-effective
ways.

Sec. 202 RCW 43.105.020 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 64 are each
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) (("Administrator" means the community technology opportunity
program administrator designated by the department.
(2) "Backbone network" means the shared high-density portions of
the state's telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes
specially conditioned high-speed communications carrier lines,
multiplexors, switches associated with such communications lines, and
any equipment and software components necessary for management and
control of the backbone network.
(3) "Board" means the information services board.
(4) "Broadband" means a high-speed, high capacity transmission
medium, using land-based, satellite, wireless, or any other mechanism,
that can carry either signals or transmit data, or both, over long
distances by using a wide range of frequencies.
(5) "Committee" means the state interoperability executive
committee.
(6) "Common vendor registration and bid notification system" has
the definition in RCW 39.29.006.
(7) "Community technology programs" means programs that are engaged
in diffusing information and communications technology in local
communities, particularly in unserved and underserved areas of the
state. These programs may include, but are not limited to, programs
that provide education and skill-building opportunities, hardware and
software, internet connectivity, digital media literacy, development of
locally relevant content, and delivery of vital services through
technology.
(8) "Council" means the advisory council on digital inclusion
created in RCW 43.105.400.
(9) "Department" means the department of information services.
(10))) "Agency" means the consolidated technology services agency.
(2) "Board" means the consolidated technology services board.
(3) "Customer agencies" means all entities that purchase services
from the consolidated technology services agency.
(4) "Director" means the director of the ((department))
consolidated technology services agency.
(((11) "Educational sectors" means those institutions of higher
education, school districts, and educational service districts that use
the network for distance education, data transmission, and other uses
permitted by the K-20 board.
(12))) (5) "Equipment" means the machines, devices, and
transmission facilities used in information processing, ((such as))
including but not limited to computers, ((word processors,)) terminals,
telephones, wireless communications system facilities, cables, and any
physical facility necessary for the operation of such equipment.
(((13) "High-speed internet" means broadband.
(14) "Information" includes, but is not limited to, data, text,
voice, and video.
(15) "Information processing" means the electronic capture,
collection, storage, manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and
presentation of information in the form of data, text, voice, or image
and includes telecommunications and office automation functions.
(16) "Information services" means data processing,
telecommunications, office automation, and computerized information
systems.
(17))) "Enterprise architecture" means an ongoing program for
translating business vision and strategy into effective enterprise
change. It is a continuous activity. Enterprise architecture creates,
communicates, and improves the key principles and models that describe
the enterprise's future state and enable its evolution. The intent of
enterprise architecture is to provide guidance to projects that will
improve the reliability, interoperability, and sustainability of the
information, services, and business processes that Washington
government uses, assisted where appropriate by common and standardized
technologies.
(7) "Information technology" includes, but is not limited to, all
electronic technology systems and services, automated information
handling, system design and analysis, conversion of data, computer
programming, information storage and retrieval, telecommunications,
requisite system controls, simulation, electronic commerce, and all
related interactions between people and machines.
(8) "Information technology portfolio" or "portfolio" means a
strategic management process documenting relationships between agency
missions and information technology and telecommunications investments.
(((18) "K-20 network" means the network established in RCW
43.105.820.
(19))) (9) "Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi
municipal corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of
such corporations and subdivisions authorized to contract separately.
(((20))) (10) "Oversight" means a process of comprehensive risk
analysis and management designed to ensure optimum use of information
technology resources and telecommunications.
(((21))) (11) "Proprietary software" means that software offered
for sale or license.
(((22) "Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions. This term
includes, but is not limited to, services acquired for equipment
maintenance and repair, operation of a physical plant, security,
computer hardware and software installation and maintenance,
telecommunications installation and maintenance, data entry, keypunch
services, programming services, and computer time-sharing.
(23) "Small business" has the definition in RCW 39.29.006.
(24) "Telecommunications" means the transmission of information by
wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other means.
(25) "Video telecommunications" means the electronic
interconnection of two or more sites for the purpose of transmitting
and/or receiving visual and associated audio information. Video
telecommunications shall not include existing public television
broadcast stations as currently designated by the department of
commerce under chapter 43.330 RCW.)) (12) "Telecommunications"
includes, but is not limited to, wireless or wired systems for
transport of voice, video, and data communications, network systems,
requisite facilities, equipment, system controls, simulation,
electronic commerce, and all related interactions between people and
machines. "Telecommunications" does not include public safety
communications.

Sec. 203 RCW 43.105.047 and 1999 c 80 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
There is created the ((department of information services))
consolidated technology services agency, an agency of state government.
The ((department)) agency shall be headed by a director appointed by
the governor with the consent of the senate. The director shall serve
at the governor's pleasure and shall receive such salary as determined
by the governor. The director shall:
(1) Appoint a confidential secretary and such deputy and assistant
directors as needed to administer the ((department)) agency; and
(2) ((Maintain and fund a strategic planning and policy component
separate from the services component of the department;
(3) Appoint, after consulting with the board, the assistant or
deputy director for the planning component;
(4))) Appoint such professional, technical, and clerical assistants
and employees as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed by this
chapter((;
(5) Report to the governor and the board any matters relating to
abuses and evasions of this chapter; and
(6) Recommend statutory changes to the governor and the board)).

Sec. 204 RCW 43.105.052 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 16 are each
amended to read as follows:
The ((department)) agency shall:
(1) ((Perform all duties and responsibilities the board delegates
to the department, including but not limited to:
(a) The review of agency information technology portfolios and
related requests; and
(b) Implementation of statewide and interagency policies,
standards, and guidelines;
(2))) Make available information services to state agencies and
local governments and public benefit nonprofit corporations ((on a full
cost-recovery basis)). For the purposes of this section "public
benefit nonprofit corporation" means a public benefit nonprofit
corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.005 that is receiving local, state,
or federal funds either directly or through a public agency other than
an Indian tribe or political subdivision of another state((. These
services may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Telecommunications services for voice, data, and video;
(b) Mainframe computing services;
(c) Support for departmental and microcomputer evaluation,
installation, and use;
(d) Equipment acquisition assistance, including leasing, brokering,
and establishing master contracts;
(e) Facilities management services for information technology
equipment, equipment repair, and maintenance service;
(f) Negotiation with local cable companies and local governments to
provide for connection to local cable services to allow for access to
these public and educational channels in the state;
(g) Office automation services;
(h) System development services; and
(i) Training.
These services are for discretionary use by customers and customers
may elect other alternatives for service if those alternatives are more
cost-effective or provide better service. Agencies may be required to
use the backbone network portions of the telecommunications services
during an initial start-up period not to exceed three years));
(((3))) (2) Establish rates and fees for services provided by the
((department to assure that the services component of the department is
self-supporting)) agency. A billing rate plan shall be developed for
a two-year period to coincide with the budgeting process. The rate
plan shall be subject to review at least annually by the office of
financial management. The rate plan shall show the proposed rates by
each cost center and will show the components of the rate structure as
mutually determined by the ((department)) agency and the office of
financial management. ((The same rate structure will apply to all user
agencies of each cost center.)) The rate plan and any adjustments to
rates shall be approved by the office of financial management((. The
services component shall not subsidize the operations of the strategic
planning and policy component));
(((4))) (3) With the advice of the ((information services)) board
and customer agencies, develop a state strategic information technology
plan and performance reports as required under ((RCW 43.105.160))
section 107 of this act;
(((5))) (4) Develop plans for the ((department's)) agency's
achievement of statewide goals and objectives set forth in the state
strategic information technology plan required under ((RCW 43.105.160.
These plans shall address such services as telecommunications, central
and distributed computing, local area networks, office automation, and
end user computing. The department shall seek the advice of the board
in the development of these plans;
(6) Under direction of the information services board and in
collaboration with the department of personnel, and other agencies as
may be appropriate, develop training plans and coordinate training
programs that are responsive to the needs of agencies;
(7) Identify opportunities for the effective use of information
services and coordinate appropriate responses to those opportunities;
(8) Assess agencies' projects, acquisitions, plans, information
technology portfolios, or overall information processing performance as
requested by the board, agencies, the director of financial management,
or the legislature. Agencies may be required to reimburse the
department for agency-requested reviews)) section 107 of this act;
(((9) Develop planning, budgeting, and expenditure reporting
requirements, in conjunction with the office of financial management,
for agencies to follow;
(10) Assist the office of financial management with budgetary and
policy review of agency plans for information services;
(11) Provide staff support from the strategic planning and policy
component to the board for:
(a) Meeting preparation, notices, and minutes;
(b) Promulgation of policies, standards, and guidelines adopted by
the board;
(c) Supervision of studies and reports requested by the board;
(d) Conducting reviews and assessments as directed by the board;
(12) Be the lead agency in coordinating video telecommunications
services for all state agencies and develop, pursuant to board
policies, standards and common specifications for leased and purchased
telecommunications equipment. The department shall not evaluate the
merits of school curriculum, higher education course offerings, or
other education and training programs proposed for transmission and/or
reception using video telecommunications resources. Nothing in this
section shall abrogate or abridge the legal responsibilities of
licensees of telecommunications facilities as licensed by the federal
communication commission on March 27, 1990;)) and
(((13))) (5) Perform all other matters and things necessary to
carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 A new section is added to chapter 43.105
RCW to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the consolidated technology services
board. The board shall be composed of seven members appointed by the
governor. The board members shall consist of customer representatives
either in the position of chief executive officer, chief financial
officer, or chief information officer.
(2)(a) Members shall serve three-year terms. Members may not serve
more than two consecutive terms.
(b) Of the initial members, two must be appointed for a one-year
term, two must be appointed for a two-year term, and three must be
appointed for a three-year term. Thereafter, members must be appointed
for three-year terms.
(c) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner that the original
appointments were made for the remainder of the member's term.
(3) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206 A new section is added to chapter 43.105
RCW to read as follows:
The board has the following powers and duties:
(1) Approve rates for services offered by the agency;
(2) Approve the budget proposal to the office of financial
management for the agency;
(3) Approve the catalog of services to be provided or procured for
client agencies;
(4) Prepare and submit an annual performance evaluation of the
director to the governor;
(5) Prepare and submit a performance assessment of the agency to
the governor annually; and
(6) Advise the director on operational issues and plans brought
before the board by the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207 A new section is added to chapter 43.105
RCW to read as follows:
The director in consultation with the board shall set performance
targets and approve plans for achieving measurable and specific goals
for the agency. By January 2012, the appropriate organizational
performance and accountability measures and performance targets shall
be submitted to the governor. These measures and targets shall include
measures of performance demonstrating specific and measurable
improvements related to service delivery and costs, operational
efficiencies, and overall customer satisfaction. The agency shall
develop a dashboard of key performance measures that will be updated
quarterly and made available on the agency public web site.
The director shall report to the governor on agency performance at
least quarterly. The reports shall be included on the agency's web
site and accessible to the public.

Sec. 208 RCW 43.105.057 and 1992 c 20 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((department of information services and the information
services board, respectively,)) agency shall adopt rules as necessary
under chapter 34.05 RCW to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Sec. 209 RCW 43.105.060 and 1987 c 504 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
State and local government agencies are authorized to enter into
any contracts with the ((department or its successor)) agency which may
be necessary or desirable to effectuate the purposes and policies of
this chapter or for maximum utilization of facilities and services
which are the subject of this chapter.

Sec. 210 RCW 39.29.040 and 2002 c 260 s 11 and 2002 c 200 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
This chapter does not apply to:
(1) Contracts specifying a fee of less than five thousand dollars
if the total of the contracts from that agency with the contractor
within a fiscal year does not exceed five thousand dollars;
(2) Contracts awarded to companies that furnish a service where the
tariff is established by the utilities and transportation commission or
other public entity;
(3) Intergovernmental agreements awarded to any governmental
entity, whether federal, state, or local and any department, division,
or subdivision thereof;
(4) Contracts awarded for services to be performed for a standard
fee, when the standard fee is established by the contracting agency or
any other governmental entity and a like contract is available to all
qualified applicants;
(5) Contracts for services that are necessary to the conduct of
collaborative research if prior approval is granted by the funding
source;
(6) Contracts for client services except as otherwise indicated in
this chapter;
(7) Contracts for architectural and engineering services as defined
in RCW 39.80.020, which shall be entered into under chapter 39.80 RCW;
(8) Contracts for the employment of expert witnesses for the
purposes of litigation;
(9) Contracts for bank supervision authorized under RCW 30.38.040;
((and))
(10) Contracts for interpreter services and interpreter brokerage
services on behalf of limited-English speaking or sensory-impaired
applicants and recipients of public assistance; and
(11) Contracts awarded by the consolidated technology services
agency.

PART III
TRANSFERS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 Collective bargaining agreements
negotiated under this chapter shall not be effective prior to July 1,
2012. Any collective bargaining agreement entered into before July 1,
2012, shall not have any terms extending beyond June 30, 2012, for
employees affected by this chapter. The duration of any collective
bargaining agreement under this chapter shall not exceed one fiscal
biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter.
(1) "Agency" means the consolidated technology services agency as
defined in chapter 43.105 RCW.
(2) "Collective bargaining" means the performance of the mutual
obligation of the representatives of the employer and the exclusive
bargaining representative to meet at reasonable times and to bargain in
good faith in an effort to reach agreement with respect to the subjects
of bargaining specified under section 304 of this act. The obligation
to bargain does not compel either party to agree to a proposal or to
make a concession, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.
(3) "Commission" means the public employment relations commission.
(4) "Confidential employee" means an employee who, in the regular
course of his or her duties, assists in a confidential capacity persons
who formulate, determine, and effectuate management policies with
regard to labor relations or who, in the regular course of his or her
duties, has authorized access to information relating to the
effectuation or review of the employer's collective bargaining
policies, or who assists or aids a manager.
(5) "Director" means the director of the public employment
relations commission.
(6) "Employee" means any employee of the consolidated technology
services agency, including employees whose work has ceased in
connection with the pursuit of lawful activities protected by this
chapter, except:
(a) Confidential employees;
(b) Managers as defined in subsection (11) of this section; or
(c) Internal auditors in the agency.
(7) "Employee organization" means any organization, union, or
association in which employees participate and that exists for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining with employers.
(8) "Employer" means the state of Washington.
(9) "Exclusive bargaining representative" means any employee
organization that has been certified under this chapter as the
representative of the employees in an appropriate bargaining unit.
(10) "Labor dispute" means any controversy concerning terms,
tenure, or conditions of employment, or concerning the association or
representation of persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining,
changing, or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of employment with
respect to the subjects of bargaining provided in this chapter,
regardless of whether the disputants stand in the proximate relation of
employer and employee.
(11) "Manager" means any employee who:
(a) Formulates statewide policy or directs the work of the agency
or agency subdivision;
(b) Is responsible to administer one or more statewide policies or
programs of the agency or agency subdivision;
(c) Manages, administers, and controls a local branch office of the
agency or agency subdivision, including the physical, financial, or
personnel resources;
(d) Has substantial responsibility in personnel administration,
legislative relations, public information, or the preparation and
administration of budgets; or
(e) Functionally is above the first level of supervision and
exercises authority that is not merely routine or clerical in nature
and requires the consistent use of independent judgment.
(12) "Supervisor" means an employee who has authority, in the
interest of the employer, to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall,
promote, discharge, direct, reward, or discipline employees, or to
adjust employee grievances, or effectively to recommend such action, if
the exercise of the authority is not of a merely routine nature but
requires the consistent exercise of individual judgment. However, no
employee who is a manager as defined in subsection (11) of this section
may be included in a collective bargaining unit established under this
chapter.
(13) "Unfair labor practice" means any unfair labor practice listed
in section 313 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 (1) For the purpose of negotiating
collective bargaining agreements under this chapter, the employer shall
be represented by the governor or governor's designee.
(2) If an exclusive bargaining representative represents more than
one bargaining unit, the exclusive bargaining representative shall
negotiate one master collective bargaining agreement on behalf of all
the employees in bargaining units that the exclusive bargaining
representative represents.
(3) The governor shall submit a request for funds necessary to
implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions in the master
collective bargaining agreement or for legislation necessary to
implement the agreement. Requests for funds necessary to implement the
provisions of bargaining agreements shall not be submitted to the
legislature by the governor unless such requests:
(a) Have been submitted to the director of financial management by
October 1st prior to the legislative session at which the requests are
to be considered; and
(b) Have been certified by the director of financial management as
being feasible financially for the state.
The legislature shall approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. The legislature shall not consider a
request for funds to implement a collective bargaining agreement unless
the request is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's
budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060. If the
legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, either party may
reopen all or part of the agreement or the exclusive bargaining
representative may seek to implement the procedures provided for in
section 311 of this act.
(4) The governor shall periodically consult with the joint
committee on employment relations pursuant to RCW 41.80.010(5)
regarding appropriations necessary to implement the compensation and
fringe benefit provisions in the master collective bargaining
agreements, and upon completion of negotiations, advise the committee
on the elements of the agreements and on any legislation necessary to
implement the agreements.
(5) If, after the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of an
agreement are approved by the legislature, a significant revenue
shortfall occurs resulting in reduced appropriations, as declared by
proclamation of the governor or by resolution of the legislature, both
parties shall immediately enter into collective bargaining for a
mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement.
(6) After the expiration date of a collective bargaining agreement
negotiated under this chapter, all of the terms and conditions
specified in the collective bargaining agreement remain in effect until
the effective date of a subsequently negotiated agreement, not to
exceed one year from the expiration date stated in the agreement.
Thereafter, the employer may unilaterally implement its last, best
offer.
(7) For collective bargaining agreements negotiated for the period
of July 1, 2012, through June 30, 2013, the governor shall submit a
request for funds necessary to implement the compensation and fringe
benefit provisions in the collective bargaining agreement or for
legislation necessary to implement the agreement. Requests for funds
necessary to implement the provisions of bargaining agreements shall
not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless such
requests:
(a) Have been submitted to the director of financial management by
January 15, 2012; and
(b) Have been certified by the director of financial management as
being feasible financially for the state.
The legislature shall approve or reject the submission of the
request for funds as a whole. If the legislature rejects or fails to
act on the submission, either party may reopen all or part of the
agreement or the exclusive bargaining representative may seek to
implement the procedures provided for in section 311 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this
chapter, the matters subject to bargaining include wages, hours, and
other terms and conditions of employment.
(2) The employer is not required to bargain over matters pertaining
to health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits, except as
required in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The employer and one coalition of all the exclusive bargaining
representatives subject to this chapter and chapters 41.80 and 47.64
RCW shall conduct negotiations regarding the dollar amount expended on
behalf of each employee for health care benefits.
(4) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not bargain over or agree to any proposal that would:
(a) Prevent the implementation of approved affirmative action
plans;
(b) Limit the ability of the employer from using a performance-based system in adjusting wages, conducting and implementing layoffs,
and hiring and promotion procedures; or
(c) Interfere with or alter the employer's sole discretion to
determine what level of discipline to impose for any employee.
(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not bargain over matters pertaining to management rights established in
section 306 of this act, the performance-based evaluation system, and
the decision and impacts of contracts authorized by section 316 of this
act.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict
exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency
policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment
and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter,
the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a
statute is invalid and unenforceable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 (1) The parties to a collective bargaining
agreement shall reduce the agreement to writing.
(2) A collective bargaining agreement shall contain provisions
that:
(a) Provide for a grievance procedure that culminates with final
and binding arbitration of all disputes arising over the interpretation
or application of the collective bargaining agreement and that is valid
and enforceable under its terms when entered into in accordance with
this chapter;
(b) Prohibit consideration or review of the level of discipline in
the grievance procedure and at binding arbitration;
(c) Prohibit grievances on the performance-based evaluation system,
including adjusting wages and salary increases, conducting and
implementing layoffs, and hiring and promotion procedures; and
(d) Require processing of disciplinary actions or terminations of
employment of employees covered by the collective bargaining agreement
entirely under the procedures of the collective bargaining agreement.
Any employee, when fully reinstated, shall be guaranteed all employee
rights and benefits, including back pay, sick leave, vacation accrual,
and retirement and federal old age, survivors, and disability insurance
act credits, but without back pay for any period of suspension.
(3) If collective bargaining between an employer and an exclusive
bargaining representative is concluded after the termination date of
the previous collective bargaining agreement between the employer and
an employee organization representing the same bargaining units, the
effective date of the new collective bargaining agreement may be the
day after the termination of the previous collective bargaining
agreement, subject to the parties' agreement, and all benefits included
in the new collective bargaining agreement, including wage or salary
increases, may accrue beginning with that effective date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 The employer shall not bargain over rights
of management which, in addition to all powers, duties, and rights
established by constitutional provision or statute, shall include but
not be limited to the following:
(1) The functions and programs of the employer, the use of
technology, and the structure of the organization;
(2) The employer's budget and the size of the agency workforce,
including determining the basis for layoffs;
(3) The right to direct and supervise employees;
(4) The right to take whatever actions are deemed necessary to
carry out the mission of the state and its agencies during emergencies;
(5) The right of the employer to use a performance-based system in
adjusting wages, conducting and implementing layoffs, and hiring and
promotion procedures; and
(6) Retirement plans and retirement benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 Except as may be specifically limited by
this chapter, employees shall have the right to self-organization, to
form, join, or assist employee organizations, and to bargain
collectively through representatives of their own choosing for the
purpose of collective bargaining free from interference, restraint, or
coercion. Employees shall also have the right to refrain from any or
all such activities except to the extent that they may be required to
pay a fee to an exclusive bargaining representative under a union
security provision authorized by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 Nothing contained in this chapter permits
or grants to any employee the right to strike or refuse to perform his
or her official duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 (1) A bargaining unit of employees covered
by this chapter existing on July 1, 2012, shall be considered an
appropriate unit at the agency, unless the unit does not meet the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section. The commission, after
hearing upon reasonable notice to all interested parties, shall decide,
in each application for certification as an exclusive bargaining
representative, the unit appropriate for certification. In determining
the new units or modifications of existing units, the commission shall
consider: The duties, skills, and working conditions of the employees;
the history of collective bargaining; the extent of organization among
the employees; the desires of the employees; and the avoidance of
excessive fragmentation.
(2) A bargaining unit is not appropriate if it includes both
supervisors and nonsupervisory employees. A unit that includes only
supervisors may be considered appropriate if a majority of the
supervisory employees indicates by vote that they desire to be included
in such a unit.
(3) The exclusive bargaining representatives certified to represent
the bargaining units existing on July 1, 2012, shall continue as the
exclusive bargaining representative without the necessity of an
election.
(4) If a single employee organization is the exclusive bargaining
representative for two or more units, upon petition by the employee
organization, the units may be consolidated into a single larger unit
if the commission considers the larger unit to be appropriate. If
consolidation is appropriate, the commission shall certify the employee
organization as the exclusive bargaining representative of the new
unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 (1) The commission shall determine all
questions pertaining to representation and shall administer all
elections and be responsible for the processing and adjudication of all
disputes that arise as a consequence of elections. The commission
shall adopt rules that provide for at least the following:
(a) Secret balloting;
(b) Consulting with employee organizations;
(c) Access to lists of employees, job classification, work
locations, and home mailing addresses;
(d) Absentee voting;
(e) Procedures for the greatest possible participation in voting;
(f) Campaigning on the employer's property during working hours;
and
(g) Election observers.
(2) If an employee organization has been certified as the exclusive
bargaining representative of the employees of a bargaining unit, the
employee organization may act for and negotiate master collective
bargaining agreements that will include within the coverage of the
agreement all employees in the bargaining unit as provided in section
303(2) of this act. However, if a master collective bargaining
agreement is in effect for the exclusive bargaining representative, it
shall apply to the bargaining unit for which the certification has been
issued. Nothing in this section requires the parties to engage in new
negotiations during the term of that agreement.
(3) The certified exclusive bargaining representative shall be
responsible for representing the interests of all the employees in the
bargaining unit. This section does not limit an exclusive
representative's right to exercise its discretion to refuse to process
grievances of employees that are unmeritorious.
(4) No question concerning representation may be raised if:
(a) Fewer than twelve months have elapsed since the last
certification or election; or
(b) A valid collective bargaining agreement exists covering the
unit, except for that period of no more than one hundred twenty
calendar days nor less than ninety calendar days before the expiration
of the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 311 Should the parties fail to reach agreement
in negotiating a collective bargaining agreement, either party may
request of the commission the assistance of an impartial third party to
mediate the negotiations.
If a collective bargaining agreement previously negotiated under
this chapter should expire while negotiations are underway, the terms
and conditions specified in the collective bargaining agreement shall
remain in effect for a period not to exceed one year from the
expiration date stated in the agreement. Thereafter, the employer may
unilaterally implement its last, best offer.
If resolution is not reached through mediation by one hundred days
beyond the expiration date of a contract previously negotiated under
this chapter, or one hundred days from the initiation of mediated
negotiations if no such contract exists, an independent fact finder
shall be appointed by the commission.
The fact finder shall meet with the parties or their
representatives, or both, and make inquiries and investigations, hold
hearings, and take such other steps as may be appropriate. If the
dispute is not settled, the fact finder shall make findings of fact and
recommend terms of settlement within thirty days.
Such recommendations, together with the findings of fact, shall be
submitted in writing to the parties and the commission privately before
they are made public. The commission, the fact finder, the employer,
or the exclusive bargaining representative may make such findings and
recommendations public if the dispute is not settled within ten working
days after their receipt from the fact finder.
This section does not prohibit an employer and an exclusive
bargaining representative from agreeing to substitute, at their own
expense, their own procedure for resolving impasses in collective
bargaining for that provided in this section or from agreeing to
utilize for the purposes of this section any other governmental or
other agency or person in lieu of the commission.
Costs for mediator services shall be borne by the commission, and
costs for fact-finding shall be borne equally by the negotiating
parties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 312 (1) A collective bargaining agreement may
contain a union security provision requiring as a condition of
employment the payment, no later than the thirtieth day following the
beginning of employment or July 1, 2013, whichever is later, of an
agency shop fee to the employee organization that is the exclusive
bargaining representative for the bargaining unit in which the employee
is employed. The amount of the fee shall be equal to the amount
required to become a member in good standing of the employee
organization. Each employee organization shall establish a procedure
by which any employee so requesting may pay a representation fee no
greater than the part of the membership fee that represents a pro rata
share of expenditures for purposes germane to the collective bargaining
process, to contract administration, or to pursuing matters affecting
wages, hours, and other conditions of employment.
(2) An employee who is covered by a union security provision and
who asserts a right of nonassociation based on bona fide religious
tenets, or teachings of a church or religious body of which the
employee is a member, shall, as a condition of employment, make
payments to the employee organization, for purposes within the program
of the employee organization as designated by the employee that would
be in harmony with his or her individual conscience. The amount of the
payments shall be equal to the periodic dues and fees uniformly
required as a condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the
employee organization minus any included monthly premiums for insurance
programs sponsored by the employee organization. The employee shall
not be a member of the employee organization but is entitled to all the
representation rights of a member of the employee organization.
(3) Upon filing with the employer the written authorization of a
bargaining unit employee under this chapter, the employee organization
that is the exclusive bargaining representative of the bargaining unit
shall have the exclusive right to have deducted from the salary of the
employee an amount equal to the fees and dues uniformly required as a
condition of acquiring or retaining membership in the employee
organization. The fees and dues shall be deducted each pay period from
the pay of all employees who have given authorization for the deduction
and shall be transmitted by the employer as provided for by agreement
between the employer and the employee organization.
(4) Employee organizations that before July 1, 2013, were entitled
to the benefits of this section shall continue to be entitled to these
benefits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 313 (1) It is an unfair labor practice for an
employer:
(a) To interfere with, restrain, or coerce employees in the
exercise of the rights guaranteed by this chapter;
(b) To dominate or interfere with the formation or administration
of any employee organization or contribute financial or other support
to it. However, subject to rules adopted by the commission, an
employer shall not be prohibited from permitting employees to confer
with it or its representatives or agents during working hours without
loss of time or pay;
(c) To encourage or discourage membership in any employee
organization by discrimination in regard to hire, tenure of employment,
or any term or condition of employment;
(d) To discharge or discriminate otherwise against an employee
because that employee has filed charges or given testimony under this
chapter; or
(e) To refuse to bargain collectively with the representatives of
its employees.
(2) It is an unfair labor practice for an employee organization:
(a) To restrain or coerce an employee in the exercise of the rights
guaranteed by this chapter. However, this subsection does not impair
the right of an employee organization to prescribe its own rules with
respect to the acquisition or retention of membership in the employee
organization or to an employer in the selection of its representatives
for the purpose of bargaining or the adjustment of grievances;
(b) To cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate
against an employee in violation of subsection (1)(c) of this section;
(c) To discriminate against an employee because that employee has
filed charges or given testimony under this chapter;
(d) To refuse to bargain collectively with an employer.
(3) The expressing of any views, arguments, or opinion, or the
dissemination thereof to the public, whether in written, printed,
graphic, or visual form, shall not constitute or be evidence of an
unfair labor practice under this chapter, if such expression contains
no threat of reprisal or force or promise of benefit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 314 (1) The commission is empowered and
directed to prevent any unfair labor practice and to issue appropriate
remedial orders. However, a complaint shall not be processed for any
unfair labor practice occurring more than six months before the filing
of the complaint with the commission. This power shall not be affected
or impaired by any means of adjustment, mediation, or conciliation in
labor disputes that have been or may hereafter be established by law.
(2) If the commission determines that any person has engaged in or
is engaging in an unfair labor practice, the commission shall issue and
cause to be served upon the person an order requiring the person to
cease and desist from such unfair labor practice, and to take such
affirmative action as will effectuate the purposes and policy of this
chapter, such as the payment of damages and the reinstatement of
employees.
(3) The commission may petition the superior court for the county
in which the main office of the employer is located or in which the
person who has engaged or is engaging in such unfair labor practice
resides or transacts business, for the enforcement of its order and for
appropriate temporary relief.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 315 (1) For the purposes of implementing final
and binding arbitration under grievance procedures required by section
305 of this act the parties to a collective bargaining agreement may
agree on one or more permanent umpires to serve as arbitrator, or may
agree on any impartial person to serve as arbitrator, or may agree to
select arbitrators from any source available to them, including federal
and private agencies, in addition to the staff and list of arbitrators
maintained by the commission. If the parties cannot agree to the
selection of an arbitrator, the commission shall supply a list of names
in accordance with the procedures established by the commission.
(2) An arbitrator may require any person to attend as a witness and
to bring with him or her any book, record, document, or other evidence.
The fees for such attendance shall be paid by the party requesting
issuance of the subpoena and shall be the same as the fees of witnesses
in the superior court. Arbitrators may administer oaths. Subpoenas
shall issue and be signed by the arbitrator and shall be served in the
same manner as subpoenas to testify before a court of record in this
state. If any person so summoned to testify refuses or neglects to
obey such subpoena, upon petition authorized by the arbitrator, the
superior court may compel the attendance of the person before the
arbitrator or punish the person for contempt in the same manner
provided for the attendance of witnesses or the punishment of them in
the courts of this state.
(3) The arbitrator shall appoint a time and place for the hearing
and notify the parties thereof, and may adjourn the hearing from time
to time as may be necessary, and, on application of either party and
for good cause, may postpone the hearing to a time not extending beyond
the date fixed by the collective bargaining agreement for making the
award. The arbitration award shall be in writing and signed by the
arbitrator. The arbitrator shall, promptly upon its rendition, serve
a true copy of the award on each of the parties or their attorneys of
record.
(4) If a party to a collective bargaining agreement negotiated
under this chapter refuses to submit a grievance for arbitration, the
other party to the collective bargaining agreement may invoke the
jurisdiction of the superior court of Thurston county or of any county
in which the labor dispute exists and such court shall have
jurisdiction to issue an order compelling arbitration. Disputes
concerning compliance with grievance procedures shall be reserved for
determination by the arbitrator. Arbitration shall be ordered if the
grievance states a claim that on its face is covered by the collective
bargaining agreement. Doubts as to the coverage of the arbitration
clause shall be resolved in favor of arbitration.
(5) If a party to a collective bargaining agreement negotiated
under this chapter refuses to comply with the award of an arbitrator
determining a grievance arising under the collective bargaining
agreement, the other party to the collective bargaining agreement may
invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court of Thurston county or of
any county in which the labor dispute exists and such court shall have
jurisdiction to issue an order enforcing the arbitration award.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 316 The consolidated technology services
agency may purchase services, including services that have been
customarily and historically provided by employees of the agency. The
consolidated technology services agency is not subject to the
provisions of RCW 41.06.142. The employer shall not bargain with an
exclusive bargaining representative over the decision and impacts of
contracting for services, including those customarily and historically
provided by employees of the agency.

PART IV
NECESSARY FOR IMPLEMENTATION
Sec. 401 RCW 41.06.070 and 2010 c 271 s 801, 2010 c 2 s 2, and
2010 c 1 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) The members of the legislature or to any employee of, or
position in, the legislative branch of the state government including
members, officers, and employees of the legislative council, joint
legislative audit and review committee, statute law committee, and any
interim committee of the legislature;
(b) The justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of
appeals, judges of the superior courts or of the inferior courts, or to
any employee of, or position in the judicial branch of state
government;
(c) Officers, academic personnel, and employees of technical
colleges;
(d) The officers of the Washington state patrol;
(e) Elective officers of the state;
(f) The chief executive officer of each agency;
(g) In the departments of employment security and social and health
services, the director and the director's confidential secretary; in
all other departments, the executive head of which is an individual
appointed by the governor, the director, his or her confidential
secretary, and his or her statutory assistant directors;
(h) In the case of a multimember board, commission, or committee,
whether the members thereof are elected, appointed by the governor or
other authority, serve ex officio, or are otherwise chosen:
(i) All members of such boards, commissions, or committees;
(ii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on
a part-time basis and there is a statutory executive officer: The
secretary of the board, commission, or committee; the chief executive
officer of the board, commission, or committee; and the confidential
secretary of the chief executive officer of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve
on a full-time basis: The chief executive officer or administrative
officer as designated by the board, commission, or committee; and a
confidential secretary to the chair of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iv) If all members of the board, commission, or committee serve ex
officio: The chief executive officer; and the confidential secretary
of such chief executive officer;
(i) The confidential secretaries and administrative assistants in
the immediate offices of the elective officers of the state;
(j) Assistant attorneys general;
(k) Commissioned and enlisted personnel in the military service of
the state;
(l) Inmate, student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel
resources board;
(m) The public printer or to any employees of or positions in the
state printing plant;
(n) Officers and employees of the Washington state fruit
commission;
(o) Officers and employees of the Washington apple commission;
(p) Officers and employees of the Washington state dairy products
commission;
(q) Officers and employees of the Washington tree fruit research
commission;
(r) Officers and employees of the Washington state beef commission;
(s) Officers and employees of the Washington grain commission;
(t) Officers and employees of any commission formed under chapter
15.66 RCW;
(u) Officers and employees of agricultural commissions formed under
chapter 15.65 RCW;
(v) Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed
under chapter 67.40 RCW;
(w) Executive assistants for personnel administration and labor
relations in all state agencies employing such executive assistants
including but not limited to all departments, offices, commissions,
committees, boards, or other bodies subject to the provisions of this
chapter and this subsection shall prevail over any provision of law
inconsistent herewith unless specific exception is made in such law;
(x) In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy agency
heads, assistant directors or division directors, and not more than
three principal policy assistants who report directly to the agency
head or deputy agency heads;
(y) All employees of the marine employees' commission;
(z) Staff employed by the department of commerce to administer
energy policy functions;
(aa) The manager of the energy facility site evaluation council;
(bb) A maximum of ten staff employed by the department of commerce
to administer innovation and policy functions, including the three
principal policy assistants exempted under (x) of this subsection;
(cc) Staff employed by Washington State University to administer
energy education, applied research, and technology transfer programs
under RCW 43.21F.045 as provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5);
(dd) Officers and employees of the consolidated technology services
agency formed under RCW 43.105.047, except those employees represented
by an exclusive bargaining representative;
(ee) Effective July 1, 2012, all officers and employees of the
consolidated technology services agency formed under RCW 43.105.047,
including those employees represented by an exclusive bargaining
representative.
(2) The following classifications, positions, and employees of
institutions of higher education and related boards are hereby exempted
from coverage of this chapter:
(a) Members of the governing board of each institution of higher
education and related boards, all presidents, vice presidents, and
their confidential secretaries, administrative, and personal
assistants; deans, directors, and chairs; academic personnel; and
executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions employed
by institutions of higher education; principal assistants to executive
heads of major administrative or academic divisions; other managerial
or professional employees in an institution or related board having
substantial responsibility for directing or controlling program
operations and accountable for allocation of resources and program
results, or for the formulation of institutional policy, or for
carrying out personnel administration or labor relations functions,
legislative relations, public information, development, senior computer
systems and network programming, or internal audits and investigations;
and any employee of a community college district whose place of work is
one which is physically located outside the state of Washington and who
is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned to an educational
program operating outside of the state of Washington;
(b) The governing board of each institution, and related boards,
may also exempt from this chapter classifications involving research
activities, counseling of students, extension or continuing education
activities, graphic arts or publications activities requiring
prescribed academic preparation or special training as determined by
the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee engaged in office,
clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be exempted by
the board under this provision;
(c) Printing craft employees in the department of printing at the
University of Washington.
(3) In addition to the exemptions specifically provided by this
chapter, the director of personnel may provide for further exemptions
pursuant to the following procedures. The governor or other
appropriate elected official may submit requests for exemption to the
director of personnel stating the reasons for requesting such
exemptions. The director of personnel shall hold a public hearing,
after proper notice, on requests submitted pursuant to this subsection.
If the director determines that the position for which exemption is
requested is one involving substantial responsibility for the
formulation of basic agency or executive policy or one involving
directing and controlling program operations of an agency or a major
administrative division thereof, the director of personnel shall grant
the request and such determination shall be final as to any decision
made before July 1, 1993. The total number of additional exemptions
permitted under this subsection shall not exceed one percent of the
number of employees in the classified service not including employees
of institutions of higher education and related boards for those
agencies not directly under the authority of any elected public
official other than the governor, and shall not exceed a total of
twenty-five for all agencies under the authority of elected public
officials other than the governor.
The salary and fringe benefits of all positions presently or
hereafter exempted except for the chief executive officer of each
agency, full-time members of boards and commissions, administrative
assistants and confidential secretaries in the immediate office of an
elected state official, and the personnel listed in subsections (1)(j)
through (v) and (y) and (2) of this section, shall be determined by the
director of personnel. Changes to the classification plan affecting
exempt salaries must meet the same provisions for classified salary
increases resulting from adjustments to the classification plan as
outlined in RCW 41.06.152.
From February 18, 2009, through June 30, 2011, a salary or wage
increase shall not be granted to any position exempt from
classification under this chapter, except that a salary or wage
increase may be granted to employees pursuant to collective bargaining
agreements negotiated under chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 47.64, or 41.76 RCW,
or negotiated by the nonprofit corporation formed under chapter 67.40
RCW, and except that increases may be granted for positions for which
the employer has demonstrated difficulty retaining qualified employees
if the following conditions are met:
(a) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources; and
(b) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of
client services.
Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010,
through June 30, 2011, to a position exempt from classification under
this chapter shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the
legislature no later than July 31, 2011, detailing the positions for
which salary increases were granted, the size of the increases, and the
reasons for giving the increases.
Any person holding a classified position subject to the provisions
of this chapter shall, when and if such position is subsequently
exempted from the application of this chapter, be afforded the
following rights: If such person previously held permanent status in
another classified position, such person shall have a right of
reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a
position of similar nature and salary.
Any classified employee having civil service status in a classified
position who accepts an appointment in an exempt position shall have
the right of reversion to the highest class of position previously
held, or to a position of similar nature and salary.
A person occupying an exempt position who is terminated from the
position for gross misconduct or malfeasance does not have the right of
reversion to a classified position as provided for in this section.
From February 15, 2010, until June 30, 2011, no monetary
performance-based awards or incentives may be granted by the director
or employers to employees covered by rules adopted under this section.
This subsection does not prohibit the payment of awards provided for in
chapter 41.60 RCW.

Sec. 402 RCW 41.80.020 and 2010 c 283 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the matters
subject to bargaining include wages, hours, and other terms and
conditions of employment, and the negotiation of any question arising
under a collective bargaining agreement.
(2) The employer is not required to bargain over matters pertaining
to:
(a) Health care benefits or other employee insurance benefits,
except as required in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Any retirement system or retirement benefit; or
(c) Rules of the director of personnel or the Washington personnel
resources board adopted under section 203, chapter 354, Laws of 2002.
(3) Matters subject to bargaining include the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits. However,
except as provided otherwise in this subsection for institutions of
higher education, negotiations regarding the number of names to be
certified for vacancies, promotional preferences, and the dollar amount
expended on behalf of each employee for health care benefits shall be
conducted between the employer and one coalition of all the exclusive
bargaining representatives subject to this chapter. The exclusive
bargaining representatives for employees that are subject to chapters
47.64 ((RCW)) and 43.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 501 of
this act) shall bargain the dollar amount expended on behalf of each
employee for health care benefits with the employer as part of the
coalition under this subsection. Any such provision agreed to by the
employer and the coalition shall be included in all master collective
bargaining agreements negotiated by the parties. For institutions of
higher education, promotional preferences and the number of names to be
certified for vacancies shall be bargained under the provisions of RCW
41.80.010(4).
(4) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not agree to any proposal that would prevent the implementation of
approved affirmative action plans or that would be inconsistent with
the comparable worth agreement that provided the basis for the salary
changes implemented beginning with the 1983-1985 biennium to achieve
comparable worth.
(5) The employer and the exclusive bargaining representative shall
not bargain over matters pertaining to management rights established in
RCW 41.80.040.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if a conflict
exists between an executive order, administrative rule, or agency
policy relating to wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment
and a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under this chapter,
the collective bargaining agreement shall prevail. A provision of a
collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with the terms of a
statute is invalid and unenforceable.
(7) This section does not prohibit bargaining that affects
contracts authorized by RCW 41.06.142.

PART V
ADMINISTRATIVE AND MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 Sections 101 through 120 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW to be codified as chapter
43.41A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 Sections 301 through 316 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 RCW 43.105.052, 43.105.172, 43.105.250,
43.105.260, 43.105.270, 43.105.280, 43.105.290, 43.105.310, and
43.105.835 are each recodified as sections in chapter 43.--- RCW (the
new chapter created in section 501 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.105.005 (Purpose) and 1990 c 208 s 1 & 1987 c 504 s 1;
(2) RCW 43.105.013 (Finding -- Intent) and 2010 c 282 s 1;
(3) RCW 43.105.019 (Enterprise-based strategy -- Coordination with
legislative and judicial branches) and 2010 c 282 s 10;
(4) RCW 43.105.032 (Information services board -- Members--Chairperson -- Vacancies -- Quorum -- Compensation and travel expenses) and
2007 c 158 s 1, 1999 c 241 s 2, 1996 c 137 s 10, 1992 c 20 s 8, 1987 c
504 s 4, 1984 c 287 s 86, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 128, & 1973 1st
ex.s. c 219 s 5;
(5) RCW 43.105.041 (Powers and duties of board) and 2010 1st sp.s.
c 7 s 65, 2009 c 486 s 13, 2003 c 18 s 3, & 1999 c 285 s 5;
(6) RCW 43.105.095 (Management and oversight structure) and 1999 c
80 s 3;
(7) RCW 43.105.105 (Information technology decisions and plans) and
1999 c 80 s 4;
(8) RCW 43.105.160 (Strategic information technology plan -- Biennial
state performance report on information technology) and 2010 c 282 s 9,
2005 c 319 s 110, 1999 c 80 s 9, 1998 c 177 s 3, 1996 c 171 s 9, & 1992
c 20 s 1;
(9) RCW 43.105.170 (Information technology portfolios -- Contents--Performance reports) and 1999 c 80 s 10;
(10) RCW 43.105.180 (Evaluation of budget requests for information
technology projects) and 2010 c 282 s 6 & 1999 c 80 s 11;
(11) RCW 43.105.190 (Major information technology projects
standards and policies -- Project evaluation and reporting) and 2005 c
319 s 111, 1999 c 80 s 12, 1998 c 177 s 4, 1996 c 137 s 15, & 1992 c 20
s 4;
(12) RCW 43.105.200 (Application to institutions of higher
education) and 1992 c 20 s 5;
(13) RCW 43.105.210 (Data processing expenditures -- Authorization--Penalties) and 1993 sp.s. c 1 s 903;
(14) RCW 43.105.330 (State interoperability executive committee)
and 2006 c 76 s 2 & 2003 c 18 s 4;
(15) RCW 43.105.805 (Information services board -- Powers and duties)
and 2010 1st sp.s. c 9 s 1, 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 66, & 1999 c 285 s 3;
(16) RCW 43.105.815 (K-20 operations cooperative -- Ongoing
management) and 1999 c 285 s 8; and
(17) RCW 43.105.820 (K-20 telecommunication system -- Technical plan)
and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 67, 1999 c 285 s 11, & 1996 c 137 s 8.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505 Section 123 of this act takes effect
January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 506 Section 124 of this act expires January 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 507 Except for section 123 of this act, this
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2011.

--- END ---