BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The state, under chapter 41.56 RCW, has
established guidelines and factors to be considered in determining
interest arbitration decisions setting compensation and benefit
spending levels for certain public employees. These factors include
the selection of an arbitration panel and neutral chair to make final
and binding determinations upon the parties subject to this chapter.
Additionally, these guidelines include criteria which the arbitration
panel must consider in making a determination.
The legislature finds that it is necessary to further define the
qualifications of the neutral chair of an arbitration panel to ensure
that determinations made by the panel are fair and just, based on a
full understanding of the factors presented.
Additionally, the legislature finds it in the interest and welfare
of the public for the arbitration panel to consider the financial
ability of the respective unit of government when making a
determination.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.56.450 and 1983 c 287 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If an agreement has not been reached following a reasonable
period of negotiations and mediation, and the executive director, upon
the recommendation of the assigned mediator, finds that the parties
remain at impasse, then an interest arbitration panel shall be created
to resolve the dispute. The issues for determination by the
arbitration panel shall be limited to the issues certified by the
executive director. Within seven days following the issuance of the
determination of the executive director, each party shall name one
person to serve as its arbitrator on the arbitration panel. The two
members so appointed shall meet within seven days following the
appointment of the later appointed member to attempt to choose a third
member to act as the neutral ((chairman)) chair of the arbitration
panel. Upon the failure of the arbitrators to select a neutral
((chairman)) chair within seven days, the two appointed members shall
use one of the two following options in the appointment of the third
member, who shall act as ((chairman)) chair of the panel: (((1))) (a)
By mutual consent, the two appointed members may jointly request the
commission to, and the commission shall, appoint a third member within
two days of such request. Costs of each party's appointee shall be
borne by each party respectively; other costs of the arbitration
proceedings shall be borne by the commission; or (((2))) (b) either
party may apply to the commission, the federal mediation and
conciliation service, or the American arbitration association to
provide a list of five qualified arbitrators from which the neutral
((chairman)) chair shall be chosen. Each party shall pay the fees and
expenses of its arbitrator, and the fees and expenses of the neutral
((chairman)) chair shall be shared equally between the parties.
The arbitration panel so constituted shall promptly establish a
date, time, and place for a hearing and shall provide reasonable notice
thereof to the parties to the dispute. A hearing, which shall be
informal, shall be held, and each party shall have the opportunity to
present evidence and make argument. No member of the arbitration panel
may present the case for a party to the proceedings. The rules of
evidence prevailing in judicial proceedings may be considered, but are
not binding, and any oral testimony or documentary evidence or other
data deemed relevant by the ((chairman)) chair of the arbitration panel
may be received in evidence. A recording of the proceedings shall be
taken. The arbitration panel has the power to administer oaths,
require the attendance of witnesses, and require the production of such
books, papers, contracts, agreements, and documents as may be deemed by
the panel to be material to a just determination of the issues in
dispute. If any person refuses to obey a subpoena issued by the
arbitration panel, or refuses to be sworn or to make an affirmation to
testify, or any witness, party, or attorney for a party is guilty of
any contempt while in attendance at any hearing held hereunder, the
arbitration panel may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court in
the county where the labor dispute exists, and the court has
jurisdiction to issue an appropriate order. Any failure to obey the
order may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof. The hearing
conducted by the arbitration panel shall be concluded within twenty-five days following the selection or designation of the neutral
((chairman)) chair of the arbitration panel, unless the parties agree
to a longer period.
The neutral ((chairman)) chair shall consult with the other members
of the arbitration panel, and, within thirty days following the
conclusion of the hearing, the neutral ((chairman)) chair shall make
written findings of fact and a written determination of the issues in
dispute, based on the evidence presented. A copy thereof shall be
served on the commission, on each of the other members of the
arbitration panel, and on each of the parties to the dispute. That
determination shall be final and binding upon both parties, subject to
review by the superior court upon the application of either party
solely upon the question of whether the decision of the panel was
arbitrary or capricious.
(2) An arbitrator serving as neutral chair for cases under interest
arbitration under this section shall be considered qualified if the
arbitrator can demonstrate all of the following:
(a) Current membership in one of the following organizations:
National academy of arbitrators; American arbitration association; or
federal mediation and conciliation services;
(b) A minimum of eight hours of training in the area of public
sector fiscal and budgetary matters. The commission is directed to
develop or certify qualifying training programs in consultation with
labor and management representatives; and
(c) Is geographically located in the northwest region of the United
States.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.56.465 and 2007 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In making its determination, the panel shall be mindful of the
legislative purpose enumerated in RCW 41.56.430 and, as additional
standards or guidelines to aid it in reaching a decision, the panel
shall consider the following criteria, but give first priority to (a)
and (b) of this subsection and secondary priority to (c) through (f) of
this subsection:
(a) The constitutional and statutory authority of the employer;
(b) The reasonable financial ability of the employer to pay for the
compensation and fringe benefit provisions of a collective bargaining
agreement giving due consideration and weight to the other services
provided by, and other priorities of, the unit of government as
determined by the governing body. A reasonable operating reserve
against future contingencies as determined by the governing body, which
does not include funds in contemplation of settlement of the labor
dispute, shall not be considered as available toward a settlement;
(c) Stipulations of the parties;
(((c))) (d) The average consumer prices for goods and services,
commonly known as the cost of living;
(((d))) (e) Changes in any of the circumstances under (a) through
(((c))) (d) of this subsection during the pendency of the proceedings;
and
(((e))) (f) Such other factors, not confined to the factors under
(a) through (((d))) (e) of this subsection, that are normally or
traditionally taken into consideration in the determination of wages,
hours, and conditions of employment. For those employees listed in RCW
41.56.030(((7))) (14)(a) who are employed by the governing body of a
city or town with a population of less than fifteen thousand, or a
county with a population of less than seventy thousand, consideration
must also be given to regional differences in the cost of living.
(2) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(((7))) (14) (a) through
(d), the panel shall also consider a comparison of the wages, hours,
and conditions of employment of personnel involved in the proceedings
with the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of like personnel
of like employers ((of similar size)) on the west coast of the United
States. However, when an adequate number of comparable employers
exists within the state of Washington, other west coast employers may
not be considered. Like employers shall be determined by factors
including, but not limited to, population size, geographic location,
financial conditions, population demographics, workforce size, assessed
valuation, and labor market characteristics.
(3) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(((7))) (14) (e) through
(h), the panel shall also consider a comparison of the wages, hours,
and conditions of employment of personnel involved in the proceedings
with the wages, hours, and conditions of employment of like personnel
of public fire departments ((of similar size)) on the west coast of the
United States. However, when an adequate number of comparable
employers exists within the state of Washington, other west coast
employers may not be considered. Like public fire departments shall be
determined by factors including, but not limited to, population size,
geographic location, financial conditions, population demographics,
workforce size, assessed valuation, and labor market characteristics.
(4) For employees listed in RCW 41.56.028:
(a) The panel shall also consider:
(i) A comparison of child care provider subsidy rates and
reimbursement programs by public entities, including counties and
municipalities, along the west coast of the United States; and
(ii) The financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement; and
(b) The panel may consider:
(i) The public's interest in reducing turnover and increasing
retention of child care providers;
(ii) The state's interest in promoting, through education and
training, a stable child care workforce to provide quality and reliable
child care from all providers throughout the state; and
(iii) In addition, for employees exempt from licensing under
chapter 74.15 RCW, the state's fiscal interest in reducing reliance
upon public benefit programs including but not limited to medical
coupons, food stamps, subsidized housing, and emergency medical
services.
(5) For employees listed in RCW 74.39A.270:
(a) The panel shall consider:
(i) A comparison of wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
publicly reimbursed personnel providing similar services to similar
clients, including clients who are elderly, frail, or have
developmental disabilities, both in the state and across the United
States; and
(ii) The financial ability of the state to pay for the compensation
and fringe benefit provisions of a collective bargaining agreement; and
(b) The panel may consider:
(i) A comparison of wages, hours, and conditions of employment of
publicly employed personnel providing similar services to similar
clients, including clients who are elderly, frail, or have
developmental disabilities, both in the state and across the United
States;
(ii) The state's interest in promoting a stable long-term care
workforce to provide quality and reliable care to vulnerable elderly
and disabled recipients;
(iii) The state's interest in ensuring access to affordable,
quality health care for all state citizens; and
(iv) The state's fiscal interest in reducing reliance upon public
benefit programs including but not limited to medical coupons, food
stamps, subsidized housing, and emergency medical services.
(6) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section may not be construed to
authorize the panel to require the employer to pay, directly or
indirectly, the increased employee contributions resulting from chapter
502, Laws of 1993 or chapter 517, Laws of 1993 as required under
chapter 41.26 RCW.

--- END ---