BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to the use by a
consumer of any property or service otherwise taxable under RCW
82.12.020 and purchased by the consumer from a nonprofit organization
or a library, if:
(a) The purchase is exempt from sales tax under RCW 82.08.02573; or
(b) In the case of an item purchased from an out-of-state seller
that is not registered with the department for sales tax purposes, the
purchase would have otherwise been exempt from sales tax under RCW
82.08.02573.
(2) Consumers must retain documentation evidencing their
entitlement to an exemption under this section.

--- END ---