BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.32.370 and 1998 c 191 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A special hunting season permit is required to hunt in each
special season established under chapter 77.12 RCW.
(2) Persons may apply for special hunting season permits as
provided by rule of the commission.
(3) The application fee to enter the drawing for a special hunting
permit is five dollars for residents, fifty dollars for nonresidents,
and three dollars for youth.
(4)(a) The department may award special hunting season permit
preference points, in the manner determined by the department, to a
person applying for a special hunting season permit.
(b) The department may conduct special hunting season permit
drawings that provide an applicant who has accumulated preference
points with an increased chance of being awarded a special hunting
season permit, in the manner determined by the department.
(c) Except as provided in section 2 of this act, the department may
not transfer preference points from one person to another.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department may only transfer special hunting season permit
preference points from one person to another as provided under
subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) The department shall transfer preference points upon a person's
death where:
(a) Prior to death, that person requests the transfer of any
preference points accumulated at the time of death to a designated
recipient. The transfer request must be made in the manner determined
by the department, and must include the signatures of both the
transferor and the designated recipient. The department must maintain
a registry containing such request; and
(b) Following the death of the transferor, the designated recipient
requests receipt of the preference points in the manner determined by
the department and provides proof of the transferor's death as required
by the department.
(3) The department shall transfer preference points upon a person's
becoming disabled where a person requests the transfer of any
preference points accumulated. The transfer request must be made in
the manner determined by the department, and must include: The
signatures of both the transferor and the designated recipient;
certification by the transferor that they meet one or more of the
criteria set forth in RCW 79A.05.065(2)(a); and any documentation
required by the department. A person may only transfer preference
points under this subsection once in a lifetime.
(4) A designated recipient receiving preference points under this
section retains all preference points that the recipient previously
accumulated prior to the transfer.
(5) A transferor may not receive any consideration for the transfer
of preference points.
(6) The department may adopt rules as necessary for the
administration of this section.

--- END ---