BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 (1) The legislature finds that generating
electricity from the combustion of coal produces large amounts of
harmful pollutants, including ammonia, arsenic, lead, mercury,
hydrochloric acid, nitrogen oxides, sulfuric acid, sulfur dioxide,
particulate matter, and several toxic heavy metals, all of which have
been determined by medical science to be harmful to human health and
safety. In addition, the emissions from the combustion of coal in the
state impact visibility in eight class I areas in the state. While the
emission of many of these pollutants continues to be addressed through
application of federal and state air quality laws, the emission of
greenhouse gases resulting from the combustion of coal has not been
addressed. Furthermore, these harmful by-products may be damaging the
cultural history of Washington and its people by eroding ancient native
American petroglyphs and pictographs and by accumulating in the soil
and waters of the usual and accustomed areas for tribal hunting,
fishing, gathering, and grazing.
(2) The legislature has previously found that greenhouse gas
emissions contribute to climate change and has found that Washington is
especially vulnerable to climate change. The legislature now finds
that coal-fired electricity generation is one of the largest sources of
greenhouse gas emissions in the state, and is the largest source of
such emissions from the generation of electricity in the state.
(3) The legislature finds coal-fired electric generation may
provide baseload power that is necessary in the near-term for the
stability and reliability of the electrical transmission grid and that
contributes to the availability of affordable power in the state. The
legislature further finds that efforts to transition power to other
fuels requires a reasonable period of time to ensure grid stability and
to maintain affordable electricity resources.
(4) The legislature finds that coal-fired baseload electric
generation facilities are a significant contributor to family-wage jobs
and economic health in parts of the state and that transition of these
facilities must address the economic future and the preservation of
jobs in affected communities.
(5) The legislature finds that coal-fired baseload electric
generation facilities are large industrial facilities that require
substantial planning and funding for closure and postclosure to ensure
that the site is fully restored and free of contamination.
(6) Therefore, it is the purpose of this act to provide for the
reduction of greenhouse gas emissions from large coal-fired baseload
electric power generation facilities, to effect an orderly transition
to cleaner fuels in a manner that ensures reliability of the state's
electrical grid, to ensure appropriate cleanup and site restoration
upon decommissioning of any of these facilities in the state, and to
provide assistance to host communities planning for new economic
development and mitigating the economic impacts of the closure of these
facilities.

Sec. 102 RCW 80.80.010 and 2009 c 565 s 54 and 2009 c 448 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for consumer-owned utilities under its jurisdiction; or
(b) an independent auditor selected by a consumer-owned utility that is
not under the jurisdiction of the state auditor.
(3) "Average available greenhouse gas emissions output" means the
level of greenhouse gas emissions as surveyed and determined by the
energy policy division of the department of commerce under RCW
80.80.050.
(4) "Baseload electric generation" means electric generation from
a power plant that is designed and intended to provide electricity at
an annualized plant capacity factor of at least sixty percent.
(5) "Cogeneration facility" means a power plant in which the heat
or steam is also used for industrial or commercial heating or cooling
purposes and that meets federal energy regulatory commission standards
for qualifying facilities under the public utility regulatory policies
act of 1978 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 824a-3), as amended.
(6) "Combined-cycle natural gas thermal electric generation
facility" means a power plant that employs a combination of one or more
gas turbines and steam turbines in which electricity is produced in the
steam turbine from otherwise lost waste heat exiting from one or more
of the gas turbines.
(7) "Commission" means the Washington utilities and transportation
commission.
(8) "Consumer-owned utility" means a municipal utility formed under
Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title 54 RCW, an
irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a cooperative
formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or association
formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, or port district within which an
industrial district has been established as authorized by Title 53 RCW,
that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to more
than one retail electric customer in the state.
(9) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(10) "Distributed generation" means electric generation connected
to the distribution level of the transmission and distribution grid,
which is usually located at or near the intended place of use.
(11) "Electric utility" means an electrical company or a consumer-owned utility.
(12) "Electrical company" means a company owned by investors that
meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010.
(13) "Governing board" means the board of directors or legislative
authority of a consumer-owned utility.
(14) "Greenhouse ((gases)) gas" includes carbon dioxide, methane,
nitrous oxide, hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, and sulfur
hexafluoride.
(15) "Long-term financial commitment" means:
(a) Either a new ownership interest in baseload electric generation
or an upgrade to a baseload electric generation facility; or
(b) A new or renewed contract for baseload electric generation with
a term of five or more years for the provision of retail power or
wholesale power to end-use customers in this state.
(16) "Plant capacity factor" means the ratio of the electricity
produced during a given time period, measured in kilowatt-hours, to the
electricity the unit could have produced if it had been operated at its
rated capacity during that period, expressed in kilowatt-hours.
(17) "Power plant" means a facility for the generation of
electricity that is permitted as a single plant by a jurisdiction
inside or outside the state.
(18) "Upgrade" means any modification made for the primary purpose
of increasing the electric generation capacity of a baseload electric
generation facility. "Upgrade" does not include routine or necessary
maintenance, installation of emission control equipment, installation,
replacement, or modification of equipment that improves the heat rate
of the facility, or installation, replacement, or modification of
equipment for the primary purpose of maintaining reliable generation
output capability that does not increase the heat input or fuel usage
as specified in existing generation air quality permits as of July 22,
2007, but may result in incidental increases in generation capacity.
(19) "Coal transition power" means the output of a coal-fired
electric generation facility located in Washington that is subject to
RCW 80.80.040(3)(c).
(20) "Memorandum of agreement" or "memorandum" means a binding and
enforceable contract entered into pursuant to section 106 of this act
between the governor on behalf of the state and an owner of a baseload
electric generation facility in the state that produces coal transition
power.

Sec. 103 RCW 80.80.040 and 2009 c 448 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2008, the greenhouse gas emissions
performance standard for all baseload electric generation for which
electric utilities enter into long-term financial commitments on or
after such date is the lower of:
(a) One thousand one hundred pounds of greenhouse gases per
megawatt-hour; or
(b) The average available greenhouse gas emissions output as
determined under RCW 80.80.050.
(2) This chapter does not apply to long-term financial commitments
with the Bonneville power administration.
(3)(a) Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, all baseload
electric generation facilities in operation as of June 30, 2008, are
deemed to be in compliance with the greenhouse gas emissions
performance standard established under this section until the
facilities are the subject of long-term financial commitments.
(b) All baseload electric generation that commences operation after
June 30, 2008, and is located in Washington, must comply with the
greenhouse gas emissions performance standard established in subsection
(1) of this section.
(c)(i) A coal-fired baseload electric generation facility in
Washington that emitted more than one million tons of greenhouse gases
in calendar year 2005 must comply with the lower of the following
greenhouse gas emissions performance standard such that one generating
boiler is in compliance by December 31, 2020, and any other generating
boiler is in compliance by December 31, 2025:
(A) One thousand one hundred pounds of greenhouse gases per
megawatt-hour; or
(B) The average available greenhouse gas emissions output as
determined under RCW 80.80.050.
(ii) This subsection (3)(c) does not apply to a coal-fired baseload
electric generating facility in the event the department determines as
a requirement of state or federal law or regulation that selective
catalytic reduction technology must be installed on any of its boilers.
(4) All electric generation facilities or power plants powered
exclusively by renewable resources, as defined in RCW 19.280.020, are
deemed to be in compliance with the greenhouse gas emissions
performance standard established under this section.
(5) All cogeneration facilities in the state that are fueled by
natural gas or waste gas or a combination of the two fuels, and that
are in operation as of June 30, 2008, are deemed to be in compliance
with the greenhouse gas emissions performance standard established
under this section until the facilities are the subject of a new
ownership interest or are upgraded.
(6) In determining the rate of emissions of greenhouse gases for
baseload electric generation, the total emissions associated with
producing electricity shall be included.
(7) In no case shall a long-term financial commitment be determined
to be in compliance with the greenhouse gas emissions performance
standard if the commitment includes more than twelve percent of
electricity from unspecified sources.
(8) For a long-term financial commitment with multiple power
plants, each specified power plant must be treated individually for the
purpose of determining the annualized plant capacity factor and net
emissions, and each power plant must comply with subsection (1) of this
section, except as provided in subsections (3) through (5) of this
section.
(9) The department shall establish an output-based methodology to
ensure that the calculation of emissions of greenhouse gases for a
cogeneration facility recognizes the total usable energy output of the
process, and includes all greenhouse gases emitted by the facility in
the production of both electrical and thermal energy. In developing
and implementing the greenhouse gas emissions performance standard, the
department shall consider and act in a manner consistent with any rules
adopted pursuant to the public utilities regulatory policy act of 1978
(16 U.S.C. Sec. 824a-3), as amended.
(10) The following greenhouse gas emissions produced by baseload
electric generation owned or contracted through a long-term financial
commitment shall not be counted as emissions of the power plant in
determining compliance with the greenhouse gas emissions performance
standard:
(a) Those emissions that are injected permanently in geological
formations;
(b) Those emissions that are permanently sequestered by other means
approved by the department; and
(c) Those emissions sequestered or mitigated as approved under
subsection (16) of this section.
(11) In adopting and implementing the greenhouse gas emissions
performance standard, the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce energy policy division, in consultation
with the commission, the department, the Bonneville power
administration, the western electricity ((coordination [coordinating]))
coordinating council, the energy facility site evaluation council,
electric utilities, public interest representatives, and consumer
representatives, shall consider the effects of the greenhouse gas
emissions performance standard on system reliability and overall costs
to electricity customers.
(12) In developing and implementing the greenhouse gas emissions
performance standard, the department shall, with assistance of the
commission, the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce energy policy division, and electric utilities,
and to the extent practicable, address long-term purchases of
electricity from unspecified sources in a manner consistent with this
chapter.
(13) The directors of the energy facility site evaluation council
and the department shall each adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW in
coordination with each other to implement and enforce the greenhouse
gas emissions performance standard. The rules necessary to implement
this section shall be adopted by June 30, 2008.
(14) In adopting the rules for implementing this section, the
energy facility site evaluation council and the department shall
include criteria to be applied in evaluating the carbon sequestration
plan, for baseload electric generation that will rely on subsection
(10) of this section to demonstrate compliance, but that will commence
sequestration after the date that electricity is first produced. The
rules shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Provisions for financial assurances, as a condition of plant
operation, sufficient to ensure successful implementation of the carbon
sequestration plan, including construction and operation of necessary
equipment, and any other significant costs;
(b) Provisions for geological or other approved sequestration
commencing within five years of plant operation, including full and
sufficient technical documentation to support the planned
sequestration;
(c) Provisions for monitoring the effectiveness of the
implementation of the sequestration plan;
(d) Penalties for failure to achieve implementation of the plan on
schedule;
(e) Provisions for an owner to purchase emissions reductions in the
event of the failure of a sequestration plan under subsection (16) of
this section; and
(f) Provisions for public notice and comment on the carbon
sequestration plan.
(15)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, as part of
its role enforcing the greenhouse gas emissions performance standard,
the department shall determine whether sequestration or a plan for
sequestration will provide safe, reliable, and permanent protection
against the greenhouse gases entering the atmosphere from the power
plant and all ancillary facilities.
(b) For facilities under its jurisdiction, the energy facility site
evaluation council shall contract for review of sequestration or the
carbon sequestration plan with the department consistent with the
conditions under (a) of this subsection, consider the adequacy of
sequestration or the plan in its adjudicative proceedings conducted
under RCW 80.50.090(3), and incorporate specific findings regarding
adequacy in its recommendation to the governor under RCW 80.50.100.
(16) A project under consideration by the energy facility site
evaluation council by July 22, 2007, is required to include all of the
requirements of subsection (14) of this section in its carbon
sequestration plan submitted as part of the energy facility site
evaluation council process. A project under consideration by the
energy facility site evaluation council by July 22, 2007, that receives
final site certification agreement approval under chapter 80.50 RCW
shall make a good faith effort to implement the sequestration plan. If
the project owner determines that implementation is not feasible, the
project owner shall submit documentation of that determination to the
energy facility site evaluation council. The documentation shall
demonstrate the steps taken to implement the sequestration plan and
evidence of the technological and economic barriers to successful
implementation. The project owner shall then provide to the energy
facility site evaluation council notification that they shall implement
the plan that requires the project owner to meet the greenhouse gas
emissions performance standard by purchasing verifiable greenhouse gas
emissions reductions from an electric ((generating)) generation
facility located within the western interconnection, where the
reduction would not have occurred otherwise or absent this contractual
agreement, such that the sum of the emissions reductions purchased and
the facility's emissions meets the standard for the life of the
facility.

Sec. 104 RCW 80.80.060 and 2009 c 448 s 3 and 2009 c 147 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) No electrical company may enter into a long-term financial
commitment unless the baseload electric generation supplied under such
a long-term financial commitment complies with the greenhouse ((gases
[gas])) gas emissions performance standard established under RCW
80.80.040.
(2) In order to enforce the requirements of this chapter, the
commission shall review in a general rate case or as provided in
subsection (5) of this section any long-term financial commitment
entered into by an electrical company after June 30, 2008, to determine
whether the baseload electric generation to be supplied under that
long-term financial commitment complies with the greenhouse ((gases
[gas])) gas emissions performance standard established under RCW
80.80.040.
(3) In determining whether a long-term financial commitment is for
baseload electric generation, the commission shall consider the design
of the power plant and its intended use, based upon the electricity
purchase contract, if any, permits necessary for the operation of the
power plant, and any other matter the commission determines is relevant
under the circumstances.
(4) Upon application by an electric utility, the commission may
provide a case-by-case exemption from the greenhouse ((gases [gas]))
gas emissions performance standard to address: (a) Unanticipated
electric system reliability needs; (b) extraordinary cost impacts on
utility ratepayers; or (c) catastrophic events or threat of significant
financial harm that may arise from unforeseen circumstances.
(5) Upon application by an electrical company, the commission shall
determine whether the company's proposed decision to acquire electric
generation or enter into a power purchase agreement for electricity
complies with the greenhouse ((gases [gas])) gas emissions performance
standard established under RCW 80.80.040. The commission shall not
decide in a proceeding under this subsection (5) issues involving the
actual costs to construct and operate the selected resource, cost
recovery, or other issues reserved by the commission for decision in a
general rate case or other proceeding for recovery of the resource or
contract costs.
(6) An electrical company may account for and defer for later
consideration by the commission costs incurred in connection with a
long-term financial commitment, including operating and maintenance
costs, depreciation, taxes, and cost of invested capital. The deferral
begins with the date on which the power plant begins commercial
operation or the effective date of the power purchase agreement and
continues for a period not to exceed twenty-four months; provided that
if during such period the company files a general rate case or other
proceeding for the recovery of such costs, deferral ends on the
effective date of the final decision by the commission in such
proceeding. Creation of such a deferral account does not by itself
determine the actual costs of the long-term financial commitment,
whether recovery of any or all of these costs is appropriate, or other
issues to be decided by the commission in a general rate case or other
proceeding for recovery of these costs. For the purpose of this
subsection (6) only, the term "long-term financial commitment" also
includes an electric company's ownership or power purchase agreement
with a term of five or more years associated with an eligible renewable
resource as defined in RCW 19.285.030.
(7) The commission shall consult with the department to apply the
procedures adopted by the department to verify the emissions of
greenhouse gases from baseload electric generation under RCW 80.80.040.
The department shall report to the commission whether baseload electric
generation will comply with the greenhouse ((gases [gas])) gas
emissions performance standard for the duration of the period the
baseload electric generation is supplied to the electrical company.
(8) The commission shall adopt rules for the enforcement of this
section with respect to electrical companies and adopt procedural rules
for approving costs incurred by an electrical company under subsection
(4) of this section.
(9) This section does not apply to a long-term financial commitment
for the purchase of coal transition power with termination dates
consistent with the applicable dates in RCW 80.80.040(3)(c).
(10) The commission shall adopt rules necessary to implement this
section by December 31, 2008.

Sec. 105 RCW 80.80.070 and 2007 c 307 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No consumer-owned utility may enter into a long-term financial
commitment unless the baseload electric generation supplied under such
a long-term financial commitment complies with the greenhouse ((gases))
gas emissions performance standard established under RCW 80.80.040.
(2) The governing board shall review and make a determination on
any long-term financial commitment by the utility, pursuant to this
chapter and after consultation with the department, to determine
whether the baseload electric generation to be supplied under that
long-term financial commitment complies with the greenhouse ((gases))
gas emissions performance standard established under RCW 80.80.040. No
consumer-owned utility may enter into a long-term financial commitment
unless the baseload electric generation to be supplied under that long-term financial commitment complies with the greenhouse ((gases)) gas
emissions performance standard established under RCW 80.80.040.
(3) In confirming that a long-term financial commitment is for
baseload electric generation, the governing board shall consider the
design of the power plant and the intended use of the power plant based
upon the electricity purchase contract, if any, permits necessary for
the operation of the power plant, and any other matter the governing
board determines is relevant under the circumstances.
(4) The governing board may provide a case-by-case exemption from
the greenhouse ((gases)) gas emissions performance standard to address:
(a) Unanticipated electric system reliability needs; or (b)
catastrophic events or threat of significant financial harm that may
arise from unforeseen circumstances.
(5) The governing board shall apply the procedures adopted by the
department to verify the emissions of greenhouse gases from baseload
electric generation under RCW 80.80.040, and may request assistance
from the department in doing so.
(6) For consumer-owned utilities, the auditor is responsible for
auditing compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under this
chapter that apply to those utilities and the attorney general is
responsible for enforcing that compliance.
(7) This section does not apply to long-term financial commitments
for the purchase of coal transition power with termination dates
consistent with the applicable dates in RCW 80.80.040(3)(c).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 106 A new section is added to chapter 80.80
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2012, the governor on behalf of the state shall
enter into a memorandum of agreement with the owners of a coal-fired
baseload facility in Washington that emitted more than one million tons
of greenhouse gases in calendar year 2005.
(2) The memorandum of agreement must:
(a) Incorporate by reference RCW 80.80.040, 80.80.060, and
80.80.070 as of the effective date of this section;
(b) Incorporate binding commitments to install selective
noncatalytic reduction pollution control technology in any coal-fired
generating boilers by January 1, 2013, after discussing the proper use
of ammonia in this technology.
(3)(a) The memorandum of agreement must include provisions by which
the facility owner will provide financial assistance:
(i) To the affected community for economic development and energy
efficiency and weatherization; and
(ii) For energy technologies with the potential to create
considerable energy, economic development, and air quality, haze, or
other environmental benefits.
(b) Except as described in (c) of this subsection, the financial
assistance in (a)(i) of this subsection must be in the amount of thirty
million dollars and the financial assistance in (a)(ii) of this
subsection must be in the amount of twenty-five million dollars, with
investments beginning January 1, 2012, and consisting of equal annual
investments through December 31, 2023, or until the full amount has
been provided. Only funds for energy efficiency and weatherization may
be spent prior to December 31, 2015.
(c) If the tax exemptions provided under RCW 82.08.811 or 82.12.811
are repealed, any remaining financial assistance required by this
section is no longer required.
(4) The memorandum of agreement must:
(a) Specify that the investments in subsection (3) of this section
be held in independent accounts at an appropriate financial
institution; and
(b) Identify individuals to approve expenditures from the accounts.
Individuals must have relevant expertise and must include members
representing the Lewis economic development council, local elected
officials, employees at the facility, and the facility owner.
(5) The memorandum of agreement must include a provision that
allows for the termination of the memorandum of agreement in the event
the department determines as a requirement of federal law or regulation
that selective catalytic reduction technology must be installed on any
of its boilers.
(6) The memorandum of agreement must include enforcement provisions
to ensure implementation of the agreement by the parties.
(7) If the memorandum of agreement is not signed by January 1,
2012, the governor must implement the provisions in subsection (2)(b)
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 A new section is added to chapter 80.80
RCW to read as follows:
No state agency or political subdivision of the state may adopt or
impose a greenhouse gas emission performance standard, or other
operating or financial requirement or limitation relating to greenhouse
gas emissions, on a coal-fired electric generation facility located in
Washington or upon an electric utility's long-term purchase of coal
transition power, that is inconsistent with or additional to the
provisions of RCW 80.80.040 or the memorandum of agreement entered into
under section 106 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 A new section is added to chapter 80.80
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A memorandum of agreement entered into pursuant to section 106
of this act may include provisions to assist in the financing of
emissions reductions that exceed those required by RCW 80.80.040(3)(c)
by providing for the recognition of such reductions in applicable state
policies and programs relating to greenhouse gas emissions, and by
encouraging and advocating for the recognition of the reductions in all
established and emerging emission reduction frameworks at the regional,
national, or international level.
(2) The governor may recommend actions by the legislature to
strengthen implementation of an agreement or a proposed agreement
relating to recognition of investments in early emissions reductions.

Sec. 109 RCW 80.50.100 and 1989 c 175 s 174 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The council shall report to the governor its recommendations as
to the approval or rejection of an application for certification within
twelve months of receipt by the council of such an application, or such
later time as is mutually agreed by the council and the applicant. In
the case of an application filed prior to December 31, 2025, for
certification of an energy facility proposed for construction,
modification, or expansion for the purpose of providing generating
facilities that meet the requirements of RCW 80.80.040 and are located
in a county with a coal-fired electric generating facility subject to
RCW 80.80.040(3)(c), the council shall expedite the processing of the
application pursuant to RCW 80.50.075 and shall report its
recommendations to the governor within one hundred eighty days of
receipt by the council of such an application, or a later time as is
mutually agreed by the council and the applicant. If the council
recommends approval of an application for certification, it shall also
submit a draft certification agreement with the report. The council
shall include conditions in the draft certification agreement to
implement the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited
to, conditions to protect state or local governmental or community
interests affected by the construction or operation of the energy
facility, and conditions designed to recognize the purpose of laws or
ordinances, or rules or regulations promulgated thereunder, that are
preempted or superseded pursuant to RCW 80.50.110 as now or hereafter
amended.
(2)(a) Within sixty days of receipt of the council's report the
governor shall take one of the following actions:
(((a))) (i) Approve the application and execute the draft
certification agreement; or
(((b))) (ii) Reject the application; or
(((c))) (iii) Direct the council to reconsider certain aspects of
the draft certification agreement.
(b) The council shall reconsider such aspects of the draft
certification agreement by reviewing the existing record of the
application or, as necessary, by reopening the adjudicative proceeding
for the purposes of receiving additional evidence. Such
reconsideration shall be conducted expeditiously. The council shall
resubmit the draft certification to the governor incorporating any
amendments deemed necessary upon reconsideration. Within sixty days of
receipt of such draft certification agreement, the governor shall
either approve the application and execute the certification agreement
or reject the application. The certification agreement shall be
binding upon execution by the governor and the applicant.
(3) The rejection of an application for certification by the
governor shall be final as to that application but shall not preclude
submission of a subsequent application for the same site on the basis
of changed conditions or new information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 The legislature finds that very large
coal-fired baseload electric generation facilities are major industrial
facilities whose closure, removal of structures, and site reclamation
requires significant planning and funding. In order to ensure that the
site of these facilities after closure is fully cleaned up, it is
necessary to require that the facility owner demonstrate during the
facility's operation that sufficient funding will be available for
closure and postclosure activities. Since the degree of cleanup
depends, in part, on the proposed future uses of a site, the closure
and postclosure requirements must consider the land use designations
and economic development plans of the host community. It is the intent
of the legislature to facilitate the transition of these facilities by
requiring facility decommissioning and site restoration plans that are
coordinated and consistent with economic development plans of affected
communities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 202 (1) A facility subject to closure under
RCW 80.80.040(3)(c), or a memorandum of agreement under section 106 of
this act, must provide the department of ecology with a plan for the
closure and postclosure of the facility at least twenty-four months
prior to its closure. This plan must be consistent with the rules
established by the energy facility site evaluation council for site
restoration and preservation applicable to facilities subject to a site
certification agreement under chapter 80.50 RCW and include but not be
limited to:
(a) A detailed estimate of the cost to implement the plan based on
the cost of hiring a third party to conduct all activities;
(b) Demonstrating financial assurance to fund the closure and
postclosure of the facility and providing methods by which this
assurance may be demonstrated;
(c) Methods for estimating closure costs, including full site
reclamation under all applicable federal and state clean-up standards;
and
(d) A decommissioning and site restoration plan that addresses
restoring physical topography, cleanup of all hazardous substances on
the site, potential future uses of the site following restoration, and
coordination with local and community plans for economic development in
the vicinity of the site.
(2) All cost estimates in the plan must be in current dollars and
may not include a net present value adjustment or offsets for salvage
value of wastes or other property.
(3) Adoption of the plan and significant revisions to the plan must
be approved by the department of ecology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 203 (1) A facility subject to closure under
RCW 80.80.040(3)(c), or a memorandum of agreement under section 106 of
this act, must guarantee funds are available to perform all activities
specified in the decommissioning plan developed under section 202 of
this act. The amount must equal the cost estimates specified in the
decommissioning plan and must be updated annually for inflation. All
guarantees under this section must be assumed by any successor owner,
parent company, or holding company.
(2) The guarantee required under subsection (1) of this section may
be accomplished by letter of credit, surety bond, or other means
acceptable to the department of ecology.
(3) The issuing institution of the letter of credit must be an
entity that has the authority to issue letters of credit and whose
letter of credit operations are regulated by a federal or state agency.
(4) A qualifying facility that uses a letter of credit to satisfy
the requirements of this act must also establish a standby trust fund
as a means to hold any funds issued from the letter of credit. Under
the terms of the letter of credit, all amounts paid pursuant to a draft
from the department of ecology must be deposited by the issuing
institution directly into the standby trust fund in accordance with
instructions from the department of ecology. This standby trust fund
must be approved by the department of ecology.
(5) The letter of credit must be irrevocable and issued for a
period of at least one year. The letter of credit must provide that
the expiration date will be automatically extended for a period of at
least one year unless, at least one hundred twenty days before the
current expiration date, the issuing institution notifies both the
qualifying facility and the department of ecology of a decision not to
extend the expiration date. Under the terms of the letter of credit,
the one hundred twenty days will begin on the date when both the
qualifying plant and the department of ecology have received the
notice, as evidenced by certified mail return receipts or by overnight
courier delivery receipts.
(6) If the qualifying facility does not establish an alternative
method of guaranteeing decommissioning funds are available within
ninety days after receipt by both the qualifying facility plant and the
department of ecology of a notice from the issuing institution that it
has decided not to extend the letter of credit beyond the current
expiration date, the department of ecology must draw on the letter of
credit. The department of ecology must approve any replacement or
substitute guarantee method before the expiration of the ninety-day
period.
(7) If a qualifying facility elects to use a letter of credit as
the sole method for guaranteeing decommissioning funds are available,
the face value of the letter of credit must meet or exceed the current
inflation-adjusted cost estimate.
(8) A qualifying facility must adjust the decommissioning costs and
financial guarantees annually for inflation and may use an amendment to
increase the face value of a letter of credit each year to account for
this inflation. A qualifying facility is not required to obtain a new
letter of credit to cover annual inflation adjustments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 204 Sections 201 through 203 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 It is in the public interest to assist
local communities in which very large energy generating facilities may
be closed, in order to plan for future economic uses of the site and in
the community surrounding the site.

Sec. 302 RCW 43.160.076 and 2008 c 327 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as authorized to the contrary under subsection (2) of
this section, from all funds available to the board for financial
assistance in a biennium under this chapter, the board shall approve at
least seventy-five percent of the first twenty million dollars of funds
available and at least fifty percent of any additional funds for
financial assistance for projects in rural counties.
(2) If at any time during the last six months of a biennium the
board finds that the actual and anticipated applications for qualified
projects in rural counties are clearly insufficient to use up the
allocations under subsection (1) of this section, then the board shall
estimate the amount of the insufficiency and during the remainder of
the biennium may use that amount of the allocation for financial
assistance to projects not located in rural counties.
(3) The board shall solicit qualifying projects to plan, design,
and construct public facilities needed to attract new industrial and
commercial activities in areas impacted by the closure or potential
closure of large coal-fired electric generation facilities, which for
the purposes of this section means a facility that emitted more than
one million tons of greenhouse gases in calendar year 2005. The
projects should be consistent with any applicable plans for major
industrial activity on lands formerly used or designated for surface
coal mining and supporting uses under RCW 36.70A.368. When the board
receives timely and eligible project applications from a political
subdivision of the state for financial assistance for such projects,
the board from available funds shall provide a priority for funding
projects at the following levels:
(a) For the 2011-2013 biennium, at least two hundred fifty thousand
dollars;
(b) For the 2013-2015 biennium, at least two hundred fifty thousand
dollars;
(c) For the 2015-2017 biennium, at least one million dollars;
(d) For the 2017-2019 biennium, at least one million dollars;
(e) For the 2019-2021 biennium, at least two million dollars; and
(f) For the 2021-2023 biennium, at least two million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 43.155
RCW to read as follows:
The board shall solicit qualifying projects to plan, design, and
construct public works projects needed to attract new industrial and
commercial activities in areas impacted by the closure or potential
closure of large coal-fired electric generation facilities, which for
the purposes of this section means a facility that emitted more than
one million tons of greenhouse gases in calendar year 2005. The
projects should be consistent with any applicable plans for major
industrial activity on lands formerly used or designated for surface
coal mining and supporting uses under RCW 36.70A.368. When the board
receives timely and eligible project applications from a political
subdivision of the state for financial assistance for such projects,
the board from available funds shall provide a priority for funding
projects at the following levels:
(1) For the 2011-2013 biennium, at least two hundred fifty thousand
dollars;
(2) For the 2013-2015 biennium, at least two hundred fifty thousand
dollars;
(3) For the 2015-2017 biennium, at least one million dollars;
(4) For the 2017-2019 biennium, at least one million dollars;
(5) For the 2019-2021 biennium, at least two million dollars; and
(6) For the 2021-2023 biennium, at least two million dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 A new section is added to chapter 80.80
RCW to read as follows:
The legislature finds that an electrical company's acquisition of
coal transition power helps to achieve the state's greenhouse gas
emission reduction goals by effecting an orderly transition to cleaner
fuels and supports the state's public policy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 A new section is added to chapter 80.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) On the petition of an electrical company, the commission shall
approve or disapprove a purchase power agreement for acquisition of
coal transition power, as defined in RCW 80.80.010, and the recovery of
related acquisition costs. No agreement for an electrical company's
acquisition of coal transition power takes effect until it is approved
by the commission.
(2) When a petition is filed, the commission shall provide notice
to the public and potentially affected parties and expedite the hearing
of that petition. The hearing of such a petition is not considered a
general rate case. However, the commission may require the utility to
file supporting testimony and exhibits. An administrative law judge of
the commission may enter an initial order including findings of fact
and conclusions of law, as provided in RCW 80.01.060(3). The
commission shall issue a final order that approves or disapproves the
acquisition of coal transition power within one hundred eighty days
after an electrical company files the petition.
(3) The commission must approve the acquisition of coal transition
power if it determines the resource is needed by the electrical company
to serve its ratepayers and the resource meets the need in a cost-effective manner as determined under the lowest reasonable cost
resource standards under chapter 19.280 RCW. As part of these
determinations, the commission shall consider, among other factors:
(a) The long-term economic benefit to the electrical company and
its ratepayers of such a long-term purchase; and
(b) The environmental benefits attributable to the orderly
transition away from coal-fired electric generation power.
(4) If the commission has not issued a final order within one
hundred eighty days from the date the petition is filed, or if the
commission disapproves the petition, the agreement for purchase of coal
transition power is null and void. In the event the commission
approves the agreement upon conditions other than those set forth in
the petition, the electrical company has the right to reject the
agreement.
(5) Upon commission approval of an electrical company's acquisition
of coal transition power in accordance with this section, the
electrical company is allowed to earn its equity component of its
authorized rate of return in the same manner as if it had purchased or
built an equivalent plant plus the cost of the coal transition power
contract. For purposes of this section, the initial value of an
equivalent plant is a purchased or self-built electric generation plant
with equivalent capacity costs as compared to the electrical company's
integrated resource plan in effect at the time the petition is filed.
The equivalent plant determined in the approval process will be
amortized on a straight line calculation over the life of the coal
transition power contract for the determination of the equity return in
future proceedings. This recovery must be determined and approved in
the process set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(6) An electrical company that purchases coal transition power, as
defined in RCW 80.80.010, under an agreement approved by the commission
pursuant to this section, may acquire other flexible capacity
resources, including for the purpose of integrating renewable
resources, and the purchase of coal transition power does not prohibit
the electrical company from acquiring other flexible capacity
resources. The commission shall not include the electric company's
purchase of coal transition power when considering the electrical
company's purchase of other flexible capacity resources.

Sec. 306 RCW 19.280.020 and 2009 c 565 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(2) "Conservation and efficiency resources" means any reduction in
electric power consumption that results from increases in the
efficiency of energy use, production, transmission, or distribution.
(3) "Consumer-owned utility" includes a municipal electric utility
formed under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title
54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a
cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or
association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, a port district formed
under Title 53 RCW, or a water-sewer district formed under Title 57
RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity to one
or more retail electric customers in the state.
(4) "Department" means the department of commerce.
(5) "Electric utility" means a consumer-owned or investor-owned
utility.
(6) "Full requirements customer" means an electric utility that
relies on the Bonneville power administration for all power needed to
supply its total load requirement other than that served by
nondispatchable generating resources totaling no more than six
megawatts or renewable resources.
(7) "Governing body" means the elected board of directors, city
council, commissioners, or board of any consumer-owned utility.
(8) "High efficiency cogeneration" means the sequential production
of electricity and useful thermal energy from a common fuel source,
where, under normal operating conditions, the facility has a useful
thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total
energy output.
(9) "Integrated resource plan" means an analysis describing the mix
of generating resources and conservation and efficiency resources that
will meet current and projected needs at the lowest reasonable cost to
the utility and its ratepayers and that complies with the requirements
specified in RCW 19.280.030(1).
(10) "Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by
investors that meets the definition in RCW 80.04.010 and is engaged in
distributing electricity to more than one retail electric customer in
the state.
(11) "Lowest reasonable cost" means the lowest cost mix of
generating resources and conservation and efficiency resources
determined through a detailed and consistent analysis of a wide range
of commercially available resources. At a minimum, this analysis must
consider resource cost, market-volatility risks, demand-side resource
uncertainties, resource dispatchability, resource effect on system
operation, the risks imposed on the utility and its ratepayers, public
policies regarding resource preference adopted by Washington state or
the federal government, and the cost of risks associated with
environmental effects including emissions of carbon dioxide. The
analysis also must consider public policies adopted by Washington state
to reduce greenhouse gases from thermal electric generation facilities
in the long term by temporarily exempting certain of those facilities
from the provisions of RCW 80.80.060 and 80.80.070.
(12) "Plan" means either an "integrated resource plan" or a
"resource plan."
(13) "Renewable resources" means electricity generation facilities
fueled by: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar energy; (d) geothermal
energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) biomass energy utilizing animal waste,
solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field residues or dedicated
energy crops that do not include wood pieces that have been treated
with chemical preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or
copper-chrome-arsenic; (g) by-products of pulping or wood manufacturing
processes, including but not limited to bark, wood chips, sawdust, and
lignin in spent pulping liquors; (h) ocean thermal, wave, or tidal
power; or (i) gas from sewage treatment facilities.
(14) "Resource plan" means an assessment that estimates electricity
loads and resources over a defined period of time and complies with the
requirements in RCW 19.280.030(2).

Sec. 307 RCW 19.280.030 and 2006 c 195 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Each electric utility must develop a plan consistent with this
section.
(1) Utilities with more than twenty-five thousand customers that
are not full requirements customers shall develop or update an
integrated resource plan by September 1, 2008. At a minimum, progress
reports reflecting changing conditions and the progress of the
integrated resource plan must be produced every two years thereafter.
An updated integrated resource plan must be developed at least every
four years subsequent to the 2008 integrated resource plan. The
integrated resource plan, at a minimum, must include:
(a) A range of forecasts, for at least the next ten years, of
projected customer demand which takes into account econometric data and
customer usage;
(b) An assessment of commercially available conservation and
efficiency resources. Such assessment may include, as appropriate,
high efficiency cogeneration, demand response and load management
programs, and currently employed and new policies and programs needed
to obtain the conservation and efficiency resources;
(c) An assessment of commercially available, utility scale
renewable and nonrenewable generating technologies including a
comparison of the benefits and risks of purchasing power from existing
resources or building new resources;
(d) A comparative evaluation of renewable and nonrenewable
generating resources, including transmission and distribution delivery
costs, and conservation and efficiency resources using "lowest
reasonable cost" as a criterion;
(e) The integration of the demand forecasts and resource
evaluations into a long-range assessment describing the mix of supply
side generating resources and conservation and efficiency resources
that will meet current and projected needs at the lowest reasonable
cost and risk to the utility and its ratepayers; and
(f) A short-term plan identifying the specific actions to be taken
by the utility consistent with the long-range integrated resource plan.
(2) All other utilities may elect to develop a full integrated
resource plan as set forth in subsection (1) of this section or, at a
minimum, shall develop a resource plan that:
(a) Estimates loads for the next five and ten years;
(b) Enumerates the resources that will be maintained and/or
acquired to serve those loads; and
(c) Explains why the resources in (b) of this subsection were
chosen and, if the resources chosen are not renewable resources or
conservation and efficiency resources, why such a decision was made.
(3) An electric utility that is required to develop a resource plan
under this section must complete its initial plan by September 1, 2008.
(4) Resource plans developed under this section must be updated on
a regular basis, at a minimum on intervals of two years.
(5) Plans shall not be a basis to bring legal action against
electric utilities.
(6) Each electric utility shall publish its final plan either as
part of an annual report or as a separate document available to the
public. The report may be in an electronic form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 A new section is added to chapter 80.70
RCW to read as follows:
An applicant for a natural gas-fired generation plant to be
constructed in a county with a coal-fired electric generation facility
subject to RCW 80.80.040(3)(c) is exempt from this chapter if the
application is filed before December 31, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 No civil liability may be imposed by any
court on the state, its officers, employees, instrumentalities, or
subdivisions under section 101, 201, or 301 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---