BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.46.0315 and 1991 c 192 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Bona fide charitable or bona fide nonprofit organizations organized
primarily for purposes other than the conduct of raffles, are hereby
authorized to conduct raffles without obtaining a license to do so from
the commission when such raffles are held in accordance with all other
requirements of this chapter, other applicable laws, and rules of the
commission; when gross revenues from all such raffles held by the
organization during the calendar year do not exceed ((five)) fifteen
thousand dollars; and when tickets to such raffles are sold only to,
and winners are determined only from among, the regular members of the
organization conducting the raffle. The organization may provide
unopened containers of beverages containing alcohol as raffle prizes if
the appropriate permit has been obtained from the liquor control board:
PROVIDED, That the term members for this purpose shall mean only those
persons who have become members prior to the commencement of the raffle
and whose qualification for membership was not dependent upon, or in
any way related to, the purchase of a ticket, or tickets, for such
raffles.

--- END ---