BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.05.065 and 2009 c 537 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board shall study all matters connected with the provision
of health care coverage, life insurance, liability insurance,
accidental death and dismemberment insurance, and disability income
insurance or any of, or a combination of, the enumerated types of
insurance for employees and their dependents on the best basis possible
with relation both to the welfare of the employees and to the state.
However, liability insurance shall not be made available to dependents.
(2) The board shall develop employee benefit plans that include
comprehensive health care benefits for employees. In developing these
plans, the board shall consider the following elements:
(a) Methods of maximizing cost containment while ensuring access to
quality health care;
(b) Development of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment and ensure access to quality care, including but not
limited to prepaid delivery systems and prospective payment methods;
(c) Wellness incentives that focus on proven strategies, such as
smoking cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol
misuse, appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and
motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol reduction, and nutrition
education;
(d) Utilization review procedures including, but not limited to a
cost-efficient method for prior authorization of services, hospital
inpatient length of stay review, requirements for use of outpatient
surgeries and second opinions for surgeries, review of invoices or
claims submitted by service providers, and performance audit of
providers;
(e) Effective coordination of benefits; and
(f) Minimum standards for insuring entities.
(3) To maintain the comprehensive nature of employee health care
benefits, benefits provided to employees shall be substantially
equivalent to the state employees' health benefits plan in effect on
January 1, 1993. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit changes or
increases in employee point-of-service payments or employee premium
payments for benefits or the administration of a high deductible health
plan in conjunction with a health savings account. The board may
establish employee eligibility criteria which are not substantially
equivalent to employee eligibility criteria in effect on January 1,
1993.
(4) Except if bargained for under chapter 41.80 RCW, the board
shall design benefits and determine the terms and conditions of
employee and retired employee participation and coverage, including
establishment of eligibility criteria subject to the requirements of
this chapter. Employer groups obtaining benefits through contractual
agreement with the authority for employees defined in RCW 41.05.011(6)
(a) through (d) may contractually agree with the authority to benefits
eligibility criteria which differs from that determined by the board.
The eligibility criteria established by the board shall be no more
restrictive than the following:
(a) Except as provided in (b) through (e) of this subsection, an
employee is eligible for benefits from the date of employment if the
employing agency anticipates he or she will work an average of at least
eighty hours per month and for at least eight hours in each month for
more than six consecutive months. An employee determined ineligible
for benefits at the beginning of his or her employment shall become
eligible in the following circumstances:
(i) An employee who works an average of at least eighty hours per
month and for at least eight hours in each month and whose anticipated
duration of employment is revised from less than or equal to six
consecutive months to more than six consecutive months becomes eligible
when the revision is made.
(ii) An employee who works an average of at least eighty hours per
month over a period of six consecutive months and for at least eight
hours in each of those six consecutive months becomes eligible at the
first of the month following the six-month averaging period.
(b) A seasonal employee is eligible for benefits from the date of
employment if the employing agency anticipates that he or she will work
an average of at least eighty hours per month and for at least eight
hours in each month of the season. A seasonal employee determined
ineligible at the beginning of his or her employment who works an
average of at least half-time, as defined by the board, per month over
a period of six consecutive months and at least eight hours in each of
those six consecutive months becomes eligible at the first of the month
following the six-month averaging period. A benefits-eligible seasonal
employee who works a season of less than nine months shall not be
eligible for the employer contribution during the off season, but may
continue enrollment in benefits during the off season by self-paying
for the benefits. A benefits-eligible seasonal employee who works a
season of nine months or more is eligible for the employer contribution
through the off season following each season worked.
(c) Faculty are eligible as follows:
(i) Faculty who the employing agency anticipates will work
half–time or more for the entire instructional year or equivalent nine-month period are eligible for benefits from the date of employment.
Eligibility shall continue until the beginning of the first full month
of the next instructional year, unless the employment relationship is
terminated, in which case eligibility shall cease the first month
following the notice of termination or the effective date of the
termination, whichever is later.
(ii) Faculty who the employing agency anticipates will not work for
the entire instructional year or equivalent nine-month period are
eligible for benefits at the beginning of the second consecutive
quarter or semester of employment in which he or she is anticipated to
work, or has actually worked, half-time or more. Such an employee
shall continue to receive uninterrupted employer contributions for
benefits if the employee works at least half-time in a quarter or
semester. Faculty who the employing agency anticipates will not work
for the entire instructional year or equivalent nine-month period, but
who actually work half-time or more throughout the entire instructional
year, are eligible for summer or off-quarter coverage. Faculty who
have met the criteria of this subsection (4)(c)(ii), who work at least
two quarters of the academic year with an average academic year
workload of half-time or more for three quarters of the academic year,
and who have worked an average of half-time or more in each of the two
preceding academic years shall continue to receive uninterrupted
employer contributions for benefits if he or she works at least half-time in a quarter or semester or works two quarters of the academic
year with an average academic workload each academic year of half-time
or more for three quarters. Eligibility under this section ceases
immediately if this criteria is not met.
(iii) Faculty may establish or maintain eligibility for benefits by
working for more than one institution of higher education. When
faculty work for more than one institution of higher education, those
institutions shall prorate the employer contribution costs, or if
eligibility is reached through one institution, that institution will
pay the full employer contribution. Faculty working for more than one
institution must alert his or her employers to his or her potential
eligibility in order to establish eligibility.
(iv) The employing agency must provide written notice to faculty
who are potentially eligible for benefits under this subsection (4)(c)
of their potential eligibility.
(v) To be eligible for maintenance of benefits through averaging
under (c)(ii) of this subsection, faculty must provide written
notification to his or her employing agency or agencies of his or her
potential eligibility.
(d) A legislator is eligible for benefits on the date his or her
term begins. All other elected and full-time appointed officials of
the legislative and executive branches of state government are eligible
for benefits on the date his or her term begins or they take the oath
of office, whichever occurs first.
(e) A justice of the supreme court and judges of the court of
appeals and the superior courts become eligible for benefits on the
date he or she takes the oath of office.
(f) Except as provided in (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection,
eligibility ceases for any employee the first of the month following
termination of the employment relationship.
(g) In determining eligibility under this section, the employing
agency may disregard training hours, standby hours, or temporary
changes in work hours as determined by the authority under this
section.
(h) Insurance coverage for all eligible employees begins on the
first day of the month following the date when eligibility for benefits
is established. If the date eligibility is established is the first
working day of a month, insurance coverage begins on that date.
(i) Eligibility for an employee whose work circumstances are
described by more than one of the eligibility categories in (a) through
(e) of this subsection shall be determined solely by the criteria of
the category that most closely describes the employee's work
circumstances.
(j) Except for an employee eligible for benefits under (b) or
(c)(ii) of this subsection, an employee who has established eligibility
for benefits under this section shall remain eligible for benefits each
month in which he or she is in pay status for eight or more hours, if
(i) he or she remains in a benefits-eligible position and (ii) leave
from the benefits-eligible position is approved by the employing
agency. A benefits-eligible seasonal employee is eligible for the
employer contribution in any month of his or her season in which he or
she is in pay status eight or more hours during that month.
Eligibility ends if these conditions are not met, the employment
relationship is terminated, or the employee voluntarily transfers to a
noneligible position.
(k) For the purposes of this subsection:
(i) "Academic year" means summer, fall, winter, and spring quarters
or semesters;
(ii) "Half-time" means one-half of the full-time academic workload
as determined by each institution, except that half-time for community
and technical college faculty employees shall have the same meaning as
"part-time" under RCW 28B.50.489;
(iii) "Benefits-eligible position" shall be defined by the board.
(5) The board may authorize premium contributions for an employee
and the employee's dependents in a manner that encourages the use of
cost-efficient managed health care systems.
(6) For any open enrollment period following the effective date of
this section, the board shall ((develop)) offer a health savings
account option for employees that conforms to section 223, Part VII of
subchapter B of chapter 1 of the internal revenue code of 1986. The
board shall comply with all applicable federal standards related to the
establishment of health savings accounts.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, for any
open enrollment period following the effective date of this section,
the board shall ((develop)) offer a high deductible health plan ((to be
offered)) in conjunction with a health savings account developed under
subsection (6) of this section.
(8) Employees shall choose participation in one of the health care
benefit plans developed by the board and may be permitted to waive
coverage under terms and conditions established by the board.
(9) The board shall review plans proposed by insuring entities that
desire to offer property insurance and/or accident and casualty
insurance to state employees through payroll deduction. The board may
approve any such plan for payroll deduction by insuring entities
holding a valid certificate of authority in the state of Washington and
which the board determines to be in the best interests of employees and
the state. The board shall adopt rules setting forth criteria by which
it shall evaluate the plans.
(10) Before January 1, 1998, the public employees' benefits board
shall make available one or more fully insured long-term care insurance
plans that comply with the requirements of chapter 48.84 RCW. Such
programs shall be made available to eligible employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees as well as eligible dependents
which, for the purpose of this section, includes the parents of the
employee or retiree and the parents of the spouse of the employee or
retiree. Employees of local governments, political subdivisions, and
tribal governments not otherwise enrolled in the public employees'
benefits board sponsored medical programs may enroll under terms and
conditions established by the administrator, if it does not jeopardize
the financial viability of the public employees' benefits board's long-term care offering.
(a) Participation of eligible employees or retired employees and
retired school employees in any long-term care insurance plan made
available by the public employees' benefits board is voluntary and
shall not be subject to binding arbitration under chapter 41.56 RCW.
Participation is subject to reasonable underwriting guidelines and
eligibility rules established by the public employees' benefits board
and the health care authority.
(b) The employee, retired employee, and retired school employee are
solely responsible for the payment of the premium rates developed by
the health care authority. The health care authority is authorized to
charge a reasonable administrative fee in addition to the premium
charged by the long-term care insurer, which shall include the health
care authority's cost of administration, marketing, and consumer
education materials prepared by the health care authority and the
office of the insurance commissioner.
(c) To the extent administratively possible, the state shall
establish an automatic payroll or pension deduction system for the
payment of the long-term care insurance premiums.
(d) The public employees' benefits board and the health care
authority shall establish a technical advisory committee to provide
advice in the development of the benefit design and establishment of
underwriting guidelines and eligibility rules. The committee shall
also advise the board and authority on effective and cost-effective
ways to market and distribute the long-term care product. The
technical advisory committee shall be comprised, at a minimum, of
representatives of the office of the insurance commissioner, providers
of long-term care services, licensed insurance agents with expertise in
long-term care insurance, employees, retired employees, retired school
employees, and other interested parties determined to be appropriate by
the board.
(e) The health care authority shall offer employees, retired
employees, and retired school employees the option of purchasing long-term care insurance through licensed agents or brokers appointed by the
long-term care insurer. The authority, in consultation with the public
employees' benefits board, shall establish marketing procedures and may
consider all premium components as a part of the contract negotiations
with the long-term care insurer.
(f) In developing the long-term care insurance benefit designs, the
public employees' benefits board shall include an alternative plan of
care benefit, including adult day services, as approved by the office
of the insurance commissioner.
(g) The health care authority, with the cooperation of the office
of the insurance commissioner, shall develop a consumer education
program for the eligible employees, retired employees, and retired
school employees designed to provide education on the potential need
for long-term care, methods of financing long-term care, and the
availability of long-term care insurance products including the
products offered by the board.
(11) The board may establish penalties to be imposed by the
authority when the eligibility determinations of an employing agency
fail to comply with the criteria under this chapter.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.05.021 and 2009 c 537 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Washington state health care authority is created within
the executive branch. The authority shall have an administrator
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. The
administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The
administrator may employ up to seven staff members, who shall be exempt
from chapter 41.06 RCW, and any additional staff members as are
necessary to administer this chapter. The administrator may delegate
any power or duty vested in him or her by this chapter, including
authority to make final decisions and enter final orders in hearings
conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The primary duties of the authority
shall be to: Administer state employees' insurance benefits and
retired or disabled school employees' insurance benefits; administer
the basic health plan pursuant to chapter 70.47 RCW; study state-purchased health care programs in order to maximize cost containment in
these programs while ensuring access to quality health care; implement
state initiatives, joint purchasing strategies, and techniques for
efficient administration that have potential application to all state-
purchased health services; and administer grants that further the
mission and goals of the authority. The authority's duties include,
but are not limited to, the following:
(a) To administer health care benefit programs for employees and
retired or disabled school employees as specifically authorized in RCW
41.05.065 and in accordance with the methods described in RCW
41.05.075, 41.05.140, and other provisions of this chapter;
(b) To analyze state-purchased health care programs and to explore
options for cost containment and delivery alternatives for those
programs that are consistent with the purposes of those programs,
including, but not limited to:
(i) Creation of economic incentives for the persons for whom the
state purchases health care to appropriately utilize and purchase
health care services, including the development of flexible benefit
plans to offset increases in individual financial responsibility;
(ii) Utilization of provider arrangements that encourage cost
containment, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems,
utilization review, and prospective payment methods, and that ensure
access to quality care, including assuring reasonable access to local
providers, especially for employees residing in rural areas;
(iii) Coordination of state agency efforts to purchase drugs
effectively as provided in RCW 70.14.050;
(iv) Development of recommendations and methods for purchasing
medical equipment and supporting services on a volume discount basis;
(v) Development of data systems to obtain utilization data from
state-purchased health care programs in order to identify cost centers,
utilization patterns, provider and hospital practice patterns, and
procedure costs, utilizing the information obtained pursuant to RCW
41.05.031; and
(vi) In collaboration with other state agencies that administer
state purchased health care programs, private health care purchasers,
health care facilities, providers, and carriers:
(A) Use evidence-based medicine principles to develop common
performance measures and implement financial incentives in contracts
with insuring entities, health care facilities, and providers that:
(I) Reward improvements in health outcomes for individuals with
chronic diseases, increased utilization of appropriate preventive
health services, and reductions in medical errors; and
(II) Increase, through appropriate incentives to insuring entities,
health care facilities, and providers, the adoption and use of
information technology that contributes to improved health outcomes,
better coordination of care, and decreased medical errors;
(B) Through state health purchasing, reimbursement, or pilot
strategies, promote and increase the adoption of health information
technology systems, including electronic medical records, by hospitals
as defined in RCW 70.41.020(4), integrated delivery systems, and
providers that:
(I) Facilitate diagnosis or treatment;
(II) Reduce unnecessary duplication of medical tests;
(III) Promote efficient electronic physician order entry;
(IV) Increase access to health information for consumers and their
providers; and
(V) Improve health outcomes;
(C) Coordinate a strategy for the adoption of health information
technology systems using the final health information technology report
and recommendations developed under chapter 261, Laws of 2005;
(c) To analyze areas of public and private health care interaction;
(d) To provide information and technical and administrative
assistance to the board;
(e) To review and approve or deny applications from counties,
municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state to
provide state-sponsored insurance or self-insurance programs to their
employees in accordance with the provisions of RCW 41.04.205 and (g) of
this subsection, setting the premium contribution for approved groups
as outlined in RCW 41.05.050;
(f) To review and approve or deny the application when the
governing body of a tribal government applies to transfer their
employees to an insurance or self-insurance program administered under
this chapter. In the event of an employee transfer pursuant to this
subsection (1)(f), members of the governing body are eligible to be
included in such a transfer if the members are authorized by the tribal
government to participate in the insurance program being transferred
from and subject to payment by the members of all costs of insurance
for the members. The authority shall: (i) Establish the conditions
for participation; (ii) have the sole right to reject the application;
and (iii) set the premium contribution for approved groups as outlined
in RCW 41.05.050. Approval of the application by the authority
transfers the employees and dependents involved to the insurance,
self-insurance, or health care program approved by the authority;
(g) To ensure the continued status of the employee insurance or
self-insurance programs administered under this chapter as a
governmental plan under section 3(32) of the employee retirement income
security act of 1974, as amended, the authority shall limit the
participation of employees of a county, municipal, school district,
educational service district, or other political subdivision, or a
tribal government, including providing for the participation of those
employees whose services are substantially all in the performance of
essential governmental functions, but not in the performance of
commercial activities;
(h) To establish billing procedures and collect funds from school
districts in a way that minimizes the administrative burden on
districts;
(i) To publish and distribute to nonparticipating school districts
and educational service districts by October 1st of each year a
description of health care benefit plans available through the
authority and the estimated cost if school districts and educational
service district employees were enrolled;
(j) To apply for, receive, and accept grants, gifts, and other
payments, including property and service, from any governmental or
other public or private entity or person, and make arrangements as to
the use of these receipts to implement initiatives and strategies
developed under this section;
(k) To issue, distribute, and administer grants that further the
mission and goals of the authority;
(l) To adopt rules consistent with this chapter as described in RCW
41.05.160 including, but not limited to:
(i) Setting forth the criteria established by the board under RCW
41.05.065 for determining whether an employee is eligible for benefits;
(ii) Establishing an appeal process in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW by which an employee may appeal an eligibility determination;
(iii) Establishing a process to assure that the eligibility
determinations of an employing agency comply with the criteria under
this chapter, including the imposition of penalties as may be
authorized by the board.
(2) On and after January 1, 1996, the public employees' benefits
board may implement strategies to promote managed competition among
employee health benefit plans. Strategies may include but are not
limited to:
(a) Standardizing the benefit package;
(b) Soliciting competitive bids for the benefit package;
(c) Limiting the state's contribution to a percent of the lowest
priced qualified plan within a geographical area;
(d) Monitoring the impact of the approach under this subsection
with regards to: Efficiencies in health service delivery, cost shifts
to subscribers, access to and choice of managed care plans statewide,
and quality of health services. The health care authority shall also
advise on the value of administering a benchmark employer-managed plan
to promote competition among managed care plans.
(3)(a) During the 2013 and 2014 plan years, the authority must
include in its provider network for a self-insured health benefit plan
a direct patient-provider primary care practice as provided in chapter
48.150 RCW.
(b) The authority shall use best efforts to enroll at least one
thousand members residing in King, Pierce, or Thurston counties.
(c) To participate in the network, a practice must have prior
experience with at least two thousand direct patients, as defined in
RCW 48.150.010, and must have the capability to produce and analyze
data on disease management, prevention measures, practice utilization,
medication utilization, and referrals and be able to link to downstream
utilization data provided by the plan.
(d) By November 30, 2015, the authority shall submit to the
legislature a performance evaluation of direct patient-provider primary
care practices participation under this subsection. The evaluation
shall include the cost effectiveness of this model and the impact on
employee access to quality, affordable health care.
(e) Funding for services provided by a direct patient-provider
primary care practice under this section must not increase the
resources provided by employer funding rates provided for employee
health benefits in the omnibus appropriations act in the absence of
these provisions.

Sec. 3 RCW 48.150.040 and 2009 c 552 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Direct practices may not:
(a) Enter into a participating provider contract as defined in RCW
48.44.010 or 48.46.020 with any carrier or with any carrier's
contractor or subcontractor, or plans administered under chapter
((41.05,)) 70.47((,)) or 70.47A RCW, to provide health care services
through a direct agreement except as set forth in subsection (2) of
this section;
(b)(i) Submit a claim for payment to any carrier or any carrier's
contractor or subcontractor, or plans administered under chapter
((41.05,)) 70.47((,)) or 70.47A RCW, for health care services provided
to direct patients as covered by their agreement; or
(ii) Submit a claim for payment, other than the direct fee and any
other negotiated ancillary costs, to any plan administered under
chapter 41.05 RCW, for health care services provided to direct patients
as covered by their agreement;
(c) With respect to services provided through a direct agreement,
be identified by a carrier or any carrier's contractor or
subcontractor, or plans administered under chapter ((41.05,))
70.47((,)) or 70.47A RCW, as a participant in the carrier's or any
carrier's contractor or subcontractor network for purposes of
determining network adequacy or being available for selection by an
enrollee under a carrier's benefit plan; or
(d) Pay for health care services covered by a direct agreement
rendered to direct patients by providers other than the providers in
the direct practice or their employees, except as described in
subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(2) Direct practices and providers may:
(a) Enter into a participating provider contract as defined by RCW
48.44.010 and 48.46.020 or plans administered under chapter 41.05,
70.47, or 70.47A RCW for purposes other than payment of claims for
services provided to direct patients through a direct agreement. Such
providers shall be subject to all other provisions of the participating
provider contract applicable to participating providers including but
not limited to the right to:
(i) Make referrals to other participating providers;
(ii) Admit the carrier's members to participating hospitals and
other health care facilities;
(iii) Prescribe prescription drugs; and
(iv) Implement other customary provisions of the contract not
dealing with reimbursement of services;
(b) Pay for charges associated with the provision of routine lab
and imaging services. In aggregate such payments per year per direct
patient are not to exceed fifteen percent of the total annual direct
fee charged that direct patient. Exceptions to this limitation may
occur in the event of short-term equipment failure if such failure
prevents the provision of care that should not be delayed; and
(c) Charge an additional fee to direct patients for supplies,
medications, and specific vaccines provided to direct patients that are
specifically excluded under the agreement, provided the direct practice
notifies the direct patient of the additional charge, prior to their
administration or delivery.

--- END ---