BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Effective July 1, 2012:
(1) Cascadia Community College shall be consolidated with Lake
Washington Technical College, shall no longer be a separate institution
of higher education located in Bothell, and shall no longer own or
occupy, permanently or temporarily, any facilities in Bothell.
(2) All Cascadia Community College real property located in Bothell
shall be owned and occupied by the University of Washington.
(3) All students enrolled in Cascadia Community College shall be
considered enrolled in Lake Washington Technical College and all
credits earned before July 1, 2012, shall be honored at Lake Washington
Technical College.
(4) All governance and administrative functions and offices of
Cascadia Community College shall be consolidated, without duplication,
with the governance and administrative functions and offices of Lake
Washington Technical College.
(5)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material connected with the powers, duties, and
functions transferred in this act shall be delivered to the custody of
Lake Washington Technical College. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed in
connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be
made available to Lake Washington Technical College. All funds,
credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, duties,
and functions transferred shall be assigned to Lake Washington
Technical College.
(b) Any appropriations made in connection with the powers, duties,
and functions transferred shall, on the effective date of this section,
be transferred and credited to Lake Washington Technical College.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, or as to
the powers, duties, and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(6) All classified employees employed in connection with the
powers, duties, and functions transferred are transferred to the
jurisdiction of Lake Washington Technical College. All employees
classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are
assigned to Lake Washington Technical College to perform their usual
duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights,
subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance
with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(7) All rules and all pending business before any agency of state
government pertaining to the powers, duties, and functions transferred
shall be continued and acted upon by Lake Washington Technical College.
All existing contracts, obligations, and agreements shall remain in
full force and shall be performed by Lake Washington Technical College.
(8) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel
shall not affect the validity of any act performed by any employee
before the effective date of this section.
(9) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(10) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter
any existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any
existing collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has
expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the
public employment relations commission as provided by law.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.45.020 and 2005 c 258 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The University of Washington is responsible for ensuring the
expansion of baccalaureate and graduate educational programs in the
central Puget Sound area under rules or guidelines adopted by the
higher education coordinating board and in accordance with
proportionality agreements emphasizing access for transfer students
developed with the state board for community and technical colleges.
The University of Washington shall meet that responsibility through the
operation of at least two branch campuses. One branch campus shall be
located in the Tacoma area. Another branch campus shall be
((collocated with Cascadia Community College)) located in the Bothell-Woodinville area.
(2) At the University of Washington Tacoma, a top priority is
expansion of upper division capacity for transfer students and graduate
capacity and programs. Beginning in the fall of 2006, the campus may
offer lower division courses linked to specific majors in fields not
addressed at local community colleges. The campus shall admit lower
division students through coadmission or coenrollment agreements with
a community college, or through direct transfer for students who have
accumulated approximately one year of transferable college credits. In
addition to offering lower division courses linked to specific majors
as addressed above, the campus may also directly admit freshmen and
sophomores gradually and deliberately in accordance with the campus
plan submitted to the higher education coordinating board in 2004.
(3) At the University of Washington Bothell, a top priority is
expansion of upper division capacity for transfer students and graduate
capacity and programs. ((The campus shall also seek additional
opportunities to collaborate with and maximize its collocation
[colocation] with Cascadia Community College.)) Beginning in the fall
of 2006, the campus may offer lower division courses linked to specific
majors in fields not addressed at local community colleges. The campus
may admit lower division students through coadmission or coenrollment
agreements with a community college, or through direct transfer for
students who have accumulated approximately one year of transferable
college credits. In addition to offering lower division courses linked
to specific majors as addressed above, the campus may also directly
admit freshmen and sophomores gradually and deliberately in accordance
with the campus plan submitted to the higher education coordinating
board in 2004.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.45.0201 and 1994 c 217 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislature finds that population growth in north King and
south Snohomish counties has created a need to expand higher education
and workforce training programs for the people living and working in
those areas. In keeping with the recommendations of the higher
education coordinating board, the legislature intends to help address
those education and training needs through ((the creation of Cascadia
Community College,)) expansion of educational opportunities at Lake
Washington Technical College((,)) and support of the University of
Washington's branch campus at Bothell-Woodinville. ((It is further the
intention of the legislature, in keeping with the higher education
coordinating board recommendations, that the Cascadia Community College
and the University of Washington branch campus be collocated, and that
the new community college and the University of Washington's branch
campus work in partnership to ensure that properly prepared students
from community colleges and other institutions are able to transfer
smoothly to the branch campus.
The legislature further finds that a governing board for Cascadia
Community College needs to be appointed and confirmed as expeditiously
as possible. The legislature intends to work cooperatively with the
governor to facilitate the appointment and confirmation of trustees for
the college.))

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.50.040 and 1994 c 217 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The state of Washington is hereby divided into ((thirty)) twenty-nine college districts as follows:
(1) The first district shall encompass the counties of Clallam and
Jefferson;
(2) The second district shall encompass the counties of Grays
Harbor and Pacific;
(3) The third district shall encompass the counties of Kitsap and
Mason;
(4) The fourth district shall encompass the counties of San Juan,
Skagit and Island;
(5) The fifth district shall encompass Snohomish county except for
the Northshore common school district and that portion encompassed by
the twenty-third district created in subsection (23) of this section:
PROVIDED, That the fifth district shall encompass the Everett Community
College;
(6) The sixth district shall encompass the present boundaries of
the common school districts of Seattle and Vashon Island, King county;
(7) The seventh district shall encompass the present boundary of
the common school district of Shoreline in King county;
(8) The eighth district shall encompass the present boundaries of
the common school districts of Bellevue, Issaquah, Mercer Island,
Skykomish and Snoqualmie, King county;
(9) The ninth district shall encompass the present boundaries of
the common school districts of Federal Way, Highline and South Central,
King county;
(10) The tenth district shall encompass the present boundaries of
the common school districts of Auburn, Black Diamond, Renton, Enumclaw,
Kent, Lester and Tahoma, King county, and the King county portion of
Puyallup common school district No. 3;
(11) The eleventh district shall encompass all of Pierce county,
except for the present boundaries of the common school districts of
Tacoma and Peninsula;
(12) The twelfth district shall encompass Lewis county, the
Rochester common school district No. 401, the Tenino common school
district No. 402 of Thurston county, and the Thurston county portion of
the Centralia common school district No. 401;
(13) The thirteenth district shall encompass the counties of
Cowlitz, and Wahkiakum;
(14) The fourteenth district shall encompass the counties of Clark,
Skamania and that portion of Klickitat county not included in the
sixteenth district;
(15) The fifteenth district shall encompass the counties of Chelan,
Douglas and Okanogan;
(16) The sixteenth district shall encompass the counties of
Kittitas, Yakima, and that portion of Klickitat county included in
United States census divisions 1 through 4;
(17) The seventeenth district shall encompass the counties of
Ferry, Lincoln (except consolidated school district 105-157-166J and
the Lincoln county portion of common school district 167-202), Pend
Oreille, Spokane, Stevens and Whitman;
(18) The eighteenth district shall encompass the counties of Adams
and Grant, and that portion of Lincoln county comprising consolidated
school district 105-157-166J and common school district 167-202;
(19) The nineteenth district shall encompass the counties of Benton
and Franklin;
(20) The twentieth district shall encompass the counties of Asotin,
Columbia, Garfield and Walla Walla;
(21) The twenty-first district shall encompass Whatcom county;
(22) The twenty-second district shall encompass the present
boundaries of the common school districts of Tacoma and Peninsula,
Pierce county;
(23) The twenty-third district shall encompass that portion of
Snohomish county within such boundaries as the state board for
community and technical colleges shall determine: PROVIDED, That the
twenty-third district shall encompass the Edmonds Community College;
(24) The twenty-fourth district shall encompass all of Thurston
county except the Rochester common school district No. 401, the Tenino
common school district No. 402, and the Thurston county portion of the
Centralia common school district No. 401;
(25) The twenty-fifth district shall encompass all of Whatcom
county;
(26) The twenty-sixth district shall encompass the Northshore, Lake
Washington, Bellevue, Mercer Island, Issaquah, Riverview, Snoqualmie
Valley and Skykomish school districts;
(27) The twenty-seventh district shall encompass the Renton, Kent,
Auburn, Tahoma, and Enumclaw school districts and a portion of the
Seattle school district described as follows: Commencing at a point
established by the intersection of the Duwamish river and the south
boundary of the Seattle Community College District (number six) and
thence north along the centerline of the Duwamish river to the west
waterway; thence north along the centerline of the west waterway to
Elliot Bay; thence along Elliot Bay to a line established by the
intersection of the extension of Denny Way to Elliot Bay; thence east
along the line established by the centerline of Denny Way to Lake
Washington; thence south along the shoreline of Lake Washington to the
south line of the Seattle Community College District; and thence west
along the south line of the Seattle Community College District to the
point of beginning;
(28) The twenty-eighth district shall encompass all of Pierce
county; and
(29) The twenty-ninth district shall encompass all of Pierce
county((; and
(30) The thirtieth district shall encompass the present boundaries
of the common school districts of Lake Washington and Riverview in King
county and Northshore in King and Snohomish counties)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 By October 1, 2011, the boards of trustees
for Cascadia Community College and for Lake Washington Technical
College, and the state board for community and technical colleges shall
devise a plan necessary to implement the changes provided for in this
act that includes a plan to eliminate duplication of governance and
administrative functions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 By December 1, 2011, the boards of trustees
for Cascadia Community College and for Lake Washington Technical
College, and the state board for community and technical colleges shall
submit to the legislature any corrective or clarifying legislation
necessary to effect the changes provided for in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 28B.50.1406 (Cascadia Community College
board of trustees) and 1994 c 217 s 4 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act takes effect August 1, 2011.

--- END ---