BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Outdoor car washing has the potential to
result in high loads of nutrients, metals, and hydrocarbons draining
directly into Washington waters as a result of the detergent and
chemical-rich water used to wash cars flowing into storm drains.
(2) The legislature finds that vehicle washing activities affect
local water quality and drinking water quality, and that the water from
car washes and the chemicals in many detergents are harmful to fish and
other aquatic life.
(3) The legislature intends to make Washington waters cleaner and
healthier by limiting the pollution from car washes from entering into
watersheds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
All charity car wash fund-raisers that do not use the facilities
and premises of a commercial car wash facility must adhere to the
following requirements:
(1) Use only biodegradable soaps;
(2) Wash all cars on gravel, grass, or other permeable surfaces;
(3) Use hoses with nozzles that automatically turn off when left
unattended;
(4)(a) Block off all storm drains surrounding the premises during
the charity car wash event; or
(b) Use a storm drain insert on all storm drains surrounding the
premises to catch car wash water during the charity car wash event; and
(5)(a) Pump water from car washes into a sanitary sewer drain; or
(b) If (a) of this subsection is not feasible, pump car wash water
onto grass or landscaping to provide filtration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
A person found in violation of section 2 of this act must serve a
minimum of six hours of community service related to storm water
education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
Annually, during the month of May, each public school shall conduct
or promote educational activities that provide instruction, awareness,
and understanding of the effects of storm water pollution in
Washington, including the effects of vehicle washing activities on
local water quality and drinking water quality.

--- END ---