BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.52.100 and 2008 c 96 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purpose of forming a cemetery district, a petition
designating the boundaries of the proposed district by metes and bounds
or describing the lands to be included in the proposed district by
government townships, ranges, and legal subdivisions, signed by not
less than ten percent of the registered voters who reside within the
boundaries of the proposed district based on the total vote cast in the
last general county election, setting forth the object of the formation
of such district and stating that the establishment thereof will be
conducive to the public welfare and convenience, ((shall)) must be
filed with the county auditor of the county within which the proposed
district is located, accompanied by an obligation signed by two or more
petitioners agreeing to pay the cost of publishing the notice
hereinafter provided for. The county auditor ((shall)) must, within
((thirty)) fifteen days from the date of filing of such petition,
examine the signatures and certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency
thereof. ((The name of any person who signed a petition shall not be
withdrawn from the petition after it has been filed with the county
auditor. If the petition is found to contain a sufficient number of
valid signatures)) If the petition is found to be insufficient, it must
be returned to the persons filing it, who may amend or add names
thereto for ten days, when it must be returned to the auditor, who has
an additional fifteen days to examine it and attach the certificate
thereto. No person signing the petition may withdraw his or her name
from the petition after filing. When the petition is certified as
sufficient, the county auditor ((shall)) must transmit it, together
with ((a)) the certificate of sufficiency attached, to the county
legislative authority, which ((shall)) must thereupon, by resolution
entered upon its minutes, receive the same and fix a day and hour when
it will publicly hear the petition.

Sec. 2 RCW 68.52.170 and 1947 c 6 s 9 are each amended to read as
follows:
The returns of such election ((shall)) must be canvassed at the
court house ((on the Monday next following the day of the election, but
the canvass)) following the election and may be adjourned from time to
time if necessary to await the receipt of election returns which may be
unavoidably delayed. The canvassing officials, upon conclusion of the
canvass, ((shall forthwith)) must certify the results thereof in
writing to the board of county commissioners. If upon examination of
the certificate of the canvassing officials it is found that ((two-thirds)) a simple majority of all the votes cast at ((said)) the
election were in favor of the formation of the cemetery district, the
board of county commissioners ((shall)) must, by resolution entered
upon its minutes, declare such territory duly organized as a cemetery
district under the name theretofore designated and ((shall)) must
declare the three candidates receiving the highest number of votes for
cemetery commissioners, the duly elected first cemetery commissioners
of the district. The clerk of the board of county commissioners
((shall)) must certify a copy of the resolution and cause it to be
filed for record in the offices of the county auditor and the county
assessor of the county. The certified copy ((shall be)) is entitled to
((record)) be recorded without payment of a recording fee. If the
certificate of the canvassing officials shows that the proposition to
organize the proposed cemetery district failed to receive ((two-thirds)) a simple majority of the votes cast at ((said)) the election,
the board of county commissioners ((shall)) must enter a minute to that
effect and all proceedings theretofore ((had shall become)) are null
and void.

--- END ---