BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the forestry
riparian easement program, as authorized by RCW 76.13.120, has evolved
into such a costly program that the state is unable to fulfill its
financial promise as previously declared in RCW 77.85.180. It is in
the state's best interest to revise RCW 76.13.130 in a way that
encourages more small, low-impact harvests, as a way to reduce the
state's future payments under the forestry riparian easement program.
(2) The legislature further finds that the processes established in
RCW 76.13.100 and 76.13.110 and WAC 222-12-040 and 222-12-0403 have
failed to provide efficient, low-cost alternative plans and alternative
restrictions for smaller harvests as envisioned by the 2002
legislation. Further, the legislature reaffirms the findings in RCW
76.13.005 and declares that it is now timely to craft amendments to RCW
76.13.130 and WAC 222-30-023 in order to help maintain and improve the
economic viability of two hundred fifteen thousand family forest owners
managing approximately three million two hundred thousand acres of
forest land across the state and provide incentives to keep their land
in long-term forestry.
(3) The legislature further finds that the shade rules in WAC 222-30-023 are overly complex for these small harvests and relatively short
stream reaches, and are beyond comprehension for nearly all small
forest owners who wish to use this rule.
(4) The legislature further finds that rules to protect stream
water from summer heat do not need to apply to stream segments that
typically do not have surface water in the summer months. The changes
to RCW 76.13.130 in this act will create a regulatory incentive that,
in the long term, will benefit all the resources inherent to a forested
landscape, including riparian function.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.13.130 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 505 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On ((parcels)) harvest units of twenty contiguous acres or
less, small forest landowners ((with a total parcel ownership of less
than eighty acres)), as that term is defined in RCW 76.13.120, shall
not be required to leave riparian buffers adjacent to streams according
to forest practices rules adopted under the forests and fish report as
defined in RCW 76.09.020. These landowners shall be subject to the
permanent forest practices rules in effect as of January 1, 1999, but
may additionally be required to leave timber adjacent to streams that
is equivalent to no greater than fifteen percent of a volume of timber
contained in a stand of well managed fifty-year old commercial timber
covering the harvest area. The additional fifteen percent maximum
leave tree level shall be computed as a rotating stand volume and shall
be regulated through flexible forest practices as the stream buffer is
managed over time to meet optimal combinations of economics, forest
health, and riparian functions.
(2) On ((parcels)) harvest units of twenty contiguous acres or less
the small forest landowner office shall work with landowners ((with a
total parcel ownership of less than eighty acres)) to develop
alternative management plans for riparian buffers. Such alternative
plans shall provide for the removal of leave trees as other new trees
grow in order to ensure the most effective protection of critical
riparian function. The office may recommend reasonable modifications
in alternative management plans of such landowners to further reduce
risks to public resources and endangered species so long as the
anticipated operating costs are not unreasonably increased and the
landowner is not required to leave a greater volume than the threshold
level. To qualify for the provisions of this section, ((parcels))
harvest units must be twenty acres or less in contiguous ownership, and
owners ((cannot have ownership interests in a total of more than eighty
acres of forest lands within the state)) must qualify as a small forest
landowner as that term is defined in RCW 76.13.120.

Sec. 3 RCW 76.13.120 and 2004 c 102 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that the state should acquire easements
along riparian and other sensitive aquatic areas from small forest
landowners willing to sell or donate such easements to the state
provided that the state will not be required to acquire such easements
if they are subject to unacceptable liabilities. The legislature
therefore establishes a forestry riparian easement program.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and RCW 76.13.100 and 76.13.110 unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(a) "Forestry riparian easement" means an easement covering
qualifying timber granted voluntarily to the state by a small forest
landowner.
(b) "Qualifying timber" means those trees covered by a forest
practices application that the small forest landowner is required to
leave unharvested under the rules adopted under RCW 76.09.055 and
76.09.370 or that is made uneconomic to harvest by those rules, and for
which the small landowner is willing to grant the state a forestry
riparian easement. "Qualifying timber" is timber within or bordering
a commercially reasonable harvest unit as determined under rules
adopted by the forest practices board, or timber for which an approved
forest practices application for timber harvest cannot be obtained
because of restrictions under the forest practices rules.
(c) "Small forest landowner" means a landowner meeting all of the
following characteristics: (i) A forest landowner as defined in RCW
76.09.020 whose interest in the land and timber is in fee or who has
rights to the timber to be included in the forestry riparian easement
that extend at least fifty years from the date the forest practices
application associated with the easement is submitted; (ii) an entity
that has harvested from its own lands in this state during the three
years prior to the year of application an average timber volume that
would qualify the owner as a small harvester under RCW 84.33.035; and
(iii) an entity that certifies at the time of application that it does
not expect to harvest from its own lands more than the volume allowed
by RCW 84.33.035 during the ten years following application. If a
landowner's prior three-year average harvest exceeds the limit of RCW
84.33.035, or the landowner expects to exceed this limit during the ten
years following application, and that landowner establishes to the
department of natural resources' reasonable satisfaction that the
harvest limits were or will be exceeded to raise funds to pay estate
taxes or equally compelling and unexpected obligations such as court-ordered judgments or extraordinary medical expenses, the landowner
shall be deemed to be a small forest landowner.
For purposes of determining whether a person qualifies as a small
forest landowner, the small forest landowner office, created in RCW
76.13.110, shall evaluate the landowner under this definition, pursuant
to RCW 76.13.160, as of the date that the forest practices application
is submitted or the date the landowner notifies the department that the
harvest is to begin with which the forestry riparian easement is
associated. A small forest landowner can include an individual,
partnership, corporate, or other nongovernmental legal entity. If a
landowner grants timber rights to another entity for less than five
years, the landowner may still qualify as a small forest landowner
under this section. If a landowner is unable to obtain an approved
forest practices application for timber harvest for any of his or her
land because of restrictions under the forest practices rules, the
landowner may still qualify as a small forest landowner under this
section.
(d) "Completion of harvest" means that the trees have been
harvested from an area and that further entry into that area by
mechanized logging or slash treating equipment is not expected.
(3) The department of natural resources is authorized and directed
to accept and hold in the name of the state of Washington forestry
riparian easements granted by small forest landowners covering
qualifying timber and to pay compensation to such landowners in
accordance with subsections (6) and (7) of this section. The
department of natural resources may not transfer the easements to any
entity other than another state agency.
(4) Forestry riparian easements shall be effective for fifty years
from the date the forest practices application associated with the
qualifying timber is submitted to the department of natural resources,
unless the easement is terminated earlier by the department of natural
resources voluntarily, based on a determination that termination is in
the best interest of the state, or under the terms of a termination
clause in the easement.
(5) Forestry riparian easements shall be restrictive only, and
shall preserve all lawful uses of the easement premises by the
landowner that are consistent with the terms of the easement and the
requirement to protect riparian functions during the term of the
easement, subject to the restriction that the leave trees required by
the rules to be left on the easement premises may not be cut during the
term of the easement. No right of public access to or across, or any
public use of the easement premises is created by this statute or by
the easement. Forestry riparian easements shall not be deemed to
trigger the compensating tax of or otherwise disqualify land from being
taxed under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW.
(6) Upon application of a small forest landowner for a riparian
easement that is associated with a forest practices application and the
landowner's marking of the qualifying timber on the qualifying lands,
the small forest landowner office shall determine the compensation to
be offered to the small forest landowner as provided for in this
section. The small forest landowner office shall also determine the
compensation to be offered to a small forest landowner for qualifying
timber for which an approved forest practices application for timber
harvest cannot be obtained because of restrictions under the forest
practices rules. The legislature recognizes that there is not readily
available market transaction evidence of value for easements of this
nature, and thus establishes the following methodology to ascertain the
value for forestry riparian easements. Values so determined shall not
be considered competent evidence of value for any other purpose.
The small forest landowner office shall establish the volume of the
qualifying timber. Based on that volume and using data obtained or
maintained by the department of revenue under RCW 84.33.074 and
84.33.091, the small forest landowner office shall attempt to determine
the fair market value of the qualifying timber as of the date the
forest practices application associated with the qualifying timber was
submitted or the date the landowner notifies the department that the
harvest is to begin. Removal of any qualifying timber before the
expiration of the easement must be in accordance with the forest
practices rules and the terms of the easement. There shall be no
reduction in compensation for reentry.
(7) Except as provided in subsections (8) and (9) of this section,
the small forest landowner office shall, subject to available funding,
offer compensation to the small forest landowner in the amount of fifty
percent of the value determined in subsection (6) of this section, plus
the compliance and reimbursement costs as determined in accordance with
RCW 76.13.140. If the landowner accepts the offer for qualifying
timber that will be harvested pursuant to an approved forest practices
application, the department of natural resources shall pay the
compensation promptly upon (a) completion of harvest in the area
covered by the forestry riparian easement; (b) verification that there
has been compliance with the rules requiring leave trees in the
easement area; and (c) execution and delivery of the easement to the
department of natural resources. If the landowner accepts the offer
for qualifying timber for which an approved forest practices
application for timber harvest cannot be obtained because of
restrictions under the forest practices rules, the department of
natural resources shall pay the compensation promptly upon (i)
verification that there has been compliance with the rules requiring
leave trees in the easement area; and (ii) execution and delivery of
the easement to the department of natural resources. Upon donation or
payment of compensation, the department of natural resources may record
the easement.
(8) For approved forest practices applications where the regulatory
impact is greater than the average percentage impact for all small
landowners as determined by the department of natural resources
analysis under the regulatory fairness act, chapter 19.85 RCW, the
compensation offered will be increased to one hundred percent for that
portion of the regulatory impact that is in excess of the average.
Regulatory impact includes trees left in buffers, special management
zones, and those rendered uneconomic to harvest by these rules. A
separate average or high impact regulatory threshold shall be
established for western and eastern Washington. Criteria for these
measurements and payments shall be established by the small forest
landowner office.
(9) Small forest landowners choosing to conduct a harvest under the
authority provided in RCW 76.13.130 and the associated rules may not
participate in the forestry riparian easement program for the affected
harvest units.
(10) The forest practices board shall adopt rules under the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement the
forestry riparian easement program, including the following:
(a) A standard version or versions of all documents necessary or
advisable to create the forestry riparian easements as provided for in
this section;
(b) Standards for descriptions of the easement premises with a
degree of precision that is reasonable in relation to the values
involved;
(c) Methods and standards for cruises and valuation of forestry
riparian easements for purposes of establishing the compensation. The
department of natural resources shall perform the timber cruises of
forestry riparian easements required under this chapter and chapter
76.09 RCW. Any rules concerning the methods and standards for
valuations of forestry riparian easements shall apply only to the
department of natural resources, small forest landowners, and the small
forest landowner office;
(d) A method to determine that a forest practices application
involves a commercially reasonable harvest, and adopt criteria for
entering into a forest riparian easement where a commercially
reasonable harvest is not possible or a forest practices application
that has been submitted cannot be approved because of restrictions
under the forest practices rules;
(e) A method to address blowdown of qualified timber falling
outside the easement premises;
(f) A formula for sharing of proceeds in relation to the
acquisition of qualified timber covered by an easement through the
exercise or threats of eminent domain by a federal or state agency with
eminent domain authority, based on the present value of the department
of natural resources' and the landowner's relative interests in the
qualified timber;
(g) High impact regulatory thresholds;
(h) A method to determine timber that is qualifying timber because
it is rendered uneconomic to harvest by the rules adopted under RCW
76.09.055 and 76.09.370; and
(i) A method for internal department of natural resources review of
small forest landowner office compensation decisions under subsection
(7) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) By July 1, 2012, the forest practices
board shall initiate and complete a process to revise the forest
practices rule currently codified as WAC 222-30-023 to reflect the
following changes:
(a) Properties affected by WAC 222-30-023 must be excluded from the
shade requirements of WAC 222-30-040;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all streams must
be required to be buffered if the stream flows year round as surface
water. Buffer sizes for type F and type Np streams, as those stream
types are classified in WAC 222-16-030, must be limited as follows:
(i) Buffers for type F seasonal stream segments that are dry during
parts of the year, and type Np stream segments with year round flowing
water, may not be required to exceed thirty feet; and
(ii) Subterranean stream segments in both type F and type Np
streams and all intermittent dry portions of the perennial channel
below the uppermost point of perennial flow on type Np streams may not
be required to have a buffer, except for areas within fifty feet of a
type Np stream's perennial initiation point and areas where type F and
type Np streams connect, in which case the buffer may not be required
to exceed thirty feet;
(c) Rewriting of any forest practices rules necessary for the
implementation of RCW 76.13.120, 70.13.130, and this section must be
done in language that makes the requirements more understandable to a
person who is not a forestry professional. In rewriting the language,
the forest practices board shall make efforts to create buffer
requirements that are able to be identified on the landscape without
the assistance of forestry professionals.
(2) The forest practices board shall, in the execution of this
section, give significant consideration to any pertinent
recommendations from the small forest landowner advisory committee
created in RCW 76.13.110 and any private organizations that represent
the interests of small forest landowners.

--- END ---