BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the states of
Washington, Oregon, and California have a common interest in the
management and protection of ocean and coastal resources. This common
interest stems from the many ocean and coastal resources that cross
jurisdictional boundaries including winds, currents, fish, and
wildlife, as well as the multijurisdictional reach of many uses of
marine waters. These shared resources provide enormous economic,
environmental, and social benefits to the states, and are an integral
part of maintaining the high quality of life enjoyed by residents of
the west coast.
(2) The legislature finds that the shared nature of ocean and
coastal resources make coordination between the states of Washington,
Oregon, and California essential in order to achieve effective ocean
and coastal resource management and support sustainable coastal
communities.
(3) The legislature recognizes the west coast governor's agreement
on ocean health, entered into on September 18, 2006, as an important
step towards achieving more coordinated management of these ocean and
coastal resources.
(4) Ocean and coastal resource planning processes and funding
opportunities recently initiated by the federal government contemplate
action at the regional level. Early action on the part of Washington,
Oregon, and California to collaboratively define and implement such
planning efforts and projects will increase the states' ability to
determine the course of federal planning processes for the west coast
and receive nonstate support for the planning efforts, resource
preservation and restoration projects, and projects to support ocean
health and sustainable coastal communities.
(5) Therefore, collaboration on ocean and coastal resource
management between Washington, Oregon, and California should be
continued and enhanced through the respective legislatures, as well as
through the respective executive branches through the west coast
governor's agreement on ocean health.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.372 RCW
to read as follows:
When moneys are deposited into the marine resources stewardship
trust account created in RCW 43.372.070, the governor must provide
recommendations on expenditures from the account to the appropriate
committees of the legislature prior to the next regular legislative
session. The recommended projects and activities must be consistent
with: The allowable uses of the marine resources stewardship trust
account; and the priority areas identified in the west coast governor's
agreement on ocean health, entered into on September 18, 2006, and
recognized in section 1 of this act.

--- END ---