BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall reconvene an expert review panel as described
under RCW 47.01.400 for the purpose of updating the work that was
previously completed by the panel on the Alaskan Way viaduct and
Seattle Seawall replacement project and to ensure that an appropriate
and viable financial plan is created and regularly reviewed. The
expert review panel must be selected cooperatively by the chairs of the
senate and house of representatives transportation committees, the
secretary of transportation, the speaker of the house of
representatives, the majority leader of the senate, and the governor.
The expert review panel must report updated findings and
recommendations to the transportation commission, the transportation
committees of the legislature, and the governor's Alaskan Way viaduct
program oversight committee by October 2011, and annually thereafter
until the project is operationally complete. Upon receipt of the
expert review panel's updated findings and recommendations, the
governor must determine whether the financial plan for the Alaskan Way
viaduct and Seattle Seawall replacement project is feasible and
sufficient to complete the project as described in the final
environmental impact statement. When reconvening the expert review
panel, the department must be attentive to cost and consider ways to
minimize expert review panel expenditures, such as the use of
teleconferencing. Anticipated expenditures related to the expert
review panel must be included in the panel's findings and
recommendation reports.

--- END ---