BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department, or any local transit agency that has received
state funding for a park and ride lot, may enter into a lease with
private entities allowing them to operate food or beverage retailers,
restaurants, grocery and convenience stores, or other private
enterprises that are of benefit to the traveling public at park and
ride lots owned by the department or local transit agency.
(2) The department or local transit agency must take all necessary
action to ensure the most favorable lease rates for the state or local
transit agency, whether by bid or other reasonable manner, and to
require the lessee to enter into any other contract or agreement to
protect the state and its citizens or the local transit agency from
commercial harm or other type of harm. Lease payments must first be
applied towards maintenance and operations of the applicable park and
ride lot and the remainder must be deposited into the multimodal
transportation account created under RCW 47.66.070 if the lot is owned
by the local transit agency, or into the motor vehicle fund created
under RCW 46.68.070 if the lot is owned by the department.
(3) The department must adopt and enforce such reasonable rules
that are consistent with and necessary to carry out this section,
including a flexible process to prioritize local business interests
when entering into lease agreements.

--- END ---