BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) To further the goals of high quality public education
throughout the state, each school district board of directors should
have the authority to grant schools of the district maximum possible
flexibility to meet the needs of students and the communities in which
they live; and
(b) Particularly in schools and communities that are struggling to
improve student academic outcomes and close the achievement gap, there
is a critical need for innovative models of public education that are
tailored to the unique circumstances and needs of the students in those
schools and communities.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to:
(a) Grant school districts and schools greater flexibility to meet
the educational needs of a diverse student population;
(b) Improve educational performance through greater individual
school autonomy and managerial flexibility;
(c) Implement evidence-based practices proven to be effective in
reducing demographic disparities in student achievement; and
(d) Encourage innovation in education by providing local school
communities and principals with greater control over staffing,
personnel selection and evaluation, scheduling, and educational
programming.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Any school district board of directors may
authorize one or more innovation schools or innovation zones within the
district as provided in this section.
(1)(a) Any school within a school district may submit to the board
of directors an innovation school plan as described under section 3 of
this act. A group of schools that share common interests, such as
geographical location or educational focus, or that sequentially serve
classes of students as they progress through elementary and secondary
grades may jointly submit to the board of directors a plan to create an
innovation zone as described under section 3 of this act. An
innovation zone may include all schools within a school district.
(b) A school district board of directors that receives an
innovation school plan or innovation zone plan shall either approve or
disapprove the plan within sixty days of receiving the plan. If the
board of directors rejects the plan, the board must provide a written
explanation of the reasons for the rejection. The school or group of
schools may resubmit an amended plan any time after a plan is rejected.
(2) A board of directors may initiate and collaborate with one or
more schools in the district to create innovation schools or innovation
zones. In creating an innovation school plan or an innovation zone
plan, the board of directors must ensure that each public school
affected by the plan has substantial opportunity to participate in the
development of the plan.
(3) If a board of directors authorizes an innovation school or an
innovation zone, the board may seek state endorsement of the innovation
school or innovation zone under section 5 of this act.
(4) If a school district board of directors approves an innovation
school plan or innovation zone plan that contains a request for a
waiver of provisions of school district collective bargaining
agreements, the board must enter into negotiations with the appropriate
employee organizations and the employee organizations and the school
board must bargain in good faith.
(5) Each innovation school or innovation zone authorized under this
section must submit an annual report to the school district board of
directors on student achievement results in the school or zone and
other accomplishments achieved during the prior year. The board of
directors shall forward a copy of the reports to the state board of
education.
(6) Once an innovation school plan or innovation zone plan has been
authorized by a school district board of directors, the board must
permit the implementation of the plan as authorized for a period of at
least four years, after which time the board may end implementation of
the plan or continue the plan for a period of time specified by the
board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An innovation school plan must include
the following information:
(a) A statement of why designation as an innovation school would
enhance the ability of the school to improve student achievement and
close the achievement gap;
(b) A description of the innovations to be implemented by the
school, which may include, but are not limited to: Innovations in
school staffing; class scheduling; use of financial and other
resources; school-based budgeting; professional development; parent
involvement; collaboration and partnership with the community; school-based decision making; and recruitment, employment, assignment,
evaluation, and compensation of school employees, including providing
financial incentives for performance and excellence;
(c) A description of the programs, policies, and approaches to
providing instruction and services that would be changed to reflect
evidence-based practices and other innovations, such as unique learning
opportunities for students; curriculum; student promotion and
graduation policies; forms of student assessment; the length of school
day and school year; programs, services, and strategies specifically
intended to close the achievement gap and increase graduation rates
across all groups of students; project-based learning; team-teaching;
interdisciplinary instruction; provision of special services including
for students in special education, highly capable students, and English
language learner students; dropout early warning, prevention,
intervention, and reengagement; and guidance and counseling services;
(d) Identification of the improvements in student achievement that
the school expects to accomplish in implementing the innovations;
(e) A statement of the level of support for designation as an
innovation school by the students and parents of students enrolled in
the school and the community surrounding the school;
(f) A listing of any waivers of school district policies or
provisions of school district collective bargaining agreements that are
necessary to implement the plan and why the waivers are necessary; and
(g) A listing of any waivers of state policies, rules, or laws that
are necessary to implement the plan and why the waivers are necessary.
(2) An innovation zone plan must include all of the information
under subsection (1) of this section, plus the following additional
information:
(a) A description of how innovations in the schools within the
innovation zone would be integrated to achieve results that would be
less likely to be accomplished by each school working alone; and
(b) An estimate of any economies of scale that would be achieved by
innovations implemented jointly by the schools within the innovation
zone.
(3) A plan submitted to the school district board of directors
under this section must be approved by a majority of staff assigned to
the school or schools participating in the plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Innovation school and innovation zone plans
must be able to be implemented without supplemental state funds, but
may include requests for supplemental funds from the school district or
from the state for specified components of the plan. Each school
district board of directors is authorized and encouraged to seek and
accept public and private gifts, grants, and donations to offset the
costs of developing and implementing innovation school and innovation
zone plans.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A school district board of directors
that has authorized an innovation school or an innovation zone under
section 2 of this act may seek endorsement of the innovation school or
innovation zone by the state board of education.
(2) The school district board of directors shall submit its
innovation school plans or innovation zone plans to the state board of
education, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and
the professional educator standards board for review and comment.
Within sixty days after receiving a plan, the state board of education,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and the
professional educator standards board shall respond to the board of
directors with any suggested changes or additions to the plan,
including suggestions for further innovations or measures to increase
the likelihood that the innovations will result in greater academic
achievement within the innovation school or innovation zone. Based on
the comments, a board of directors may withdraw and resubmit the plan.
(3) Within ten days of providing comment on an innovation school
plan or innovation zone plan under subsection (2) of this section,
unless the school district board of directors withdraws the plan for
purposes of revision, the state board of education shall endorse the
innovation school or innovation zone unless the state board concludes
that the plan:
(a) Is likely to result in a decrease in academic achievement in
the innovation school or innovation zone;
(b) Is not financially feasible to implement; or
(c) Would violate state or federal laws or rules that are not
authorized to be waived under section 6 of this act.
(4) If the state board of education does not endorse an innovation
school or innovation zone, the board shall provide a written
explanation of the basis for the rejection to the school district board
of directors. The school district board of directors may resubmit a
revised plan at any time after the endorsement is rejected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The superintendent of public
instruction, the state board of education, and the professional
educator standards board, each within the scope of their statutory
authority, shall waive the application of policies and procedures for
an innovation school or schools within an innovation zone endorsed
under section 5 of this act to the extent the waivers are included in
the innovation school or innovation zone plan. The superintendent of
public instruction, the state board of education, and the professional
educator standards board may not waive policies and procedures that
jeopardize the receipt of state or federal funds that a school district
with an innovation school or innovation zone would otherwise be
eligible to receive unless the school district submits a written
authorization for the waiver acknowledging that receipt of these funds
could be jeopardized.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, and the professional educator standards board, each within
the scope of their statutory authority, shall waive the statutory
requirements and any related rules of the chapters of law specified
under section 7 of this act for an innovation school or schools within
an innovation zone endorsed under section 5 of this act to the extent
the waivers are included in the innovation school or innovation zone
plan.
(3) A waiver under this section applies only to innovation schools
or schools within innovation zones endorsed under section 5 of this act
and only as specified in the innovation school or innovation zone plan.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, or the professional educator standards board may suspend a
waiver granted under this section based on evidence of academic harm to
students or findings in financial or program audits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The following laws and related rules are
subject to waiver under section 6 of this act, except as provided under
subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Chapter 28A.150 RCW, general provisions;
(b) Chapter 28A.160 RCW, student transportation;
(c) Chapter 28A.165 RCW, learning assistance program;
(d) Chapter 28A.170 RCW, substance abuse awareness program;
(e) Chapter 28A.175 RCW, dropout prevention, intervention, and
retrieval system;
(f) Chapter 28A.180 RCW, transitional bilingual instructional
program;
(g) Chapter 28A.185 RCW, highly capable students;
(h) Chapter 28A.190 RCW, residential education programs;
(i) Chapter 28A.193 RCW, education programs for juvenile inmates;
(j) Chapter 28A.194 RCW, education programs for juveniles in adult
jails;
(k) Chapter 28A.215 RCW, early childhood, preschools, before-and-after school care;
(l) Chapter 28A.220 RCW, traffic safety;
(m) Chapter 28A.225 RCW, compulsory school attendance and
admission;
(n) Chapter 28A.230 RCW, compulsory course work and activities;
(o) Chapter 28A.235 RCW, food services;
(p) Chapter 28A.245 RCW, skill centers;
(q) Chapter 28A.250 RCW, online learning;
(r) Chapter 28A.300 RCW, superintendent of public instruction;
(s) Chapter 28A.305 RCW, state board of education;
(t) Chapter 28A.320 RCW, provisions applicable to all districts;
(u) Chapter 28A.325 RCW, associated student bodies;
(v) Chapter 28A.335 RCW, school districts' property;
(w) Chapter 28A.340 RCW, small high school cooperative projects;
(x) Chapter 28A.345 RCW, Washington state school directors'
association;
(y) Chapter 28A.400 RCW, employees;
(z) Chapter 28A.405 RCW, certificated employees;
(aa) Chapter 28A.410 RCW, certification;
(bb) Chapter 28A.415 RCW, institutes, workshops, and training;
(cc) Chapter 28A.600 RCW, students;
(dd) Chapter 28A.605 RCW, parent access;
(ee) Chapter 28A.620 RCW, community education programs;
(ff) Chapter 28A.623 RCW, meal programs;
(gg) Chapter 28A.625 RCW, awards;
(hh) Chapter 28A.630 RCW, temporary provisions--special projects;
(ii) Chapter 28A.635 RCW, offenses relating to school property and
personnel;
(jj) Chapter 28A.650 RCW, education technology;
(kk) Chapter 28A.655 RCW, academic achievement and accountability;
and
(ll) Chapter 28A.700 RCW, secondary career and technical education.
(2) Statutes or administrative rules pertaining to the following
state requirements may not be waived under section 6 of this act:
(a) Laws and regulations pertaining to health, safety, civil
rights, privacy, and nondiscrimination;
(b) Laws and rules associated with determining disbursements of
state funds, including capital funds, through state funding formulas;
(c) Laws and regulations pertaining to school district budgeting
and accounting and bonded indebtedness;
(d) Laws and regulations pertaining to the statewide assessment and
school and district accountability system to the extent that the
provisions are required under federal laws or regulations;
(e) Laws regarding financial examinations and audits as determined
by the state auditor and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, including audits for legal and fiscal compliance;
(f) Laws pertaining to the election of school district boards of
directors and to the organization and reorganization of school
districts;
(g) Employee background and record check requirements under RCW
28A.400.301 and 28A.400.303 and mandatory termination for crimes
against children under RCW 28A.400.320 through 28A.400.330; and
(h) The provisions of the interstate compact on educational
opportunity for military children.
(3) By August 1, 2011, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the professional educator standards board, and the state
board of education shall jointly publish a list of each of the statutes
under Title 28A RCW and administrative rules adopted under those
statutes that may be waived under this section. The list must be
updated by August 1st of each year thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) The office of the superintendent of
public instruction must annually forward to the legislature any
supplemental state funding requests contained in the plans of
innovation schools or innovation zones endorsed by the state board of
education under section 5 of this act.
(2) The supplemental funding requests under this section must be
submitted as a single decision package, to be considered as a whole by
the legislature and not by each innovation school or innovation zone.
(3) If funding is appropriated to implement innovation school plans
or innovation zone plans in an amount less than the full request, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall apportion the
appropriated funds among the school districts with innovation schools
and innovation zones based on a pro rata share of the amount of the
appropriation compared to the amount of the request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) A school district with an innovation
school or innovation zone endorsed by the state board of education
under section 6 of this act shall permit but not require employees
assigned to an innovation school or a school within an innovation zone
to elect to be removed from collective bargaining units and collective
bargaining agreements as provided under sections 12 and 13 of this act.
(2) If the employees assigned to a school within an innovation zone
do not elect to be removed from the collective bargaining unit, the
school district board of directors may revise the innovation zone plan
to remove that school from the plan.
(3) Any employee who is assigned to an innovation school or a
school within an innovation zone may request a transfer to another
school within the school district. The superintendent and school
district board of directors shall make every reasonable effort to
accommodate the employee's request for a transfer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 The office of the superintendent of public
instruction must provide information about the provisions of this
chapter to all schools and school districts in the state and, within
available funds, offer advice and technical assistance at the request
of schools, school districts, and school district boards of directors
in the development and implementation of innovation school plans and
innovation zone plans.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.657.050 and 2010 c 235 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The local district superintendent and local school board of a
school district designated as a required action district must submit a
required action plan to the state board of education for approval.
Unless otherwise required by subsection (3) of this section, the plan
must be submitted under a schedule as required by the state board. A
required action plan must be developed in collaboration with
administrators, teachers, and other staff, parents, unions representing
any employees within the district, students, and other representatives
of the local community. The superintendent of public instruction shall
provide a district with assistance in developing its plan if requested.
The school board must conduct a public hearing to allow for comment on
a proposed required action plan. The local school district shall
submit the plan first to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to review and approve that the plan is consistent with
federal guidelines. After the office of the superintendent of public
instruction has approved that the plan is consistent with federal
guidelines, the local school district must submit its required action
plan to the state board of education for approval.
(2) A required action plan must include all of the following:
(a) Implementation of one of the four federal intervention models
required for the receipt of a federal school improvement grant, for
those persistently lowest-achieving schools that the district will be
focusing on for required action. However, a district may not establish
a charter school under a federal intervention model without express
legislative authority. The intervention models are the turnaround,
restart, school closure, and transformation models. School districts
are encouraged to implement an innovation school as provided in
sections 2 through 10 of this act in a persistently lowest-achieving
school, as long as the innovation school plan under section 3 of this
act also meets the requirements of a federal intervention model. The
intervention model selected must address the concerns raised in the
academic performance audit and be intended to improve student
performance to allow a school district to be removed from the list of
districts designated as a required action district by the state board
of education within three years of implementation of the plan;
(b) Submission of an application for a federal school improvement
grant or a grant from other federal funds for school improvement to the
superintendent of public instruction;
(c) A budget that provides for adequate resources to implement the
federal model selected and any other requirements of the plan;
(d) A description of the changes in the district's or school's
existing policies, structures, agreements, processes, and practices
that are intended to attain significant achievement gains for all
students enrolled in the school and how the district intends to address
the findings of the academic performance audit; and
(e) Identification of the measures that the school district will
use in assessing student achievement at a school identified as a
persistently lowest-achieving school, which include improving
mathematics and reading student achievement and graduation rates as
defined by the office of the superintendent of public instruction that
enable the school to no longer be identified as a persistently lowest-achieving school.
(3)(a) For any district designated for required action, the parties
to any collective bargaining agreement negotiated, renewed, or extended
under chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW after June 10, 2010, must reopen the
agreement, or negotiate an addendum, if needed, to make changes to
terms and conditions of employment that are necessary to implement a
required action plan.
(b) If the school district and the employee organizations are
unable to agree on the terms of an addendum or modification to an
existing collective bargaining agreement, the parties, including all
labor organizations affected under the required action plan, shall
request the public employment relations commission to, and the
commission shall, appoint an employee of the commission to act as a
mediator to assist in the resolution of a dispute between the school
district and the employee organizations. Beginning in 2011, and each
year thereafter, mediation shall commence no later than April 15th.
All mediations held under this section shall include the employer and
representatives of all affected bargaining units.
(c) If the executive director of the public employment relations
commission, upon the recommendation of the assigned mediator, finds
that the employer and any affected bargaining unit are unable to reach
agreement following a reasonable period of negotiations and mediation,
but by no later than May 15th of the year in which mediation occurred,
the executive director shall certify any disputed issues for a decision
by the superior court in the county where the school district is
located. The issues for determination by the superior court must be
limited to the issues certified by the executive director.
(d) The process for filing with the court in this subsection (3)(d)
must be used in the case where the executive director certifies issues
for a decision by the superior court.
(i) The school district shall file a petition with the superior
court, by no later than May 20th of the same year in which the issues
were certified, setting forth the following:
(A) The name, address, and telephone number of the school district
and its principal representative;
(B) The name, address, and telephone number of the employee
organizations and their principal representatives;
(C) A description of the bargaining units involved;
(D) A copy of the unresolved issues certified by the executive
director for a final and binding decision by the court; and
(E) The academic performance audit that the office of the
superintendent of public instruction completed for the school district.
(ii) Within seven days after the filing of the petition, each party
shall file with the court the proposal it is asking the court to order
be implemented in a required action plan for the district for each
issue certified by the executive director. Contemporaneously with the
filing of the proposal, a party must file a brief with the court
setting forth the reasons why the court should order implementation of
its proposal in the final plan.
(iii) Following receipt of the proposals and briefs of the parties,
the court must schedule a date and time for a hearing on the petition.
The hearing must be limited to argument of the parties or their counsel
regarding the proposals submitted for the court's consideration. The
parties may waive a hearing by written agreement.
(iv) The court must enter an order selecting the proposal for
inclusion in a required action plan that best responds to the issues
raised in the school district's academic performance audit, and allows
for the award of a federal school improvement grant or a grant from
other federal funds for school improvement to the district from the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to implement one of
the four federal intervention models. The court's decision must be
issued no later than June 15th of the year in which the petition is
filed and is final and binding on the parties; however the court's
decision is subject to appeal only in the case where it does not allow
the school district to implement a required action plan consistent with
the requirements for the award of a federal school improvement grant or
other federal funds for school improvement by the superintendent of
public instruction.
(e) Each party shall bear its own costs and attorneys' fees
incurred under this statute.
(f) Any party that proceeds with the process in this section after
knowledge that any provision of this section has not been complied with
and who fails to state its objection in writing is deemed to have
waived its right to object.
(4) All contracts entered into between a school district and an
employee must be consistent with this section and allow school
districts designated as required action districts to implement one of
the four federal models in a required action plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 A new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any collective bargaining agreement entered into, extended,
amended, or renewed after the effective date of this section between a
school district employer and employees under this chapter must contain
a provision that allows employees of a school district who are assigned
to an innovation school or a school within an innovation zone endorsed
by the state board of education under section 6 of this act to elect to
be removed from the bargaining unit and the collective bargaining
agreement as provided under this section.
(2) Employees under this section may elect, by means of a secret
ballot approved by a majority of the employees under this chapter
assigned to the school, to be removed from their bargaining unit and
collective bargaining agreement. In the case of schools within an
innovation zone, the election must be conducted separately for each
school within the zone.
(3) Removal of employees of an innovation school or a school within
an innovation zone from bargaining units and collective bargaining
agreements under this section must continue so long as the school
remains an innovation school or within an innovation zone.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 A new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any collective bargaining agreement entered into, extended,
amended, or renewed after the effective date of this section between an
employer and employees under this chapter must contain a provision that
allows employees of a school district who are assigned to an innovation
school or a school within an innovation zone endorsed by the state
board of education under section 6 of this act to elect to be removed
from the bargaining unit and the collective bargaining agreement as
provided under this section.
(2) Employees assigned to an innovation school or a school within
an innovation zone may elect, by means of a secret ballot approved by
a majority of the employees under this chapter assigned to the school,
to be removed from their bargaining unit and collective bargaining
agreement. In the case of schools within an innovation zone, the
election must be conducted separately for each school within the zone.
(3) Removal of employees of an innovation school or a school within
an innovation zone from bargaining units and collective bargaining
agreements under this section must continue so long as the school
remains an innovation school or within an innovation zone.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 A new section is added to chapter 28A.160
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 28A.165
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 28A.170
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 A new section is added to chapter 28A.175
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 A new section is added to chapter 28A.180
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 A new section is added to chapter 28A.185
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21 A new section is added to chapter 28A.190
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22 A new section is added to chapter 28A.193
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23 A new section is added to chapter 28A.194
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24 A new section is added to chapter 28A.215
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25 A new section is added to chapter 28A.220
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26 A new section is added to chapter 28A.225
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 27 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28 A new section is added to chapter 28A.235
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 29 A new section is added to chapter 28A.245
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30 A new section is added to chapter 28A.250
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33 A new section is added to chapter 28A.320
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 34 A new section is added to chapter 28A.325
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 35 A new section is added to chapter 28A.335
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 36 A new section is added to chapter 28A.340
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37 A new section is added to chapter 28A.345
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 38 A new section is added to chapter 28A.400
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 39 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41 A new section is added to chapter 28A.415
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 42 A new section is added to chapter 28A.600
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43 A new section is added to chapter 28A.605
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 44 A new section is added to chapter 28A.620
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 45 A new section is added to chapter 28A.623
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 46 A new section is added to chapter 28A.625
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 47 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 48 A new section is added to chapter 28A.635
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 49 A new section is added to chapter 28A.650
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 50 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 51 A new section is added to chapter 28A.700
RCW to read as follows:
A school district with an innovation school or an innovation zone
endorsed by the state board of education under section 6 of this act is
subject to the requirements of this chapter and related rules unless a
waiver is included in the innovation school plan or innovation zone
plan. A waiver provided under section 7 of this act from the
requirements of this chapter and related rules applies only to the
innovation schools or schools within innovation zones and only as
specified in the endorsed plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 52 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 53 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 54 Sections 2 through 10 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

--- END ---