BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.70.190 and 2009 c 564 s 949 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unclaimed prizes shall be retained in the state lottery account for
the person entitled thereto for one hundred eighty days after the
drawing in which the prize is won, or after the official end of the
game for instant prizes. If no claim is made for the prize within this
time, all rights to the prize shall be extinguished, and the prize
shall be retained in the state lottery fund for further use as prizes,
except that one-third of all unclaimed prize money shall be deposited
in the economic development strategic reserve account created in RCW
43.330.250, and for each of fiscal years 2011-2012 and 2012-2013, two
hundred fifty thousand dollars shall be deposited in the student child
care in higher education account created in RCW 28B.135.010 to the
extent that these funds are provided in the omnibus appropriations act
and these amounts must be divided equally between the four-year and
two-year programs.
((On July 1, 2009, June 30, 2010, and June 30, 2011, all unclaimed
prize money retained in the state lottery fund [account] in excess of
three million dollars, excluding amounts distributed to the economic
development strategic reserve account, shall be transferred into the
state general fund.))

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.135.010 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 9 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
The ((four-year)) student child care in higher education account is
established. The higher education coordinating board shall administer
the program for the four-year institutions of higher education. The
state board for community and technical colleges shall administer the
program for the two-year institutions of higher education. Through
((these)) this program((s)) the board shall award either competitive or
matching child care grants to state institutions of higher education to
encourage programs to address the need for high quality, accessible,
and affordable child care for students at higher education
institutions. The grants shall be used exclusively for the provision
of quality child care services for students at institutions of higher
education. The university or college administration and student
government association, or its equivalent, of each institution
receiving the award may contribute financial support in an amount equal
to or greater than the child care grant received by the institution.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.135.040 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 9 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
The ((four-year)) student child care in higher education account is
established in the custody of the state treasurer. Moneys in the
account may be spent only for the purposes of RCW 28B.135.010.
Disbursements from the account shall be on the authorization of the
higher education coordinating board or the state board for community
and technical colleges. The account is subject to the allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for disbursements.

--- END ---