BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.58.2795 and 1994 c 158 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
By ((April)) September 1st of each year, the legislative authority
of each municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, and each regional
transit authority shall prepare a six-year transit development plan for
that calendar year and the ensuing five years. The program shall be
consistent with the comprehensive plans adopted by counties, cities,
and towns, pursuant to chapter 35.63, 35A.63, or 36.70 RCW, the
inherent authority of a first-class city or charter county derived from
its charter, or chapter 36.70A RCW. The program shall contain
information as to how the municipality intends to meet state and local
long-range priorities for public transportation, capital improvements,
significant operating changes planned for the system, and how the
municipality intends to fund program needs. The six-year plan for each
municipality and regional transit authority shall specifically set
forth those projects of regional significance for inclusion in the
transportation improvement program within that region. Each
municipality and regional transit authority shall file the six-year
program with the state department of transportation, the transportation
improvement board, and cities, counties, and regional planning councils
within which the municipality is located.
In developing its program, the municipality and the regional
transit authority shall consider those policy recommendations affecting
public transportation contained in the state transportation policy plan
approved by the state transportation commission and, where appropriate,
adopted by the legislature. The municipality shall conduct one or more
public hearings while developing its program and for each annual
update.

Sec. 2 RCW 35.58.2796 and 2005 c 319 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of transportation shall develop an annual report
summarizing the status of public transportation systems in the state
for the previous calendar year. By ((September)) December 1st of each
year, ((copies of)) the report ((shall be submitted)) must be made
available to the transportation committees of the legislature and to
each municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, and to individual
members of the municipality's legislative authority.
(2) To assist the department with preparation of the report, each
municipality shall file a system report by ((April)) September 1st of
each year with the state department of transportation identifying its
public transportation services for the previous calendar year and its
objectives for improving the efficiency and effectiveness of those
services. The system report shall address those items required for
each public transportation system in the department's report.
(3) The department report shall describe individual public
transportation systems, including contracted transportation services
and dial-a-ride services, and include a statewide summary of public
transportation issues and data. The descriptions shall include the
following elements and such other elements as the department deems
appropriate after consultation with the municipalities and the
transportation committees of the legislature:
(((1))) (a) Equipment and facilities, including vehicle replacement
standards;
(((2))) (b) Services and service standards;
(((3))) (c) Revenues, expenses, and ending balances, by fund
source;
(((4))) (d) Policy issues and system improvement objectives,
including community participation in development of those objectives
and how those objectives address statewide transportation priorities;
(((5))) (e) Operating indicators applied to public transportation
services, revenues, and expenses. Operating indicators shall include
operating cost per passenger trip, operating cost per revenue vehicle
service hour, passenger trips per revenue service hour, passenger trips
per vehicle service mile, vehicle service hours per employee, and
farebox revenue as a percent of operating costs.
(4) To the extent that information is available, the department
report must include descriptive information on any other modes of
public transportation, the impact of public transportation on
transportation system performance, and how public transportation helps
the state meet the transportation system policy goals described in RCW
47.04.280.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
New state facilities, to be located within the boundaries of a
public transportation system identified under RCW 82.14.045, may only
be sited after the department has consulted with the respective public
transportation system to ensure that the new state facilities are
located in an area that is adequately accessible by transit service.

--- END ---