BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 RCW 47.26.080 (Urban arterial trust
account -- Withholding of funds for noncompliance) and 2007 c 148 s 2,
1999 c 94 s 16, 1994 c 179 s 8, 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 32, 1988 c 167 s 13,
1981 c 315 s 2, 1979 c 5 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 317 s 22, & 1967 ex.s. c 83
s 14 are each repealed.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.70A.340 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 26 are each amended
to read as follows:
Upon receipt from the board of a finding that a state agency,
county, or city is in noncompliance under RCW 36.70A.330, or as a
result of failure to meet the requirements of RCW 36.70A.210, the
governor may either:
(1) Notify and direct the director of the office of financial
management to revise allotments in appropriation levels;
(2) Notify and direct the state treasurer to withhold the portion
of revenues to which the county or city is entitled under one or more
of the following: The motor vehicle fuel tax, as provided in chapter
82.36 RCW; the transportation improvement account, as provided in RCW
47.26.084; ((the urban arterial trust account, as provided in RCW
47.26.080;)) the rural arterial trust account, as provided in RCW
36.79.150; the sales and use tax, as provided in chapter 82.14 RCW; the
liquor profit tax, as provided in RCW 66.08.190; and the liquor excise
tax, as provided in RCW 82.08.170; or
(3) File a notice of noncompliance with the secretary of state and
the county or city, which shall temporarily rescind the county or
city's authority to collect the real estate excise tax under RCW
82.46.030 until the governor files a notice rescinding the notice of
noncompliance.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.84.092 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 30 s 20, 2010 1st sp.s.
c 9 s 7, 2010 c 248 s 6, 2010 c 222 s 5, 2010 c 162 s 6, and 2010 c 145
s 11 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University
capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and
reformatory institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the
Columbia river basin water supply development account, the common
school construction fund, the county arterial preservation account, the
county criminal justice assistance account, the county sales and use
tax equalization account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
licensing services account, the department of retirement systems
expense account, the developmental disabilities community trust
account, the drinking water assistance account, the drinking water
assistance administrative account, the drinking water assistance
repayment account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects
account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust
account, the election account, the energy freedom account, the energy
recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The
Evergreen State College capital projects account, the federal forest
revolving account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the freight
congestion relief account, the freight mobility investment account, the
freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective
fund, the public health services account, the health system capacity
account, the high capacity transportation account, the state higher
education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure
account, the highway safety account, the high occupancy toll lanes
operations account, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement
account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial
retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax
account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical
aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the motor vehicle
fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the multiagency
permitting team account, the multimodal transportation account, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and
use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account,
the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public
facilities construction loan revolving account beginning July 1, 2004,
the public health supplemental account, the public transportation
systems account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account,
the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real estate appraiser
commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional
mobility grant program account, the resource management cost account,
the rural arterial trust account, the rural Washington loan fund, the
site closure account, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the
special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol
highway account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account,
the state route number 520 corridor account, the supplemental pension
account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation 2003
account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership
account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, ((the urban arterial trust account,))
the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account,
the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan
1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public
safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing
balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be
allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.68.090 and 2005 c 314 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle
fund from the motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax shall be
first expended for purposes enumerated in (a) and (b) of this
subsection. The remaining net tax amount shall be distributed monthly
by the state treasurer in accordance with subsections (2) through (7)
of this section.
(a) For payment of refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special
fuel tax that has been paid and is refundable as provided by law;
(b) For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to
appropriations for the administrative expenses of the offices of state
treasurer, state auditor, and the department of licensing of the state
of Washington in the administration of the motor vehicle fuel tax and
the special fuel tax, which sums shall be distributed monthly.
(2) All of the remaining net tax amount collected under RCW
82.36.025(1) and 82.38.030(1) shall be distributed as set forth in (a)
through (j) of this section.
(a) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
44.387 percent to be expended for highway purposes of the state as
defined in RCW 46.68.130;
(b) For distribution to the special category C account, hereby
created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609 percent to
be expended for special category C projects. Special category C
projects are category C projects that, due to high cost only, will
require bond financing to complete construction.
The following criteria, listed in order of priority, shall be used
in determining which special category C projects have the highest
priority:
(i) Accident experience;
(ii) Fatal accident experience;
(iii) Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable
speeds without undue congestion; and
(iv) Continuity of development of the highway transportation
network.
Moneys deposited in the special category C account in the motor
vehicle fund may be used for payment of debt service on bonds the
proceeds of which are used to finance special category C projects under
this subsection (2)(b);
(c) For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent;
(d) For distribution to the Puget Sound capital construction
account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3726 percent;
(e) For distribution to the ((urban arterial trust)) transportation
improvement account in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 7.5597
percent;
(f) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and expended
in accordance with RCW 47.26.086;
(g) For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW
46.68.110;
(h) For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle fund an
amount equal to 19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there shall be
distributed from time to time, as directed by the department of
transportation, those sums as may be necessary to carry out the
provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any amounts appropriated to
the county road administration board to implement the provisions of RCW
47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be distributed
monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW
46.68.120;
(i) For distribution to the county arterial preservation account,
hereby created in the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 1.9565
percent. These funds shall be distributed by the county road
administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the
number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each
county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the structural,
safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county road
administration board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies
to implement this program and to assure that a pavement management
system is used;
(j) For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended in
accordance with RCW 36.79.020.
(3) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(2)
and 82.38.030(2) shall be distributed to the transportation 2003
account (nickel account).
(4) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(3)
and 82.38.030(3) shall be distributed as follows:
(a) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to the incorporated cities
and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;
(b) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to counties of the state in
accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and
(c) The remainder shall be distributed to the transportation
partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.
(5) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025(4)
and 82.38.030(4) shall be distributed as follows:
(a) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to the incorporated cities
and towns of the state in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;
(b) 8.3333 percent shall be distributed to counties of the state in
accordance with RCW 46.68.120; and
(c) The remainder shall be distributed to the transportation
partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.
(6) The remaining net tax amount collected under RCW 82.36.025 (5)
and (6) and 82.38.030 (5) and (6) shall be distributed to the
transportation partnership account created in RCW 46.68.290.
(7) Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so
as to violate any terms or conditions contained in any highway
construction bond issues now or hereafter authorized by statute and
whose payment is by such statute pledged to be paid from any excise
taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.68.110 and 2008 c 121 s 601 are each amended to
read as follows:
Funds credited to the incorporated cities and towns of the state as
set forth in RCW 46.68.090 shall be subject to deduction and
distribution as follows:
(1) One and one-half percent of such sums distributed under RCW
46.68.090 shall be deducted monthly as such sums are credited and set
aside for the use of the department of transportation for the
supervision of work and expenditures of such incorporated cities and
towns on the city and town streets thereof, including the supervision
and administration of federal-aid programs for which the department of
transportation has responsibility: PROVIDED, That any moneys so
retained and not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium
to the incorporated cities and towns in proportion to deductions herein
made;
(2) Thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent of such funds
distributed under RCW 46.68.090 shall be deducted monthly, as such
funds accrue, and set aside for the use of the department of
transportation for the purpose of funding the cities' share of the
costs of highway jurisdiction studies and other studies. Any funds so
retained and not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium
to the cities in proportion to the deductions made;
(3) One percent of such funds distributed under RCW 46.68.090 shall
be deducted monthly, as such funds accrue, to be deposited in the small
city pavement and sidewalk account, to implement the city hardship
assistance program, as provided in RCW 47.26.164. However, any moneys
so retained and not required to carry out the program under this
subsection as of July 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter, shall
be retained in the account and used for maintenance, repair, and
resurfacing of city and town streets for cities and towns with a
population of less than five thousand((.));
(4) ((Except as provided in RCW 47.26.080,)) After making the
deductions under subsections (1) through (3) of this section and RCW
35.76.050, the balance remaining to the credit of incorporated cities
and towns shall be apportioned monthly as such funds accrue among the
several cities and towns within the state ratably on the basis of the
population last determined by the office of financial management.

Sec. 6 RCW 47.26.084 and 1999 c 94 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The transportation improvement account is hereby created in the
motor vehicle fund. The intent of the program is to:
(a) Improve mobility of people and goods in Washington state by
supporting economic development and environmentally responsive
solutions to our statewide transportation system needs;
(b) Improve the arterial street system of the state by improving
mobility and safety while supporting an environment essential to the
quality of life of the citizens of the state; and
(c) Maintain, preserve, and extend the life and utility of prior
investments in transportation systems and services.
(2) The small city program, as provided for in RCW 47.26.115, is
implemented within the transportation improvement account.
(3) Within one year after board approval of an application for
funding, a county, city, or transportation benefit district shall
provide written certification to the board of the pledged local and/or
private funding. Funds allocated to an applicant that does not certify
its funding within one year after approval may be reallocated by the
board.

Sec. 7 RCW 47.26.086 and 1994 c 179 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
Transportation improvement account projects selected for funding
programs after fiscal year 1995 are governed by the requirements of
this section.
The board shall allocate funds from the account by June 30th of
each year for the ensuing fiscal year to urban counties, cities with a
population of five thousand and over, and to transportation benefit
districts. Projects may include, but are not limited to, multi-agency
projects and arterial improvement projects in fast-growing areas. The
board shall endeavor to provide geographical diversity in selecting
improvement projects to be funded from the account.
((The intent of the program is to improve mobility of people and
goods in Washington state by supporting economic development and
environmentally responsive solutions to our statewide transportation
system needs.))
To be eligible to receive these funds, a project must be consistent
with the Growth Management Act, the Clean Air Act including conformity,
and the Commute Trip Reduction Law and consideration must have been
given to the project's relationship, both actual and potential, with
the statewide rail passenger program and rapid mass transit. Projects
must be consistent with any adopted high capacity transportation plan,
must consider existing or reasonably foreseeable congestion levels
attributable to economic development or growth and all modes of
transportation and safety, and must be partially funded by local
government or private contributions, or a combination of such
contributions. Priority consideration shall be given to those projects
with the greatest percentage of local or private contribution, or both.
Within one year after board approval of an application for funding,
the lead agency shall provide written certification to the board of the
pledged local and private funding for the phase of the project
approved. Funds allocated to an applicant that does not certify its
funding within one year after approval may be reallocated by the board.

Sec. 8 RCW 47.26.190 and 1994 c 179 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall adopt rules that provide geographical diversity in
selecting improvement projects to be funded from the ((urban arterial
trust)) transportation improvement account and small city ((account))
program funds.

Sec. 9 RCW 47.26.140 and 1999 c 94 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
The transportation improvement board shall appoint an executive
director, who shall serve at its pleasure and whose salary shall be set
by the board, and may employ additional staff as it deems appropriate.
All costs associated with staff, together with travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, shall be paid from the
((urban arterial trust account,)) public transportation systems
account((,)) and the transportation improvement account in the motor
vehicle fund as determined by the biennial appropriation.

Sec. 10 RCW 47.26.423 and 1986 c 290 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The money arising from the sale of the first authorization bonds,
series II bonds, and series III bonds shall be deposited in the state
treasury to the credit of the ((urban arterial trust)) transportation
improvement account in the motor vehicle fund, and such money shall be
available only for the construction and improvement of county and city
urban arterials, and for payment of the expense incurred in the
printing, issuance, and sale of any such bonds. The costs of obtaining
insurance, letters of credit, or other credit enhancement devices with
respect to the bonds shall be considered to be expenses incurred in the
issuance and sale of the bonds.

Sec. 11 RCW 47.26.425 and 2007 c 519 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
Any funds required to repay the first authorization of two hundred
fifty million dollars of bonds authorized by RCW 47.26.420, as amended
by section 18, chapter 317, Laws of 1977 ex. sess. or the interest
thereon when due, shall be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle
fund which results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle
and special fuels and which is distributed to the ((urban arterial
trust)) transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund
pursuant to RCW 46.68.090(2)(e), and shall never constitute a charge
against any allocations of any other such funds in the motor vehicle
fund to the state, counties, cities, and towns unless and until the
amount of the motor vehicle fund arising from the excise tax on motor
vehicle and special fuels and distributed to the ((urban arterial
trust)) transportation improvement account proves insufficient to meet
the requirements for bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.

Sec. 12 RCW 47.26.4252 and 1999 sp.s. c 1 s 610 are each amended
to read as follows:
Any funds required to repay the authorization of series II bonds
authorized by RCW 47.26.420, as reenacted by section 3, chapter 5, Laws
of 1979, or the interest thereon when due, shall first be taken from
that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from the
imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels imposed
by chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW and which is distributed to the ((urban
arterial trust)) transportation improvement account in the motor
vehicle fund pursuant to RCW 46.68.090(((1)(g))) (2)(e), subject,
however, to the prior lien of the first authorization of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.26.420, as reenacted by section 3, chapter 5, Laws
of 1979. If the moneys distributed to the ((urban arterial trust))
transportation improvement account shall ever be insufficient to repay
the first authorization bonds together with interest thereon, and the
series II bonds or the interest thereon when due, the amount required
to make such payments on such bonds or interest thereon shall next be
taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from
the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and
which is distributed to the state, counties, cities, and towns pursuant
to RCW 46.68.090. Any payments on such bonds or interest thereon taken
from motor vehicle or special fuel tax revenues which are distributable
to the state, counties, cities, and towns, shall be repaid from the
first moneys distributed to the ((urban arterial trust)) transportation
improvement account not required for redemption of the first
authorization bonds or series II and series III bonds or interest on
those bond issues.

Sec. 13 RCW 47.26.4254 and 2010 c 8 s 10008 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any funds required to repay series III bonds authorized by RCW
47.26.420, or the interest thereon, when due shall first be taken from
that portion of the motor vehicle fund that results from the imposition
of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels imposed by chapters
82.36 and 82.38 RCW and that is distributed to the ((urban arterial
trust)) transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund
pursuant to RCW 46.68.090(2)(e), subject, however, to the prior lien of
the first authorization of bonds authorized by RCW 47.26.420. If the
moneys so distributed to the ((urban arterial trust)) transportation
improvement account, after first being applied to administrative
expenses of the transportation improvement board and to the
requirements of bond retirement and payment of interest on first
authorization bonds and series II bonds as provided in RCW 47.26.425
and 47.26.4252, are insufficient to meet the requirements for bond
retirement or interest on any series III bonds, the amount required to
make such payments on series III bonds or interest thereon shall next
be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund that results from
the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and
that is distributed to the state, counties, cities, and towns pursuant
to RCW 46.68.090, subject, however, to subsection (2) of this section.
(2) To the extent that moneys so distributed to the ((urban
arterial trust)) transportation improvement account are insufficient to
meet the requirements for bond retirement or interest on any series III
bonds, sixty percent of the amount required to make such payments when
due shall first be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund
that results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and
special fuels and that is distributed to the state. The remaining
forty percent shall first be taken from that portion of the motor
vehicle fund that results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels and that is distributed to the cities and
towns pursuant to RCW 46.68.090(2)(g) and to the counties pursuant to
RCW 46.68.090(2)(h). Of the counties', cities', and towns' share of
any additional amounts required in each fiscal year, the percentage
thereof to be taken from the counties' distributive share and from the
cities' and towns' distributive share shall correspond to the
percentage of funds authorized for specific county projects and for
specific city and town projects, respectively, from the proceeds of
series III bonds, for the period through the first eleven months of the
prior fiscal year as determined by the chair of the transportation
improvement board and reported to the state finance committee and the
state treasurer not later than the first working day of June.
(3) Any payments on such bonds or interest thereon taken from motor
vehicle or special fuel tax revenues that are distributable to the
state, counties, cities, and towns shall be repaid from the first
moneys distributed to the ((urban arterial trust)) transportation
improvement account not required for redemption of the first
authorization bonds, series II bonds, or series III bonds or interest
on these bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 RCW 46.68.160 is decodified.

--- END ---