BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Off-road motorcycle" means a motorcycle as defined in RCW
46.04.330 that is labeled by the manufacturer's statement or
certificate of origin as intended for "off-road use only" or a similar
message stamped into the frame of the motorcycle, contained in the
owner's manual, or affixed to any part of the motorcycle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may operate an off-road motorcycle upon a public road,
street, or highway of this state if the person:
(a) Files a motorcycle highway use declaration, as provided under
section 3 of this act, with the department certifying conformance with
all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards and state
standards;
(b) Obtains and has in full force and effect a current and proper
ORV registration or temporary ORV use permit under chapter 46.09 RCW;
and
(c) Obtains a valid driver's license and motorcycle endorsement
issued to Washington residents in compliance with chapter 46.20 RCW for
a motorcycle.
(2) Any off-road motorcycle operated under this section must have:
(a) A head lamp meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.523 and
46.37.524, and used in accordance with RCW 46.37.522;
(b) A tail lamp meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.525;
(c) A stop lamp meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.525;
(d) Reflectors meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.525;
(e) Brakes meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.527, 46.37.528,
and 46.37.529;
(f) A mirror on both the left and right handlebar meeting the
requirements of RCW 46.37.530;
(g) A windshield meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.530, unless
the driver wears glasses, goggles, or a face shield while operating the
motorcycle, of a type conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol;
(h) A horn or warning device meeting the requirements of RCW
46.37.380;
(i) Tires meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.420 and 46.37.425;
(j) Turn signals meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.200; and
(k) Fenders adequate for minimizing the spray or splash of water,
rocks, or mud from the roadway. Fenders must be as wide as the tires
behind which they are mounted and extend downward at least half way to
the center of the axle.
(3) Every person operating an off-road motorcycle under this
section is granted all rights and is subject to all duties applicable
to the driver of a motorcycle under RCW 46.37.530 and chapter 46.61
RCW.
(4) Any person who violates this section commits a traffic
infraction.
(5) Accidents must be recorded and tracked in compliance with
chapter 46.52 RCW. An accident report must indicate and be tracked
separately when any of the vehicles involved are an off-road
motorcycle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.16A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish a declaration subject to the
requirements of RCW 9A.72.085, which must be submitted by an off-road
motorcycle owner when applying for on-road registration of the off-road
motorcycle. In order to be registered for on-road use, an off-road
motorcycle must travel on two wheels with a seat designed to be
straddled by the operator and with handlebar-type steering control.
(2) Registration for on-road use of an off-road motorcycle is
prohibited for dune buggies, snowmobiles, trimobiles, mopeds, pocket
bikes, motor vehicles registered by the department, side-by-sides,
utility vehicles, grey-market vehicles, off-road three-wheeled
vehicles, and, as determined by the department, any other vehicles that
were not originally certified by the manufacturer for use on public
roads.
(3) The declaration must include the following:
(a) Documentation of a safety inspection to be completed by a
licensed motorcycle dealer or repair shop in the state of Washington
that must outline the vehicle information and certify that all off-road
to on-road motorcycle equipment as required under section 2 of this act
meets the requirements outlined in state and federal law;
(b) Documentation that the licensed motorcycle dealer or repair
shop did not charge more than one hundred dollars per safety inspection
and that the entire safety inspection fee is paid directly and only to
the licensed motorcycle dealer or repair shop;
(c) A statement that the licensed motorcycle dealer or repair shop
is entitled to the full amount charged for the motorcycle safety
inspection;
(d) A vehicle identification number verification that must be
completed by a licensed motorcycle dealer or repair shop in the state
of Washington; and
(e) A release signed by the owner of the off-road motorcycle and
verified by the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director that releases the state from any liability
and outlines that the owner understands that the original off-road
motorcycle was not manufactured for on-road use and that it has been
modified for use on public roads.
(4) The department must track off-road motorcycles in a separate
registration category for reporting purposes.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.09.470 and 2006 c 212 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, it is a
traffic infraction for any person to operate any nonhighway vehicle:
(a) In such a manner as to endanger the property of another;
(b) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without a lighted headlight and taillight between the hours of
dusk and dawn, or when otherwise required for the safety of others
regardless of ownership;
(c) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle without an adequate braking device or when otherwise required
for the safety of others regardless of ownership;
(d) Without a spark arrester approved by the department of natural
resources;
(e) Without an adequate, and operating, muffling device which
effectively limits vehicle noise to no more than eighty-six decibels on
the "A" scale at fifty feet as measured by the Society of Automotive
Engineers (SAE) test procedure J 331a, except that a maximum noise
level of one hundred and five decibels on the "A" scale at a distance
of twenty inches from the exhaust outlet shall be an acceptable
substitute in lieu of the Society of Automotive Engineers test
procedure J 331a when measured:
(i) At a forty-five degree angle at a distance of twenty inches
from the exhaust outlet;
(ii) With the vehicle stationary and the engine running at a steady
speed equal to one-half of the manufacturer's maximum allowable ("red
line") engine speed or where the manufacturer's maximum allowable
engine speed is not known the test speed in revolutions per minute
calculated as sixty percent of the speed at which maximum horsepower is
developed; and
(iii) With the microphone placed ten inches from the side of the
vehicle, one-half way between the lowest part of the vehicle body and
the ground plane, and in the same lateral plane as the rearmost exhaust
outlet where the outlet of the exhaust pipe is under the vehicle;
(f) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle upon the shoulder or inside bank or slope of any nonhighway
road or highway, or upon the median of any divided highway;
(g) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle in any area or in such a manner so as to unreasonably expose
the underlying soil, or to create an erosion condition, or to injure,
damage, or destroy trees, growing crops, or other vegetation;
(h) On lands not owned by the operator or owner of the nonhighway
vehicle or on any nonhighway road or trail, when these are restricted
to pedestrian or animal travel;
(i) On any public lands in violation of rules and regulations of
the agency administering such lands; and
(j) On a private nonhighway road in violation of RCW
((46.09.115(3))) 46.09.450(3).
(2) It is a misdemeanor for any person to operate any nonhighway
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance.
(3)(a) Except for an off-road vehicle equipped with seat belts and
roll bars or an enclosed passenger compartment, it is a traffic
infraction for any person to operate or ride an off-road vehicle on a
nonhighway road without wearing upon his or her head a motorcycle
helmet fastened securely while in motion. For purposes of this
section, "motorcycle helmet" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
46.37.530.
(b) Subsection (3)(a) of this section does not apply to an off-road
vehicle operator operating on his or her own land.
(c) Subsection (3)(a) of this section does not apply to an off-road
vehicle operator operating on agricultural lands owned or leased by the
off-road vehicle operator or the operator's employer.
(4) It is not a traffic infraction to operate an off-road vehicle
on a street, road, or highway as authorized under RCW ((46.09.180))
46.09.360 or section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act takes effect January 1, 2012.

--- END ---