BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In the current financial crisis, elected
representatives in Washington state have an enormous duty to be
responsible stewards of government. Local governments are facing
significant financial constraints that will hamper their ability to
provide adequate services. The legislature intends to give additional
flexibility to local elected officials as they make budgetary and
salary decisions.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.17.020 and 2008 c 309 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The county legislative authority of each county or a county
commissioner or councilmember salary commission which conforms with RCW
36.17.024 is authorized to establish the salaries of the elected
officials of the county. The state and county shall contribute to the
costs of the salary of the elected prosecuting attorney as set forth in
subsection (11) of this section. The annual salary of a county elected
official shall not be less than the following:
(1) In each county with a population of one million or more:
Auditor, clerk, treasurer, sheriff, members of the county legislative
authority, and coroner, eighteen thousand dollars; and assessor,
nineteen thousand dollars;
(2) In each county with a population of from two hundred ten
thousand to less than one million: Auditor, seventeen thousand six
hundred dollars; clerk, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars;
treasurer, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; sheriff, nineteen
thousand five hundred dollars; assessor, seventeen thousand six hundred
dollars; members of the county legislative authority, nineteen thousand
five hundred dollars; and coroner, seventeen thousand six hundred
dollars;
(3) In each county with a population of from one hundred twenty-five thousand to less than two hundred ten thousand: Auditor, sixteen
thousand dollars; clerk, sixteen thousand dollars; treasurer, sixteen
thousand dollars; sheriff, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars;
assessor, sixteen thousand dollars; members of the county legislative
authority, seventeen thousand six hundred dollars; and coroner, sixteen
thousand dollars;
(4) In each county with a population of from seventy thousand to
less than one hundred twenty-five thousand: Auditor, fourteen thousand
nine hundred dollars; clerk, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars;
treasurer, fourteen thousand nine hundred dollars; assessor, fourteen
thousand nine hundred dollars; sheriff, fourteen thousand nine hundred
dollars; members of the county legislative authority, fourteen thousand
nine hundred dollars; and coroner, fourteen thousand nine hundred
dollars;
(5) In each county with a population of from forty thousand to less
than seventy thousand: Auditor, thirteen thousand eight hundred
dollars; clerk, thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; treasurer,
thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars; assessor, thirteen thousand
eight hundred dollars; sheriff, thirteen thousand eight hundred
dollars; members of the county legislative authority, thirteen thousand
eight hundred dollars; and coroner, thirteen thousand eight hundred
dollars;
(6) In each county with a population of from eighteen thousand to
less than forty thousand: Auditor, twelve thousand one hundred
dollars; clerk, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, twelve
thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, twelve thousand one hundred
dollars; assessor, twelve thousand one hundred dollars; and members of
the county legislative authority, eleven thousand dollars;
(7) In each county with a population of from twelve thousand to
less than eighteen thousand: Auditor, ten thousand one hundred
dollars; clerk, ten thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, ten
thousand one hundred dollars; assessor, ten thousand one hundred
dollars; sheriff, eleven thousand two hundred dollars; and members of
the county legislative authority, nine thousand four hundred dollars;
(8) In each county with a population of from eight thousand to less
than twelve thousand: Auditor, ten thousand one hundred dollars;
clerk, ten thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, ten thousand one
hundred dollars; assessor, ten thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff,
eleven thousand two hundred dollars; and members of the county
legislative authority, seven thousand dollars;
(9) In each county with a population of from five thousand to less
than eight thousand: Auditor, nine thousand one hundred dollars;
clerk, nine thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, nine thousand one
hundred dollars; assessor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff,
ten thousand five hundred dollars; and members of the county
legislative authority, six thousand five hundred dollars;
(10) In each other county: Auditor, nine thousand one hundred
dollars; clerk, nine thousand one hundred dollars; treasurer, nine
thousand one hundred dollars; sheriff, ten thousand five hundred
dollars; assessor, nine thousand one hundred dollars; and members of
the county legislative authority, six thousand five hundred dollars;
(11) The state of Washington shall contribute an amount equal to
one-half the salary of a superior court judge towards the salary of the
elected prosecuting attorney. Upon receipt of the state contribution,
a county ((shall continue to)) may contribute towards the salary of the
elected prosecuting attorney in an amount that equals or exceeds that
contributed by the county in 2008.

--- END ---