BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Many small public water systems in
Washington are facing higher expenses, failing infrastructure, a
falloff in state and federal aid, and more difficulty with borrowing
money as a result of the economic downturn. It is the intent of the
legislature to provide small public water systems with short-term
options to meet public health requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.119A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A public water system in a county with a population of less
than eleven thousand that borders the Columbia river and is located
completely east of the crest of the Cascade mountains may allow the use
of point-of-entry and point-of-use treatment in lieu of centralized
treatment where it can be demonstrated that there is a problem with
arsenic levels in the drinking water and centralized treatment is not
immediately economically feasible. Use of point-of-entry and
point-of-use treatment is limited to the following:
(a) Water systems with less than one hundred service connections;
(b) Usage is allowed under the federal safe drinking water act and
its implementing regulations and guidance, including, but not limited
to:
(i) The point-of-entry or point-of-use treatment must be owned,
controlled, and maintained by the public water system or a contractor
hired by the public water system to ensure proper operation and
maintenance of the point-of-entry or point-of-use treatment;
(ii) The public water system or a contractor hired by the public
water system must have access to the point-of-entry or point-of-use
treatment for installation, maintenance, monitoring, and removal;
(iii) The public water system may terminate, after notice, the
water service of any customer who fails or refuses to allow such
access, or adjusts, modifies, repairs, replaces, removes, disconnects,
bypasses, or otherwise tampers with a treatment unit without prior
approval from the public water system;
(c) The point-of-entry or point-of-use treatment must have
mechanical warnings to automatically notify the customer of the public
water system of operational problems; and
(d) The public water system has submitted an application to the
department for funding to correct the violations for which the
point-of-entry and point-of-use treatment is provided.
(2) The public water system must, in consultation with the
department, conduct a public hearing in the community served by the
public water system. The public water system must report to the
department whether there is any substantial community opposition to the
installation of point-of-entry or point-of-use treatment devices.
(3) The public water system must develop a compliance monitoring
plan and the department must approve the compliance monitoring plan
before point-of-entry or point-of-use treatment may be installed.
(4) The approval of point-of-use or point-of-entry treatment is
limited to not more than three years or until funding for centralized
treatment is available, whichever occurs first.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Point-of-entry treatment" means a device for the treatment of
potable water that is located at the water service entry in a building.
(b) "Point-of-use treatment" means a device for the treatment of
potable water that is located at the water tap in a building.
(6) This section expires June 30, 2015.

--- END ---