BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall endeavor to increase the use of telephonic
and video remote technologies for medical interpretive services:
PROVIDED, That telephone and video remote technologies may not be used
in the following situations: Patients who are hard of hearing, mental
health diagnosis and treatment, sharing of bad news or end-of-life
scenarios, situations that require demonstrations or where visual cues
are important, labor and delivery appointments, surgeries, or any other
situation where the health and safety of the client would be
compromised.
(2) All medical interpretive services must be provided by language
access providers certified by Washington state.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.04.025 and 2010 c 296 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department and the office of administrative hearings shall
ensure that bilingual services are provided to non-English speaking
applicants and recipients. The services shall be provided to the
extent necessary to assure that non-English speaking persons are not
denied, or unable to obtain or maintain, services or benefits because
of their inability to speak English.
(2) If the number of non-English speaking applicants or recipients
sharing the same language served by any community service office client
contact job classification equals or exceeds fifty percent of the
average caseload of a full-time position in such classification, the
department shall, through attrition, employ bilingual personnel to
serve such applicants or recipients.
(3) Regardless of the applicant or recipient caseload of any
community service office, each community service office shall ensure
that bilingual services required to supplement the community service
office staff are provided through contracts with language access
providers, ((local agencies, or other community resources)) or through
a single coordinating entity that contracts directly with language
access providers.
(4) The department shall certify, authorize, and qualify language
access providers as needed to maintain an adequate pool of providers.
(5) The department shall require compliance with RCW 41.56.113(2)
through its contracts with third parties.
(6) Initial client contact materials shall inform clients in all
primary languages of the availability of interpretation services for
non-English speaking persons. Basic informational pamphlets shall be
translated into all primary languages.
(7) To the extent all written communications directed to applicants
or recipients are not in the primary language of the applicant or
recipient, the department and the office of administrative hearings
shall include with the written communication a notice in all primary
languages of applicants or recipients describing the significance of
the communication and specifically how the applicants or recipients may
receive assistance in understanding, and responding to if necessary,
the written communication. The department shall assure that sufficient
resources are available to assist applicants and recipients in a timely
fashion with understanding, responding to, and complying with the
requirements of all such written communications.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) "Language access provider" means any independent contractor who
provides spoken language interpreter services for department
appointments or medicaid enrollee appointments, or provided these
services on or after January 1, 2009, and before June 10, 2010, whether
paid by a broker, language access agency, or the department. "Language
access provider" does not mean an owner, manager, or employee of a
broker or a language access agency.
(b) "Primary languages" includes but is not limited to Spanish,
Vietnamese, Cambodian, Laotian, and Chinese.

--- END ---