BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 This chapter may be known and cited as the
Washington innovation industries enabling act. This chapter is enacted
in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of
protecting the economic well-being and general welfare of the people of
this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The legislature finds that innovation in
the production of goods and services is woven throughout the history,
economy, and culture of Washington state and that the future economic
success of the state will be dependent on our being in the forefront of
innovation. The legislature declares that the promotion of innovation
within private sector companies is a fundamental purpose of state
government and that the commercialization and manufacture of products
within this state is in the public interest.
(2) By this chapter, the legislature intends to accelerate the
growth of industry clusters, strengthen industry collaboration in
innovation, create jobs, enhance public revenues and further the
continued commercialization and manufacture of innovative products in
Washington, and the promotion of Washington's products and services
nationally and globally. It is the purpose of this chapter to:
(a) Enable industry-sponsored organizations to work collaboratively
and provide technical and other joint assistance to help industrial
producers meet their research, commercialization, financial, workforce
training, marketing, exporting, and other industry identified needs;
(b) Assist industrial producers to improve productivity and reduce
costs within a globally competitive environment and remove impairments
to their ability to compete in local, domestic, and foreign markets;
and
(c) Promote industry clusters individually and as part of a
comprehensive state strategy to enhance the innovativeness, quality,
reputation, and sales of Washington's industrial products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Certified industry cluster" means an industry sector, which
may include sector suppliers and associated institutions, which has
been certified by the director as eligible for assistance through
innovation industry credit allowances.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of commerce or
his or her duly appointed representative. The phrase "director or his
or her designee" means the director unless he or she has designated an
administrator, board, or other designee to act in the matter
designated, in which case "director or his or her designee" means the
administrator, board, or other person or persons so designated and not
the director.
(3) "Industry development organization" means a nonprofit,
membership-based organization formed by firms within an industry
cluster for the purpose of providing technical assistance and support
to firms within the industry cluster. Industry development
organization membership may be either statewide in scope or a workforce
development area or areas as determined under the federal workforce
investment act, P.L. 105-220.
(4) "Industry cluster" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
43.330.090.
(5)(a) "Innovation credit allocation" means for the calendar year
in which certification of an industry cluster occurs and any subsequent
calendar year during which an industry cluster is certified for the
duration of the year, fifty percent of the amount, if any, of business
and occupation taxes reported for that calendar year by all business
entities within that certified industry cluster that exceed the
projected tax receipts for that certified industry cluster.
(b) An innovation credit allocation may not exceed five million
dollars.
(6) "Innovation industry credit allowance" means the amount of
contributions to an industry development organization for which a
business and occupation tax credit may be taken by the donor under
section 7 of this act.
(7) "NAICS" means the North American industry classification
system.
(8) "Projected tax receipts" means the expected business and
occupation tax receipts for a calendar year from all businesses in a
certified industry cluster based on a five-year trend line of state
business and occupation taxes reported by all businesses in that
certified industry cluster, as established by the department of
revenue.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The director is hereby authorized to
implement, administer, and enforce this chapter. The director may
adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this
chapter. The director must administer provisions of this act to align
with the strategic plan and priorities of the Washington economic
development commission.
(2) The director, in consultation with the executive director of
the Washington economic development commission, must:
(a) Establish the process by which firms or industry development
organizations may petition for certification of an industry cluster.
The process must reference the minimum number of firms, or the minimum
percent of the firms within an industry cluster, that must join in the
petition. Industry firm participation in the cluster is voluntary;
(b) Establish industry cluster certification standards. The
certification standards must reference:
(i) The minimum number of firms, which must be at least three, that
may be in a certified industry cluster;
(ii) The minimum rate of employment growth within the certified
industry cluster;
(iii) The minimum rate of revenue growth within the certified
industry cluster;
(iv) The identification of relationships with organizations
critical to accelerating a cluster's innovation capacity and growth,
such as universities and colleges, research organizations, workforce
development organizations, public agencies, local economic development
agencies, innovation partnership zones, and technical assistance
providers; and
(iv) Any other quantitative and qualitative factors as the director
determines are appropriate;
(c) Certify, via certification orders, industry clusters that meet
the certification standards established by the director. The director
may amend or terminate certification orders, consistent with the
standards and rules adopted by the director;
(d) Make the final determination on the NAICS codes that define a
certified industry cluster;
(e) Notify the director of the department of revenue when an
industry cluster has been certified;
(f) Establish the processes, selection criteria, and contractual
requirements relating to the distribution of innovation industry funds;
and
(g) Provide bona fide industry development organizations seeking
innovation industry funds with contact information for firms within the
relevant certified industry clusters.
(3) The director may only certify one industry cluster in the first
year, and then one additional industry cluster each year thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Upon receipt of a certification order
from the director, the department of revenue must establish the
projected tax receipts for a certified industry cluster. The
department of revenue must establish the projected tax receipts by the
later of sixty days following the receipt of the certification order or
September 1st of the year in which the certification order was
received. In determining the projected tax receipts the department of
revenue must use existing data that is compiled in the department of
revenue's normal course of business and used for other purposes. No
corrections to the projected tax receipts for a certified industry
cluster may be made after the department of revenue determines the
initial innovation credit allocation for that certified industry
cluster.
(2) The department of revenue must determine the annual innovation
credit allocation attributable to each certified industry cluster when
the data is available. Such determination must be made by September
1st of each year. In determining the annual innovation credit
allocation the department of revenue must use existing data that is
compiled in the department of revenue's normal course of business and
used for other purposes. No changes to the innovation credit
allocation for a certified industry cluster may be made after the
department of revenue notifies the director of that innovation credit
allocation as required in subsection (3) of this section.
(3) The department of revenue must notify the director and the
applicable industry development organization of the innovation credit
allocations determined under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The department of revenue must annually provide to the director
such contact information for firms within a certified industry cluster
as is subject to disclosure under RCW 82.32.330(3)(k). The information
required under this subsection must be provided by a date mutually
agreed to by the department of revenue and the director.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The innovation industry program is
established in the department of commerce. The director may award
innovation industry credit allowances via contract with industry
development organizations to assist certified industry clusters
consistent with the purpose of this chapter. The period during which
awarded innovation industry credit allowances may be used may be up to
five years. The amount awarded to all industry development
organizations combined must not exceed five million dollars per year.
An individual industry development organization may not receive an
innovation industry credit allowance that exceeds the amount of private
sector contributions to the industry development organization.
Industry development organizations must indicate the certified industry
cluster they seek to serve and whether they intend to provide services
statewide or within a substate area. The director must set
qualification standards for industry development organizations applying
for innovation industry credit allowances under the program including,
but not limited to, the number and the percentage of certified industry
cluster firms in the proposed service area that are members of the
industry development organization.
(2) Innovation industry credit allowances awarded to industry
development organizations may be used for any of the following:
(a) Research and development of better and more efficient
production, processing, transportation, handling, and marketing of
value-added products;
(b) Assistance with quality control and testing of products and
processes;
(c) Workforce training and recruitment;
(d) Incubation and acceleration services;
(e) Export assistance, including the prevention, modification, or
elimination of trade barriers;
(f) Providing marketing information and services including the
development of cooperative efforts;
(g) Providing information and services for meeting energy
efficiency and conservation objectives; and
(h) Any other services as are approved by the director.
(3) Innovation industry credit allowances may not be used for:
(a) Lobbying;
(b) Providing cash grants or loans to businesses; or
(c) Any other purpose prohibited by the director through rule or
contract.
(4) The contracts with industry development organizations must
specify:
(a) The expected deliverables and performance requirements;
(b) The annual reporting requirements; and
(c) That the organizations must demonstrate the maintenance of
previous efforts and the use of innovation industry credit allowances
for activities in addition to and beyond previous efforts.
(5) Priority will be given to those applicants who demonstrate:
(a) The capacity to serve all firms in an industry cluster;
(b) Collaboration with, and the ability to facilitate the goals of,
innovation partnership zones established under RCW 43.330.270; and
(c) Collaboration with centers of excellence established under RCW
28B.50.902 or with other industry specific assistance centers.
(6) Industry development organizations receiving innovation
industry credit allowances may contract with other research, education,
management, and technical assistance providers for services necessary
to meet industry cluster objectives and state contract obligations.
(7) The director may, through interagency agreement or contract,
utilize the services of public or private entities to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.
(8) All activities of the certified industry cluster under the
provisions of this act should not violate United States antitrust law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) In computing the tax authorized under
chapter 82.04 RCW, a credit is allowed for contributions to an industry
development organization representing a certified industry cluster.
The credit is only allowed if the industry development organization has
been awarded an innovation industry credit allowance via contract by
the director. The credit allowed under this section is equal to one
hundred percent of the value of a contribution to an industry
development organization.
(2) The person must make the contribution before claiming a credit
authorized under this section. Credit earned under this section may be
claimed against taxes due for the calendar year in which the
contribution is made. The amount of credit claimed for a reporting
period may not exceed the tax otherwise due under this chapter for that
reporting period. No refunds may be granted for any unused credits.
(3) Any amount of tax credit otherwise allowable under this section
not claimed by the person in any calendar year may be carried over and
claimed against the person's tax liability for the next succeeding
calendar year. Any credit not used in the succeeding calendar year may
not be carried over for any calendar year thereafter.
(4) Credits are available on a first in-time basis. The department
of revenue must disallow any credits, or portion thereof, that would
cause the total amount of credits claimed for donations to an industry
development organization to exceed the annual innovative industry
credit allowance of an industry development organization.
(5) At the time an industry development organization that receives
donations, by persons eligible to receive the credit under this
section, that reaches its annual innovative industry credit allowance,
it must notify the director and the director of the department of
revenue that its annual innovative industry credit allowance has been
reached. In addition, the industry development organization must
notify any additional donors if the annual limit has been reached and
that any additional donations in the calendar year may not receive the
credit authorized under this section.
(6) To claim a credit under this section, a person must
electronically file with the department all returns, forms, and any
other information required by the department, in an electronic format
as provided or approved by the department.
(7) No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section.
(8) The department may not allow any credit under this section
before July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---