BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 31.04.015 and 2010 c 35 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires a different meaning.
(1) "Add-on method" means the method of precomputing interest
payable on a loan whereby the interest to be earned is added to the
principal balance and the total plus any charges allowed under this
chapter is stated as the loan amount, without further provision for the
payment of interest except for failure to pay according to loan terms.
The director may adopt by rule a more detailed explanation of the
meaning and use of this method.
(2) "Applicant" means a person applying for a license under this
chapter.
(3) "Borrower" means any person who consults with or retains a
licensee or person subject to this chapter in an effort to obtain or
seek information about obtaining a loan, regardless of whether that
person actually obtains such a loan.
(4) "Depository institution" has the same meaning as in section 3
of the federal deposit insurance act on July 26, 2009, and includes
credit unions.
(5) "Director" means the director of financial institutions.
(6) "Federal banking agencies" means the board of governors of the
federal reserve system, comptroller of the currency, director of the
office of thrift supervision, national credit union administration, and
federal deposit insurance corporation.
(7) "Individual servicing a mortgage loan" means a person on behalf
of a lender or servicer licensed by this state, or a person acting on
behalf of a federally chartered or licensed financial institution or
its affiliate, who collects or receives payments including payments of
principal, interest, escrow amounts, and other amounts due, on existing
obligations due and owing to the licensed lender or servicer or
financial institution for a residential mortgage loan when the borrower
is in default, or in reasonably foreseeable likelihood of default,
working with the borrower and the licensed lender or servicer or
financial institution, collects data and makes decisions necessary to
modify either temporarily or permanently certain terms of those
obligations, or otherwise finalizing collection through the foreclosure
process.
(8) "Insurance" means life insurance, disability insurance,
property insurance, involuntary unemployment insurance, and such other
insurance as may be authorized by the insurance commissioner.
(9) "License" means a single license issued under the authority of
this chapter with respect to a single place of business.
(10) "Licensee" means a person to whom one or more licenses have
been issued.
(11) "Loan" means a sum of money lent at interest or for a fee or
other charge and includes both open-end and closed-end loan
transactions.
(12) "Loan processor" means an individual who performs clerical or
support duties as an employee at the direction of and subject to the
supervision and instruction of a person licensed, or exempt from
licensing, under chapter 19.146 RCW.
(13) "Making a loan" means advancing, offering to advance, or
making a commitment to advance funds to a borrower for a loan.
(14) "Mortgage broker" means the same as defined in RCW 19.146.010,
except that for purposes of this chapter, a licensee or person subject
to this chapter cannot receive compensation as both a consumer loan
licensee making the loan and as a consumer loan licensee acting as the
mortgage broker in the same loan transaction.
(15)(a) "Mortgage loan originator" means an individual who for
compensation or gain (i) takes a residential mortgage loan application,
or (ii) offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan.
"Mortgage loan originator" does not include any individual who performs
purely administrative or clerical tasks; and does not include a person
or entity solely involved in extensions of credit relating to timeshare
plans, as that term is defined in section 101(53D) of Title 11, United
States Code. For the purposes of this definition, administrative or
clerical tasks means the receipt, collection, and distribution of
information common for the processing of a loan in the mortgage
industry and communication with a consumer to obtain information
necessary for the processing of a residential mortgage loan.
(b) "Mortgage loan originator" also includes an individual who for
compensation or gain performs residential mortgage loan modification
services or holds himself or herself out as being able to perform
residential mortgage loan modification services.
(c) "Mortgage loan originator" does not include a person or entity
that only performs real estate brokerage activities and is licensed or
registered in accordance with applicable state law, unless the person
or entity is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker, or other
mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such a lender, mortgage
broker, or other mortgage loan originator. For the purposes of chapter
120, Laws of 2009, the term "real estate brokerage activity" means any
activity that involves offering or providing real estate brokerage
services to the public, including:
(i) Acting as a real estate agent or real estate broker for a
buyer, seller, lessor, or lessee of real property;
(ii) Bringing together parties interested in the sale, purchase,
lease, rental, or exchange of real property;
(iii) Negotiating, on behalf of any party, any portion of a
contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of
real property, other than in connection with providing financing with
respect to such a transaction;
(iv) Engaging in any activity for which a person engaged in the
activity is required to be registered or licensed as a real estate
agent or real estate broker under any applicable law; and
(v) Offering to engage in any activity, or act in any capacity,
described in (c)(i) through (iv) of this subsection.
(d) This subsection does not apply to an individual servicing a
mortgage loan before July 1, 2011.
(e) This subsection does not apply to employees of a housing
counseling agency approved by the United States department of housing
and urban development unless the employees of a housing counseling
agency are required under federal law to be individually licensed as
mortgage loan originators.
(16) "Nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry" means a
mortgage licensing system developed and maintained by the conference of
state bank supervisors and the American association of residential
mortgage regulators for the licensing and registration of mortgage loan
originators.
(17) "Officer" means an official appointed by the company for the
purpose of making business decisions or corporate decisions.
(18) "Person" includes individuals, partnerships, associations,
limited liability companies, limited liability partnerships, trusts,
corporations, and all other legal entities.
(19) "Principal" means any person who controls, directly or
indirectly through one or more intermediaries, alone or in concert with
others, a ten percent or greater interest in a partnership; company;
association or corporation; or a limited liability company, and the
owner of a sole proprietorship.
(20) "Registered mortgage loan originator" means any individual who
meets the definition of mortgage loan originator and is an employee of
a depository institution; a subsidiary that is owned and controlled by
a depository institution and regulated by a federal banking agency; or
an institution regulated by the farm credit administration and is
registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through, the
nationwide mortgage licensing system and registry.
(21) "Residential mortgage loan" means any loan primarily for
personal, family, or household use that is secured by a mortgage, deed
of trust, or other equivalent consensual security interest on a
dwelling, as defined in section 103(v) of the truth in lending act, or
residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be
constructed a dwelling.
(22) "Residential mortgage loan modification" means a change in one
or more of a residential mortgage loan's terms or conditions. Changes
to a residential mortgage loan's terms or conditions include but are
not limited to forbearances; repayment plans; changes in interest
rates, loan terms, or loan types; capitalizations of arrearages; or
principal reductions.
(23) "Residential mortgage loan modification services" includes
negotiating, attempting to negotiate, arranging, attempting to arrange,
or otherwise offering to perform a residential mortgage loan
modification. "Residential mortgage loan modification services" also
includes the collection of data for submission to an entity performing
mortgage loan modification services. "Residential mortgage loan
modification services" do not include actions by individuals servicing
a mortgage loan before July 1, 2011.
(24) "S.A.F.E. act" means the secure and fair enforcement for
mortgage licensing act of 2008, Title V of the housing and economic
recovery act of 2008 ("HERA"), P.L. 110-289, effective July 30, 2008.
(25) "Senior officer" means an officer of a licensee at the vice
president level or above.
(26) "Service or servicing a loan" means on behalf of the lender or
investor of a residential mortgage loan or on behalf of a federally
chartered or licensed financial institution or its affiliate: (a)
Collecting or receiving payments on existing obligations due and owing
to the lender or investor or financial institution, including payments
of principal, interest, escrow amounts, and other amounts due; (b)
collecting fees due to the servicer; (c) working with the borrower and
the licensed lender or servicer or financial institution to collect
data and make decisions necessary to modify certain terms of those
obligations either temporarily or permanently; (d) otherwise finalizing
collection through the foreclosure process; or (e) servicing a reverse
mortgage loan.
(27) "Service or servicing a reverse mortgage loan" means, pursuant
to an agreement with the owner of a reverse mortgage loan:
Calculating, collecting, or receiving payments of interest or other
amounts due; administering advances to the borrower; and providing
account statements to the borrower or lender.
(28) "Simple interest method" means the method of computing
interest payable on a loan by applying the annual percentage interest
rate or its periodic equivalent to the unpaid balances of the principal
of the loan outstanding for the time outstanding with each payment
applied first to any unpaid penalties, fees, or charges, then to
accumulated interest, and the remainder of the payment applied to the
unpaid balance of the principal until paid in full. In using such
method, interest shall not be payable in advance nor compounded, except
that on a loan secured by real estate, a licensee may collect at the
time of the loan closing up to but not exceeding forty-five days of
prepaid interest. The prohibition on compounding interest does not
apply to reverse mortgage loans made in accordance with the Washington
state reverse mortgage act. The director may adopt by rule a more
detailed explanation of the meaning and use of this method.
(29) "Third-party residential mortgage loan modification services"
means residential mortgage loan modification services offered or
performed by any person other than the owner or servicer of the loan.
(30) "Third-party service provider" means any person other than the
licensee or a mortgage broker who provides goods or services to the
licensee or borrower in connection with the preparation of the
borrower's loan and includes, but is not limited to, credit reporting
agencies, real estate brokers or salespersons, title insurance
companies and agents, appraisers, structural and pest inspectors, or
escrow companies.
(31) "Unique identifier" means a number or other identifier
assigned by protocols established by the nationwide mortgage licensing
system and registry.

Sec. 2 RCW 31.04.290 and 2010 c 35 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A residential mortgage loan servicer must comply with the
following requirements:
(a) The requirements of chapter 19.148 RCW;
(b) Any fee that is assessed by a servicer must be assessed within
forty-five days of the date on which the fee was incurred and must be
explained clearly and conspicuously in a statement mailed to the
borrower at the borrower's last known address no more than thirty days
after assessing the fee;
(c) All amounts received by a servicer on a residential mortgage
loan at the address where the borrower has been instructed to make
payments must be accepted and credited, or treated as credited, within
one business day of the date received, provided that the borrower has
provided sufficient information to credit the account. If a servicer
uses the scheduled method of accounting, any regularly scheduled
payment made prior to the scheduled due date must be credited no later
than the due date. If any payment is received and not credited, or
treated as credited, the borrower must be notified of the disposition
of the payment within ten business days by mail at the borrower's last
known address. The notification must identify the reason the payment
was not credited or treated as credited to the account, as well as any
actions the borrower must take to make the residential mortgage loan
current;
(d) Any servicer that exercises the authority to collect escrow
amounts on a residential mortgage loan held for the borrower for
payment of insurance, taxes, and other charges with respect to the
property shall collect and make all such payments from the escrow
account and ensure that no late penalties are assessed or other
negative consequences result for the borrower;
(e) The servicer shall make reasonable attempts to comply with a
borrower's request for information about the residential mortgage loan
account and to respond to any dispute initiated by the borrower about
the loan account. The servicer:
(i) Must maintain written or electronic records of each written
request for information regarding a dispute or error involving the
borrower's account until the residential mortgage loan is paid in full,
sold, or otherwise satisfied;
(ii) Must provide a written statement to the borrower within
fifteen business days of receipt of a written request from the
borrower. The borrower's request must include the name and account
number, if any, of the borrower, a statement that the account is or may
be in error, and sufficient detail regarding the information sought by
the borrower to permit the servicer to comply. At a minimum, the
servicer's response to the borrower's request must include the
following information:
(A) Whether the account is current or, if the account is not
current, an explanation of the default and the date the account went
into default;
(B) The current balance due on the residential mortgage loan,
including the principal due, the amount of funds, if any, held in a
suspense account, the amount of the escrow balance known to the
servicer, if any, and whether there are any escrow deficiencies or
shortages known to the servicer;
(C) The identity, address, and other relevant information about the
current holder, owner, or assignee of the residential mortgage loan;
and
(D) The direct telephone number and mailing address of a servicer
representative who will serve as the direct point of contact for the
borrower with the information and authority to answer questions and
resolve disputes; and
(iii) May charge a fee for preparing and furnishing the statement
in (e)(ii) of this subsection not exceeding thirty dollars per
statement; ((and))
(f) Promptly correct any errors and refund any fees assessed to the
borrower resulting from the servicer's error;
(g) Maintain a caseload that provides the servicer the opportunity
to engage in effective loss mitigation;
(h) Disclose to the primary lender when the servicer or its
affiliate owns a subsequent lien;
(i) Reduce subordinate liens pro rata to any change in the first
mortgage;
(j) Foreclose in the servicer's own name or that of the lender; and
(k) Provide the borrower with a complete chain of title and note
transfer history in the notice of default.
(2) In addition to the statement in subsection (1)(e)(ii) of this
section, a borrower may request more detailed information from a
servicer, and the servicer must provide the information within fifteen
business days of receipt of a written request from the borrower. The
request must include the name and account number, if any, of the
borrower, a statement that the account is or may be in error, and
provide sufficient detail to the servicer regarding information sought
by the borrower. If requested by the borrower this statement must
include:
(a) A copy of the original note, or if unavailable, an affidavit of
lost note; and
(b) A statement that identifies and itemizes all fees and charges
assessed under the loan transaction and provides a full payment history
identifying in a clear and conspicuous manner all of the debits,
credits, application of and disbursement of all payments received from
or for the benefit of the borrower, and other activity on the
residential mortgage loan including escrow account activity and
suspense account activity, if any. The period of the account history
shall cover at a minimum the two-year period prior to the date of the
receipt of the request for information. If the servicer has not
serviced the residential mortgage loan for the entire two-year time
period the servicer shall provide the information going back to the
date on which the servicer began servicing the home loan, and identify
the previous servicer, if known. If the servicer claims that any
delinquent or outstanding sums are owed on the home loan prior to the
two-year period or the period during which the servicer has serviced
the residential mortgage loan, the servicer shall provide an account
history beginning with the month that the servicer claims any
outstanding sums are owed on the residential mortgage loan up to the
date of the request for the information. The borrower may request
annually one statement free of charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---