BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Many small public water systems in
Washington are facing higher expenses, failing infrastructure, a
falloff in state and federal aid, and more difficulty with borrowing
money as a result of the economic downturn. It is the intent of the
legislature to provide small public water systems with short-term
options to meet public health requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.119A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A public water system may allow the use of point-of-entry and
point-of-use treatment in lieu of centralized treatment where it can be
demonstrated that centralized treatment is not immediately economically
feasible. Use of point-of-entry and point-of-use treatment is limited
to the following:
(a) Water systems with less than two hundred service connections;
(b) Usage is allowed under the federal safe drinking water act and
its implementing regulations and guidance;
(c) The estimated cost to install centralized treatment exceeds one
percent of the median household income for the community;
(d) The point-of-entry or point-of-use treatment is independently
certified by the American national standards institute, or its
successor organization, and is operated and maintained by the water
system; and
(e) The point-of-entry or point-of-use treatment is equipped with
a mechanical warning system and equipped with a totalizing flow meter.
(2) The department shall not issue a permit to a public water
system or amend a valid existing permit to allow the use of point-of-entry or point-of-use treatment unless the department determines, after
conducting a public hearing in the community served by the public water
system, that there is no substantial community opposition to the
installation of point-of-entry or point-of-use treatment devices. The
issuance of a permit is limited to not more than three years or until
funding for centralized treatment is available, whichever occurs first.
(3) The department must submit a report to the governor and the
legislature on the status of public water systems that are using point-of-entry or point-of-use treatment by November 30, 2019. The report
must include the number of public water systems relying on point-of-entry or point-of-use treatment and any recommendations the department
has regarding the use of point-of-entry or point-of-use treatment by
public water systems.
(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Point-of-entry treatment" means a device for the treatment of
potable water that is located at the water service entry in a building.
(b) "Point-of-use treatment" means a device for the treatment of
potable water that is located at the water tap in a building.

--- END ---