BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.05.060 and 1991 c 3 s 308 are each amended to read
as follows:
Each local board of health ((shall have)) has supervision over all
matters pertaining to the preservation of the life and health of the
people within its jurisdiction and ((shall)) must:
(1) Enforce through the local health officer or the administrative
officer appointed under RCW 70.05.040, if any, the public health
statutes of the state and rules promulgated by the state board of
health and the secretary of health;
(2) Supervise the maintenance of all health and sanitary measures
for the protection of the public health within its jurisdiction;
(3) Enact such local rules and regulations as are necessary in
order to preserve, promote and improve the public health and provide
for the enforcement thereof;
(4) Provide for the control and prevention of any dangerous,
contagious or infectious disease within the jurisdiction of the local
health department;
(5) Provide for the prevention, control and abatement of nuisances
detrimental to the public health;
(6) Make such reports to the state board of health through the
local health officer or the administrative officer as the state board
of health may require; and
(7) Establish fee schedules for issuing or renewing licenses or
permits or for such other services as are authorized by the law and the
rules of the state board of health((: PROVIDED, That)). However, such
fees for services ((shall)) may not exceed the actual cost of providing
any such services. Such fees, if imposed annually upon more than fifty
properties, may be collected by the county treasurer for the purpose of
financing on-site sewerage programs. Any fees collected by the county
treasurer under this subsection must be collected in the same manner as
provided for rates and charges under RCW 84.56.035.

--- END ---