BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
Findings & Intent
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that there is a need
to provide funding to maintain enrollment in the state basic health
plan in order to ensure access to affordable, quality health care
services for Washington residents who lack other means of acquiring or
maintaining such health care coverage. The legislature further finds
that certain tax preferences are obsolete and inefficient and that such
tax preferences should be ended and the funding therefrom should be
used to provide funding to maintain enrollment in the state basic
health plan. Therefore, it is the legislature's intent that the funds
saved by the termination of the tax preferences in this act be used for
the purpose of the basic health plan.

PART II
Modifying and Placing a Cap on the First Mortgage Deduction
Sec. 201 RCW 82.04.4292 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 301 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
by those engaged in banking, loan, security or other financial
businesses, interest received on investments or loans primarily secured
by first mortgages or trust deeds on nontransient residential
properties.
(2) Interest deductible under this section includes the portion of
fees charged to borrowers, including points and loan origination fees,
that is recognized over the life of the loan as an adjustment to yield
in the taxpayer's books and records according to generally accepted
accounting principles.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section notwithstanding, the
following is a nonexclusive list of items that are not deductible under
this section:
(a) Fees for specific services such as: Document preparation fees;
finder fees; brokerage fees; title examination fees; fees for credit
checks; notary fees; loan application fees; interest lock-in fees if
the loan is not made; servicing fees; and similar fees or amounts;
(b) Fees received in consideration for an agreement to make funds
available for a specific period of time at specified terms, commonly
referred to as commitment fees;
(c) Any other fees, or portion of a fee, that is not recognized
over the life of the loan as an adjustment to yield in the taxpayer's
books and records according to generally accepted accounting
principles;
(d) Gains on the sale of valuable rights such as service release
premiums, which are amounts received when servicing rights are sold;
and
(e) Gains on the sale of loans, except deferred loan origination
fees and points deductible under subsection (2) of this section, are
not to be considered part of the proceeds of sale of the loan.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, in computing
tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax by those engaged in
banking, loan, security, or other financial businesses, amounts
received for servicing loans primarily secured by first mortgages or
trust deeds on nontransient residential properties, including such
loans that secure mortgage-backed or mortgage-related securities, but
only if:
(a)(i) The loans were originated by the person claiming a deduction
under this subsection (4) and that person either sold the loans on the
secondary market or securitized the loans and sold the securities on
the secondary market; or
(ii)(A) The person claiming a deduction under this subsection (4)
acquired the loans from the person that originated the loans through a
merger or acquisition of substantially all of the assets of the person
who originated the loans, or the person claiming a deduction under this
subsection (4) is affiliated with the person that originated the loans.
For purposes of this subsection, "affiliated" means under common
control. "Control" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of
more than fifty percent of the power to direct or cause the direction
of the management and policies of a person, whether through the
ownership of voting shares, by contract, or otherwise; and
(B) Either the person who originated the loans or the person
claiming a deduction under this subsection (4) sold the loans on the
secondary market or securitized the loans and sold the securities on
the secondary market; and
(b) The amounts received for servicing the loans are determined by
a percentage of the interest paid by the borrower and are only received
if the borrower makes interest payments.
(5) The total amount a person may deduct under this section for any
calendar year may not exceed one hundred million dollars.

PART III
Airplane Excise Tax
Sec. 301 RCW 82.48.010 and 1995 c 318 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the
context:
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Aircraft" means any weight-carrying device or structure for
navigation of the air which is designed to be supported by the air;
(((2) "Secretary" means the secretary of transportation;))
(3) "Person" includes a firm, partnership, limited liability
company, or corporation((;
(4) "Small multi-engine fixed wing" means any piston-driven multi-engine fixed wing aircraft with a maximum gross weight as listed by the
manufacturer of less than seventy-five hundred pounds; and
(5) "Large multi-engine fixed wing" means any piston-driven multi-engine fixed wing aircraft with a maximum gross weight as listed by the
manufacturer of seventy-five hundred pounds or more)).

Sec. 302 RCW 82.48.020 and 2000 c 229 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An annual excise tax is hereby imposed for the privilege of
using any aircraft in the state. A current certificate of air
worthiness with a current inspection date from the appropriate federal
agency and/or the purchase of aviation fuel ((shall)) constitutes the
necessary evidence of aircraft use or intended use. ((The tax shall))
The amount of the tax is five-tenths of one percent of the taxable
value of the aircraft, as determined under section 303 of this act.
(2) The tax imposed under this section must be collected annually
or under a staggered collection schedule as required by the
((secretary)) department by rule. ((No additional tax shall be imposed
under this chapter upon any aircraft upon the transfer of ownership
thereof, if the tax imposed by this chapter with respect to such
aircraft has already been paid for the year in which transfer of
ownership occurs. A violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor
punishable as provided under chapter 9A.20 RCW.
(2))) (3) Persons who are required to register aircraft under
chapter 47.68 RCW and who register aircraft in another state or foreign
country and avoid the ((Washington)) aircraft excise tax imposed under
this section are liable for ((such)) the unpaid excise tax. A
violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.
(4) The department of revenue may, under chapter 82.32 RCW, assess
and collect the unpaid excise tax imposed under ((chapter 82.32 RCW))
this section, including the penalties and interest provided in chapter
82.32 RCW.
(((3))) (5) Except as provided under subsection((s (1) and (2)))
(3) of this section, a violation of this chapter is a misdemeanor
punishable as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 A new section is added to chapter 82.48
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, taxable value
is based on the most recent purchase price of the aircraft, depreciated
according to the year of the most recent purchase of the aircraft. For
purposes of this subsection, "purchase price" means the consideration,
whether money, credit, rights, or other property expressed in terms of
money paid or given or contracted to be paid or given by the purchaser
to the seller for the aircraft.
(b) For aircraft for which the most recent purchase price was not
indicative of the fair market value of the aircraft at the time of
purchase, the department may appraise the aircraft. If the department
appraises the aircraft, the taxable value is based on the department's
appraisal of fair market value of the aircraft at the time of the most
recent purchase, depreciated according to the year of the most recent
purchase of the aircraft.
(c) For aircraft acquired other than by purchase, including
aircraft manufactured, constructed, or assembled by the owner, the
department must appraise the aircraft before registration. In such
cases, the taxable value is the fair market value at the time of the
department's appraisal. For subsequent years, taxable value is based
on the department's appraisal of fair market value of the aircraft,
depreciated according to the year that the owner acquired the aircraft
or, in the case of aircraft manufactured, constructed, or assembled by
the owner, the year that the aircraft became operational.
(2)(a) An appraisal conducted by the department:
(i) Need not include a physical inspection of the aircraft; and
(ii) May be based on any guidebook, report, or compendium of
recognized standing in the aviation industry and information provided
to the department by the owner of the aircraft.
(b) Any aircraft owner disputing the department's appraised value
under this section may petition for a conference with the department as
provided under RCW 82.32.160 or for reduction of the tax due as
provided under RCW 82.32.170.
(3)(a) The department must prepare a depreciation schedule for use
in the determination of the taxable value for the purposes of this
chapter. The schedule must be based upon information available to the
department pertaining to the current fair market value of aircraft.
(b) The department must recommend a depreciation schedule to the
fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 31, 2011, for enactment in law during the 2012 legislative
session for use in the determination of taxable value for taxes due
under this chapter during calendar year 2013 and subsequent calendar
years.
(4) The department may adopt any rules necessary to implement this
section, including any rules necessary to provide a reasonable method
or methods to determine the fair market value of an aircraft.
(5) For purposes of this section, "department" means the department
of revenue.

Sec. 304 RCW 82.48.030 and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 22 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) ((The amount of the tax imposed by this chapter for each
calendar year shall be as follows:

Type of aircraft Registration fee

Single engine fixed wing $ 50

Small multi-engine fixed wing 65

Large multi-engine fixed wing 80

Turboprop multi-engine fixed wing 100

Turbojet multi-engine fixed wing 125

Helicopter 75

Sailplane 20

Lighter than air 20

Home built 20

(2))) The amount of tax imposed under ((subsection (1) of this
section)) RCW 82.48.020 for each calendar year ((shall)) must be
divided into twelve parts corresponding to the months of the calendar
year, and the excise tax upon an aircraft registered for the first time
in this state after the last day of any month ((shall)) is only ((be))
levied for the remaining months of the calendar year including the
month in which the aircraft is being registered((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, the minimum amount payable ((shall be)) is three dollars.
(2) For the purposes of this chapter, an aircraft ((shall be)) is
deemed registered for the first time in this state when such aircraft
was not ((previously)) required to be registered by this state for the
year immediately preceding the year in which application for
registration is made and was not so registered.

Sec. 305 RCW 82.48.070 and 1987 c 220 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((secretary shall)) department must give a receipt to each
person paying ((the)) excise tax under this chapter.

Sec. 306 RCW 82.48.080 and 1995 c 170 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((secretary shall)) department must regularly pay to the state
treasurer the excise taxes collected under this chapter((, which shall
be credited by the state treasurer as follows: Ninety percent to the
general fund and ten percent to the aeronautics account in the
transportation fund for administrative expenses)) for deposit into the
general fund.

Sec. 307 RCW 82.48.110 and 1967 ex.s. c 9 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The first tax to be collected under this chapter shall be for the
calendar year 1968.)) (1) No aircraft with respect to which the excise
tax imposed by this chapter is payable ((shall)) may be listed and
assessed for ad valorem taxation so long as this chapter remains in
effect((, and any such assessment heretofore made except under
authority of section 13, chapter 49, Laws of 1949 and section
82.48.110, chapter 15, Laws of 1961 is hereby directed to be canceled:
PROVIDED, That)).
(2) Any aircraft, whether or not subject to the provisions of this
chapter, with respect to which the excise tax imposed by this chapter
will not be paid or has not been paid for any year ((shall)) must be
listed and assessed for ad valorem taxation in that year, and the ad
valorem tax liability resulting from such listing and assessment
((shall)) must be collected in the same manner as though this chapter
had not been passed((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That this chapter shall not
be construed to affect any ad valorem tax based upon assessed
valuations made in 1948 and/or any preceding year for taxes payable in
1949 or any preceding year, which ad valorem tax liability tax for any
such years shall remain payable and collectible in the same manner as
though this chapter had not been passed)).

Sec. 308 RCW 47.68.230 and 2005 c 341 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It ((shall be)) is unlawful for any person to operate or cause
or authorize to be operated any civil aircraft within this state unless
such aircraft has an appropriate effective certificate, permit, or
license issued by the United States, if such certificate, permit, or
license is required by the United States, and a current registration
certificate issued by the ((secretary of transportation)) department of
licensing, if registration of the aircraft with the department of
((transportation)) licensing is required by this chapter. It ((shall
be)) is unlawful for any person to engage in aeronautics as an airman
or airwoman in the state unless the person has an appropriate effective
airman or airwoman certificate, permit, rating, or license issued by
the United States authorizing him or her to engage in the particular
class of aeronautics in which he or she is engaged, if such
certificate, permit, rating, or license is required by the United
States.
(2) Where a certificate, permit, rating, or license is required for
an airman or airwoman by the United States, it ((shall)) must be kept
in his or her personal possession when he or she is operating within
the state. Where a certificate, permit, or license is required by the
United States or by this chapter for an aircraft, it ((shall)) must be
carried in the aircraft at all times while the aircraft is operating in
the state and ((shall)) must be conspicuously posted in the aircraft
where it may be readily seen by passengers or inspectors. Such
certificates ((shall)) must be presented for inspection upon the demand
of any peace officer, or any other officer of the state or of a
municipality or member, official, or employee of the department of
transportation authorized pursuant to this chapter to enforce the
aeronautics laws, or any official, manager, or person in charge of any
airport, or upon the reasonable request of any person.

Sec. 309 RCW 82.48.090 and 1992 c 154 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
In case a claim is made by any person that the person has paid an
erroneously excessive amount of excise tax under this chapter, the
person may apply to the department of ((transportation)) licensing for
a refund of the claimed excessive amount together with interest at the
rate specified in RCW 82.32.060. The department of ((transportation
shall)) licensing must review such application, and if it determines
that an excess amount of tax has actually been paid by the taxpayer,
such excess amount and interest at the rate specified in RCW 82.32.060
((shall)) must be refunded to the taxpayer by means of a voucher
approved by the department of ((transportation)) licensing and by the
issuance of a state warrant drawn upon and payable from such funds as
the legislature may provide for that purpose. No refund ((shall)) may
be allowed, however, unless application for the refund is filed with
the department of ((transportation)) licensing within ninety days after
the claimed excessive excise tax was paid and the amount of the
overpayment exceeds five dollars.

PART IV
Imposing Sales and Use Tax on Cosmetic Surgery
Sec. 401 RCW 82.04.050 and 2010 c 112 s 14, 2010 c 111 s 201, and
2010 c 106 s 202 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) "Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of
tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons
who install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real
or personal property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person
who:
(i) Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal
property in the regular course of business without intervening use by
such person, but a purchase for the purpose of resale by a regional
transit authority under RCW 81.112.300 is not a sale for resale; or
(ii) Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves,
constructs, or decorates real or personal property of or for consumers,
if such tangible personal property becomes an ingredient or component
of such real or personal property without intervening use by such
person; or
(iii) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing for sale as a new article of tangible personal property or
substance, of which such property becomes an ingredient or component or
is a chemical used in processing, when the primary purpose of such
chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly through contact with
an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale; or
(iv) Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased
in producing ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing
magnesium for sale, if the primary purpose of such property is to
create a chemical reaction directly through contact with an ingredient
of ferrosilicon; or
(v) Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to
consumers as part of competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW
82.04.065; or
(vi) Purchases for the purpose of satisfying the person's
obligations under an extended warranty as defined in subsection (7) of
this section, if such tangible personal property replaces or becomes an
ingredient or component of property covered by the extended warranty
without intervening use by such person.
(b) The term includes every sale of tangible personal property that
is used or consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any
activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though
such property is resold or used as provided in (a)(i) through (vi) of
this subsection following such use.
(c) The term also means every sale of tangible personal property to
persons engaged in any business that is taxable under RCW 82.04.280
(1), (2), and (7), 82.04.290, and 82.04.2908.
(2) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for labor
and services rendered in respect to the following:
(a) The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or
improving of tangible personal property of or for consumers, including
charges made for the mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but
excluding charges made for the use of self-service laundry facilities,
and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit health care
facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live animals,
birds and insects;
(b) The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or
existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for consumers, including the installing or attaching of
any article of tangible personal property therein or thereto, whether
or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by virtue of
installation, and also includes the sale of services or charges made
for the clearing of land and the moving of earth excepting the mere
leveling of land used in commercial farming or agriculture;
(c) The constructing, repairing, or improving of any structure
upon, above, or under any real property owned by an owner who conveys
the property by title, possession, or any other means to the person
performing such construction, repair, or improvement for the purpose of
performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the property
is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the
original owner;
(d) The cleaning, fumigating, razing, or moving of existing
buildings or structures, but does not include the charge made for
janitorial services; and for purposes of this section the term
"janitorial services" means those cleaning and caretaking services
ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service businesses
including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor cleaning
and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or
sandblasting;
(e) Automobile towing and similar automotive transportation
services, but not in respect to those required to report and pay taxes
under chapter 82.16 RCW;
(f) The furnishing of lodging and all other services by a hotel,
rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the granting of
any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the
renting or leasing of real property, and it is presumed that the
occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more
constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license
to use or enjoy the same. For the purposes of this subsection, it is
presumed that the sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging
for a continuous period of one month or more to a person is a rental or
lease of real property and not a mere license to enjoy the same;
(g) The installing, repairing, altering, or improving of digital
goods for consumers;
(h) Persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of
this subsection when such sales or charges are for property, labor and
services which are used or consumed in whole or in part by such persons
in the performance of any activity defined as a "sale at retail" or
"retail sale" even though such property, labor and services may be
resold after such use or consumption. Nothing contained in this
subsection may be construed to modify subsection (1) of this section
and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this section may be
construed to modify this subsection.
(3) The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" includes the sale of
or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and
other service emoluments however designated, received by persons
engaging in the following business activities:
(a) Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to
golf, pool, billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips
for sightseeing purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;
(b) Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;
(c) Credit bureau services;
(d) Automobile parking and storage garage services;
(e) Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding
(i) horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning,
trimming, repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near
electric transmission or distribution lines or equipment, if performed
by or at the direction of an electric utility;
(f) Service charges associated with tickets to professional
sporting events; ((and))
(g) The following personal services: Physical fitness services,
tanning salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services,
turkish bath services, escort services, and dating services; and
(h) Cosmetic medical services.
(4)(a) The term also includes the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property to consumers.
(b) The term does not include the renting or leasing of tangible
personal property where the lease or rental is for the purpose of
sublease or subrent.
(5) The term also includes the providing of "competitive telephone
service," "telecommunications service," or "ancillary services," as
those terms are defined in RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.
(6)(a) The term also includes the sale of prewritten computer
software to a consumer, regardless of the method of delivery to the end
user. For purposes of this subsection (6)(a), the sale of prewritten
computer software includes the sale of or charge made for a key or an
enabling or activation code, where the key or code is required to
activate prewritten computer software and put the software into use.
There is no separate sale of the key or code from the prewritten
computer software, regardless of how the sale may be characterized by
the vendor or by the purchaser.
The term "retail sale" does not include the sale of or charge made
for:
(i) Custom software; or
(ii) The customization of prewritten computer software.
(b)(i) The term also includes the charge made to consumers for the
right to access and use prewritten computer software, where possession
of the software is maintained by the seller or a third party,
regardless of whether the charge for the service is on a per use, per
user, per license, subscription, or some other basis.
(ii)(A) The service described in (b)(i) of this subsection (6)
includes the right to access and use prewritten computer software to
perform data processing.
(B) For purposes of this subsection (6)(b)(ii), "data processing"
means the systematic performance of operations on data to extract the
required information in an appropriate form or to convert the data to
usable information. Data processing includes check processing, image
processing, form processing, survey processing, payroll processing,
claim processing, and similar activities.
(7) The term also includes the sale of or charge made for an
extended warranty to a consumer. For purposes of this subsection,
"extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration to
perform the replacement or repair of tangible personal property at no
additional charge or a reduced charge for tangible personal property,
labor, or both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or
repair of tangible personal property, based on the occurrence of
specified events. The term "extended warranty" does not include an
agreement, otherwise meeting the definition of extended warranty in
this subsection, if no separate charge is made for the agreement and
the value of the agreement is included in the sales price of the
tangible personal property covered by the agreement. For purposes of
this subsection, "sales price" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.08.010.
(8)(a) The term also includes the following sales to consumers of
digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services:
(i) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right
of permanent use;
(ii) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of
use that is less than permanent;
(iii) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make
continued payment as a condition of the sale; and
(iv) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale.
(b) A retail sale of digital goods, digital codes, or digital
automated services under this subsection (8) includes any services
provided by the seller exclusively in connection with the digital
goods, digital codes, or digital automated services, whether or not a
separate charge is made for such services.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "permanent" means perpetual or
for an indefinite or unspecified length of time. A right of permanent
use is presumed to have been granted unless the agreement between the
seller and the purchaser specifies or the circumstances surrounding the
transaction suggest or indicate that the right to use terminates on the
occurrence of a condition subsequent.
(9) The term also includes the charge made for providing tangible
personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate
period of time. A consideration of this is that the operator is
necessary for the tangible personal property to perform as designed.
For the purpose of this subsection (9), an operator must do more than
maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.
(10) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or
improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way,
mass public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal corporation or
political subdivision of the state or by the United States and which is
used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.
(11) The term also does not include sales of chemical sprays or
washes to persons for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for
the prevention of scald, fungus, mold, or decay, nor does it include
sales of feed, seed, seedlings, fertilizer, agents for enhanced
pollination including insects such as bees, and spray materials to:
(a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation reserve
program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture;
(b) farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural
product; and (c) farmers acting under cooperative habitat development
or access contracts with an organization exempt from federal income tax
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code or
the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or
improve wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.
(12) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for labor
and services rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United
States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property
therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation. Nor does the term
include the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land
and the moving of earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority. Nor
does the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning
up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste
and other by-products of weapons production and nuclear research and
development.
(13) The term does not include the sale of or charge made for
labor, services, or tangible personal property pursuant to agreements
providing maintenance services for bus, rail, or rail fixed guideway
equipment when a regional transit authority is the recipient of the
labor, services, or tangible personal property, and a transit agency,
as defined in RCW 81.104.015, performs the labor or services.
(14) The term does not include the sale for resale of any service
described in this section if the sale would otherwise constitute a
"sale at retail" and "retail sale" under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 A new section is added to chapter 82.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) "Cosmetic medical service" means any medical procedure
performed on an individual by a person licensed or regulated in a
health profession as described in RCW 18.120.020, and any services
directly related to the performance of the medical procedure, that is
directed at improving the individual's appearance and that is not
medically necessary to promote the proper function of the body or
prevent or treat physical illness or disease. "Cosmetic medical
service" includes, but is not limited to, cosmetic surgery, hair
transplants, cosmetic injections, cosmetic soft tissue fillers,
dermabrasion and chemical peel, laser hair removal, laser skin
resurfacing, laser treatment of leg veins, sclerotherapy, and cosmetic
dentistry. Any medical procedure performed on abnormal structures
caused by or related to congenital defects, developmental
abnormalities, trauma, infection, tumors, or disease, including
procedures to improve function or give a more normal appearance, is
medically necessary. Services covered by the individual's medical or
dental insurance or that are deductible by the individual as medical
expenses for purposes of federal income tax are presumed to be
medically necessary services.
(2) "Cosmetic surgery" means the surgical reshaping of normal
structures on the body to improve the body image, self-esteem, or
appearance of an individual.
(3) "Services directly related to the performance of the medical
procedure" include occupancy at medical facilities and services
provided by an anesthesiologist, surgeon, or other licensed or
regulated health professional described in RCW 18.120.020. Services
required for or directly related to cosmetic medical services do not
include evaluation and referral by a primary care physician or
consultation or treatment by a counselor, psychologist, or
psychiatrist.
(4) An individual claiming that a medical procedure, otherwise
meeting the definition of cosmetic medical service in this section, is
not a cosmetic medical service must complete and provide to the seller
an affidavit in a form and manner prescribed by the department
documenting that the procedure is medically necessary to promote the
proper function of the body or prevent or treat physical illness or
disease. The seller must retain a copy of the affidavit for the
seller's files.

Sec. 403 RCW 82.12.020 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 206 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected from every person in this state
a tax or excise for the privilege of using within this state as a
consumer any:
(a) Article of tangible personal property acquired by the user in
any manner, including tangible personal property acquired at a casual
or isolated sale, and including by-products used by the manufacturer
thereof, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, irrespective of
whether the article or similar articles are manufactured or are
available for purchase within this state;
(b) Prewritten computer software, regardless of the method of
delivery, but excluding prewritten computer software that is either
provided free of charge or is provided for temporary use in viewing
information, or both;
(c) Services defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or
(g), (3)(a) or (h), or (6)(b), excluding services defined as a retail
sale in RCW 82.04.050(6)(b) that are provided free of charge;
(d) Extended warranty; or
(e)(i) Digital good, digital code, or digital automated service,
including the use of any services provided by a seller exclusively in
connection with digital goods, digital codes, or digital automated
services, whether or not a separate charge is made for such services.
(ii) With respect to the use of digital goods, digital automated
services, and digital codes acquired by purchase, the tax imposed in
this subsection (1)(e) applies in respect to:
(A) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser the right
of permanent use;
(B) Sales in which the seller has granted the purchaser a right of
use that is less than permanent;
(C) Sales in which the purchaser is not obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale; and
(D) Sales in which the purchaser is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of the sale.
(iii) With respect to digital goods, digital automated services,
and digital codes acquired other than by purchase, the tax imposed in
this subsection (1)(e) applies regardless of whether or not the
consumer has a right of permanent use or is obligated to make continued
payment as a condition of use.
(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the
use of any article of tangible personal property, extended warranty,
digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or service
taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (2)(a) or (g), (3)(a) or (h), or (6)(b), if
the sale to, or the use by, the present user or the present user's
bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter
82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user
or by the present user's bailor or donor.
(3)(a) Except as provided in this section, payment of the tax
imposed by this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW by one purchaser or user
of tangible personal property, extended warranty, digital good, digital
code, digital automated service, or other service does not have the
effect of exempting any other purchaser or user of the same property,
extended warranty, digital good, digital code, digital automated
service, or other service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.
(b) The tax imposed by this chapter does not apply:
(i) If the sale to, or the use by, the present user or his or her
bailor or donor has already been subjected to the tax under chapter
82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been paid by the present user
or by his or her bailor or donor;
(ii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal
property acquired by bailment and the tax has once been paid based on
reasonable rental as determined by RCW 82.12.060 measured by the value
of the article at time of first use multiplied by the tax rate imposed
by chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter as of the time of first use;
(iii) In respect to the use of any article of tangible personal
property acquired by bailment, if the property was acquired by a
previous bailee from the same bailor for use in the same general
activity and the original bailment was prior to June 9, 1961; or
(iv) To the use of digital goods or digital automated services,
which were obtained through the use of a digital code, if the sale of
the digital code to, or the use of the digital code by, the present
user or the present user's bailor or donor has already been subjected
to the tax under chapter 82.08 RCW or this chapter and the tax has been
paid by the present user or by the present user's bailor or donor.
(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection (4), the tax is
levied and must be collected in an amount equal to the value of the
article used, value of the digital good or digital code used, value of
the extended warranty used, or value of the service used by the
taxpayer, multiplied by the applicable rates in effect for the retail
sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.
(b) In the case of a seller required to collect use tax from the
purchaser, the tax must be collected in an amount equal to the purchase
price multiplied by the applicable rate in effect for the retail sales
tax under RCW 82.08.020.
(5) For purposes of the tax imposed in this section, "person"
includes anyone within the definition of "buyer," "purchaser," and
"consumer" in RCW 82.08.010.

Sec. 404 RCW 82.12.010 and 2010 c 127 s 4 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and
82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, has full force and effect with
respect to taxes imposed under the provisions of this chapter.
"Consumer," in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04
and 82.08 RCW insofar as applicable, also means any person who
distributes or displays, or causes to be distributed or displayed, any
article of tangible personal property, except newspapers, the primary
purpose of which is to promote the sale of products or services. With
respect to property distributed to persons within this state by a
consumer as defined in this subsection (1), the use of the property is
deemed to be by such consumer.
(2) "Extended warranty" has the same meaning as in RCW
82.04.050(7).
(3) "Purchase price" means the same as sales price as defined in
RCW 82.08.010.
(4)(a)(i) Except as provided in (a)(ii) of this subsection (4),
"retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and every
person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property at
retail and every person required to collect from purchasers the tax
imposed under this chapter.
(ii) "Retailer" does not include a professional employer
organization when a covered employee coemployed with the client under
the terms of a professional employer agreement engages in activities
that constitute a sale of tangible personal property, extended
warranty, digital good, digital code, or a sale of any digital
automated service or service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050
(2)(a) or (g), (3)(a), or (6)(b) that is subject to the tax imposed by
this chapter. In such cases, the client, and not the professional
employer organization, is deemed to be the retailer and is responsible
for collecting and remitting the tax imposed by this chapter.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, the terms "client,"
"covered employee," "professional employer agreement," and
"professional employer organization" have the same meanings as in RCW
82.04.540.
(5) "Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included within
the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word "consumer" as defined in
chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW.
(6) "Use," "used," "using," or "put to use" have their ordinary
meaning, and mean:
(a) With respect to tangible personal property, except for natural
gas and manufactured gas, the first act within this state by which the
taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of
tangible personal property (as a consumer), and include installation,
storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act
preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption within this state;
(b) With respect to a service defined in RCW 82.04.050(2)(a), the
first act within this state after the service has been performed by
which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the
article of tangible personal property upon which the service was
performed (as a consumer), and includes installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, distribution, or any other act preparatory to
subsequent actual use or consumption of the article within this state;
(c) With respect to an extended warranty, the first act within this
state after the extended warranty has been acquired by which the
taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of
tangible personal property to which the extended warranty applies, and
includes installation, storage, withdrawal from storage, distribution,
or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use or consumption of
the article within this state;
(d) With respect to a digital good or digital code, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, views,
accesses, downloads, possesses, stores, opens, manipulates, or
otherwise uses or enjoys the digital good or digital code;
(e) With respect to a digital automated service, the first act
within this state by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, uses, enjoys,
or otherwise receives the benefit of the service;
(f) With respect to a service defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050(6)(b), the first act within this state by which the taxpayer,
as a consumer, accesses the prewritten computer software;
(g) With respect to a service defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050(2)(g), the first act within this state after the service has
been performed by which the taxpayer, as a consumer, views, accesses,
downloads, possesses, stores, opens, manipulates, or otherwise uses or
enjoys the digital good upon which the service was performed; ((and))
(h) With respect to natural gas or manufactured gas, the use of
which is taxable under RCW 82.12.022, including gas that is also
taxable under the authority of RCW 82.14.230, the first act within this
state by which the taxpayer consumes the gas by burning the gas or
storing the gas in the taxpayer's own facilities for later consumption
by the taxpayer; and
(i) With respect to a service described in RCW 82.04.050(3)(h), the
first presence within this state by the taxpayer after the service has
been performed upon that taxpayer.
(7)(a) "Value of the article used" is the purchase price for the
article of tangible personal property, the use of which is taxable
under this chapter. The term also includes, in addition to the
purchase price, the amount of any tariff or duty paid with respect to
the importation of the article used. In case the article used is
acquired by lease or by gift or is extracted, produced, or manufactured
by the person using the same or is sold under conditions wherein the
purchase price does not represent the true value thereof, the value of
the article used is determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar products of like
quality and character under such rules as the department may prescribe.
(b) In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value
of the use of the articles so used must be in an amount representing a
reasonable rental for the use of the articles so bailed, determined as
nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places of
use of similar products of like quality and character under such rules
as the department of revenue may prescribe. In case any such articles
of tangible personal property are used in respect to the construction,
repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become or are to
become an ingredient or component of, new or existing buildings or
other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing or attaching of any such articles therein or thereto,
whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty by
virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such articles so
used is determined according to the retail selling price of such
articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar products of like quality and character or, in the absence of
either of these selling price measures, such value may be determined
upon a cost basis, in any event under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.
(c) In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business
outside the state which are brought into the state for no more than one
hundred eighty days in any period of three hundred sixty-five
consecutive days and which are temporarily used for business purposes
by the person in this state, the value of the article used must be an
amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of the articles,
unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter 82.08 RCW
upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.
(d) In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user
and used in the manufacture or production of products sold or to be
sold to the department of defense of the United States, the value of
the articles used is determined according to the value of the
ingredients of such articles.
(e) In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes
of serving as a prototype for the development of a new or improved
product, the value of the article used is determined by: (i) The
retail selling price of such new or improved product when first offered
for sale; or (ii) the value of materials incorporated into the
prototype in cases in which the new or improved product is not offered
for sale.
(f) In the case of an article purchased with a direct pay permit
under RCW 82.32.087, the value of the article used is determined by the
purchase price of such article if, but for the use of the direct pay
permit, the transaction would have been subject to sales tax.
(8) "Value of the digital good or digital code used" means the
purchase price for the digital good or digital code, the use of which
is taxable under this chapter. If the digital good or digital code is
acquired other than by purchase, the value of the digital good or
digital code must be determined as nearly as possible according to the
retail selling price at place of use of similar digital goods or
digital codes of like quality and character under rules the department
may prescribe.
(9) "Value of the extended warranty used" means the purchase price
for the extended warranty, the use of which is taxable under this
chapter. If the extended warranty is received by gift or under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
of the extended warranty, the value of the extended warranty used is
determined as nearly as possible according to the retail selling price
at place of use of similar extended warranties of like quality and
character under rules the department may prescribe.
(10) "Value of the service used" means the purchase price for the
digital automated service or other service, the use of which is taxable
under this chapter. If the service is received by gift or under
conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
thereof, the value of the service used is determined as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar services of like quality and character under rules the
department may prescribe.

Sec. 405 RCW 82.12.035 and 2009 c 535 s 1107 are each amended to
read as follows:
A credit is allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter upon
the use in this state of tangible personal property, extended warranty,
digital good, digital code, digital automated service, or services
defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050(2) (a) or (g), (3) (a) or
(h), or (6)(b), in the amount that the present user thereof or his or
her bailor or donor has paid a legally imposed retail sales or use tax
with respect to such property, extended warranty, digital good, digital
code, digital automated service, or service defined as a retail sale in
RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g), (3)(a), or (6)(b) to any other state,
possession, territory, or commonwealth of the United States, any
political subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia, and any
foreign country or political subdivision thereof.

PART V
Repealing the Sales Tax Exemption for Coal Used at Coal-Fired Thermal
Electric Generation Facilities
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 82.08.811 (Exemptions -- Coal used at coal-fired thermal
electric generation facility -- Application -- Demonstration of progress in
air pollution control -- Notice of emissions violations -- Reapplication--Payments on cessation of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 4; and
(2) RCW 82.12.811 (Exemptions -- Coal used at coal-fired thermal
electric generation facility -- Application -- Demonstration of progress in
air pollution control -- Notice of emissions violations -- Reapplication--Payments on cessation of operation) and 1997 c 368 s 6.

PART VI
Miscellaneous
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
April 1, 2011.

--- END ---