BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.06B.900 and 2009 c 515 s 17 are each amended to
read as follows:
The agency council on coordinated transportation is terminated on
June 30, ((2011)) 2013, as provided in RCW 47.06B.901.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.06B.901 and 2009 c 515 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter
amended, are each repealed, effective June 30, ((2012)) 2014:
(1) RCW 47.06B.010 and 2009 c 515 s 3, 2007 c 421 s 1, 1999 c 385
s 1, & 1998 c 173 s 1;
(2) RCW 47.06B.012 and 1999 c 385 s 2;
(3) RCW 47.06B.020 and 2009 c 515 s 4, 2007 c 421 s 2, & 1998 c 173
s 2;
(4) RCW 47.06B.030 and ((2009 c 515 s 5,)) 2007 c 421 s 3, 1999 c
385 s 5, & 1998 c 173 s 3;
(5) RCW 47.06B.040 and 2007 c 421 s 4 & 1999 c 385 s 6;
(6) RCW 47.06B.050 and 2009 c 515 s 8 & 2007 c 421 s 6;
(7) RCW 47.06B.060 and 2009 c 515 s 1;
(8) ((Section 2 of this act;
(9) Section 6 of this act;
(10) Section 7 of this act;
(11))) RCW 47.06B.070 and 2009 c 515 s 9;
(((12))) (9) RCW 47.06B.075 and 2009 c 515 s 10; and
(((13))) (10) RCW 47.06B.080 and 2009 c 515 s 11.

--- END ---