BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Within fifteen days of a certificate of death being filed
under RCW 70.58.160, a boarding home must file a notification with the
department when that death is partially or fully caused by a health
care-associated infection acquired by the resident during his or her
stay at the boarding home.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "health care-associated
infection" means a localized or systemic condition that results from
adverse reaction to the presence of an infectious agent or its toxins
and that was not present or incubating at the time of admission to the
boarding home.
(2) If the certificate of death notes the presence of
methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus, as provided in RCW
70.58.400, the criteria of subsection (1) of this section is presumed
met and the notification must be filed.
(3) All notifications filed with the department must be in a format
defined by the department, readily available to the public for
inspection, and posted to a public web site maintained by the
department with patient identifiable information redacted.
(4) The protections of RCW 74.34.180 apply to notifications and
reports under this section that are submitted in good faith by
employees or residents of a boarding home.
(5) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.51 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Within fifteen days of a certificate of death being filed
under RCW 70.58.160, a nursing home must file a notification with the
department when that death is partially or fully caused by a health
care-associated infection acquired by the resident during his or her
stay at the nursing home.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "health care-associated
infection" means a localized or systemic condition that results from
adverse reaction to the presence of an infectious agent or its toxins
and that was not present or incubating at the time of admission to the
nursing home.
(2) If the certificate of death notes the presence of
methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus, as provided in RCW
70.58.400, the criteria of subsection (1) of this section is presumed
met and the notification must be filed.
(3) All notifications filed with the department must be in a format
defined by the department, readily available to the public for
inspection, and posted to a public web site maintained by the
department with patient identifiable information redacted.
(4) The protections of RCW 74.34.180 apply to notifications and
reports under this section that are submitted in good faith by
employees or residents of a nursing home.
(5) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Within fifteen days of a certificate of death being filed
under RCW 70.58.160, an adult family home must file a notification with
the department when that death is partially or fully caused by a health
care-associated infection acquired by the resident during his or her
stay at the adult family home.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "health care-associated
infection" means a localized or systemic condition that results from
adverse reaction to the presence of an infectious agent or its toxins
and that was not present or incubating at the time of admission to the
adult family home.
(2) If the certificate of death notes the presence of
methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus, as provided in RCW
70.58.400, the criteria of subsection (1) of this section is presumed
met and the notification must be filed.
(3) All notifications filed with the department must be in a format
defined by the department, readily available to the public for
inspection, and posted to a public web site maintained by the
department with patient identifiable information redacted.
(4) The protections of RCW 74.34.180 apply to notifications and
reports under this section that are submitted in good faith by
employees or residents of an adult family home.
(5) The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this
section.

--- END ---