BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 11.92.043 and 1991 c 289 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It ((shall be)) is the duty of the guardian or limited guardian
of the person:
(((1))) (a) To file within three months after appointment a
personal care plan for the incapacitated person which ((shall)) must
include (((a))) (i) an assessment of the incapacitated person's
physical, mental, and emotional needs and of such person's ability to
perform or assist in activities of daily living, and (((b))) (ii) the
guardian's specific plan for meeting the identified and emerging
personal care needs of the incapacitated person.
(((2))) (b) To file annually or, where a guardian of the estate has
been appointed, at the time an account is required to be filed under
RCW 11.92.040, a report on the status of the incapacitated person,
which ((shall)) must include:
(((a))) (i) The address and name of the incapacitated person and
all residential changes during the period;
(((b))) (ii) The services or programs which the incapacitated
person receives;
(((c))) (iii) The medical status of the incapacitated person;
(((d))) (iv) The mental status of the incapacitated person;
(((e))) (v) Changes in the functional abilities of the
incapacitated person;
(((f))) (vi) Activities of the guardian for the period;
(((g))) (vii) Any recommended changes in the scope of the authority
of the guardian;
(((h))) (viii) The identity of any professionals who have assisted
the incapacitated person during the period;
(ix) Activities of the guardian undertaken to determine if the
incapacitated person wants to work, and if so, the activities
undertaken by the guardian to identify and secure training and
education so that the incapacitated person has the opportunity to
learn, acquire, and maintain employment in a trade, occupation, or
profession; and
(x) Activities of the guardian undertaken to maintain the
incapacitated person in the setting least restrictive to the
incapacitated person's freedom and appropriate to the incapacitated
person's personal care needs, including the following:
(A) If the incapacitated person resides in a facility, an
explanation of why the setting is the least restrictive appropriate to
the person's needs and appropriate to the incapacitated person's
personal care needs; what steps the guardian has taken to identify
placement options and determine the incapacitated person's preferences
regarding placement; and, where appropriate, a plan which will be
implemented to assist the individual in moving to an appropriate and
less restrictive setting;
(B) If the incapacitated person remains in a nonfacility residence
and requires additional support in order to remain in that residence,
activities that have been undertaken by the guardian to secure and
maintain adequate support for the incapacitated person in that
residence, and a plan which will be implemented to assist the
individual in maintaining the residence.
(((3))) (c) To report to the court within thirty days any
substantial change in the incapacitated person's condition, or any
changes in residence of the incapacitated person.
(((4))) (d) Consistent with the powers granted by the court, to
care for and maintain the incapacitated person in the setting least
restrictive to the incapacitated person's freedom and appropriate to
the incapacitated person's personal care needs, assert the
incapacitated person's rights and best interests, and if the
incapacitated person is a minor or where otherwise appropriate, to see
that the incapacitated person receives appropriate training and
education and that the incapacitated person has the opportunity to
learn a trade, occupation, or profession.
(((5))) (e) Consistent with RCW 7.70.065, to provide timely,
informed consent for health care of the incapacitated person, except in
the case of a limited guardian where such power is not expressly
provided for in the order of appointment or subsequent modifying order
as provided in RCW 11.88.125 as now or hereafter amended, the standby
guardian or standby limited guardian may provide timely, informed
consent to necessary medical procedures if the guardian or limited
guardian cannot be located within four hours after the need for such
consent arises. No guardian, limited guardian, or standby guardian may
involuntarily commit for mental health treatment, observation, or
evaluation an alleged incapacitated person who is unable or unwilling
to give informed consent to such commitment unless the procedures for
involuntary commitment set forth in chapter 71.05 or 72.23 RCW are
followed. Nothing in this section ((shall)) may be construed to allow
a guardian, limited guardian, or standby guardian to consent to:
(((a))) (i) Therapy or other procedure which induces convulsion;
(((b))) (ii) Surgery solely for the purpose of psychosurgery;
(((c))) (iii) Other psychiatric or mental health procedures that
restrict physical freedom of movement, or the rights set forth in RCW
((71.05.370)) 71.05.217.
(2) A guardian, limited guardian, or standby guardian who believes
these procedures are necessary for the proper care and maintenance of
the incapacitated person ((shall)) must petition the court for an order
unless the court has previously approved the procedure within the past
thirty days. The court may order the procedure only after an attorney
is appointed in accordance with RCW 11.88.045 if no attorney has
previously appeared, notice is given, and a hearing is held in
accordance with RCW 11.88.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect August 1, 2011.

--- END ---