BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The intent of this act is to identify and
fund a project of significance in the Snohomish region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW
to read as follows:
In preparation for construction of a new Snohomish river bridge on
state route number 9, and in order to develop a more accurate project
cost, the department shall begin geotechnical investigation and
analysis work in the vicinity of the Snohomish river bridge on state
route number 9.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The sum of five hundred twenty thousand
dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the biennium ending June 30, 2013, from the motor vehicle fund to the
department of transportation for the purposes of section 2 of this act.

--- END ---