BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95N.020 and 2006 c 183 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means the Washington materials management and
financing authority created under RCW 70.95N.280.
(2) "Authorized party" means a manufacturer who submits an
individual independent plan or the entity authorized to submit an
independent plan for more than one manufacturer.
(3) "Board" means the board of directors of the Washington
materials management and financing authority created under RCW
70.95N.290.
(4) "Collector" means an entity licensed to do business in the
state that gathers unwanted covered electronic products from
households, small businesses, school districts, small governments, and
charities for the purpose of recycling and meets minimum standards that
may be developed by the department.
(5) "Contract for services" means an instrument executed by the
authority and one or more persons or entities that delineates
collection, transportation, and recycling services, in whole or in
part, that will be provided to the citizens of the state within service
areas as described in the approved standard plan.
(6) "Covered electronic product" includes a cathode ray tube or
flat panel computer monitor having a viewable area greater than four
inches when measured diagonally, a desktop computer, a laptop or a
portable computer, ((or)) a cathode ray tube or flat panel television
having a viewable area greater than four inches when measured
diagonally, or a peripheral that has been used in the state by any
covered entity regardless of original point of purchase. "Covered
electronic product" does not include: (a) A motor vehicle or
replacement parts for use in motor vehicles or aircraft, or any
computer, computer monitor, ((or)) television, or peripheral that is
contained within, and is not separate from, the motor vehicle or
aircraft; (b) monitoring and control instruments or systems; (c)
medical devices; (d) products including materials intended for use as
ingredients in those products as defined in the federal food, drug, and
cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.) or the virus-serum-toxin act
of 1913 (21 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.), and regulations issued under
those acts; (e) equipment used in the delivery of patient care in a
health care setting; (f) a computer, computer monitor, ((or))
television, or peripheral that is contained within a clothes washer,
clothes dryer, refrigerator, refrigerator and freezer, microwave oven,
conventional oven or range, dishwasher, room air conditioner,
dehumidifier, or air purifier; or (g) hand-held portable voice or data
devices used for commercial mobile services as defined in 47 U.S.C.
Sec. 332 (d)(1).
(7) "Covered entity" means any household, charity, school district,
small business, or small government located in Washington state.
(8) "Curbside service" means a collection service providing
regularly scheduled pickup of covered electronic products from
households or other covered entities in quantities generated from
households.
(9) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(10) "Electronic product" includes a cathode ray tube or flat panel
computer monitor having a viewable area greater than four inches when
measured diagonally; a desktop computer; a laptop or a portable
computer; ((or)) a cathode ray tube or flat screen television having a
viewable area greater than four inches when measured diagonally; or a
peripheral.
(11) "Equivalent share" means the weight in pounds of covered
electronic products identified for an individual manufacturer under
this chapter as determined by the department under RCW 70.95N.200.
(12) "Household" means a single detached dwelling unit or a single
unit of a multiple dwelling unit and appurtenant structures.
(13) "Independent plan" means a plan for the collection,
transportation, and recycling of unwanted covered electronic products
that is developed, implemented, and financed by an individual
manufacturer or by an authorized party.
(14) "Manufacturer" means any person, in business or no longer in
business but having a successor in interest, who, irrespective of the
selling technique used, including by means of distance or remote sale:
(a) Manufactures or has manufactured a covered electronic product
under its own brand names for sale in or into this state;
(b) Assembles or has assembled a covered electronic product that
uses parts manufactured by others for sale in or into this state under
the assembler's brand names;
(c) Resells or has resold in or into this state under its own brand
names a covered electronic product produced by other suppliers,
including retail establishments that sell covered electronic products
under their own brand names;
(d) Manufactures or manufactured a cobranded product for sale in or
into this state that carries the name of both the manufacturer and a
retailer;
(e) Imports or has imported a covered electronic product into the
United States that is sold in or into this state. However, if the
imported covered electronic product is manufactured by any person with
a presence in the United States meeting the criteria of manufacturer
under (a) through (d) of this subsection, that person is the
manufacturer. For purposes of this subsection, "presence" means any
person that performs activities conducted under the standards
established for interstate commerce under the commerce clause of the
United States Constitution; or
(f) Sells at retail a covered electronic product acquired from an
importer that is the manufacturer as described in (e) of this
subsection, and elects to register in lieu of the importer as the
manufacturer for those products.
(15) "New entrant" means: (a) A manufacturer of televisions that
have been sold in the state for less than ten years; or (b) a
manufacturer of desktop computers, laptop and portable computers, or
computer monitors that have been sold in the state for less than five
years. However, a manufacturer of both televisions and computers or a
manufacturer of both televisions and computer monitors that is deemed
a new entrant under either only (a) or (b) of this subsection is not
considered a new entrant for purposes of this chapter.
(16) "Orphan product" means a covered electronic product that lacks
a manufacturer's brand or for which the manufacturer is no longer in
business and has no successor in interest.
(17) "Plan's equivalent share" means the weight in pounds of
covered electronic products for which a plan is responsible. A plan's
equivalent share is equal to the sum of the equivalent shares of each
manufacturer participating in that plan.
(18) "Plan's return share" means the sum of the return shares of
each manufacturer participating in that plan.
(19) "Premium service" means services such as at-location system
upgrade services provided to covered entities and at-home pickup
services offered to households. "Premium service" does not include
curbside service.
(20) "Processor" means an entity engaged in disassembling,
dismantling, or shredding electronic products to recover materials
contained in the electronic products and prepare those materials for
reclaiming or reuse in new products in accordance with processing
standards established by this chapter and by the department. A
processor may also salvage parts to be used in new products.
(21) "Product type" means one of the following categories:
Computer monitors; desktop computers; laptop and portable computers;
((and)) televisions; and peripherals.
(22) "Program" means the collection, transportation, and recycling
activities conducted to implement an independent plan or the standard
plan.
(23) "Program year" means each full calendar year after the program
has been initiated.
(24) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing unwanted
electronic products, components, and by-products into usable or
marketable materials for use other than landfill disposal or
incineration. "Recycling" does not include energy recovery or energy
generation by means of combusting unwanted electronic products,
components, and by-products with or without other waste. Smelting of
electronic materials to recover metals for reuse in conformance with
all applicable laws and regulations is not considered disposal or
energy recovery.
(25) "Retailer" means a person who offers covered electronic
products for sale at retail through any means including, but not
limited to, remote offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or the
internet, but does not include a sale or lease that is a wholesale
transaction with a distributor or a retailer.
(26) "Return share" means the percentage of covered electronic
products by weight identified for an individual manufacturer, as
determined by the department under RCW 70.95N.190.
(27) "Reuse" means any operation by which an electronic product or
a component of a covered electronic product changes ownership and is
used for the same purpose for which it was originally purchased.
(28) "Small business" means a business employing less than fifty
people.
(29) "Small government" means a city in the state with a population
less than fifty thousand, a county in the state with a population less
than one hundred twenty-five thousand, and special purpose districts in
the state.
(30) "Standard plan" means the plan for the collection,
transportation, and recycling of unwanted covered electronic products
developed, implemented, and financed by the authority on behalf of
manufacturers participating in the authority.
(31) "Transporter" means an entity that transports covered
electronic products from collection sites or services to processors or
other locations for the purpose of recycling, but does not include any
entity or person that hauls their own unwanted electronic products.
(32) "Unwanted electronic product" means a covered electronic
product that has been discarded or is intended to be discarded by its
owner.
(33) "White box manufacturer" means a person who manufactured
unbranded covered electronic products offered for sale in the state
within ten years prior to a program year for televisions or within five
years prior to a program year for desktop computers, laptop or portable
computers, or computer monitors.
(34) "Market share" means the percentage of covered electronic
products by weight identified for an individual manufacturer, as
determined by the department under RCW 70.95N.190.
(35) "Peripheral" means any device sold exclusively for external
use with a computer or television that provides input or output into or
from a computer or television. "Peripheral" includes but is not
limited to a mouse, keyboard, printer, speakers, zip drive, external
hard drive, scanner, small-scale server, router, modem, video game
console, video cassette recorder/player, digital video recorder,
digital video disk player or similar video device, digital streaming
player, web cams, cable or satellite receiver, or digital converter
box.
(36)(a) "Printer" means desktop printers, multifunction printer
copiers, and printer/fax combinations that are designed to reside on a
work surface, and include various print technologies, including without
limitation laser and LED (electrographic), ink jet, dot matrix,
thermal, and digital sublimation, and multifunction or all-in-one
devices that perform different tasks, including without limitation
copying, scanning, faxing, and printing.
(b) "Printer" does not include floor-standing printers, printers
with optional floor stand, point of sale receipt printers, household
printers such as a calculator with printing capabilities or label
makers, or nonstand-alone printers that are embedded into products that
are not covered electronic products.
(37) "Small-scale server" means a computer that typically uses
desktop components in a desktop form factor, but is designed primarily
to be a storage host for other computers. To be considered a
small-scale server, a computer must have the following characteristics:
Designed in a pedestal, tower, or other form factor similar to those of
desktop computers so that all data processing, storage, and network
interfacing is contained within one box or product; intended to be
operational twenty-four hours per day and seven days a week, and
unscheduled downtime is extremely low, such as on the order of hours
per year; is capable of operating in a simultaneous multiuser
environment serving several users through networked client units; and
designed for an industry accepted operating system for home or low-end
server applications.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95N.040 and 2006 c 183 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2007, and annually thereafter, each manufacturer
must register with the department.
(2) A manufacturer must submit to the department with each
registration or annual renewal a fee to cover the administrative costs
of this chapter as determined by the department under RCW 70.95N.230.
(3) The department shall review the registration or renewal
application and notify the manufacturer if their registration does not
meet the requirements of this section. Within thirty days of receipt
of such a notification from the department, the manufacturer must file
with the department a revised registration addressing the requirements
noted by the department.
(4) The registration must include the following information:
(a) The name and contact information of the manufacturer submitting
the registration;
(b) The manufacturer's brand names of covered electronic products,
including all brand names sold in the state in the past, all brand
names currently being sold in the state, and all brand names for which
the manufacturer has legal responsibility ((under RCW 70.95N.100));
(c) The method or methods of sale used in the state; and
(d) Whether the registrant will be participating in the standard
plan or submitting an independent plan to the department for approval.
(5) The registrant shall submit any changes to the information
provided in the registration to the department within fourteen days of
such change.
(6) The department shall identify, using all reasonable means,
manufacturers that are in business or that are no longer in business
but that have a successor in interest by examining best available
((return share)) data, product advertisements, and other pertinent
data. The department shall notify manufacturers that have been
identified and for whom an address has been found of the requirements
of this chapter, including registration and plan requirements under
this section and RCW 70.95N.050.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.95N.050 and 2006 c 183 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A manufacturer must participate in the standard plan
administered by the authority, unless the manufacturer obtains
department approval for an independent plan for the collection,
transportation, and recycling of unwanted electronic products.
(2) An independent plan may be submitted by an individual
manufacturer or by a group of manufacturers, provided that:
(a) For program years 2009 through 2012, each independent plan
represents at least a five percent return share of covered electronic
products and for program year 2013 and all subsequent program years,
each independent plan represents at least a five percent market share
of covered electronic products; and
(b) No manufacturer may participate in an independent plan if it is
a new entrant or a white box manufacturer.
(3) An individual manufacturer submitting an independent plan to
the department is responsible for collecting, transporting, and
recycling its equivalent share of covered electronic products.
(4)(a) Manufacturers collectively submitting an independent plan
are responsible for collecting, transporting, and recycling the sum of
the equivalent shares of each participating manufacturer.
(b) Each group of manufacturers submitting an independent plan must
designate a party authorized to file the plan with the department on
their behalf. A letter of certification from each of the manufacturers
designating the authorized party must be submitted to the department
together with the plan.
(5) For the 2013 program year and all subsequent program years, an
independent plan must apportion its costs among manufacturers
participating in that plan based on market share.
(6) Each manufacturer in the standard plan or in an independent
plan retains responsibility and liability under this chapter in the
event that the plan fails to meet the manufacturer's obligations under
this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 70.95N.090 and 2006 c 183 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A program must provide collection services for covered
electronic products of all product types and produced by any
manufacturer that are reasonably convenient and available to all
citizens of the state residing within its geographic boundaries,
including both rural and urban areas. Each program must provide
collection service in every county of the state. A program may provide
collection services jointly with another plan or plans.
(a) For any city or town with a population of greater than ten
thousand, each program shall provide a minimum of one collection site
or alternate collection service described in subsection (3) of this
section or a combination of sites and alternate service that together
provide at least one collection opportunity for all product types. A
collection site for a county may be the same as a collection site for
a city or town in the county.
(b) Collection sites may include electronics recyclers and repair
shops, recyclers of other commodities, reuse organizations, charities,
retailers, government recycling sites, or other suitable locations.
(c) Collection sites must be staffed, open to the public at a
frequency adequate to meet the needs of the area being served, and on
an on-going basis.
(2) A program may limit the number of covered electronic products
or covered electronic products by product type accepted per customer
per day or per delivery at a collection site or service. All covered
entities may use a collection site as long as the covered entities
adhere to any restrictions established in the plans.
(3) A program may provide collection services in forms different
than collection sites, such as curbside services, if those alternate
services provide equal or better convenience to citizens and equal or
increased recovery of unwanted covered electronic products.
(4) For rural areas without commercial centers or areas with widely
dispersed population, a program may provide collection at the nearest
commercial centers or solid waste sites, collection events, mail-back
systems, or a combination of these options.
(5) For small businesses, small governments, charities, and school
districts that may have large quantities of covered electronic products
that cannot be handled at collection sites or curbside services, a
program may provide alternate services. At a minimum, a program must
provide for processing of these large quantities of covered electronic
products at no charge to the small businesses, small governments,
charities, and school districts.

Sec. 5 RCW 70.95N.140 and 2006 c 183 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By March 1st of the second program year and each program year
thereafter, the authority and each authorized party shall file with the
department an annual report for the preceding program year.
(2) The annual report must include the following information:
(a) The total weight in pounds of covered electronic products
collected and recycled, by county, during the preceding program year
including documentation verifying collection and processing of that
material. ((The total weight in pounds includes orphan products.))
The report must also indicate and document the weight in pounds
received from each nonprofit charitable organization primarily engaged
in the business of reuse and resale used by the plan. The report must
document the weight in pounds that were received in large quantities
from small businesses, small governments, charities and school
districts as described in RCW 70.95N.090(5);
(b) The collection services provided in each county and for each
city with a population over ten thousand including a list of all
collection sites and services operating in the state in the prior
program year and the parties who operated them;
(c) A list of processors used, the weight of covered electronic
products processed by each direct processor, and a description of the
processes and methods used to recycle the covered electronic products
including a description of the processing and facility locations. The
report must also include a list of subcontractors who further processed
or recycled unwanted covered electronic products, electronic
components, or electronic scrap ((described in section 26(1) of this
act)), including facility locations;
(d) ((Other documentation as established under section 26(3) of
this act;
(e))) Educational and promotional efforts that were undertaken;
(((f))) (e) For program years 2009 through 2011, the results of
sampling and sorting ((as required in RCW 70.95N.110)), including a
list of the brand names of covered electronic products by product type,
the number of covered electronic products by product type, the weight
of covered electronic products that are identified for each brand name
or that lack a manufacturer's brand, and the total weight of the sample
by product type;
(((g))) (f) The list of manufacturers that are participating in the
standard plan; and
(((h))) (g) Any other information deemed necessary by the
department.
(3) The department shall review each report within ninety days of
its submission and shall notify the authority or authorized party of
any need for additional information or documentation, or any deficiency
in its program.
(4) All reports submitted to the department must be available to
the general public through the internet. Proprietary information
submitted to the department under this chapter is exempt from public
disclosure under RCW 42.56.270.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.95N.180 and 2006 c 183 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall maintain on its web site the following
information:
(a) The names of the manufacturers and the manufacturer's brands
that are registered with the department under RCW 70.95N.040;
(b) The names of the manufacturers and the manufacturer's brands
that are participating in an approved plan under RCW 70.95N.050;
(c) The names and addresses of the collectors and transporters that
are listed in registrations filed with the department under RCW
70.95N.240;
(d) The names and addresses of the processors used to fulfill the
requirements of the plans;
(e) ((Return and equivalent shares for all manufacturers.)) For
program years 2009 through 2012, return and equivalent shares for all
manufacturers, and for program years 2013 and all subsequent program
years, market and equivalent shares for all manufacturers.
(2) The department shall update this web site information promptly
upon receipt of a registration or a report.

Sec. 7 RCW 70.95N.190 and 2006 c 183 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For program years 2009 through 2012, the department shall
determine the return share for each manufacturer in the standard plan
or an independent plan by dividing the weight of covered electronic
products identified for each manufacturer by the total weight of
covered electronic products identified for all manufacturers in the
standard plan or an independent plan, then multiplying the quotient by
one hundred.
(2) For the first program year, the department shall determine the
return share for such manufacturers using all reasonable means and
based on best available information regarding return share data from
other states and other pertinent data.
(3) For ((the second and each subsequent program year)) 2010
through 2012, the department shall determine the return share for such
manufacturers using all reasonable means and based on the most recent
sampling of covered electronic products conducted in the state ((under
RCW 70.95N.110)).
(4)(a) For program year 2013 and all subsequent program years, the
department shall determine market share for all manufacturers using
data reported by manufacturers under (b) of this subsection and
publicly available data.
(b)(i) By March 1st of each program year, each manufacturer must
report one of the following to the department:
(A) The total weight of covered electronic products sold by that
manufacturer nationwide in the prior program year; or
(B) The total weight of covered electronic products sold by that
manufacturer within the state in the prior program year;
(ii) For those manufacturers who reported information under
(b)(i)(A) of this subsection, the department shall total the weight
reported by each manufacturer and then multiply that total weight by
the quotient of the state's population divided by the total population
of the United States;
(iii) Next, the department shall total all the weight in (b)(ii) of
this subsection and all the weight reported by manufacturers in
(b)(i)(B) of this subsection and that equals X; and
(c) The department then divides each individual manufacturers'
total weight reported in (b)(i)(B) of this subsection or calculated in
(b)(ii) of this subsection by X and this equals each individual
manufacturers' market share calculation, which is a percentage.

Sec. 8 RCW 70.95N.200 and 2006 c 183 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For program years 2009 through 2012, the department shall
determine the total equivalent share for each manufacturer in the
standard plan or an independent plan by dividing the return share
percentage for each manufacturer by one hundred, then multiplying the
quotient by the total weight in pounds of covered electronic products
collected in this state for that program year, allowing as needed for
the additional credit authorized in subsection (3) of this section.
For program year 2013 and all subsequent program years, the department
shall determine the total equivalent share for each manufacturer in the
standard plan or an independent plan by dividing the market share
percentage for each manufacturer by one hundred, then multiplying the
quotient by the total weight in pounds of covered electronic products
collected for that program year, allowing as needed for the additional
credit authorized in subsection (3) of this section.
(2)(a) By June 1st of each program year, the department shall
notify each manufacturer of the manufacturer's equivalent share of
covered electronic products to be applied to the previous program year.
The department shall also notify each manufacturer of how its
equivalent share was determined.
(b) By June 1st of each program year, the department shall bill any
authorized party or authority that has not attained its plan's
equivalent share as determined under RCW 70.95N.220. The authorized
party or authority shall remit payment to the department within sixty
days from the billing date.
(c) By September 1st of each program year, the department shall pay
any authorized party or authority that exceeded its plan's equivalent
share.
(3) Plans that utilize the collection services of nonprofit
charitable organizations that qualify for a taxation exemption under
section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3)) that are primarily engaged in the business of reuse and
resale must be given an additional five percent credit to be applied
toward a plan's equivalent share for pounds that are received for
recycling from those organizations. The department may adjust the
percentage of credit annually.

Sec. 9 RCW 70.95N.210 and 2006 c 183 s 21 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By June 1, 2007, the department shall notify each manufacturer
of its preliminary return share of covered electronic products for the
first program year.
(2) For program years 2009 through 2011, preliminary return share
of covered electronic products must be announced annually by June 1st
of each program year for the next program year. Beginning in 2012 and
all subsequent program years, preliminary market share of covered
electronic products must be announced annually by June 1st of each
program year for the next program year.
(3) Manufacturers may challenge the preliminary return or market
share by written petition to the department. The petition must be
received by the department within thirty days of the date of
publication of the preliminary return or market shares.
(4) The petition must contain a detailed explanation of the grounds
for the challenge, an alternative calculation, and the basis for such
a calculation, documentary evidence supporting the challenge, and
complete contact information for requests for additional information or
clarification.
(5) Sixty days after the publication of the preliminary return or
market share, the department shall make a final decision on return or
market share, having fully taken into consideration any and all
challenges to its preliminary calculations.
(6) A written record of challenges received and a summary of the
bases for the challenges, as well as the department's response, must be
published at the same time as the publication of the final return
share.
(7) By August 1, 2007, the department shall publish the final
return shares for the first program year. For program years 2009
through 2011, by August 1st of each program year, the department shall
publish the final return shares for use in the coming program year.
For the 2012 program year and beyond, by August 1st of each program
year, the department shall publish the final market shares for use in
the coming program year.

Sec. 10 RCW 70.95N.230 and 2006 c 183 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt rules to determine the process for
manufacturers to change plans under RCW 70.95N.080.
(2) The department shall establish annual registration and plan
review fees for administering this chapter. An initial fee schedule
must be established by rule and be adjusted no more often than once
every two years. All fees charged must be based on factors relating to
administering this chapter and be based on a sliding scale that is
representative of annual sales of covered electronic products in the
state either by weight or unit, or representative of market share.
Fees must be established in amounts to fully recover and not to exceed
expenses incurred by the department to implement this chapter.
(3) The department shall establish an annual process for local
governments and local communities to report their satisfaction with the
services provided by plans under this chapter. This information must
be used by the department in reviewing plan updates and revisions.
(4) The department may adopt rules as necessary for the purpose of
implementing, administering, and enforcing this chapter.

Sec. 11 RCW 70.95N.290 and 2008 c 79 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The authority is governed by a board of directors. The
board of directors is comprised of eleven participating manufacturers,
appointed by the director of the department. For program years 2009
through 2012, five board positions are reserved for representatives of
the top ten brand owners by return share of covered electronic
products, and six board positions are reserved for representatives of
other brands, including at least one board position reserved for a
manufacturer who is also a retailer selling their own private label.
The return share of covered electronic products used to determine the
top ten brand owners for purposes of electing the board must be
determined by the department by January 1, 2007. For program year 2013
and all subsequent program years, five board positions are reserved for
representatives of the top ten brand owners by market share of covered
electronic products and six board positions are reserved for
representatives of other brands, including at least one board position
reserved for a manufacturer that is also a retailer selling its own
private label. The market share of covered electronic products used to
determine the top ten brand owners for purposes of electing the board
must be determined by the department by August 1, 2012.
(b) The board must have representation from both television and
computer manufacturers.
(2) The board shall select from its membership the chair of the
board and such other officers as it deems appropriate.
(3) A majority of the board constitutes a quorum.
(4) The directors of the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce and the department of ecology serve as
ex officio members. The state agency directors serving in ex officio
capacity may each designate an employee of their respective departments
to act on their behalf in all respects with regard to any matter to
come before the authority. Ex officio designations must be made in
writing and communicated to the authority director.
(5) The board shall create its own bylaws in accordance with the
laws of the state of Washington.
(6) Any member of the board may be removed for misfeasance,
malfeasance, or willful neglect of duty after notice and a public
hearing, unless the notice and hearing are expressly waived in writing
by the affected member.
(7) The members of the board serve without compensation but are
entitled to reimbursement, solely from the funds of the authority, for
expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter.

Sec. 12 RCW 70.95N.300 and 2006 c 183 s 31 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Manufacturers participating in the standard plan shall pay the
authority to cover all administrative and operational costs associated
with the collection, transportation, and recycling of covered
electronic products within the state of Washington incurred by the
standard program operated by the authority to meet the standard plan's
equivalent share obligation as described in RCW 70.95N.280(5).
(2) The authority shall assess charges on each manufacturer
participating in the standard plan and collect funds from each
participating manufacturer for the manufacturer's portion of the costs
in subsection (1) of this section. Prior to 2013 program year, such
apportionment shall be based on return share, market share, any
combination of return share and market share, or any other equitable
method. For the 2013 program year and all subsequent program years,
the apportionment must be based on market share. The authority's
apportionment of costs to manufacturers participating in the standard
plan may not include nor be based on electronic products imported
through the state and subsequently exported outside the state. Charges
assessed under this section must not be formulated in such a way as to
create incentives to divert imported electronic products to ports or
distribution centers in other states. The authority shall adjust the
charges to manufacturers participating in the standard plan as
necessary in order to ensure that all costs associated with the
identified activities are covered.
(3) The authority may require financial assurances or performance
bonds for manufacturers participating in the standard plan, including
but not limited to new entrants and white box manufacturers, when
determining equitable methods for apportioning costs to ensure that the
long-term costs for collecting, transporting, and recycling of a
covered electronic product are borne by the appropriate manufacturer in
the event that the manufacturer ceases to participate in the program.
(4) Nothing in this section authorizes the authority to assess fees
or levy taxes directly on the sale or possession of electronic
products.
(5) If a manufacturer has not met its financial obligations as
determined by the authority under this section, the authority shall
notify the department that the manufacturer is no longer participating
in the standard plan.
(6) The authority shall submit its plan for assessing charges and
apportioning cost on manufacturers participating in the standard plan
to the department for review and approval along with the standard plan
as provided in RCW 70.95N.060. Beginning January 1, 2013, the
authority is no longer required to submit a plan for assessing charges
and apportioning cost along with a standard plan update or as a
standard plan revision.
(7)(a) Any manufacturer participating in the standard plan may
appeal an assessment of charges or apportionment of costs levied by the
authority under this section by written petition to the director of the
department. The director of the department or the director's designee
shall review all appeals within timelines established by the department
and shall reverse any assessments of charges or apportionment of costs
if the director finds that the authority's assessments or apportionment
of costs was an arbitrary administrative decision, an abuse of
administrative discretion, or is not an equitable assessment or
apportionment of costs. The director shall make a fair and impartial
decision based on sound data. If the director of the department
reverses an assessment of charges, the authority must redetermine the
assessment or apportionment of costs.
(b) Disputes regarding a final decision made by the director or
director's designee may be challenged through arbitration. The
director shall appoint one member to serve on the arbitration panel and
the challenging party shall appoint one other. These two persons shall
choose a third person to serve. If the two persons cannot agree on a
third person, the presiding judge of the Thurston county superior court
shall choose a third person. The decision of the arbitration panel
shall be final and binding, subject to review by the superior court
solely upon the question of whether the decision of the panel was
arbitrary or capricious.

Sec. 13 RCW 70.95N.350 and 2009 c 285 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Only an entity registered as a collector with the department
may act as a collector in a plan. All covered electronic products
received by a registered collector must be submitted to a plan. Fully
functioning computers and fully functioning peripherals that are
received by a registered collector and demonstrated to be in working
order may be sold or donated as whole products by the collector for
reuse. Computers and peripherals that require repair to make them a
fully functioning unit may only be repaired on-site at the collector's
place of business by the registered collector for reuse according to
its original purpose.
(2) Registered collectors may use whole parts gleaned from
collected computers and peripherals or new parts for making repairs as
long as there is a part-for-part exchange with nonfunctioning computers
and peripherals submitted to a plan.
(3) Registered collectors may not include computers and peripherals
that are gleaned for reuse in the weight totals for compensation by the
plan.
(4) Registered collectors must maintain a record of computers sold
or donated by the collector for a period of three years.
(5) Registered collectors must display a notice at the point of
collection that computers and peripherals received by the collector may
be repaired and sold or donated as a fully functioning computer or
peripheral rather than submitted to a processor for recycling.
(6) The authority, authorized party, or the department may conduct
site visits of all registered collectors that reuse or refurbish
computers and peripherals and who have an agreement with the authority
or authorized party to provide collection services. If the authority
or authorized party finds that a collector is not providing services in
compliance with this chapter, the authority or authorized party shall
report that finding to the department for enforcement action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 A new section is added to chapter 70.95N
RCW to read as follows:
The standard plan and any independent plan must accept peripherals
starting in 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act takes effect January 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 70.95N.100 (Successor duties) and 2006 c 183 s 10; and
(2) RCW 70.95N.110 (Covered electronic sampling) and 2006 c 183 s
11.

--- END ---