BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that residential
landlords frequently use tenant screening reports in evaluating and
selecting tenants for their rental properties. These tenant screening
reports frequently contain misleading, incomplete, or inaccurate
information about: Eviction lawsuits where the landlord was
unsuccessful and the tenant prevailed; protection orders the tenant
obtained for protection against domestic violence, stalking, or sexual
assault; or other court records that, though not predictive of an
applicant's suitability for a residential tenancy, are often cited by
housing providers as a basis for rejecting rental applicants. Such use
of court records unfairly diminishes the housing opportunities of many
qualified rental applicants and impairs the access of residential
tenants to their day in court. These court records threaten a tenant's
future housing prospects irrespective as to the outcome of an action.
The costs of tenant screening are passed on to applicants in the form
of screening fees, and applicants who apply at multiple housing
providers must pay repeated screening fees for successive reports
containing the same information. To avoid the pernicious effects of
unfair tenant screening reports, tenants with meritorious claims and
defenses often choose not to enforce their rights in cases against
landlords. This problem affects not only tenants but also the public
as a whole because many provisions of the residential landlord-tenant
act can be enforced only through litigation and the integrity of our
landlord-tenant courts is undermined when tenants are systematically
deterred from presenting meritorious claims.

Sec. 2 RCW 59.18.030 and 2010 c 148 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Certificate of inspection" means an unsworn statement,
declaration, verification, or certificate made in accordance with the
requirements of RCW 9A.72.085 by a qualified inspector that states that
the landlord has not failed to fulfill any substantial obligation
imposed under RCW 59.18.060 that endangers or impairs the health or
safety of a tenant, including (a) structural members that are of
insufficient size or strength to carry imposed loads with safety, (b)
exposure of the occupants to the weather, (c) plumbing and sanitation
defects that directly expose the occupants to the risk of illness or
injury, (d) not providing facilities adequate to supply heat and water
and hot water as reasonably required by the tenant, (e) providing
heating or ventilation systems that are not functional or are
hazardous, (f) defective, hazardous, or missing electrical wiring or
electrical service, (g) defective or hazardous exits that increase the
risk of injury to occupants, and (h) conditions that increase the risk
of fire.
(2) "Distressed home" has the same meaning as in RCW 61.34.020.
(3) "Distressed home conveyance" has the same meaning as in RCW
61.34.020.
(4) "Distressed home purchaser" has the same meaning as in RCW
61.34.020.
(5) "Dwelling unit" is a structure or that part of a structure
which is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person or
by two or more persons maintaining a common household, including but
not limited to single family residences and units of multiplexes,
apartment buildings, and mobile homes.
(6) "Gang" means a group that: (a) Consists of three or more
persons; (b) has identifiable leadership or an identifiable name, sign,
or symbol; and (c) on an ongoing basis, regularly conspires and acts in
concert mainly for criminal purposes.
(7) "Gang-related activity" means any activity that occurs within
the gang or advances a gang purpose.
(8) "In danger of foreclosure" means any of the following:
(a) The homeowner has defaulted on the mortgage and, under the
terms of the mortgage, the mortgagee has the right to accelerate full
payment of the mortgage and repossess, sell, or cause to be sold the
property;
(b) The homeowner is at least thirty days delinquent on any loan
that is secured by the property; or
(c) The homeowner has a good faith belief that he or she is likely
to default on the mortgage within the upcoming four months due to a
lack of funds, and the homeowner has reported this belief to:
(i) The mortgagee;
(ii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
19.134 RCW;
(iii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
19.146 RCW;
(iv) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter
18.85 RCW;
(v) An attorney-at-law;
(vi) A mortgage counselor or other credit counselor licensed or
certified by any federal, state, or local agency; or
(vii) Any other party to a distressed property conveyance.
(9) "Landlord" means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of the
dwelling unit or the property of which it is a part, and in addition
means any person designated as representative of the landlord.
(10) "Mortgage" is used in the general sense and includes all
instruments, including deeds of trust, that are used to secure an
obligation by an interest in real property.
(11) "Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in
whom is vested:
(a) All or any part of the legal title to property; or
(b) All or part of the beneficial ownership, and a right to present
use and enjoyment of the property.
(12) "Person" means an individual, group of individuals,
corporation, government, or governmental agency, business trust,
estate, trust, partnership, or association, two or more persons having
a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(13) "Premises" means a dwelling unit, appurtenances thereto,
grounds, and facilities held out for the use of tenants generally and
any other area or facility which is held out for use by the tenant.
(14) "Property" or "rental property" means all dwelling units on a
contiguous quantity of land managed by the same landlord as a single,
rental complex.
(15) "Qualified inspector" means a United States department of
housing and urban development certified inspector; a Washington state
licensed home inspector; an American society of home inspectors
certified inspector; a private inspector certified by the national
association of housing and redevelopment officials, the American
association of code enforcement, or other comparable professional
association as approved by the local municipality; a municipal code
enforcement officer; a Washington licensed structural engineer; or a
Washington licensed architect.
(16) "Reasonable attorneys' fees", where authorized in this
chapter, means an amount to be determined including the following
factors: The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty of
the questions involved, the skill requisite to perform the legal
service properly, the fee customarily charged in the locality for
similar legal services, the amount involved and the results obtained,
and the experience, reputation and ability of the lawyer or lawyers
performing the services.
(17) "Rental agreement" means all agreements which establish or
modify the terms, conditions, rules, regulations, or any other
provisions concerning the use and occupancy of a dwelling unit.
(18) A "single family residence" is a structure maintained and used
as a single dwelling unit. Notwithstanding that a dwelling unit shares
one or more walls with another dwelling unit, it shall be deemed a
single family residence if it has direct access to a street and shares
neither heating facilities nor hot water equipment, nor any other
essential facility or service, with any other dwelling unit.
(19) A "tenant" is any person who is entitled to occupy a dwelling
unit primarily for living or dwelling purposes under a rental
agreement.
(20) "Tenant screening" means seeking or obtaining a consumer
report about a prospective tenant or using the consumer report in
deciding whether to make or accept an offer for residential rental
property to or from a prospective tenant.
(21) "Tenant screening report" means a written, oral, or other
communication of information by a screening service bearing on a
prospective tenant's creditworthiness, credit standing, credit
capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or
mode of living that is prepared, transmitted, accessed, used, or
expected to be used or collected for tenant screening purposes.
(22) "Screening service" means any person who, for monetary fees or
dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in the
business of assembling or evaluating information on individuals for the
purpose of furnishing tenant screening reports to third parties, and
who uses any means or facility of commerce for the purpose of preparing
or furnishing tenant screening reports. "Screening service" does not
include a person who obtains a tenant screening report and provides the
report or information contained in it to a subsidiary or affiliate of
the person.
(23) "Prospective landlord" means a landlord or a person who
advertises, solicits, offers, or otherwise holds a dwelling unit out as
available for rent.
(24) "Prospective tenant" means a tenant or a person who has
applied for residential housing that is governed under this chapter.
(25) "Eviction suit" means a civil action for unlawful detainer,
forcible detainer, ejectment, or other claim in which the plaintiff
seeks to gain or recover possession of residential real property from
one or more defendants.
(26)(a) "Qualified victim protection records" means:
(i) Records or information concerning any judicial or
administrative proceeding in which the person about whom the records or
information pertains sought to obtain an order of protection from
domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking, harassment, or other
violent crime, including any petition or action for a protection order
under chapter 9A.46, 10.14, 10.99, 26.09, 26.26, or 26.50 RCW, or any
other law;
(ii) Records or information concerning any judicial or
administrative proceeding in which the person about whom the records or
information pertains exercised or attempted to exercise a right or
obtain a benefit available specifically or exclusively to victims of
violence, such as, but not limited to, the early termination of a
rental agreement under RCW 59.18.575;
(iii) Records or information indicating that the person about whom
the records or information pertains asserted that a claim or defense
was available to the person in a judicial or administrative proceeding
by reason of the person's status as a victim of violence, such as in a
proceeding under chapter 49.60 RCW; and
(iv) Any other records or information indicating that the person
about whom the records or information pertains is a victim of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or is protected by a court
order.
(b) "Qualified victim protection records" does not include records
or information tending to indicate that the person about whom the
records or information pertains was a perpetrator of sexual assault,
harassment, or violent crime.

Sec. 3 RCW 59.18.257 and 1991 c 194 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) If a prospective landlord uses a ((tenant)) screening
service, ((then the landlord may only charge for the costs incurred for
using the tenant screening service under this section.)) and prior to
obtaining a tenant screening report about a prospective tenant, the
prospective landlord shall first notify the prospective tenant in
writing of the following:
(i) What criteria may result in denial of the application;
(ii) The name and address of the screening service that will be
used;
(iii) What types of information will be accessed to conduct the
tenant screening; and
(iv) The prospective tenant's rights to obtain a free copy of the
tenant screening report in the event of a denial or other adverse
action, and to dispute the accuracy of information appearing in the
tenant screening report.
(b) The landlord may charge a prospective tenant a maximum of ten
dollars for using the tenant screening service.
(c) If a prospective landlord takes an adverse action with respect
to a prospective tenant that is based, in whole or in part, on
information contained in a tenant screening report, the prospective
landlord shall provide a written notice of the adverse action to the
prospective tenant that states the reasons for the adverse action and
contains the name, address, and telephone number of the screening
service that furnished the tenant screening report that contributed to
the adverse action.
(2)(a) If a landlord conducts his or her own screening of tenants,
((then)) the landlord may charge his or her actual costs in obtaining
the background information, but the amount may not exceed the customary
costs charged by a screening service in the general area. The
prospective landlord's actual costs include costs incurred for long
distance phone calls and for time spent calling landlords, employers,
and financial institutions.
(((2))) (b) A landlord may not charge a prospective tenant for the
cost of obtaining background information under this section unless the
landlord first notifies the prospective tenant in writing of ((what a
tenant screening entails, the prospective tenant's rights to dispute
the accuracy of information provided by the tenant screening service or
provided by the entities listed on the tenant application who will be))
the following:
(i) What criteria may result in denial of the application;
(ii) What types of information will be accessed to conduct the
tenant screening; and
(iii) The prospective tenant's right to dispute the accuracy of
information provided by the entities contacted for information
concerning the tenant((, and the name and address of the tenant
screening service used by the landlord)).
(((3) Nothing in this section requires a landlord to disclose
information to a prospective tenant that was obtained from a tenant
screening service or from entities listed on the tenant application
which is not required under the federal fair credit reporting act, 15
U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.
(4))) (c) If a prospective landlord takes an adverse action with
respect to a prospective tenant that is not based on information
obtained from a tenant screening report, the prospective landlord shall
provide a written notice of the adverse action to the prospective
tenant that states the reasons for the adverse action.
(3)(a) A screening service shall not, if requested by a consumer,
fail to generate and transmit to the consumer a tenant screening report
regarding that consumer. The form and contents of the tenant screening
report must be identical or substantially similar to the tenant
screening report that the screening service would generate and transmit
to a prospective landlord regarding the consumer, and must be
transmitted to the consumer in substantially the same time and manner
as the screening service would transmit such a report to a prospective
landlord. The screening service shall provide the report free of
charge, unless the screening service has provided a tenant screening
report to that same consumer within the preceding twelve months, in
which case the screening service may charge a fee not exceeding the
charge that the screening service would customarily charge a
prospective landlord for generating and transmitting a tenant screening
report. The amount of any charge must be disclosed to the consumer
before furnishing the information.
(b) A tenant screening report may not contain any of the following
items of information about a prospective tenant:
(i) Eviction suits that did not result in a judgment or other
adjudication finding that the prospective tenant was a responsible
party. For purposes of this subsection, a person is deemed to have
been a responsible party only if: (A) A judgment or other order was
entered in the eviction suit finding that the person was guilty of
unlawful detainer or otherwise in unlawful possession of the premises;
(B) the person's right to possession of the premises to which the
eviction suit related had not been terminated by a foreclosure sale
within ninety days of when the eviction suit was filed; and (C) the
judgment or order has not been vacated, expunged, sealed, or similarly
impaired;
(ii) Qualified victim protection records; or
(iii) Other information prohibited from disclosure under RCW
19.182.040.
(4) Any landlord or prospective landlord who violates this section
may be liable to the prospective tenant for an amount not to exceed one
hundred dollars. The prevailing party may also recover court costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees.
(5) Any screening service that violates this section is liable to
the prospective tenant in the amount of his or her actual damages and
costs of the action together with reasonable attorneys' fees as
determined by the court. A screening service that willfully fails to
comply with any requirement imposed under this section is liable to the
prospective tenant in the amount of one thousand dollars for each
willful violation.
(6) This section does not limit a prospective tenant's rights or
the duties of a screening service as otherwise provided in chapter
19.182 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any hearing in an action for the possession of real property
under this title, the court shall order the court files and records in
the proceeding, or any part of the court files and records, to be
sealed or redacted in a manner minimally necessary to protect the
defendant's ability to obtain rental housing in the future if the court
finds that:
(a) The defendant is neither a homeowner nor an incarcerated
person;
(b) Unfettered public access to the record of the action is likely
to materially diminish the defendant's ability to obtain rental housing
in the future; and
(c) The diminution of the defendant's future rental housing
prospects would be inequitable in light of the totality of the
circumstances, including the public's interest in access to the
affected court records.
(2) It is presumed that the diminution of a defendant's future
rental housing prospects would be inequitable in light of the totality
of the circumstances if:
(a) The court has entered a final order in the action, and the
defendant was not found guilty of unlawful detainer or otherwise in
unlawful possession of the disputed premises;
(b) The defendant occupied the real property as a tenant prior to
a foreclosure sale concerning the same premises, and the action was
filed less than ninety days after the foreclosure sale;
(c) Notwithstanding any other findings or orders in the case, the
defendant prevailed on an affirmative defense, counterclaim, or setoff
asserted in the action, such as a claim for breach of an implied
warranty of habitability or breach of the covenant of quiet enjoyment;
or
(d) A judgment entered solely for nonpayment of rent has been fully
cured and the defendant's tenancy reinstated pursuant to RCW 59.12.170,
59.12.190, or 59.18.410, or any other law.
(3) The presumption arising under subsection (2) of this section
may be rebutted by evidence establishing that the public's interest in
access to the court records outweighs the defendant's interest in
obtaining future rental housing, and that the public access will not
materially chill tenants with meritorious defenses from appearing and
defending in unlawful detainer actions.
(4) A person for whose benefit an order to seal or redact court
records has been entered under this section, when engaged in an effort
to secure possession of residential rental property:
(a) Has no duty to disclose the action to any prospective landlord
or provider of any services in connection with housing on any written
or nonwritten application; and
(b) May not be penalized in any manner, or denied any right or
privilege, for making to any prospective landlord or provider of any
services in connection with housing a statement denying the existence
of the action or denying knowledge of its existence.
(5) A screening service shall not unreasonably make a tenant
screening report containing information the court has sealed or
redacted under this section. Such a report is presumed to be
unreasonable if the screening service provided the report based on
records obtained from the court more than thirty days prior to the
report date. A screening service that violates this section is liable
to the prospective tenant in the amount of his or her actual damages
and costs of the action together with reasonable attorneys' fees as
determined by the court and for a monetary penalty in the amount of one
thousand dollars in the case of a willful violation.
(6) A person having notice of an order to seal or redact unlawful
detainer case records shall not, either directly or through any agent,
disclose the existence of the action, or other information expected to
enable discovery of the action, to any tenant screening service or
prospective landlord seeking information about the person for whose
benefit the order was entered. The duty imposed under this subsection
cannot be waived by the person for whose benefit the order to seal was
entered, and any purported or attempted waiver, whether written or
nonwritten, is void and has no effect. A person who willfully violates
this subsection is liable to the person for whose benefit the order was
entered in the amount of such person's actual damages and costs of
suit, together with reasonable attorneys' fees as determined by the
court, and a monetary penalty of one thousand dollars for each willful
violation. A violation of this subsection is considered willful only
if the person committing the violation had actual knowledge of the
order to seal or redact.
(7) This section does not limit or impair the right of any party to
an unlawful detainer action from pursuing, or of a court from ordering,
the sealing or redaction of court records under any other provision of
law.

--- END ---