BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.24.450 and 2009 c 373 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No club shall be entitled to a spirits, beer, and wine private
club license:
(a) Unless such private club has been in continuous operation for
at least one year immediately prior to the date of its application for
such license;
(b) Unless the private club premises be constructed and equipped,
conducted, managed, and operated to the satisfaction of the board and
in accordance with this title and the regulations made thereunder;
(c) Unless the board shall have determined pursuant to any
regulations made by it with respect to private clubs, that such private
club is a bona fide private club; it being the intent of this section
that license shall not be granted to a club which is, or has been,
primarily formed or activated to obtain a license to sell liquor, but
solely to a bona fide private club, where the sale of liquor is
incidental to the main purposes of the spirits, beer, and wine private
club, as defined in RCW 66.04.010(8).
(2) The annual fee for a spirits, beer, and wine private club
license, whether inside or outside of an incorporated city or town, is
seven hundred twenty dollars per year.
(3) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and
wine private club license that allows ((up to forty)) nonclub, member-sponsored events using club liquor. Visitors and guests may attend
these events only by invitation of the sponsoring member or members.
These events may not be open to the general public. The fee for the
endorsement shall be an annual fee of nine hundred dollars. Upon the
board's request, the holder of the endorsement must provide the board
or the board's designee with the following information at least
seventy-two hours prior to the event: The date, time, and location of
the event; the name of the sponsor of the event; and a brief
description of the purpose of the event.
(4) The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and
wine private club license that allows the holder of a spirits, beer,
and wine private club license to sell bottled wine for off-premises
consumption. Spirits and beer may not be sold for off-premises
consumption under this section. The annual fee for the endorsement
under this section is one hundred twenty dollars.

--- END ---