BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) On July 1, 2012, all powers, duties, and functions of the
department of archaeology and historic preservation are transferred to
the office of lieutenant governor.
(2) On July 1, 2012, all department of archaeology and historic
preservation employees are transferred to and become employees of the
office of lieutenant governor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.334 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The office of archaeology and historic preservation is created
within the office of lieutenant governor.
(2) The office of archaeology and historic preservation within the
office of lieutenant governor assumes all powers, duties, and functions
of the department of archaeology and historic preservation.
(3) All department of archaeology and historic preservation
personnel are employed, supervised, and controlled by the office of
lieutenant governor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.334 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of archaeology and historic preservation is
hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby
transferred to the office of lieutenant governor. All references to
the director or the department of archaeology and historic preservation
in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the
director or the office of lieutenant governor.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department of
archaeology and historic preservation shall be delivered to the custody
of the office of lieutenant governor. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
department of archaeology and historic preservation shall be made
available to the office of lieutenant governor. All funds, credits, or
other assets held by the department of archaeology and historic
preservation shall be assigned to the office of lieutenant governor.
(b) Any appropriations made to the department of archaeology and
historic preservation shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the office of lieutenant governor.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the department of archaeology and historic
preservation are transferred to the jurisdiction of the office of
lieutenant governor. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW,
the state civil service law, are assigned to the office of lieutenant
governor to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly,
without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be
appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing
state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the department of
archaeology and historic preservation shall be continued and acted upon
by the office of lieutenant governor. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
office of lieutenant governor.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the department of archaeology and historic preservation shall not
affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of
this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any
existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or
until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel
resources board as provided by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The office of lieutenant governor must:
(a) Establish a transition plan for the orderly implementation of
this act, including: Addressing personnel issues relating to the
transfer and facilitating the transfer of powers, duties, and
functions, property and equipment, records, contracts, and funding from
the department of archaeology and historic preservation to the office
of lieutenant governor. The office of lieutenant governor must consult
with the department of archaeology and historic preservation, the
department of personnel, and the office of financial management in
developing the transition plan; and
(b) Present recommendations to the legislature, in the form of
draft legislation, regarding any further statutory changes necessary to
implement this act.
(2) The transition plan and recommendations required by subsection
(1) of this section must be presented to the appropriate committees of
the legislature by November 1, 2011.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.17.010 and 2009 c 565 s 25 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be departments of the state government which shall be
known as (1) the department of social and health services, (2) the
department of ecology, (3) the department of labor and industries, (4)
the department of agriculture, (5) the department of fish and wildlife,
(6) the department of transportation, (7) the department of licensing,
(8) the department of general administration, (9) the department of
commerce, (10) the department of veterans affairs, (11) the department
of revenue, (12) the department of retirement systems, (13) the
department of corrections, (14) the department of health, (15) the
department of financial institutions, (16) ((the department of
archaeology and historic preservation, (17))) the department of early
learning, and (((18))) (17) the Puget Sound partnership, which shall be
charged with the execution, enforcement, and administration of such
laws, and invested with such powers and required to perform such
duties, as the legislature may provide.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.17.020 and 2009 c 565 s 26 are each amended to read
as follows:
There shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be
known as: (1) The secretary of social and health services, (2) the
director of ecology, (3) the director of labor and industries, (4) the
director of agriculture, (5) the director of fish and wildlife, (6) the
secretary of transportation, (7) the director of licensing, (8) the
director of general administration, (9) the director of commerce, (10)
the director of veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12)
the director of retirement systems, (13) the secretary of corrections,
(14) the secretary of health, (15) the director of financial
institutions, (16) ((the director of the department of archaeology and
historic preservation, (17))) the director of early learning, and
(((18))) (17) the executive director of the Puget Sound partnership.
Such officers, except the director of fish and wildlife, shall be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, and hold
office at the pleasure of the governor. The director of fish and
wildlife shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as
prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.334.020 and 2005 c 333 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The executive head ((and appointing authority)) of the
((department)) office of archaeology and historic preservation within
the office of lieutenant governor is the director. The director shall
serve as the state historic preservation officer, and shall have a
background in program administration, an active involvement in historic
preservation, and a knowledge of the national, state, and local
preservation programs as they affect the state of Washington. The
director shall be appointed by the governor((, with the consent of the
senate, and serves at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall
be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW
43.03.040. If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not
in session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the
next meeting of the senate)) from among a list of candidates provided
by the lieutenant governor, and serves at the pleasure of the
lieutenant governor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 1 through 3 of this act take effect
July 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 43.334.030 (Director powers and duties) and 2005 c 333 s 3;
(2) RCW 43.334.040 (Departmental divisions) and 2005 c 333 s 4;
(3) RCW 43.334.050 (Deputy director--Department personnel
director--Assistant directors) and 2005 c 333 s 5; and
(4) RCW 43.334.900 (Transfer of powers, duties, and functions) and
2005 c 333 s 12.

--- END ---