BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.100 and 2007 c 83 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon all roadways of sufficient width a vehicle shall be driven
upon the right half of the roadway, except as follows:
(a) When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the
same direction under the rules governing such movement;
(b) When an obstruction exists making it necessary to drive to the
left of the center of the highway; provided, any person so doing shall
yield the right-of-way to all vehicles traveling in the proper
direction upon the unobstructed portion of the highway within such
distance as to constitute an immediate hazard;
(c) Upon a roadway divided into three marked lanes and providing
for two-way movement traffic under the rules applicable thereon;
(d) Upon a street or highway restricted to one-way traffic; or
(e) Upon a highway having three lanes or less, when approaching a
stationary authorized emergency vehicle, tow truck or other vehicle
providing roadside assistance while operating warning lights with three
hundred sixty degree visibility, or police vehicle as described under
RCW 46.61.212(((2))) (1)(d)(ii).
(2) Upon all roadways having two or more lanes for traffic moving
in the same direction, all vehicles shall be driven in the right-hand
lane then available for traffic, except (a) when overtaking and passing
another vehicle proceeding in the same direction, (b) when traveling at
a speed greater than the traffic flow, (c) when moving left to allow
traffic to merge, or (d) when preparing for a left turn at an
intersection, exit, or into a private road or driveway when such left
turn is legally permitted. On any such roadway, a vehicle or
combination over ten thousand pounds shall be driven only in the right-hand lane except under the conditions enumerated in (a) through (d) of
this subsection.
(3) No vehicle towing a trailer or no vehicle or combination over
ten thousand pounds may be driven in the left-hand lane of a limited
access roadway having three or more lanes for traffic moving in one
direction except when preparing for a left turn at an intersection,
exit, or into a private road or driveway when a left turn is legally
permitted. This subsection does not apply to a vehicle using a high
occupancy vehicle lane. A high occupancy vehicle lane is not
considered the left-hand lane of a roadway. This subsection does not
apply to: Public transportation vehicles; auto transportation company
vehicles regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; passenger charter carrier
vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked
stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under
department rules; private nonprofit transportation provider vehicles
regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and private employer transportation
service vehicles. The department of transportation, in consultation
with the Washington state patrol, shall adopt rules specifying (a)
those circumstances where it is permissible for other vehicles to use
the left lane in case of emergency or to facilitate the orderly flow of
traffic, and (b) those segments of limited access roadway to be exempt
from this subsection due to the operational characteristics of the
roadway.
(4) It is a traffic infraction to drive continuously in the left
lane of a multilane roadway when it impedes the flow of other traffic.
(5) Upon any roadway having four or more lanes for moving traffic
and providing for two-way movement of traffic, a vehicle shall not be
driven to the left of the center line of the roadway except when
authorized by official traffic control devices designating certain
lanes to the left side of the center of the roadway for use by traffic
not otherwise permitted to use such lanes, or except as permitted under
subsection (1)(b) of this section. However, this subsection shall not
be construed as prohibiting the crossing of the center line in making
a left turn into or from an alley, private road or driveway.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "private employer
transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route
transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit
of its employees.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.61.165 and 1999 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state department of transportation and the local
authorities are authorized to reserve all or any portion of any highway
under their respective jurisdictions, including any designated lane or
ramp, for the exclusive or preferential use of public transportation
vehicles, private transportation provider vehicles as described in
subsections (2) and (3) of this section, or private motor vehicles
carrying no fewer than a specified number of passengers, when such
limitation will increase the efficient utilization of the highway or
will aid in the conservation of energy resources.
(2) When the reserved portion of a highway is based on the number
of passengers in a vehicle, the following vehicles must be authorized
to use the reserved portion of the highway if the vehicle has the
capacity to carry eight or more passengers, regardless of the number of
passengers in the vehicle: (a) Auto transportation company vehicles
regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; (b) passenger charter carrier
vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked
stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under
department rules; (c) private nonprofit transportation provider
vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and (d) private employer
transportation service vehicles.
(3) If a portion of a highway is reserved for the exclusive or
preferential use of public transportation vehicles, the following
vehicles must also be authorized to use the reserved portion of the
highway, provided that such use does not interfere with the efficiency,
reliability, and safety of public transportation operations: (a) Auto
transportation company vehicles regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; (b)
passenger charter carrier vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW,
except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility
vehicles as defined under department rules; (c) private nonprofit
transportation provider vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and
(d) private employer transportation service vehicles. However, when
the reserved portion of the highway is a lane or lanes in a ferry
terminal queuing or holding area, the state or local highway authority
may consult with private transportation providers, as described under
this subsection, and public transportation providers to negotiate
otherwise.
(4) Regulations authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of
a highway facility under this section may be declared to be effective
at all times or at specified times of day or on specified days.
(5) Violation of a restriction of highway usage prescribed by the
appropriate authority under this section is a traffic infraction.
(6) For the purposes of this section, "private employer
transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route
transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit
of its employees.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.52.025 and 1974 ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Highway authorities of the state, counties, and incorporated
cities and towns, in addition to the specific powers granted in this
chapter, shall also have, and may exercise, relative to limited access
facilities, any and all additional authority, now or hereafter vested
in them relative to highways or streets within their respective
jurisdictions, and may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the use of such
limited access facilities by various classes of vehicles or traffic.
Such highway authorities may reserve any limited access facility or
portions thereof, including designated lanes or ramps for the exclusive
or preferential use of public transportation vehicles, private
transportation provider vehicles as described in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section, privately owned buses, or private motor vehicles
carrying not less than a specified number of passengers when such
limitation will increase the efficient utilization of the highway
facility or will aid in the conservation of energy resources.
Regulations authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of a highway
facility may under this section be declared to be effective at all time
or at specified times of day or on specified days.
(2) When the reserved portion of a highway is based on the number
of passengers in a vehicle, the following vehicles must be authorized
to use the reserved portion of the highway if the vehicle has the
capacity to carry eight or more passengers, regardless of the number of
passengers in the vehicle: (a) Auto transportation company vehicles
regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; (b) passenger charter carrier
vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked
stretch limousines and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under
department of licensing rules; (c) private nonprofit transportation
provider vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and (d) private
employer transportation service vehicles.
(3) If a portion of a highway is reserved for the exclusive or
preferential use of public transportation vehicles, the following
vehicles must also be authorized to use the reserved portion of the
highway, provided that such use does not interfere with the efficiency,
reliability, and safety of public transportation operations: (a) Auto
transportation company vehicles regulated under chapter 81.68 RCW; (b)
passenger charter carrier vehicles regulated under chapter 81.70 RCW,
except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport utility
vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules; (c) private
nonprofit transportation provider vehicles regulated under chapter
81.66 RCW; and (d) private employer transportation service vehicles.
However, when the reserved portion of the highway is a lane or lanes in
a ferry terminal queuing or holding area, the state or local highway
authority may consult with private transportation providers, as
described under this subsection, and public transportation providers to
negotiate otherwise.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "private employer
transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route
transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit
of its employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or local jurisdiction, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this
finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in
its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this
act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to
the receipt of federal funds by the state.

--- END ---