BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.61.165 and 1999 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The state department of transportation and the local
authorities are authorized to reserve all or any portion of any highway
under their respective jurisdictions, including any designated lane or
ramp, for the exclusive or preferential use of (a) public
transportation vehicles ((or)), (b) private motor vehicles carrying no
fewer than a specified number of passengers, or (c) the following
private transportation provider vehicles if the vehicle has the
capacity to carry eight or more passengers, regardless of the number of
passengers in the vehicle, and if such use does not interfere with the
efficiency, reliability, and safety of public transportation
operations: (i) Auto transportation company vehicles regulated under
chapter 81.68 RCW; (ii) passenger charter carrier vehicles regulated
under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines
and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of
licensing rules; (iii) private nonprofit transportation provider
vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and (iv) private employer
transportation service vehicles, when such limitation will increase the
efficient utilization of the highway or will aid in the conservation of
energy resources.
(2) Regulations authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of
a highway facility may be declared to be effective at all times or at
specified times of day or on specified days. Violation of a
restriction of highway usage prescribed by the appropriate authority
under this section is a traffic infraction.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "private employer
transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route
transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit
of its employees.

Sec. 2 RCW 47.04.290 and 2008 c 257 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any local transit agency that has received state funding for a
park and ride lot shall make reasonable accommodation for use of that
lot by: Auto transportation companies regulated under chapter 81.68
RCW ((and)); passenger charter carriers regulated under chapter 81.70
RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines and stretch sport
utility vehicles as defined under department of licensing rules;
private, nonprofit transportation providers regulated under chapter
81.66 RCW((, that intend to provide or already provide regularly
scheduled service at that lot)); and private employer transportation
service vehicles. The accommodation must be in the form of an
agreement between the applicable local transit agency and the private
((transit)) transportation provider ((regulated under chapter 81.68 or
81.66 RCW)). The transit agency may require that the agreement include
provisions to recover actual costs ((and fair market value)) for the
use of the lot and its related facilities and to provide adequate
insurance and indemnification of the transit agency, and other
reasonable provisions to ensure that the private ((transit))
transportation provider's use does not unduly burden the transit
agency. If the agreement includes provisions to recover actual costs,
the private transportation provider is responsible to remit the full
actual costs of park and ride lot use to the appropriate transit
agency. No accommodation is required, and any agreement may be
terminated, if the park and ride lot is at or exceeds ninety percent
capacity during off-peak hours.
(2) A local transit agency described under subsection (1) of this
section may enter into a cooperative agreement with a taxicab company
regulated under chapter 81.72 RCW in order to accommodate the taxicab
company at the agency's park and ride lot, provided the taxicab company
must agree to provide service with reasonable availability, subject to
schedule coordination provisions as agreed to by the parties.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "private employer
transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route
transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit
of its employees.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.52.025 and 1974 ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Highway authorities of the state, counties, and incorporated
cities and towns, in addition to the specific powers granted in this
chapter, shall also have, and may exercise, relative to limited access
facilities, any and all additional authority, now or hereafter vested
in them relative to highways or streets within their respective
jurisdictions, and may regulate, restrict, or prohibit the use of such
limited access facilities by various classes of vehicles or traffic.
Such highway authorities may reserve any limited access facility or
portions thereof, including designated lanes or ramps for the exclusive
or preferential use of (a) public transportation vehicles, (b)
privately owned buses, ((or)) (c) private motor vehicles carrying not
less than a specified number of passengers, or (d) the following
private transportation provider vehicles if the vehicle has the
capacity to carry eight or more passengers, regardless of the number of
passengers in the vehicle, and if such use does not interfere with the
efficiency, reliability, and safety of public transportation
operations: (i) Auto transportation company vehicles regulated under
chapter 81.68 RCW; (ii) passenger charter carrier vehicles regulated
under chapter 81.70 RCW, except marked or unmarked stretch limousines
and stretch sport utility vehicles as defined under department of
licensing rules; (iii) private nonprofit transportation provider
vehicles regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW; and (iv) private employer
transportation service vehicles, when such limitation will increase the
efficient utilization of the highway facility or will aid in the
conservation of energy resources. Regulations authorizing such
exclusive or preferential use of a highway facility may be declared to
be effective at all time or at specified times of day or on specified
days.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "private employer
transportation service" means regularly scheduled, fixed-route
transportation service that is offered by an employer for the benefit
of its employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
When designing portions of a highway that are intended to be used
as portions reserved for the exclusive or preferential use of public
transportation vehicles, state and local jurisdictions shall consider
whether the design will safely accommodate private transportation
provider vehicles that are authorized to use the reserved portions
under RCW 46.61.165 and 47.52.025.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or local jurisdiction, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this
finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in
its application to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this
act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to
the receipt of federal funds by the state.

--- END ---