BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.220 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 102 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected from every person that has a
substantial nexus with this state a tax for the act or privilege of
engaging in business activities. The tax is measured by the
application of rates against value of products, gross proceeds of
sales, or gross income of the business, as the case may be.
(2) A person who has a substantial nexus with this state in any tax
year under the provisions of RCW 82.04.067 will be deemed to have a
substantial nexus with this state for the following tax year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.16.140 (Renewable energy system cost recovery -- Report to
legislature) and 2010 c 202 s 4 & 2005 c 300 s 5; and
(2) RCW 82.32.570 (Smelter tax incentives -- Goals -- Annual report)
and 2010 1st sp.s. c 2 s 6, 2006 c 182 s 6, & 2004 c 24 s 14.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.12.040 and 2010 c 106 s 221 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every person who maintains in this state a place of business or
a stock of goods, or engages in business activities within this state,
shall obtain from the department a certificate of registration, and
shall, at the time of making sales of tangible personal property,
digital goods, digital codes, digital automated services, extended
warranties, or sales of any service defined as a retail sale in RCW
82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g), (3)(a), or (6)(b), or making transfers of
either possession or title, or both, of tangible personal property for
use in this state, collect from the purchasers or transferees the tax
imposed under this chapter. The tax to be collected under this section
must be in an amount equal to the purchase price multiplied by the rate
in effect for the retail sales tax under RCW 82.08.020. For the
purposes of this chapter, the phrase "maintains in this state a place
of business" shall include the solicitation of sales and/or taking of
orders by sales agents or traveling representatives. For the purposes
of this chapter, "engages in business activity within this state"
includes every activity which is sufficient under the Constitution of
the United States for this state to require collection of tax under
this chapter. The department must in rules specify activities which
constitute engaging in business activity within this state, and must
keep the rules current with future court interpretations of the
Constitution of the United States.
(2) Every person who engages in this state in the business of
acting as an independent selling agent for persons who do not hold a
valid certificate of registration, and who receives compensation by
reason of sales of tangible personal property, digital goods, digital
codes, digital automated services, extended warranties, or sales of any
service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (2) (a) or (g),
(3)(a), or (6)(b), of his or her principals for use in this state,
must, at the time such sales are made, collect from the purchasers the
tax imposed on the purchase price under this chapter, and for that
purpose is deemed a retailer as defined in this chapter.
(3) The tax required to be collected by this chapter is deemed to
be held in trust by the retailer until paid to the department, and any
retailer who appropriates or converts the tax collected to the
retailer's own use or to any use other than the payment of the tax
provided herein to the extent that the money required to be collected
is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed is guilty of
a misdemeanor. In case any seller fails to collect the tax herein
imposed or having collected the tax, fails to pay the same to the
department in the manner prescribed, whether such failure is the result
of the seller's own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the
seller's control, the seller is nevertheless personally liable to the
state for the amount of such tax, unless the seller has taken from the
buyer a copy of a direct pay permit issued under RCW 82.32.087.
(4) Any retailer who refunds, remits, or rebates to a purchaser, or
transferee, either directly or indirectly, and by whatever means, all
or any part of the tax levied by this chapter is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section,
any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by
this chapter if:
(a) The person's activities in this state, whether conducted
directly or through another person, are limited to:
(i) The storage, dissemination, or display of advertising;
(ii) The taking of orders; or
(iii) The processing of payments; and
(b) The activities are conducted electronically via a web site on
a server or other computer equipment located in Washington that is not
owned or operated by the person making sales into this state nor owned
or operated by an affiliated person. "Affiliated persons" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 82.04.424.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section expires when: (a) The United
States congress grants individual states the authority to impose sales
and use tax collection duties on remote sellers; or (b) it is
determined by a court of competent jurisdiction, in a judgment not
subject to review, that a state can impose sales and use tax collection
duties on remote sellers.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section,
any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by
this chapter if the person would have been obligated to collect retail
sales tax on the sale absent a specific exemption provided in chapter
82.08 RCW, and there is no corresponding use tax exemption in this
chapter. Nothing in this subsection (7) may be construed as relieving
purchasers from liability for reporting and remitting the tax due under
this chapter directly to the department.
(8) Notwithstanding subsections (1) through (4) of this section,
any person making sales is not obligated to collect the tax imposed by
this chapter if the state is prohibited under the Constitution or laws
of the United States from requiring the person to collect the tax
imposed by this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.04.4297 and 2002 c 314 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts received from the United States or any instrumentality thereof
or from the state of Washington or any municipal corporation or
political subdivision thereof as compensation for, or to support,
health or social welfare services rendered by a health or social
welfare organization or by a municipal corporation or political
subdivision, except deductions are not allowed under this section for
amounts that are received under an employee benefit plan. For purposes
of this section, amounts received under subcontracts pursuant to
chapter 74.13 RCW are deemed to be received from the state of
Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A health or social welfare organization may deduct from the
measure of tax amounts received as compensation for providing child
welfare services under a government-funded program.
(2) A person may deduct from the measure of tax amounts received
from the state of Washington for distribution to a health or social
welfare organization that is eligible to deduct the distribution under
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Child welfare services" has the same meaning as provided in
RCW 74.13.020; and
(b) "Health or social welfare organization" has the meaning
provided in RCW 82.04.431.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.04.431 and 2008 c 137 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 82.04.4297, 82.04.4311, 82.08.02915,
82.12.02915, and 82.08.997, the term "health or social welfare
organization" means an organization, including any community action
council, which renders health or social welfare services as defined in
subsection (2) of this section, which is a not-for-profit corporation
under chapter 24.03 RCW and which is managed by a governing board of
not less than eight individuals none of whom is a paid employee of the
organization or which is a corporation sole under chapter 24.12 RCW.
Health or social welfare organization does not include a corporation
providing professional services as authorized in chapter 18.100 RCW.
In addition a corporation in order to be exempt under RCW 82.04.4297
shall satisfy the following conditions:
(a) No part of its income may be paid directly or indirectly to its
members, stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees except in the
form of services rendered by the corporation in accordance with its
purposes and bylaws;
(b) Salary or compensation paid to its officers and executives must
be only for actual services rendered, and at levels comparable to the
salary or compensation of like positions within the public service of
the state;
(c) Assets of the corporation must be irrevocably dedicated to the
activities for which the exemption is granted and, on the liquidation,
dissolution, or abandonment by the corporation, may not inure directly
or indirectly to the benefit of any member or individual except a
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation which also would be
entitled to the exemption;
(d) The corporation must be duly licensed or certified where
licensing or certification is required by law or regulation;
(e) The amounts received qualifying for exemption must be used for
the activities for which the exemption is granted;
(f) Services must be available regardless of race, color, national
origin, or ancestry; and
(g) The director of revenue shall have access to its books in order
to determine whether the corporation is exempt from taxes within the
intent of RCW 82.04.4297 and this section.
(2) The term "health or social welfare services" includes and is
limited to:
(a) Mental health, drug, or alcoholism counseling or treatment;
(b) Family counseling;
(c) Health care services;
(d) Therapeutic, diagnostic, rehabilitative, or restorative
services for the care of the sick, aged, or physically,
developmentally, or emotionally-disabled individuals;
(e) Activities which are for the purpose of preventing or
ameliorating juvenile delinquency or child abuse, including
recreational activities for those purposes;
(f) Care of orphans or foster children;
(g) Day care of children;
(h) Employment development, training, and placement;
(i) Legal services to the indigent;
(j) Weatherization assistance or minor home repair for low-income
homeowners or renters;
(k) Assistance to low-income homeowners and renters to offset the
cost of home heating energy, through direct benefits to eligible
households or to fuel vendors on behalf of eligible households;
(l) Community services to low-income individuals, families, and
groups, which are designed to have a measurable and potentially major
impact on causes of poverty in communities of the state; ((and))
(m) Temporary medical housing, as defined in RCW 82.08.997, if the
housing is provided only:
(i) While the patient is receiving medical treatment at a hospital
required to be licensed under RCW 70.41.090 or at an outpatient clinic
associated with such hospital, including any period of recuperation or
observation immediately following such medical treatment; and
(ii) By a person that does not furnish lodging or related services
to the general public; and
(n) Performance contract management of child welfare services under
chapter 74.13 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 4 through 6 of this act take effect
August 1, 2011.

--- END ---