BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.118.010 and 2008 c 321 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall design the Washington
college bound scholarship program in accordance with this section.
(1) "Eligible students" are those students who qualify for free or
reduced-price lunches. If a student qualifies in the seventh grade,
the student remains eligible even if the student does not receive free
or reduced-price lunches thereafter.
(2) Eligible students shall be notified of their eligibility for
the Washington college bound scholarship program beginning in their
seventh grade year. Students shall also be notified of the
requirements for award of the scholarship.
(3) To be eligible for a Washington college bound scholarship, a
student must sign a pledge before the effective date of this section
during seventh or eighth grade that includes a commitment to graduate
from high school with at least a C average and with no felony
convictions. Students who were in the eighth grade during the 2007-08
school year may sign the pledge during the 2008-09 school year. The
pledge must be witnessed by a parent or guardian and forwarded to the
higher education coordinating board by mail or electronically, as
indicated on the pledge form.
(4)(a) Scholarships shall be awarded to eligible students
graduating from public high schools, approved private high schools
under chapter 28A.195 RCW, or who received home-based instruction under
chapter 28A.200 RCW.
(b) To receive the Washington college bound scholarship, a student
must graduate with at least a "C" average from a public high school or
an approved private high school under chapter 28A.195 RCW in Washington
or have received home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, must
have no felony convictions, and must be a resident student as defined
in RCW 28B.15.012(2) (a) through (d).
(5) A student's family income will be assessed upon graduation
before awarding the scholarship.
(6) If at graduation from high school the student's family income
does not exceed sixty-five percent of the state median family income,
scholarship award amounts shall be as provided in this section.
(a) For students attending two or four-year institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, the value of the award shall be
(i) the difference between the student's tuition and required fees,
less the value of any state-funded grant, scholarship, or waiver
assistance the student receives; (ii) plus five hundred dollars for
books and materials.
(b) For students attending private four-year institutions of higher
education in Washington, the award amount shall be the representative
average of awards granted to students in public research universities
in Washington.
(c) For students attending private vocational schools in
Washington, the award amount shall be the representative average of
awards granted to students in public community and technical colleges
in Washington.
(7) Recipients may receive no more than four full-time years' worth
of scholarship awards.
(8) Institutions of higher education shall award the student all
need-based and merit-based financial aid for which the student would
otherwise qualify. The Washington college bound scholarship is
intended to replace unmet need, loans, and, at the student's option,
work-study award before any other grants or scholarships are reduced.
(9) The first scholarships shall be awarded to students graduating
in 2012.
(10) The state of Washington retains legal ownership of tuition
units awarded as scholarships under this chapter until the tuition
units are redeemed. These tuition units shall remain separately held
from any tuition units owned under chapter 28B.95 RCW by a Washington
college bound scholarship recipient.
(11) The scholarship award must be used within five years of
receipt. Any unused scholarship tuition units revert to the Washington
college bound scholarship account.
(12) Should the recipient terminate his or her enrollment for any
reason during the academic year, the unused portion of the scholarship
tuition units shall revert to the Washington college bound scholarship
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---