BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that off-road vehicle
users have been overwhelmed with varied confusing rules, regulations,
and ordinances from federal, state, county, and city land managers
throughout the state to the extent standardization statewide is needed
to maintain public safety and good order.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.09.310 and 2010 c 161 s 213 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Advisory committee" means the nonhighway and off-road vehicle
activities advisory committee established in RCW 46.09.340.
(2) "Board" means the recreation and conservation funding board
established in RCW 79A.25.110.
(3) "Dealer" means a person, partnership, association, or
corporation engaged in the business of selling off-road vehicles at
wholesale or retail in this state.
(4) "Highway," for the purpose of this chapter only, means the
entire width between the boundary lines of every roadway publicly
maintained by the state department of transportation or any county or
city with funding from the motor vehicle fund. A highway is generally
capable of travel by a conventional two-wheel drive passenger
automobile during most of the year and in use by such vehicles.
(5) "Nonhighway road" means any road owned or managed by a public
agency or any private road for which the owner has granted an easement
for public use for which appropriations from the motor vehicle fund
were not used for (a) original construction or reconstruction in the
last twenty-five years; ((or)) (b) maintenance in the last four years;
or (c) primitive roads.
(6) "Nonhighway road recreation facilities" means recreational
facilities that are adjacent to, or accessed by, a nonhighway road and
intended primarily for nonhighway road recreational users.
(7) "Nonhighway road recreational user" means a person whose
purpose for consuming fuel on a nonhighway road or off-road is
primarily for nonhighway road recreational purposes, including, but not
limited to, hunting, fishing, camping, sightseeing, wildlife viewing,
picnicking, driving for pleasure, kayaking/canoeing, and gathering
berries, firewood, mushrooms, and other natural products.
(8) "Nonhighway vehicle" means any motorized vehicle including an
ORV when used for recreational purposes on nonhighway roads, trails, or
a variety of other natural terrain.
Nonhighway vehicle does not include:
(a) Any vehicle designed primarily for travel on, over, or in the
water;
(b) Snowmobiles or any military vehicles; or
(c) Any vehicle eligible for a motor vehicle fuel tax exemption or
rebate under chapter 82.36 RCW while an exemption or rebate is claimed.
This exemption includes but is not limited to farm, construction, and
logging vehicles.
(9) "Nonmotorized recreational facilities" means recreational
trails and facilities that are adjacent to, or accessed by, a
nonhighway road and intended primarily for nonmotorized recreational
users.
(10) "Nonmotorized recreational user" means a person whose purpose
for consuming fuel on a nonhighway road or off-road is primarily for
nonmotorized recreational purposes including, but not limited to,
walking, hiking, backpacking, climbing, cross-country skiing,
snowshoeing, mountain biking, horseback riding, and pack animal
activities.
(11) "Organized competitive event" means any competition,
advertised in advance through written notice to organized clubs or
published in local newspapers, sponsored by recognized clubs, and
conducted at a predetermined time and place.
(12) "ORV recreation facilities" include, but are not limited to,
ORV trails, trailheads, campgrounds, ORV sports parks, and ORV use
areas, designated for ORV use by the managing authority ((that are
intended primarily for ORV recreational users)).
(13) "ORV recreational user" means a person whose purpose for
consuming fuel on nonhighway roads or off-road is primarily for ORV
recreational purposes, including but not limited to riding an all-terrain vehicle, motorcycling, or driving a four-wheel drive vehicle or
dune buggy.
(14) "ORV sports park" means a facility designed to accommodate
competitive ORV recreational uses including, but not limited to,
motocross racing, four-wheel drive competitions, and flat track racing.
Use of ORV sports parks can be competitive or noncompetitive in nature.
(15) "ORV trail" means a multiple-use corridor designated by the
managing authority and maintained for recreational use by motorized
vehicles.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.09.360 and 2006 c 212 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this chapter, any
city, county, or other political subdivision of this state, or any
state agency, may regulate the operation of nonhighway vehicles on
public lands, waters, and other properties under its jurisdiction, and
on streets, roads, or highways within its boundaries by adopting
regulations or ordinances of its governing body, provided such
regulations are not less stringent than the provisions of this chapter.
((However, the legislative body of a city with a population of less
than three thousand persons may, by ordinance, designate a street or
highway within its boundaries to be suitable for use by off-road
vehicles. The legislative body of a county may, by ordinance,
designate a road or highway within its boundaries to be suitable for
use by off-road vehicles if the road or highway is a direct connection
between a city with a population of less than three thousand persons
and an off-road vehicle recreation facility.))
(2) The legislative body of a city or county may, by ordinance,
designate a street, highway, or segment of highway within its
boundaries with a speed limit greater than thirty-five miles per hour
to be suitable for use by off-road vehicles.
(3) The legislative body of a city or county may, by ordinance,
designate a road or highway within its boundaries to be unsuitable for
use by off-road vehicles.
(4) The legislative body of a city or county may, by ordinance,
designate a segment of a state highway within its boundaries to be
suitable for use by off-road vehicles for the purpose of traversing
natural or manmade obstacles including, but not limited to, use of a
bridge to cross a river, lake, stream, or other water feature and use
of a roadway tunnel when reasonable means do not exist to do otherwise.
Adequate signage or other warning devices must alert other vehicle
traffic of such off-road vehicle usage.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.09.420 and 2010 c 161 s 217 are each amended to
read as follows:
ORV registrations and decals are required under this chapter except
for the following:
(1) Off-road vehicles owned and operated by the United States,
another state, or a political subdivision of the United States or
another state.
(2) Off-road vehicles owned and operated by this state, a
municipality, or a political subdivision of this state or the
municipality.
(3) Off-road vehicles operated on agricultural lands owned or
leased by the off-road vehicle owner or operator.
(4) Off-road vehicles owned by a resident of another state that
have a valid ORV use permit or vehicle registration issued in
accordance with the laws of the other state. This exemption applies
only to the extent that a similar exemption or privilege is granted
under the laws of that state.
(5) Off-road vehicles while being used for ((search and rescue))
emergency management purposes under the authority or direction of an
appropriate search and rescue, emergency management, or law enforcement
agency.
(6) Vehicles registered under chapter ((46.16)) 46.16A RCW or, in
the case of nonresidents, vehicles validly registered for operation
over public highways in the jurisdiction of the owner's residence.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.09.450 and 2010 c 161 s 221 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, it is lawful to
operate an off-road vehicle upon:
(a) ((A nonhighway road and in parking areas serving designated
off-road vehicle areas if the state, federal, local, or private
authority responsible for the management of the nonhighway road
authorizes the use of off-road vehicles)) Any road, nonhighway road, or
highway within the state with a posted speed limit of thirty-five miles
per hour or less; ((and))
(b) A street, road, or highway as authorized under RCW 46.09.360;
and
(c) Any road, trail, nonhighway road, or highway within the state
while being used under the authority or direction of an appropriate
emergency management, search and rescue, or law enforcement agency.
(2) Operations of an off-road vehicle on a nonhighway road, or on
a street, road, or highway as authorized under RCW 46.09.360((, under))
and this section ((is)), are exempt from registration requirements of
chapter ((46.16)) 46.16A RCW and vehicle lighting and equipment
requirements of chapter 46.37 RCW.
(3) It is unlawful to operate an off-road vehicle upon a private
nonhighway road if the road owner has not authorized the use of off-road vehicles.
(4) It is unlawful to operate an off-road vehicle on any interstate
highway, United States highway, numbered state highway, divided
highway, or limited access highway and its center median.
(5) Nothing in this section authorizes trespass on private
property.
(((5))) (6) The provisions of RCW 4.24.210(5) shall apply to public
landowners who allow members of the public to use public facilities
accessed by a highway, street, or nonhighway road for recreational off-road vehicle use.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.09.460 and 2005 c 213 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as specified in subsection (2) of this section, no
person under ((thirteen)) sixteen years of age may operate an off-road
vehicle on or across a highway or nonhighway road in this state.
(2) Persons under ((thirteen)) sixteen years of age may operate an
off-road vehicle on a nonhighway road designated for off-road vehicle
use under the direct supervision of a person eighteen years of age or
older possessing a valid license to operate a motor vehicle under
chapter 46.20 RCW.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.09.510 and 2007 c 241 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
The nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account is
created in the custody of the state ((treasury)) treasurer. ((Moneys
in this account are subject to legislative appropriation.)) The
recreation and conservation funding board shall administer the account
for purposes specified in this chapter and shall hold it separate and
apart from all other money, funds, and accounts of the board. Grants,
gifts, or other financial assistance, proceeds received from public
bodies as administrative cost contributions, and any moneys made
available to the state of Washington by the federal government for
outdoor recreation may be deposited into the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.09.520 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 936 and 2010 c 161
s 222 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) From time to time, but at least once each year, the state
treasurer shall refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the
motor vehicle fuel tax revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW,
based on a tax rate of: (a) Nineteen cents per gallon of motor vehicle
fuel from July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2005; (b) twenty cents per
gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007;
(c) twenty-one cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2009; (d) twenty-two cents per gallon of motor
vehicle fuel from July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011; and (e)
((twenty-three)) thirty-seven cents per gallon of motor vehicle fuel
beginning July 1, 2011, and thereafter, less proper deductions for
refunds and costs of collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090.
(2) The treasurer shall place these funds in the general fund as
follows:
(a) Thirty-six percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway
vehicle account and administered by the department of natural resources
solely for acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and
management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation
facilities, and information programs and maintenance of nonhighway
roads;
(b) Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and
nonhighway vehicle account and administered by the department of fish
and wildlife solely for the acquisition, planning, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and the maintenance of nonhighway roads;
(c) Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the parks and recreation commission solely
for the acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management
of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities; and
(d) Fifty-eight and one-half percent shall be credited to the
nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to be
administered by the board for planning, acquisition, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV, nonmotorized, and nonhighway road
recreation facilities and for education, information, and law
enforcement programs. The funds under this subsection shall be
expended in accordance with the following limitations:
(i) Not more than thirty percent may be expended for education,
information, and law enforcement programs under this chapter;
(ii) Not less than seventy percent may be expended for ORV,
nonmotorized, and nonhighway road recreation facilities. Except as
provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, of this amount:
(A) Not less than thirty percent, together with the funds the board
receives under RCW 46.68.045, may be expended for ORV recreation
facilities;
(B) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonmotorized
recreation facilities. Funds expended under this subsection
(2)(d)(ii)(B) shall be known as Ira Spring outdoor recreation
facilities funds; and
(C) Not less than thirty percent may be expended for nonhighway
road recreation facilities;
(iii) The board may waive the minimum percentage cited in (d)(ii)
of this subsection due to insufficient requests for funds or projects
that score low in the board's project evaluation. Funds remaining
after such a waiver must be allocated in accordance with board policy.
(3) On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW
46.68.045, expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under
this chapter for general administration expenses incurred in carrying
out this chapter.
(4) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the NOVA
account to the department of natural resources to install consistent
off-road vehicle signage at department-managed recreation sites, and to
implement the recreation opportunities on department-managed lands in
the Reiter block and Ahtanum state forest, and to the state parks and
recreation commission. The legislature finds that the appropriation of
funds from the NOVA account during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium for
maintenance and operation of state parks or to improve accessibility
for boaters and off-road vehicle users at state parks will benefit
boaters and off-road vehicle users and others who use nonhighway and
nonmotorized recreational facilities. The appropriations under this
subsection are not required to follow the specific distribution
specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 46.09.530 and 2010 c 161 s 223 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) After deducting administrative expenses and the expense of any
programs conducted under this chapter, the board shall, at least once
each year, distribute the funds it receives under RCW 46.68.045 and
46.09.520 to state agencies, counties, municipalities, federal
agencies, nonprofit off-road vehicle organizations, and Indian tribes.
Funds distributed under this section to nonprofit off-road vehicle
organizations may be spent only on projects or activities that benefit
off-road vehicle recreation on publicly owned lands or lands once
publicly owned that come into private ownership in a federally approved
land exchange completed between January 1, 1998, and January 1, 2005.
(2) The board shall adopt rules governing applications for funds
administered by the recreation and conservation office under this
chapter and shall determine the amount of money distributed to each
applicant. Agencies receiving funds under this chapter for capital
purposes shall consider the possibility of contracting with the state
parks and recreation commission, the department of natural resources,
or other federal, state, and local agencies to employ the youth
development and conservation corps or other youth crews in completing
the project.
(3) The board shall require each applicant for acquisition or
development funds under this section to comply with the requirements of
either the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, or the
national environmental policy act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.).

Sec. 10 RCW 46.30.020 and 2010 c 161 s 1115 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) No person may operate a motor vehicle subject to
registration under chapter ((46.16)) 46.16A RCW in this state unless
the person is insured under a motor vehicle liability policy with
liability limits of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090, is
self-insured as provided in RCW 46.29.630, is covered by a certificate
of deposit in conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a
liability bond of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090.
Written proof of financial responsibility for motor vehicle operation
must be provided on the request of a law enforcement officer in the
format specified under RCW 46.30.030.
(b) A person who drives a motor vehicle that is required to be
registered in another state that requires drivers and owners of
vehicles in that state to maintain insurance or financial
responsibility shall, when requested by a law enforcement officer,
provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance as is
required by the laws of the state in which the vehicle is registered.
(c) When asked to do so by a law enforcement officer, failure to
display an insurance identification card as specified under RCW
46.30.030 creates a presumption that the person does not have motor
vehicle insurance.
(d) Failure to provide proof of motor vehicle insurance is a
traffic infraction and is subject to penalties as set by the supreme
court under RCW 46.63.110 or community restitution.
(2) If a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this
section appears in person before the court or a violations bureau and
provides written evidence that at the time the person was cited, he or
she was in compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of
subsection (1) of this section, the citation shall be dismissed and the
court or violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of
twenty-five dollars at the time of dismissal. In lieu of personal
appearance, a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this
section may, before the date scheduled for the person's appearance
before the court or violations bureau, submit by mail to the court or
violations bureau written evidence that at the time the person was
cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in which case the
citation shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court or
violations bureau may assess court administrative costs of twenty-five
dollars at the time of dismissal.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not govern:
(a) The operation of a motor vehicle registered under RCW
46.18.255, governed by RCW 46.16A.170, or registered with the
Washington utilities and transportation commission as common or
contract carriers; or
(b) The operation of a motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330, a
motor-driven cycle as defined in RCW 46.04.332, ((or)) a moped as
defined in RCW 46.04.304, or an off-road vehicle as defined in RCW
46.04.365.
(4) RCW 46.29.490 shall not be deemed to govern all motor vehicle
liability policies required by this chapter but only those certified
for the purposes stated in chapter 46.29 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---