BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2011-12 school year, parents who choose to
educate their children outside the public education system may receive
an education voucher for each child educated outside the public
education system.
(2)(a) A parent or guardian who wishes to obtain education vouchers
for his or her school-age children must apply to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by September 30th of each year.
(b) The application must show that the child has passed a national
assessment.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
issue vouchers by May 30th of the school year in which the parent
applies in the amount of three thousand five hundred dollars per
student per school year.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to
implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The education support account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. All
receipts from subsection (2) of this section shall be deposited into
the account to be used solely for the purpose of implementing
Initiative 728 and Initiative 732.
(2) By September 1, 2011, and by September 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter, there shall be a transfer of funds from the
state general fund to the education support account. The amount
transferred must equal the amount that the statewide average per-pupil
funding exceeds the amount awarded for an education voucher under
section 1 of this act, multiplied by the number of education vouchers
awarded in the relevant school year.

--- END ---