BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 On December 17, 2010, the federal tax
relief, unemployment insurance reauthorization, and job creation act of
2010, House Resolution No. 4853, P.L. 111-312, was enacted into law.
Federal House Resolution No. 4853 amended the federal gift, estate, and
generation-skipping transfer taxes by retroactively reinstating those
taxes to January 1, 2010, with an increased applicable exemption amount
per taxpayer of five million dollars. House Resolution No. 4853 also
extended the time for making certain qualified disclaimers. In light
of these changes in federal law, the legislature finds in order: To
carry out the intent of decedents and grantors in the construction of
wills, trusts, and other dispositive instruments; to continue the
uniformity of the Washington disclaimer law with federal law; and to
promote judicial economy in the administration of trusts and estates,
it is necessary to amend certain time limitations and to clarify
procedures to construe certain formula clauses that refer to federal
estate, gift, and generation-skipping transfer tax rules applicable to
estates of decedents dying after December 31, 2009, and prior to
December 18, 2010.

Sec. 2 RCW 11.108.090 and 2010 c 11 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The personal representative, trustee, or any affected beneficiary
under a will or trust may bring a proceeding under the trust and estate
dispute resolution act in chapter 11.96A RCW, to determine whether the
decedent intended that the references, presumptions, or rules of
construction under RCW 11.108.080 be construed with respect to the
federal law as it existed after December 31, 2009, including but not
limited to the amendments made to federal law by the federal tax
relief, unemployment insurance reauthorization, and job creation act of
2010, federal House Resolution No. 4853, P.L. 111-312. In making such
determinations, extrinsic evidence may be considered, whether or not
the governing instrument is found to be ambiguous, including but not
limited to, information provided by the decedent to the decedent's
attorney or personal representative. Such a proceeding must be
commenced ((within twelve months)) not later than two years following
the death of the testator or grantor, and not thereafter.

Sec. 3 RCW 11.86.031 and 1995 c 292 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The disclaimer ((shall)) must:
(a) Be in writing;
(b) Be signed by the disclaimant;
(c) Identify the interest to be disclaimed; and
(d) State the disclaimer and the extent thereof.
(2) The disclaimer ((shall)) must be delivered or mailed as
provided in subsection (3) of this section at any time after the
creation of the interest, but in all events by nine months after the
latest of:
(a) The date the beneficiary attains the age of twenty-one years;
(b) The date of the transfer; ((or))
(c) The date that the beneficiary is finally ascertained and the
beneficiary's interest is indefeasibly vested; or
(d) December 17, 2010, if the date of the transfer is the date of
the death of the creator of the interest and the creator dies after
December 31, 2009, and before December 18, 2010.
(3) The disclaimer shall be mailed by first-class mail, or
otherwise delivered, to the creator of the interest, the creator's
legal representative, or the holder of the legal title to the property
to which the interest relates or, if the creator is dead and there is
no legal representative or holder of legal title, to the person having
possession of the property.
(4) If the date of the transfer is the date of the death of the
creator of the interest, a copy of the disclaimer may be filed with the
clerk of the probate court in which the estate of the creator is, or
has been, administered, or, if no probate administration has been
commenced, then with the clerk of the court of any county provided by
law as the place for probate administration of such person, where it
shall be indexed under the name of the decedent in the probate index
upon the payment of a fee established under RCW 36.18.016.
(5) The disclaimer of an interest in real property may be recorded,
but shall constitute notice to all persons only from and after the date
of recording. If recorded, a copy of the disclaimer shall be recorded
in the office of the auditor in the county or counties where the real
property is situated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The provisions of this act are effective
retroactive to December 31, 2009, and apply to estates of decedents
dying after December 31, 2009, and prior to December 18, 2010. Returns
and payments for estate tax imposed under chapter 83.100 RCW will
continue to be due and owing as provided in chapter 83.100 RCW and
nothing in this act is intended to affect the application of that
chapter to any taxpayer.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 This act is remedial in nature and must be
applied and construed liberally in order to carry out its intent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---