BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that district and
municipal courts have jurisdiction to hear and determine traffic
infractions that are violations of state law. To promote highway
safety and uniform traffic laws within this state, the legislature
encourages city, town, and county governments to cite to and use state
law when adjudicating civil and criminal traffic violations. It is not
the legislature's intent to deny any local authority its legislative
power, but rather to enhance safe and efficient movement of traffic
throughout the state by promoting uniform traffic laws.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts, as now
existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed effective June 30,
2012:
(1) RCW 46.90.005 (Purpose) and 1993 c 400 s 1 & 1975 1st ex.s. c
54 s 1; and
(2) RCW 46.90.010 (Adoption of model traffic ordinance -- Amendments)
and 1993 c 400 s 2 & 1975 1st ex.s. c 54 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The department of licensing shall notify
local governments that the department's rules regarding the model
traffic ordinance will be repealed as a result of this act.

--- END ---