BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 2.36.072 and 2009 c 330 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each court shall establish a means to preliminarily determine
by a written or electronic declaration signed under penalty of perjury
by the person summoned, the qualifications set forth in RCW 2.36.070 of
each person summoned for jury duty prior to their appearance at the
court to which they are summoned to serve.
(2) An electronic signature may be used in lieu of a written
signature.
(3) "Electronic signature" means an electric sound, symbol, or
process attached to or logically associated with a document and
executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the document.
(4) Upon receipt by the summoning court of a written declaration
stating that a declarant does not meet the qualifications set forth in
RCW 2.36.070, that declarant shall be excused from appearing in
response to the summons. If a person summoned to appear for jury duty
fails to sign and return a declaration of his or her qualifications to
serve as a juror prior to appearing in response to a summons and is
later determined to be unqualified for one of the reasons set forth in
RCW 2.36.070, that person shall not be entitled to any compensation as
provided in RCW 2.36.150. Information provided to the court for
preliminary determination of statutory qualification for jury duty may
only be used ((for the term such person is summoned and may not be used
for any other purpose, except that)) by the court, or designee, ((may))
to report a change of address or nondelivery of summons of persons
summoned for jury duty to the county auditor, and to create and
maintain the list described in subsection (5) of this section.
(5) The court shall create and maintain a list of names of all
prospective jurors who have been disqualified in accordance with RCW
2.36.070 for the following reasons: (a) Is less than eighteen years of
age; (b) is not a citizen of the United States; (c) is not a resident
of the county in which he or she has been summoned to serve; or (d) has
been convicted of a felony and has not had his or her civil rights
restored. The list shall be open for public inspection, and the court
shall provide to the office of the secretary of state and the
appropriate county election official on a monthly basis the name of any
declarant who does not meet the qualifications set forth in RCW
2.36.070 (1) through (3) and (5).

--- END ---