BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 INTENT. The legislature finds that the
development of a professional motorsports entertainment and family
recreation facility in Washington will serve numerous public purposes
by providing recreational opportunities for Washington citizens and
spurring economic development in the state. Professional motorsports
racing is the fastest growing spectator sport in the nation.
Professional motorsports entertainment facilities in other states have
stimulated economic development by generating spending by out-of-state
visitors, investment, employment, and tax revenues. Economic impact
studies confirm, based on assumptions generally regarded as
conservative, that a Washington professional motorsports entertainment
and family recreation facility would be a significant contributor to
the state economy here as well. Public support for and participation
in the development and operation of a professional motorsports
entertainment and family recreation facility in Washington is in the
public interest and consistent with prior public involvement in the
development and operation of similar facilities.

PART II
DEFINITIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply throughout this act unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Early retirement" means the redemption or defeasance of bonds
or the setting aside of funds for the payment of principal of and
interest on bonds.
(2) "Facility" means a professional motorsports entertainment and
family recreation facility.
(3) "Force majeure event" means natural disasters or other
casualty, including fire, flood, earthquake, windstorm, avalanche,
landslide, mudslide, and other similar events; acts of war or civil
unrest when an emergency has been declared by appropriate governmental
officials; acts of civil or military authority; strike, lockout, or
other labor dispute (not involving the public speedway authority or its
lessee or prospective lessee or any parent, corporate affiliate, or
successor directly as a party in such strike, lockout, or other labor
dispute); embargoes; epidemics; terrorist acts; riots; insurrections;
explosions; and nuclear accidents or other occurrence reasonably beyond
the control of the public speedway authority or its lessee or
prospective lessee.
(4) "Host jurisdiction" means (a) a first class city that has
adopted a resolution setting forth its intention to annex territory
within which the proposed facility is located and to assume
responsibility for the environmental review and permitting of such
proposed facility, or (b) if no such resolution is adopted or if such
proposed annexation is not complete within one year of the effective
date of this section, the general purpose local government within which
the facility is located and that is responsible for the environmental
review and permitting of the facility. A first class city adopting
such a resolution may continue as host jurisdiction for additional six-month periods by adopting resolutions setting forth its intention to
continue annexation proceedings during such six-month periods.
(5) "Lessee" means a corporation that enters into a lease agreement
with a public speedway authority under section 401 of this act and that
is a corporation that, or is a wholly owned subsidiary of a corporation
that, directly or through its subsidiaries or affiliates, owns or
operates at least ten professional motorsports entertainment facilities
in the United States and conducts at least fifty nationally recognized,
top tier professional motorsports events, including at least twenty
NASCAR NEXTEL Cup Events, during the year in which such lease agreement
becomes effective.
(6) "Major motorsports event weekend" means a multiday series of
professional motorsports racing and related events spanning a weekend
anchored by one nationally recognized, top tier professional
motorsports event.
(7) "NASCAR" means the National Association for Stockcar Auto
Racing, Inc. or its designees or assignees.
(8) "Nationally recognized, top tier professional motorsports
event" means a principal event in a sanctioned national or
international touring professional racing series that is broadly
recognized as a leader in its racing discipline and is generally
capable of producing the level of economic activity including, but not
limited to, paid attendance by out-of-state visitors, on which public
support for the development of a facility in Washington is based. As
of the effective date of this section, nationally recognized, top tier
professional motorsports events include, but are not limited to, NASCAR
NEXTEL Cup Series, NASCAR Busch Series, Indy Racing League, NASCAR
Craftsman Truck Series, USAC Silver Crown Series, Grand American Road
Racing Series, Champ Car Series, and Formula One events.
(9) "Professional motorsports entertainment and family recreation
facility" means a multifaceted complex designed to be primarily used as
a venue for nationally recognized, top tier professional motorsports
events, including a closed-course speedway, grandstands and other
seating with capacity for at least eighty-three thousand attendees,
control towers, open space, administration and maintenance buildings,
together with support services and facilities, such as hospitality
facilities, food and beverage sale locations, parking, recreational
vehicle camping, and retail sale locations, for motorsports fans and
participants, and for those using the complex for community,
charitable, recreation, and other activities (such as family recreation
and social events, local and regional business functions, arts events,
emergency services, and public safety training) on a fee or nonfee
basis as appropriate and to the extent that such activities are
consistent with use of the facility for professional motorsports
events.
(10) "Prospective lessee" means an entity that would qualify as a
lessee that has not yet entered into a lease with a public speedway
authority.

PART III
PUBLIC SPEEDWAY AUTHORITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 CREATION. (1) A public speedway authority
may be created to function in an area with a total population of at
least four hundred thousand that is coterminous with the boundaries of
one county or up to three contiguous counties.
(2) A public speedway authority may be created upon the adoption of
a resolution of the legislative body of the host jurisdiction and, if
the authority includes more than one county, the adoption of a
concurring resolution by the legislative body of at least one county
that is within the proposed public speedway authority area and that is
not the host jurisdiction. The approving and, if applicable,
concurring resolutions must identify the one, two, or three-county area
in which the public speedway authority is to function, approve the
creation of a public speedway authority within such area, and appoint
or provide for the appointment of board members as described in section
302(1) of this act.
(3) A public speedway authority is a municipal corporation and
possesses all the usual corporate powers as well as all other powers
that may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by statute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 GOVERNANCE. (1) A public speedway
authority must be governed by a board of directors consisting of seven
members. The governor may appoint two members. If the host
jurisdiction is a county, the legislative body of the host jurisdiction
may appoint three members, and if the host jurisdiction is a city, the
legislative body of the host jurisdiction may appoint two members. The
remaining members must be appointed as set forth in the approving and,
if applicable, concurring resolution adopted pursuant to section 301 of
this act; provided that the approving resolution and concurring
resolution, if any, must permit the appointment of at least one board
member by the legislative body of each county included within the
boundaries of the authority. The board of directors must elect the
chair of the board from among the seven members.
(2) Members of the board of directors serve four-year terms of
office, except that two of the initial board members serve two-year
terms of office and two of the initial board members serve three-year
terms of office. The governor must designate which of the initial
board members serve two-year terms, which serve three-year terms, and
which serve four-year terms.
(3) A vacancy must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment was made except that, if the governor or any legislative
body responsible for appointing a member to a vacant position fails to
make the appointment for a period of ninety days or more, the remaining
members of the board of directors may select an interim member to fill
the position by majority vote of such members. The person appointed by
the governor, a legislative body, or the board to fill a vacancy serves
for the remainder of the unexpired term of the office to which he or
she was appointed.
(4) If a director is appointed by the governor, the governor may
remove the director from office for any or no reason. If a director is
appointed by a legislative body, the legislative body may remove the
director from office for any or no reason. If a director is not
appointed by either the governor or a legislative body, the director
may be removed from office by majority vote of the board.
(5) If a city becomes the host jurisdiction after a county has been
the host jurisdiction, the legislative body of the city must appoint
two members of the board of directors to replace two of the members
appointed by the previous host jurisdiction within thirty days of the
effective date of such change. If a county becomes the host
jurisdiction after a city has been the host jurisdiction, the
legislative body of the county must appoint members of the board of
directors to replace the members appointed by the previous host
jurisdiction within thirty days of the effective date of such change.
Each newly appointed member of the board of directors serves for the
remainder of the unexpired term of office to which he or she was
appointed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303 POWERS AND PURPOSES. (1) A public
speedway authority is authorized to undertake or otherwise provide for
the acquisition of a site for and the financing, permitting, design,
development, construction, reconstruction, remodeling, alteration,
maintenance, equipping, reequipping, repair, and operation of a
professional motorsports entertainment and family recreation facility.
(2) A public speedway authority may exercise all other powers
necessary and appropriate to carry out its responsibilities, including
without limitation the power to sue and be sued, to acquire, own, and
transfer real and personal property and property rights by lease,
sublease, purchase, or sale, and to enter into contracts. An authority
may also sell, lease, convey, or otherwise dispose of any real or
personal property or property rights no longer necessary or desirable
for the conduct of the affairs of the authority.
(3) A public speedway authority may enter into agreements with the
state or any municipal corporation, acting through its legislative
body, for the joint design, financing, acquisition, development,
construction, reconstruction, lease, remodeling, alteration,
maintenance, equipping, reequipping, repair, or operation of a
facility. Such activities are deemed to be a public purpose of the
state or any such municipal corporation. The agreements may provide
that any party to the contract designs, finances, acquires, develops,
constructs, reconstructs, remodels, alters, maintains, equips,
reequips, repairs, or operates the facility for the other party or
parties to the contract. The state and any municipal corporation is
authorized to participate with a public speedway authority in the
financing of all or any part of the facility on any terms as may be
fixed by agreement between the parties, pursuant to a loan, guaranty,
or other financing agreement. The legislative body of any county or
city within which a public speedway authority functions may acquire
property on behalf of, or transfer property to, a public speedway
authority created under this act with or without consideration.
(4) A public speedway authority may contract with a public or
private entity for the acquisition of a site for a facility.
(5) A public speedway authority may accept and expend or use gifts,
grants, and donations and impose or provide for its lessee to impose
charges and fees for the use of the facility.
(6) A public speedway authority may spend funds for the public
purposes of promoting and preparing and distributing advertising and
promotional information about the facility.
(7) A public speedway authority may secure professional or other
services by means of an agreement with any service provider. The
public speedway authority must establish criteria, receive and evaluate
proposals, and negotiate with respondents under requirements set forth
by authority resolution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 304 EXPENSE REIMBURSEMENT PROCEDURES. The
board of directors of a public speedway authority must adopt a
resolution that may be amended from time to time governing methods and
amounts of reimbursement payable to directors, officers, and employees
for travel and other business expenses incurred on behalf of the
authority. The resolution must, among other things, establish
procedures for approving expenses; the form of travel and expense
vouchers; and requirements governing the use of credit cards issued in
the name of the authority. Directors, officers, and employees may be
advanced sufficient sums to cover their anticipated expenses in
accordance with rules adopted by the state auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 305 PER DIEM COMPENSATION. Each member of the
board of directors of a public speedway authority may receive
compensation of fifty dollars per day for attending meetings or
conferences on behalf of the authority, not to exceed three thousand
dollars per year. A director may waive all or a portion of his or her
compensation under this section during his or her term of office, by a
written waiver filed with the public speedway authority. The
compensation provided in this section is in addition to reimbursement
for expenses paid to directors by the public speedway authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 306 LIABILITY INSURANCE. The board of
directors of a public speedway authority may purchase liability
insurance with limits the directors deem reasonable for the purpose of
protecting and holding personally harmless directors, officers, and
employees of the authority against liability arising from their acts or
omissions while performing or in good faith purporting to perform their
official duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 307 DEFENSE AND INDEMNITY. Whenever an
action, claim, or proceeding is instituted against a person who is or
was a director, officer, or employee of a public speedway authority
arising out of the performance of duties for or employment with the
authority, the public speedway authority may grant a request by the
person that the attorney of the authority's choosing be authorized to
defend the claim, suit, or proceeding, and the costs of defense,
attorneys' fees, and obligation for payments arising from the action
may be paid from the authority's funds. Costs of defense, judgment, or
settlement against the person may not be paid in a case where the court
has found that the person was not acting in good faith within the scope
of employment with or duties for the public speedway authority. A
director or officer of a public speedway authority is not personally
liable for acts done or omitted in good faith while performing duties
as director or officer on behalf of the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 308 EMPLOYEES, SALARIES, AND BENEFITS. A
public speedway authority has the authority to create and fill
positions, fix reasonable wages and salaries, pay costs involved in
hiring employees, and establish reasonable benefits for employees,
including holiday pay, vacations or vacation pay, retirement benefits,
and medical, life, accident, or health disability insurance, as
approved by the board. Public speedway authority board members, at
their own expense, may be included under any authority policy for
medical, life, accident, or health disability insurance. Insurance for
employees and board members is not considered compensation. Coverage
for the board under any authority policy is not to exceed that provided
public speedway authority employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 309 TREASURER. The treasurer of the host
jurisdiction is the ex officio treasurer of the authority.

PART IV
PUBLIC FUNDING AND FACILITY FINANCING
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
SALES TAX--CREDIT AGAINST STATE SALES TAX. (1) Beginning January
1, 2015, the board of directors of a public speedway authority that has
entered into a lease agreement with a lessee under section 601 of this
act may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with this chapter.
The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and must be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the authority's area. The rate of tax may not exceed 0.016
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the
article or service used in the case of a use tax.
(2) The department of revenue must deduct the proceeds of the tax
imposed under subsection (1) of this section from the amount of tax
otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of
revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW and must remit the proceeds of
the tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section to the public
speedway authority. The department of revenue must collect and remit
the proceeds of such taxes on behalf of the authority at no cost to the
authority.
(3) The tax imposed pursuant to this section expires when all bonds
issued to finance or refinance costs of the acquisition, permitting,
design, development, construction, or equipping of the facility have
been retired, whether upon maturity or by early retirement, and all
amounts due to any financial institutions, insurance companies, or
other public or private entities providing credit enhancement to the
bonds have been paid, or twenty-five years after the tax under this
section is first imposed, whichever occurs first.
(4) The tax collected under this section must be used exclusively
to pay costs of the acquisition, permitting, design, development,
construction, or equipping of the facility, including paying debt
service on bonds issued to finance or refinance such costs, paying
amounts due to any financial institutions, insurance companies, or
other public or private entities providing credit enhancement and
paying other costs of issuance, and to fund reasonable debt service
reserves. Any excess taxes must be applied to provide for the early
retirement of any bonds issued by the public speedway authority.
(5) This section constitutes the entire state contribution for a
professional motorsports entertainment and family recreation facility,
as defined in section 101 of this act. The state will not make any
additional contributions based on revised cost or revenue estimates,
cost overruns, unforeseen circumstances, or any other reason.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 402 PUBLIC SPEEDWAY AUTHORITY ADMISSIONS TAX.
(1) A public speedway authority that has entered into a lease agreement
with a lessee under section 601 of this act may impose a tax of not
more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof on the amount of
the admissions charge paid by any person who pays for admission to be
a motorsports event spectator at a professional motorsports
entertainment and family recreation facility, including charges for
season or subscription tickets, but not including ticket handling fees,
seat license charges, and charges for admissions to ancillary
facilities such as hospitality venues. "Seat license" means a
transferable license sold to a third party that, subject to certain
conditions, restrictions, and limitations, entitles the third party to
purchase a season or subscription ticket to professional motorsports
events at a facility. Persons who are admitted to the facility by the
lessee free of charge are exempt from payment of the admissions tax.
(2) An authority may apply the proceeds of the tax as provided in
the host jurisdiction agreement to pay costs of the acquisition,
permitting, design, development, construction, or equipping of the
facility, including paying debt service on or providing for the early
retirement of bonds issued to finance or refinance these costs, paying
for credit enhancement and other costs of issuance, and funding
reasonable debt service or capital reserves, and for payments to the
host jurisdiction for use by the host jurisdiction for any public
purpose. After all costs of the initial acquisition, permitting,
design, development, construction, and equipping of a facility have
been paid and all bonds issued to finance or refinance these costs and
paid from the admissions tax have been retired, whether upon maturity
or by early retirement, the proceeds of the tax first may be used to
pay debt service on any other authority bonds issued to finance or
refinance these costs and to pay amounts due in connection with credit
enhancement for such authority bonds, and, second, must be paid to the
host jurisdiction for use by the host jurisdiction for any public
purpose.
(3) No county, city, town, or special purpose district, other than
the public speedway authority within which the facility is located, may
impose a tax of the same or similar kind on any admission or comparable
charge at the facility so long as a tax is imposed by the public
speedway authority under this section. After all costs of the initial
acquisition, permitting, design, development, construction, and
equipping of the facility and any public infrastructure funded from the
proceeds of the admissions tax have been paid, all authority bonds and
refunding bonds have been retired, whether upon maturity or by early
retirement, and all amounts due in connection with credit enhancement
of authority bonds have been paid, the rate of the admissions tax
imposed by the authority under this section may not exceed the rate of
any admissions tax then imposed by the host jurisdiction within its
boundaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403 BONDS. (1) To carry out the purposes of
this act, the board of directors of a public speedway authority may
authorize the issuance of bonds of the authority in one or more series
to which it may pledge: (a) The sales tax authorized in section 401 of
this act; (b) the admissions tax authorized in section 402 of this act;
(c) revenues derived from the lease of the facility; and (d) any other
amounts derived from any other source and available for the payment of
debt service on the bonds.
(2) The proceeds of bonds issued under this section may be applied
to finance or refinance the acquisition, permitting, design,
development, construction, or equipping of the facility, including
payments for costs of credit enhancement and other costs of issuance,
establishment of reasonable reserves, and capitalizing interest on
bonds during and up to eighteen months following completion of
construction of the facility. A public speedway authority may issue
additional bonds to pay costs of reconstruction, remodeling,
alteration, maintenance, reequipping, and repair of a facility payable
from and secured by a pledge of revenues derived from the lease of the
facility or any other amounts derived from any other source that are
available for the payment of debt service on the bonds.
(3) A public speedway authority may create funds and accounts for
the deposit of pledged taxes, revenues and other amounts, and for the
deposit of bond proceeds as it deems necessary or prudent to issue,
secure, and administer the bonds, and may appoint one or more trustees
to hold and apply these funds and accounts.
(4) The bonds of a public speedway authority must bear such date or
dates, mature at such time or times, be in such denominations, be in
such form, be registered or registrable in such manner, be made
transferable, exchangeable, and interchangeable, be payable in such
medium of payment, at such place or places, be subject to such terms of
redemption, bear such fixed or variable rate or rates of interest, be
payable at such time or times, and be sold in such manner and at such
price or prices, as the public speedway authority determines. The
bonds must be executed by the chair of the public speedway authority,
by either its duly elected secretary or its treasurer, and by the
trustee or paying agent if the public speedway authority determines to
use a trustee or paying agent for the bonds. Execution of the bonds
may be by manual or facsimile signature. The term of authority bonds
may not exceed thirty years.
(5) The bonds of a public speedway authority are subject to any
terms, conditions, covenants, and protective provisions found necessary
or desirable by the authority, including without limitation the setting
aside of reserves, limitations on additional forms of indebtedness, and
other provisions the public speedway authority finds necessary or
desirable for the security of bondholders. Damages received by the
public speedway authority resulting from its lessee's default on its
obligation under section 601(6) of this act must be applied to pay or
provide for the early retirement of bonds issued pursuant to this
section. If any lease required under section 601 of this act is
terminated while the sales and use tax credit authorized under section
401 of this act is in effect, the public speedway authority must apply
the proceeds of (a) any subsequent lease, net of reasonable
administrative or operating expenses of the authority and costs of
capital improvements required of the authority under such substitute
lease, including debt service on bonds issued for such capital
improvements, or (b) the sale of public speedway authority property for
a use other than for a facility to pay or provide for the early
retirement of bonds issued pursuant to this section, consistent with
any applicable requirements of the federal tax code.
(6) Any pledge of taxes, revenue, or other amount by the authority
under subsection (1) or (11) of this section is valid and binding at
the time the pledge is made. The authority constitutes a governmental
unit within the meaning of RCW 62A.9A-102(a)(45).
(7) When issuing bonds, a public speedway authority may provide for
the future issuance of additional bonds or debt consistent with
subsection (1) of this section on a parity with or subordinate to
outstanding bonds and the terms and conditions of their issuance.
Consistent with subsection (1) of this section, a public speedway
authority may refund or advance refund any bond of the public speedway
authority in accordance with chapter 39.53 RCW.
(8) The board members of a public speedway authority and any person
executing the bonds are not liable personally on the indebtedness or
subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of their
issuance.
(9) The public speedway authority may, out of any available funds,
purchase its bonds for cancellation or retirement.
(10) The public speedway authority is authorized to enter into
contracts with financial institutions, insurance companies, and other
public and private entities to provide credit enhancement for its bonds
if the public speedway authority determines that credit enhancement is
cost-effective. Each city or county within the area boundaries of the
public speedway authority is authorized, acting through its legislative
body, to enter into a contract with the public speedway authority, with
or without consideration and as the parties may mutually agree upon, to
provide credit enhancement to facilitate the sale of public speedway
authority bonds.
(11) The financing of a facility owned by a public speedway
authority is deemed to be a public purpose for each city or county
within the area boundaries of the public speedway authority, and such
city or county, acting through its legislative body, is authorized to
issue bonds or otherwise contract indebtedness and make the proceeds of
bonds and indebtedness available to the public speedway authority for
its purposes upon the terms and conditions that the county or city and
the public speedway authority may mutually agree upon. The public
speedway authority may pledge the taxes, revenues, or other amounts
described in subsection (1) of this section to pay and secure bonds and
indebtedness of any such city or county.
(12) Except as specifically provided in this section, the bonds
must be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.
(13) The provisions of this section and any resolution or trust
indenture of the public speedway authority providing for the
authorization, issuance, and sale of bonds constitute a contract with
the owners of such bonds, and the provisions thereof are enforceable by
any owner of such bonds by mandamus or any appropriate suit, action, or
proceeding at law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction.
(14) The net proceeds of bonds issued to finance the acquisition,
financing, permitting, design, development, construction, and equipping
of the facility and payable from the sales tax imposed under section
401 of this act may not exceed one hundred forty-five million dollars,
adjusted for inflation annually beginning in 2012 using the Engineering
News-Record 20-city construction cost index. For the purposes of this
limitation "net proceeds" means gross bond proceeds less costs of
credit enhancement and other costs of issuance and less any deposits to
fund reasonable debt service reserves for the bonds and does not
include earnings on any portion of gross bond proceeds.

Sec. 404 RCW 36.38.010 and 1999 c 165 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Any county may by ordinance enacted by its county legislative
authority, levy and fix a tax of not more than one cent on twenty cents
or fraction thereof to be paid for county purposes by persons who pay
an admission charge to any place, including a tax on persons who are
admitted free of charge or at reduced rates to any place for which
other persons pay a charge or a regular higher charge for the same or
similar privileges or accommodations; and require that one who receives
any admission charge to any place ((shall)) must collect and remit the
tax to the county treasurer of the county((: PROVIDED,)). No county
((shall)) may impose ((such)) the tax on persons paying an admission to
any activity of any elementary or secondary school ((or)), any public
facility of a public facility district under chapter 35.57 or 36.100
RCW for which a tax is imposed under RCW 35.57.100 or 36.100.210, or
any professional motorsports entertainment and family recreation
facility for which a tax is imposed under section 402 of this act.
(2) As used in this chapter, the term "admission charge" includes
a charge made for season tickets or subscriptions, a cover charge, or
a charge made for use of seats and tables, reserved or otherwise, and
other similar accommodations; a charge made for food and refreshments
in any place where any free entertainment, recreation, or amusement is
provided; a charge made for rental or use of equipment or facilities
for purpose of recreation or amusement, and where the rental of the
equipment or facilities is necessary to the enjoyment of a privilege
for which a general admission is charged, the combined charges
((shall)) must be considered as the admission charge. It ((shall))
also includes any automobile parking charge where the amount of such
charge is determined according to the number of passengers in any
automobile.
(3) Subject to subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the tax
herein authorized ((shall)) is not ((be)) exclusive and ((shall)) does
not prevent any city or town within the taxing county, when authorized
by law, from imposing within its corporate limits a tax of the same or
similar kind((: PROVIDED, That whenever)). If the same or similar
kind of tax is imposed by any such city or town, no such tax ((shall))
may be levied within the corporate limits of such city or town by the
county.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the legislative
authority of a county with a population of one million or more may
exclusively levy taxes on events in baseball stadiums constructed on or
after January 1, 1995, that are owned by a public facilities district
under chapter 36.100 RCW and that have seating capacities over forty
thousand at the rates of:
(a) Not more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof, to
be used for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by a county to construct a baseball stadium as defined
in RCW 82.14.0485. If the revenue from the tax exceeds the amount
needed for that purpose, the excess ((shall)) must be placed in a
contingency fund which may only be used to pay unanticipated capital
costs on the baseball stadium, excluding any cost overruns on initial
construction; and
(b) Not more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof, to
be used for the purpose of paying the principal and interest payments
on bonds issued by a county to construct a baseball stadium as defined
in RCW 82.14.0485. The tax imposed under this subsection (4)(b)
((shall)) expires when the bonds issued for the construction of the
baseball stadium are retired, but not later than twenty years after the
tax is first collected.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the legislative
authority of a county that has created a public stadium authority to
develop a stadium and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.050 may levy
and fix a tax on charges for admission to events in a stadium and
exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, constructed in the
county on or after January 1, 1998, that is owned by a public stadium
authority under chapter 36.102 RCW. The tax ((shall be)) is exclusive
and ((shall)) precludes the city or town within which the stadium and
exhibition center is located from imposing a tax of the same or similar
kind on charges for admission to events in the stadium and exhibition
center, and ((shall)) precludes the imposition of a general county
admissions tax on charges for admission to events in the stadium and
exhibition center. For the purposes of this subsection, "charges for
admission to events" means only the actual admission charge, exclusive
of taxes and service charges and the value of any other benefit
conferred by the admission. The tax authorized under this subsection
((shall)) must be at the rate of not more than one cent on ten cents or
fraction thereof. Revenues collected under this subsection ((shall))
must be deposited in the stadium and exhibition center account under
RCW 43.99N.060 until the bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 for the
construction of the stadium and exhibition center are retired. After
the bonds issued for the construction of the stadium and exhibition
center are retired, the tax authorized under this section ((shall))
must be used exclusively to fund repair, reequipping, and capital
improvement of the stadium and exhibition center. The tax under this
subsection may be levied upon the first use of any part of the stadium
and exhibition center but ((shall)) may not be collected at any
facility already in operation as of July 17, 1997.

Sec. 405 RCW 35.21.280 and 2002 c 363 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every city and town may levy and fix a tax of not more than one
cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof to be paid by the person who
pays an admission charge to any place with the following limitations:
((PROVIDED,))
(a) No city or town ((shall)) may impose such tax on persons paying
an admission to any activity of any elementary or secondary school or
any public facility of a public facility district under chapter 35.57
or 36.100 RCW for which a tax is imposed under RCW 35.57.100 or
36.100.210, except the city or town may impose a tax on persons paying
an admission to any activity of such public facility if the city or
town uses the admission tax revenue it collects on the admission
charges to that public facility for the construction, operation,
maintenance, repair, replacement, or enhancement of that public
facility or to develop, support, operate, or enhance programs in that
public facility; and
(b) No city or town may impose such a tax upon any admission to a
professional motorsports entertainment and family recreation facility.
(2) Tax authorization under this section includes a tax on persons
who are admitted free of charge or at reduced rates to any place for
which other persons pay a charge or a regular higher charge for the
same privileges or accommodations. A city that is located in a county
with a population of one million or more may not levy a tax on events
in stadia constructed on or after January 1, 1995, that are owned by a
public facilities district under chapter 36.100 RCW and that have
seating capacities over forty thousand. The city or town may require
anyone who receives payment for an admission charge to collect and
remit the tax to the city or town.
(3) The term "admission charge" includes:
(a) A charge made for season tickets or subscriptions;
(b) A cover charge, or a charge made for use of seats and tables
reserved or otherwise, and other similar accommodations;
(c) A charge made for food and refreshment in any place where free
entertainment, recreation or amusement is provided;
(d) A charge made for rental or use of equipment or facilities for
purposes of recreation or amusement; if the rental of the equipment or
facilities is necessary to the enjoyment of a privilege for which a
general admission is charged, the combined charges ((shall)) must be
considered as the admission charge;
(e) Automobile parking charges if the amount of the charge is
determined according to the number of passengers in the automobile.

PART V
DEVELOPMENT OF FACILITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 HOST JURISDICTION AGREEMENT. Prior to the
construction of any professional motorsports entertainment and family
recreation facility by or on behalf of a public speedway authority, the
public speedway authority, its lessee or prospective lessee, and the
host jurisdiction, acting through its legislative body, must have first
entered into a legally binding and enforceable host jurisdiction
agreement addressing matters appropriately of mutual interest
concerning the development and operation of the facility. The
agreement must include without limitation the following terms:
(1) The authority or the lessee, or prospective lessee, assumes
financial responsibility or otherwise provides for the construction of
such public infrastructure improvements off-site and on-site that are
necessary for the efficient operation of the facility as identified
through environmental review of the proposed facility, required as
conditions to its permitting, and only to the extent such improvements
are incremental to the public infrastructure required to serve other
nearby development as described in a host jurisdiction comprehensive
plan, if applicable. This obligation may be satisfied through payments
made to or on behalf of the host jurisdiction or from tax revenues
generated by the facility directed to such host jurisdiction;
(2) Confirmation that the lease between the authority and the
lessee, or prospective lessee, must require and provide for reasonable
public access to and use of the facility for community, charitable,
recreation, and other activities, such as family recreation and social
events, local and regional business functions, arts events, emergency
services, and public safety training, on a fee or nonfee basis as
appropriate and to the extent that such activities are consistent with
use of the facility for professional motorsports events; and
(3) Confirmation that the authority or the lessee, or prospective
lessee, must assume financial responsibility for the additional
incremental cost of public services required to operate the facility
during major motorsports event weekends as identified through
environmental review of the proposed facility and required as
conditions to its permitting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 FACILITY DEVELOPMENT. (1) A public
speedway authority may, in consultation with its lessee or prospective
lessee, determine the overall scope and components of any professional
motorsports entertainment and family recreation facility owned or to be
owned by the authority, approve the final design and specifications of
the facility acceptable to the lessee for operation as a professional
motorsports venue for hosting nationally recognized, top tier
professional motorsports events, and approve the final budget for
financing, permitting, design, development, construction, and equipping
of the facility.
(2) A public speedway authority must enter into a development
agreement with a lessee or prospective lessee under which the lessee or
prospective lessee undertakes and controls the development of the
facility to be owned by the authority, consistent with subsection (1)
of this section. Under the development agreement, the lessee must,
subject to the approval of the public speedway authority, determine
project design, specifications, and the budget. In addition, the
lessee must determine procurement procedures, select and contract with
an architect or architects, other professional service providers, or a
contractor or contractors for the design, construction, operation, or
maintenance of the facility and determine whether to enter into a
project labor agreement related to construction of the facility.
However, any contracts for the construction, operation, and maintenance
of a facility is subject to the prevailing wage requirements of chapter
39.12 RCW and the goals established by the state for women's and
minority business participation consistent with the provisions of RCW
39.04.160 and 49.60.400. Contractors are required, to the extent
feasible, to both hire local residents in connection with the
development of the facility and utilize apprentices enrolled in a
state-approved apprenticeship training program, consistent with the
goals established for state public works projects in RCW 39.04.320.
(3) Under the development agreement, the lessee or prospective
lessee must agree to provide at least one hundred eighty million
dollars toward the cost of the acquisition, financing, permitting,
design, development, construction, or equipping of the facility. The
lessee must assume responsibility for any construction cost overruns in
completing the project consistent with the final design and budget
approved by the public speedway authority.
(4) The development agreement must provide for parity in the
expenditure of public speedway authority bond proceeds and lessee or
prospective lessee funding after the public speedway authority is
authorized to issue its bonds and expend funds upon and following
satisfaction of the requirements of sections 501 and 504 of this act.
The lessee or prospective lessee is responsible for advancing funds
needed to satisfy the requirements of sections 501 and 504 of this act
until public speedway authority bonds can be issued and bond proceeds
become available.
(5) The development agreement must require the lessee or
prospective lessee to obtain performance and payment bonds from any
contractors it contracts with to perform construction of the facility.
The performance and payment bonds must be consistent, in form and
amount, with the requirements of chapter 39.08 RCW.
(6) The development agreement must require the lessee or
prospective lessee to commit to support one or more land conservation
projects located within the area of the public speedway authority,
subject to development and construction of the facility as provided in
this act. Such project or projects must be undertaken in addition to
any offsite mitigation projects or activities that may be required of
the lessee or prospective lessee as a condition of permitting the
facility. The total value of the lessee's or prospective lessee's
support of such a conservation project or projects may be not less than
one million dollars total, which may be provided over three years
following approval by the host jurisdiction of all land use permitting
decisions necessary for development of the facility as provided in this
act. The lessee or prospective lessee may work with a nonprofit land
trust or other conservation organization to identify and implement
projects to which support can be directed in satisfaction of the
requirements of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 SALES TAX DEFERRAL. (1) The public
speedway authority may apply for deferral of taxes on the design and
construction of buildings, site preparation, and the acquisition of
related tangible personal property and retail services for a facility
including, but not limited to, parking lots, parking garages,
landscaping, environmental or other mitigation work required as part of
any federal, state, county, city, or other governmental regulatory
approval process, utility relocation, sidewalks, storm water systems,
transit improvements, roads, or other investments made: Either at the
facility or off-site and regardless if owned by the authority or
dedicated to a public body. Application must be made to the department
of revenue in a form and manner prescribed by the department of
revenue. The application must contain information regarding the
location of the facility, estimated or actual costs, time schedules for
completion and operation, and other information required by the
department of revenue. The department of revenue must approve the
application within sixty days if it meets the requirements of this
section.
(2) The department of revenue must issue a sales and use tax
deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due under
chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW for the activities described in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The public speedway authority must begin paying the deferred
taxes in the fifth year after the date certified by the department of
revenue as the date on which the facility is operationally complete.
The first payment is due on December 31st of the fifth calendar year
after such certified date, with subsequent annual payments due on
December 31st of the following nine years. Each payment must equal ten
percent of the deferred tax.
(4) The department of revenue may authorize an accelerated
repayment schedule upon request of the public speedway authority.
(5) Interest and penalties may not be charged on any taxes deferred
under this section for the period of deferral, although all other
penalties and interest applicable to delinquent excise taxes may be
assessed and imposed for delinquent payments under this section. The
debt for deferred taxes is not extinguished by insolvency or other
failure of the public speedway authority.
(6) Applications and any other information received by the
department of revenue under this section are not confidential and are
subject to disclosure. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration
of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 504 PERMITTING. (1) The lessee and the
legislative bodies of the public speedway authority and the host
jurisdiction must negotiate terms acceptable to each party to address:
(a) A schedule for efficient, timely, and reliable permit
processing for the facility, to reflect statutory and regulatory
permitting time frames and local government best practices;
(b) A schedule for efficient, timely, and reliable environmental
review processing for the facility, to reflect statutory and regulatory
permitting time frames and local government best practices;
(c) A schedule for efficient, timely, and reliable processing of
requests for street, right-of-way, or easement vacations necessary for
the construction of the facility, to reflect statutory and regulatory
permitting time frames and local government best practices; and
(d) Other items deemed appropriate by the lessee and the
legislative bodies of the authority and the host jurisdiction for an
efficient permitting, environmental review, and regulatory approval
process and timely construction of the facility, including use of
parallel review processes, early coordination and timely comment on
preapplication matters, consolidated hearings, and identification of a
lead representative for permit preparation and environmental review for
each party.
(2) The agreements required by subsection (1) of this section must
address host jurisdiction permitting and review processes and not
federal permitting or review processes. State agencies with expertise
and jurisdiction may also enter into such agreements to the extent
necessary to assure timely, efficient, and reliable permitting.
(3) The proceeds of any public speedway authority bonds issued to
finance costs of acquisition, permitting, design, development,
construction, or equipping of the facility may not be expended until
any host jurisdiction that requires master plan approval for the
proposed facility approves a master plan for the facility or,
alternatively, when the proposed facility site is annexed into any city
that is a host jurisdiction in which a professional motorsports
entertainment and family recreation facility is a permitted use.
(4) All land use permitting decisions for a professional
motorsports entertainment and family recreation facility must be made
by the host jurisdiction.
(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to reduce the
responsibility or ability of the host jurisdiction or state agencies
with jurisdiction to carry out such permitting, review, and regulatory
approval processes in compliance with applicable law and regulations;
the purpose of any agreements entered into pursuant to this section
specifying schedules for permitting, environmental review, and
regulatory approval is to facilitate construction of a large capital
facility project in a timely manner and avoid the inflationary costs
associated with undue delay.

Sec. 505 RCW 36.70A.110 and 2010 c 211 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
URBAN SERVICES TO THE FACILITY. (1) Each county that is required
or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 ((shall)) must designate an
urban growth area or areas within which urban growth ((shall)) must be
encouraged and outside of which growth can occur only if it is not
urban in nature. Each city that is located in such a county ((shall))
must be included within an urban growth area. An urban growth area may
include more than a single city. An urban growth area may include
territory that is located outside of a city only if such territory
already is characterized by urban growth whether or not the urban
growth area includes a city, or is adjacent to territory already
characterized by urban growth, or is a designated new fully contained
community as defined by RCW 36.70A.350.
(2)(a) Based upon the growth management population projection made
for the county by the office of financial management, the county and
each city within the county ((shall)) must include areas and densities
sufficient to permit the urban growth that is projected to occur in the
county or city for the succeeding twenty-year period, except for those
urban growth areas contained totally within a national historical
reserve. As part of this planning process, each city within the county
must include areas sufficient to accommodate the broad range of needs
and uses that will accompany the projected urban growth including, as
appropriate, medical, governmental, institutional, commercial, service,
retail, and other nonresidential uses.
(b) Each urban growth area ((shall)) must permit urban densities
and ((shall)) include greenbelt and open space areas. In the case of
urban growth areas contained totally within a national historical
reserve, the city may restrict densities, intensities, and forms of
urban growth as determined to be necessary and appropriate to protect
the physical, cultural, or historic integrity of the reserve. An urban
growth area determination may include a reasonable land market supply
factor and ((shall)) must permit a range of urban densities and uses.
In determining this market factor, cities and counties may consider
local circumstances. Cities and counties have discretion in their
comprehensive plans to make many choices about accommodating growth.
(c) Within one year of July 1, 1990, each county that as of June 1,
1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, ((shall))
must begin consulting with each city located within its boundaries and
each city ((shall)) must propose the location of an urban growth area.
Within sixty days of the date the county legislative authority of a
county adopts its resolution of intention or of certification by the
office of financial management, all other counties that are required or
choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 ((shall)) must begin this
consultation with each city located within its boundaries. The county
((shall)) must attempt to reach agreement with each city on the
location of an urban growth area within which the city is located. If
such an agreement is not reached with each city located within the
urban growth area, the county ((shall)) must justify in writing why it
so designated the area an urban growth area. A city may object
formally with the department over the designation of the urban growth
area within which it is located. Where appropriate, the department
((shall)) must attempt to resolve the conflicts, including the use of
mediation services.
(3) Urban growth should be located first in areas already
characterized by urban growth that have adequate existing public
facility and service capacities to serve such development, second in
areas already characterized by urban growth that will be served
adequately by a combination of both existing public facilities and
services and any additional needed public facilities and services that
are provided by either public or private sources, and third in the
remaining portions of the urban growth areas. Urban growth may also be
located in designated new fully contained communities as defined by RCW
36.70A.350.
(4) In general, cities are the units of local government most
appropriate to provide urban governmental services. In general, it is
not appropriate that urban governmental services be extended to or
expanded in rural areas except in those limited circumstances shown to
be necessary to protect basic public health and safety and the
environment and when such services are financially supportable at rural
densities and do not permit urban development. The extension of urban
governmental services including, without limitation, storm and sanitary
sewer services, to a facility owned or operated by a public speedway
authority and with capacity for not fewer than eighty-three thousand
people is necessary to protect basic public health and safety and the
environment, provided it is located at least partially within an urban
growth area.
(5) On or before October 1, 1993, each county that was initially
required to plan under RCW 36.70A.040(1) ((shall)) must adopt
development regulations designating interim urban growth areas under
this chapter. Within three years and three months of the date the
county legislative authority of a county adopts its resolution of
intention or of certification by the office of financial management,
all other counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 ((shall)) must adopt development regulations designating
interim urban growth areas under this chapter. Adoption of the interim
urban growth areas may only occur after public notice; public hearing;
and compliance with the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C
RCW, and under this section. Such action may be appealed to the growth
management hearings board under RCW 36.70A.280. Final urban growth
areas ((shall)) must be adopted at the time of comprehensive plan
adoption under this chapter.
(6) Each county ((shall)) must include designations of urban growth
areas in its comprehensive plan.
(7) An urban growth area designated in accordance with this section
may include within its boundaries urban service areas or potential
annexation areas designated for specific cities or towns within the
county.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the expansion
of an urban growth area is prohibited into the one hundred year
floodplain of any river or river segment that: (i) Is located west of
the crest of the Cascade mountains; and (ii) has a mean annual flow of
one thousand or more cubic feet per second as determined by the
department of ecology.
(b) Subsection (8)(a) of this section does not apply to:
(i) Urban growth areas that are fully contained within a floodplain
and lack adjacent buildable areas outside the floodplain;
(ii) Urban growth areas where expansions are precluded outside
floodplains because:
(A) Urban governmental services cannot be physically provided to
serve areas outside the floodplain; or
(B) Expansions outside the floodplain would require a river or
estuary crossing to access the expansion; or
(iii) Urban growth area expansions where:
(A) Public facilities already exist within the floodplain and the
expansion of an existing public facility is only possible on the land
to be included in the urban growth area and located within the
floodplain; or
(B) Urban development already exists within a floodplain as of July
26, 2009, and is adjacent to, but outside of, the urban growth area,
and the expansion of the urban growth area is necessary to include such
urban development within the urban growth area; or
(C) The land is owned by a jurisdiction planning under this chapter
or the rights to the development of the land have been permanently
extinguished, and the following criteria are met:
(I) The permissible use of the land is limited to one of the
following: Outdoor recreation; environmentally beneficial projects,
including but not limited to habitat enhancement or environmental
restoration; storm water facilities; flood control facilities; or
underground conveyances; and
(II) The development and use of such facilities or projects will
not decrease flood storage, increase storm water runoff, discharge
pollutants to fresh or salt waters during normal operations or floods,
or increase hazards to people and property.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (8), "one hundred year
floodplain" means the same as "special flood hazard area" as set forth
in WAC 173-158-040 as it exists on July 26, 2009.

Sec. 506 RCW 70.107.080 and 1974 ex.s. c 183 s 8 are each amended
to read as follows:
NOISE. (1) The department ((shall)) must, in the exercise of rule-making power under this chapter, provide exemptions or specially
limited regulations relating to recreational shooting and emergency or
law enforcement equipment where appropriate in the interests of public
safety.
(2) Sounds originating from any professional motorsports
entertainment and family recreation facility is exempt from rules
adopted pursuant to this chapter to the same extent as at existing
motor vehicle racing event facilities, and the department must prepare,
publish, and approve rules to this effect within one hundred eighty
days of the effective date of this section. Nothing in this subsection
may be deemed to exempt sounds originating from any professional
motorsports entertainment and family recreation facility from review
under chapter 43.21C RCW or from any requirements imposed for the
purpose of mitigating impacts under RCW 43.21C.060.
(3) The department, in the development of rules under this chapter,
((shall)) must consult and take into consideration the land use
policies and programs of local government.

Sec. 507 RCW 39.04.010 and 2008 c 130 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
PUBLIC WORKS PROVISIONS. The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Award" means the formal decision by the state or municipality
notifying a responsible bidder with the lowest responsive bid of the
state's or municipality's acceptance of the bid and intent to enter
into a contract with the bidder.
(2) "Contract" means a contract in writing for the execution of
public work for a fixed or determinable amount duly awarded after
advertisement and competitive bid, or a contract awarded under the
small works roster process in RCW 39.04.155.
(3) "Municipality" means every city, county, town, port district,
district, or other public agency authorized by law to require the
execution of public work, except drainage districts, diking districts,
diking and drainage improvement districts, drainage improvement
districts, diking improvement districts, consolidated diking and
drainage improvement districts, consolidated drainage improvement
districts, consolidated diking improvement districts, irrigation
districts, or other districts authorized by law for the reclamation or
development of waste or undeveloped lands.
(4) "Public work" means all work, construction, alteration, repair,
or improvement other than ordinary maintenance, executed at the cost of
the state or of any municipality, or which is by law a lien or charge
on any property therein. All public works, including maintenance when
performed by contract ((shall)) must comply with chapter 39.12 RCW.
"Public work" does not include work, construction, alteration, repair,
or improvement performed under contracts entered into under RCW
36.102.060(4) or under development agreements entered into under RCW
36.102.060(7) or leases entered into under RCW 36.102.060(8). The term
does not include work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement
of a professional motorsports entertainment and family recreation
facility performed under a development agreement authorized pursuant to
section 502(2) of this act or lease authorized pursuant to section 601
of this act or services procured by the lessee or prospective lessee in
connection with any such work, construction, alteration, repair, or
improvement.
(5) "Responsible bidder" means a contractor who meets the criteria
in RCW 39.04.350.
(6) "State" means the state of Washington and all departments,
supervisors, commissioners, and agencies of the state.

Sec. 508 RCW 84.33.140 and 2009 c 354 s 2, 2009 c 255 s 3, and
2009 c 246 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
EXEMPTION FROM FOREST LAND COMPENSATION TAX. (1) When land has
been designated as forest land under RCW 84.33.130, a notation of the
designation ((shall)) must be made each year upon the assessment and
tax rolls. A copy of the notice of approval together with the legal
description or assessor's parcel numbers for the land ((shall)) must,
at the expense of the applicant, be filed by the assessor in the same
manner as deeds are recorded.
(2) In preparing the assessment roll as of January 1, 2002, for
taxes payable in 2003 and each January 1st thereafter, the assessor
((shall)) must list each parcel of designated forest land at a value
with respect to the grade and class provided in this subsection and
adjusted as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The assessor
((shall)) must compute the assessed value of the land using the same
assessment ratio applied generally in computing the assessed value of
other property in the county. Values for the several grades of bare
forest land ((shall be)) are as follows:

LAND
GRADE OPERABILITY
CLASS VALUES
PER ACRE

1 $234

1 2 229

3 217

4 157

1 198

2 2 190

3 183

4 132

1 154

3 2 149

3 148

4 113

1 117

4 2 114

3 113

4 86

1 85

5 2 78

3 77

4 52

1 43

6 2 39

3 39

4 37

1 21

7 2 21

3 20

4 20

8 1

(3) On or before December 31, 2001, the department ((shall)) must
adjust by rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, the forest land values
contained in subsection (2) of this section in accordance with this
subsection, and ((shall)) must certify the adjusted values to the
assessor who will use these values in preparing the assessment roll as
of January 1, 2002. For the adjustment to be made on or before
December 31, 2001, for use in the 2002 assessment year, the department
((shall)) must:
(a) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1996, and June 30, 2001, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(b) Divide the aggregate value of all timber harvested within the
state between July 1, 1995, and June 30, 2000, by the aggregate harvest
volume for the same period, as determined from the harvester excise tax
returns filed with the department under RCW 84.33.074; and
(c) Adjust the forest land values contained in subsection (2) of
this section by a percentage equal to one-half of the percentage change
in the average values of harvested timber reflected by comparing the
resultant values calculated under (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(4) For the adjustments to be made on or before December 31, 2002,
and each succeeding year thereafter, the same procedure described in
subsection (3) of this section ((shall)) must be followed using
harvester excise tax returns filed under RCW 84.33.074. However, this
adjustment ((shall)) must be made to the prior year's adjusted value,
and the five-year periods for calculating average harvested timber
values ((shall)) must be successively one year more recent.
(5) Land graded, assessed, and valued as forest land ((shall)) must
continue to be so graded, assessed, and valued until removal of
designation by the assessor upon the occurrence of any of the
following:
(a) Receipt of notice from the owner to remove the designation;
(b) Sale or transfer to an ownership making the land exempt from ad
valorem taxation;
(c) Sale or transfer of all or a portion of the land to a new
owner, unless the new owner has signed a notice of forest land
designation continuance, except transfer to an owner who is an heir or
devisee of a deceased owner, ((shall)) does not, by itself, result in
removal of designation. The signed notice of continuance ((shall))
must be attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit provided for
in RCW 82.45.150. The notice of continuance ((shall)) must be on a
form prepared by the department. If the notice of continuance is not
signed by the new owner and attached to the real estate excise tax
affidavit, all compensating taxes calculated under subsection (11) of
this section ((shall)) become due and payable by the seller or
transferor at time of sale. The auditor ((shall)) may not accept an
instrument of conveyance regarding designated forest land for filing or
recording unless the new owner has signed the notice of continuance or
the compensating tax has been paid, as evidenced by the real estate
excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the treasurer. The seller,
transferor, or new owner may appeal the new assessed valuation
calculated under subsection (11) of this section to the county board of
equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of equalization to
hear these appeals;
(d) Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written
notice and an opportunity to be heard, that:
(i) The land is no longer primarily devoted to and used for growing
and harvesting timber. However, land ((shall)) may not be removed from
designation if a governmental agency, organization, or other recipient
identified in subsection (13) or (14) of this section as exempt from
the payment of compensating tax has manifested its intent in writing or
by other official action to acquire a property interest in the
designated forest land by means of a transaction that qualifies for an
exemption under subsection (13) or (14) of this section. The
governmental agency, organization, or recipient ((shall)) must annually
provide the assessor of the county in which the land is located
reasonable evidence in writing of the intent to acquire the designated
land as long as the intent continues or within sixty days of a request
by the assessor. The assessor may not request this evidence more than
once in a calendar year;
(ii) The owner has failed to comply with a final administrative or
judicial order with respect to a violation of the restocking, forest
management, fire protection, insect and disease control, and forest
debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable rules under Title
76 RCW; or
(iii) Restocking has not occurred to the extent or within the time
specified in the application for designation of such land.
(6) Land ((shall)) may not be removed from designation if there is
a governmental restriction that prohibits, in whole or in part, the
owner from harvesting timber from the owner's designated forest land.
If only a portion of the parcel is impacted by governmental
restrictions of this nature, the restrictions cannot be used as a basis
to remove the remainder of the forest land from designation under this
chapter. For the purposes of this section, "governmental restrictions"
includes: (a) Any law, regulation, rule, ordinance, program, or other
action adopted or taken by a federal, state, county, city, or other
governmental entity; or (b) the land's zoning or its presence within an
urban growth area designated under RCW 36.70A.110.
(7) The assessor ((shall have)) has the option of requiring an
owner of forest land to file a timber management plan with the assessor
upon the occurrence of one of the following:
(a) An application for designation as forest land is submitted; or
(b) Designated forest land is sold or transferred and a notice of
continuance, described in subsection (5)(c) of this section, is signed.
(8) If land is removed from designation because of any of the
circumstances listed in subsection (5)(a) through (c) of this section,
the removal ((shall apply)) applies only to the land affected. If land
is removed from designation because of subsection (5)(d) of this
section, the removal ((shall apply)) applies only to the actual area of
land that is no longer primarily devoted to the growing and harvesting
of timber, without regard to any other land that may have been included
in the application and approved for designation, as long as the
remaining designated forest land meets the definition of forest land
contained in RCW 84.33.035.
(9) Within thirty days after the removal of designation as forest
land, the assessor ((shall)) must notify the owner in writing, setting
forth the reasons for the removal. The seller, transferor, or owner
may appeal the removal to the county board of equalization in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 84.40.038.
(10) Unless the removal is reversed on appeal a copy of the notice
of removal with a notation of the action, if any, upon appeal, together
with the legal description or assessor's parcel numbers for the land
removed from designation ((shall)) must, at the expense of the
applicant, be filed by the assessor in the same manner as deeds are
recorded and a notation of removal from designation ((shall)) must
immediately be made upon the assessment and tax rolls. The assessor
((shall)) must revalue the land to be removed with reference to its
true and fair value as of January 1st of the year of removal from
designation. Both the assessed value before and after the removal of
designation ((shall)) must be listed. Taxes based on the value of the
land as forest land ((shall)) must be assessed and payable up until the
date of removal and taxes based on the true and fair value of the land
((shall)) must be assessed and payable from the date of removal from
designation.
(11) Except as provided in subsection (5)(c), (13), or (14) of this
section, a compensating tax ((shall be)) is imposed on land removed
from designation as forest land. The compensating tax ((shall be)) is
due and payable to the treasurer thirty days after the owner is
notified of the amount of this tax. As soon as possible after the land
is removed from designation, the assessor ((shall)) must compute the
amount of compensating tax and mail a notice to the owner of the amount
of compensating tax owed and the date on which payment of this tax is
due. The amount of compensating tax ((shall be)) is equal to the
difference between the amount of tax last levied on the land as
designated forest land and an amount equal to the new assessed value of
the land multiplied by the dollar rate of the last levy extended
against the land, multiplied by a number, in no event greater than
nine, equal to the number of years for which the land was designated as
forest land, plus compensating taxes on the land at forest land values
up until the date of removal and the prorated taxes on the land at true
and fair value from the date of removal to the end of the current tax
year.
(12) Compensating tax, together with applicable interest thereon,
((shall)) becomes a lien on the land which ((shall attach)) attaches at
the time the land is removed from designation as forest land and
((shall have)) has priority to and ((shall)) must be fully paid and
satisfied before any recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt,
obligation, or responsibility to or with which the land may become
charged or liable. The lien may be foreclosed upon expiration of the
same period after delinquency and in the same manner provided by law
for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property taxes as provided
in RCW 84.64.050. Any compensating tax unpaid on its due date
((shall)) must thereupon become delinquent. From the date of
delinquency until paid, interest ((shall)) must be charged at the same
rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.
(13) The compensating tax specified in subsection (11) of this
section ((shall)) may not be imposed if the removal of designation
under subsection (5) of this section resulted solely from:
(a) Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other forest
land located within the state of Washington;
(b) A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain,
or sale or transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in
anticipation of the exercise of such power;
(c) A donation of fee title, development rights, or the right to
harvest timber, to a government agency or organization qualified under
RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes enumerated in those
sections, or the sale or transfer of fee title to a governmental entity
or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW
64.04.130, exclusively for the protection and conservation of lands
recommended for state natural area preserve purposes by the natural
heritage council and natural heritage plan as defined in chapter 79.70
RCW or approved for state natural resources conservation area purposes
as defined in chapter 79.71 RCW. At such time as the land is not used
for the purposes enumerated, the compensating tax specified in
subsection (11) of this section ((shall)) must be imposed upon the
current owner;
(d) The sale or transfer of fee title to the parks and recreation
commission for park and recreation purposes;
(e) Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by
the county or city within which the land is located that disallows the
present use of the land;
(f) The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements
under RCW 76.13.120;
(g) The creation, sale, or transfer of a conservation easement of
private forest lands within unconfined channel migration zones or
containing critical habitat for threatened or endangered species under
RCW 76.09.040;
(h) The sale or transfer of land within two years after the death
of the owner of at least a fifty percent interest in the land if the
land has been assessed and valued as classified forest land, designated
as forest land under this chapter, or classified under chapter 84.34
RCW continuously since 1993. The date of death shown on a death
certificate is the date used for the purposes of this subsection
(13)(h); ((or))
(i)(i) The discovery that the land was designated under this
chapter in error through no fault of the owner. For purposes of this
subsection (13)(i), "fault" means a knowingly false or misleading
statement, or other act or omission not in good faith, that contributed
to the approval of designation under this chapter or the failure of the
assessor to remove the land from designation under this chapter.
(ii) For purposes of this subsection (13), the discovery that land
was designated under this chapter in error through no fault of the
owner is not the sole reason for removal of designation under
subsection (5) of this section if an independent basis for removal
exists. An example of an independent basis for removal includes the
land no longer being devoted to and used for growing and harvesting
timber; or
(j) The sale or transfer of land to a public speedway authority for
use as a portion of a professional motorsports entertainment and family
recreation facility for as long as such land is not covered with an
impervious surface. At any time a portion of the land is covered with
an impervious surface or is no longer used as a portion of such a
facility, the compensating tax must be imposed on the current owner.
(14) In a county with a population of more than six hundred
thousand inhabitants, the compensating tax specified in subsection (11)
of this section ((shall)) may not be imposed if the removal of
designation as forest land under subsection (5) of this section
resulted solely from:
(a) An action described in subsection (13) of this section; or
(b) A transfer of a property interest to a government entity, or to
a nonprofit historic preservation corporation or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW 64.04.130, to protect or
enhance public resources, or to preserve, maintain, improve, restore,
limit the future use of, or otherwise to conserve for public use or
enjoyment, the property interest being transferred. At such time as
the property interest is not used for the purposes enumerated, the
compensating tax ((shall)) must be imposed upon the current owner.

Sec. 509 RCW 76.09.460 and 2007 c 106 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
EXEMPTION FROM FOREST PRACTICES ACT CONVERSION MORATORIA. (1) If
a county, city, town, or regional governmental entity receives a notice
of conversion to nonforestry use by the department under RCW 76.09.060,
then the county, city, town, or regional governmental entity must deny
all applications for permits or approvals, including building permits
and subdivision approvals, relating to nonforestry uses of the land
that is the subject of the notification. The prohibition created by
this section must be enforced by the county, city, town, or regional
governmental entity:
(((1))) (a) For a period of six years from the approval date of the
applicable forest practices application or notification or the date
that the department was made aware of the harvest activities; or
(((2))) (b) Until the following activities are completed for the
land that is the subject of the notice of conversion to a nonforestry
use:
(((a))) (i) Full compliance with chapter 43.21C RCW, if applicable;
(((b))) (ii) The department has notified the county, city, town, or
regional governmental entity that the landowner has resolved any
outstanding final orders or decisions issued by the department; and
(((c))) (iii) A determination is made by the county, city, town, or
regional governmental entity as to whether or not the condition of the
land in question is in full compliance with local ordinances and
regulations. If full compliance is not found, a mitigation plan to
address violations of local ordinances or regulations must be required
for the parcel in question by the county, city, town, or regional
governmental entity. Required mitigation plans must be prepared by the
landowner and approved by the county, city, town, or regional
governmental entity. Once approved, the mitigation plan must be
implemented by the landowner. Mitigation measures that may be required
include, but are not limited to, revegetation requirements to plant and
maintain trees of sufficient maturity and appropriate species
composition to restore critical area and buffer function or to be in
compliance with applicable local government regulations.
(2) Any six-year moratorium preventing conversion to nonforestry
uses under this section must be waived as of the date the land subject
to the moratorium is purchased or acquired for use as a professional
motorsports entertainment and family recreation facility.

PART VI
LEASE AND OPERATION OF FACILITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 LEASE OF FACILITY. In consideration for
the public funding provided for the acquisition of a site for and the
financing, permitting, design, development, and construction of a
facility, a lessee must enter into a binding and legally enforceable
sole master tenant lease agreement with the public speedway authority
for the management and operation of the facility, which includes
without limitation the following terms:
(1) The term of the lease may not be less than fifty years.
(2) The lessee must pay reasonable rent and assume risk, legal
liability, and responsibility for costs associated with maintaining and
operating the facility. As used in this subsection, "reasonable rent"
is solely intended to fund the reasonable annual operating expenses of
the public speedway authority, including a reasonable operating expense
reserve. Rents paid in excess of actual operating expenses of the
public speedway authority must be committed to funding capital
improvements to the facility undertaken pursuant to plans approved by
the public speedway authority and the lessee.
(3) The lessee must, at its own expense, maintain, provide major
repairs and renovations of, and operate the facility in a first-class
manner consistent with any standards or requirements of NASCAR or other
nationally recognized motorsports sanctioning bodies to ensure the
continuous and uninterrupted suitability of the facility as a viable
venue for hosting nationally recognized, top tier professional
motorsports events.
(4) The lessee must make and participate financially in capital
improvements necessary to ensure the continuous and uninterrupted
suitability of the facility as a viable venue for hosting nationally
recognized, top tier professional motorsports events.
(5) The lessee has the authority to sublease and enter into use,
license, naming rights, and concession agreements with various lessees,
users, licensees, or concessionaires of the facility. The lessee has
the right to retain all revenues derived from the operation of the
facility, including revenues from any sublease, use, license, naming
rights, and concession agreements, revenues from concessions, ticket
sales, suite rentals, suite and seat licenses, advertising, parking,
signage, and intellectual property rights.
(6) The lessee must host at least two major motorsports event
weekends annually if the sales and use tax credit under section 401 of
this act is in effect and the lessee is not prevented from doing so by
a force majeure event. The lessee and its parent company must use
their good faith best efforts to secure as one of the two major
motorsports event weekends hosted annually at the facility a NASCAR
Nextel Cup event or an event in NASCAR's then-comparable successor
premier national series beginning in the initial year of operation of
the facility.
(7) If the sales and use tax credit under section 401 of this act
is in effect, the lessee or any parent, corporate affiliate or
successor, successor in interest, or other entity in any way related to
the lessee may not petition, support, or condone a proposal or decision
of the sanctioning body of any nationally recognized, top tier
professional motorsports event anchoring either of the two major
motorsports event weekends at the facility required under subsection
(6) of this section to move, realign, or otherwise deprive the facility
of such event. The lessee may seek to replace an event only if it can
demonstrate to the satisfaction of the office of financial management
that a substitute nationally recognized, top tier professional
motorsports event is capable of producing a higher level of economic
activity, including without limitation paid attendance by out-of-state
visitors, than the event on which public support for the development of
the facility in the state was based. The loss of any nationally
recognized, top tier professional motorsports event anchoring a major
motorsports event weekend at the facility required under subsection (6)
of this section while the sales and use tax credit under section 401 of
this act is in effect must be replaced by the lessee with a comparable
or superior nationally recognized, top tier professional motorsports
event.
(8) If the sales and use tax credit under section 401 of this act
is in effect, the lessee or any parent, corporate affiliate or
successor, successor in interest, or other entity in any way related to
the lessee may not develop, own, or operate or participate in the
development, ownership, or operation of any other professional
motorsports entertainment and family recreation facility to host
nationally recognized, top tier professional motorsports events within
five hundred miles of the facility.
(9) The lessee is required:
(a) Subject to its rights under the lease agreement to use the site
for professional motorsports entertainment and family recreation, to
make the facility available for community, charitable, recreation, and
other activities, such as family recreation and social events, local
and regional business functions, arts events, emergency services, and
public safety training, on a fee or nonfee basis as appropriate and to
the extent that such activities are consistent with use of the facility
for professional motorsports events;
(b) To use reasonable efforts to allow for meaningful,
noncommercial opportunities for the promotion of Washington state
tourism, trade, and generic products when the facility is not otherwise
in use; and
(c) To use reasonable efforts to provide opportunities for local
not-for-profit organizations to participate in facility use and
operation of concessions during professional motorsports events.
(10) The lessee must assume responsibility for payment of sales and
use taxes deferred under section 503 of this act when the deferred
taxes become due and payable by the public speedway authority.
(11) Violations by the lessee of its material obligations under
the lease are considered defaults under the lease subject to such
remedies and reasonable opportunities to cure as the lease may provide.
Damages received by the public speedway authority resulting from the
lessee's default on its obligation to annually host two major
motorsports event weekends must be applied by the public speedway
authority to pay or provide for the early retirement of bonds issued
pursuant to section 403 of this act.

Sec. 602 RCW 82.29A.130 and 2008 c 194 s 1 and 2008 c 84 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
LEASEHOLD EXCISE TAX EXEMPTION. The following leasehold interests
((shall be)) are exempt from taxes imposed pursuant to RCW 82.29A.030
and 82.29A.040:
(1) All leasehold interests constituting a part of the operating
properties of any public utility which is assessed and taxed as a
public utility pursuant to chapter 84.12 RCW.
(2) All leasehold interests in facilities owned or used by a
school, college or university which leasehold provides housing for
students and which is otherwise exempt from taxation under provisions
of RCW 84.36.010 and 84.36.050.
(3) All leasehold interests of subsidized housing where the fee
ownership of such property is vested in the government of the United
States, or the state of Washington or any political subdivision thereof
but only if income qualification exists for such housing.
(4) All leasehold interests used for fair purposes of a nonprofit
fair association that sponsors or conducts a fair or fairs which
receive support from revenues collected pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and
allocated by the director of the department of agriculture where the
fee ownership of such property is vested in the government of the
United States, the state of Washington or any of its political
subdivisions((: PROVIDED, That)). However, this exemption ((shall))
does not apply to the leasehold interest of any sublessee of such
nonprofit fair association if such leasehold interest would be taxable
if it were the primary lease.
(5) All leasehold interests in any property of any public entity
used as a residence by an employee of that public entity who is
required as a condition of employment to live in the publicly owned
property.
(6) All leasehold interests held by enrolled Indians of lands owned
or held by any Indian or Indian tribe where the fee ownership of such
property is vested in or held in trust by the United States and which
are not subleased to other than to a lessee which would qualify
pursuant to this chapter, RCW 84.36.451 and 84.40.175.
(7) All leasehold interests in any real property of any Indian or
Indian tribe, band, or community that is held in trust by the United
States or is subject to a restriction against alienation imposed by the
United States((: PROVIDED, That)). However, this exemption ((shall
apply)) applies only where it is determined that contract rent paid is
greater than or equal to ninety percent of fair market rental, to be
determined by the department of revenue using the same criteria used to
establish taxable rent in RCW 82.29A.020(2)(b).
(8) All leasehold interests for which annual taxable rent is less
than two hundred fifty dollars per year. For purposes of this
subsection leasehold interests held by the same lessee in contiguous
properties owned by the same lessor ((shall be)) is deemed a single
leasehold interest.
(9) All leasehold interests which give use or possession of the
leased property for a continuous period of less than thirty days((:
PROVIDED, That)). For purposes of this subsection, successive leases
or lease renewals giving substantially continuous use of possession of
the same property to the same lessee ((shall be)) is deemed a single
leasehold interest((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). No leasehold interest
((shall)) may be deemed to give use or possession for a period of less
than thirty days solely by virtue of the reservation by the public
lessor of the right to use the property or to allow third parties to
use the property on an occasional, temporary basis.
(10) All leasehold interests under month-to-month leases in
residential units rented for residential purposes of the lessee pending
destruction or removal for the purpose of constructing a public highway
or building.
(11) All leasehold interests in any publicly owned real or personal
property to the extent such leasehold interests arises solely by virtue
of a contract for public improvements or work executed under the public
works statutes of this state or of the United States between the public
owner of the property and a contractor.
(12) All leasehold interests that give use or possession of state
adult correctional facilities for the purposes of operating
correctional industries under RCW 72.09.100.
(13) All leasehold interests used to provide organized and
supervised recreational activities for persons with disabilities of all
ages in a camp facility and for public recreational purposes by a
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation that would be
exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.030(1) if it owned the
property. If the publicly owned property is used for any taxable
purpose, the leasehold excise taxes set forth in RCW 82.29A.030 and
82.29A.040 ((shall)) must be imposed and ((shall)) must be apportioned
accordingly.
(14) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of a baseball stadium with natural turf and a retractable roof or
canopy that is in a county with a population of over one million, that
has a seating capacity of over forty thousand, and that is constructed
on or after January 1, 1995. "Public or entertainment areas" include
ticket sales areas, ramps and stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking
areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality and stadium club
areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily servicing other public or
entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas,
control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas,
museum and exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage
areas, loading, staging, and servicing areas, seating areas and suites,
the playing field, and any other areas to which the public has access
or which are used for the production of the entertainment event or
other public usage, and any other personal property used for these
purposes. "Public or entertainment areas" does not include locker
rooms or private offices exclusively used by the lessee.
(15) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of a stadium and exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, that
is constructed on or after January 1, 1998. For the purposes of this
subsection, "public or entertainment areas" has the same meaning as in
subsection (14) of this section, and includes exhibition areas.
(16) All leasehold interests in public facilities districts, as
provided in chapter 36.100 or 35.57 RCW.
(17) All leasehold interests in property that is: (a) Owned by the
United States government or a municipal corporation; (b) listed on any
federal or state register of historical sites; and (c) wholly contained
within a designated national historic reserve under 16 U.S.C. Sec. 461.
(18)(a) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment
areas of an amphitheater if a private entity is responsible for one
hundred percent of the cost of constructing the amphitheater which is
not reimbursed by the public owner, both the public owner and the
private lessee sponsor events at the facility on a regular basis, the
lessee is responsible under the lease or agreement to operate and
maintain the facility, and the amphitheater has a seating capacity of
over seventeen thousand reserved and general admission seats and is in
a county that had a population of over three hundred fifty thousand,
but less than four hundred twenty-five thousand when the amphitheater
first opened to the public.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (18), "public or
entertainment areas" include box offices or other ticket sales areas,
entrance gates, ramps and stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking
areas, concession areas, restaurants, hospitality areas, kitchens or
other work areas primarily servicing other public or entertainment
areas, public rest room areas, press and media areas, control booths,
broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas, museum and exhibit
areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage areas, loading,
staging, and servicing areas, seating areas including lawn seating
areas and suites, stages, and any other areas to which the public has
access or which are used for the production of the entertainment event
or other public usage, and any other personal property used for these
purposes. "Public or entertainment areas" does not include office
areas used predominately by the lessee.
(19) All leasehold interests in real property used for the
placement of military housing meeting the requirements of RCW
84.36.665.
(20) All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas
of a professional motorsports entertainment and family recreation
facility that is constructed on or after January 1, 2011. For the
purposes of this subsection, "public or entertainment areas" include
ticket sales areas, ramps and stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking
areas, recreational vehicle camping areas, concession areas
restaurants, hospitality and club areas, kitchens and other work and
maintenance areas servicing other public or entertainment areas, public
restroom areas, press and media areas, control towers and booths,
broadcast and production areas, retail sales areas, museum and exhibit
areas, scoreboards and other public displays, storage areas, loading,
staging, and servicing areas, seating areas and suites, the closed-course speedway, open space, and any other areas to which the public
has access or which are used for the production of the entertainment
event or other public usage, and any other personal property used for
these purposes. "Public or entertainment areas" does not include
private offices or other areas exclusively used by the lessee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603 PAYMENTS IN LIEU OF TAXES. A public
speedway authority must make annual payments in lieu of property taxes
to any host jurisdiction, fire protection district, regional fire
protection service authority, emergency medical service district, urban
emergency medical service district, or other taxing district in an
amount equal to the property taxes that would be payable with respect
to the property were it not owned by a municipal corporation.

Sec. 604 RCW 36.94.020 and 2008 c 301 s 25 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The construction, operation, and maintenance of a system of
sewerage and/or water is a county purpose. Subject to the provisions
of this chapter, every county has the power, individually or in
conjunction with another county or counties to adopt, provide for,
accept, establish, condemn, purchase, construct, add to, operate, and
maintain a system or systems of sanitary and storm sewers, including
outfalls, interceptors, plans, and facilities and services necessary
for sewerage treatment and disposal, and/or system or systems of water
supply within all or a portion of the county. However, counties
((shall)) do not have power to condemn sewerage and/or water systems of
any municipal corporation or private utility.
(2) A county may provide sewer service within ten miles outside of
its corporate limits to a professional motorsports entertainment and
family recreation facility, provided that another municipal corporation
is not already furnishing sewerage service to the facility.
(3) Such county or counties ((shall)) have the authority to
control, regulate, operate, and manage such system or systems and to
provide funds therefor by general obligation bonds, revenue bonds,
local improvement district bonds, utility local improvement district or
local improvement district assessments, and in any other lawful fiscal
manner. Rates or charges for on-site inspection and maintenance
services may not be imposed under this chapter on the development,
construction, or reconstruction of property.
(4) Under this chapter, after July 1, 1998, any requirements for
pumping the septic tank of an on-site sewage system should be based,
among other things, on actual measurement of accumulation of sludge and
scum by a trained inspector, trained owner's agent, or trained owner.
Training must occur in a program approved by the state board of health
or by a local health officer.
(5) Before adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility
services, or incorporating residences into an on-site inspection and
maintenance or sewer utility under this chapter, notification must be
provided, prior to the applicable public hearing, to all residences
within the proposed service area that have on-site systems permitted by
the local health officer. The notice must clearly state that the
residence is within the proposed service area and must provide
information on estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the
service.
(6) A county ((shall)) may not provide on-site sewage system
inspection, pumping services, or other maintenance or repair services
under this section using county employees unless the on-site system is
connected by a publicly owned collection system to the county's
sewerage system, and the on-site system represents the first step in
the sewage disposal process. Nothing in this section ((shall)) affects
the authority of a state or local health officer to carry out their
responsibilities under any other applicable law.
(7) A county may, as part of a system of sewerage established under
this chapter, provide for, finance, and operate any of the facilities
and services and may exercise the powers expressly authorized for
county storm water, flood control, pollution prevention, and drainage
services and activities under chapters 36.89, 86.12, 86.13, and 86.15
RCW. A county also may provide for, finance, and operate the
facilities and services and may exercise any of the powers authorized
for aquifer protection areas under chapter 36.36 RCW; for lake or beach
management districts under chapter 36.61 RCW; for diking districts, and
diking, drainage, and sewerage improvement districts under chapters
85.05, 85.08, 85.15, 85.16, and 85.18 RCW; and for shellfish protection
districts under chapter 90.72 RCW. However, if a county by reference
to any of those statutes assumes as part of its system of sewerage any
powers granted to such areas or districts and not otherwise available
to a county under this chapter, then (((1))) (a) the procedures and
restrictions applicable to those areas or districts apply to the
county's exercise of those powers, and (((2))) (b) the county may not
simultaneously impose rates and charges under this chapter and under
the statutes authorizing such areas or districts for substantially the
same facilities and services, but must instead impose uniform rates and
charges consistent with RCW 36.94.140. By agreement with such an area
or district that is not part of a county's system of sewerage, a county
may operate that area's or district's services or facilities, but a
county may not dissolve any existing area or district except in
accordance with any applicable provisions of the statute under which
that area or district was created.

Sec. 605 RCW 36.94.030 and 1981 c 313 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
Whenever the county legislative authority deems it advisable and
necessary for the public health and welfare of the inhabitants of the
county to establish, purchase, acquire, and construct a system of
sewerage and/or water, or make any additions and betterments thereto,
or extensions thereof, the board ((shall)) must adopt a sewerage and/or
water general plan for a system of sewerage and/or water for all or a
portion of the county as deemed necessary by the board, and for a
system of sewerage service to a professional motorsports entertainment
and family recreation facility as permitted by RCW 36.94.020. If the
county has adopted a comprehensive plan for a physical development of
the county pursuant to chapter 36.70 RCW and/or chapter 35.63 RCW, then
the sewerage and/or water general plan ((shall)) must be adopted as an
element of that comprehensive plan pursuant to the applicable statute.

Sec. 606 RCW 35.91.020 and 2009 c 344 s 1 and 2009 c 230 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, the
governing body of any city, town, county, water-sewer district, or
drainage district, hereinafter referred to as a "municipality" may
contract with owners of real estate for the construction of storm,
sanitary, or combination sewers, pumping stations, and disposal plants,
water mains, hydrants, reservoirs, or appurtenances, hereinafter called
"water or sewer facilities," within their boundaries or (except for
counties) within ten miles from their corporate limits connecting with
the public water or sewerage system to serve the area in which the real
estate of such owners is located, and to provide for a period of not to
exceed twenty years for the reimbursement of such owners and their
assigns by any owner of real estate who did not contribute to the
original cost of such water or sewer facilities and who subsequently
tap onto or use the same of a fair pro rata share of the cost of the
construction of said water or sewer facilities, including not only
those directly connected thereto, but also users connected to laterals
or branches connecting thereto, subject to such reasonable rules and
regulations as the governing body of such municipality may provide or
contract, and notwithstanding the provisions of any other law.
(b) If authorized by ordinance or contract, a municipality may
participate in financing the development of water or sewer facilities
development projects authorized by, and in accordance with, (a) of this
subsection. Unless otherwise provided by ordinance or contract:
(i) Municipalities that contribute to the financing of water or
sewer facilities projects under this section have the same rights to
reimbursement as owners of real estate who make contributions as
authorized under this section; and
(ii) If the projects are jointly financed by a combination of
municipal funding and private funding by real estate owners, the amount
of reimbursement received by each participant in the financing must be
a pro rata share.
(c) A municipality seeking reimbursement from an owner of real
estate under this section is limited to the dollar amount authorized
under this chapter and may not collect any additional reimbursement,
assessment, charge, or fee for the infrastructure or facilities that
were constructed under the applicable ordinance, contract, or
agreement. This does not prevent the collection of amounts for
services or infrastructure that are additional expenditures not subject
to such ordinance, contract, or agreement.
(d) Notwithstanding any limitation on counties in (a) of this
subsection, a county may contract with a public speedway authority or
its lessee for the construction of water or sewer facilities within ten
miles of its corporate limits connecting with the county's public
sewerage system to service a professional motorsports entertainment and
family recreation facility, and to provide for a period of not to
exceed fifteen years for the reimbursement of the authority or its
lessee and their assigns by any owner of real estate who did not
contribute to the original cost of such sewer facilities and who
subsequently tap onto or use the same of a fair pro rata share of the
cost of the construction of said sewer facilities, including not only
those directly connected thereto, but also users connected to laterals
or branches connecting thereto, subject to such reasonable rules and
regulations as the governing body of such county may provide or
contract.
(2)(a) The contract may provide for an extension of the twenty-year
reimbursement period for a time not to exceed the duration of any
moratorium, phasing ordinance, concurrency designation, or other
governmental action that prevents making applications for, or the
approval of, any new development within the benefit area for a period
of six months or more.
(b) Upon the extension of the reimbursement period pursuant to (a)
of this subsection, the contract must specify the duration of the
contract extension and must be filed and recorded with the county
auditor. Property owners who are subject to the reimbursement
obligations under subsection (1) of this section ((shall)) must be
notified by the contracting municipality of the extension filed under
this subsection.
(3) Each contract ((shall)) must include a provision requiring that
every two years from the date the contract is executed a property owner
entitled to reimbursement under this section provide the contracting
municipality with information regarding the current contract name,
address, and telephone number of the person, company, or partnership
that originally entered into the contract. If the property owner fails
to comply with the notification requirements of this subsection within
sixty days of the specified time, then the contracting municipality may
collect any reimbursement funds owed to the property owner under the
contract. Such funds must be deposited in the capital fund of the
municipality.
(4) To the extent it may require in the performance of such
contract, such municipality may install said water or sewer facilities
in and along the county streets in the area to be served as hereinabove
provided, subject to such reasonable requirements as to the manner of
occupancy of such streets as the county may by resolution provide. The
provisions of such contract ((shall)) are not ((be)) effective as to
any owner of real estate not a party thereto unless such contract has
been recorded in the office of the county auditor of the county in
which the real estate of such owner is located prior to the time such
owner taps into or connects to said water or sewer facilities.

Sec. 607 RCW 84.34.037 and 2009 c 350 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Applications for classification or reclassification under RCW
84.34.020(1) ((shall)) must be made to the county legislative
authority. An application made for classification or reclassification
of land under RCW 84.34.020(1) (b) and (c) which is in an area subject
to a comprehensive plan ((shall)) must be acted upon in the same manner
in which an amendment to the comprehensive plan is processed.
Application made for classification of land which is in an area not
subject to a comprehensive plan ((shall)) must be acted upon after a
public hearing and after notice of the hearing ((shall have)) has been
given by one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the
area at least ten days before the hearing((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, applications for classification of land in an incorporated
area ((shall)) must be acted upon by: (a) A granting authority
composed of three members of the county legislative body and three
members of the city legislative body in which the land is located in a
meeting where members may be physically absent but participating
through telephonic connection; or (b) separate affirmative acts by both
the county and city legislative bodies where both bodies affirm the
entirety of an application without modification or both bodies affirm
an application with identical modifications.
(2) In determining whether an application made for classification
or reclassification under RCW 84.34.020(1) (b) and (c) should be
approved or disapproved, the granting authority may take cognizance of
the benefits to the general welfare of preserving the current use of
the property which is the subject of application, and ((shall)) must
consider:
(a) The resulting revenue loss or tax shift;
(b) Whether granting the application for land applying under RCW
84.34.020(1)(b) will (i) conserve or enhance natural, cultural, or
scenic resources, (ii) protect streams, stream corridors, wetlands,
natural shorelines and aquifers, (iii) protect soil resources and
unique or critical wildlife and native plant habitat, (iv) promote
conservation principles by example or by offering educational
opportunities, (v) enhance the value of abutting or neighboring parks,
forests, wildlife preserves, nature reservations, sanctuaries, or other
open spaces, (vi) enhance recreation opportunities, (vii) preserve
historic and archaeological sites, (viii) preserve visual quality along
highway, road, and street corridors or scenic vistas, (ix) affect any
other factors relevant in weighing benefits to the general welfare of
preserving the current use of the property; and
(c) Whether granting the application for land applying under RCW
84.34.020(1)(c) will (i) either preserve land previously classified
under RCW 84.34.020(2) or preserve land that is traditional farmland
and not classified under chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, (ii) preserve land
with a potential for returning to commercial agriculture, and (iii)
affect any other factors relevant in weighing benefits to the general
welfare of preserving the current use of property.
(3) If a public benefit rating system is adopted under RCW
84.34.055, the county legislative authority ((shall)) must rate
property for which application for classification has been made under
RCW 84.34.020(1) (b) and (c) according to the public benefit rating
system in determining whether an application should be approved or
disapproved, but when such a system is adopted, open space properties
then classified under this chapter which do not qualify under the
system ((shall)) may not be removed from classification but may be
rated according to the public benefit rating system.
(4) The granting authority may approve the application with respect
to only part of the land which is the subject of the application. If
any part of the application is denied, the applicant may withdraw the
entire application. The granting authority in approving in part or
whole an application for land classified or reclassified pursuant to
RCW 84.34.020(1) may also require that certain conditions be met,
including but not limited to the granting of easements. As a condition
of granting open space classification, the legislative body may not
require public access on land classified under RCW 84.34.020(1)(b)(iii)
for the purpose of promoting conservation of wetlands.
(5) The granting authority must approve an application for open
space classification for any portion of a property used for a
professional motorsports entertainment and family recreation facility
that is (a) not covered with impervious surface and (b) maintained in
a condition consistent with the open space designation, including
without limitation portions used for activities such as recreation,
temporary parking for events, storm water management, wetlands, and
wetland buffers.
(6) The granting or denial of the application for current use
classification or reclassification is a legislative determination and
((shall be)) is reviewable only for arbitrary and capricious actions.

PART VII
MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 701 RCW 36.96.010 and 1999 c 153 s 50 are each amended to
read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Special purpose district" means every municipal and quasi-municipal corporation other than counties, cities, and towns. Such
special purpose districts ((shall)) include, but are not limited to,
water-sewer districts, fire protection districts, port districts,
public utility districts, county park and recreation service areas,
flood control zone districts, diking districts, drainage improvement
districts, public speedway authorities, and solid waste collection
districts, but ((shall)) does not include industrial development
districts created by port districts, and ((shall)) does not include
local improvement districts, utility local improvement districts, and
road improvement districts;
(2) "Governing authority" means the commission, council, or other
body which directs the affairs of a special purpose district;
(3) "Inactive" means that a special purpose district, other than a
public utility district, is characterized by either of the following
criteria:
(a) Has not carried out any of the special purposes or functions
for which it was formed within the preceding consecutive five-year
period; or
(b) No election has been held for the purpose of electing a member
of the governing body within the preceding consecutive seven-year
period or, in those instances where members of the governing body are
appointed and not elected, where no member of the governing body has
been appointed within the preceding seven-year period.
A public utility district is inactive when it is characterized by
both criteria (a) and (b) of this subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 702 APPLICABILITY OF PUBLIC LAWS. A public
speedway authority, its officers, and the board of directors, created
under this act, are subject to the general laws regulating local
governments and local governmental officials including, but not limited
to, the requirement to be audited by the state auditor and various
accounting requirements under chapter 43.09 RCW, the open public record
requirements under chapter 42.17 RCW, the prohibition on using its
facilities for campaign purposes under RCW 42.17.130, the open public
meetings law under chapter 42.30 RCW, the code of ethics for municipal
officers under chapter 42.23 RCW, and the local government
whistleblower law under chapter 42.41 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 No direct or collateral attack on any
public speedway authority purported to be authorized or created in
conformance with this chapter may be commenced more than thirty days
after creation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 704 A new section is added to chapter 82.08
RCW to read as follows:
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to any retail sales
for which a tax deferral certificate is currently effective and has
been issued by the department to a public speedway authority, pursuant
to section 503 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 A new section is added to chapter 82.12
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to any uses
for which a tax deferral certificate is currently effective and has
been issued by the department to a public speedway authority, pursuant
to section 503 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 A new section is added to chapter 82.14
RCW to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to any local
retail sales or uses for which a tax deferral certificate is currently
effective and has been issued by the department to a public speedway
authority, pursuant to section 503 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 Sections 101 through 309, 402, 403, 501
through 504, 601, 603, 702, and 703 of this act constitute a new
chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 The provisions of this act must be
liberally construed to effect the policies and purposes of this act.

--- END ---