BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The state wildlife land management trust account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from moneys received from the sale of
surplus lands owned by the department must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only as directed by the
legislature.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.210 and 2009 c 333 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall maintain and manage real or personal
property owned, leased, or held by the department and shall control the
construction of buildings, structures, and improvements in or on the
property. The director may adopt rules for the operation and
maintenance of the property.
(2) The commission may authorize the director to sell, lease,
convey, or grant concessions upon real or personal property under the
control of the department. This includes the authority to sell timber,
gravel, sand, and other materials or products from real property held
by the department, and to sell or lease the department's real or
personal property or grant concessions or rights-of-way for roads or
utilities in the property. Oil and gas resources owned by the state
which lie below lands owned, leased, or held by the department shall be
offered for lease by the commissioner of public lands pursuant to
chapter 79.14 RCW with the proceeds being deposited in the state
wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170: PROVIDED, That the
commissioner of public lands shall condition such leases at the request
of the department to protect wildlife and its habitat.
(3) If the commission determines that real or personal property
held by the department cannot be used advantageously by the department,
the director may dispose of that property if it is in the public
interest.
(4)(a) The legislature finds that department-owned land used for
agricultural purposes is surplus. The director must create an
inventory of such land and report the results of that inventory to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2011. The
director must dispose of this land by June 30, 2017. In disposing of
the land, the director must retain the development rights of the
property to ensure that the land remains in agricultural use. If such
agricultural land was acquired with grants, gifts, or donations that
restrict the disposal of the lands, the inventory must include the
actual language that restricts disposal. For the purposes of this
subsection, agricultural land includes land used to graze domestic
animals or raise commercial agricultural crops either as a direct
agency operation or through a lease or other agreement with a private
operator.
(b) The director shall also prepare an inventory of departmental
lands with potential for active management as commercial timber lands
and report the results of that inventory to the appropriate committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2011.
(5) If the state acquired real property with use limited to
specific purposes, the director may negotiate terms for the return of
the property to the donor or grantor. Other real property shall be
sold to the highest bidder at public auction. After appraisal, notice
of the auction shall be published at least once a week for two
successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the
county where the property is located at least twenty days prior to
sale.
(6) Proceeds from the sales shall be deposited in the state
wildlife land management trust account created in ((RCW 77.12.170))
section 1 of this act.

--- END ---