BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the property
tax exemption for hospitals dates back as far as the year 1854 when
benevolent, charitable, literary, and scientific institutions were
first exempted from the tax base.
(2) The legislature finds that a 2007 report on tax preferences
from the joint legislative audit and review committee suggested that it
was not clear how well nonprofit hospitals had met expectations for
charitable services and community benefits as compared to the
performance of private for-profit hospitals and also found mixed
results as to whether nonprofit hospitals were providing more charity
care as a percent of adjusted revenue than for-profit hospitals not
receiving the tax exemption. The same report values the property tax
exemption between fifty and sixty million dollars per year for the
state's forty-five nonprofit hospitals.
(3) The legislature finds that an exemption from property taxes for
certain hospitals both: (a) Reduces state funds that would otherwise
be available to fund the health care safety net; and (b) requires
property owners in those communities to pay a greater share of the
local tax burden.
(4) It is therefore the intent of the legislature to recognize
nonprofit hospitals that are providing essential community benefits
while ensuring that compensation packages for nonprofit hospital
employees are comparable with other public purpose entities.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.36.840 and 2007 c 111 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to determine whether organizations, associations,
corporations, or institutions, except those exempted under RCW
84.36.020 and 84.36.030, are exempt from property taxes, and before the
exemption ((shall be)) is allowed for any year, the superintendent or
manager or other proper officer of the organization, association,
corporation, or institution claiming exemption from taxation ((shall))
must file with the department of revenue a statement certifying that
the income and the receipts thereof, including donations to it, have
been applied to the actual expenses of operating and maintaining it, or
for its capital expenditures, and to no other purpose. This report
((shall)) must also include a statement of the receipts and
disbursements of the exempt organization, association, corporation, or
institution.
(2) Educational institutions claiming exemption under RCW 84.36.050
((shall)) must also file a list of all property claimed to be exempt,
the purpose for which it is used, the revenue derived from it for the
preceding year, the use to which the revenue was applied, the number of
students who attended the school or college, the total revenues of the
institution with the source from which they were derived, and the
purposes to which the revenues were applied, listing the items of such
revenues and expenditures in detail.
(3) A nonprofit hospital that claims an exemption under RCW
84.36.040 must file an unofficial copy of their federal Schedule H form
990 with the department within five days of filing the form with the
internal revenue service. The department must make each unofficial
copy of the federal Schedule H form 990 available for download on the
department's web site.
(4) The reports required under ((subsections (1) and (2) of)) this
section may be submitted electronically, in a format provided or
approved by the department, or mailed to the department. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, the reports
((shall)) must be submitted on or before March 31st of each year. The
department ((shall)) must remove the tax exemption from the property of
any organization, association, corporation, or institution that does
not file the required report with the department on or before the due
date. However, the department ((shall)) must allow a reasonable
extension of time for filing upon receipt of a written request on or
before the required filing date and for good cause shown therein.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.36.040 and 2010 c 106 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The real and personal property used by, and for the purposes
of, the following nonprofit organizations is exempt from property
taxation:
(a) Child day care centers ((as defined in subsection (4) of this
section));
(b) Free public libraries;
(c) Orphanages and orphan asylums;
(d) Homes for the sick or infirm;
(e) Hospitals for the sick that meet the requirements in subsection
(4) of this section; and
(f) Outpatient dialysis facilities.
(2) The real and personal property leased to and used by a hospital
for hospital purposes is exempt from property taxation if the hospital
is established under chapter 36.62 RCW or is owned and operated by a
public hospital district established under chapter 70.44 RCW.
(3) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used
exclusively for the purposes for which exemption is granted, except as
provided in RCW 84.36.805, and the benefit of the exemption must inure
to the user.
(4)(a) To be exempt under this section, a nonprofit hospital or
public hospital district must post the full salary detail, including
all forms of wage and nonwage compensation, of its five highest paid
officers on a public web site maintained by the Washington state
hospital association.
(b) The nonprofit hospital or public hospital district has the
burden of proof on an annual basis to demonstrate that its five highest
paid officers are compensated at levels comparable to like positions
within the public service of the state and the department may require
adjustment to the salary schedule for purposes of maintaining exempted
status under subsection (1) of this section.
(5) For purposes of ((subsection (1) of)) this section, "child day
care center" means a nonprofit organization that regularly provides
child day care and early learning services for a group of children for
periods of less than twenty-four hours.

--- END ---