BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in this section, from July 1, 2011, through
June 29, 2013, base salaries are reduced three percent for all state
employees of the executive, legislative, and judicial branches,
including those employees in the Washington management service and
employees not subject to the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW.
(2) The following employees of the executive, legislative, and
judicial branches are not subject to subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Elected officials whose salaries are set by the commission on
salaries for elected officials;
(b) Employees at state institutions of higher education;
(c) Certificated employees of the state school for the blind and
the center for childhood deafness and hearing loss;
(d) Commissioned officers of the Washington state patrol
represented by the state patrol troopers association and the Washington
state patrol lieutenants association;
(e) Represented ferry workers of the Washington state department of
transportation; and
(f) Employees whose monthly full-time equivalent salary is less
than two thousand five hundred dollars per month.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, if an
employee subject to the three percent salary reduction under subsection
(1) of this section is entitled to leave, the employee will receive
temporary salary reduction leave of up to five and two-tenths hours per
month. The director of the department of personnel shall adopt rules
governing the accrual and use of temporary salary reduction leave for
nonrepresented employees. For represented employees, the accrual and
use of temporary salary reduction leave shall be in accordance with the
provisions of the collective bargaining agreements.
(4) If provisions of collective bargaining agreements prevent the
implementation of subsection (1) of this section, agencies of the
executive, legislative, and judicial branches shall achieve a three
percent salary reduction for each employee through employee leave
without pay, mandatory and voluntary temporary layoffs, reduced work
hours, or other actions consistent with collective bargaining
agreements. This subsection does not prohibit an agency from granting
temporary salary reduction leave for employees entitled to leave in
accordance with subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Subsection (2) of this section does not prohibit employers of
the executive, legislative, and judicial branches from implementing a
salary reduction for employees exempted under subsection (2) of this
section. Employers of the executive, legislative, and judicial
branches are encouraged to implement a salary reduction for employees
exempted under subsection (2) of this section, except for those
employees whose monthly full-time equivalent salary is less than two
thousand five hundred dollars per month.
(6) Subsection (2) of this section does not prohibit elected
officials whose salaries are set by the commission on salaries for
elected officials to voluntarily agree to a reduction in salary and
elected officials are encouraged to take such action.
(7) This section does not prohibit a state agency or institution
during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium from instituting reduced work
hours, mandatory or voluntary leave without pay, reductions in
salaries, or temporary layoffs as an integral part of the employer's
expenditure reduction efforts, as certified by the employer. This
subsection must be implemented consistent with collective bargaining
agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, any state elected
official of the executive branch may voluntarily reduce his or her
salary from that established pursuant to Article XXVIII, section 1 of
the state Constitution by three percent.
(2) The department of personnel and office of financial management
shall develop a form to be used by any state elected official of the
executive branch to execute the salary reduction under subsection (1)
of this section through the state's central personnel payroll system.
(3) A voluntary reduction in salary shall be effective and continue
through June 29, 2013, unless the state elected official of the
executive branch directs in writing that the department of personnel
discontinue the reduction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Except as provided in this section,
institutions of higher education are to achieve compensation reductions
as specifically set forth in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium omnibus
appropriations act.
(2) Student employees and employees whose monthly full-time
equivalent salary is less than two thousand five hundred dollars per
month are not subject to subsection (1) of this section.
(3) This section does not prohibit institutions of higher education
from implementing temporary salary reduction leave for employees who
are entitled to leave.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.06.070 and 2010 c 271 s 801, 2010 c 2 s 2, and 2010
c 1 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) The members of the legislature or to any employee of, or
position in, the legislative branch of the state government including
members, officers, and employees of the legislative council, joint
legislative audit and review committee, statute law committee, and any
interim committee of the legislature;
(b) The justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of
appeals, judges of the superior courts or of the inferior courts, or to
any employee of, or position in the judicial branch of state
government;
(c) Officers, academic personnel, and employees of technical
colleges;
(d) The officers of the Washington state patrol;
(e) Elective officers of the state;
(f) The chief executive officer of each agency;
(g) In the departments of employment security and social and health
services, the director and the director's confidential secretary; in
all other departments, the executive head of which is an individual
appointed by the governor, the director, his or her confidential
secretary, and his or her statutory assistant directors;
(h) In the case of a multimember board, commission, or committee,
whether the members thereof are elected, appointed by the governor or
other authority, serve ex officio, or are otherwise chosen:
(i) All members of such boards, commissions, or committees;
(ii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on
a part-time basis and there is a statutory executive officer: The
secretary of the board, commission, or committee; the chief executive
officer of the board, commission, or committee; and the confidential
secretary of the chief executive officer of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iii) If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve
on a full-time basis: The chief executive officer or administrative
officer as designated by the board, commission, or committee; and a
confidential secretary to the chair of the board, commission, or
committee;
(iv) If all members of the board, commission, or committee serve ex
officio: The chief executive officer; and the confidential secretary
of such chief executive officer;
(i) The confidential secretaries and administrative assistants in
the immediate offices of the elective officers of the state;
(j) Assistant attorneys general;
(k) Commissioned and enlisted personnel in the military service of
the state;
(l) Inmate, student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel
resources board;
(m) The public printer or to any employees of or positions in the
state printing plant;
(n) Officers and employees of the Washington state fruit
commission;
(o) Officers and employees of the Washington apple commission;
(p) Officers and employees of the Washington state dairy products
commission;
(q) Officers and employees of the Washington tree fruit research
commission;
(r) Officers and employees of the Washington state beef commission;
(s) Officers and employees of the Washington grain commission;
(t) Officers and employees of any commission formed under chapter
15.66 RCW;
(u) Officers and employees of agricultural commissions formed under
chapter 15.65 RCW;
(v) ((Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed
under chapter 67.40 RCW;
(w))) Executive assistants for personnel administration and labor
relations in all state agencies employing such executive assistants
including but not limited to all departments, offices, commissions,
committees, boards, or other bodies subject to the provisions of this
chapter and this subsection shall prevail over any provision of law
inconsistent herewith unless specific exception is made in such law;
(((x))) (w) In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy
agency heads, assistant directors or division directors, and not more
than three principal policy assistants who report directly to the
agency head or deputy agency heads;
(((y))) (x) All employees of the marine employees' commission;
(((z))) (y) Staff employed by the department of commerce to
administer energy policy functions;
(((aa))) (z) The manager of the energy facility site evaluation
council;
(((bb))) (aa) A maximum of ten staff employed by the department of
commerce to administer innovation and policy functions, including the
three principal policy assistants exempted under (((x))) (w) of this
subsection;
(((cc))) (bb) Staff employed by Washington State University to
administer energy education, applied research, and technology transfer
programs under RCW 43.21F.045 as provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5).
(2) The following classifications, positions, and employees of
institutions of higher education and related boards are hereby exempted
from coverage of this chapter:
(a) Members of the governing board of each institution of higher
education and related boards, all presidents, vice presidents, and
their confidential secretaries, administrative, and personal
assistants; deans, directors, and chairs; academic personnel; and
executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions employed
by institutions of higher education; principal assistants to executive
heads of major administrative or academic divisions; other managerial
or professional employees in an institution or related board having
substantial responsibility for directing or controlling program
operations and accountable for allocation of resources and program
results, or for the formulation of institutional policy, or for
carrying out personnel administration or labor relations functions,
legislative relations, public information, development, senior computer
systems and network programming, or internal audits and investigations;
and any employee of a community college district whose place of work is
one which is physically located outside the state of Washington and who
is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned to an educational
program operating outside of the state of Washington;
(b) The governing board of each institution, and related boards,
may also exempt from this chapter classifications involving research
activities, counseling of students, extension or continuing education
activities, graphic arts or publications activities requiring
prescribed academic preparation or special training as determined by
the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee engaged in office,
clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be exempted by
the board under this provision;
(c) Printing craft employees in the department of printing at the
University of Washington.
(3) In addition to the exemptions specifically provided by this
chapter, the director of personnel may provide for further exemptions
pursuant to the following procedures. The governor or other
appropriate elected official may submit requests for exemption to the
director of personnel stating the reasons for requesting such
exemptions. The director of personnel shall hold a public hearing,
after proper notice, on requests submitted pursuant to this subsection.
If the director determines that the position for which exemption is
requested is one involving substantial responsibility for the
formulation of basic agency or executive policy or one involving
directing and controlling program operations of an agency or a major
administrative division thereof, the director of personnel shall grant
the request and such determination shall be final as to any decision
made before July 1, 1993. The total number of additional exemptions
permitted under this subsection shall not exceed one percent of the
number of employees in the classified service not including employees
of institutions of higher education and related boards for those
agencies not directly under the authority of any elected public
official other than the governor, and shall not exceed a total of
twenty-five for all agencies under the authority of elected public
officials other than the governor.
The salary and fringe benefits of all positions presently or
hereafter exempted except for the chief executive officer of each
agency, full-time members of boards and commissions, administrative
assistants and confidential secretaries in the immediate office of an
elected state official, and the personnel listed in subsections (1)(j)
through (((v))) (u) and (((y))) (x) and (2) of this section, shall be
determined by the director of personnel. Changes to the classification
plan affecting exempt salaries must meet the same provisions for
classified salary increases resulting from adjustments to the
classification plan as outlined in RCW 41.06.152.
From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, salaries for all
positions exempt from classification under this chapter are subject to
section 1 of this act.
From February 18, 2009, through June 30, ((2011)) 2013, a salary or
wage increase shall not be granted to any position exempt from
classification under this chapter, except that a salary or wage
increase may be granted to employees pursuant to collective bargaining
agreements negotiated under chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 47.64, or 41.76 RCW,
((or negotiated by the nonprofit corporation formed under chapter 67.40
RCW,)) and except that increases may be granted for positions for which
the employer has demonstrated difficulty retaining qualified employees
if the following conditions are met:
(a) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources;
((and))
(b) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of
client services; and
(c) For any state agency of the executive branch, not including
institutions of higher education, the salary increase is approved by
the director of the office of financial management.
Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010,
through June 30, 2011, to a position exempt from classification under
this chapter shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the
legislature no later than July 31, 2011, detailing the positions for
which salary increases were granted, the size of the increases, and the
reasons for giving the increases.
Any agency granting a salary increase from July 1, 2011, through
June 30, 2013, to a position exempt from classification under this
chapter shall submit a report to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by July 31, 2012, and July 31, 2013, detailing the
positions for which salary increases were granted during the preceding
fiscal year, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the
increases.
Any person holding a classified position subject to the provisions
of this chapter shall, when and if such position is subsequently
exempted from the application of this chapter, be afforded the
following rights: If such person previously held permanent status in
another classified position, such person shall have a right of
reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a
position of similar nature and salary.
Any classified employee having civil service status in a classified
position who accepts an appointment in an exempt position shall have
the right of reversion to the highest class of position previously
held, or to a position of similar nature and salary.
A person occupying an exempt position who is terminated from the
position for gross misconduct or malfeasance does not have the right of
reversion to a classified position as provided for in this section.
From February 15, 2010, until June 30, ((2011)) 2013, no monetary
performance-based awards or incentives may be granted by the director
or employers to employees covered by rules adopted under this section.
This subsection does not prohibit the payment of awards provided for in
chapter 41.60 RCW.
From July 1, 2011, until June 30, 2013, no performance-based awards
or incentives may be granted by the director or employers to employees
pursuant to a performance management confirmation granted by the
department of personnel under WAC 357-37-055.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.06.133 and 2010 c 2 s 3 and 2010 c 1 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The director shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes
and provisions of this chapter and with the best standards of personnel
administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:
(a) The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an
employee;
(b) Training and career development;
(c) Probationary periods of six to twelve months and rejections of
probationary employees, depending on the job requirements of the class,
except that entry level state park rangers shall serve a probationary
period of twelve months;
(d) Transfers;
(e) Promotional preferences;
(f) Sick leaves and vacations;
(g) Hours of work;
(h) Layoffs when necessary and subsequent reemployment, except for
the financial basis for layoffs;
(i) The number of names to be certified for vacancies;
(j) Subject to section 1 of this act, adoption and revision of a
state salary schedule to reflect the prevailing rates in Washington
state private industries and other governmental units. The rates in
the salary schedules or plans shall be increased if necessary to attain
comparable worth under an implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and,
for institutions of higher education and related boards, shall be
competitive for positions of a similar nature in the state or the
locality in which an institution of higher education or related board
is located. Such adoption and revision is subject to approval by the
director of financial management in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW;
(k) Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay
grade based on length of service for all employees whose standards of
performance are such as to permit them to retain job status in the
classified service. From February 18, 2009, through June 30, ((2011))
2013, a salary or wage increase shall not be granted to any exempt
position under this chapter, except that a salary or wage increase may
be granted to employees pursuant to collective bargaining agreements
negotiated under chapter 28B.52, 41.56, 47.64, or 41.76 RCW, ((or
negotiated by the nonprofit corporation formed under chapter 67.40
RCW,)) and except that increases may be granted for positions for which
the employer has demonstrated difficulty retaining qualified employees
if the following conditions are met:
(i) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources;
((and))
(ii) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of
client services; and
(iii) For any state agency of the executive branch, not including
institutions of higher education, the salary increase is approved by
the director of the office of financial management;
Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010,
through June 30, 2011, to a position exempt under this chapter shall
submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later
than July 31, 2011, detailing the positions for which salary increases
were granted, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the
increases;
Any agency granting a salary increase from July 1, 2011, through
June 30, 2013, to a position exempt under this chapter shall submit a
report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 31, 2012,
and July 31, 2013, detailing the positions for which salary increases
were granted during the preceding fiscal year, the size of the
increases, and the reasons for giving the increases;
(l) Optional lump sum relocation compensation approved by the
agency director, whenever it is reasonably necessary that a person make
a domiciliary move in accepting a transfer or other employment with the
state. An agency must provide lump sum compensation within existing
resources. If the person receiving the relocation payment terminates
or causes termination with the state, for reasons other than layoff,
disability separation, or other good cause as determined by an agency
director, within one year of the date of the employment, the state is
entitled to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation from the person;
(m) Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing
statutes, with recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and
subsequent reemployment for veterans and their surviving spouses by
giving such eligible veterans and their surviving spouses additional
credit in computing their seniority by adding to their unbroken state
service, as defined by the director, the veteran's service in the
military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section,
"veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active military
service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who
has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability
incurred in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the
government and who, upon termination of such service, has received an
honorable discharge, a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable
record, or a release from active military service with evidence of
service other than that for which an undesirable, bad conduct, or
dishonorable discharge shall be given. However, the surviving spouse
of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of this section regardless of
the veteran's length of active military service. For the purposes of
this section, "veteran" does not include any person who has voluntarily
retired with twenty or more years of active military service and whose
military retirement pay is in excess of five hundred dollars per month.
(2) Rules adopted under this section by the director shall provide
for local administration and management by the institutions of higher
education and related boards, subject to periodic audit and review by
the director.
(3) Rules adopted by the director under this section may be
superseded by the provisions of a collective bargaining agreement
negotiated under RCW 41.80.001 and 41.80.010 through 41.80.130. The
supersession of such rules shall only affect employees in the
respective collective bargaining units.
(4)(a) The director shall require that each state agency report
annually the following data:
(i) The number of classified, Washington management service, and
exempt employees in the agency and the change compared to the previous
report;
(ii) The number of bonuses and performance-based incentives awarded
to agency staff and the base wages of such employees; and
(iii) The cost of each bonus or incentive awarded.
(b) A report that compiles the data in (a) of this subsection for
all agencies will be provided annually to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature and must be posted for the
public on the department of personnel's agency web site.
(5) From February 15, 2010, until June 30, ((2011)) 2013, no
monetary performance-based awards or incentives may be granted by the
director or employers to employees covered by rules adopted under this
section. This subsection does not prohibit the payment of awards
provided for in chapter 41.60 RCW.
From July 1, 2011, until June 30, 2013, no performance-based awards
or incentives may be granted by the director or employers to employees
pursuant to a performance management confirmation granted by the
department of personnel under WAC 357-37-055.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.06.500 and 2010 c 2 s 4 and 2010 c 1 s 3 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in RCW 41.06.070 and subject to section 1 of
this act, notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the
director is authorized to adopt, after consultation with state agencies
and employee organizations, rules for managers as defined in RCW
41.06.022. These rules shall not apply to managers employed by
institutions of higher education or related boards or whose positions
are exempt. The rules shall govern recruitment, appointment,
classification and allocation of positions, examination, training and
career development, hours of work, probation, certification,
compensation, transfer, affirmative action, promotion, layoff,
reemployment, performance appraisals, discipline, and any and all other
personnel practices for managers. These rules shall be separate from
rules adopted for other employees, and to the extent that the rules
adopted under this section apply only to managers shall take precedence
over rules adopted for other employees, and are not subject to review
by the board.
(2) In establishing rules for managers, the director shall adhere
to the following goals:
(a) Development of a simplified classification system that
facilitates movement of managers between agencies and promotes upward
mobility;
(b) Creation of a compensation system that provides flexibility in
setting and changing salaries, and shall require review and approval by
the director in the case of any salary changes greater than five
percent proposed for any group of employees;
(c) Establishment of a performance appraisal system that emphasizes
individual accountability for program results and efficient management
of resources; effective planning, organization, and communication
skills; valuing and managing workplace diversity; development of
leadership and interpersonal abilities; and employee development;
(d) Strengthening management training and career development
programs that build critical management knowledge, skills, and
abilities; focusing on managing and valuing workplace diversity;
empowering employees by enabling them to share in workplace decision
making and to be innovative, willing to take risks, and able to accept
and deal with change; promoting a workplace where the overall focus is
on the recipient of the government services and how these services can
be improved; and enhancing mobility and career advancement
opportunities;
(e) Permitting flexible recruitment and hiring procedures that
enable agencies to compete effectively with other employers, both
public and private, for managers with appropriate skills and training;
allowing consideration of all qualified candidates for positions as
managers; and achieving affirmative action goals and diversity in the
workplace;
(f) Providing that managers may only be reduced, dismissed,
suspended, or demoted for cause; and
(g) Facilitating decentralized and regional administration.
(3) From February 18, 2009, through June 30, ((2011)) 2013, a
salary or wage increase shall not be granted to any position under this
section, except that increases may be granted for positions for which
the employer has demonstrated difficulty retaining qualified employees
if the following conditions are met:
(a) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources;
((and))
(b) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of
client services; and
(c) For any state agency of the executive branch, not including
institutions of higher education, the salary increase is approved by
the director of the office of financial management.
Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010,
through June 30, 2011, to a position under this section shall submit a
report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than July
31, 2011, detailing the positions for which salary increases were
granted, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the
increases.
Any agency granting a salary increase from July 1, 2011, through
June 30, 2013, to a position under this section shall submit a report
to the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 31, 2012, and July
31, 2013, detailing the positions for which salary increases were
granted during the preceding fiscal year, the size of the increases,
and the reasons for giving the increases.
(4) From February 15, 2010, until June 30, ((2011)) 2013, no
monetary performance-based awards or growth and development progression
adjustments may be granted by the director or employers to the
Washington management service employees covered by the rules adopted
under this section. This subsection does not prohibit the payment of
awards provided for in chapter 41.60 RCW.
From July 1, 2011, until June 30, 2013, no performance-based awards
or incentives may be granted by the director or employers to employees
pursuant to a performance management confirmation granted by the
department of personnel under WAC 357-37-055.
From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, salaries for all
positions under this section are subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.03.030 and 2010 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read as
follows:
(1) Wherever the compensation of any appointive state officer or
employee is fixed by statute, it may be hereafter increased or
decreased in the manner provided by law for the fixing of compensation
of other appointive state officers or employees; but this subsection
shall not apply to the heads of state departments.
(2) Wherever the compensation of any state officer appointed by the
governor, or of any employee in any office or department under the
control of any such officer, is fixed by statute, such compensation may
hereafter, from time to time, be changed by the governor, and he or she
shall have power to fix such compensation at any amount not to exceed
the amount fixed by statute.
(3) From February 18, 2009, through June 30, ((2011)) 2013, a
salary or wage increase shall not be granted to any position under this
section, except that increases may be granted for positions for which
the employer has demonstrated difficulty retaining qualified employees
if the following conditions are met:
(a) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources;
((and))
(b) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of
client services; and
(c) For any state agency of the executive branch, not including
institutions of higher education, the salary increase is approved by
the director of the office of financial management.
Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010,
through June 30, 2011, to a position exempt under this section shall
submit a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later
than July 31, 2011, detailing the positions for which salary increases
were granted, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the
increases.
Any agency granting a salary increase from July 1, 2011, through
June 30, 2013, to a position exempt under this section shall submit a
report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 31, 2012,
and July 31, 2013, detailing the positions for which salary increases
were granted during the preceding fiscal year, the size of the
increases, and the reasons for giving the increases.
From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, salaries for all
positions under this section are subject to section 1 of this act.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.03.040 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 5 and 2010 c 1 s 5
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Subject to section 1 of this act, the directors of the several
departments and members of the several boards and commissions, whose
salaries are fixed by the governor and the chief executive officers of
the agencies named in RCW 43.03.028(1) as now or hereafter amended
shall each severally receive such salaries, payable in monthly
installments, as shall be fixed by the governor or the appropriate
salary fixing authority, in an amount not to exceed the recommendations
of the department of personnel. From February 18, 2009, through June
30, ((2011)) 2013, a salary or wage increase shall not be granted to
any position under this section, except that increases may be granted
for positions for which the employer has demonstrated difficulty
retaining qualified employees if the following conditions are met:
(1) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources;
((and))
(2) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision
(([of])) of client services; and
(3) For any state agency of the executive branch, not including
institutions of higher education, the salary increase is approved by
the director of the office of financial management.
Any agency granting a salary increase from February 15, 2010,
through June 30, 2011, to a position under this section shall submit a
report to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later than July
31, 2011, detailing the positions for which salary increases were
granted, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the
increases.
Any agency granting a salary increase from July 1, 2011, through
June 30, 2013, to a position under this section shall submit a report
to the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 31, 2012, and July
31, 2013, detailing the positions for which salary increases were
granted during the preceding fiscal year, the size of the increases,
and the reasons for giving the increases.

Sec. 9 RCW 41.60.150 and 2010 c 1 s 6 are each amended to read as
follows:
Other than suggestion awards and incentive pay unit awards,
agencies shall have the authority to recognize employees, either
individually or as a class, for accomplishments including outstanding
achievements, safety performance, longevity, outstanding public
service, or service as employee suggestion evaluators and implementors.
Recognition awards may not exceed two hundred dollars in value per
award. Such awards may include, but not be limited to, cash or such
items as pen and desk sets, plaques, pins, framed certificates, clocks,
and calculators. Award costs shall be paid by the agency giving the
award. From February 15, 2010, through June 30, ((2011)) 2013,
recognition awards may not be given in the form of cash or cash
equivalents such as gift certificates or gift cards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) Notwithstanding sections 4 through 8 of
this act, during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium institutions of higher
education may grant a wage or salary increase for additional academic
responsibilities during the summer quarter if the following conditions
are met:
(a) The salary increase can be paid within existing resources; and
(b) The salary increase will not adversely impact the provision of
client services.
(2) Any institution granting a wage or salary increase under this
section from July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2013, shall submit a report
to the fiscal committees of the legislature by July 31, 2012, and July
31, 2013, detailing the positions for which salary increases were
granted, the size of the increases, and the reasons for giving the
increases.

Sec. 11 RCW 41.06.560 and 2010 c 2 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
From February 15, 2010, until June 30, ((2011)) 2013, no monetary
performance-based awards or incentives may be granted by the director
or employers to employees covered by rules adopted under this section.
This section does not prohibit the payment of awards provided for in
chapter 41.60 RCW.
From July 1, 2011, until June 30, 2013, no performance-based awards
or incentives may be granted by the director or employers to employees
pursuant to a performance management confirmation granted by the
department of personnel under WAC 357-37-055.

Sec. 12 RCW 41.04.340 and 2002 c 354 s 227 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An attendance incentive program is established for all eligible
employees. As used in this section the term "eligible employee" means
any employee of the state, other than eligible employees of the
community and technical colleges and the state board for community and
technical colleges identified in RCW 28B.50.553, and teaching and
research faculty at the state and regional universities and The
Evergreen State College, entitled to accumulate sick leave and for whom
accurate sick leave records have been maintained. No employee may
receive compensation under this section for any portion of sick leave
accumulated at a rate in excess of one day per month. The state and
regional universities and The Evergreen State College shall maintain
complete and accurate sick leave records for all teaching and research
faculty.
(2) In January of the year following any year in which a minimum of
sixty days of sick leave is accrued, and each January thereafter, any
eligible employee may receive remuneration for unused sick leave
accumulated in the previous year at a rate equal to one day's monetary
compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick
leave in excess of sixty days. Sick leave for which compensation has
been received shall be deducted from accrued sick leave at the rate of
four days for every one day's monetary compensation.
From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, the rate of monetary
compensation for the purposes of this subsection shall not be reduced
by any temporary salary reduction.
(3) At the time of separation from state service due to retirement
or death, an eligible employee or the employee's estate may elect to
receive remuneration at a rate equal to one day's current monetary
compensation of the employee for each four full days of accrued sick
leave. From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, the rate of monetary
compensation for the purposes of this subsection shall not be reduced
by any temporary salary reduction.
(4) Remuneration or benefits received under this section shall not
be included for the purpose of computing a retirement allowance under
any public retirement system in this state.
(5) Except as provided in subsections (7) through (9) of this
section for employees not covered by chapter 41.06 RCW, this section
shall be administered, and rules shall be adopted to carry out its
purposes, by the director of personnel for persons subject to chapter
41.06 RCW: PROVIDED, That determination of classes of eligible
employees shall be subject to approval by the office of financial
management.
(6) Should the legislature revoke any remuneration or benefits
granted under this section, no affected employee shall be entitled
thereafter to receive such benefits as a matter of contractual right.
(7) In lieu of remuneration for unused sick leave at retirement as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, an agency head or designee
may with equivalent funds, provide eligible employees with a benefit
plan that provides for reimbursement for medical expenses. This plan
shall be implemented only after consultation with affected groups of
employees. For eligible employees covered by chapter 41.06 RCW,
procedures for the implementation of these plans shall be adopted by
the director of personnel. For eligible employees exempt from chapter
41.06 RCW, and classified employees who have opted out of coverage of
chapter 41.06 RCW as provided in RCW 41.56.201, implementation
procedures shall be adopted by an agency head having jurisdiction over
the employees.
(8) Implementing procedures adopted by the director of personnel or
agency heads shall require that each medical expense plan authorized by
subsection (7) of this section apply to all eligible employees in any
one of the following groups: (a) Employees in an agency; (b) employees
in a major organizational subdivision of an agency; (c) employees at a
major operating location of an agency; (d) exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of an elected or appointed Washington state executive; (e)
employees of the Washington state senate; (f) employees of the
Washington state house of representatives; (g) classified employees in
a bargaining unit established by the director of personnel; or (h)
other group of employees defined by an agency head that is not designed
to provide an individual-employee choice regarding participation in a
medical expense plan. However, medical expense plans for eligible
employees in any of the groups under (a) through (h) of this subsection
who are covered by a collective bargaining agreement shall be
implemented only by written agreement with the bargaining unit's
exclusive representative and a separate medical expense plan may be
provided for unrepresented employees.
(9) Medical expense plans authorized by subsection (7) of this
section must require as a condition of participation in the plan that
employees in the group affected by the plan sign an agreement with the
employer. The agreement must include a provision to hold the employer
harmless should the United States government find that the employer or
the employee is in debt to the United States as a result of the
employee not paying income taxes due on the equivalent funds placed
into the plan, or as a result of the employer not withholding or
deducting a tax, assessment, or other payment on the funds as required
by federal law. The agreement must also include a provision that
requires an eligible employee to forfeit remuneration under subsection
(3) of this section if the employee belongs to a group that has been
designated to participate in the medical expense plan permitted under
this section and the employee refuses to execute the required
agreement.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.01.041 and 1985 c 292 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Officers and employees referred to in RCW 43.01.040 whose
employment is terminated by their death, reduction in force,
resignation, dismissal, or retirement, and who have accrued vacation
leave as specified in RCW 43.01.040 or 43.01.044, shall be paid
therefor under their contract of employment, or their estate if they
are deceased, or if the employee in case of voluntary resignation has
provided adequate notice of termination. Annual leave accumulated
under RCW 43.01.044 is not to be included in the computation of
retirement benefits. From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, the
amount of pay received by an employee under the provisions of this
section shall not be reduced by any temporary salary reduction.
Should the legislature revoke any benefits or rights provided under
chapter 292, Laws of 1985, no affected officer or employee shall be
entitled thereafter to receive such benefits or exercise such rights as
a matter of contractual right.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 The director of the department of personnel
and the director of the department of retirement systems shall adopt
rules as necessary to implement the temporary salary reductions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---