BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.135.010 and 2005 c 72 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The people of the state of Washington hereby find and declare:
(1) The continuing increases in our state tax burden and the
corresponding growth of state government is contrary to the interest of
the people of the state of Washington.
(2) It is necessary to limit the rate of growth of state government
while assuring adequate funding of essential services, including basic
education as defined by the legislature.
(3) The current budgetary system in the state of Washington lacks
stability. The system encourages crisis budgeting and results in
cutbacks during lean years and overspending during surplus years.
(4) It is therefore the intent of this chapter to:
(a) Establish a limit on state expenditures that will assure that
the growth rate of state expenditures does not exceed the growth rate
((in Washington personal income)) of inflation and state population;
(b) Assure that local governments are provided funds adequate to
render those services deemed essential by their citizens;
(c) Assure that the state does not impose responsibility on local
governments for new programs or increased levels of service under
existing programs unless the costs thereof are paid by the state;
(d) Provide for adjustment of the limit when costs of a program are
transferred between the state and another political entity;
(e) Establish a procedure for exceeding this limit in emergency
situations;
(f) Provide for voter approval of tax increases; and
(g) Avoid overfunding and underfunding state programs by providing
stability, consistency, and long-range planning.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.135.025 and 2009 c 479 s 35 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state shall not expend from the general fund during any
fiscal year state moneys in excess of the state expenditure limit
established under this chapter.
(2) Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW
((43.135.035)) 43.135.034 or pursuant to an appropriation under RCW
43.135.045(2), the state treasurer shall not issue or redeem any check,
warrant, or voucher that will result in a state general fund
expenditure for any fiscal year in excess of the state expenditure
limit established under this chapter. A violation of this subsection
constitutes a violation of RCW 43.88.290 and shall subject the state
treasurer to the penalties provided in RCW 43.88.300.
(3) The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the
previous fiscal year's state expenditure limit increased by a
percentage rate that equals the fiscal growth factor.
(4) For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, ((2009)) 2012, the phrase "the previous
fiscal year's state expenditure limit" means the total state
expenditures from the state general fund((, the public safety and
education account, the health services account, the violence reduction
and drug enforcement account, the student achievement fund, the water
quality account, and the equal justice subaccount)) and related funds,
not including federal funds, for the fiscal year beginning July 1,
((2008)) 2011, plus the fiscal growth factor.
(5) A state expenditure limit committee is established for the
purpose of determining and adjusting the state expenditure limit as
provided in this chapter. The members of the state expenditure limit
committee are the director of financial management, the attorney
general or the attorney general's designee, and the chairs and ranking
minority members of the senate committee on ways and means and the
house of representatives committee on ways and means. All actions of
the state expenditure limit committee taken pursuant to this chapter
require an affirmative vote of at least four members.
(6) Each November, the state expenditure limit committee shall
adjust the expenditure limit for the preceding fiscal year based on
actual expenditures and known changes in the fiscal growth factor and
then project an expenditure limit for the next two fiscal years. If,
by November 30th, the state expenditure limit committee has not adopted
the expenditure limit adjustment and projected expenditure limit as
provided in subsection (5) of this section, the attorney general or his
or her designee shall adjust or project the expenditure limit, as
necessary.
(7) "Fiscal growth factor" means the average ((growth in state
personal income for the prior ten fiscal years)) of the sum of
inflation and state population change for each of the prior three
fiscal years.
(8) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for the United States for each fiscal year as published by the
federal bureau of labor statistics.
(9) "Population change" means the percentage change in state
population for each fiscal year as reported by the office of financial
management.
(10) "General fund" means the state general fund.
(11) "Related funds" means the education legacy trust account and
the Washington opportunity pathways account.

--- END ---