BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08A.010 and 2004 c 54 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A family that includes an adult who has received temporary
assistance for needy families for sixty months after July 27, 1997,
shall be ineligible for further temporary assistance for needy families
assistance.
(2) For the purposes of applying the rules of this section, the
department shall count any month in which an adult family member
received a temporary assistance for needy families cash assistance
grant unless the assistance was provided when the family member was a
minor child and not the head of the household or married to the head of
the household or if the family was not engaged in work or work
activities for good cause provided in RCW 74.08A.270(1).
(3) The department shall refer recipients who require specialized
assistance to appropriate department programs, crime victims' programs
through the department of ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce, or the crime victims' compensation program of
the department of labor and industries.
(4) The department may exempt a recipient and the recipient's
family from the application of subsection (1) of this section by reason
of hardship or if the recipient meets the family violence options of
section 402(A)(7) of Title IVA of the federal social security act as
amended by P.L. 104-193. The number of recipients and their families
exempted from subsection (1) of this section for a fiscal year shall
not exceed twenty percent of the average monthly number of recipients
and their families to which assistance is provided under the temporary
assistance for needy families program.
(5) The department shall not exempt a recipient and his or her
family from the application of subsection (1) of this section until
after the recipient has received fifty-two months of assistance under
this chapter.
(6) Beginning on October 31, 2005, the department shall provide
transitional food stamp assistance for a period of five months to a
household that ceases to receive temporary assistance for needy
families assistance and is not in sanction status. If necessary, the
department shall extend the household's food stamp certification until
the end of the transition period.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.08A.270 and 2007 c 289 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Good cause reasons for failure to participate in WorkFirst
program components include: (a) Situations where the recipient is a
parent or other relative personally providing care for a child under
the age of six years, and formal or informal child care, or day care
for an incapacitated individual living in the same home as a dependent
child, is necessary for an individual to participate or continue
participation in the program or accept employment, and such care is not
available, and the department fails to provide such care; or (b) the
recipient is a parent with a child under the age of ((one)) two years.
(2) A parent claiming a good cause exemption from WorkFirst
participation under subsection (1)(b) of this section may be required
to participate in one or more of the following, up to a maximum total
of twenty hours per week, if such treatment, services, or training is
indicated by the comprehensive evaluation or other assessment:
(a) Mental health treatment;
(b) Alcohol or drug treatment;
(c) Domestic violence services; or
(d) Parenting education or parenting skills training, if available.
(3) The department shall: (a) Work with a parent claiming a good
cause exemption under subsection (1)(b) of this section to identify and
access programs and services designed to improve parenting skills and
promote child well-being, including but not limited to home visitation
programs and services; and (b) provide information on the availability
of home visitation services to temporary assistance for needy families
caseworkers, who shall inform clients of the availability of the
services. If desired by the client, the caseworker shall facilitate
appropriate referrals to providers of home visitation services. If a
participant does not participate on a voluntary basis, the participant
is not eligible for child care services provided in RCW 74.08A.340.
(4) Nothing in this section shall prevent a recipient from
participating in the WorkFirst program on a voluntary basis.
(5) A parent is eligible for a good cause exemption under
subsection (1)(b) of this section for a maximum total of ((twelve))
twenty-four months over the parent's lifetime.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
May 1, 2011.

--- END ---