BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that, as
a result of the significant fiscal crisis facing the state, the highest
priority for the allocation of the state's limited fiscal resources is
providing for the education of our children, preserving critical safety
net programs for the most vulnerable, and protecting our valuable
natural resources.
Further, the legislature finds the collective bargaining agreements
negotiated by the governor for the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium are
neither financially feasible for the state nor do they give the
legislature the necessary flexibility to properly prioritize competing
needs within the budget.
Specifically, the legislature finds the following provisions
contrary to the needs of citizens that depend upon vital state programs
and taxpayers that expect lawmakers to best prioritize existing funds:
(1) Employee health care premiums, which limit employees to paying
fifteen percent of the premium share, a percentage well below the
private sector average;
(2) Step salary increases, which provide thousands of employees up
to five percent annual raises over the course of the next biennium;
(3) Limitations on health benefit designs, which restrict
innovations in health care delivery and attempts to bend the cost
curve;
(4) Temporary salary reductions, which do not carry forward savings
into future biennia; and
(5) Sick leave cash out, which costs the state budget millions of
dollars at a time when those funds could be put to more urgent uses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Pursuant to RCW 41.80.010, the legislature,
by this act, hereby rejects the governor's request for funds necessary
to implement the compensation and fringe benefit provisions of all
collective bargaining agreements under chapter 41.80 RCW agreed to by
the governor prior to March 1, 2011, for the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium.
The parties to the collective bargaining agreements are encouraged
to reconvene to reach an agreement that takes into account the
legislature's concerns and better recognizes the state's fiscal
situation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---