BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The office of financial management shall
prepare a report to be used to initiate a comprehensive, long-range
planning process for the future of McNeil Island during the 2013-2015
biennium.
(2) The report on the initiation of the process must, at a minimum,
include three parts:
(a) Resolution of ownership issues. The first part of the report
must provide information on resolution of ownership issues, and must
include, but not be limited to:
(i) Consultation with the federal government about its current
legal requirements associated with the island, its views about
potential future uses of the island, and its potential willingness to
transfer the land to state or tribal ownership;
(ii) Ownership inventory of developed land; undeveloped land; open
space and tidelands, with respect to their ecological and biological
significance; and buildings and structures, together with restrictions,
reversionary interests, and other limitations;
(iii) A description of the federal and state decision-making
processes that would need to be followed to achieve a change of use or
ownership.
(b) Data and inventory information. The second part of the report
must be composed of a compilation of relevant data and inventory
information important to conducting the future long-range comprehensive
planning process, and must include, but not be limited to:
(i) Ownership of property and facilities currently associated with
transportation to and from McNeil Island;
(ii) Identification of potential tribal treaty interests in lands
and immediately surrounding waters and tidelands;
(iii) A description of the significance of the island and
surrounding waters, tidelands, and bedlands as a strategic resource for
protection and enhancement of south Puget Sound water quality and
marine resources;
(iv) Inventory of habitat protection areas, together with
management responsibilities for them, and potential future additions;
(v) Information from the department of social and health services
and Pierce county about land use and public safety needs;
(vi) Preliminary inventory of potential recreational opportunities
for the general public;
(vii) Preliminary inventory of historic and archaeological
resources which might be considered for protection and interpretation,
including tribal and nontribal grave sites; and
(viii) Preliminary identification of potential revenue sources for
potential future uses of the island.
(c) Development and recommendation for a comprehensive, long-range
planning process. The third part of the report must contain options
for, and a recommendation for convening an open, inclusive process for
the development of a comprehensive plan for the future of the island
and associated tidelands, shorelands, and bedlands associated with it,
including compatibility with surrounding areas. The recommended
planning process must, at a minimum, assure inclusion of the following:
(i) Use of information developed pursuant to (a) and (b) of this
subsection (2);
(ii) Availability of relevant scientific and technical information;
(iii) Full recognition and consideration of the strategic
importance of the island and surrounding marine waters to south Puget
Sound health and recovery;
(iv) Identification of priority recreation opportunities for the
public;
(v) Identification of funding needs for various existing and
proposed uses together with potential revenue sources;
(vi) Development of recommendations concerning whether a change in
ownership of the property should be sought, together with options for
such potential change;
(vii) Development of recommendations to meet short and long-range
public safety and security needs;
(viii) Development of recommendations for priority habitat
protection, including coordination with existing habitat protection
areas, Puget Sound recovery plans, and future management of the
proposed Nisqually reach aquatic reserve currently being developed;
(ix) Development of recommendations for historic, archaeological,
architecture, and art preservation and interpretation, including
special consideration of native and nonnative grave sites, and
consultation with the McNeil Island historical society; and
(x) Identification of potential economic uses compatible with
habitat, recreation, and historic and archaeological preservation uses.
(3) The office of financial management may use its own staff, other
public agency and tribal staff, or contract for services, and may
create a work group of knowledgeable agencies, organizations, and
individuals to assist in preparing the report.
(4) The office of financial management shall engage in broad
consultation with interested parties including, but not limited to:
(a) Federal agencies with relevant responsibilities;
(b) Tribal governments;
(c) State agencies;
(d) Local governments and communities in the area, including the
Anderson Island community, Steilacoom, and Pierce county; and
(e) Interested private organizations and individuals.
(5) The report must be submitted to the governor and appropriate
committees of the legislature by October 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 There is appropriated to the office of
financial management from the aquatic lands enhancement account the sum
of one hundred thousand dollars for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2012, to accomplish the purposes set forth in section 1 of this act.

--- END ---