BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that local,
regional and intercity public transportation provides many economical,
social, and environmental benefits to the citizens of this state
including, but not limited to:
(a) Creating jobs associated with the design, construction, and
operation of transit systems;
(b) Providing transportation choices for commuters to reach their
jobs, homes, and destinations;
(c) Maintaining a competitive edge for Washington state to
companies and individuals considering relocation;
(d) Catalyzing the development of sustainable communities;
(e) Decreasing household expenses associated with personal vehicle
transportation and ownership;
(f) Providing transportation choices for vulnerable populations and
those unable to own or operate a personal vehicle;
(g) Decreasing greenhouse gas emissions associated with the
transportation sector;
(h) Decreasing air pollution-causing congestion on our roadways;
and
(i) Decreasing water pollution associated with storm water runoff.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to provide robust state and
local funding options for the financing of capital improvements and
operations of local, regional, and intercity public transportation in
order to:
(a) Generate sufficient revenue to meet transit ridership and
projected demand;
(b) Allow diverse funding sources to withstand economic
fluctuations; and
(c) Provide local choices in revenue sources to meet the values and
economic profiles of local jurisdictions.

Sec. 2 RCW 36.73.040 and 2008 c 122 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A transportation benefit district is a quasi-municipal
corporation, an independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of
Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a "taxing
district" within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state
Constitution.
(2) A transportation benefit district constitutes a body corporate
and possesses all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes
as well as all other powers that may now or hereafter be specifically
conferred by statute, including, but not limited to, the authority to
hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into contracts, to
acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property, and to sue
and be sued. Public works contract limits applicable to the
jurisdiction that established the district apply to the district.
(3) To carry out the purposes of this chapter, and subject to the
provisions of RCW 36.73.065, a district is authorized to impose the
following taxes, fees, charges, and tolls:
(a) A sales and use tax in accordance with RCW 82.14.0455;
(b) A vehicle fee in accordance with RCW 82.80.140;
(c) A fee or charge in accordance with RCW 36.73.120. However, if
a county or city within the district area is levying a fee or charge
for a transportation improvement, the fee or charge ((shall)) must be
credited against the amount of the fee or charge imposed by the
district. Developments consisting of less than twenty residences are
exempt from the fee or charge under RCW 36.73.120; and
(d) Vehicle tolls on state routes, city streets, or county roads,
within the boundaries of the district((, unless otherwise prohibited by
law. However, consistent with RCW 47.56.820, the vehicle toll must
first be authorized by the legislature if the toll is imposed on a
state route)). The department of transportation ((shall)) must
administer the collection of vehicle tolls authorized on state routes,
unless otherwise specified in law or by contract, and the state
transportation commission, or its successor, may approve, set, and
impose the tolls in amounts sufficient to implement the district's
transportation improvement finance plan. The district ((shall)) must
administer the collection of vehicle tolls authorized on city streets
or county roads, and shall set and impose the tolls in amounts
sufficient to implement the district's transportation improvement plan.
((However, consistent with RCW 47.56.850, the vehicle toll, including
any change in an existing toll rate, must first be reviewed and
approved by the tolling authority designated in RCW 47.56.850 if the
toll, or change in toll rate, would have a significant impact, as
determined by the tolling authority, on the operation of any state
facility.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The governing body of any public
transportation agency may submit an authorizing proposition to the
voters and, if approved, for the sole purpose of providing funds for
the operation, maintenance, or capital needs of a public transportation
agency or public transportation limited to persons with special needs
under RCW 36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, impose a vehicle license fee, which
may vary according to the miles traveled by the vehicle, on each
vehicle registered in the boundaries of the transportation agency
subject to vehicle license fees under RCW 46.17.350(1) (a), (d), (e),
(f), (g), (h), (j), (l), (n), (o), (p), or (q) and for each vehicle
subject to gross weight license fees under RCW 46.17.355 with an
unladen weight of six thousand pounds or less.
(2) A public transportation agency must contract with the
department as provided under subsection (6) of this section for the
collection of a vehicle license fee.
(3) A vehicle license fee imposed under this section may not be
assessed until six months after approval.
(4) A vehicle license fee imposed under this section applies only
for vehicle registration renewals and is effective upon the
registration renewal date as provided by the department.
(5) The following vehicles are exempt from the vehicle license fee
imposed under this section:
(a) Farm tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and
46.04.181;
(b) Off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365;
(c) Nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW 46.09.310;
(d) Vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW and the
international registration plan; and
(e) Snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.
(6) Whenever the department enters into a contract with a public
transportation agency for the collection of vehicle license fees
authorized under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The contract must require that the public transportation agency
provide any information specified by the department to identify the
vehicle owners who owe the vehicle license fees, and must specify that
it is the responsibility of the public transportation agency to ensure
that the vehicle license fees are appropriately applied;
(b) The department is not responsible for the collection of vehicle
license fees until a date agreed to by both parties as specified in the
contract;
(c) The department must deduct a percentage amount as provided in
the contract, not to exceed three percent of the fees collected,
necessary to reimburse the department for the costs incurred for the
collection of the vehicle license fees; and
(d) The department must remit remaining proceeds to the custody of
the state treasurer. The state treasurer must distribute the proceeds
to the public transportation agency on a monthly basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The governing body of any public
transportation agency may submit an authorizing proposition to the
voters and, if approved, for the sole purpose of providing funds for
the operation, maintenance, or capital needs of a public transportation
agency or public transportation limited to persons with special needs
under RCW 36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, impose a vehicle excise tax based
on fuel efficiency as measured by the estimated, combined (fifty-five
percent city and forty-five percent highway) fuel economy rating for
vehicles, as reported in the United States environmental protection
agency and United States department of energy "fuel economy guide"
since the 1978 model year.
(2) A public transportation agency must contract with the
department as provided under subsection (5) of this section for the
collection of a vehicle excise tax based on fuel efficiency.
(3) A vehicle excise tax based on fuel efficiency imposed under
this section may not be assessed until six months after approval.
(4) A vehicle excise tax based on fuel efficiency imposed under
this section applies only at the time of vehicle registration renewal
and is effective upon the registration renewal date as provided by the
department.
(5) Whenever the department enters into a contract with a public
transportation agency for the collection of vehicle excise taxes based
on fuel efficiency authorized under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The contract must require that the public transportation agency
provide any information specified by the department to identify the
vehicle owners who owe vehicle excise taxes based on fuel efficiency,
and must specify that it is the responsibility of the public
transportation agency to ensure that the vehicle excise tax based on
fuel efficiency is appropriately applied;
(b) The department is not responsible for the collection of vehicle
excise taxes based on fuel efficiency until a date agreed to by both
parties as specified in the contract;
(c) The department must deduct a percentage amount as provided in
the contract, not to exceed three percent of the taxes collected,
necessary to reimburse the department for the costs incurred for the
collection of the vehicle excise tax based on fuel efficiency; and
(d) The department must remit remaining proceeds to the custody of
the state treasurer. The state treasurer must distribute the proceeds
to the public transportation agency on a monthly basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The legislative authority of any county
may submit an authorizing proposition to the voters and, if approved,
may fix and impose a tax at up to the rate specified in the authorizing
proposition on the selling price on the retail sale of motor vehicle
fuel and special fuel within the applicable jurisdiction solely for the
purpose of providing funds for the operation, maintenance, or capital
needs of a public transportation agency or public transportation
limited to persons with special needs under RCW 36.57.130 and
36.57A.180 that is located within the boundaries of the county.
(2) An election held under this section must be held not more than
twelve months before the date on which the proposed tax is to be
levied. The ballot setting forth the proposition must state the tax
rate that is proposed.
(3) The tax imposed in this section must be collected and paid to
the jurisdiction but once in respect to any motor vehicle fuel or
special fuel. This tax is in addition to any other tax authorized or
imposed by law.
(4) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Motor vehicle fuel" has the meaning given in RCW 82.36.010;
(b) "Special fuel" has the meaning given in RCW 82.38.020; and
(c) "Motor vehicle" has the meaning given in RCW 82.36.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) For the privilege of using in this state
any motor vehicle, unless the motor vehicle is specifically exempted,
the governing body of any public transportation agency may submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters and, if approved, for the sole
purpose of providing funds for the operation, maintenance, or capital
needs of public transportation systems or public transportation limited
to persons with special needs under RCW 36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, fix
and impose a motor vehicle excise tax. The rate or rates, which may
vary according to the value of the motor vehicle, of any such tax may
not exceed the rate or rates specified in the authorizing proposition
on the value of every motor vehicle registered within the boundaries of
the public transportation agency for the privilege of using a motor
vehicle. Rental cars as defined in RCW 46.04.465 are exempt from the
taxes imposed by this section. Valuation of motor vehicles for
purposes of any motor vehicle excise tax imposed under this section
must be consistent with section 7 of this act.
(2) A motor vehicle excise tax imposed by a public transportation
agency does not take effect until at least six months after the passage
of the proposition authorizing the tax. Upon passage of the
proposition imposing a motor vehicle excise tax by a public
transportation agency, the agency shall immediately notify the
department.
(3) If a public transportation agency imposes a motor vehicle
excise tax, it must provide a credit against its tax imposed under
subsection (1) of this section for any preexisting motor vehicle excise
tax to the extent the total motor vehicle excise tax on a motor vehicle
would exceed one percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The tax on a truck-type power or
trailing unit shall equal the latest purchase price of the truck-type
power or trailing unit, excluding applicable federal excise taxes,
state and local sales or use taxes, transportation or shipping costs,
or preparatory or delivery costs, multiplied by the following
percentage based on year of service of the vehicle since the last sale.
The latest purchase year is considered the first year of service.

YEAR OF SERVICE PERCENTAGE

1 100

2 81

3 67

4 55

5 45

6 37

7 30

8 25

9 20

10 16

11 13

12 11

13 9

14 7

15 3

16 or older 0

(2) The reissuance of title and registration for a truck-type power
or trailing unit because of the installation of body or special
equipment must be treated as a sale, and the value of the truck-type
power or trailing unit at that time, as determined by the department
from such information as may be available, is considered the latest
purchase price.
(3)(a) The tax on a motor vehicle, other than a truck-type power or
trailing unit, shall be the manufacturer's base suggested retail price
of the vehicle when first offered for sale as a new vehicle, excluding
any optional equipment, applicable federal excise taxes, state and
local sales or use taxes, transportation or shipping costs, or
preparatory or delivery costs, multiplied by the applicable percentage
listed in this subsection based on year of service of the vehicle.
(b) If the manufacturer's base suggested retail price is
unavailable or otherwise unascertainable at the time of initial
registration in this state, the department must determine a value
equivalent to a manufacturer's base suggested retail price by using any
information that may be available, including any guidebook, report, or
compendium of recognized standing in the automotive industry or the
selling price and year of sale of the vehicle. The department may use
an appraisal by the county assessor. In valuing a vehicle for which
the current value or selling price is not indicative of the value of
similar vehicles of the same year and model, the department must
establish a value that more closely represents the average value of
similar vehicles of the same year and model.
(c) To determine the tax of a vehicle under (a) or (b) of this
subsection, the department must multiply the amount determined in (a)
or (b) of this subsection by the following applicable percentage based
on the year of service of the vehicle:

YEAR OF SERVICE PERCENTAGE

1 100

2 81

3 72

4 63

5 55

6 47

7 41

8 36

9 32

10 27

11 26

12 24

13 23

14 21

15 16

16 or older 10

(4) For purposes of this chapter, value excludes value attributable
to modifications of a motor vehicle and equipment that are designed to
facilitate the use or operation of the motor vehicle by a person with
a disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The department must administer and collect
any motor vehicle excise tax imposed under section 6 of this act. A
public transportation agency imposing a motor vehicle excise tax must
enter into a contract with the department. The contract must contain
provisions that fully recover the costs to the department of licensing
for collection and administration of the fee and the payment of motor
vehicle excise tax refunds. The department must remit remaining
proceeds to the public transportation agency by the twentieth day
following the end of each calendar quarter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 For the purposes of this chapter, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(2) "Motor vehicle" means all motor vehicles, trailers and
semitrailers used, or of the type designed primarily to be used, upon
the public streets and highways, for the convenience or pleasure of the
owner, or for the conveyance, for hire or otherwise, of persons or
property, including fixed loads and facilities for human habitation.
(3) "Motor vehicle" does not include (a) vehicles carrying exempt
licenses; (b) dock and warehouse tractors and their cars or trailers,
lumber carriers of the type known as spiders, and all other automotive
equipment not designed primarily for use upon public streets, or
highways; (c) motor vehicles or their trailers used entirely upon
private property; (d) travel trailers as defined in RCW 82.50.010; (e)
motor vehicles owned by nonresident military personnel of the armed
forces of the United States stationed in the state of Washington
provided personnel were also nonresident at the time of their entry
into military service; or (f) motor vehicles registered under the
provisions of the international registration plan under chapter 46.87
RCW.
(4) "Public transportation" means the transportation of passengers
and any incidental baggage by a public transportation agency or by any
service provider to a public transportation agency, together with
passenger terminals, access facilities, parking facilities, rights-of-way, and street and road and other improvements or facilities to
provide for passenger and vehicular access to and from people-moving
facilities and systems.
(5)(a) "Public transportation agency" means any city exercising
authorities pursuant to RCW 35.92.060, any county which has created an
unincorporated transportation benefit area pursuant to RCW 36.57.100
and 36.57.110, any public transportation benefit area established
pursuant to RCW 36.57A.080 and 36.57A.090, any county transportation
authority established pursuant to chapter 36.57 RCW, and any
metropolitan municipal corporation within a county with a population of
one million or more established pursuant to chapter 35.58 RCW.
(b) After January 1, 2016, "public transportation agency" also
means any regional transit authority established pursuant to RCW
81.112.030.
(6) "Truck-type power or trailing unit" means any vehicle that is
subject to the fees under RCW 46.16A.455 except vehicles with an
unladen weight of ten thousand pounds or less, RCW 46.16A.425.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1)(a) For the purposes of this chapter, in
addition to the motor vehicle exclusions under section 9 of this act,
"motor vehicle" does not include passenger motor vehicles used
primarily for commuter ride sharing and ride sharing for persons with
special transportation needs, as defined in RCW 46.74.010. The
registered owner of one of these vehicles must notify the department of
licensing upon termination of primary use of the vehicle in commuter
ride sharing or ride sharing for persons with special transportation
needs and is liable for the tax imposed by this chapter, prorated on
the remaining months for which the vehicle is licensed.
(b) To qualify for the tax exemption in (a) of this subsection,
those passenger motor vehicles with five or six passengers, including
the driver, used for commuter ride-sharing, must be operated either
within the state's eight largest counties that are required to develop
commute trip reduction plans as directed by chapter 70.94 RCW or in
other counties, or cities and towns within those counties, that elect
to adopt and implement a commute trip reduction plan. Additionally at
least one of the following conditions must apply: (i) The vehicle must
be operated by a public transportation agency for the general public;
or (ii) the vehicle must be used by a major employer, as defined in RCW
70.94.524 as an element of its commute trip reduction program for their
employees; or (iii) the vehicle must be owned and operated by
individual employees and must be registered either with the employer as
part of its commute trip reduction program or with a public
transportation agency serving the area where the employees live or
work. Individual employee owned and operated motor vehicles require
certification that the vehicle is registered with a major employer or
a public transportation agency. Major employers who own and operate
motor vehicles for their employees must certify that the commuter ride-sharing arrangement conforms to a carpool/vanpool element contained
within their commute trip reduction program.
(c) A public transportation agency may develop an exemption from
the motor vehicle excise tax for the registered owners of vehicles
residing within the boundaries of the public transportation agency who:
(i) Are sixty-two years old or older at the time payment of the tax is
due and whose household income for the previous calendar year is less
than an amount prescribed by the public transportation agency; or (ii)
have a physical disability.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Any excise tax imposed under section 6 of
this act is due and payable to the department or its agents at the time
of registration renewal of a motor vehicle. Whenever an application is
made to the department or its agents for a license renewal for a motor
vehicle there must be collected, in addition to the amount of the
renewal license fee, the amount of any excise tax authorized by this
chapter. The excise tax must be collected each registration year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The county auditor or department must give
to each person paying any excise tax imposed under this chapter a
receipt which sufficiently designates and identifies the vehicle with
respect to which the tax is paid. The receipt may be incorporated in
the receipt given for the motor vehicle license fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) Whenever any person has paid a motor
vehicle license fee, and any excise tax imposed under this chapter, and
the director determines that the payor is entitled to a refund of the
entire amount of the license fee as provided by law, then the payor is
also entitled to a refund of the entire excise tax collected under the
provisions of this chapter. In case the director determines that any
person is entitled to a refund of only a part of the license fee so
paid, the payor is entitled to a refund of the difference, if any,
between the excise tax collected and that which should have been
collected.
(2) In case no claim is to be made for the refund of the license
fee, but claim is made by any person that he or she has paid an
erroneously excessive amount of excise tax, the department must
determine in the manner generally provided in this chapter the amount
of the excess, if any, that has been paid and must certify to the state
treasurer that the person is entitled to a refund in such amount.
(3) In any case where due to error, a person has been required to
pay an excise tax pursuant to this chapter and a vehicle license fee
pursuant to Title 46 RCW which amounts to an overpayment of ten dollars
or more, the person is entitled to a refund of the entire amount of the
overpayment, regardless of whether or not a refund of the overpayment
has been requested. Conversely, if due to error, the department or its
agents has failed to collect the full amount of the license fee and
excise tax due, which underpayment is in the amount of ten dollars or
more, the department must charge and collect the additional amount as
will constitute full payment of the tax.
(4) Any claim for refund of an erroneously excessive amount of
excise tax or overpayment of excise tax with a motor vehicle license
fee must be filed with the director within three years after the
claimed erroneous payment was made.
(5) If the department approves the claim it must notify the state
treasurer to that effect, and the treasurer must make approved refunds
from the account to which any motor vehicle excise taxes collected
under this chapter are paid into and mail or deliver the same to the
person entitled thereto.
(6) If the department, under section 7 of this act, determines a
value of a motor vehicle or a truck-type power or trailing unit, any
person who pays the motor vehicle excise tax under this chapter for
that vehicle may appeal the valuation to the department under chapter
34.05 RCW. If the taxpayer is successful on appeal, the department
shall refund the excess tax in the manner provided in this section.
(7) Any person making any false statement under which he or she
obtains any amount of refund to which he or she is not entitled under
the provisions of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Any duties required by this chapter to be
performed by the county auditor may be performed by any other person
designated by the director of licensing and authorized by him or her to
receive motor vehicle license fees and issue receipt therefor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 (1) A citizen advisory committee may be
created at the direction of any public transportation agency submitting
an authorizing proposition to the voters to implement any of the
revenue options authorized by this chapter. The public transportation
agency must appoint nine members to the committee, all of whom must be
permanent residents of the public transportation agency's service area.
Members of the committee must serve without receiving compensation.
(2) The citizen advisory committee must serve in an advisory
capacity to the public transportation agency on all matters related to
the imposition of one or more revenue options authorized by this
chapter including, but not limited to:
(a) The revenue option or options selected;
(b) The rate or amount of each revenue option; and
(c) The feasibility of providing discounts or exemptions.
(3) Any public transportation agency submitting an authorizing
proposition to the voters to implement any of the revenue options
authorized by this chapter must annually complete a report detailing
the expenditures of the proceeds of any revenue option or options
authorized by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Public transportation agencies are
authorized to pledge revenues from the vehicle license fee authorized
in section 3 of this act, the vehicle excise tax based on fuel
efficiency authorized in section 4 of this act, the sales tax
authorized in section 5 of this act, and the motor vehicle excise tax
authorized in section 6 of this act to the payment of general
obligation and revenue bonds issued for public transportation purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 This chapter may be known and cited as the
local transit act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Sections 3 through 17 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 This act takes effect August 1, 2011.

--- END ---