BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that efforts to combat
fraud and abuse in public assistance programs have failed to meet the
public's expectation for integrity and accountability around use of
their tax dollars. The legislature further finds that it is necessary
to fundamentally reorganize the fraud investigative activities within
the department of social and health services to ensure accountability
for beneficiaries, state employees, and vendors. The legislature
declares that in a time of shrinking resources, eliminating waste,
fraud, and abuse should be a top priority of the department, and this
can best be reflected in a newly organized, accountable, and proactive
fraud unit directly under the secretary's authority with the resources
necessary to combat fraud and to ensure the confidence of the public in
the critical social safety net programs it funds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(2) "Director" means the director of the office of program
integrity.
(3) "Disclosable information" means public information that (a) is
not exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW; and (b) does not
pertain to an ongoing investigation.
(4) "Fraud" or "abuse" means any intentional action, inaction, or
statements made by an individual for the purposes of obtaining public
assistance benefits to which he or she is not entitled or the illegal
misuse of public assistance benefits once obtained. This does not
include provider fraud as it relates to the department's administration
of funds under Title XIX of the federal social security act for which
the medicaid fraud control unit of the office of the attorney general
has jurisdiction.
(5) "Office" means the office of program integrity.
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The office of program integrity is created
within the department to provide a dedicated and accountable unit
directly responsible for the following tasks:
(1) Conducting and supervising independent and objective
investigations relating to allegations of fraud and abuse in any
program or service administered by the department including the child
care subsidy program administered jointly with the department of early
learning;
(2) Providing leadership and coordination in recommending policies
and procedures designed to detect and prevent fraud and abuse;
(3) Informing the secretary, governor, and legislature about
vulnerabilities and deficiencies relating to the detection and
prevention of fraud and abuse as may be discovered as a result of
completed investigations conducted or coordinated by the office;
(4) Ensuring that policy, practice, and information technology
systems are mitigating the risk for fraud and abuse and appropriate
referrals to law enforcement or prosecuting authorities are made when
fraud and abuse is suspected; and
(5) Assisting the fraud ombudsman in the state auditor's office
with his or her responsibilities in auditing and overseeing the
activities of the office of program integrity under section 9 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The director is the head of the office and
is selected by the secretary on the basis of integrity and must
demonstrate suitable capacity and experience in law enforcement
management, public administration, and criminal investigations. The
director shall report directly to the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The director shall:
(a) Conduct, supervise, and coordinate fraud and abuse
investigations and provide policy direction as it relates to program
integrity and fraud and abuse;
(b) Review proposed legislation and rules relating to the detection
and prevention of fraud and abuse in public assistance programs
administered by the department, and make recommendations for
improvement;
(c) Recommend policies for, and conduct, supervise, and coordinate,
relationships between other fraud units and federal, state, and local
governmental agencies, and nongovernmental entities, with respect to:
(i) Matters relating to the prevention and detection of fraud and
abuse in programs and operations administered by the department; or
(ii) The identification and prosecution of participants in the
fraud and abuse;
(d) Provide reports to the secretary, governor, and legislature
concerning the detection and prevention of fraud and abuse, and make
recommendations for improvement of the activities, including changes in
the application and eligibility processes for public assistance
programs to improve capacity and effectiveness of fraud and abuse
investigations;
(e) Ensure that front line employees of the office of program
integrity have a direct line of communication with the director to
address concerns pertaining to their duties and recommend changes to
improve the work product of the office;
(f) Develop a realistic funding model for adding necessary criminal
and fraud investigator staff in a budget neutral fashion;
(g) Develop policies and protocols to allow consistent and real-time review of all cash assistance programs administered by the
department to assure that benefits are being used for their statutorily
stated goals and analyze alternatives to the cash delivery system that
are consistent with federal law, cost effective, and can help ensure
that benefits are being used for appropriate purposes;
(h) Collaborate with other state agencies on common algorithms,
risk factors, models, and other data analytics to detect possible fraud
and abuse; and
(i) Manage fraud investigative tools and resources to effectively
balance them between field operations and data analytics.
(2) In carrying out the duties and responsibilities established in
this chapter, the director must refer all investigations in which the
director has found substantial evidence supporting a finding of a
violation of federal or state criminal law to the appropriate
prosecuting authority for possible criminal prosecution. The director
must collaborate with county prosecuting attorneys to increase
prosecution of welfare fraud cases and publicize convictions to serve
as an effective deterrent on fraud and abuse in public assistance
programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) The office of program integrity has the
authority to apply for and execute all warrants and serve process of
law issued by the courts in enforcing the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The office has the full authority to administer oaths and take
testimony, to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses
before the office, together with all books, memoranda, papers, and
other documents, articles, or instruments, and to compel the disclosure
by such witnesses of all facts known to them relative to the matters
under investigation.
(3) Subpoenas issued in adjudicative proceedings are governed by
RCW 34.05.588(1).
(4) Subpoenas issued in the conduct of investigations required or
authorized by other statutory provisions or necessary in the
enforcement of other statutory provisions are governed by RCW
34.05.588(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) In carrying out the provisions of this
chapter, the director shall have prompt access to all individuals,
records, electronic data, reports, audits, reviews, documents, and
other materials available to the department of revenue, department of
labor and industries, department of early learning, employment security
department, department of licensing, and any other government entity
that can be used to help facilitate investigations of fraud or abuse as
determined necessary by the director.
(2) Whenever information or assistance requested under subsection
(1) of this section is, in the judgment of the director, unreasonably
refused or not provided, the director must report the circumstances to
the secretary immediately.

Sec. 8 RCW 49.60.210 and 1992 c 118 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is an unfair practice for any employer, employment agency,
labor union, or other person to discharge, expel, or otherwise
discriminate against any person because he or she has opposed any
practices forbidden by this chapter, or because he or she has filed a
charge, testified, or assisted in any proceeding under this chapter.
(2) It is an unfair practice for a government agency or government
manager or supervisor to retaliate against a whistleblower as defined
in chapter 42.40 RCW.
(3) It is an unfair practice for any employer, employment agency,
labor union, government agency, government manager, or government
supervisor to discharge, expel, discriminate, or otherwise retaliate
against an individual assisting with an office of program integrity
investigation under chapter 43.--- RCW (the new chapter created in
section 10 of this act), unless the individual has willfully
disregarded the truth in providing information to the office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The auditor shall appoint a fraud ombudsman to oversee and
annually audit the work of the office of program integrity within the
department of social and health services. The ombudsman shall review
the fraud investigative work done by the office including cases filed
with local prosecuting authorities. The ombudsman shall also have
authority to investigate citizen complaints made to the auditor's
office related to fraud or abuse in any public assistance program. The
department of social and health services shall provide the ombudsman
with access to any relevant records it has in its possession related to
a fraud or abuse investigation as determined by the fraud ombudsman,
including access to historic and real-time electronic benefit transfer
card transaction data.
(2) The fraud ombudsman shall have access to front line personnel
in the office of program integrity for purposes of interviews and
evaluation.
(3) The fraud ombudsman must submit a report summarizing its
auditing activities of the office to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by November 30, 2012, and biennially thereafter. The
office of program integrity shall assist the ombudsman to the fullest
extent practicable in producing this report. The report shall contain
only disclosable information, including:
(a) A description of significant fraud or abuse, and of
vulnerabilities or deficiencies relating to the prevention and
detection of fraud or abuse, discovered as a result of investigations
completed during the reporting period;
(b) A description of corrective action taken by the department of
social and health services regarding fraud and abuse discovered as a
result of investigations conducted by the office of program integrity;
(c) Recommendations for improving the activities of the office of
program integrity with respect to the vulnerabilities or deficiencies
identified under (a) of this subsection;
(d) An identification of each significant recommendation described
in the previous reports on which corrective action has or has not been
completed;
(e) A summary of matters referred to prosecuting authorities during
the reporting period and the charges filed and convictions entered
during the reporting period that have resulted from referrals by the
office of program integrity;
(f) A description of the division of duties within the office of
program integrity between fraud early detection and criminal
investigative assignments and whether the office has appropriate
resources to adequately respond to referrals from the department, other
agencies, and the public concerning fraud or abuse;
(g) A description of the ease of access allowed by the office of
program integrity to all necessary data and personnel for purposes of
conducting the audit; and
(h) A determination of whether the director has met the
requirements in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---