BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 71A.20.020 and 1994 c 215 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following residential habilitation centers are permanently
established to provide services to persons with developmental
disabilities: Lakeland Village, located at Medical Lake, Spokane
county; Rainier School, located at Buckley, Pierce county; Yakima
Valley School, located at Selah, Yakima county; Fircrest School,
located at Seattle, King county; and Frances Haddon Morgan Children's
Center, located at Bremerton, Kitsap county.
(2)(a) The department shall conduct a study to determine the
feasibility of the privatization of the residential habilitation
centers described in this section. The department shall examine the
current nationwide nonprofit organizations and any private-public
partnerships that operate residential habilitation centers. As an
element of the study, the department shall review applicable state and
federal laws, as well as current and potential public and private
funding sources for residential habilitation centers. The department
shall provide recommendations regarding the implementation in
Washington state of residential habilitation centers operated by either
private organizations or a public-private partnership, and whether such
organizations or partnerships can deliver the same or better services
than are currently delivered by state-operated residential habilitation
centers.
(b) The department shall submit the study and its recommendations
to the appropriate committees of the legislature before June 30, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---