BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 101 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,923,000))
$29,934,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,444,000))
$30,465,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,316,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,683,000))
$61,715,000

Sec. 102 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,772,000))
$21,770,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,868,000))
$23,864,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,040,000))
$47,034,000

Sec. 103 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,249,000))
$4,248,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,691,000))
$4,689,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,940,000))
$8,937,000

Sec. 104 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,714,000))
$6,724,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,729,000))
$6,738,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,443,000))
$13,462,000

Sec. 105 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,472,000))
$1,506,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,466,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,938,000))
$2,972,000

Sec. 106 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COURT OF APPEALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,227,000))
$15,285,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,280,000))
$15,290,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,507,000))
$30,575,000

Sec. 107 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,619,000))
$50,692,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,174,000))
$50,235,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,551,000))
$2,532,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($248,000))
$390,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,383,000))
$42,414,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,414,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($150,389,000))
$151,677,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for school districts for petitions
to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030
and 28A.225.035. The office of the administrator for the courts shall
develop an interagency agreement with the superintendent of public
instruction to allocate the funding provided in this subsection.
Allocation of this money to school districts shall be based on the
number of petitions filed. This funding includes amounts school
districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW
28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or for the
performance of service of process for any hearing associated with RCW
28A.225.030.
(2)(a) $8,252,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $8,253,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for distribution
to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing
truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions.
The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile
court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution
formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than
average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties
with lower than average per-petition processing costs.
(b) Each fiscal year during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives and senate ways and means committees no
later than 60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are deemed
informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing
funds.
(3) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions
from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to
section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs
for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW
43.135.060.
(4) $265,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the office of public guardianship to
provide guardianship services for low-income incapacitated persons.
(5) $1,178,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for replacing computer equipment at
state courts and state judicial agencies.
(6) No later than September 30, 2011, the judicial information
systems committee shall provide a report to the legislature on the
recommendations of the case management feasibility study, including
plans for a replacement of the superior court management information
system (SCOMIS) and plans for completing the data exchange core system
component consistent with a complete data exchange standard. No later
than December 31, 2011, the judicial information systems committee
shall provide a report to the legislature on the status of the data
exchange, the procurement process for a SCOMIS replacement, and a case
management system that is designed to meet the requirements approved by
the superior courts and county clerks of all thirty-nine counties. The
legislature shall solicit input on both reports from judicial,
legislative, and executive stakeholders.
(7) In order to gather better data on juveniles in the criminal
justice system, the administrative office of the courts shall modify
the judgment and sentence form for juvenile and adult sentences to
include one or more check boxes indicating whether (a) the adult
superior court had original jurisdiction for a defendant who was
younger than eighteen years of age at the time the case was filed; (b)
the case was originally filed in juvenile court but transferred to
adult superior court jurisdiction; or (c) the case was originally filed
in adult superior court or transferred to adult superior court but then
returned to the juvenile court.

Sec. 108 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,027,000))
$25,030,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,966,000))
$24,972,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,490,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,483,000))
$52,492,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The amounts provided include funding for expert and
investigative services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.
(2) By December 1, 2011, the office of public defense shall submit
to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature a
proposal for office of public defense to assume the effective and
efficient administration of defense services for indigent persons
throughout the state who are involved in proceedings under chapter
71.09 RCW. In developing its proposal, the office of public defense
should consult with interested stakeholders, including the King county
public defender, the Washington defender association, the Washington
association of criminal defense lawyers, the administrative office of
the courts, the superior court judges association, the office of the
attorney general, the King county prosecuting attorney, the Washington
association of counties, and the department of social and health
services. At a minimum, the proposal should identify:
(a) Procedures to control costs and require accountability,
consistent with the state's obligation to ensure the right to counsel
under both the United States Constitution and the Washington
Constitution;
(b) Appropriate practice standards for trial-level defense of
indigent persons involved in proceedings under chapter 71.09 RCW, an
estimated number of attorneys statewide who are qualified to provide
such representation, and reasonable compensation for such defense
services;
(c) The total budget necessary to implement the proposal statewide
for fiscal year 2013, including administrative support; and
(d) Possible savings to the state and counties that might result
from implementing the proposal.

Sec. 109 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,312,000))
$5,311,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,293,000))
$5,292,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,105,000))
$12,103,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,500,000 of the economic development strategic reserve
account appropriation is provided solely for efforts to assist with
currently active industrial recruitment efforts that will bring new
jobs to the state or will retain headquarter locations of major
companies currently housed in the state.
(2) $547,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $547,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the office of the education
ombudsman.

Sec. 110 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,107,000))
$2,106,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,130,000))
$2,129,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,237,000))
$4,235,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $43,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and $82,000 of the general fund--
state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5021 (election
campaign disclosure).

Sec. 111 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 119 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,710,000))
$16,014,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,135,000))
$12,862,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,338,000
Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,943,000))
$7,950,000
Charitable Organization Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $452,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,556,000))
$10,557,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,288,000
Washington State Heritage Center Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,028,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($75,450,000))
$73,489,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($4,101,000)) $3,898,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 is provided solely to reimburse
counties for the state's share of primary and general election costs
and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state measures.
Counties shall be reimbursed only for those odd-year election costs
that the secretary of state validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2)(a) (($1,997,000)) $1,847,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and (($2,076,000)) $1,926,000 of the
general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided
solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations and
other events of statewide significance during the 2011-2013 biennium.
The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the
amount provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall
be required to raise contributions or commitments to make
contributions, in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent
of the state contribution. The office of the secretary of state may
make full or partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have
been satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and
Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to
the funding for the library as a whole.

Sec. 112 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($232,000))
$236,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $219,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($451,000))
$455,000

Sec. 113 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,996,000))
$14,994,000

Sec. 114 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 123 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,293,000
Performance Audit of Government Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,685,000))
$1,461,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,978,000))
$11,754,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $1,461,000 of the performance audits of government account
appropriation is provided solely for staff and related costs to verify
the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for state
funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state
funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state
funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is
not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when
requested.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the state
auditor shall continue to complete the annual audit of the state's
comprehensive annual financial report and the annual federal single
audit consistent with the auditing standards generally accepted in the
United States and the standards applicable to financial audits
contained in government auditing standards, issued by the comptroller
general of the United States, and OMB circular A-133, audits of states,
local governments, and nonprofit organizations.

Sec. 115 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,028,000))
$4,758,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,997,000))
$2,727,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,819,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $972,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($206,635,000))
$206,617,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($227,546,000))
$224,163,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the
legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management,
the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing
the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown
by division of division administration expenses.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on ways and means.
(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements
and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the
nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for
the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed
electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The
report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.
(4) The attorney general shall enter into an interagency agreement
with the department of social and health services for expenditure of
the state's proceeds from the cy pres settlement in State of Washington
v. AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for the purposes set forth in sections 204
and 213 of this act.
(5) $62,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1770
(state purchasing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $5,924,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2123
(workers' compensation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) The office of the attorney general is authorized to expend
$2,100,000 from the Zyprexa and other cy pres awards towards consumer
protection costs in accordance with uses authorized in the court
orders.
(8) $96,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5076
(financial institutions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $99,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5769 (coal-fired generation). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(10) $416,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5801 (industrial insurance system). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $31,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5021 (election campaign disclosure). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(12) The executive ethics board shall: (a) Develop a statewide
plan, with performance measures, to provide overall direction and
accountability in all executive branch agencies and statewide elected
offices; (b) coordinate and work with the commission on judicial
conduct and the legislative ethics board; (c) assess and evaluate each
agency's ethical culture through employee and stakeholder surveys,
review Washington state quality award feedback reports, and publish an
annual report on the results to the public; and (d) solicit outside
evaluations, studies, and recommendations for improvements from
academics, nonprofit organizations, the public disclosure commission,
or other entities with expertise in ethics, integrity, and the public
sector.

Sec. 116 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 126 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,308,000))
$1,310,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,305,000))
$1,309,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,613,000))
$2,619,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section include funding for
activities transferred from the sentencing guidelines commission to the
caseload forecast council pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5891 (criminal justice cost savings). Prior to the effective date
of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5891, the appropriations in
this section may be expended for the continued operations and expenses
of the sentencing guidelines commission pursuant to the expenditure
authority schedule produced by the office of financial management in
accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate
Bill No. 5304 (college bound scholarship).

Sec. 117 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,271,000))
$57,261,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($72,479,000))
$72,459,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($282,218,000))
$282,185,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,998,000))
$4,989,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,767,000))
$2,764,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $437,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Home Security Fund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,655,000))
$16,652,000
Affordable Housing for All Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,902,000
County Research Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,081,000
Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes Investigation
and Prosecution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,166,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,778,000
City and Town Research Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,166,000
Manufacturing Innovation and Modernization
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,488,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,503,000))
$17,498,000
Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($94,000))
$86,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $755,000
Washington Community Technology Opportunity Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($487,610,000))
$487,519,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance
program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall
be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account
balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans,
and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed
under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the
terms included in the original loan agreements.
(2) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a grant to resolution
Washington to building statewide capacity for alternative dispute
resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that
citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to
litigation.
(3) $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior
volunteer program.
(4) The department shall administer its growth management act
technical assistance so that smaller cities receive proportionately
more assistance than larger cities or counties.
(5) $1,800,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided for transitional housing assistance or partial payments for
rental assistance under the independent youth housing program.
(6) $5,000,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
for the operation, repair, and staffing of shelters in the homeless
family shelter program.
(7) $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $198,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington new Americans
program.
(8) $2,949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for associate development
organizations.
(9) $127,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1886
(Ruckelshaus center process). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) Up to $200,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation is for a grant to the Washington tourism alliance for the
maintenance of the Washington state tourism web site
www.experiencewa.com and its related sub-sites. The department may
transfer ownership of the web site and other tourism promotion assets
and assign obligations to the Washington tourism alliance for purposes
of tourism promotion throughout the state. The alliance may use the
assets only in a manner consistent with the purposes for which they
were created. Any revenue generated from these assets must be used by
the alliance for the sole purposes of statewide Washington tourism
promotion. The legislature finds that the Washington tourism alliance,
a not-for-profit, 501.c.6 organization established, funded, and
governed by Washington tourism industry stakeholders to sustain
destination tourism marketing across Washington, is an appropriate body
to receive funding and assets from and assume obligations of the
department for the purposes described in this section.
(((12))) (11) Within the appropriations in this section, specific
funding is provided to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5741
(economic development commission).
(((13))) (12) $2,000,000 of the community and economic development
fee account appropriation is provided solely for the department of
commerce for services to homeless families through the Washington
families fund.
(((14))) (13) $260,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $259,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington asset
building coalitions.
(((15))) (14) $1,859,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 and $1,859,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for innovative
research teams, also known as entrepreneurial STARS, at higher
education research institutions, and for entrepreneurs-in-residence
programs at higher education research institutions and entrepreneurial
assistance organizations. Of these amounts no more than $50,000 in
fiscal year 2012 and no more than $50,000 in fiscal year 2013 may be
provided for the operation of entrepreneurs-in-residence programs at
entrepreneurial assistance organizations external to higher education
research institutions.
(((16))) (15) Up to $700,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation is for pass-through grants to cities in central Puget
Sound to plan for transfer of development rights receiving areas under
the central Puget Sound regional transfer of development rights
program.
(((17))) (16) $16,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 is provided solely to implement section 503 of
Substitute House Bill No. 1277 (licensed settings for vulnerable
adults). The long-term care ombudsman shall convene an adult family
home quality assurance panel to review problems concerning the quality
of care for residents in adult family homes. If Substitute House Bill
No. 1277 (licensed settings for vulnerable adults) is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((18))) (17) $24,605,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 and $39,527,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for
establishment of the essential needs and housing support program
created in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2082 (essential needs
and assistance program). The department of commerce shall contract for
these services with counties or community-based organizations involved
in providing essential needs and housing supports to low-income persons
who meet eligibility pursuant to Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2082. The department shall limit the funding used for administration
of the program to no more than five percent. Counties and community
providers shall limit the funding used for administration of the
program to no more than seven percent.
(a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $4,000,000 is
provided solely for essential needs to clients who meet the eligibility
established in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2082. Counties and
community-based organizations shall distribute basic essential products
in a manner that prevents abuse. To the greatest extent possible, the
counties or community-based organizations shall leverage local or
private funds, and volunteer support to acquire and distribute the
basic essential products.
(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $30,000,000 is
provided solely for housing support services to individuals who are
homeless and eligible for services under this program pursuant to
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2082.
(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $30,000,000 is
provided solely as a contingency fund to provide housing support
services for individuals who may become homeless and are otherwise
eligible for this program pursuant to Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 2082.

Sec. 118 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,688,000))
$18,627,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,547,000))
$18,851,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,534,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,270,000
Performance Audits of Government Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000
Department of Personnel Services--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,111,000))
$7,827,000
Data Processing Revolving Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,208,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,581,000))
$1,537,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,344,000))
$85,259,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill
No. 1178 (regulatory assistance office). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the office of financial management to
contract with an independent consultant to evaluate and recommend the
most cost-effective provision of services required to support the
department of social and health services special commitment center on
McNeil Island. The evaluation shall include island operation services
that include, but are not limited to: (a) Marine transport of
passengers and goods; (b) wastewater treatment; (c) fire protection and
suppression; (d) electrical supply; (e) water supply; and (f) road
maintenance.
The office of financial management shall solicit the input of
Pierce county, the department of corrections, and the department of
social and health services in developing the request for proposal,
evaluating applications, and directing the evaluation. The consultant
shall report to the governor and legislature by November 15, 2011.
(3) $100,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial management
to prepare a report to be used to initiate a comprehensive, long-range
planning process for the future of McNeil Island during the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium.
(a) The report on the initiation of the process must document:
(i) Ownership issues, including consultation with the federal
government about its current legal requirements associated with the
island;
(ii) Federal and state decision-making processes to change use or
ownership;
(iii) Tribal treaty interests;
(iv) Fish and wildlife species and their habitats;
(v) Land use and public safety needs;
(vi) Recreational opportunities for the general public;
(vii) Historic and archaeological resources; and
(viii) Revenue from and necessary to support potential future uses
of the island.
(b) The report shall develop and recommend a comprehensive, long-range planning process for the future of the island and associated
aquatic resources, addressing the items in (a) of this subsection.
(c) The office of financial management may use its own staff and
other public agency and tribal staff or contract for services, and may
create a work group of knowledgeable agencies, organizations, and
individuals to assist in preparing the report.
(d) The office of financial management shall engage in broad
consultation with interested parties, including, but not limited to:
(i) Federal agencies with relevant responsibilities;
(ii) Tribal governments;
(iii) State agencies;
(iv) Local governments and communities in the area, including the
Anderson Island community, Steilacoom, and Pierce county; and
(v) Interested private organizations and individuals.
(e) The report must be submitted to the governor and appropriate
committees of the legislature by October 1, 2012.
(((7))) (4) The appropriations in this section include funding for
activities transferred from the sentencing guidelines commission to the
office of financial management pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5891 (criminal justice cost savings). Prior to the effective
date of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5891, the appropriations
in this section may be expended for the continued operations and
expenses of the sentencing guidelines commission pursuant to the
expenditure authority schedule produced by the office of financial
management in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 119 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,040,000))
$34,043,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $769,000 of the administrative hearings
revolving account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5921 (social services programs).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 120 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY
Lottery Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,694,000))
$25,709,000

Sec. 121 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 134 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,057,000))
$47,049,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $146,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of House Bill No. 2070 (state and local
government employees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $65,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of House Bill No. 1625 (plan 3 default
investment option). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $133,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1981 as
amended (post-retirement employment). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((5))) (4) $15,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative
costs associated with implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2021
(plan 1 annual increase amounts). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2011, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

Sec. 122 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 135 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($104,380,000))
$100,927,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($104,232,000))
$100,801,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,940,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,000
Waste Tire Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
Master License Fund--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,012,000
Vehicle License Fraud Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Performance Audits of Government Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,188,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($231,994,000))
$225,110,000

Sec. 123 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 138 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,266,000))
$3,264,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 124 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 139 (uncodified) is
repealed.

Sec. 125 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,452,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,509,000))
$47,514,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,961,000))
$51,966,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $75,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation
of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5445 (health benefit exchange).
(2) $42,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation
of Senate Bill No. 5213 (insurance statutes).

Sec.126 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 141 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY
Certified Public Accountants' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,810,000))
$2,808,000

Sec. 127 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE HORSE RACING COMMISSION
Horse Racing Commission Operating Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,040,000))
$4,007,000

Sec. 128 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 144 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,081,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($176,646,000))
$176,238,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $120,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($186,847,000))
$186,439,000

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:))

Sec. 129 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 145 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $502,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,175,000
Public Service Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,990,000))
$30,992,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,201,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,848,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,716,000))
$48,718,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In accordance with RCW 80.36.610(1), the utilities and
transportation commission is authorized to establish federal
telecommunications act services fees in fiscal year 2012 as necessary
to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation
levels in this section.
(2) $15,000 of the pipeline safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1634 (underground utilities).
(3) $182,000 of the public service revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5769 (coal-fired generation).
(4) $169,000 of the public service revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5034 (private infrastructure).

Sec. 130 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 146 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,010,000))
$7,175,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,001,000))
$7,175,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,181,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,556,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,933,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,266,000
Military Department Rent and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,165,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($308,727,000))
$307,066,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $18,018,000 of the disaster response account -- state
appropriation and $66,266,000 of the disaster response account--federal
appropriation may be spent only on disasters declared by the governor
and with the approval of the office of financial management. The
military department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees on October 1st and
February 1st of each year detailing information on the disaster
response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into
the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting
date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2011-2013
biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.
(2) $75,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee; and
(b) The department shall submit an annual report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; and incremental changes from the
previous estimate.

Sec. 131 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 148 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,347,000))
$2,346,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,402,000))
$2,400,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,309,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,309,000))
$8,306,000

Sec. 132 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 150 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,052,000))
$3,501,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,047,000))
$3,495,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $177,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $368,000
Building Code Council Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,185,000))
$1,187,000
Department of Personnel Service Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,511,000))
$11,119,000
((General Administration Service)) Enterprise
Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,524,000))
$26,540,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,864,000))
$46,387,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are for the operations and
expenses of the department of enterprise services as established by
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5931 (central service functions of
state government), effective October 1, 2011. Prior to October 1,
2011, the appropriations in this section may be expended for the
continued operations and expenses of the office of financial
management, the department of general administration, the department of
information services, and the department of personnel, pursuant to the
expenditure authority schedules produced by the office of financial
management, in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) $3,090,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $3,090,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the payment of facilities and
services charges, utilities and contracts charges, public and historic
facilities charges, and capital projects surcharges allocable to the
senate, house of representatives, statute law committee, and joint
legislative systems committee. The department shall allocate charges
attributable to these agencies among the affected revolving funds. The
department shall maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies
to establish performance standards, prioritization of preservation and
capital improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the
delivery of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies
named in this subsection shall continue to enjoy all of the same rights
of occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically
established.
(3) In accordance with RCW 46.08.172 and 43.135.055, the department
is authorized to increase parking fees in fiscal years 2012 and 2013 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business.
(4) The building code council account appropriation is provided
solely for the operation of the state building code council as required
by statute and modified by the standards established by executive order
10-06. The council shall not consider any proposed code amendment or
take any other action not authorized by statute or in compliance with
the standards established in executive order 10-06. No member of the
council may receive compensation, per diem, or reimbursement for
activities other than physical attendance at those meetings of the
state building code council or the council's designated committees, at
which the opportunity for public comment is provided generally and on
all agenda items upon which the council proposes to take action.
(5) Specific funding is provided for the purposes of section 3 of
House Bill No. 1770 (state purchasing).
(6) The amounts appropriated in this section are for implementation
of Senate Bill No. 5931 (streamlining central service functions).

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 201 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the
department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as
expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications
permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be
used for other than that purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) The health care authority and the department are authorized to
develop an integrated health care program designed to slow the
progression of illness and disability and better manage medicaid
expenditures for the aged and disabled population. Under this
Washington medicaid integration partnership (WMIP), the health care
authority and the department may combine and transfer such medicaid
funds appropriated under sections 204, 206, 208, and 213 of this act as
may be necessary to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP
program enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 6,000 persons, nor expand beyond one county during the
2011-2013 fiscal biennium. The amount of funding assigned from each
program may not exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act
for individuals covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the
health condition of persons enrolled, times the number of clients
enrolled. In implementing the WMIP, the health care authority and the
department may: (a) Withhold from calculations of "available
resources" as set forth in RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the capitated
rate for enrolled individuals; and (b) employ capitation financing and
risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health care service
contractors licensed by the office of the insurance commissioner and
qualified to participate in both the medicaid and medicare programs.
The health care authority and the department shall conduct an
evaluation of the WMIP, measuring changes in participant health
outcomes, changes in patterns of service utilization, participant
satisfaction, participant access to services, and the state fiscal
impact.
(4) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as
calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this
act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by
efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality
services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care
and services are available to the extent that such care and services
are available to the general population in the geographic area. The
legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal
government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input
constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.
(((6))) (5) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable
use the same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter
services for social services appointments as the one established for
medical appointments in section 213 of this act. When contracting
directly with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter
services, the department shall only contract with language access
providers who are working at a location in the state and who are state-certified or state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not
available, the department may use a language access provider who meets
other certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards,
including interpreters in other states.

Sec. 202 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($301,565,000))
$295,011,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($302,895,000))
$294,232,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($473,030,000))
$487,912,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,358,000
Home Security Fund--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,741,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,154,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $725,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,091,468,000))
$1,091,133,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.
(2) $668,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $668,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to contract for the operation of
one pediatric interim care center. The center shall provide
residential care for up to thirteen children through two years of age.
Seventy-five percent of the children served by the center must be in
need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their mothers.
The center shall also provide on-site training to biological, adoptive,
or foster parents. The center shall provide at least three months of
consultation and support to the parents accepting placement of children
from the center. The center may recruit new and current foster and
adoptive parents for infants served by the center. The department
shall not require case management as a condition of the contract. The
department shall collaborate with the pediatric interim care center to
determine if and how the center could be appropriately incorporated
into the performance-based contract model and report its findings to
the legislature by December 1, 2012.
(3)(a) (($85,114,000)) $85,202,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, (($85,409,000)) $85,408,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and
(($79,166,000)) $79,279,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for services for children and families subject to
RCW 74.13.360 and House Bill No. 2122 (child welfare). Prior to
approval of contract services pursuant to RCW 74.13.360 and House Bill
No. 2122, the amounts provided in this section shall be allotted on a
monthly basis and expenditures shall not exceed allotments based on a
three month rolling average without approval of the office of financial
management following notification to the legislative fiscal committees.
(b) The department shall use performance-based contracts to provide
services to safely reduce the number of children in out-of-home care,
safely reduce the time spent in out-of-home care prior to achieving
permanency, and safely reduce the number of children returning to
out-of-home care following permanency. The department shall provide an
initial report to the legislature and the governor by January 15, 2012,
regarding the start-up costs associated with performance-based
contracts under RCW 74.13.360 and House Bill No. 2122 (child welfare).
(4) $176,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $177,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, $656,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation,
$253,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, and $725,000 of
the education legacy trust account--state appropriation are provided
solely for children's administration to contract with an educational
advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach.
The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted
education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12
and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during
the transition to performance based contracts. Funding shall be
prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth and/or
regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested
educational outreach services exist. The department shall utilize
private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.
(5) $670,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $670,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for services provided through
children's advocacy centers.
(6) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds
appropriated in this section as required by RCW 74.13A.005 and
74.13A.020, the secretary shall not set the amount of any adoption
assistance payment or payments, made pursuant to RCW 26.33.320 and
74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080, to more than ninety percent of the
foster care maintenance payment for that child had he or she remained
in a foster family home during the same period. This subsection does
not apply to adoption assistance agreements in existence on the
effective date of this section.
(7) $10,741,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract for services pursuant to
RCW 13.32A.030 and 74.15.220. The department shall contract and
collaborate with service providers in a manner that maintains the
availability and geographic representation of secure and semi-secure
crisis residential centers and HOPE centers. To achieve efficiencies
and increase utilization, the department shall allow the co-location of
these centers, except that a youth may not be placed in a secure
facility or the secure portion of a co-located facility except as
specifically authorized by chapter 13.32A RCW. The reductions to
appropriations in this subsection related to semi-secure crisis
residential centers reflect a reduction to the number of beds for semi-secure crisis residential centers and not a reduction in rates. Any
secure crisis residential center or semi-secure crisis residential
center bed reduction shall not be based solely upon bed utilization.
The department is to exercise its discretion in reducing the number of
beds but to do so in a manner that maintains availability and
geographic representation of semi-secure and secure crisis residential
centers.
(((9))) (8) $47,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $14,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $40,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 1697 (dependency system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((10))) (9) $564,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1128
(extended foster care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 203 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($87,025,000))
$86,684,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,803,000))
$86,505,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($702,000))
$3,758,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,903,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,801,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($179,430,000))
$181,847,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $2,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in
this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and
shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $3,482,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $3,482,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement community juvenile
accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile
code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection may be used solely
for community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the
grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance
abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive
basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $3,123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $3,123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile
courts for the following programs identified by the Washington state
institute for public policy (institute) in its October 2006 report:
"Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional
family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training
and interagency coordination programs, or other programs with a
positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. County
juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration for funding for program-specific participation and the
administration shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the
per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.
(6) $1,537,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,537,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for expansion of the following
treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration
programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy
in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to
Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime
Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated
transitions, and aggression replacement training, or other programs
with a positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. The
administration may concentrate delivery of these treatments and
therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in
a cost-effective manner.
(7)(a) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall administer
a block grant, rather than categorical funding, of consolidated
juvenile service funds, community juvenile accountability act grants,
the chemical dependency disposition alternative funds, the mental
health disposition alternative, and the sentencing disposition
alternative for the purpose of serving youth adjudicated in the
juvenile justice system. In making the block grant, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall follow the following formula and
will prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives
and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in
conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years
old; (ii) fifteen percent for moderate and high-risk youth; (iii)
twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv)
seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three
percent for the chemical dependency disposition alternative; and (vi)
two percent for the mental health and sentencing dispositional
alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition
alternative (SSODA) shall not be included in the block grant, but
allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding
for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the
block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when
approved by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile
courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee,
based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state
institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.
(b) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall phase the
implementation of the formula provided in subsection (1) of this
section by including a stop-loss formula of five percent in fiscal year
2012 and five percent in fiscal year 2013.
(c) The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile
courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight
committee with equal representation from the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee
is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding
formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current
available information. The committee will be cochaired by the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts, who will also
have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to
achieve its purpose. Initial members will include one juvenile court
representative from the finance committee, the community juvenile
accountability act committee, the risk assessment quality assurance
committee, the executive board of the Washington association of
juvenile court administrators, the Washington state center for court
research, and a representative of the superior court judges
association; two representatives from the juvenile rehabilitation
administration headquarters program oversight staff, two
representatives of the juvenile rehabilitation administration regional
office staff, one representative of the juvenile rehabilitation
administration fiscal staff and a juvenile rehabilitation
administration division director. The committee may make changes to
the formula categories other than the evidence-based program and
disposition alternative categories if it is determined the changes will
increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based
program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost benefit
savings to the state. Long-term cost benefit must be considered.
Percentage changes may occur in the evidence-based program or
disposition alternative categories of the formula should it be
determined the changes will increase evidence-based program or
disposition alternative delivery and increase the cost benefit to the
state. These outcomes will also be considered in determining when
evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition
alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left
separate.
(d) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts
shall be responsible for collecting and distributing information and
providing access to the data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the Washington state institute for public policy
related to program and outcome data. The juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the juvenile courts will work collaboratively to
develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost benefit to
the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and
disposition alternatives.
(8) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts
shall collect and distribute information related to program outcome and
provide access to these data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and Washington state institute for public policy.
Consistent with chapter 13.50 RCW, all confidentiality agreements
necessary to implement this information-sharing shall be approved
within 30 days of the effective date of this section. The agreements
between administrative office of the courts, the juvenile courts, and
the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall be executed to ensure
that the juvenile rehabilitation administration receives the data that
the juvenile rehabilitation administration identifies as needed to
comply with this subsection. This includes, but is not limited to,
information by program at the statewide aggregate level, individual
court level, and individual client level for the purpose of the
juvenile rehabilitation administration providing quality assurance and
oversight for the locally committed youth block grant and associated
funds and at times as specified by the juvenile rehabilitation
administration as necessary to carry out these functions. The data
shall be provided in a manner that reflects the collaborative work the
juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile courts have
developed regarding program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost
benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices
and disposition alternatives.
(9) Within the funds provided in this section, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall maintain the physical plant and
protect state assets at the Maple Lane School.

Sec. 204 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($322,704,000))
$317,392,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($327,615,000))
$322,982,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($456,691,000))
$448,732,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,604,000))
$17,864,000
Hospital Safety Net Assessment Fund--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,802,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,131,416,000))
$1,113,772,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $109,342,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $109,341,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for persons and
services not covered by the medicaid program. This is a reduction of
$4,348,000 each fiscal year from the nonmedicaid funding that was
allocated for expenditure by regional support networks during fiscal
year 2011 prior to supplemental budget reductions. This $4,348,000
reduction shall be distributed among regional support networks
proportional to each network's share of the total state population. To
the extent possible, levels of regional support network spending shall
be maintained in the following priority order: (i) Crisis and
commitment services; (ii) community inpatient services; and (iii)
residential care services, including personal care and emergency
housing assistance.
(b) $6,590,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $6,590,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $7,620,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department and regional
support networks to continue to contract for implementation of high-
intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In
determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided
to regional support networks with PACT teams, the department shall
consider the differences between regional support networks in the
percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that
are not reimbursable under medicaid. The department may allow regional
support networks which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are
higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section
to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under
section 204(1)(a) of this act. The department and regional support
networks shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the
PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this
section.
(c) $5,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $5,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $1,300,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the western Washington regional
support networks to provide either community- or hospital campus-based
services for persons who require the level of care previously provided
by the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) at western state
hospital.
(d) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The
number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support
networks at western state hospital shall be 557 per day.
(e) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(f) $4,582,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $4,582,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for mental health services for
mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for
facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon
release from confinement.
(g) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly,
rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for
children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(h) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to continue performance-based
incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services
for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the
state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative.
These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support
services provided by regional support networks through other state and
federal funding.
(i) $1,125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Spokane regional support
network to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at
eastern state hospital. Such services shall include:
(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high
utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;
(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the
community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient
care or jail services;
(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to
individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating
those individuals; and
(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.
At least annually, the Spokane regional support network shall
assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at
eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally
effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.
(j) $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane
counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the
state psychiatric hospitals.
(k) Regional support networks may use local funds to earn
additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate
does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate
range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide
medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients.
Additionally, regional support networks may use a portion of the state
funds allocated in accordance with (a) of this subsection to earn
additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application
of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of
crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and
outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for
medicaid.
(l) Given the recent approval of federal medicaid matching funds
for the disability lifeline and the alcohol and drug abuse treatment
support act programs, the department shall charge regional support
networks for only the state share rather than the total cost of
community psychiatric hospitalization for persons enrolled in those
programs.
(m) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $1,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to adjust regional support network capitation rates
to account for the per diem rates actually paid for psychiatric care
provided at hospitals participating in the certified public expenditure
program operated pursuant to section 213 of this act.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($114,686,000))
$115,317,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($113,766,000))
$114,111,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($150,767,000))
$153,324,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,834,000))
$67,325,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($445,053,000))
$450,077,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a community partnership
between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support
community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding
western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b)
are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time
community service officer at the city of Lakewood.
(c) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state
hospital and adjacent areas.
(d) $20,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $20,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to maintain staffed capacity to
serve an average daily census in forensic wards at western state
hospital of 270 patients per day.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,457,000))
$1,168,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,462,000))
$1,164,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,682,000))
$4,109,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,301,000))
$7,141,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $1,161,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,161,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for children's evidence based
mental health services. Funding is sufficient to continue serving
children at the same levels as fiscal year 2009.
(b) $700,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence based
practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and
implementation of evidence-based or promising practices for serving
children and youth with mental health disorders. The department shall
enter into an interagency agreement with the office of the attorney
general for expenditure of $700,000 of the state's proceeds of the cy
pres settlement in State of Washington v. AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for
this purpose.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,276,000))
$4,476,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,102,000))
$4,261,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,894,000))
$7,227,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $446,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,718,000))
$16,410,000

(a) The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: In accordance with RCW
43.20B.110, 43.135.055, and 71.24.035, the department is authorized to
increase license and certification fees in fiscal years 2012 and 2013
to support the costs of the regulatory program. The fee schedule
increases must be developed so that the maximum amount of additional
fees paid by providers statewide in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium is
$446,000. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates
for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the
department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to
those of the department, including but not limited to the joint
commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the
commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the
council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with
regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for
organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower
costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations
which are not accredited.
(b) $19,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $17,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $34,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to support a partnership among the department of social
and health services, the department of health, and agencies that
deliver medical care and behavioral health services in Cowlitz county.
The partnership shall identify and recommend strategies for resolving
regulatory, licensing, data management, reporting, and funding barriers
to more effective integration of primary medical and behavioral health
care services in the county.

Sec. 205 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($418,664,000))
$418,815,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($422,393,000))
$422,854,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($726,897,000))
$743,532,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $184,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,568,138,000))
$1,585,385,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) Amounts appropriated in this subsection reflect a reduction to
funds appropriated for in-home care. The department shall reduce the
number of in-home hours authorized. The reduction shall be scaled
based on the acuity level of care recipients. The largest hour
reductions shall be to lower acuity patients and the smallest hour
reductions shall be to higher acuity patients.
(c) Amounts appropriated in this subsection are sufficient to
develop and implement the use of a consistent, statewide outcome-based
vendor contract for employment and day services by July 1, 2012. The
rates paid to vendors under this contract shall also be made
consistent. In its description of activities the agency shall include
activity listings and dollars appropriated for: Employment services,
day services, child development services and county administration of
services to the developmentally disabled. The department shall begin
reporting to the office of financial management on these activities
beginning in fiscal year 2010.
(d) $944,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $944,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $1,888,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for state contributions for individual provider
health care benefits. Pursuant to the collective bargaining agreement
negotiated with the exclusive bargaining representative of individual
providers established under RCW 74.39A.270, the state shall contribute
to the multiemployer health benefits trust fund $1.96 per paid hour
worked by individual providers.
(e) $1,871,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $1,995,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $3,865,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for home care agencies to purchase
health coverage for home care providers. The department shall
calculate and distribute payments for health care benefits to home care
agencies at $558 per month for each worker who cares for publicly
funded clients at 86 hours or more per month. In order to negotiate
the most comprehensive health benefits package for its employees, each
agency may determine benefit levels according to the hours an employee
works providing state-funded personal care. Health benefits shall be
offered to all employees who care for publicly funded clients for 86
hours per month or more. At a minimum, employees who care for publicly
funded clients at 140 hours a month or greater must receive a
comprehensive medical benefit. Benefits shall not be provided to
employees who care for publicly funded clients at 85 hours or less per
month or as interim respite workers. The department shall not pay an
agency for benefits provided to an employee who otherwise receives
health care coverage through other family members, other
employment-based coverage, or military or veteran's coverage. The
department shall require annually, each home care agency to review each
of its employee's available health coverage and to provide a written
declaration to the department verifying that health benefits purchased
with public funds are solely for employees that do not have other
available coverage. Home care agencies may determine a reasonable
employee co-premium not to exceed 20 percent of the total benefit cost.
(f) $1,127,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $1,199,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $2,322,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
training partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, for instructional
costs associated with the training of individual providers. House Bill
No. 1548 and Senate Bill No. 5473 (long-term care worker requirements)
make statutory changes to the increased training requirements and
therefore the state shall contribute to the partnership $0.17 per paid
hour worked by all home care workers. This amount is pursuant to the
collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270. Expenditures for the purposes specified in this subsection
shall not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection.
(g)(i) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the
department shall revise the current working age adult policy to allow
clients to choose between employment and community access activities.
Clients age 21 and older who are receiving services through a home- and
community-based medicaid waiver shall be offered the choice to
transition to a community access program after nine months of
enrollment in an employment program, and the option to transition from
a community access program to an employment program at any time. The
department shall inform clients and their legal representatives of all
available options for employment and day services. Information
provided to the client and the client's legal representative shall
include the types of activities each service option provides, and the
amount, scope, and duration of service for which the client would be
eligible under each service option. An individual client may be
authorized for only one service option, either employment services or
community access services. Clients may not participate in more than
one of these services at any given time.
(ii) The department shall work with counties and stakeholders to
strengthen and expand the existing community access program. The
program must emphasize support for the client so they are able to
participate in activities that integrate them into their community and
support independent living and skills.
(iii) The appropriation in this subsection includes funding to
provide employment or community access services to 168 medicaid
eligible young adults with developmental disabilities living with their
families who need employment opportunities and assistance after high
school graduation.
(h) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the restoration of direct
support to local organizations that utilize parent-to-parent networks
and communication to promote access and quality of care for individuals
with developmental disabilities and their families.
(i) In accordance with Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1277
(licensed settings for vulnerable adults), adult family home license
fees are increased in fiscal years 2012 and 2013 to support the costs
of conducting licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs.
(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes
shall be increased to $100 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2012 and
$175 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2013. Adult family homes shall
receive a corresponding vendor rate increase per medicaid patient day
of $0.22 in fiscal year 2012 and $0.43 in fiscal year 2013 to cover the
cost of the license fee increase for publicly funded beds.
(ii) Beginning in fiscal year 2012, a processing fee of $2,750
shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially
licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.
(((k))) (j) Clients with developmental disabilities have
demonstrated a need and a desire for a day services program as verified
by over 900 clients currently accessing day programs through a long-term care service model. In addition, every individual, to include
those with a developmental disability, should have the opportunity for
meaningful employment which allows them to contribute to their
communities and to become as self-sufficient as possible. Providing
choice empowers recipients of publicly funded services and their
families by expanding their degree of control over the services and
supports they need.
The department shall work with legislators and stakeholders to
develop a new approach to employment and day services. The objective
of this plan is to ensure that adults with developmental disabilities
have optimum choices, and that employment and day offerings are
comprehensive enough to meet the needs of all clients currently served
on a home and community based waiver. The proposal shall be submitted
to the 2012 legislature for consideration and shall be constructed such
that a client ultimately receives employment, community access, or the
community day option but not more than one service at a time. The
proposal shall include options for program efficiencies within the
current employment and day structure and shall provide details on the
plan to implement a consistent, statewide outcome-based vendor contract
for employment and day services as specified in (c) of this subsection.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,256,000))
$80,815,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($79,288,000))
$79,939,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($153,007,000))
$154,388,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,043,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($334,594,000))
$337,185,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with
the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide
transportation, building space, and other support services as are
reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students
living in residential habilitation centers.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,383,000))
$1,380,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,376,000))
$1,371,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,326,000))
$1,323,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,085,000))
$4,074,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,659,000))
$4,648,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,659,000))
$4,637,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,590,000))
$9,575,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $998,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,906,000))
$19,858,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
Amounts appropriated in this subsection are for the purposes of
transitioning clients with developmental disabilities into community
settings. The department is authorized as needed to use these funds to
either pay for clients residing within a residential habilitation
center or for placements in the community. Pursuant to Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5459 (services for people with developmental
disabilities), funding in this subsection must be prioritized for the
purpose of facilitating the consolidation and closure of Frances Haddon
Morgan Center. The department shall use a person-centered approach in
developing the discharge plan to assess each resident's needs and
identify services the resident requires to successfully transition to
the community or another residential habilitation center. The
department is authorized to use any savings from this effort for the
purpose of developing community resources to address the needs of
clients with developmental disabilities who are in crisis or in need of
respite. The department shall track the costs and savings of closing
Frances Haddon Morgan Center and any investments into community
placements and resources. The department shall provide a fiscal
progress report to the legislature by December 5, 2011.

Sec. 206 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($783,305,000))
$781,995,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($811,670,000))
$804,465,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,686,010,000))
$1,680,450,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,517,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,388,000
Nursing Facility Quality Assurance Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,000,000))
$88,071,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,399,890,000))
$3,385,886,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $170.37 for
fiscal year 2012 and shall not exceed $171.43 for fiscal year 2013,
including the rate add-ons described in (a) and (b) of this subsection.
However, if the waiver requested from the federal centers for medicare
and medicaid services in relation to the safety net assessment created
by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (nursing home payments) is
for any reason not approved and implemented, the weighted average
nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $159.87 for fiscal year
2012 and shall not exceed $160.93 for fiscal year 2013. There will be
no adjustments for economic trends and conditions in fiscal years 2012
and 2013. The economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined
in the biennial appropriations act shall not be compounded with the
economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any other
biennial appropriations acts before applying it to the component rate
allocations established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW. When no
economic trends and conditions factor for either fiscal year is defined
in a biennial appropriations act, no economic trends and conditions
factor or factors defined in any earlier biennial appropriations act
shall be applied solely or compounded to the component rate allocations
established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW.
(a) Within the funds provided, the department shall continue to
provide an add-on per medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed
$1.57. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or
staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or
benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other
category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was
less than $15 in calendar year 2008, according to cost report data.
The add-on may also be used to address resulting wage compression for
related job classes immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage
workers. The department shall continue reporting requirements and a
settlement process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this
subsection.
(b) The department shall do a comparative analysis of the facility-based payment rates calculated on July 1, 2011, using the payment
methodology defined in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581
(nursing home payments), to the facility-based payment rates in effect
June 30, 2010. If the facility-based payment rate calculated on July
1, 2011, is smaller than the facility-based payment rate on June 30,
2010, then the difference shall be provided to the individual nursing
facilities as an add-on payment per medicaid resident day.
(c) During the comparative analysis performed in subsection (b) of
this section, if it is found that the direct care rate for any facility
calculated using the payment methodology defined in Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (nursing home payments) is greater than
the direct care rate in effect on June 30, 2010, then the facility
shall receive a ten percent direct care rate add-on to compensate that
facility for taking on more acute clients than they have in the past.
(d) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to
reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net
assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety
net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual
statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.
(e) If the waiver requested from the federal centers for medicare
and medicaid services in relation to the safety net assessment created
by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (nursing home payments) is
for any reason not approved and implemented, subsections (b), (c), and
(d) of this subsection do not apply.
(2) After examining actual nursing facility cost information, the
legislature finds that the medicaid nursing facility rates calculated
pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (nursing home
payments) provide sufficient reimbursement to efficiently and
economically operating nursing facilities and bear a reasonable
relationship to costs.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue no additional certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2012 and no new certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2013 and shall grant no rate add-ons to payment rates for capital
improvements not requiring a certificate of need and a certificate of
capital authorization for fiscal years 2012 and 2013.
(4) The long-term care program may develop and pay enhanced rates
for exceptional care to nursing homes for persons with traumatic brain
injuries who are transitioning from hospital care. The cost per
patient day for caring for these clients in a nursing home setting may
be equal to or less than the cost of caring for these clients in a
hospital setting.
(5) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to
funds appropriated for in-home care. The department shall reduce the
number of in-home hours authorized. The reduction shall be scaled
based on the acuity level of care recipients. The largest hour
reductions shall be to lower acuity patients and the smallest hour
reductions shall be to higher acuity patients.
(6) $1,883,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $1,883,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $3,766,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for state contributions for
individual provider health care benefits. Pursuant to the collective
bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive bargaining
representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270, the state shall contribute to the multiemployer health
benefits trust fund $1.96 per paid hour worked by individual providers.
(7) $16,835,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $17,952,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $34,786,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for home care agencies to purchase
health coverage for home care providers. The department shall
calculate and distribute payments for health care benefits to home care
agencies at $558 per month for each worker who cares for publicly
funded clients at 86 hours or more per month. In order to negotiate
the most comprehensive health benefits package for its employees, each
agency may determine benefit levels according to the hours an employee
works providing state-funded personal care. Health benefits shall be
offered to all employees who care for publicly funded clients for 86
hours per month or more. At a minimum, employees who care for publicly
funded clients at 140 hours a month or greater must receive a
comprehensive medical benefit. Benefits shall not be provided to
employees who care for publicly funded clients at 85 hours or less per
month or as interim respite workers. The department shall not pay an
agency for benefits provided to an employee who otherwise receives
health care coverage through other family members, other
employment-based coverage, or military or veteran's coverage. The
department shall require annually, each home care agency to review each
of its employee's available health coverage and to provide a written
declaration to the department verifying that health benefits purchased
with public funds are solely for employees that do not have other
available coverage. Home care agencies may determine a reasonable
employee co-premium not to exceed 20 percent of the total benefit cost.
(8) $2,063,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $2,195,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $4,260,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
training partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, for instructional
costs associated with the training of individual providers. House Bill
No. 1548 and Senate Bill No. 5473 (long-term care worker requirements)
make statutory changes to the increased training requirements and
therefore the state shall contribute to the partnership $0.17 per paid
hour worked by all home care workers. This amount is pursuant to the
collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270. Expenditures for the purposes specified in this subsection
shall not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection.
(9) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(10) The department shall eliminate the adult day health program
under the state plan 1915(i) option and shall reestablish it under the
long-term care home and community-based waiver.
(11) $4,588,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $4,559,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $9,237,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of
community residential and support services for persons who are older
adults or who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and
who have been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital.
These funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment.
(12) $1,840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
services program. Funding shall be prioritized towards serving
populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include
senior citizens and persons with disabilities.
(13) In accordance with Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1277
(licensed settings for vulnerable adults), nursing facility fees are
increased in fiscal year 2012 and adult family home fees are increased
in fiscal year 2012 and fiscal year 2013 to support the costs of
conducting licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs.
(a) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities
shall be increased to $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2012 and
assumes $517,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation.
Nursing facilities shall receive a vendor rate increase of $0.08 per
medicaid patient day to cover the license fee increase for publicly
funded beds.
(b) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes
shall be increased to $100 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2012 and
assumes $1,449,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation;
and $175 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2013 and assumes $2,463,000
of the general fund--private/local appropriation. Adult family homes
shall receive a corresponding vendor rate increase per medicaid patient
day of $0.22 in fiscal year 2012 and $0.43 in fiscal year 2013 to cover
the license fee increase for publicly funded beds.
(c) Beginning in fiscal year 2012, a processing fee of $2,750 shall
be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially
licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.
(d) $72,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $708,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
and $708,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely to implement sections 501 through 503 of Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1277 (licensed settings for vulnerable adults). The
department shall use additional investigative resources to address
complaints about provider practices as well as alleged abuse, neglect,
abandonment, and exploitation of residents in adult family homes. The
department shall develop a statewide internal quality review and
accountability program to improve the accountability of staff and the
consistent application of investigative activities, and shall convene
a quality assurance panel to review problems in the quality of care in
adult family homes.
(14) $3,316,000 of the traumatic brain injury account--state
appropriation is provided solely to continue services for persons with
traumatic brain injury (TBI) as defined in chapter 143, Laws of 2011
(traumatic brain injury strategic partnership).
(15) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients
residing in nursing homes and paid for with state only funds into less
restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the
client's care needs.

Sec. 207 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($506,611,000))
$487,305,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,003,000))
$503,362,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,115,799,000))
$1,167,467,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,592,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,153,005,000))
$2,188,726,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($297,623,000)) $258,880,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, (($297,623,000)) $297,296,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and
(($672,443,000)) $710,173,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst
program. Under section 2 of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5921
(social services programs), the amounts in this subsection assume that
any participant in the temporary assistance for needy families where
their participation is suspended and does not volunteer to participate
in WorkFirst services or unsubsidized employment does not receive child
care subsidies or WorkFirst subsidies as a condition of the suspension.
Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department
may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for
temporary assistance for needy families.
(a) Within the amounts provided for WorkFirst in this subsection,
the department shall continue to implement WorkFirst program
improvements that are designed to achieve progress against outcome
measures specified in RCW 74.08A.410.
(b) The department may establish a career services work transition
program.
(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,414,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and
$5,150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2013 are provided solely for the implementation and administration of
the electronic benefit transfer system under section 12 of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5921 (social services programs). The
department shall transfer these amounts to the department of early
learning for the implementation and administration of the project.
(d) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the legislature
expressly mandates that the department exercise its authority, granted
in 1997 under RCW 74.08A.290, to contract for work activities services
pursuant to that statutory authority and RCW 41.06.142(3).
(e) The department shall create a temporary assistance for needy
families budget structure that allows for more transparent tracking of
budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and
subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units.
The budget structure shall include budget units for the following:
Grants, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the
program.
(2)(a) $11,825,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for a contingency reserve in the event the temporary
assistance for needy families cash benefit is projected to exceed
forecasted amounts by more than one percent. The department shall only
expend an amount equal to the forecasted over-expenditure. For
purposes of this subsection, the temporary assistance forecast shall be
completed every quarter and follow a similar schedule of the caseload
forecast council forecasts.
(b) If sufficient savings in subsection (1) of this section are
achieved, the department of early learning shall increase the number of
child care slots available for the working connections child care
program.
(3) (($31,960,000)) $23,494,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, in addition to supplemental
security income recoveries, is provided solely for financial assistance
and other services to recipients in the program established in section
4, chapter 8, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess., until the program terminates
on October 31, 2011.
(4)(a) (($11,690,000)) $13,086,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and (($21,494,000)) $24,788,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, in addition
to supplemental security income recoveries, are provided solely for the
programs created in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2082 (essential
needs and assistance program) beginning November 1, 2011.
(b) The department shall review clients receiving services through
the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether
they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens,
and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income
benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization
funding through the department.
(c) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with
the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral
of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement
must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in
selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties
to facilitate applications for veterans' services.
(5) $1,657,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,657,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for naturalization services.
(6) $2,366,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for refugee employment services, of which
$1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to
statewide refugee assistance organizations for limited English
proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for refugee
employment services, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the
department to pass through to statewide refugee assistance
organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.
(7) On December 1, 2011, and annually thereafter, the department
must report to the legislature on all sources of funding available for
both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during
the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service
type and funding source. The report must also include the number of
clients served and outcome data for the clients.
(8) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds
appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit
under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to
be fifty percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance
program benefit amount.

Sec. 208 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND
SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($75,785,000))
$74,287,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($75,924,000))
$74,422,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($141,516,000))
$141,514,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,086,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,748,000))
$20,748,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,448,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($314,507,000))
$314,505,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
may contract with the University of Washington and community-based
providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program.
For all contractors, indirect charges for administering the program
shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall continue to provide for chemical dependency treatment services
for adult medicaid eligible, pregnant and parenting women, disability
lifeline, and alcoholism and drug addiction treatment and support act,
and medical care services clients.
(3) In accordance with RCW 70.96A.090 and 43.135.055, the
department is authorized to increase fees for the review and approval
of treatment programs in fiscal years 2012 and 2013 as necessary to
support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee
schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of
accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to
have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department,
including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of
health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of
rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To
reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited
programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of
accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these
programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.
(4) $3,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation (from the
substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is
provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and
alcohol use prevention programs.

Sec. 209 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,852,000))
$10,874,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,861,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($102,622,000))
$105,091,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,766,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($127,101,000))
$129,592,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (((2))) $480,000 of the telecommunications
devices for the hearing and speech impaired account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the office of deaf and hard of
hearing to contract for services that provide employment support and
help with life activities for deaf-blind individuals in King county.

Sec. 210 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- SPECIAL COMMITMENT
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,779,000))
$47,719,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,609,000))
$46,292,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($95,388,000))
$94,011,000

Sec. 211 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,698,000))
$26,125,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,960,000))
$24,586,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,917,000))
$39,223,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,116,000
Performance Audits of State Government--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,812,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($95,503,000))
$96,862,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington state mentors
program to continue its public-private partnerships to provide
technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve
at-risk youth.
(2) $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project.
(3) $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the juvenile detention
alternatives initiative.
(4) $4,812,000 of the performance audits of state government--state
appropriation is provided solely for support and expansion of the
division of fraud investigation. The division shall conduct
investigatory and enforcement activities for all department programs,
including the child support and TANF programs.
(5) $1,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the department to distribute as
support to community public health and safety networks that have a
history of providing training and services related to adverse childhood
experiences. Distribution of these funds is contingent upon securing
funding from a private entity or entities to provide one dollar in
matching funds for each dollar in state funds received by a network so
that the funding received by a community public health and safety
network will be equal portions of state and private funding.

Sec. 212 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER
AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($66,410,000))
$62,778,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($63,304,000))
$61,927,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,313,000))
$58,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($190,027,000))
$183,105,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $469,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 and $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2012 are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5921 (social
services programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 213 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,195,580,000))
$2,130,229,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,263,679,000))
$2,185,617,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,608,085,000))
$5,389,627,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($60,277,000))
$45,512,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,077,000
Hospital Safety Net Assessment Fund--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($404,438,000))
$394,905,000
State Health Care Authority Administration Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,476,000))
$34,118,000
Basic Health Plan Stabilization Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,000,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $529,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,643,180,000))
$10,239,614,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents eligible
to participate in the basic health plan as subsidized enrollees and
home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
that choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(3)(a) $1,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 is provided solely to plan the implementation of a
system of consolidated public school employee health benefits
purchasing.
It is the intent of the legislature to improve the administration,
transparency, and equity in delivering a K-12 employees' health
benefits system. In addition, the legislature intends that any cost
savings that result from changes to K-12 health benefits be dedicated
to public schools.
To further this legislative intent, the state health care authority
shall develop a plan to implement a consolidated health benefits'
system for K-12 employees for the 2013-14 school year. The health care
authority shall deliver a report to the legislature by December 15,
2011, that sets forth the implementation plan to the ways and means
committees of the house of representatives and the senate.
(b) The report prepared by the health care authority shall compare
and contrast the costs and benefits, both long and short term, of:
(i) The current K-12 health benefits system;
(ii) A new K-12 employee benefits pool; and
(iii) Enrolling K-12 employees into the health benefits pool for
state employees.
(c) In addition to the implementation plan, the report shall
include the following information:
(i) The costs and benefits of the current K-12 health benefits
system;
(ii) The costs and benefits of providing a new statewide K-12
employees' health benefits pool to school districts and school
employees;
(iii) The costs and benefits of enrolling K-12 employees into the
existing health benefits pool for state employees;
(iv) Recommendations of ways to limit administrative duplication
and costs, improve transparency to employees, the legislature, and the
public and assure equity among beneficiaries of publicly provided
employee health benefits;
(v) Recommendations for standardizing benefit packages and
purchasing efforts in a manner that seeks to maximize funding and
equity for all school employees;
(vi) Recommendations regarding the use of incentives, including how
changes to state health benefit allocations could provide employees
with benefits that would encourage participation;
(vii) Recommendations regarding the implementation of a new K-12
employee benefit plan, with separate options for voluntary
participation and mandatory statewide participation;
(viii) Recommendations regarding methods to reduce inequities
between individual and family coverage;
(ix) Consolidation of the purchasing and budget accountability for
school employee benefits to maximize administrative efficiency and
leverage existing skills and resources; and
(x) Other details the health care authority deems necessary,
including but not limited to recommendations on the following:
(A) Approaches for implementing the transition to a statewide pool,
including administrative and statutory changes necessary to ensure a
successful transition, and whether the pool should be separate from, or
combined with, the public employees' benefits pool;
(B) The structure of a permanent governing group to provide ongoing
oversight to the consolidated pool, in a manner similar to the public
employees benefits board functions for employee health benefits,
including statutory duties and authorities of the board; and
(C) Options for including potential changes to: Eligibility
standardization, the public employees benefits risk pools, the movement
of school employee retirees into the new K-12 pool or pools, and the
movement of educational service district employees into the new K-12
pool or pools.
(d) In determining its costs and benefits of a new statewide K-12
employees' health benefits pool for school districts and school
employees, the health care authority shall assume the following:
(i) School district enrollees must constitute an entire bargaining
unit, or an entire group of nonrepresented employees;
(ii) Staffing and administration for benefits purchasing shall be
provided by the health care authority; and
(iii) The new K-12 pool would operate on a schedule that
coordinates with the financing and enrollment schedule used for school
districts.
(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
office of the insurance commissioner shall provide information and
technical assistance to the health care authority as requested by the
health care authority. The health care authority shall not implement
the new school employee benefits pool until authorized to do so by the
legislature.
(4) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(5) Enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan shall be limited
to only include persons who qualify as subsidized enrollees as defined
in RCW 70.47.020 and who (a) qualify for services under 1115 medicaid
demonstration project number 11-W-00254/10; or (b) are foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.
(6) $23,700,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for planning and implementation of a health benefit
exchange under the federal patient protection and affordable care act.
Within the amounts provided in this subsection, funds used by the
authority for information technology projects are conditioned on the
authority satisfying the requirements of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5931 (central service agencies).
(7) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the
medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health
care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction
of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so
that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation
authority.
(8) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard
recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other
assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.
(9) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(10) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care
authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she
would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the
extent necessary.
(11) $4,261,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $4,261,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $8,522,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share
hospital payments under RCW 74.09.730(1)(a).
(12) $5,905,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $5,905,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $11,810,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for nonrural indigent assistance
disproportionate share hospital payments in accordance with RCW
74.09.730(1).
(13) $665,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $665,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $1,330,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for small rural indigent assistance
disproportionate share hospital payments in accordance with RCW
74.09.730(1).
(14) $6,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by
public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be
responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the
supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum
allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the
payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or
reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E
of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that
costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against
payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because
such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from
these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to
retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing
homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the
interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care
authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or
the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from
the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the
medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The
health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the
eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.
(15) The health care authority shall continue the inpatient
hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals, including
those owned or operated by the state, except those classified as
critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The
health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and
legislature by November 1, 2011, and by November 1, 2012, that evaluate
whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the
certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no
longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall
submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing
cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources
as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2012 and fiscal
year 2013, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one
hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost
for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical
assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the
maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal
regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an
allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by
the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each
fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount.
The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the
inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the
fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the
reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with
policies approved in the 2011-13 biennial operating appropriations act
and in effect on July 1, 2011, (b) one half of the indigent assistance
disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by
each hospital during fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other
disproportionate share hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by
each hospital during fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same
disproportionate share hospital programs exist in the 2011-13 biennium.
If payments during the fiscal year exceed the hospital's baseline
amount, no additional payments will be made to the hospital except the
federal portion of allowable disproportionate share hospital payments
for which the hospital can certify allowable match. If payments during
the fiscal year are less than the baseline amount, the hospital will be
paid a state grant equal to the difference between payments during the
fiscal year and the applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state
grant shall be made in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in
monthly payments. The grants will be recalculated and redistributed as
the baseline is updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are
subject to an interim settlement within eleven months after the end of
the fiscal year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent
that either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in
excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection,
the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested.
(($32,673,000)) $24,677,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated in section
204(1) of this act, and (($29,693,000)) $21,531,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, of which $6,570,000 is
appropriated in section 204(1) of this act, are provided solely for
state grants for the participating hospitals. CPE hospitals will
receive the inpatient and outpatient reimbursement rate restorations in
RCW 74.60.080 and rate increases in RCW 74.60.090 funded through the
hospital safety net assessment fund rather than through the baseline
mechanism specified in this subsection.
(((18))) (16) The health care authority shall seek public-private
partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to
provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under the
federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of
2009.
(((19))) (17) The health care authority shall target funding for
maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that
lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a
preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a
cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe
mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco
use, or African American or Native American race. The health care
authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of
maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care
authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for
maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those
services.
(((20))) (18) For children with family incomes above 200 percent of
the federal poverty level in the state-funded children's health program
for children who are not eligible for coverage under the federally
funded children's health insurance program, premiums shall be set every
two years in an amount equal to the average state-only share of the per
capita cost of coverage in the state-funded children's health program
for children in families with incomes at or less than two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level.
(((21))) (19) $704,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $726,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $1,431,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for disproportionate share hospital
payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the
children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title
XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship
status.
(((22))) (20) $998,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $979,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $1,980,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase prior authorization
activities for advanced imaging procedures.
(((23))) (21) $249,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $246,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $495,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase prior authorization
activities for surgical procedures, which may include orthopedic
procedures, spinal procedures and interventions, and nerve procedures.
(((24))) (22) $300,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation and $300,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for a prescriptive practices improvement
collaborative focusing upon atypical antipsychotics and other
medications commonly used in the treatment of severe and persistent
mental illnesses among adults. The project shall promote collaboration
among community mental health centers, other major prescribers of
atypical antipsychotic medications to adults enrolled in state medical
assistance programs, and psychiatrists, pharmacists, and other
specialists at the University of Washington department of psychiatry
and/or other research universities. The collaboration shall include
patient-specific prescriber consultations by psychiatrists and
pharmacists specializing in treatment of severe and persistent mental
illnesses among adults; production of profiles to assist prescribers
and clinics in tracking their prescriptive practices and their
patients' medication use and adherence relative to evidence-based
practices guidelines, other prescribers, and patients at other clinics;
and in-service seminars at which participants can share and increase
their knowledge of evidence- based and other effective prescriptive
practices. The health care authority shall enter into an interagency
agreement with the office of the attorney general for expenditure of
$300,000 of the state's proceeds of the cy pres settlement in State of
Washington v. AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for this purpose.
(((25))) (23) $570,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation is provided solely for continued operation of the
partnership access line for child mental health consultations. The
health care authority shall enter into an interagency agreement with
the office of the attorney general for expenditure of $570,000 of the
state's proceeds of the cy pres settlement in State of Washington v.
AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for this purpose.
(((26))) (24) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $160,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to fund the Tacoma-Pierce county
health department for access and outreach activities to reduce infant
mortality.
(((27))) (25) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $150,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to assist with development and
implementation of evidence-based strategies regarding the appropriate,
safe, and effective role of C-section surgeries and early induced labor
in births and neonatal care. The strategies shall be identified and
implemented in consultation with clinical research specialists,
physicians, hospitals, advanced registered nurse practitioners, and
organizations concerned with maternal and child health.
(((28) $4,126,000)) (26) $2,400,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, (($4,268,000)) $2,435,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, (($11,816,000))
$7,253,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation, and
(($20,207,000)) $12,455,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for continued provision of school-based medical
services by means of an intergovernmental transfer arrangement. Under
the arrangement, the state shall provide forty percent and school
districts sixty percent of the nonfederal matching funds required for
receipt of federal medicaid funding for the service.
(((29))) (27) $263,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $88,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $351,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and submission to the
federal government by October 1, 2011, of a demonstration project
proposal as provided in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5596 (medicaid
demonstration waiver).
(((30) $19,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $17,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $34,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to support a partnership among the department of social
and health services, the department of health, and agencies that
deliver medical care and behavioral health services in Cowlitz county.
The partnership shall identify and recommend strategies for resolving
regulatory, licensing, data management, reporting, and funding barriers
to more effective integration of primary medical and behavioral health
care services in the county.
(31) $4,761,000)) (28) $5,600,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, (($4,066,000)) $4,094,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and
(($10,902,000)) $11,332,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for spoken-language interpreter services. The
authority shall develop and implement a new model for delivery of such
services no later than January 1, 2012. The model shall include:
(a) Development by the authority in consultation with subject-area
experts of guidelines to assist medical practitioners identify the
circumstances under which it is appropriate to use telephonic or video-remote interpreting;
(b) The requirement that the state contract with delivery
organizations, including foreign language agencies, who employ or
subcontract only with language access providers or interpreters working
in the state who are certified or authorized by the state. When a
state-certified or state-authorized in-state language access provider
or interpreter is not available, the delivery organization, including
foreign language agencies, may use a provider with other certifications
or qualifications deemed to meet state standards, including
interpreters in other states; and
(c) Provision of a secure, web-based tool that medical
practitioners will use to schedule appointments for interpreter
services and to identify the most appropriate, cost-effective method of
service delivery in accordance with the state guidelines.
Nothing in this subsection affects the ability of health care
providers to provide interpretive services through employed staff or
through telephone and video remote technologies when not reimbursed
directly by the department. The amounts in this subsection do not
include federal administrative funds provided to match nonstate
expenditures by local health jurisdictions and governmental hospitals.
(((32))) (29) In its procurement of contractors for delivery of
medical managed care services for nondisabled, nonelderly persons, the
medical assistance program shall (a) place substantial emphasis upon
price competition in the selection of successful bidders; and (b) not
require delivery of any services that would increase the actuarial cost
of service beyond the levels included in current healthy options
contracts.
(((33))) (30) $1,430,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012, $1,430,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $2,860,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to pay
federally-designated rural health clinics their standard encounter rate
for prenatal and well-child visits, whether delivered under a managed
care contract or fee-for-service. In reconciling managed care
enhancement payments for calendar years 2009 and 2010, the department
shall treat well-child and prenatal care visits as encounters subject
to the clinic's encounter rate.
(((35))) (31) $280,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $282,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase utilization management of
drugs and drug classes for which there is evidence of over-utilization,
off-label use, excessive dosing, duplicative therapy, or opportunities
to shift utilization to less expensive, equally effective formulations.
(((36))) (32) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $140,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit
organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn
about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.
(((37))) (33) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for the local outreach, case
management, and coordination with dental providers needed to execute
the access to baby and child dentistry program, which provides dental
care to Medicaid eligible children up to age six.
(((39) $1,555,000)) (34) $1,868,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, (($1,580,000)) $1,873,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and
(($2,171,000)) $3,154,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to continue to provide dental services to pregnant
women. Services shall include preventive, routine, and emergent dental
care.
(((40))) (35) $395,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $395,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $790,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for continued operation of the
dental education in care of persons with disabilities (DECOD) program
at the University of Washington.
(((41))) (36) $112,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $112,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $1,928,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the provider incentive program
and other initiatives related to the health information technology
Medicaid plan.
(((42) $1,373,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $2,105,000 of the medicaid fraud penalty account--state appropriation, and $3,701,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for efforts to reduce Medicaid fraud
and abuse and to seek coverage or recovery from other medical payers.
(43))) (37) $2,926,000 of the general fund--local appropriation and
$2,928,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely to support medical airlift services.
(((44))) (38) The authority shall collect data on enrollment and
utilization to study whether the expansion of family planning coverage
under Substitute Senate Bill No. 5912 is reducing state medical
expenditures by reducing unwanted pregnancies. The authority shall
report its findings to the legislature by December 1, 2012.
(((45))) (39) $480,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $480,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $824,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for customer services staff. The
authority will attempt to improve the phone answer rate to 40 percent
and reduce the response times to written questions to ten days for
clients and 25 days for providers. The authority will report to the
legislature on its progress toward achieving these goals by January 1,
2012. If the authority has not achieved these goals by July 1, 2012,
then the authority shall reduce expenditures on management staff in
order to increase expenditures on customer service staff until the
goals are achieved.
(((46))) (40) The department shall purchase a brand name drug when
it determines that the cost of the brand name drug after rebates is
less than the cost of generic alternatives and that purchase of the
brand rather than generic version can save at least $250,000. The
department may purchase generic alternatives when changes in market
prices make the price of the brand name drug after rebates more
expensive than the generic alternatives.
(((49))) (41) The department shall collaborate closely with the
Washington state hospital and medical associations in identification of
the diagnostic codes and retroactive review procedures that will be
used to determine whether an emergency room visit is a nonemergency
condition to assure that conditions that require emergency treatment
continue to be covered.

Sec. 214 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,685,000))
$19,690,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,685,000))
$19,689,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,380,000))
$39,389,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $36,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$36,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are solely
provided for Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5068 (industrial
safety and health act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $16,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$16,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are solely
provided for Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801 (industrial insurance
system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $1,893,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$1,893,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2123 (workers'
compensation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 215 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,165,000))
$14,850,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,140,000))
$14,711,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $456,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,048,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,597,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,014,000))
$43,270,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, are provided to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency
of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW
9A.44.130.
(2) $321,000 of the general fund--local appropriation is provided
solely to purchase ammunition for the basic law enforcement academy.
Jurisdictions shall reimburse to the criminal justice training
commission the costs of ammunition, based on the average cost of
ammunition per cadet, for cadets that they enroll in the basic law
enforcement academy.
(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic
law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a school safety program. The
commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory
committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school
administrators and school safety personnel hired after the effective
date of this section.
(5) $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the school safety center
within the commission. The safety center shall act as an information
dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school
district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities
relating to school safety, and review and approve manuals and curricula
used for school safety models and training. Through an interagency
agreement, the commission shall provide funding for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to continue to develop and
maintain a school safety information web site. The school safety
center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training
program, using the best practices in school safety, for all school
safety personnel. The commission shall provide research-related
programs in school safety and security issues beneficial to both law
enforcement and schools.
(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for grants to counties enforcing
illegal drug laws and which have been underserved by federally funded
state narcotics task forces. The Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys,
and the Washington association of county officials shall jointly
develop funding allocations for the offices of the county sheriff,
county prosecutor, and county clerk in qualifying counties. The
commission shall not impose an administrative cost on this program.

Sec. 216 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,605,000))
$17,433,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,513,000))
$18,374,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,100,000))
$11,636,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $395,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,019,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $949,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,814,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($151,000))
$334,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($252,689,000))
$252,809,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,622,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($264,070,000))
$264,202,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,186,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,688,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,068,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($632,897,000))
$632,557,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase fees related to factory assembled structures, contractor
registration, electricians, plumbers, asbestos removal, boilers,
elevators, and manufactured home installers. These increases are
necessary to support expenditures authorized in this section,
consistent with chapters 43.22, 18.27, 19.28, and 18.106 RCW, RCW
49.26.130, and chapters 70.79, 70.87, and 43.22A RCW.
(2) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the crime victims compensation
program to pay claims for mental health services for crime victim
compensation program clients who have an established relationship with
a mental health provider and subsequently obtain coverage under the
medicaid program or the medical care services program under chapter
74.09 RCW. Prior to making such payment, the program must have
determined that payment for the specific treatment or provider is not
available under the medicaid or medical care services program. In
addition, the program shall make efforts to contact any healthy options
or medical care services health plan in which the client may be
enrolled to help the client obtain authorization to pay the claim on an
out-of-network basis.
(((4))) (3) $1,281,000 of the accident account--state appropriation
and $1,281,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 1725 (workers' compensation). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((5))) (4) $51,000 of the accident account--state appropriation
and $51,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 1367 (for hire vehicles, operators). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((6))) (5) $8,727,000 of the medical aid account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5801 (industrial insurance system). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((7))) (6) $625,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $625,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, $1,250,000 of the public works administration
account--state appropriation, $708,000 of the accident account--state
appropriation, and $708,000 of the medical aid account--state
appropriation are provided solely for the purposes of expanding the
detecting unregistered employers targeting system and to support field
staff in investigation and enforcement. Within the funds appropriated
in this subsection, the department shall aggressively combat the
underground economy in construction. Of the amounts provided in this
subsection, $800,000 shall be used for investigation and enforcement.
(((8))) (7) $8,583,000 of the accident account--state appropriation
and $18,278,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2123 (workers'
compensation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 217 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,832,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,826,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,668,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,006,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,001,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,704,000))
$3,356,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,161,000))
$4,737,000
Veterans Innovations Program Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $812,000
Veteran Estate Management Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,083,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,767,000))
$19,995,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (((b))) $821,000 of the veterans
innovations program account--state appropriation is provided solely for
the department to continue support for returning combat veterans
through the veterans innovation program, including emergency financial
assistance through the defenders' fund and long-term financial
assistance through the competitive grant program.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,693,000))
$899,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($903,000))
$71,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,141,000))
$59,177,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,630,000))
$32,094,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($92,367,000))
$92,241,000

Sec. 218 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,370,000))
$79,888,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,177,000))
$79,718,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($533,065,000))
$555,563,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($148,386,000))
$148,362,000
Hospital Data Collection Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $214,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($94,505,000))
$94,469,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $604,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,302,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,480,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,884,000))
$22,875,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,532,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
((Site Closure Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $349,000))
Biotoxin Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,167,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,649,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,321,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,512,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $596,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,598,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $297,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,037,000))
$37,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($996,421,000))
$1,013,560,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the
state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules
pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules
and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and
the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through
the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek,
receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal
moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does
not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of
amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that
provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(2) In accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.135.055, the department
is authorized to establish and raise fees in fiscal year 2012 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the
appropriation levels in this section. This authorization applies to
fees required for: The review of health care facility construction;
review of health facility requests for certificate of need; the
regulation and inspection of farm worker housing, hospital licensing,
in-home health service agencies, and producers of radioactive waste;
the regulation and inspection of shellfish sanitary control, surgical
facility licensing, and; fees associated with the following
professions: Dieticians and nutritionists, occupational therapists,
pharmacy, veterinarian, orthotics and prosthetics, surgical
technicians, nursing home administrators, health care assistants,
hearing and speech, psychology, hypnotherapy, chiropractic, social
workers, physicians, and physician assistants.
(3) $1,969,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement online licensing for
health care providers. The department must submit a detailed
investment plan for this project to the office of financial management.
The office of financial management must review and approve this plan
before funding may be expended. The department of health must
successfully implement online application and renewal for at least one
profession as a pilot project before pursuing additional professions.
The department must report to the office of financial management on the
outcome of the pilot project.
(4) $16,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1181 (board
of naturopathy). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $21,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1304 (health care assistants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $54,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1353
(pharmacy technicians). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) $142,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5020 (social workers). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(8) $336,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5480
(physicians and physician assistants). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $46,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5071 (online access for midwives and marriage and family therapists).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $137,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1133 (massage practitioner license). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((12))) (11) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the developmental
disabilities council to contract for a family-to-family mentor program
to provide information and support to families and guardians of persons
who are transitioning out of residential habilitation centers. To the
maximum extent allowable under federal law, these funds shall be
matched under medicaid through the department of social and health
services and federal funds shall be transferred to the department for
the purposes stated in this subsection. If Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5459 (people with developmental disabilities) is not enacted
by June 30, 2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((13))) (12) $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $58,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure
and regulatory program to offset a reduction in revenue from fees.
There shall be no change to the current annual fees for new or renewed
licenses for the midwifery program, except from online access to HEAL-WA. The department shall convene the midwifery advisory committee on
a quarterly basis to address issues related to licensed midwifery.
(((15))) (13) $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for prevention of youth
suicides.
(((16))) (14) $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the senior falls
prevention program.

Sec. 219 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,895,000))
$54,529,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,044,000))
$53,210,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($108,939,000))
$107,739,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (((a))) $35,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
support of a statewide council on mentally ill offenders that includes
as its members representatives of community-based mental health
treatment programs, current or former judicial officers, and directors
and commanders of city and county jails and state prison facilities.
The council will investigate and promote cost-effective approaches to
meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental
disorders who have a history of offending or who are at-risk of
offending, including their mental health, physiological, housing,
employment, and job training needs.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($612,803,000))
$609,105,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($577,647,000))
$602,804,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,398,000))
$3,324,000
((General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,336,000))
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,079,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,210,263,000))
$1,229,312,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(((b))) (a) During the 2011-13 biennium, when contracts are
established or renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone
services provided to inmates, the department shall select the
contractor or contractors primarily based on the following factors:
(i) The lowest rate charged to both the inmate and the person paying
for the telephone call; and (ii) the lowest commission rates paid to
the department, while providing reasonable compensation to cover the
costs of the department to provide the telephone services to inmates
and provide sufficient revenues for the activities funded from the
institutional welfare betterment account.
(((c))) (b) The Harborview medical center and the University of
Washington medical center shall provide inpatient and outpatient
hospital services to offenders confined in department of corrections
facilities at a rate no greater than the average rate that the
department has negotiated with other community hospitals in Washington
state.
(((d))) (c) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement House Bill No.
1290 (health care employee overtime). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((e))) (d) $32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $33,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement Substitute House
Bill No. 1718 (offenders with developmental disabilities). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((f))) (e) The department of corrections shall contract with local
and tribal governments for the provision of jail capacity to house
offenders. A contract shall not have a cost of incarceration in excess
of $85 per day per offender. A contract shall not have a year-to-year
increase in excess of three percent per year. The contracts may
include rates for the medical care of offenders which exceed the daily
cost of incarceration and the limitation on year-to-year increase,
provided that medical payments conform to the department's offender
health plan, pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are
preapproved by department utilization management staff.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($128,403,000))
$129,635,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($124,709,000))
$128,049,000
Federal Narcotics Forfeiture Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $372,000
Controlled Substances Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($253,112,000))
$258,088,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (((b))) $875,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2012 is provided solely to
implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 5891 (criminal justice
cost savings). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,598,000))
$3,535,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,589,000))
$3,458,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,187,000))
$6,993,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: (($132,000)) $66,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2012 ((and $132,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely
for transfer to the jail industries board. The board shall use the
amounts provided only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases,
and technical assistance associated with advising cities and counties
in developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and
efficient offender work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,765,000))
$37,053,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,035,000))
$35,549,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($75,800,000))
$72,602,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state prison institutions may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to rent uniforms from correctional industries in
accordance with existing legislative mandates.
(b) The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated
in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital or
other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do
so.
(c) The department shall reduce payments to the department of
information services or its successor by $213,000 in fiscal year 2012
and by $1,150,000 in fiscal year 2013. The reduction in payment shall
be related to the elimination of the offender base tracking system,
including moving remaining portions of the offender base tracking
system into the offender management network information system.

Sec. 220 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,278,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,264,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,082,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,654,000

Sec. 221 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT
((General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $26,000))
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($267,328,000))
$267,301,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,937,000))
$33,931,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($359,598,000))
$350,622,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,429,000))
$20,948,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,738,000))
$33,721,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($715,099,000))
$706,523,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $39,666,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the
state by section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed
act). This amount is provided solely for continuing current
unemployment insurance functions and department services to employers
and job seekers.
(2) $35,584,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the
state by section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed
act). This amount is provided solely for the replacement of the
unemployment insurance tax information system for the employment
security department. The employment security department shall support
the department of revenue and department of labor and industries to
develop a common vision to ensure technological compatibility between
the three agencies to facilitate a coordinated business tax system for
the future that improves services to business customers. The amounts
provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department
satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight
standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer created in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5931 (information technology management).
(3) $25,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the
state by section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed
act). This amount is provided solely for implementation of system
changes to the unemployment insurance tax information system required
under chapter 4, Laws of 2011 (unemployment insurance program).
(4) $1,459,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is from amounts available to the state
by section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is provided solely for implementation of chapter 4, Laws of
2011 (unemployment insurance program).
(5) $60,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided solely for costs associated
with the initial review and evaluation of the training benefits program
as directed in section 15(2), chapter 4, Laws of 2011 (unemployment
insurance program). The initial review shall be developed by the joint
legislative audit and review committee. This appropriation is provided
from funds made available to the state by section 903 (d), (f), and (g)
of the social security act (Reed act).

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 301 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 301 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($364,000))
$402,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $410,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,000))
$31,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($386,000))
$782,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($766,000))
$1,625,000

Sec. 302 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,002,000))
$47,630,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,789,000))
$46,226,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,467,000))
$77,452,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,005,000))
$16,691,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Reclamation Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,642,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,940,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,475,000))
$11,478,000
State Drought Preparedness Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $118,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $423,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
Water Rights Tracking System Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($354,000))
$703,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $612,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,668,000
Water Rights Processing Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $136,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($112,512,000))
$112,575,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $968,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,384,000))
$27,390,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,730,000))
$37,748,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,251,000))
$3,254,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,805,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,854,000))
$5,857,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,468,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,563,000))
$5,566,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,744,000))
$2,746,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,700,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,076,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
((Pollution Liability Insurance Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $333,000))
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $611,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,517,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($424,989,000))
$421,842,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of
Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase the following fees as necessary to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section:
Wastewater discharge permit, not more than 4.34 percent in fiscal year
2012 and 4.62 percent in fiscal year 2013; biosolids permit fee, not
more than 10 percent during the biennium; and air contaminate source
registration fee, not more than 36 percent during the biennium; and dam
safety and inspection fees, not more than 35 percent in fiscal year
2012 and 4.62 percent in fiscal year 2013.
(3) If Substitute House Bill No. 1294 (Puget Sound corps) is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, $322,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and $322,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 shall be transferred to the
department of natural resources.
(4) $463,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1186 (state's oil spill program). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) The department may not spend waste reduction, recycling, and
litter control account funds to support the following activities: The
beyond waste plan, work on national solid waste recycling issues, work
on construction and demolition recycling and green building
alternatives, education programs including the green schools
initiative, and management of the 1-800-recycle hotline and database on
school awards. Waste reduction, recycling, and litter account control
funds must be prioritized to support litter pickup using correctional
crews, regulatory programs, and technical assistance to local
governments.
(6) The department shall make every possible effort through its
existing statutory authorities to obtain federal funding for public
participation grants regarding the Hanford nuclear reservation and
associated properties and facilities. Such federal funding shall not
limit the total state funding authorized under this section for public
participation grants made pursuant to RCW 70.105D.070(5), but the
amount of any individual grant from such federal funding shall be
offset against any grant award amount to an individual grantee from
state funds under RCW 70.105D.070(5).
(7) The department shall review its water rights application review
procedures to simplify the procedures, eliminate unnecessary steps, and
decrease the time required to issue decisions. The department shall
implement changes to improve water rights processing for which it has
current administrative authority. The department shall report on
reforms implemented and efficiencies achieved as demonstrated through
enhanced permit processing to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on December 1, 2011, and October 1, 2012.
(a) The department shall consult with key stakeholders on statutory
barriers to efficient water rights processing and effective water
management, including identification of obsolete, confusing, or
conflicting statutory provisions. The department shall report
stakeholder recommendations to appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2011, and October 1, 2012.
(b) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for processing water right permit
applications only if the department of ecology issues at least five
hundred water right decisions in fiscal year 2012, and if the
department of ecology does not issue at least five hundred water right
decisions in fiscal year 2012 the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse and remain unexpended. The department of ecology shall
submit a report to the office of financial management and the state
treasurer by June 30, 2012, that documents whether five hundred water
right decisions were issued in fiscal year 2012.
(c) The department shall maintain an ongoing accounting of water
right applications received and acted on and shall post that
information to the department's internet site.
(8) ((Appropriations for fiscal year 2013 are included for
consolidation of the Columbia river gorge commission and the pollution
liability insurance agency into the department of ecology.
(11))) $1,075,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $1,075,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for processing
the backlog of pending water rights permit applications in the water
resources program.

Sec. 303 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,955,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,379,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,905,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,761,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $224,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,848,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $363,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($115,779,000))
$116,087,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($146,514,000))
$146,822,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $8,876,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $8,300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to operate and maintain state
parks as the commission implements a new fee structure. The goal of
this structure is to make the parks system self-supporting. By August
1, 2012, state parks must submit a report to the office of financial
management detailing its progress toward this goal and outlining any
additional statutory changes needed for successful implementation.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $79,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $53,928,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5622 (state land recreation access). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(((5))) (4) Prior to closing any state park, the commission must
notify all affected local governments and relevant nonprofit
organizations of the intended closure and provide an opportunity for
the notified local governments and nonprofit organizations to elect to
acquire, or enter into, a maintenance and operating contract with the
commission that would allow the park to remain open.

Sec. 304 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($953,000))
$954,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($972,000))
$973,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,299,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $274,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $278,000
Vessel Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,874,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,687,000))
$9,689,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $40,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation, $24,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation, $100,000 of the vessel response account--state
appropriation, and $12,000 of the recreation resources account--state
appropriation are provided solely for House Bill No. 1413 (invasive
species council). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 305 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,419,000))
$2,308,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,422,000))
$2,275,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,841,000))
$4,583,000

Sec. 306 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,790,000))
$6,789,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,793,000))
$6,792,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,301,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,884,000))
$14,882,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The conservation commission, in cooperation with all
conservation districts, will seek to minimize conservation district
overhead costs. These efforts may include consolidating conservation
districts.
(2) $122,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely for Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1886 (Ruckelshaus center
process). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 307 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,721,000))
$34,695,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,666,000))
$32,388,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $105,717,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,711,000))
$57,025,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $391,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,856,000))
$8,230,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,550,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,051,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $849,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $719,000
State Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,169,000))
$100,424,000
Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,384,000
Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,428,000))
$500,000
Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($487,000))
$3,415,000
Wildlife Rehabilitation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $259,000
Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,001,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $887,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $921,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($354,971,000))
$360,610,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $294,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(2) $355,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $355,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the department to continue a
pilot project with the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation
to develop expanded recreational fishing opportunities on Lake Rufus
Woods and its northern shoreline and to conduct joint enforcement of
lake fisheries on Lake Rufus Woods and adjoining waters, pursuant to
state and tribal intergovernmental agreements developed under the
Columbia River water supply program. For the purposes of the pilot
project:
(a) A fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville
Tribes shall satisfy the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on the
waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(b) The Colville Tribes have agreed to provide to holders of its
nontribal member fishing permits a means to demonstrate that fish in
their possession were lawfully taken in Lake Rufus Woods;
(c) A Colville tribal member identification card shall satisfy the
license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods;
(d) The department and the Colville Tribes shall jointly designate
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods for the purposes
of enhancing access to the recreational fisheries on the lake; and
(e) The Colville Tribes have agreed to recognize a fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470 or RCW 77.32.490 as satisfying the nontribal
member fishing permit requirements of Colville tribal law on the
reservation portion of the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and at designated
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(3) Prior to submitting its 2013-2015 biennial operating and
capital budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office
of financial management, the department shall contract with the
hatchery scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This
review shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent
with HSRG recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the
requests based on their contributions to protecting wild salmonid
stocks and meeting the recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate
whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost effective
manner. The department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the
office of financial management with their agency budget proposal.
(4) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
army corps of engineers.
(5) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for removal of derelict gear in
Washington waters.
(6) $100,000 of the eastern Washington pheasant enhancement
account -- state appropriation is provided solely for the department to
support efforts to enhance permanent and temporary pheasant habitat on
public and private lands in Grant, Franklin, and Adams counties. The
department may support efforts by entities including conservation
districts, nonprofit organizations, and landowners, and must require
such entities to provide significant nonstate matching resources, which
may be in the form of funds, material, or labor.
(7) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall identify additional opportunities for partnerships in order to
keep fish hatcheries operational. Such partnerships shall aim to
maintain fish production and salmon recovery with less reliance on
state operating funds.
(8) By September 1, 2011, the department shall update its
interagency agreement dated September 30, 2010, with the department of
natural resources concerning land management services on the department
of fish and wildlife's wildlife conservation and recreation lands. The
update shall include rates and terms for services.
(9) Prior to opening game management unit 490 to public hunting,
the department shall complete an environmental impact statement that
includes an assessment of how public hunting activities will impact the
ongoing protection of the public water supply.
(10) $18,514,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5385 (state wildlife account). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $9,418,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5622 (state land recreation access). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 308 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,856,000))
$31,324,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,057,000))
$35,791,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,919,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,374,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,507,000))
$41,717,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,387,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,346,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,218,000))
$7,224,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($81,800,000))
$82,097,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,484,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Forest and Fish Support Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,933,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $838,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,319,000))
$669,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $639,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,761,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,854,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($259,406,000))
$257,471,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($977,000)) $710,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 and $915,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for deposit into
the agricultural college trust management account and are provided
solely to manage approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State
University's agricultural college trust lands.
(2) (($10,037,000)) $8,030,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, $10,037,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $5,000,000 of the
disaster response account -- state appropriation are provided solely for
emergency fire suppression. None of the general fund and disaster
response account amounts provided in this subsection may be used to
fund agency indirect and administrative expenses. Agency indirect and
administrative costs shall be allocated among the agency's remaining
accounts and appropriations. The department of natural resources shall
submit a quarterly report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and
planned expenditures from the disaster response account. This work
shall be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) $4,000,000 of the forest and fish support account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to tribes. If federal funding for this
purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $333,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to nongovernmental organizations.
(5) $487,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely to fund interagency agreements with the department of ecology
and the department of fish and wildlife as part of the adaptive
management process.
(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation and
$1,000,000 of the forest and fish support account--state appropriation
are provided solely for continuing scientific studies already underway
as part of the adaptive management process. Funds may not be used to
initiate new studies unless the department secures new federal funding
for the adaptive management process.
(7) The department is authorized to increase the silviculture
burning permit fee in the 2011-2013 biennium by up to eighty dollars
plus fifty cents per ton for each ton of material burned in excess of
one hundred tons.
(8) $440,000 of the state general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $440,000 of the state general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for forest work
crews that support correctional camps and are contingent upon
continuing operations of Naselle youth camp.
(9) By September 1, 2011, the department shall update its
interagency agreement dated September 30, 2010, with the department of
fish and wildlife concerning land management services on the department
of fish and wildlife's wildlife conservation and recreation lands. The
update shall include rates and terms for services.

Sec. 309 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,729,000))
$15,484,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,371,000))
$14,875,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,925,000))
$22,940,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,074,000))
$2,553,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,116,000))
$5,118,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,465,000))
$61,500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $5,308,445 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and $5,302,905 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for
implementing the food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.

Sec. 310 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 310 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM
Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($335,000))
$668,000

Sec. 311 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,545,000))
$2,399,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,520,000))
$2,424,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,581,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $493,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $665,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,829,000))
$15,587,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($706,000)) $665,000 of the state toxics control account--state appropriation is provided solely for activities that contribute
to Puget Sound protection and recovery, including provision of
independent advice and assessment of the state's oil spill prevention,
preparedness, and response programs, including review of existing
activities and recommendations for any necessary improvements. The
partnership may carry out this function through an existing committee,
such as the ecosystem coordination board or the leadership council, or
may appoint a special advisory council. Because this is a unique
statewide program, the partnership may invite participation from
outside the Puget Sound region.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the Puget
Sound partnership shall facilitate an ongoing monitoring consortium to
integrate monitoring efforts for storm water, water quality, watershed
health, and other indicators to enhance monitoring efforts in Puget
Sound.

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 401 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,265,000))
$1,167,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,508,000))
$1,307,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,084,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,524,000))
$3,518,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,843,000))
$9,833,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,126,000))
$3,120,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,687,000
Business and Professions Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,646,000))
$15,592,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $622,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,663,000))
$38,288,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase fees for collection agencies. This increase is necessary to
support the expenditures authorized in this section, consistent with
RCW 43.24.086.
(2) $8,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5574 (collection agencies).

Sec. 402 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,921,000))
$37,352,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,578,000))
$35,108,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,081,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,021,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,572,000))
$5,551,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,215,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,290,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,002,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,010,000))
$9,394,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $505,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,788,000))
$10,090,000
Vehicle License Fraud Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $339,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($131,507,000))
$130,133,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the fire service training account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the
state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12
construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the
state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide
these services only to those districts that are located in counties
without qualified review capabilities.
(2) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account--state
appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service
resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or
disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 and 43.43.964. The state
patrol shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information
on current and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall
be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) $400,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship
training program.
(4) In accordance with RCW 43.43.742 the state patrol is authorized
to increase the following fees in fiscal year 2012 as necessary to meet
the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in
this section: Notary service fee.
(5) $59,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1776 (child care center licensing). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) $6,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1494 (vulnerable adult referrals). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
Sec. 501 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,701,000))
$25,406,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,052,000))
$22,502,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($81,065,000))
$77,065,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($133,818,000))
$128,973,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of (($16,450,000)) $16,139,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and (($13,889,000))
$13,335,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2013 is for state agency operations.
(a) (($9,365,000)) $9,775,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and (($8,451,000)) $8,532,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided
solely for the operation and expenses of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.
(i) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), the
superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of
four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the
civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans
civic education award.
(ii) By January 1, 2012, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall issue a report to the legislature with a timeline and
an estimate of costs for implementation of the common core standards.
The report must incorporate feedback from an open public forum for
recommendations to enhance the standards, particularly in math.
(iii) Within the amounts provided, and in consultation with the
public school employees of Washington and the Washington school
counselors' association, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop a model policy that further defines the
recommended roles and responsibilities of graduation coaches and
identifies best practices for how graduation coaches work in
coordination with school counselors and in the context of a
comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
(((v))) (iv) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall, no later than August 1, 2011, establish a standard statewide
definition of unexcused absence. The definition shall be reported to
the ways and means committees of the senate and house of
representatives for legislative review in the 2012 legislative session.
Beginning no later than January 1, 2012, districts shall report to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, daily student
unexcused absence data by school.
(b) $1,964,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,017,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for activities associated with the
implementation of new school finance systems required by chapter 236,
Laws of 2010 (K-12 education funding) and chapter 548, Laws of 2009
(state's education system), including technical staff, systems
reprogramming, and workgroup deliberations, including the quality
education council and the data governance working group.
(c) $851,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $851,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the state board of education, including basic education assistance
activities.
(d) $1,744,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,362,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to the professional educator
standards board for the following:
(i) $1,050,000 in fiscal year 2012 and $1,050,000 in fiscal year
2013 are for the operation and expenses of the Washington professional
educator standards board; and
(ii) $694,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $312,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are for conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends provided through the alternative routes to certification
program administered by the professional educator standards board,
including the pipeline for paraeducators program and the retooling to
teach conditional loan programs. Funding within this subsection
(1)(d)(ii) is also provided for the recruiting Washington teachers
program. Funding reductions in this subsection (1)(d)(ii) in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium are intended to be one-time.
(e) $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil
rights.
(f) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the ongoing work of the
((achievement)) education opportunity gap oversight and accountability
committee.
(g) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on educational
opportunity for military children).
(h) $159,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
185, Laws of 2011 (bullying prevention), which requires the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to convene an ongoing
workgroup on school bullying and harassment prevention. Within the
amounts provided, $140,000 is for youth suicide prevention activities.
(((j))) (i) $1,227,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $1,227,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementing
a comprehensive data system to include financial, student, and educator
data, including development and maintenance of the comprehensive
education data and research system (CEDARS).
(((k))) (j) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for project citizen, a program
sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and the
center for civic education to promote participation in government by
middle school students.
(((l))) (k) $166,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 is provided solely for the implementation of chapter
192, Laws of 2011 (school district insolvency). Funding is provided to
develop a clear legal framework and process for dissolution of a school
district.
(2) $9,267,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $9,167,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are for statewide programs.

(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,541,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at
educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of
public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to
provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.
(ii) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a nonviolence and leadership
training program provided by the institute for community leadership.

(b) TECHNOLOGY
$1,221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2012 and $1,221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 are provided solely for K-20 telecommunications network
technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and
avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data processing and
video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These funds may be
used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support for the
network.

(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington state achievers
scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support community
involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community volunteer
mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(ii) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for contracting with a college
scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach to
students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound
scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007.
(iii) $2,808,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $2,808,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
dissemination of the navigation 101 curriculum to all districts. The
funding shall support electronic student planning tools and software
for analyzing the impact of navigation 101 on student performance, as
well as grants to a maximum of one hundred school districts each year,
based on progress and need for the implementation of the navigation 101
program. The implementation grants shall be awarded to a cross-section
of school districts reflecting a balance of geographic and demographic
characteristics. Within the amounts provided, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction will create a navigation 101
accountability model to analyze the impact of the program.
(iv) $337,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $337,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementation of the building
bridges statewide program for comprehensive dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement strategies.
(v) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for dropout prevention programs at
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, including the
jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program.
(vi) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
340, Laws of 2011 (assessment of students in state-funded full-day
kindergarten classrooms), including the development and implementation
of the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills (WaKIDS).

Sec. 502 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,242,704,000))
$5,253,769,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,217,070,000))
$5,205,868,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,078,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,459,774,000))
$10,481,715,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such
funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal
year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(b) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as
provided in the funding formulas and salary schedules in sections 502
and 503 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.
(c) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as
provided in sections 502 and 504, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as amended
through sections 1402 and 1403 of this act.
(d) The appropriations in this section include federal funds
provided through section 101 of P.L. No. 111-226 (education jobs fund),
which shall be used to support general apportionment program funding.
In distributing general apportionment allocations under this section
for the 2011-12 school year, the superintendent shall include the
additional amount of $3,078,000 allocated by the United States
department of education on September 16, 2011, provided through 101 of
P.L. No. 111-226 (education jobs fund) as part of each district's
general apportionment allocation.
(e) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in
September and on the first school day of each month October through
June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. Any school district concluding its basic education
program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held
in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the
2011-12 and 2012-13 school years are determined using formula-generated
staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.
(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW
28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size
allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as
provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall ((adjust)) make
allocations to school districts based on the district's annual average
full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.
(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in
this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW
28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of
prototypical school on the following regular education average class
size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided
in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade RCW 28A.150.260

Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for career and technical
education (CTE) and skill center programs average class size as
provided in RCW 28A.150.260.
(ii) For each level of prototypical school at which more than fifty
percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals
in the prior school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding
based on the following average class size of full-time equivalent
students per teacher:

General education class size in high poverty
school:

Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 24.10

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(iii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher
planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is
13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and
(iv) Laboratory science, advanced placement, and international
baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as
general education schools in the same grade; and
(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated
based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and is
considered certificated instructional staff, except as provided in
(d)(ii) of this subsection.
(ii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to
provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following
combined rate per 1000 students:

Career and Technical Education
students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.02 per 1000 student FTE's
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.36 per 1000 student FTE's

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS
(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated
administrative staff salaries for the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years
for general education students are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based
on a district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment
in each grade.
(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated school building-level
administrator staff units at per student rates that exceed the general
education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following percentages:

Career and Technical Education students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.5 percent
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 19.75 percent

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2011-12 and 2012-13
school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units
provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based on each district's
annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS
In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated
in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and
administrative staff units are provided for the 2011-12 and 2012-13
school year for the central office administrative costs of operating a
school district, at the following rates:
(a) The total central office staff units provided in this
subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of
eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and
classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support
services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b), by 5.3 percent.
(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this
subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as
generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.47 percent shall be
allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3)
of this section.
(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of
basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and
staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students,
are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in
(a) of this subsection.
(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center
programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same
staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education
students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office
administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student
rates that exceed the general education rate established for students
in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 3.69 percent for career and
technical education students, and 21.92 percent for skill center
students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of
((16.49)) 16.33 percent in the 2011-12 school year and ((16.50)) 16.33
percent in the 2012-13 school year for certificated salary allocations
provided under subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a
rate of ((18.86)) 18.73 percent in the 2011-12 school year and
((18.88)) 18.73 percent in the 2012-13 school year for classified
salary allocations provided under subsections (4) and (5) of this
section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504 of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections
(4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is
intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of
distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified
employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per
year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time
equivalent.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS
Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent
student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC)
incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW
28A.150.260.
(a) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at
the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component 2011-12
SCHOOL YEAR 2012-13
SCHOOL YEAR

Technology (($57.02)) $57.42 (($57.99)) $58.17

Utilities and Insurance (($154.93))
$156.03 (($157.56))
$158.05

Curriculum and Textbooks (($61.22)) $61.65 (($62.26)) $62.45

Other Supplies and Library Materials (($129.97))
$130.89 (($132.18))
$132.59

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated and Classified Staff (($9.47)) $9.53 (($9.63)) $9.66

Facilities Maintenance (($76.75)) $77.30 (($78.06)) $78.30

Security and Central Office (($53.17)) $53.55 (($54.08)) $54.25

TOTAL BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE (($542.53))
$546.37 (($551.76))
$553.47

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student
FTE MSOC allocations which equal the rate for general education
students calculated in (a) of this subsection, multiplied by a factor
of ((2.187)) 2.171.
(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education programs generate a per student MSOC allocation
that is equal to the rate for general education students calculated in
(a) of this subsection, multiplied by a factor of ((2.459)) 2.442.
(d) Students in laboratory science courses generate per student FTE
MSOC allocations which equal the per student FTE rate for general
education students established in (a) of this subsection.

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS
For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, funding for substitute
costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute
days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this
section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING
(a) Amounts provided in this section are adjusted to reflect
provisions of House Bill No. 2065 (allocation of funding for funding
for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all
districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative
learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to
provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE
programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not
limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as
accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic
education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident
students.

(11) VOLUNTARY FULL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS
Funding in this section is sufficient to fund voluntary full day
kindergarten programs in qualifying high poverty schools, pursuant to
RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315. Each kindergarten student who enrolls
for the voluntary full-day program in a qualifying school shall count
as one-half of one full-time equivalent student for purpose of making
allocations under this section. Funding in this section provides full-day kindergarten programs for 21 percent of kindergarten enrollment in
the 2011-12 school year, and 22 percent in the 2012-13 school year.
Funding priority shall be given to schools with the highest poverty
levels, as measured by prior year free and reduced price lunch
eligibility rates in each school. Funding in this section is
sufficient to fund voluntary full day kindergarten programs for July
and August of the 2010-11 school year.

(12) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND
NECESSARY PLANTS
For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants
within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary
by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are
provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional
administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to
districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education
staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center
enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of
this section on a per district basis.
(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and
enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent
students in grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full-time equivalent students;
(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit
allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified
staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit; and
(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support
small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under
subsection (12) of this section shall generate additional MSOC
allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC)
allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided
section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental
budget), adjusted annually for inflation.
(13) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(14) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following
programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2012
and 2013 as follows:
(a) $589,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and (($599,000)) $597,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for fire
protection for school districts located in a fire protection district
as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.
(b) $436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for programs providing skills
training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day
school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public
instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500
per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.
(c) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund adjustments to
school districts' allocations resulting from the implementation of the
prototypical school funding formula, pursuant to chapter 236, Laws of
2010 (K-12 education funding). The funding in this section is intended
to hold school districts harmless in total for funding changes
resulting from conversion to the prototypical school formula in the
general apportionment program, the learning assistance program, the
transitional bilingual program, and the highly capable program, after
adjustment for changes in enrollment and other caseload adjustments.
(15) $208,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $211,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for school district emergencies as
certified by the superintendent of public instruction. At the close of
the fiscal year the superintendent of public instruction shall report
to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature on the allocations provided to districts
and the nature of the emergency.
(16) ((Amounts in this section include adjustments made by the
superintendent of public instruction for the repayment of financial
contingency funds allocated in fiscal year 2011, as specified in
section 501 of the 2011 supplemental budget. For any amount allocated
to a district in state fiscal year 2011, the superintendent of public
instruction shall deduct in state fiscal year 2012 from the district's
general apportionment the amount of the emergency contingency
allocation and any earnings by the school district on the investment of
a temporary cash surplus due to the emergency contingency allocation.
Repayments or advances will be accomplished by a reduction in the
school district's apportionment payments on or before June 30th of the
school year following the distribution of the emergency contingency
allocation. All disbursements, repayments, and outstanding allocations
to be repaid of the emergency contingency pool shall be reported to the
office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees of
the legislature on July 1st and January 1st of each year.
(17))) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of
1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463,
Laws of 2007.
(((18))) (17) Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, students
participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined
maximum enrollment of 1.2 FTE including school district and institution
of higher education enrollment. In calculating the combined 1.2 FTE,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction may average the
participating student's September through June enrollment to account
for differences in the start and end dates for courses provided by the
high school and higher education institution. Additionally, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the
state board for community and technical colleges, the higher education
coordinating board, and the education data center, shall annually track
and report to the fiscal committees of the legislature on the combined
FTE experience of students participating in the running start program,
including course load analyses at both the high school and community
and technical college system.
(((19))) (18) If two or more school districts consolidate and each
district was receiving additional basic education formula staff units
pursuant to subsection (12) of this section, the following apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (12) of this section shall be
reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(((20))) (19)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to
approved career and technical education middle and secondary programs
shall not exceed 15 percent of the combined basic education and career
and technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds.
Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are
considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting
purposes under this section.
(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent
enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the
enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall
be adjusted for reported career and technical education program
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

Sec. 503 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION
(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the
state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated
administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW
28A.150.280 and under section 503 of this act:
(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
are determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 2
by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP document
1; and
(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units
and classified staff units for each district are determined based on
the district's certificated administrative and classified salary
allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document 2.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "LEAP Document 1" means the staff mix factors for certificated
instructional staff according to education and years of experience, as
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on May 23, 2011, at 16:10 hours; and
(b) "LEAP Document 2" means the school year salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff and classified staff and derived and
total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed
by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on
May 23, 2011, at 16:10 hours.
(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary
adjustments at a rate of ((15.85)) 15.69 percent for school year
2011-12 and ((15.86)) 15.69 percent for school year 2012-13 for
certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and
((15.36)) 15.23 percent for school year 2011-12 and ((15.38)) 15.23
percent for the 2012-13 school year for classified staff.
(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary
allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are
established for basic education salary allocations:

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff For School Year 2011-12
***Education Experience***

Years MA+90

of OR

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 Ph.D.

0 33,401 34,303 35,238 36,175 39,180 41,116 40,045 43,051 44,989

1 33,851 34,765 35,712 36,690 39,727 41,652 40,490 43,527 45,452

2 34,279 35,202 36,159 37,212 40,241 42,186 40,938 43,966 45,912

3 34,720 35,653 36,620 37,706 40,729 42,722 41,363 44,384 46,377

4 35,153 36,127 37,099 38,224 41,264 43,271 41,808 44,849 46,857

5 35,600 36,578 37,561 38,748 41,777 43,824 42,261 45,291 47,339

6 36,060 37,017 38,032 39,279 42,293 44,352 42,725 45,740 47,797

7 36,868 37,839 38,868 40,182 43,241 45,356 43,594 46,652 48,768

8 38,050 39,074 40,127 41,550 44,651 46,844 44,961 48,063 50,254

9 40,353 41,459 42,933 46,106 48,373 46,343 49,518 51,785

10 42,806 44,387 47,602 49,945 47,798 51,014 53,356

11 45,883 49,169 51,558 49,295 52,581 54,969

12 47,332 50,777 53,238 50,850 54,188 56,650

13 52,425 54,959 52,460 55,836 58,370

14 54,081 56,745 54,117 57,600 60,157

15 55,488 58,221 55,523 59,098 61,721

16 or more 56,597 59,385 56,634 60,279 62,955

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff For School Year 2012-13
***Education Experience***

Years MA+90

of OR

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 Ph.D.

0 33,401 34,303 35,238 36,175 39,180 41,116 40,045 43,051 44,989

1 33,851 34,765 35,712 36,690 39,727 41,652 40,490 43,527 45,452

2 34,279 35,202 36,159 37,212 40,241 42,186 40,938 43,966 45,912

3 34,720 35,653 36,620 37,706 40,729 42,722 41,363 44,384 46,377

4 35,153 36,127 37,099 38,224 41,264 43,271 41,808 44,849 46,857

5 35,600 36,578 37,561 38,748 41,777 43,824 42,261 45,291 47,339

6 36,060 37,017 38,032 39,279 42,293 44,352 42,725 45,740 47,797

7 36,868 37,839 38,868 40,182 43,241 45,356 43,594 46,652 48,768

8 38,050 39,074 40,127 41,550 44,651 46,844 44,961 48,063 50,254

9 40,353 41,459 42,933 46,106 48,373 46,343 49,518 51,785

10 42,806 44,387 47,602 49,945 47,798 51,014 53,356

11 45,883 49,169 51,558 49,295 52,581 54,969

12 47,332 50,777 53,238 50,850 54,188 56,650

13 52,425 54,959 52,460 55,836 58,370

14 54,081 56,745 54,117 57,600 60,157

15 55,488 58,221 55,523 59,098 61,721

16 or more 56,597 59,385 56,634 60,279 62,955

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer
to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate
degree.
(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before
the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be
counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection,
the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:
(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and
(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.
(b) "MA" means a masters degree.
(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.
(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent
in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and
28A.415.023.
(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by
any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in this part V, or any replacement schedules
and documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(7) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are
for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

Sec. 504 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Additional salary adjustments as necessary to fund the base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as listed for each
district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section 504(2)(b) of this act.
Allocations for these salary adjustments shall be provided to all
districts that are not grandfathered to receive salary allocations
above the statewide salary allocation schedule, and to certain
grandfathered districts to the extent necessary to ensure that salary
allocations for districts that are currently grandfathered do not fall
below the statewide salary allocation schedule.
(b) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff as listed for each district in LEAP
Document 2, defined in section 504(2)(b) of this act.
(c) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for classified
staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2, defined in
section 504(2)(b) of this act.
(d) The appropriations in this subsection (1) include associated
incremental fringe benefit allocations at ((15.85)) 15.69 percent for
the 2011-12 school year and ((15.86)) 15.69 percent for the 2012-13
school year for certificated instructional and certificated
administrative staff and ((15.36)) 15.23 percent for the 2011-12 school
year and ((15.38)) 15.23 percent for the 2012-13 school year for
classified staff.
(e) The appropriations in this section include the increased or
decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all
relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes
for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections 503 and 504 of this
act. Changes for special education result from changes in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
503 and 504 of this act.
(f) The appropriations in this section include no salary
adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2) The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is
$768.00 per month for the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years. The
appropriations in this section reflect the incremental change in cost
of allocating rates of $768.00 per month for the 2011-12 school year
and $768.00 per month for the 2012-13 school year.
(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

Sec. 505 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($323,759,000))
$322,033,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($326,054,000))
$273,380,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($649,813,000))
$595,413,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for the
transportation of students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192.
(b) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of
students as provided in section 505, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1404 of this act.
(3) Any amounts appropriated for maintenance level funding for
pupil transportation that exceed actual maintenance level expenditures
as calculated under the funding formula that takes effect September 1,
2011, shall be distributed to districts according to RCW
28A.160.192(2)(b).
(4) A maximum of $892,000 of this fiscal year 2012 appropriation
and a maximum of $892,000 of the fiscal year 2013 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus
purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction
determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process
based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to
those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall base
depreciation payments for school district buses on the pre-sales tax
five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus.
In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation
payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus
category for that school year.
(7) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the
state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW
28A.305.141.
(8) Starting with the 2012-13 school year, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall disburse payments for bus
depreciation in August.

Sec. 506 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE
PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,111,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,111,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($437,988,000))
$436,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($452,210,000))
$450,622,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $7,111,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $7,111,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for state matching money for
federal child nutrition programs, and may support the meals for kids
program through the following allowable uses:
(a) Elimination of breakfast copays for eligible public school
students and lunch copays for eligible public school students in grades
kindergarten through third grade who are eligible for reduced price
lunch;
(b) Assistance to school districts and authorized public and
private nonprofit organizations for supporting summer food service
programs, and initiating new summer food service programs in low-income
areas;
(c) Reimbursements to school districts for school breakfasts served
to students eligible for free and reduced price lunch, pursuant to
chapter 287, Laws of 2005; and
(d) Assistance to school districts in initiating and expanding
school breakfast programs.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall report
annually to the fiscal committees of the legislature on annual
expenditures in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection.

Sec. 507 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($659,950,000))
$653,904,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($689,480,000))
$694,237,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($691,796,000))
$486,936,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $756,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,041,982,000))
$1,835,833,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to
implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed
by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to
section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.
(c) Beginning with the 2010-11 school year award cycle, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award
determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school
year. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety
net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from
the current school year.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for special
education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390.
(b) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school district programs for special education
students as provided in section 507, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1406 of this act.
(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions
for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW
28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund--state funded special
education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual
enrollment percent or 12.7 percent.
(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW
28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate
rather than individual district units. For purposes of this
subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than
individual district units.
(7) (($16,404,000)) $8,914,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, (($30,807,000)) $34,200,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $29,574,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
safety net awards for districts with demonstrated needs for special
education funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this
section. If the federal safety net awards based on the federal
eligibility threshold exceed the federal appropriation in this
subsection (7) in any fiscal year, the superintendent shall expend all
available federal discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At
the conclusion of each school year, the superintendent shall recover
safety net funds that were distributed prospectively but for which
districts were not subsequently eligible.
(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, safety net funds
shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as
provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (ESHB 2261).
(b) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
operate the safety net oversight committee and shall award safety net
funds as provided in section 507, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as amended
through section 1406 of this act.
(8) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund--state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund--state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.
(11) $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for two additional full-time
equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to
provide training and support to districts applying for safety net
awards.
(12) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
shall be expended to support a special education ombudsman program
within the office of superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 508 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE
DISTRICTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,898,000))
$7,889,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,917,000))
$7,904,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,815,000))
$15,793,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional
professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum
and instructional strategies. Funding shall be distributed among the
educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions
in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use
this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated
instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter
and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials,
and other expenditures related to providing regional professional
development support.
(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.310.340, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

Sec. 509 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR LOCAL EFFORT
ASSISTANCE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($303,337,000))
$300,761,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($308,445,000))
$299,276,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($611,782,000))
$600,037,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the
increase per full-time equivalent student is 3 percent from the 2010-11
school year to the 2011-12 school year and 5 percent from the 2011-12
school year to the 2012-13 school year.

Sec. 510 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,420,000))
$17,507,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,190,000))
$16,969,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,610,000))
$34,476,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund--state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) (($509,000)) $669,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 and (($509,000)) $669,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to
maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related
support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not
sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated
instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following
types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the
department of social and health services for developmentally disabled
juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections,
programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation
administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county
jails.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 511 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,741,000))
$8,759,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,794,000))
$8,842,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,535,000))
$17,601,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable
students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i)
Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly
capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students
per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900
instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the district's average staff
mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this
act.
(b) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable
students as provided in section 511, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1409 of this act.
(3) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort
Worden state park.

Sec. 512 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR MISCELLANEOUS--NO
CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,352,000))
$6,152,000

Sec. 513 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,078,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($98,491,000))
$98,309,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($103,161,000))
$219,161,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,598,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($265,328,000))
$381,146,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $40,822,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $41,613,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for development and
implementation of the Washington state assessment system, including:
(a) Development and implementation of retake assessments for high
school students who are not successful in one or more content areas and
(b) development and implementation of alternative assessments or
appeals procedures to implement the certificate of academic
achievement. The superintendent of public instruction shall report
quarterly on the progress on development and implementation of
alternative assessments or appeals procedures. Within these amounts,
the superintendent of public instruction shall contract for the early
return of 10th grade student assessment results, on or around June 10th
of each year. State funding shall be limited to one collection of
evidence payment per student, per content-area assessment.
(2) $356,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $356,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington state
leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional
partnership activities coordinated at the Pacific science center,
including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal
professional development, and school and community engagement events.
(3) $980,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $980,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for improving technology
infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district technology
development, promoting standards for school district technology,
promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.
(4) $3,852,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,624,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for continued implementation of
chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) including development of
new performance-based evaluation systems for certificated educators.
(5)(a) (($40,863,000)) $40,681,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for the following
bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the
national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching
in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of $5,090 per
teacher in the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, adjusted for inflation
in each school year in which Initiative 732 cost of living adjustments
are provided;
(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national
board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where
at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for
federal free or reduced price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least
60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free
or reduced price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70
percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or
reduced price lunch;
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications
for bonuses under (a)(ii) of this subsection for less than one full
school year receive bonuses in a pro-rated manner. Beginning in the
2011-12 school year, all bonuses in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection
will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in (a)(i) and (ii)
of this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for first
year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the
instructional school year they are certified; and
(iv) During the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, and within
available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the
eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the
national board for professional teaching standards may receive a
conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward
the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front
candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual
bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in
addition to compensation received under a district's salary schedule
and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average
salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200.
Recipients who fail to receive certification after three years are
required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the
terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including
applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use
revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure
payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section
in each school year.
(6) $477,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $477,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(7) $950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps.
The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing
comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more
schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.
(8) $810,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $810,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the development of a
leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent
organization to design, field test, and implement a state-of-the-art
education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the
state. Initial development of the content of the academy activities
shall be supported by private funds. Semiannually the independent
organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and
others to support the development and implementation of this program.
Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations
for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public
instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as
the independent organization shall identify.
(9) $3,234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $3,234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for grants to school districts to
provide a continuum of care for children and families to help children
become ready to learn. Grant proposals from school districts shall
contain local plans designed collaboratively with community service
providers. If a continuum of care program exists in the area in which
the school district is located, the local plan shall provide for
coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent possible.
(10) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
288, Laws of 2011 (actual student success program), including
allocations to the opportunity internship program, the jobs for
America's graduates program, the building bridges program, services
provided by a college scholarship organization. Funding shall not be
used in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium to provide awards for schools and
school districts.
(11) (($843,000)) $859,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012, (($848,000)) $846,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and (($247,000)) $248,000 of the
education legacy trust account--state appropriation are for
administrative support of education reform programs.
(12) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a statewide information
technology (IT) academy program. This public-private partnership will
provide educational software, as well as IT certification and software
training opportunities for students and staff in public schools.
(13) $977,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $977,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for secondary career and technical
education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008. If equally
matched by private donations, $300,000 of the 2012 appropriation and
$300,000 of the 2013 appropriation shall be used to support FIRST
robotics programs.
(14) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for (a) staff at the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote efforts
to develop integrated math, science, technology, and engineering
programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b) grants of
$2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each year with
professional development training for implementing integrated math,
science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.
(15) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for science, technology,
engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects, consistent with
chapter 238, Laws of 2010.
(16) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a beginning educator support
program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply for
grant funding. The superintendent shall implement this program in 5 to
15 school districts and/or regional consortia. The program provided by
a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid
orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a
professional growth plan for each beginning teacher aligned with
professional certification; release time for mentors and new teachers
to work together; and teacher observation time with accomplished peers.
$250,000 may be used to provide statewide professional development
opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.

Sec. 514 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($83,959,000))
$79,496,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,580,000))
$82,856,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,001,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($243,540,000))
$233,353,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual
programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages:
(i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional
bilingual program student; (ii) fifteen transitional bilingual program
students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900
instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the district's average staff
mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this
act.
(b) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual
instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 564, Laws of
2009, as amended through section 1411 of this act.
(c) The allocations in this section reflect the implementation of
a new funding formula for the transitional bilingual instructional
program, effective September 1, 2011, as specified in RCW
28A.150.260(10)(b).
(3) The superintendent may withhold ((up to 3.0 percent of the
school year)) allocations to school districts in subsection (2) of this
section solely for the central provision of assessments as provided in
RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the following amounts: 2.79 percent
for school year 2011-12 and 2.09 percent for school year 2012-13.
(4) The general fund--federal appropriation in this section is for
migrant education under Title I Part C and English language
acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the
elementary and secondary education act.
(5)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
implement a funding model for the transitional bilingual program,
beginning in school year 2012-13, that is scaled to provide more
support to students requiring most intensive intervention, (students
with beginning levels of English language proficiency) and less support
to students requiring less intervention. The funding model shall also
provide up to two years of bonus funding upon successful exit from the
bilingual program to facilitate successful transition to a standard
program of education.
(b) It is expected that per-pupil funding for level 2 proficiency
will be set at the same level as would have been provided statewide
prior to establishing differential per-pupil amounts; level 1 will be
125 percent of level 2; level 3 through the level prior to exit will be
75 percent of level 2; and two bonus years upon successful
demonstration of proficiency will be 100 percent of level 2. Prior to
implementing in school year 2012-13, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall provide to the senate and house of
representatives ways and means committees recommended rates based on
the results of proficiency test procurement, expressed as both per-pupil rates and hours of instruction as provided in RCW
28A.150.260(10)(b).
(c) Each bilingual student shall be tested for proficiency level
and, therefore, eligibility for the transitional bilingual program each
year. The bonus payments for up to two school years following
successful exit from the transitional bilingual program shall be
allocated to the exiting school district. If the student graduates or
transfers to another district prior to the district receiving both
years' bonuses, the district shall receive the bonus for only the
length of time the student remains enrolled in the exiting district.
(d) The quality education council shall examine the revised
funding model developed under this subsection and provide a report to
the education and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1,
2011, that includes recommendations for:
(i) Changing the prototypical school funding formula for the
transitional bilingual program to align with the revised model in an
accurate and transparent manner;
(ii) Reconciling the revised model with statutory requirements for
categorical funding of the transitional bilingual instructional program
that is restricted to students eligible for and enrolled in that
program;
(iii) Clarifying the elements of the transitional bilingual
instructional program that fall under the definition of basic education
and the impact of the revised model on them; and
(iv) The extent that the disparate financial impact of the revised
model on different school districts should be addressed and options for
addressing it.
(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
report to the senate and house of representatives ways and means
committees and education committees annually by December 31st of each
year, through 2018, regarding any measurable changes in proficiency,
time-in-program, and transition experience.
(6) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to track current and former
transitional bilingual program students.

Sec. 515 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($102,104,000))
$102,470,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($102,137,000))
$103,666,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($581,207,000))
$492,207,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,980,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($833,428,000))
$746,323,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund--state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b)(i) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance
programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages:
(A) Additional instruction of 1.51560 hours per week per funded
learning assistance program student; (B) fifteen learning assistance
program students per teacher; (C) 36 instructional weeks per year; (D)
900 instructional hours per teacher; and (E) the district's average
staff mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of
this act.
(ii) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance
programs as provided in section 515, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1412 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent
enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the
district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12
eligible for free or reduced price lunch in the prior school year.
(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through
the annual income verification process required by the national school
lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the
learning assistance program dated February, 2010.
(3) The general fund--federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund-state or education legacy trust funds
allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
research and recommend options for an adjustment factor for middle
school and high school free and reduced price lunch eligibility
reporting rates pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(12)(a), and submit a report
to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 1, 2012. For the
2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the adjustment factor is 1.0.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
Sec. 601 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($533,355,000))
$533,009,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($525,998,000))
$525,644,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,037,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,370,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,162,760,000))
$1,162,060,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $28,761,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $28,761,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely as special funds for training and
related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW
28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in fiscal year 2012 and at least 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in fiscal year 2013.
(2) $2,725,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,725,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for administration and customized
training contracts through the job skills program. The state board
shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor
and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature
regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant
awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of
the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these
funds.
(((4))) (3) $4,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $4,500,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for worker
retraining.
(((5))) (4) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $5,000,000
is provided solely for the student achievement initiative.
(((6))) (5) When implementing the appropriations in this section,
the state board and the trustees of the individual community and
technical colleges shall minimize impact on academic programs, maximize
reductions in administration, and shall at least maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment opportunities and degree and certificate
production in high employer-demand fields of study at their academic
year 2008-09 levels.
(((7))) (6) Community and technical colleges are not required to
send mass mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts.
Community and technical colleges shall consider lower cost
alternatives, such as mailing postcards or brochures that direct
individuals to online information and other ways of acquiring print
catalogs.
(((8))) (7) Bellevue college is authorized to offer applied
baccalaureate degrees in information technology, health care services
and management, biotechnology, and preprofessional preparation for
medical fields. These degrees shall be directed at high school
graduates and transfer-oriented degree and professional and technical
degree holders. In fiscal year 2012, Bellevue college will develop a
two-year plan for offering these new degrees. The plan will assume
funding for these new degrees shall come through redistribution of its
current per full-time enrollment funding. The plan shall be delivered
to the legislature by June 30, 2012.
(((9))) (8) The Seattle community college district is authorized to
offer applied baccalaureate degree programs in business/international
business and technology management, interactive and artistic digital
media, sustainability, building science technology, and allied and
global health. These degrees shall be directed at high school
graduates and professional and technical degree holders. In fiscal
year 2012, Seattle community colleges shall develop a two-year plan for
offering these new degrees. The plan will assume that funding for
these new degrees comes through redistribution of its current per full-time enrollment funding. The plan shall be delivered to the
legislature by June 30, 2012.

Sec. 602 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($201,471,000))
$201,388,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($206,523,000))
$206,358,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,579,000
((University of Washington Building Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $239,000))
Biotoxin Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,699,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,502,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($440,463,000))
$439,976,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and regents shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the development of integrated
medical curriculum for the Washington/Wyoming/Alaska/Montana/Idaho
(WWAMI) medical education program in Spokane and eastern Washington.
Funding is contingent on appropriations being provided to Washington
State University for WWAMI program expansion in Spokane and eastern
Washington.
(3) $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the center for international
trade in forest products in the college of forest resources.
(4) $88,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5485 (state's natural resources). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $143,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the ongoing management of the
Washington park arboretum.

Sec. 603 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($134,912,000))
$134,512,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($135,389,000))
$136,087,000
((Washington State University Building Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,364,000))
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,065,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($308,730,000))
$303,664,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and regents shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) Within available funds, Washington State University shall serve
an additional cohort of fifteen full-time equivalent students in the
mechanical engineering program located at Olympic College.
(3) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the expansion of health
sciences capacity through the Washington/Wyoming/Alaska/Montana/Idaho
(WWAMI) medical education program in Spokane and eastern Washington.
Funding is contingent on appropriations being provided to the
University of Washington for integrated medical curriculum development
for WWAMI.

Sec. 604 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,281,000))
$26,257,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,589,000))
$26,541,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,087,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,957,000))
$68,885,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) At least $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and at least $200,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 shall be expended on the Northwest
autism center.

Sec. 605 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,492,000))
$22,468,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,573,000))
$22,525,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,076,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,141,000))
$64,069,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In implementing the appropriations in this
section, the president and governing board shall seek to minimize
impacts on student services and instructional programs by maximizing
reductions in administration and other noninstructional activities.

Sec. 606 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,698,000))
$15,595,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,366,000))
$15,339,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,514,000))
$36,384,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to conduct a detailed study of the commitment of
sexually violent predators to the special commitment center pursuant to
chapter 71.09 RCW and the subsequent release of those persons to
less-restrictive alternatives.
(a) Specifically, the institute's study shall examine:
(i) The projected future demand for the special commitment center,
including profiles and characteristics of persons referred and
committed to the special commitment center since its inception, whether
the profiles of those persons have changed over time, and, given
current trends, the likelihood of the continuing rate of referral;
(ii) Residents' participation in treatment over time and the impact
of treatment on eventual release to a less-restrictive alternative;
(iii) The annual review process and the process for a committed
person to petition for conditional or unconditional release,
specifically:
(A) The time frames for conducting mandatory reviews;
(B) The role of the special commitment center clinical team;
(C) Options and standards utilized by other jurisdictions or
similar processes to conduct periodic reviews, including specialized
courts, parole boards, independent review boards, and other commitment
proceedings;
(iv) The capacity and future demand for appropriate less
restrictive alternatives for moving residents out of the special
commitment center, including:
(A) The capacity and demand for secure community transition
facilities;
(B) Options for specialized populations such as the elderly or
those with developmental disabilities and whether more cost-efficient
options might be used to house those populations while keeping the
public safe;
(C) Prospects for moving residents to noninstitutionalized settings
beyond a secure community transition facility.
(b) The department of social and health services shall cooperate
with the institute in conducting its examination and must provide the
institute with requested data and records in a timely manner.
(c) The institute shall provide a status report to the governor and
the legislature no later than November 1, 2011, with a final report due
no later than November 1, 2012.
(((4))) (3) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the institute for public
policy to provide research support to the council on quality education.
(((5))) (4) To the extent federal or private funding is available
for this purpose, the Washington state institute for public policy and
the center for reinventing public education at the University of
Washington shall examine the relationship between participation in
pension systems and teacher quality and mobility patterns in the state.
The department of retirement systems shall facilitate researchers'
access to necessary individual-level data necessary to effectively
conduct the study. The researchers shall ensure that no individually
identifiable information will be disclosed at any time. An interim
report on project findings shall be completed by November 15, 2010, and
a final report shall be submitted to the governor and to the relevant
committees of the legislature by October 15, 2011.
(((6))) (5) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The
Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center
and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.
(((7))) (6) If, and to the extent that private funding is available
for this purpose, the Washington state institute for public policy
shall study and report on the child welfare and educational
characteristics and outcomes for foster youth who are served by
educational advocates. The department of social and health services
and the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
facilitate researchers' access to data necessary to effectively
complete the study. The institute shall submit an interim report with
baseline characteristics of youth served by educational advocates by
December 2011 and a final report by October 31, 2012, to the governor
and to the appropriate committees of the legislature.
(((8))) (7) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 is provided to the Washington state institute for
public policy (WSIPP) to conduct a review of state investments in the
family caregiver and support program. Funding for this program is
provided by assumed savings from diverting seniors from entering into
long-term care medicaid placements by supporting informal caregivers.
WSIPP shall work with the department of social and health services to
establish and review outcome data for this investment. A preliminary
report on the outcomes of the investment into this program is due to
the appropriate legislative committees by December 15, 2011, and a
final report is due to the appropriate legislative committees by August
30, 2012.

Sec. 607 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 611 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,709,000))
$33,754,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,654,000))
$33,743,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,266,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,629,000))
$80,763,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In implementing the appropriations in this
section, the president and governing board shall seek to minimize
impacts on student services and instructional programs by maximizing
reductions in administration and other noninstructional activities.

Sec. 608 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,041,000))
$1,036,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,976,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,017,000))
$3,012,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The higher education coordinating board is
authorized to increase or establish fees for initial degree
authorization, degree authorization renewal, degree authorization
reapplication, new program applications, and new site applications
pursuant to RCW 28B.85.060.

Sec. 609 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD -- FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $217,939,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,570,000))
$5,829,000
Opportunity Pathways Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($298,009,000))
$297,268,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($196,214,000)) $200,413,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012((,)) and $73,500,000 of the
opportunity pathways account--state appropriation((, and $740,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation)) are provided solely for
student financial aid payments under the state need grant and the state
work study program including up to a four percent administrative
allowance for the state work study program.
(2)(((a))) Within the funds appropriated in this section,
eligibility for the state need grant shall include students with family
incomes at or below 70 percent of the state median family income (MFI),
adjusted for family size, and shall include students enrolled in three
to five credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester
credits. The higher education coordinating board shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2013, regarding the number of students
enrolled in three to five credit-bearing quarter credits, or the
equivalent semester credits, and their academic progress including
degree completion. Awards for all students shall be adjusted by the
estimated amount by which Pell grant increases exceed projected
increases in the noninstructional costs of attendance. Awards for
students with incomes between 51 and 70 percent of the state median
shall be prorated at the following percentages of the award amount
granted to those with incomes below 51 percent of the MFI: 70 percent
for students with family incomes between 51 and 55 percent MFI; 65
percent for students with family incomes between 56 and 60 percent MFI;
60 percent for students with family incomes between 61 and 65 percent
MFI; and 50 percent for students with family incomes between 66 and 70
percent MFI.
(3) For fiscal year 2012, the board shall defer loan or conditional
scholarship repayments to the future teachers conditional scholarship
and loan repayment program for up to one year for each participant if
the participant has shown evidence of efforts to find a teaching job
but has been unable to secure a teaching job per the requirements of
the program.
(((5))) (4) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 is provided solely for the leadership 1000 program.
(((6))) (5) $2,436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 is provided solely for the passport to college
program. The maximum scholarship award shall be $5,000. The board
shall contract with a nonprofit organization to provide support
services to increase student completion in their postsecondary program
and shall, under this contract provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal
year 2012.
(((7))) (6) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 is provided solely for implementation of the aerospace
training scholarship and student loan program as specified in Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1846 (aerospace student loans). If this bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 610 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COUNCIL FOR HIGHER EDUCATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($997,000))
$992,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,377,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,374,000))
$3,369,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The council for higher education is
authorized to increase or establish fees for initial degree
authorization, degree authorization renewal, degree authorization
reapplication, new program applications, and new site applications
pursuant to RCW 28B.85.060.

Sec. 611 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($247,932,000))
$248,927,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,557,000))
$5,816,000
Washington Opportunity Pathways Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($327,989,000))
$328,243,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($230,889,000)) $237,018,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013((,)) and $73,500,000 of the
opportunity pathways account--state appropriation((, and $740,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation)) are provided solely for
student financial aid payments under the state need grant and the state
work study program including up to a four percent administrative
allowance for the state work study program.
(2) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for
the state need grant shall include students with family incomes at or
below 70 percent of the state median family income (MFI), adjusted for
family size, and shall include students enrolled in three to five
credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits.
The office of student financial assistance shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2013, regarding the number of students
enrolled in three to five credit-bearing quarter credits, or the
equivalent semester credits, and their academic progress including
degree completion. Awards for all students shall be adjusted by the
estimated amount by which Pell grant increases exceed projected
increases in the noninstructional costs of attendance. Awards for
students with incomes between 51 and 70 percent of the state median
shall be prorated at the following percentages of the award amount
granted to those with incomes below 51 percent of the MFI: 70 percent
for students with family incomes between 51 and 55 percent MFI; 65
percent for students with family incomes between 56 and 60 percent MFI;
60 percent for students with family incomes between 61 and 65 percent
MFI; and 50 percent for students with family incomes between 66 and 70
percent MFI.
(3) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of the aerospace
training scholarship and student loan program as specified in Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1846 (aerospace student loans). If this bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(4) For fiscal year 2013, the board shall defer loan or conditional
scholarship repayments to the future teachers conditional scholarship
and loan repayment program for up to one year for each participant if
the participant has shown evidence of efforts to find a teaching job
but has been unable to secure a teaching job per the requirements of
the program.
(5) $1,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the gaining early awareness and
readiness for undergraduate programs project.
(6) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the leadership 1000 program.
(7) $2,436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the passport to college program. The
maximum scholarship award shall be $5,000. The board shall contract
with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase
student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this
contract provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal year 2013 for this
purpose.
(8) In addition to the entities listed in RCW 28B.122.010, the
aerospace student loan program may provide loans to students attending
an aerospace training program at Renton technical college.

Sec. 612 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 617 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,570,000))
$27,571,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,557,000))
$27,558,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($253,530,000))
$261,753,000
Opportunity Pathways Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($388,657,000))
$396,882,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $16,028,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $16,028,000 of the general fund--state appropriation of
fiscal year 2013, $80,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account
appropriation, and $2,256,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education
assistance program services. Of these amounts, $10,284,000 is a
portion of the biennial amount of state maintenance of effort dollars
required to receive federal child care and development fund grant
dollars.
(2) In accordance to RCW 43.215.255(2) and 43.135.055, the
department is authorized to increase child care center and child care
family home licensure fees in fiscal years 2012 and 2013 for costs to
the department for the licensure activity, including costs of necessary
inspection. These increases are necessary to support expenditures
authorized in this section.
(3) $638,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $638,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for child care resource and
referral network services.
(4) $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally
relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.
(5) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the
federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this
grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives,
agency administration, and other costs associated with child care
subsidies. The department shall transfer a portion of this grant to
the department of social and health services to fund the child care
subsidies paid by the department of social and health services on
behalf of the department of early learning.
(6) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions in the
appropriations for the department's administrative expenses. It is the
intent of the legislature that these reductions shall be achieved, to
the greatest extent possible, by reducing those administrative costs
that do not affect direct client services or direct service delivery or
program.
(((8))) (7) $934,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $934,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $2,400,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for expenditure into the home
visiting services account. This funding is intended to meet federal
maintenance of effort requirements and to secure private matching
funds.
(((9))) (8) In addition to groups that were given prioritized
access to the working connections child care program effective March 1,
2011, the department shall also give prioritized access into the
program to families in which a parent of a child in care is a minor who
is not living with a parent or guardian and who is a full-time student
in a high school that has a school-sponsored on-site child care center.
(((10))) (9) Within available amounts, the department in
consultation with the office of financial management and the department
of social and health services shall report quarterly enrollments and
active caseload for the working connections child care program to the
legislative fiscal committees. The report shall also identify the
number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy
families and working connections child care.
(((12))) (10) $2,522,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012, $2,522,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $4,304,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid
treatment child care (MTCC) program. The department shall contract for
MTCC services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized
treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected
children. Priority for services shall be given to children referred
from the department of social and health services children's
administration. In addition to referrals made by children's
administration, the department shall authorize services for children
referred to the MTCC program, as long as the children meet the
eligibility requirements as outlined in the Washington state plan for
the MTCC program. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection,
$60,000 per fiscal year may be used by the department for administering
the MTCC program, if needed.

Sec. 613 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 618 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,780,000))
$5,782,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,746,000))
$5,749,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,961,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,487,000))
$13,492,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $271,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is provided solely for the school for the
blind to offer short course programs, allowing students the opportunity
to leave their home schools for short periods and receive intensive
training. The school for the blind shall provide this service to the
extent that it is funded by contracts with school districts and
educational services districts.

Sec. 614 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 619 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING
LOSS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,451,000))
$8,449,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,449,000))
$8,446,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,426,000))
$17,421,000

Sec. 615 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 620 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,961,000))
$2,065,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,056,000
Washington State Heritage Center Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,213,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,230,000))
$5,334,000

Sec. 616 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 621 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Washington State Heritage Center Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,249,000))
$4,241,000

Sec. 617 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 622 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Washington State Heritage Center Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,965,000))
$2,962,000

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 701 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT
LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($924,047,000))
$919,198,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($981,486,000))
$967,749,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,589,000))
$3,866,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($73,000))
$121,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,000))
$4,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($345,000))
$90,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000))
$13,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retire Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,909,847,000))
$1,893,341,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.
The entire general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2012 shall
be expended into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by
June 30, 2012.

Sec. 702 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,516,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,758,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($140,417,000))
$140,128,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($198,691,000))
$198,402,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
expenditure into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement
account. The entire general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2012 shall be expended into the nondebt-limit general fund bond
retirement account by June 30, 2012.

Sec. 703 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,357,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,273,000))
$356,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,000))
$21,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($55,000))
$25,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000))
$2,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,056,000))
$3,119,000

Sec. 704 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 713 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS
The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a
monthly basis beginning July 1, 2011, consistent with chapter 41.45
RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement
systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with chapters
2.10 and 2.12 RCW.
(1) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,547,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $56,729,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $111,276,000

(2) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,100,000))
$8,100,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,100,000))
$10,100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,200,000))
$18,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CENTRAL SERVICES EFFICIENCIES
From appropriations to state agencies for the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, the office of financial management shall reduce general
fund--state allotments by $1,850,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$3,792,000 for fiscal year 2013 to reflect reduced central service
billings and related charges to client agencies for legal services,
audits, and records management, pursuant to allotment schedules
prepared by the office of financial management. The allotment
reductions under this section shall be placed in unallotted status and
remain unexpended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 706 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--AGENCY SELF-INSURANCE
LIABILITY PREMIUMS
From appropriations to state agencies for the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, the office of financial management shall reduce general
fund--state allotments by $1,664,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$9,284,000 for fiscal year 2013 to reflect reduced billings and related
charges to client agencies for self-insurance premiums for liability
coverage under RCW 4.92.130, pursuant to allotment schedules prepared
by the office of financial management. The allotment reductions under
this section shall be placed in unallotted status and remain
unexpended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PERSONNEL SERVICES
From appropriations to state agencies for the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, the office of financial management shall reduce general
fund--state allotments by $9,537,000 for fiscal year 2013 to reflect
reduced billings and related charges to client agencies for central
personnel services, pursuant to allotment schedules prepared by the
office of financial management. The allotment reductions under this
section shall be placed in unallotted status and remain unexpended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PROCUREMENT SERVICES
From appropriations to state agencies for the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, the office of financial management shall reduce general
fund--state allotments by $394,000 for fiscal year 2012 and $792,000
for fiscal year 2013 to reflect reduced billings and related charges to
client agencies for central procurement of goods and services, pursuant
to allotment schedules prepared by the office of financial management.
The allotment reductions under this section shall be placed in
unallotted status and remain unexpended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 722 (uncodified) is
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 710 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 725 (uncodified) is
repealed.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 801 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 805 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, (($10,000,000)) $16,300,000
for fiscal year 2012 and (($15,000,000)) $21,300,000
for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,000,000))
$37,600,000
Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control
Account: For transfer to the state general
fund, $3,500,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$3,500,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Aquatics Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $3,500,000 for fiscal
year 2012 and $3,500,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Savings Incentive Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $44,618,000 for fiscal year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,618,000
Distinguished Professorship Trust Fund: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year 2012, an amount
not to exceed the actual cash balance of the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,024,000
Washington Graduate Fellowship Trust Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2012, an
amount not to exceed the actual cash balance of
the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,028,000
College Faculty Awards Trust Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2012, an amount
not to exceed the actual cash balance of the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,996,000
Data Processing Revolving Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $5,960,000 for fiscal
year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,960,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer to
the drinking water assistance repayment account . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $2,100,000
for fiscal year 2012 and $2,100,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamlined sales
and use tax account, $24,846,000 for fiscal year
2012 and $24,789,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,635,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
water pollution control revolving account,
$7,750,000 for fiscal year 2012 and $7,750,000 for
fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,500,000
The Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $4,500,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$4,500,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $4,000,000
for fiscal year 2012 and $4,000,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
drinking water assistance account, $10,000,000 for
fiscal year 2012 and $5,000,000 for fiscal year
2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account: For transfer to the state general fund,
$500,000 for fiscal year 2012 and $500,000 for
fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Education Savings Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, (($22,500,000)) $54,431,000 for fiscal
year 2012 and $22,500,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,000,000))
$76,931,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:
For transfer to the state general fund, $250,000
for fiscal year 2012 and $250,000 for fiscal year
2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Education Construction Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $102,000,000 for fiscal year
2012 and $102,000,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $25,000,000 for fiscal year 2012
and $25,000,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
Foster Care Endowed Scholarship Trust Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund, $200,000 for fiscal year
2012 and $200,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Affordable Housing For All Account: For transfer to
the home security fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal year
2012 and $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, in an amount not to exceed the actual
amount of the annual base payment to the tobacco
settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,205,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the basic
health plan stabilization account from the amounts
deposited in the account that are attributable to the
annual strategic contribution payment received in
fiscal year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the basic
health plan stabilization account from the amounts
deposited in the account that are attributable to the
annual strategic contribution payment received in
fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
the actual remaining amount of the annual strategic
contribution payment to the tobacco settlement account
for fiscal year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
the actual remaining amount of the annual strategic
contribution payment to the tobacco settlement account
for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000

The transfer to the life sciences discovery fund is subject to the
following conditions: (((1))) All new grants awarded during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium shall support and accelerate the commercialization
of an identifiable product((;)).

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 901 RCW 28B.50.837 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 914 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The Washington community and technical college exceptional
faculty awards program is established. The program shall be
administered by the college board. The college faculty awards trust
fund hereby created shall be administered by the state treasurer.
(2) Funds appropriated by the legislature for the community and
technical college exceptional faculty awards program shall be deposited
in the college faculty awards trust fund. At the request of the
college board, the treasurer shall release the state matching funds to
the local endowment fund of the college or its foundation. No
appropriation is necessary for the expenditure of moneys from the fund.
Expenditures from the fund may be used solely for the exceptional
faculty awards program. During the ((2009-2011)) 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the college faculty awards
trust fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance in the account.

Sec. 902 RCW 28B.76.565 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 915 are each
amended to read as follows:
Funds appropriated by the legislature for the distinguished
professorship program shall be deposited in the distinguished
professorship trust fund. At the request of the higher education
coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.575, the treasurer shall release
the state matching funds to the designated institution's local
endowment fund. No appropriation is required for expenditures from the
fund. During the ((2009-2011)) 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the distinguished professorship trust
fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance in the account.

Sec. 903 RCW 28B.76.565 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 113 are each
amended to read as follows:
Funds appropriated by the legislature for the distinguished
professorship program shall be deposited in the distinguished
professorship trust fund. At the request of the office under RCW
28B.76.575, the treasurer shall release the state matching funds to the
designated institution's local endowment fund. No appropriation is
required for expenditures from the fund. During the ((2009-2011))
2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
distinguished professorship trust fund to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

Sec. 904 RCW 28B.76.605 and 1987 c 147 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
The Washington graduate fellowship trust fund program is
established. The program shall be administered by the higher education
coordinating board. The trust fund shall be administered by the state
treasurer. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the Washington graduate fellowship trust fund to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in
the account.

Sec. 905 RCW 28B.76.605 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 116 are each
amended to read as follows:
The Washington graduate fellowship trust fund program is
established. The program shall be administered by the office. The
trust fund shall be administered by the state treasurer. During the
2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the
Washington graduate fellowship trust fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

Sec. 906 RCW 43.19.791 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 601 and 2011 c
5 s 912 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
There is created a revolving fund to be known as the data
processing revolving fund in the custody of the state treasurer. The
revolving fund shall be used for the acquisition of equipment,
software, supplies, and services and the payment of salaries, wages,
and other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, operation,
and administration of information services, telecommunications,
systems, software, supplies and equipment, including the payment of
principal and interest on bonds issued for capital projects, by the
department, Washington State University's computer services center, the
department of enterprise services' personnel information systems group
and financial systems management group, and other users as determined
by the office of financial management. The revolving fund is subject
to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW. The chief
information officer or the chief information officer's designee, with
the approval of the technology services board, is authorized to expend
up to one million dollars per fiscal biennium for the technology
services board to conduct independent technical and financial analysis
of proposed information technology projects, and such an expenditure
does not require an appropriation. Disbursements from the revolving
fund for the services component of the department are not subject to
appropriation. Disbursements for the strategic planning and policy
component of the department are subject to appropriation. All
disbursements from the fund are subject to the allotment procedures
provided under chapter 43.88 RCW. The department shall establish and
implement a billing structure to assure all agencies pay an equitable
share of the costs.
During the ((2009-2011)) 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the data processing revolving account to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance.
As used in this section, the word "supplies" shall not be
interpreted to delegate or abrogate the division of purchasing's
responsibilities and authority to purchase supplies as described in RCW
43.19.190 and 43.19.200.

Sec. 907 RCW 43.21A.660 and 2011 c 5 s 907 are each amended to
read as follows:
Funds in the freshwater aquatic weeds account may be appropriated
to the department of ecology to develop a freshwater aquatic weeds
management program. Funds shall be expended as follows:
(1) No less than two-thirds of the appropriated funds shall be
issued as grants to (a) cities, counties, tribes, special purpose
districts, and state agencies to prevent, remove, reduce, or manage
excessive freshwater aquatic weeds; (b) fund demonstration or pilot
projects consistent with the purposes of this section; and (c) fund
hydrilla eradication activities in waters of the state. Except for
hydrilla eradication activities, such grants shall only be issued for
lakes, rivers, or streams with a public boat launching ramp or which
are designated by the department of fish and wildlife for fly-fishing.
The department shall give preference to projects having matching funds
or in-kind services;
(2) No more than one-third of the appropriated funds shall be
expended to:
(a) Develop public education programs relating to preventing the
propagation and spread of freshwater aquatic weeds; and
(b) Provide technical assistance to local governments and citizen
groups; and
(3) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the freshwater aquatic weeds account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.
(4) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, excess funds in the
freshwater aquatic weeds account may be appropriated to the department
of agriculture to support the invasive knotweed program.

Sec. 908 RCW 43.79.460 and 2011 c 5 s 909 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The savings incentive account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The account shall consist of all moneys appropriated
to the account by the legislature. The account is subject to the
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for expenditures from the account.
(2) Within the savings incentive account, the state treasurer may
create subaccounts to be credited with incentive savings attributable
to individual state agencies, as determined by the office of financial
management in consultation with the legislative fiscal committees.
Moneys deposited in the subaccounts may be expended only on the
authorization of the agency's executive head or designee and only for
the purpose of one-time expenditures to improve the quality,
efficiency, and effectiveness of services to customers of the state,
such as one-time expenditures for employee training, employee
incentives, technology improvements, new work processes, or performance
measurement. Funds may not be expended from the account to establish
new programs or services, expand existing programs or services, or
incur ongoing costs that would require future expenditures.
(3) For purposes of this section, "incentive savings" means state
general fund appropriations that are unspent as of June 30th of a
fiscal year, excluding any amounts included in across-the-board
reductions under RCW 43.88.110 and excluding unspent appropriations
for:
(a) Caseload and enrollment in entitlement programs, except to the
extent that an agency has clearly demonstrated that efficiencies have
been achieved in the administration of the entitlement program.
"Entitlement program," as used in this section, includes programs for
which specific sums of money are appropriated for pass-through to third
parties or other entities;
(b) Enrollments in state institutions of higher education;
(c) Except for fiscal year 2011, a specific amount contained in a
condition or limitation to an appropriation in the biennial
appropriations act, if the agency did not achieve the specific purpose
or objective of the condition or limitation;
(d) Debt service on state obligations; and
(e) State retirement system obligations.
(4) The office of financial management, after consulting with the
legislative fiscal committees, shall report the amount of savings
incentives achieved.
(5) For fiscal year 2010, the legislature may transfer from the
savings incentive account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the fund balance of the account attributable to unspent state
general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2009. For fiscal year
2011, the legislature may transfer from the savings incentive account
to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the fund balance of
the account attributable to unspent state general fund appropriations
for fiscal year 2010. For fiscal year 2011, the legislature may
transfer from the savings incentive account to the state general fund
eight million dollars or as much as reflects the fund balance of the
account attributable to unspent agency credits prior to fiscal year
2009. Credits for legislative and judicial agencies are not included
in this action, with the exception and upon consent of the supreme
court, court of appeals, office of public defense, and office of civil
legal aid.
(6) For fiscal years 2012 and 2013, the legislature may transfer
from the savings incentive account to the state general fund such
amounts as reflect the fund balance of the account attributable to
unspent general fund appropriations for fiscal years 2011 and 2012.

Sec. 909 RCW 43.320.110 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 934 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is created a local fund known as the "financial services
regulation fund" which shall consist of all moneys received by the
divisions of the department of financial institutions, except for the
division of securities which shall deposit thirteen percent of all
moneys received, except as provided in RCW 43.320.115, and which shall
be used for the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the
payment of salaries, wages, and utilities; the establishment of
reserves; and other incidental costs required for the proper regulation
of individuals and entities subject to regulation by the department.
The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund. Disbursements
from the fund shall be on authorization of the director of financial
institutions or the director's designee. In order to maintain an
effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be subject in
all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to
permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.
During the ((2009-2011)) 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the financial services regulation fund to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
fund.

Sec. 910 RCW 70.96A.350 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 34 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The criminal justice treatment account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be expended solely for: (a)
Substance abuse treatment and treatment support services for offenders
with an addiction or a substance abuse problem that, if not treated,
would result in addiction, against whom charges are filed by a
prosecuting attorney in Washington state; (b) the provision of drug and
alcohol treatment services and treatment support services for
nonviolent offenders within a drug court program; (c) the
administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a
drug court; and (d) during the ((2007-2009 biennium, operation of the
integrated crisis response and intensive case management pilots
contracted with the department of social and health services division
of alcohol and substance abuse)) 2011-2013 biennium, the legislature
may appropriate up to three million dollars from the account in order
to offset reductions in the state general fund for treatment services
provided by counties. This amount is not subject to the requirements
of subsections (5) through (9) of this section. Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Treatment" means services that are critical to a participant's
successful completion of his or her substance abuse treatment program,
but does not include the following services: Housing other than that
provided as part of an inpatient substance abuse treatment program,
vocational training, and mental health counseling; and
(b) "Treatment support" means transportation to or from inpatient
or outpatient treatment services when no viable alternative exists, and
child care services that are necessary to ensure a participant's
ability to attend outpatient treatment sessions.
(3) Revenues to the criminal justice treatment account consist of:
(a) Funds transferred to the account pursuant to this section; and (b)
any other revenues appropriated to or deposited in the account.
(4)(a) For the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2003, the state
treasurer shall transfer eight million nine hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund into the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into eight equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2005, and each subsequent fiscal year, the state
treasurer shall transfer eight million two hundred fifty thousand
dollars from the general fund to the criminal justice treatment
account, divided into four equal quarterly payments. For the fiscal
year beginning July 1, 2006, and each subsequent fiscal year, the
amount transferred shall be increased on an annual basis by the
implicit price deflator as published by the federal bureau of labor
statistics.
(b) In each odd-numbered year, the legislature shall appropriate
the amount transferred to the criminal justice treatment account in (a)
of this subsection to the division of alcohol and substance abuse for
the purposes of subsection (5) of this section.
(5) Moneys appropriated to the division of alcohol and substance
abuse from the criminal justice treatment account shall be distributed
as specified in this subsection. The department shall serve as the
fiscal agent for purposes of distribution. Until July 1, 2004, the
department may not use moneys appropriated from the criminal justice
treatment account for administrative expenses and shall distribute all
amounts appropriated under subsection (4)(b) of this section in
accordance with this subsection. Beginning in July 1, 2004, the
department may retain up to three percent of the amount appropriated
under subsection (4)(b) of this section for its administrative costs.
(a) Seventy percent of amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed to counties pursuant to the
distribution formula adopted under this section. The division of
alcohol and substance abuse, in consultation with the department of
corrections, the Washington state association of counties, the
Washington state association of drug court professionals, the superior
court judges' association, the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys, representatives of the criminal defense bar, representatives
of substance abuse treatment providers, and any other person deemed by
the division to be necessary, shall establish a fair and reasonable
methodology for distribution to counties of moneys in the criminal
justice treatment account. County or regional plans submitted for the
expenditure of formula funds must be approved by the panel established
in (b) of this subsection.
(b) Thirty percent of the amounts appropriated to the division from
the account shall be distributed as grants for purposes of treating
offenders against whom charges are filed by a county prosecuting
attorney. The division shall appoint a panel of representatives from
the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the superior court judges'
association, the Washington state association of counties, the
Washington defender's association or the Washington association of
criminal defense lawyers, the department of corrections, the Washington
state association of drug court professionals, substance abuse
treatment providers, and the division. The panel shall review county
or regional plans for funding under (a) of this subsection and grants
approved under this subsection. The panel shall attempt to ensure that
treatment as funded by the grants is available to offenders statewide.
(6) The county alcohol and drug coordinator, county prosecutor,
county sheriff, county superior court, a substance abuse treatment
provider appointed by the county legislative authority, a member of the
criminal defense bar appointed by the county legislative authority,
and, in counties with a drug court, a representative of the drug court
shall jointly submit a plan, approved by the county legislative
authority or authorities, to the panel established in subsection (5)(b)
of this section, for disposition of all the funds provided from the
criminal justice treatment account within that county. The funds shall
be used solely to provide approved alcohol and substance abuse
treatment pursuant to RCW 70.96A.090, treatment support services, and
for the administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation
of a drug court.
(a) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of
counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent on the
administrative and overhead costs associated with the operation of a
drug court.
(b) No more than ten percent of the total moneys received under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section by a county or group of
counties participating in a regional agreement shall be spent for
treatment support services.
(7) Counties are encouraged to consider regional agreements and
submit regional plans for the efficient delivery of treatment under
this section.
(8) Moneys allocated under this section shall be used to
supplement, not supplant, other federal, state, and local funds used
for substance abuse treatment.
(9) Counties must meet the criteria established in RCW
2.28.170(3)(b).
(10) The authority under this section to use funds from the
criminal justice treatment account for the administrative and overhead
costs associated with the operation of a drug court expires June 30,
2013.

Sec. 911 RCW 79.105.150 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 967 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW
79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW 79.115.150(2), all moneys
received by the state from the sale or lease of state-owned aquatic
lands and from the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic
lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which
is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation, these
funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for
the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public
purposes; for providing and improving access to the lands; and for
volunteer cooperative fish and game projects. During the 2009-2011 and
2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the aquatic lands enhancement account may
also be used for scientific research as part of the adaptive management
process and for developing a planning report for McNeil Island. During
the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature may
transfer from the aquatic lands enhancement account to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect excess fund balance of the
account. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the aquatic lands
enhancement account may be used to support the shellfish program, the
ballast water program, and the Puget Sound toxic sampling program at
the department of fish and wildlife, and the knotweed program at the
department of agriculture.
(2) In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the
recreation and conservation funding board shall:
(a) Require grant recipients to incorporate the environmental
benefits of the project into their grant applications;
(b) Utilize the statement of environmental benefits, consideration,
except as provided in RCW 79.105.610, of whether the applicant is a
Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, whether a project is
referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound
partnership under RCW 90.71.310, and except as otherwise provided in
RCW 79.105.630, and effective one calendar year following the
development and statewide availability of model evergreen community
management plans and ordinances under RCW 35.105.050, whether the
applicant is an entity that has been recognized, and what gradation of
recognition was received, in the evergreen community recognition
program created in RCW 35.105.030 in its prioritization and selection
process; and
(c) Develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to be
used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.
(3) To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its
performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies
as defined in RCW 43.41.270.
(4) The department shall consult with affected interest groups in
implementing this section.
(5) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the
project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the
Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 912 Section 902 of this act expires July 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 913 Section 903 of this act takes effect July
1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 914 Section 904 of this act expires July 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915 Section 905 of this act takes effect July
1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 916 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 917 Except for sections 903 and 905 of this
act which take effect July 1, 2012, this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 77
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 155
COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 93
COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 99
COUNCIL FOR HIGHER EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 161
COURT OF APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 78
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 105
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 87
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING . . . . . . . . . . . . 163
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 93
DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 100
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 83
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 79
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 108
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 169
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 90
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 62
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 45
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 57
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 34
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 39
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 61
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 82
EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 166
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 155
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 90
ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 99
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 156
HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
FINANCIAL AID AND GRANTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 159
POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMIN . . . . . . . . . . . . 159
HORSE RACING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 3
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
AGENCY SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
CENTRAL SERVICES EFFICIENCIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 169
PERSONNEL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
PROCUREMENT SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 161
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 139
PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 7
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 106
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 98
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 151
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 63
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 97
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 109
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 165
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST: DEBT REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 168
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST: DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT . . . . . . . . . . . . 167
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST: FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES . . . . . . . . . . . . 168
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 172
STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 111
BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 127
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 141
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 137
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 116
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 138
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 148
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 138
MISCELLANEOUS PURPOSES--NO CHILD LEFT BEHIND ACT . . . . . . . . . . . . 140
PUPIL TRANSPORTATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 132
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 130
SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 133
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 134
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 146
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 24
WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY INSURANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 106
WASHINGTON STATE ARTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 166
WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 166
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY . . . . . . . . . . . . 166
WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 154
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 158
--- END ---