BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.410.210 and 2009 c 531 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The purpose of the professional educator standards board is to
establish policies and requirements for the preparation and
certification of educators that provide standards for competency in
professional knowledge and practice in the areas of certification; a
foundation of skills, knowledge, and attitudes necessary to help
students with diverse needs, abilities, cultural experiences, and
learning styles meet or exceed the learning goals outlined in RCW
28A.150.210; knowledge of research-based practice; and professional
development throughout a career. The Washington professional educator
standards board shall:
(1) Establish policies and practices for the approval of programs
of courses, requirements, and other activities leading to educator
certification including teacher, school administrator, and educational
staff associate certification;
(2) Establish policies and practices for the approval of the
character of work required to be performed as a condition of entrance
to and graduation from any educator preparation program including
teacher, school administrator, and educational staff associate
preparation program as provided in subsection (1) of this section;
(3) Establish a list of accredited institutions of higher education
of this and other states whose graduates may be awarded educator
certificates as teacher, school administrator, and educational staff
associate and establish criteria and enter into agreements with other
states to acquire reciprocal approval of educator preparation programs
and certification, including teacher certification from the national
board for professional teaching standards;
(4) Establish policies for approval of nontraditional educator
preparation programs;
(5) Conduct a review of educator program approval standards at
least every five years, beginning in 2006, to reflect research findings
and assure continued improvement of preparation programs for teachers,
administrators, and school specialized personnel;
(6) Specify the types and kinds of educator certificates to be
issued and conditions for certification in accordance with subsection
(1) of this section and RCW 28A.410.010, except that all certificated
teachers, including certificated career and technical education
teachers who hold a valid certificate and have a master's degree or
greater from an accredited university shall be considered professional
certificated teachers and are not subject to continuing education
requirements to maintain their certification;
(7) Apply for and receive federal or other funds on behalf of the
state for purposes related to the duties of the board;
(8) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that are necessary for the
effective and efficient implementation of this chapter;
(9) Maintain data concerning educator preparation programs and
their quality, educator certification, educator employment trends and
needs, and other data deemed relevant by the board;
(10) Serve as an advisory body to the superintendent of public
instruction on issues related to educator recruitment, hiring,
mentoring and support, professional growth, retention, educator
evaluation including but not limited to peer evaluation, and revocation
and suspension of licensure;
(11) Submit, by October 15th of each even-numbered year, a joint
report with the state board of education to the legislative education
committees, the governor, and the superintendent of public instruction.
The report shall address the progress the boards have made and the
obstacles they have encountered, individually and collectively, in the
work of achieving the goals set out in RCW 28A.150.210;
(12) Establish the prospective teacher assessment system for basic
skills and subject knowledge that shall be required to obtain residency
certification pursuant to RCW 28A.410.220 through 28A.410.240;
(13) By January 2010, set performance standards and develop, pilot,
and implement a uniform and externally administered professional-level
certification assessment based on demonstrated teaching skill. In the
development of this assessment, consideration shall be given to changes
in professional certification program components such as the
culminating seminar; and
(14) Conduct meetings under the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW.

--- END ---