BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to ensure that the
state's water resource management program is administered to maximize
administrative efficiency, accountability, and financial self-sufficiency. The legislature intends to eliminate unnecessary
duplication, delay, and costs in processing water right transfers by
reducing the role of the department of ecology while fully preserving
the rights of affected parties to obtain review of water conservancy
board decisions. The legislature finds that expedited administrative
review of water right transfers by water conservancy boards, subject to
appeal by aggrieved parties or the department of ecology and review by
the pollution control hearings board, will result in more efficient
reallocation of water supplies, encourage water conservation efforts,
and facilitate development while reducing costs to the state general
fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 7 and 2010 c 84 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, water conservancy boards
established pursuant to chapter 90.80 RCW, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the parks and recreation
commission:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) A final decision by the department or director made under
chapter 183, Laws of 2009.
(d) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(f) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(g) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(h) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(i) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(j) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(k) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(l) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(m) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(n) Decisions of a state agency that is an authorized public entity
under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of a
vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are
reviewable under RCW 79.100.120.
(o) Decisions of water conservancy boards to approve or deny
applications under chapter 90.80 RCW.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 8 and 2010 c 84 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, water conservancy boards
established pursuant to chapter 90.80 RCW, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the parks and recreation
commission:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(i) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(j) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(k) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(l) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(m) Decisions of a state agency that is an authorized public entity
under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of a
vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are
reviewable under RCW 79.100.120.
(n) Decisions of water conservancy boards to approve or deny
applications under chapter 90.80 RCW.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.80.055 and 2001 c 237 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a board
shall operate on a countywide basis or on an areawide basis in the case
of a board with jurisdiction in more than one county or water resource
inventory area, and have the following powers, in addition to any other
powers granted in this chapter:
(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a board
may act upon applications for the same kinds of transfers that the
department itself is authorized to act upon, including an application
to establish a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW. A
board may not act upon an application for the type of transfer within
an irrigation district as described in RCW 90.03.380(3). If a board
receives an application for a transfer between two irrigation districts
as described in RCW 90.03.380(2), the board must, before publication of
notice of the application, receive the concurrence specified in that
section.
(b) A board may act upon an application to transfer a water right
claim filed under chapter 90.14 RCW. In acting upon such an
application, the board must make a tentative determination as to the
validity and extent of the right, if any, embodied in the claim and may
only issue a record of decision regarding a transfer of such a claim to
the extent it is tentatively determined to be valid. ((Neither)) The
board's tentative determination((, nor the director's acceptance of
such a tentative determination,)) does not constitute((s)) an
adjudication of the right under RCW 90.03.110 through 90.03.240 or
90.44.220, and such a determination does not preclude or prejudice a
subsequent challenge to the validity, priority, or quantity of the
right in a general adjudication under those sections.
(c) A board may establish a water right transfer information
exchange through which all or part of a water right may be listed for
sale or lease. The board may also accept and post notices in the
exchange from persons interested in acquiring or leasing water rights
from willing sellers.
(d) The director shall assign a representative of the department to
provide technical assistance to each board. If requested by the board,
the representative shall work with the board as it reviews applications
for formal acceptance, prepares draft records of decision, and
considers other technical or legal factors affecting the board's
development of a final record of decision. A board may request and
accept additional technical assistance from the department. A board
may also request and accept assistance and support from the county
government or governments of the county or counties in which it
operates.
(2) The jurisdiction of a board shall not apply within the
boundaries of a federal Indian reservation or to lands held in trust
for an Indian band, tribe, or nation by the federal government.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.80.070 and 2004 c 10 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person proposing a transfer of a water right may elect to
file an application with a water conservancy board, if a board has been
established for the geographic area where the water is or would be
diverted, withdrawn, or used. If the person has already filed an
application with the department, the person may request that the
department convey the application to the conservancy board with
jurisdiction and the department must promptly forward the application.
A board is not required to process an application filed with the board.
If a board decides that it will not process an application, it must
return the application to the applicant and must inform the applicant
that the application may be filed with the department. An application
to the board for a transfer shall be made on a form provided by the
department. A board may require an applicant to submit within a
reasonable time additional information as may be required by the board
in order to review and act upon the application. At a minimum, the
application shall include information sufficient to establish to the
board's satisfaction that a right to the quantity of water being
transferred exists, and a description of any applicable limitations on
the right to use water, including the point of diversion or withdrawal,
place of use, source of supply, purpose of use, quantity of use
permitted, time of use, period of use, and the place of storage.
(2) The applicant for any proposed water right transfer may apply
to a board for a record of decision on a transfer if the water proposed
to be transferred is currently diverted, withdrawn, or used within the
geographic area in which the board has jurisdiction, or would be
diverted, withdrawn, or used within the geographic area in which the
board has jurisdiction if the transfer is approved. In the case of a
proposed water right transfer in which the water is currently diverted
or withdrawn or would be diverted or withdrawn outside the geographic
boundaries of the county or the water resource inventory area where the
use is proposed to be made, the board shall hold a public hearing in
the county of the diversion or withdrawal or proposed diversion or
withdrawal. The board shall provide for prominent publication of
notice of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation published
in the county in which the hearing is to be held for the purpose of
affording an opportunity for interested persons to comment upon the
application. If an application is for a transfer of water out of the
water resource inventory area that is the source of the water, the
board shall consult with the department regarding the application.
(3) After an application for a transfer is filed with the board,
the board shall publish notice of the application and send notice to
state agencies in accordance with the requirements of RCW 90.03.280.
In addition, the board shall send notice of the application to any
Indian tribe with reservation lands that would be, but for RCW
90.80.055(2), within the area in which the board has jurisdiction. The
board shall also provide notice of the application to any Indian tribe
that has requested that it be notified of applications. Any person may
submit comments and other information to the board regarding the
application. The comments and information may be submitted in writing
or verbally at any public meeting of the board to discuss or decide on
the application. The comments must be considered by the board in
making its record of decision.
(4) If a majority of the board determines that the application is
complete, and that the transfer is in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.390, or 90.44.100, the board must issue a record of decision
approving the transfer((, subject to review by the director)). In
making its record of decision, the board must consider among other
things whether the proposed transfer can be made without detriment or
injury to existing water rights, including rights established for
instream flows. The board must include in its record of decision any
conditions that are deemed necessary for the transfer to qualify for
approval under the applicable laws of the state. The basis for the
record of decision of the board must be documented in a report of
examination. The board's ((proposed)) approval must clearly state that
the applicant is not permitted to proceed to effect the proposed
transfer until ((a final decision is made by the director)) the
expiration of thirty days following the date of receipt of the record
of decision. ((In making its record of decision, the board must
consider among other things whether the proposed transfer can be made
without detriment or injury to existing water rights, including rights
established for instream flows.))
(5) If a majority of the board determines that the application
cannot be approved under the applicable laws of the state of
Washington, the board must make a record of decision denying the
application together with its report of examination documenting its
record of decision. ((The board's record of decision is subject to
review by the director under RCW 90.80.080.))
(6) When alternates appointed under the provisions of RCW
90.80.050(3) are serving as commissioners on a board, a majority vote
of the board must include at least one commissioner appointed under the
provisions of RCW 90.80.050(1).
(7) An alternate when serving as a commissioner in the review of an
application before the board shall:
(a) Review the written record before the board and any exhibits
provided for the review or provided at the hearing if a hearing was
held;
(b) Review any audio or video recordings made of the proceedings on
the application; and
(c) Conduct a site visit if a site visit by other commissioners
acting on the application has been previously conducted.
(8) An alternate serving as a commissioner shall be guided by the
conflict of interest standards applicable to all commissioners under
RCW 90.80.120. The board shall provide notice of an alternate sitting
as a commissioner to the applicant and other participants in
proceedings before the board in a timely manner to provide sufficient
time for any challenges for conflict of interest to be made prior to
the board's decision on the application.

Sec. 6 RCW 90.80.080 and 2001 c 237 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The board must provide a copy of its record of decision and
report of examination to the applicant and the department. ((The board
shall submit its record of decision on the transfer application to the
department for review. The board shall also submit its report of
examination to the department summarizing factual findings on which the
board relied in reaching its record of decision and a copy of the files
and records upon which the board's record of decision is based.)) The
board shall also promptly transmit notice by mail to any person who
objected to the transfer or who requested notice of the board's record
of decision.
(2) Upon receipt of a board's record of decision, the department
shall promptly post the text of the record of decision transmittal form
on the department's internet site. ((The director shall review each
record of decision made by a board for compliance with applicable state
water law.))
(3) Any ((party to a transfer, third party who alleges his or her
water right will be impaired by the proposed transfer, or other person
may file a letter of concern or support with the department and the
department may consider the concern or support expressed in the letter.
Such letters must be received by the department within thirty days of
the department's receipt of the board's record of decision)) person
aggrieved by the board's approval or denial of an application under
this chapter may seek review from the pollution control hearings board
by filing a written notice of appeal with the pollution control
hearings board within thirty days from the date of receipt of the
decision as provided in RCW 43.21B.230.
(4) The ((director shall review the record of decision of the board
and shall affirm, reverse, or modify the action of the board within
forty-five days of receipt. The forty-five day time period may be
extended for an additional thirty days by the director or at the
request of the board or applicant. If the director fails to act within
the prescribed time period, the board's record of decision becomes the
decision of the department and is appealable as provided by RCW
90.80.090. If the director acts within the prescribed time period, the
director's decision to affirm, modify, or reverse is appealable as
provided by RCW 90.80.090, and the director's decision to remand is
appealable as provided by RCW 90.80.120(2)(b))) department may obtain
review of a board's approval or denial of an application under this
chapter by filing a written notice of appeal with the pollution control
hearings board within thirty days from the date of receipt of the
decision as provided in RCW 43.21B.230.

Sec. 7 RCW 90.80.090 and 2001 c 237 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
The decision of the director to approve or deny an action to create
a board((, or to approve, deny, or modify a water right transfer either
by action or inaction)) is appealable in the same manner as other water
right decisions made pursuant to chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.80.120 and 2004 c 10 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A commissioner of a water conservancy board shall not engage in
any act which is in conflict with the proper discharge of the official
duties of a commissioner. A commissioner is deemed to have a conflict
of interest if he or she:
(a) Has an ownership interest in a water right subject to an
application for approval before the board;
(b) Receives or has a financial interest in an application
submitted to the board or a project, development, or venture related to
the approval of the application; or
(c) Solicits, accepts, or seeks anything of economic value as a
gift, gratuity, or favor from any person, firm, or corporation involved
in the application.
(2) In the event of a recusal of an appointed commissioner, an
alternate may serve as a commissioner on a board and may act upon the
official board business for which the conflict of interest exists.
(3) The department shall ((return a record of decision to a
conservancy board without action)) promptly notify a water conservancy
board where the department determines that any member of ((a)) the
board has violated subsection (1) of this section or should be
disqualified to avoid a violation of subsection (1) of this section.
(a) If a person seeking to rely on this section to disqualify a
commissioner knows of the basis for disqualification before the time
the board issues a record of decision, the person must request the
board to have the commissioner recuse himself or herself from further
involvement in processing the application, or be barred from later
raising that challenge.
(b) If the commissioner does not recuse himself or herself or if
the person becomes aware of the basis for disqualification after the
board issues a record of decision ((but within the time period under
RCW 90.80.080(3) for filing objections with the department, the person
must raise the challenge with the department. If the department
determines that the commissioner should be disqualified under this
section, the director must remand the record of decision to the board
for reconsideration and resubmission of a record of decision. The
disqualified commissioner shall not participate in any further board
review of the application. The department's decision on whether to
remand a record of decision under this section may only be appealed at
the same time and in the same manner as an appeal of the department's
decision to affirm, modify, or reverse the record of decision after
remand.
(c) If the person becomes aware of the basis for disqualification
after the time for filing objections with the department, the person
may raise the challenge in an appeal of the department's final decision
under RCW 90.80.090)), the person may raise the challenge in an appeal
of the board's decision under RCW 90.80.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 2 of this act expires June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Section 3 of this act takes effect June 30,
2019.

--- END ---