BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
SHORT TITLE AND INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 This act may be known and cited as the
excellent teachers for every student act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 102 The legislature finds that in order for
Washington schools to be great places to teach and learn - where all
kids and educators succeed - schools must build cultures where all
students thrive. The legislature intends to respect teachers and
principals first by empowering them to create that culture together,
and then by helping them retain the teachers who are crucial to that
culture. In particular, these policies support practices with a track
record of closing the achievement gap. This is done by:
(1) Ensuring that teachers who do the best work are the ones who
keep their jobs when budgets need to be cut, by basing reduction in
force policies on the evaluations the legislature has outlined for
measuring teacher performance. Since the loss of teachers through
layoffs already impacts student learning, there is an urgent need to
conduct layoffs in a way that retains the most effective teachers.
Educators deserve to be recognized for their ability to help students
learn and children deserve the very best and brightest teachers;
(2) Empowering principals and teachers with autonomy in challenging
school placement decisions to ensure the creation of school cultures
that both promote the ongoing improvement of teaching and learning and
are committed to closing the achievement gap. The strongest, most
successful school cultures are those in which teachers and principals
work toward shared goals for improving student learning. In order to
create shared cultures, principals and teachers must be able to agree
that a challenging school placement is the best fit for them;
(3) Recognizing that for the fair evaluation of a principal based
on the criteria outlined by the legislature, specifically that
principals should be evaluated on creating a school culture that
promotes the ongoing improvement of learning and teaching and managing
both staff and fiscal resources to support student achievement and
legal responsibilities for students and staff, a principal needs the
ability to select teachers who have demonstrated effectiveness and have
demonstrated qualifications and teaching experience that support the
instructional practices of his or her school;
(4) Increasing the authority of principals to terminate teachers
upon a finding that, after multiple years of unsuccessful improvement
following training and mentoring, the lack of a teacher's progress in
improving his or her teaching skills is detrimental to the academic
performance of the teacher's students; and
(5) Reforming the statewide salary allocation schedule and national
board bonuses to ensure that state appropriations are rationally
allocated using an evidence-based pay schedule that rewards teachers
who are making a positive difference toward educational attainment of
their students.

PART II
PERFORMANCE-BASED REDUCTION IN FORCE DUE TO ENROLLMENT
DECLINE OR REVENUE LOSS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 201 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) When reductions in the workforce occur due to enrollment
decline or revenue loss, the employment contracts of any certificated
classroom teacher must be nonrenewed in the following manner within
each particular certification or endorsement area. Certificated
classroom teachers who received the lowest evaluation rating, as
described in RCW 28A.405.100 must have their contracts nonrenewed
first.
(2) The board of directors of each school district shall adopt a
written policy governing procedures for the nonrenewal of employment
contracts for certificated classroom teachers as provided for in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Any school district whose board policies or locally bargained
agreement outlines recall rights for certificated classroom teachers
must recall staff in the reverse order contracts were nonrenewed as
provided for in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) All collective bargaining agreements and other contracts
entered into between a school district and an employee bargaining unit
or an employee after the effective date of this section, as well as
bargaining agreements existing on the effective date of this section,
but renewed or extended after the effective date of this section, must
be consistent with this section.

PART III
STAFFING PLACEMENTS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 301 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
Any policy adopted by a school district board of directors after
the effective date of this section under RCW 28A.150.230 or in a
locally bargained agreement must contain provisions that prohibit
assignment of a certificated classroom teacher to a school in the
lowest tier of the state board of education's accountability index,
unless agreed to by the hiring principal and, if applicable to local
policy, the school-based entity charged with hiring decisions.

PART IV
AUTHORITY TO REMOVE TEACHERS DETRIMENTAL
TO STUDENT ACADEMIC PERFORMANCE
Sec. 401 RCW 28A.405.140 and 1993 c 336 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) After an evaluation conducted pursuant to RCW 28A.405.100, the
principal or the evaluator may require the teacher to take in-service
training provided by the district in the area of teaching skills
needing improvement, and may require the teacher to have a mentor for
purposes of achieving such improvement.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28A.405.210 and
28A.405.220, if for three consecutive years or three nonconsecutive
years within any five-year period, clear improvement is not
demonstrated based on the in-service training and mentoring provided
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and after a finding that the
lack of a teacher's progress in improving his or her teaching skills is
detrimental to the academic performance of the teacher's students, the
principal may initiate an action to dismiss the teacher. In the event
the principal makes this determination, the teacher shall be notified
in writing. The notification must include a detailed explanation of
the reasons for the principal making this determination.
(3) Within ten days of receiving notice pursuant to this section,
every teacher receiving such notice, at his or her request, shall be
provided an opportunity to meet informally with the principal for the
purpose of requesting that the principal reconsider his or her
decision. At the meeting, the teacher must be given the opportunity to
refute any facts upon which the principal's determination was made.
(4) Within ten days following the meeting with the teacher, the
principal shall either reinstate the teacher or shall submit to the
school district board of directors for consideration at its next
regular meeting a written report recommending that the employment
contract of the teacher be terminated. A copy of the report must be
delivered to the teacher at least ten days before the scheduled meeting
of the board of directors. At the board of directors' meeting, the
teacher must be given the opportunity to present information and
provide documentation refuting any facts upon which the principal's
determination was made.
(5) The board of directors shall notify the teacher in writing of
its final decision within ten days following the meeting at which the
principal's recommendation was considered. The decision of the board
of directors to terminate the contract of a teacher pursuant to this
section shall be final and not subject to appeal.
(6) All school district collective bargaining agreements signed,
adopted, or renewed after the effective date of this section, shall
include provisions consistent with this section.

Sec. 402 RCW 28A.405.220 and 2010 c 235 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28A.405.140 and
28A.405.210, every person employed by a school district in a teaching
or other nonsupervisory certificated position shall be subject to
nonrenewal of employment contract as provided in this section during
the first three years of employment by such district, unless: (a) The
employee has previously completed at least two years of certificated
employment in another school district in the state of Washington, in
which case the employee shall be subject to nonrenewal of employment
contract pursuant to this section during the first year of employment
with the new district; or (b) the school district superintendent may
make a determination to remove an employee from provisional status if
the employee has received one of the top two evaluation ratings during
the second year of employment by the district. Employees as defined in
this section shall hereinafter be referred to as "provisional
employees."
(2) In the event the superintendent of the school district
determines that the employment contract of any provisional employee
should not be renewed by the district for the next ensuing term such
provisional employee shall be notified thereof in writing on or before
May 15th preceding the commencement of such school term, or if the
omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by May 15th,
then notification shall be no later than June 15th, which notification
shall state the reason or reasons for such determination. Such notice
shall be served upon the provisional employee personally, or by
certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the
place of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and
discretion then resident therein. The determination of the
superintendent shall be subject to the evaluation requirements of RCW
28A.405.100.
(3) Every such provisional employee so notified, at his or her
request made in writing and filed with the superintendent of the
district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be given
the opportunity to meet informally with the superintendent for the
purpose of requesting the superintendent to reconsider his or her
decision. Such meeting shall be held no later than ten days following
the receipt of such request, and the provisional employee shall be
given written notice of the date, time and place of meeting at least
three days prior thereto. At such meeting the provisional employee
shall be given the opportunity to refute any facts upon which the
superintendent's determination was based and to make any argument in
support of his or her request for reconsideration.
(4) Within ten days following the meeting with the provisional
employee, the superintendent shall either reinstate the provisional
employee or shall submit to the school district board of directors for
consideration at its next regular meeting a written report recommending
that the employment contract of the provisional employee be nonrenewed
and stating the reason or reasons therefor. A copy of such report
shall be delivered to the provisional employee at least three days
prior to the scheduled meeting of the board of directors. In taking
action upon the recommendation of the superintendent, the board of
directors shall consider any written communication which the
provisional employee may file with the secretary of the board at any
time prior to that meeting.
(5) The board of directors shall notify the provisional employee in
writing of its final decision within ten days following the meeting at
which the superintendent's recommendation was considered. The decision
of the board of directors to nonrenew the contract of a provisional
employee shall be final and not subject to appeal.
(6) This section applies to any person employed by a school
district in a teaching or other nonsupervisory certificated position
after June 25, 1976. This section provides the exclusive means for
nonrenewing the employment contract of a provisional employee and no
other provision of law shall be applicable thereto, including, without
limitation, RCW 28A.405.210 and chapter 28A.645 RCW.

PART V
LINKING YEARLY BONUSES TO TEACHER PERFORMANCE
Sec. 501 RCW 28A.405.415 and 2009 c 539 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before the 2013-14 school year, certificated instructional
staff who have attained certification from the national board for
professional teaching standards shall receive a bonus each year in
which they maintain the certification. Beginning in the 2013-14 school
year and each year thereafter, certificated instructional staff who
have received a bonus for at least two years must be evaluated by the
principal as a top tier teacher under RCW 28A.405.100 in order to
receive an annual bonus. The bonus shall be calculated as follows:
The annual bonus shall be five thousand dollars ((in the 2007-08 school
year. Thereafter, the annual bonus shall increase by inflation. For
the 2009-10 and 2010-11 school years the annual bonus shall be subject
to the availability of amounts appropriated for this purpose. During
the 2011-2013 and 2013-2015 fiscal biennia, in addition to annual
adjustments for inflation, the bonus amount shall be additionally
increased such that, by the end of the 2014-15 school year, national
board bonus amounts are, at a minimum, equal to what they would have
been if annual adjustments for inflation had not been suspended during
the 2009-10 or 2010-11 school year)).
(2) Before the 2013-14 school year, certificated instructional
staff who have attained certification from the national board for
professional teaching standards shall be eligible for bonuses in
addition to that provided by subsection (1) of this section if the
individual is in an instructional assignment in a school in which at
least seventy percent of the students qualify for the free and reduced-price lunch program. Beginning in the 2013-14 school year and each
year thereafter, certificated instructional staff who have received a
bonus for at least two years must be evaluated by the principal as a
top tier teacher under RCW 28A.405.100 in order to receive an annual
bonus under this subsection.
(3) The amount of the additional bonus under subsection (2) of this
section for those meeting the qualifications of subsection (2) of this
section is five thousand dollars.
(4) The bonuses provided under this section are in addition to
compensation received under a district's salary schedule adopted in
accordance with RCW 28A.405.200 and shall not be included in
calculations of a district's average salary and associated salary
limitations under RCW 28A.400.200.
(5) The bonuses provided under this section shall be paid in a lump
sum amount in July of each school year.
(6) The technical working group established in RCW 28A.400.201 must
include an examination of national board certification bonuses.

PART VI
STATEWIDE SALARY ALLOCATION SCHEDULE
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 The legislature finds the Washington state
institute for public policy has analyzed research on whether having a
graduate degree improves the ability of a teacher to raise the academic
performance of his or her students. The institute concluded that the
average research estimate is that graduate degrees had "essentially
zero" impact on student outcomes, except possibly in the instance of
mathematics and science graduate degrees for teachers in particular
fields. The institute found that, within the context of a single
salary schedule, salary schedules should be adjusted to place less or
no emphasis on graduate degrees. Additionally, the institute found
that the effect of teacher experience on student learning, while quite
significant in the initial years, levels off considerably beyond five
years of experience. The legislature is cognizant of this research and
finds that, at present, it spends more than nine hundred million
dollars per year in higher pay for teachers with educational experience
beyond a bachelor's degree and a significant amount in higher
compensation for teachers beyond their initial years of experience.
The legislature intends to reform the statewide salary schedule to
ensure that dollars spent on education are better allocated to improve
student outcomes.

Sec. 602 RCW 28A.150.410 and 2010 c 236 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature shall establish for each school year in the
appropriations act a statewide salary allocation schedule, for
allocation purposes only, to be used to distribute funds for basic
education certificated instructional staff salaries under RCW
28A.150.260. For the purposes of this section, the staff allocations
for classroom teachers, teacher librarians, guidance counselors, and
student health services staff under RCW 28A.150.260 are considered
allocations for certificated instructional staff.
(2) Salary allocations for state-funded basic education
certificated instructional staff shall be calculated by the
superintendent of public instruction by determining the district's
average salary for certificated instructional staff, using the
statewide salary allocation schedule and related documents, conditions,
and limitations established by the omnibus appropriations act.
(3) Beginning ((January 1, 1992, no more than ninety college
quarter-hour credits received by any employee after the baccalaureate
degree may be used to determine compensation allocations under the
state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in the
omnibus appropriations act, or any replacement schedules and documents,
unless:
(a) The employee has a master's degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992)) in the 2013-14 school year, the statewide
salary allocation schedule shall phase out in annual proportional
decrements additional salary allocations for certificated instructional
staff with greater than eight years of service and educational
experience beyond a baccalaureate degree plus forty-five credits,
unless the employee has a master's degree in mathematics, science, or
special education and is teaching in one of those fields, in which case
the increased compensation allocation shall reflect only that portion
of an employee's workload that is spent teaching those fields.
(4) By no later than the 2018-19 school year, the maximum college
quarter-hour credits and years of education service used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in the omnibus appropriations act, or any
replacement schedules and documents, shall be:
(a) Forty-five credits after the baccalaureate degree, unless the
employee has a master's degree in mathematics, science, or special
education and is teaching in one of those fields, in which case the
increased compensation allocation shall reflect only that portion of
the employee's workload that is spent teaching in those fields; and
(b) Eight years of service.
(5) Beginning in the 2007-08 school year, the calculation of years
of service for occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists, audiologists, nurses, social workers,
counselors, and psychologists regulated under Title 18 RCW may include
experience in schools and other nonschool positions as occupational
therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists,
audiologists, nurses, social workers, counselors, or psychologists.
The calculation shall be that one year of service in a nonschool
position counts as one year of service for purposes of this chapter, up
to a limit of two years of nonschool service. Nonschool years of
service included in calculations under this subsection shall not be
applied to service credit totals for purposes of any retirement benefit
under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW, or any other state retirement
system benefits.
(6) Fiscal savings from changes to the statewide salary allocation
schedule under this section shall be fully reinvested in compensation
of certificated instructional staff. Beginning in the 2013-14 school
year the statewide salary allocation schedule shall be revised to
incorporate performance pay based on the certificated teacher
evaluation system required under RCW 28A.405.100 and the school
accountability index required under RCW 28A.657.110. Seventy percent
of savings from changes to the statewide salary allocation schedule
shall be directed to certificated instructional staff performance pay
based on the certificated teacher evaluation system required under RCW
28A.405.100 and thirty percent directed to certificated instructional
staff performance pay based on the school accountability index required
under RCW 28A.657.110.

Sec. 603 RCW 28A.400.200 and 2010 c 235 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter,
allow, and order paid salaries and compensation for all district
employees in conformance with this section.
(2)(((a))) Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not
be less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the
statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
baccalaureate degree and zero years of service((; and
(b) Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a master's
degree shall not be less than the salary provided in the appropriations
act in the statewide salary allocation schedule for an employee with a
master's degree and zero years of service)).
(3)(a) The actual average salary paid to certificated instructional
staff shall not exceed the district's average certificated
instructional staff salary used for the state basic education
allocations for that school year as determined pursuant to RCW
28A.150.410.
(b) Fringe benefit contributions for certificated instructional
staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this subsection only to
the extent that the district's actual average benefit contribution
exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
For purposes of this section, fringe benefits shall not include payment
for unused leave for illness or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer
contributions for old age survivors insurance, workers' compensation,
unemployment compensation, and retirement benefits under the Washington
state retirement system; or employer contributions for health benefits
in excess of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating
appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is payable.
A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.
(c) Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in
programs other than basic education shall be consistent with the salary
and benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic
education program.
(4) Except as provided in RCW 28A.150.410, salaries and benefits
for certificated instructional staff may exceed the limitations in
subsection (3) of this section only by separate contract for additional
time, for additional responsibilities, for incentives, or for
implementing specific measurable innovative activities, including
professional development, specified by the school district to: (a)
Close one or more achievement gaps, (b) focus on development of
science, technology, engineering, and mathematics (STEM) learning
opportunities, or (c) provide arts education. Beginning September 1,
2011, school districts shall annually provide a brief description of
the innovative activities included in any supplemental contract to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall summarize the district
information and submit an annual report to the education committees of
the house of representatives and the senate. Supplemental contracts
shall not cause the state to incur any present or future funding
obligation. Supplemental contracts shall be subject to the collective
bargaining provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW
28A.405.240, shall not exceed one year, and if not renewed shall not
constitute adverse change in accordance with RCW 28A.405.300 through
28A.405.380. No district may enter into a supplemental contract under
this subsection for the provision of services which are a part of the
basic education program required by Article IX, section 3 of the state
Constitution.
(5) Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply
with RCW 28A.400.350 ((and)), 28A.400.275, and 28A.400.280.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604 A new section is added to chapter 28A.150
RCW to read as follows:
Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, the base salary allocation
for school district certificated instructional staff must be reduced
for those grandfathered school districts with allocations above the
minimum salary identified in the statewide salary allocation schedule.
The grandfathered district reduction shall be in annual proportional
decrements that result in the allocation being uniform across all
school districts in the 2013-14 school year. The annual decrement for
each grandfathered school district shall, at a minimum, be the lesser
of (1) the difference between the district's base salary allocation and
the minimum salary identified in the statewide salary allocation
schedule, and (2) one percent of the minimum salary identified in the
statewide salary allocation schedule.

PART VII
MISCELLANEOUS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 701 This act takes effect September 1, 2011.

--- END ---