BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Washington is successful because of its
people whose social and economic well-being depends upon the
availability and quality of their education. The legislature finds
that, even during these financially challenging times, Washington
colleges and universities provide high quality educational experiences
for their students and produce graduates well prepared to fuel
Washington's economy and society. Postsecondary funding, however, has
been cut to the point that the future vitality and production capacity
of Washington's institutions of higher education is at risk unless bold
actions are taken.
The legislature finds that, unlike reductions for other state
services that can recover quickly as the economy recovers, budget
reductions in higher education have long-lasting adverse effects on
Washington citizens, the economy, and society - effects that the state
must minimize. For these reasons, the legislature finds that immediate
actions must be taken to preserve the excellent quality of education
that students receive at Washington's institutions of higher education
and the availability of educational opportunities for a broad spectrum
of Washington students.
The legislature intends to buffer the economic challenges
experienced by Washington colleges and universities by permitting them
to establish their tuition rates institutionally while holding them
accountable for their performance on specific outcomes, including
quality and quantity measures. The legislature intends to require
continuing achievement of these progressively challenging outcomes to
justify continuing institutional autonomy.
The legislature further intends that the effects of the tuition
increases be mitigated for middle-class and needy students by
preserving its commitment to state and institutional funding for need-based financial aid.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2010 c 20 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning with the 2003-04 academic year and ending with the
2012-13 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees for resident undergraduates shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act. Beginning in the 2013-14 academic year, reductions
or increases in full-time tuition fees shall be as provided in the
omnibus appropriations act for resident undergraduate students at
community and technical colleges. The state board for community and
technical colleges may pilot or institute differential tuition models.
The board may define scale, scope, and rationale for the models.
(3)(a) Beginning with the ((2003-04)) 2013-14 academic year and
((ending with the 2012-13)) through the end of the 2018-19 academic
year, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College((, and the state board
for community and technical colleges)) may reduce or increase full-time
tuition fees for all students ((other than resident undergraduates)),
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Reductions or increases may be made,
and differential tuition rates may be charged, for all or portions of
an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or students. This
subsection (3)(a) applies to the state board for community and
technical colleges for all nonresident students, summer school
students, and students in other self-supporting programs.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Governing boards shall be required to
provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial
aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of
attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
each college in the state board for community and technical college
system shall consult with existing student associations or
organizations with undergraduate student representation regarding the
impacts of potential tuition increases. Colleges shall provide data
regarding the percentage of students receiving financial aid, the
sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of attendance paid
for by aid.
(4) ((Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's
institutions of higher education beginning with 2015-16, other than
summer term, shall be as charged during the 2014-15 academic year
unless different rates are adopted by the legislature)) Beginning with
the 2019-20 academic year, reductions or increases in full-time tuition
fees shall be as provided in the omnibus appropriations act for
resident undergraduate students at four-year institutions of higher
education.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement program
through an interlocal agreement between a school district and a
community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through
28A.175.110.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose
of obtaining a high school diploma.
(((8) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, the
University of Washington shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent
of all revenues received as a result of law school tuition increases
beginning in academic year 2000-01 through academic year 2008-09 to
assist needy low and middle-income resident law students.
(9) For the academic years 2003-04 through 2008-09, institutions of
higher education shall use an amount equivalent to ten percent of all
revenues received as a result of graduate academic school tuition
increases beginning in academic year 2003-04 through academic year
2008-09 to assist needy low and middle-income resident graduate
academic students.
(10) Any tuition increases above seven percent shall fund costs of
instruction, library and student services, utilities and maintenance,
other costs related to instruction as well as institutional financial
aid. Through 2010-11, any funding reductions to instruction, library
and student services, utilities and maintenance and other costs related
to instruction shall be proportionally less than other program areas
including administration.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in the 2013-14 academic year, each four-year
institution of higher education that raises tuition levels beyond
levels established in subsection (3) of this section shall provide
financial aid for the express purpose of eliminating the effects of
tuition increases above those specified in subsection (3)(a) and (b) of
this section on students with incomes below one hundred twenty-five
percent of the median family income. Financial aid sources and methods
may be:
(a) Tuition revenue or locally held funds;
(b) Tuition waivers created by a four-year institution of higher
education for the specific purpose of serving middle class students; or
(c) Local financial aid programs.
(2) By January 1, 2014, four-year institutions of higher education
shall report to the governor and relevant committees of the legislature
on the effectiveness of financial aid programs in mitigating tuition
increases.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section applies when tuition levels are
raised above:
(a) For the University of Washington, Washington State University,
and Western Washington University, eleven percent per year; and
(b) For The Evergreen State College, Central Washington University,
and Eastern Washington University, nine percent per year.

Sec. 4 RCW 28B.15.068 and 2009 c 540 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((Beginning with the 2007-08 academic year and ending with the
2016-17 academic year)) Except during the 2011-2013 through 2017-2019
biennia, tuition fees charged to full-time resident undergraduate
students((, except in academic years 2009-10 and 2010-11, may increase
no greater than seven percent over the previous academic year in any
institution of higher education. Annual reductions or increases in
full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduate students)) shall be
as provided in the omnibus appropriations act((, within the seven
percent increase limit established in this section. For academic years
2009-10 and 2010-11 the omnibus appropriations act may provide tuition
increases greater than seven percent)). To the extent that state
appropriations combined with tuition and fee revenues are insufficient
to achieve the total per-student funding goals established in
subsection (2) of this section, the legislature may revisit state
appropriations, authorized enrollment levels, and changes in tuition
fees for any given fiscal year.
(2) The state shall adopt as its goal total per-student funding
levels, from state appropriations plus tuition and fees, of at least
the sixtieth percentile of total per-student funding at similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states. In
defining comparable per-student funding levels, the office of financial
management shall adjust for regional cost-of-living differences; for
differences in program offerings and in the relative mix of lower
division, upper division, and graduate students; and for accounting and
reporting differences among the comparison institutions. The office of
financial management shall develop a funding trajectory for each four-year institution of higher education and for the community and
technical college system as a whole that when combined with tuition and
fees revenue allows the state to achieve its funding goal for each
four-year institution and the community and technical college system as
a whole no later than fiscal year 2017. ((The state shall not reduce
enrollment levels below fiscal year 2007 budgeted levels in order to
improve or alter the per-student funding amount at any four-year
institution of higher education or the community and technical college
system as a whole.)) The state recognizes that each four-year
institution of higher education and the community and technical college
system as a whole have different funding requirements to achieve
desired performance levels, and that increases to the total per-student
funding amount may need to exceed the minimum funding goal.
(3) By September 1st of each year beginning in 2008, the office of
financial management shall report to the governor, the higher education
coordinating board, and appropriate committees of the legislature with
updated estimates of the total per-student funding level that
represents the sixtieth percentile of funding for comparable
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states, and
the progress toward that goal that was made for each of the public
institutions of higher education.
(4) As used in this section, "global challenge states" are the top
performing states on the new economy index published by the progressive
policy institute as of July 22, 2007. The new economy index ranks
states on indicators of their potential to compete in the new economy.
At least once every five years, the office of financial management
shall determine if changes to the list of global challenge states are
appropriate. The office of financial management shall report its
findings to the governor and the legislature.
(5) ((During the 2009-10 and the 2010-11 academic years,)) The
institutions of higher education shall include information on their
billing statements notifying students of available federal tax credits
((available through the American opportunity tax credit provided in the
American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009)).

Sec. 5 RCW 28B.76.270 and 2004 c 275 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall establish an accountability monitoring and
reporting system as part of a continuing effort to make meaningful and
substantial progress towards the achievement of long-term performance
goals in higher education.
(2) To provide consistent, easily understood data among the public
four-year institutions of higher education within Washington and in
other states, the following data must be reported annually and at a
minimum include data recommended by a national organization
representing state chief executives. This data must include the
following for the four-year institutions of higher education and the
board may change the data requirements to be consistent with best
practices across the country:
(a) Bachelor's degrees awarded;
(b) Graduate and professional degrees awarded;
(c) Graduation rates: The number and percentage of students who
graduate within four years for bachelor's degrees and within the
extended time, which is six years for bachelor's degrees;
(d) Transfer rates: The annual number and percentage of students
who transfer from a two-year to a four-year institution of higher
education;
(e) Time and credits to degree: The average length of time in
years and average number of credits that graduating students took to
earn a bachelor's degree;
(f) Enrollment in remedial education: The number and percentage of
entering first-time undergraduate students who place into and enroll in
remedial mathematics, English, or both;
(g) Success beyond remedial education: The number and percentage
of entering first-time undergraduate students who complete entry
college-level math and English courses within the first two consecutive
academic years;
(h) Credit accumulation: The number and percentage of first-time
undergraduate students completing two quarters or one semester worth of
credit during their first academic year;
(i) Retention rates: The number and percentage of entering
undergraduate students who enroll consecutively from fall-to-spring and
fall-to-fall at an institution of higher education;
(j) Course completion: The percentage of credit hours completed
out of those attempted during an academic year;
(k) Program participation and degree completion rates in bachelor
and advanced degree programs in the sciences, which includes the health
sciences, natural resources, environment, conservation, biology, life
sciences, and other applied and interdisciplinary sciences, technology,
engineering, and mathematics disciplines, and other high demand and
critical state need areas, including participation and degree
completion rates for students from traditionally underrepresented
populations;
(l) Annual unduplicated number of students enrolled over a twelve-month period at institutions of higher education;
(m) Annual ratio of undergraduate degrees and certificates of at
least one year in expected length awarded per one hundred full-time
equivalent undergraduate students at the state level; and
(n) Annual ratio of undergraduate degrees and certificates, of at
least one year in program length, awarded relative to the state's
population age eighteen to twenty-four years old with a high school
diploma.
(3) Four-year institutions of higher education must count all
students when collecting data, not only first-time, full-time freshmen.
(4) Based on guidelines prepared by the board, ((each four-year
institution and)) the state board for community and technical colleges
shall submit a biennial plan to achieve measurable and specific
improvements each academic year on statewide ((and institution-specific)) performance measures. Plans shall be submitted to the board
along with the biennial budget requests from ((the institutions and))
the state board for community and technical colleges. Performance
measures established for the community and technical colleges shall
reflect the role and mission of the colleges.
(((3))) (5) The board shall approve biennial performance targets
((for each four-year institution and)) for the community and technical
college system and shall review actual achievements annually. The
state board for community and technical colleges shall set biennial
performance targets for each college or district, where appropriate.
(((4))) (6) For the community and technical college system, the
board shall submit a report on progress towards the statewide goals,
with recommendations for the ensuing biennium, to the fiscal and higher
education committees of the legislature along with the board's biennial
budget recommendations.
(((5))) (7) For the four-year institutions, the board shall submit
a report on progress toward degree completion goals and on comparisons
with other states for the measures listed in subsection (2) of this
section, with recommendations for the ensuing biennium, to the fiscal
and higher education committees of the legislature along with the
board's biennial budget recommendation.
(8) The board, in collaboration with the four-year institutions and
the state board for community and technical colleges, shall
periodically review and update the accountability monitoring and
reporting system.
(((6))) (9) The board shall develop measurable indicators and
benchmarks for its own performance regarding cost, quantity, quality,
and timeliness and including the performance of committees and advisory
groups convened under this chapter to accomplish such tasks as
improving transfer and articulation, improving articulation with the K-12 education system, measuring educational costs, or developing data
protocols. The board shall submit its accountability plan to the
legislature concurrently with the biennial report on institution
progress.

Sec. 6 RCW 28B.76.200 and 2007 c 458 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall develop a statewide strategic master plan for
higher education that proposes a vision and identifies measurable goals
and priorities for the system of higher education in Washington state
for a ten-year time period. The board shall update the statewide
strategic master plan every four years. The plan shall address the
goals of: (a) Expanding access; (b) using methods of educational
delivery that are efficient, cost-effective, and productive to deliver
modern educational programs; and (c) using performance measures to
gauge the effectiveness of the state's progress towards meeting its
higher education goals. The plan shall encompass all sectors of higher
education, including the two-year system, workforce training, the four-year institutions, and financial aid. The board shall also specify
strategies for expanding access, affordability, quality, efficiency,
and accountability among the various institutions of higher education.
(2) In developing the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education, the board shall collaborate with the four-year institutions
of higher education including the council of presidents, the community
and technical college system, and, when appropriate, the workforce
training and education coordinating board, the superintendent of public
instruction, the independent higher education institutions, the
business sector, and labor. The board shall identify and utilize
models of regional planning and decision making before initiating a
statewide planning process. The board shall also seek input from
students, faculty organizations, community and business leaders in the
state, members of the legislature, and the governor.
(3) As a foundation for the statewide strategic master plan for
higher education, the board shall review role and mission statements
for each of the four-year institutions of higher education and the
community and technical college system. The purpose of the review is
to ensure institutional roles and missions are aligned with the overall
state vision and priorities for higher education.
(4) In assessing needs of the state's higher education system, the
board should encourage partnerships, embrace innovation, and consider,
analyze, and make recommendations concerning the following information:
(a) Demographic, social, economic, and technological trends and
their impact on service delivery for a twenty-year horizon;
(b) The changing ethnic composition of the population and the
special needs arising from those trends;
(c) Business and industrial needs for a skilled workforce;
(d) College attendance, retention, transfer, graduation, and
dropout rates;
(e) Needs and demands for basic and continuing education and
opportunities for lifelong learning by individuals of all age groups;
(f) Needs and demands for nontraditional populations including, but
not limited to, adult learners; and
(g) Needs and demands for access to higher education by placebound
students and individuals in heavily populated areas underserved by
public institutions.
(5) The statewide strategic master plan for higher education shall
include, but not be limited to, the following access and educational
delivery items:
(a) Recommendations based on enrollment forecasts and analysis of
data about demand for higher education, and policies and actions to
meet the goal of expanding access;
(b) State and regional priorities for new or expanded degree
programs or off-campus programs, including what models of service
delivery may be most cost-effective;
(c) Recommended policies or actions to improve the efficiency of
student transfer and graduation or completion;
(d) State and regional priorities for addressing needs in high-demand fields where enrollment access is limited and employers are
experiencing difficulty finding enough qualified graduates to fill job
openings;
(e) Recommended tuition and fees policies and levels; and
(f) Priorities and recommendations including increased transparency
on financial aid.
(6) The board shall present the vision, goals, priorities, and
strategies in the statewide strategic master plan for higher education
in a way that provides guidance for institutions, the governor, and the
legislature to make further decisions regarding institution-level
plans, policies, legislation, and operating and capital funding for
higher education. In the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education, the board shall recommend specific actions to be taken and
identify measurable performance indicators and benchmarks for gauging
progress toward achieving the goals and priorities.
(7) Every four years by December 15th, beginning December 15, 2007,
the board shall submit an update of the ten-year statewide strategic
master plan for higher education to the governor and the legislature.
The updated plan shall reflect the expectations and policy directions
of the legislative higher education and fiscal committees, and shall
provide a timely and relevant framework for the development of future
budgets and policy proposals. The legislature shall, by concurrent
resolution, approve or recommend changes to the updated plan, following
public hearings. The board shall submit the final plan, incorporating
legislative changes, to the governor and the legislature by June of the
year in which the legislature approves the concurrent resolution. The
plan shall then become state higher education policy unless legislation
is enacted to alter the policies set forth in the plan. The board
shall report annually to the governor and the legislature on the
progress being made by the institutions of higher education and the
state to implement the strategic master plan.
(8)(a) The master plan updated in 2011 shall include a plan for
achieving the following initial degree completion targets by 2018:
(i) Increasing the number of bachelor's degrees earned by
Washington's resident students from the 2010 levels by at least six
thousand degrees completed or by twenty-seven percent;
(ii) Consistent with the priority for increasing the number of
enrollments and degrees in the fields of engineering, technology,
biotechnology, sciences, computer sciences, and mathematics, at least
two thousand of the additional degrees in (a)(i) of this subsection
would be awarded in the areas of science, which includes the health
sciences, technology, engineering, and mathematics; and
(iii) Attaining parity in degree attainment for students from
underrepresented groups, which would mean that at least nineteen
percent of the degrees awarded would include students who are low
income or are the first in their families to attend college.
(b) The bachelor degree completion targets in (a)(i) of this
subsection shall be updated by the higher education coordinating board
by September 1, 2012, and by September 1st every two years thereafter
based upon the state's changing population and economic needs. Targets
shall be set for five-year periods following the 2018 target.
(9) Each four-year institution shall develop an institution-level
ten-year strategic plan that implements the vision, goals, priorities,
and strategies within the statewide strategic master plan for higher
education based on the institution's role and mission. Institutional
strategic plans shall encourage partnerships, embrace innovation, and
contain measurable performance indicators and benchmarks for gauging
progress toward achieving the goals and priorities with attention given
to the goals and strategies of increased access and program delivery
methods. The board shall review the institution-level plans to ensure
the plans are aligned with and implement the statewide strategic master
plan for higher education and shall periodically monitor institutions'
progress toward achieving the goals and priorities within their plans.
(((9))) (10) The board shall also review the comprehensive master
plan prepared by the state board for community and technical colleges
for the community and technical college system under RCW 28B.50.090 to
ensure the plan is aligned with and implements the statewide strategic
master plan for higher education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) To ensure institutional quality, promote access, and advance
the public mission of public four-year institutions of higher
education, the authority to increase or decrease tuition rates shall be
considered within the context of performance-based measures and goals
for each state university, regional university, and The Evergreen State
College. By September 1, 2013, and September 1st every two years
thereafter, the state universities, the regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College shall each negotiate an institutional
performance contract with the higher education coordinating board and
the office of financial management that includes expected outcomes that
must be achieved by each institution in the following biennium and that
includes a method for rewarding performance improvement beyond expected
outcomes in accordance with the baccalaureate degree incentive program
established in section 8 of this act. At a minimum, an individual
institutional performance contract shall include:
(a) Expected outcomes concerning time and credits to degree;
(b) Expected outcomes concerning retention and success of students
from low-income, diverse, or underrepresented communities;
(c) Expected outcomes concerning bachelor degree production for
resident students;
(d) Expected outcomes concerning degree production in high demand
and critical state need areas;
(e) Expected outcomes that maintain the proportion of resident
undergraduate students to the total student population; and
(f) Expected outcomes concerning number of students enrolled.
(2) If performance contracts are not completed as specified in
subsection (1) of this section or if, at the conclusion of a biennium,
any state university, regional university, or The Evergreen State
College does not achieve the expected outcomes established in the
performance contracts, in the following biennium that university's or
college's tuition may not, without prior legislative approval, be
increased more than the increase specified in section 3(3) (a) and (b)
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28B.76 RCW
to read as follows:
The board shall establish a baccalaureate degree incentive program.
To the extent funds are available to the board for this purpose, awards
shall be made beginning with the 2013-2014 fiscal year. The board, in
collaboration with the institutions, the council of presidents, and the
education data center, shall design the program to provide awards for
four-year institutions of higher education based upon each
institution's individual performance improvement on a set of measures.
At a minimum, measures must initially include:
(1) Time and credits to degree;
(2) Retention and success of students from low-income, diverse, or
underrepresented communities;
(3) Bachelor degree production for resident students; and
(4) Degree production in high demand and critical state need areas.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A graduate of a community or technical college in this state
who has earned a transferrable associate of arts or sciences degree
when admitted to a four-year institution of higher education shall have
junior standing and shall be deemed to have met the lower division
general education requirements of that institution.
(2) A student who has earned the equivalent of ninety quarter
credit hours and has completed the general education requirements at
that four-year institution of higher education in Washington when
admitted to another four-year institution of higher education shall
have junior standing and shall be deemed to have met the lower division
general education requirements of the institution to which the student
transfers.
(3) The community and technical colleges, jointly with the four-year institutions of higher education, must develop a list of academic
courses that are equivalent to one-year's worth of general education
credit and that would transfer for that purpose to any other two or
four-year institution of higher education. If a student completes one-
year's worth of general education credits, that student may be issued
a one-year academic completion certificate. This certificate shall be
accepted at any transferring two or four-year institution of higher
education.
(4) Each institution of higher education must develop a minimum of
one degree within the arts and sciences disciplines that can be
completed within the equivalent of ninety quarter upper division
credits by any student who enters an institution of higher education
with junior status and lower division general education requirements
completed.
(5) Each four-year institution of higher education must publish a
list of recommended courses for each academic major designed to help
students who are planning to transfer design their course of study.
(6) The requirement to publish a list of academic courses under
this section does not apply if an institution does not require courses
or majors to meet specific requirements but generally applies credits
earned toward degree requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) Community and technical colleges must identify and publish
in their admissions materials the college level courses that are
recognized by all four-year institutions of higher education as
transferring to the four-year institutions of higher education.
Publication of the list of courses must be easily identified and
accessible on the college's web site.
(b) If a four-year institution of higher education does not require
courses of major for transfer, the community and technical colleges
must identify and publish the transfer policy of the institution in
their admissions materials and make the transfer policy of the
institution easily identifiable on the college's web site.
(2) Community and technical colleges must create a list of courses
that satisfy the basic requirements, distribution requirements, and
approved electives for:
(a) A one-year academic completion certificate as provided for
under section 9 of this act; and
(b) A transferrable associate of arts or sciences degree as
provided for under section 9 of this act.
(3) To the extent possible, each community and technical college
must develop links between the lists in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section and its list of courses, and develop methods to encourage
students to check the lists in subsections (1) and (2) of this section
when the students are registering for courses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28B.10.920 (Performance agreements--Generally) and 2008 c
160 s 2;
(2) RCW 28B.10.921 (Performance agreements -- Contents) and 2008 c
160 s 3; and
(3) RCW 28B.10.922 (Performance agreements -- State committee--Development of final proposals -- Implementation -- Updates) and 2008 c 160
s 4.

--- END ---