BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.08.026 and 2008 c 67 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Administrative expenses of the board shall be appropriated and paid
from the liquor revolving fund. These administrative expenses
((shall)) include, but are not ((be)) limited to: The salaries and
expenses of the board and its employees, the cost of opening additional
state liquor stores and warehouses, legal services, pilot projects,
annual or other audits, and other general costs of conducting the
business of the board. The administrative expenses ((shall)) do not
include costs of liquor, liquor-related products, and lottery tickets
purchased, the cost of transportation and delivery to the point of
distribution, the cost of operating, maintaining, relocating, and
leasing state liquor stores and warehouses, other costs pertaining to
the acquisition and receipt of liquor and lottery tickets, agency
commissions for contract liquor stores, transaction fees associated
with credit or debit card purchases for liquor in state liquor stores
and in contract liquor stores pursuant to RCW 66.16.040 and 66.16.041,
sales tax, and those amounts distributed pursuant to RCW 66.08.180,
66.08.190, 66.08.200, 66.08.210 and 66.08.220. Agency commissions for
contract liquor stores shall be established by the liquor control board
after consultation with and approval by the director of the office of
financial management. All expenditures and payment of obligations
authorized by this section are subject to the allotment requirements of
chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 66.08.165 and 2005 c 231 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall, consistent with, and in addition to, the existing
retail business plan, implement strategies to improve the efficiency of
retail sales operations and maximize revenue-generating opportunities.
Strategies to be implemented ((shall)) include, but are not limited to:
(1) Expanding store operations to include Sunday sales in selected
liquor stores. Sunday sales are optional for liquor vendors operating
agency stores;
(2) Implementing a plan of in-store liquor merchandising, including
point-of-sale advertising, and product specific point-of-sale
promotional displays and carousels, including displays designed and
provided by vendors; and
(3) Implementing a plan for in-store liquor merchandising of
brands. ((The plan may not include provisions for selling liquor-related items other than those items previously authorized.))

Sec. 3 RCW 66.16.010 and 2005 c 518 s 935 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There shall be established at such places throughout the state
as the liquor control board, constituted under this title, ((shall))
deems advisable, stores to be known as "state liquor stores," for the
sale of liquor and liquor-related products on consignment in accordance
with the provisions of this title and the regulations((: PROVIDED,
That)). However, the prices of all liquor shall be fixed by the board
from time to time so that the net annual revenue received by the board
therefrom shall not exceed thirty-five percent. Effective no later
than July 1, 2005, the liquor control board shall add an equivalent
surcharge of $0.42 per liter on all retail sales of spirits, excluding
licensee, military, and tribal sales. The intent of this surcharge is
to raise revenue for the general fund-state for the 2003-2005 and 2005-2007 bienniums. The board shall remove the surcharge June 30, 2007.
(2) The liquor control board may, from time to time, fix the
special price at which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to physicians and
dentists and institutions regularly conducted as hospitals, for use or
consumption only in such hospitals; and may also fix the special price
at which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to schools, colleges and
universities within the state for use for scientific purposes.
Regularly conducted hospitals may have right to purchase pure ethyl
alcohol on a federal permit.
(3) The liquor control board may also fix the special price at
which pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to any department, branch or
institution of the state of Washington, federal government, or to any
person engaged in a manufacturing or industrial business or in
scientific pursuits requiring alcohol for use therein.
(4) The liquor control board may also fix a special price at which
pure ethyl alcohol may be sold to any private individual, and shall
make regulations governing such sale of alcohol to private individuals
as shall promote, as nearly as may be, the minimum purchase of such
alcohol by such persons.

--- END ---