BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.08.050 and 2005 c 151 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, subject to the provisions of this title and the rules,
shall:
(1) Determine the localities within which state liquor stores shall
be established throughout the state, and the number and situation of
the stores within each locality;
(2) Appoint in cities and towns and other communities, in which no
state liquor store is located, except as provided in subsection (12) of
this section, contract liquor stores. In addition, the board may
appoint, in its discretion, a manufacturer that also manufactures
liquor products other than wine under a license under this title, as a
contract liquor store for the purpose of sale of liquor products of its
own manufacture on the licensed premises only. Such contract liquor
stores shall be authorized to sell liquor under the guidelines provided
by law, rule, or contract, and such contract liquor stores shall be
subject to such additional rules and regulations consistent with this
title as the board may require;
(3) Establish all necessary warehouses for the storing and
bottling, diluting and rectifying of stocks of liquors for the purposes
of this title;
(4) Provide for the leasing for periods not to exceed ten years of
all premises required for the conduct of the business; and for
remodeling the same, and the procuring of their furnishings, fixtures,
and supplies; and for obtaining options of renewal of such leases by
the lessee. The terms of such leases in all other respects ((shall
be)) are subject to the direction of the board;
(5) Determine the nature, form and capacity of all packages to be
used for containing liquor kept for sale under this title;
(6) Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and
documents in the name of the board, under such regulations as the board
may fix;
(7) Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations
whatsoever relating to the business of the board;
(8) Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the
board, and to determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such
employee;
(9) Perform services for the state lottery commission to such
extent, and for such compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon
between the board and the commission;
(10) Accept and deposit into the general fund-local account and
disburse, subject to appropriation, federal grants or other funds or
donations from any source for the purpose of improving public awareness
of the health risks associated with alcohol consumption by youth and
the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington state. The board's
alcohol awareness program shall cooperate with federal and state
agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an active
public beverage alcohol awareness program;
(11) Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the
foregoing or not, to carry out the provisions of this title, and shall
have full power to do each and every act necessary to the conduct of
its business, including all buying, selling, preparation and approval
of forms, and every other function of the business whatsoever, subject
only to audit by the state auditor((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the
board shall have no authority to regulate the content of spoken
language on licensed premises where wine and other liquors are served
and where there is not a clear and present danger of disorderly conduct
being provoked by such language;
(12) Conduct a pilot project, beginning in fiscal year 2012,
appointing up to ten colocated contract stores within existing grocery
stores, licensed under RCW 66.24.360, in high population areas. A
grocery store containing a colocated contract store must have a fully
enclosed retail area encompassing at least nine thousand square feet.
The board must report to the applicable committees of the legislature
the results of the pilot project no later than January 1, 2013.

--- END ---