BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Chapter 561, Laws of 2009 made necessary
changes to the funding plan for the fiscal integrity of the teachers'
retirement system, plan 1 and the public employees' retirement system,
plan 1, and provides a basis for improvements in the financial
soundness of the pension plans. The legislature now finds that
changing economic conditions have also made necessary the amendatory
provisions contained in this act. Due to the current extraordinary
economic recession and due to the financial demands of other core
responsibilities of government, it is not feasible for public employers
of this state to fund the annual increase amount and continue to ensure
the fiscal integrity of these pension funds. The legislature further
clarifies and affirms that the intent of the legislature in section 5,
chapter 345, Laws of 1995 and this act is to not create any contractual
rights to the annual increase amount on the part of the public
employees' retirement system, plan 1 and the teachers' retirement
system, plan 1 members or retirees. Having reserved the right to amend
or repeal these provisions in RCW 41.32.489(6) and 41.40.197(5), the
legislature is now exercising that right through this act.

Sec. 2 RCW 41.32.483 and 2007 c 491 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, the annual increase amount as defined
in RCW 41.32.010(((46))) (4) shall be increased by an amount equal to
$0.40 per month per year of service minus the 2008 gain-sharing
increase amount under RCW 41.31.010 as it exists on July 22, 2007.
This adjustment shall not decrease the annual increase amount, and is
not to exceed $0.20 per month per year of service. The legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no
member or beneficiary has the contractual right to receive this
adjustment to the annual increase amount not granted prior to that
time.
(2) The adjustment to the annual increase amount as set forth in
section 5, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 was intended by the legislature as
a replacement benefit for gain-sharing. If the repeal of chapter 41.31
RCW is held to be invalid in a final determination of a court of law,
and the court orders reinstatement of gain-sharing or other alternate
benefits as a remedy, then this adjustment to the annual increase
amount shall not be included in future annual increase amounts paid on
or after the date of such reinstatement.
(3) No additional annual increase under this section shall be
provided after June 30, 2011.

Sec. 3 RCW 41.32.489 and 2007 c 89 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 1995, and annually thereafter through July 1,
2010, the retirement allowance of a person meeting the requirements of
this section shall be increased by the annual increase amount.
(a) After July 1, 2010, those currently receiving benefits under
this section will receive no additional annual increase amounts above
the amount in effect on July 1, 2010, except for those who qualify
under subsections (2)(b) and (3)(a) of this section. This subsection
shall not reduce retirement allowances below the amounts in effect on
the effective date of this section.
(b) After July 1, 2010, no annual increase amounts may be provided
to any beneficiaries who are not already receiving benefits under this
section, except for those who qualify under subsections (2)(b) and
(3)(a) of this section.
(2) The following persons shall be eligible for the benefit
provided in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) A beneficiary who has received a retirement allowance for at
least one year by July 1st in the calendar year in which the annual
increase is given and has attained at least age sixty-six by December
31st in the calendar year in which the annual increase is given; or
(b) A beneficiary whose retirement allowance is lower than the
minimum benefit provided under RCW 41.32.4851.
(3) The following persons shall also be eligible for the benefit
provided in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) A beneficiary receiving the minimum benefit on June 30, 1995,
under RCW 41.32.485; or
(b) A recipient of a survivor benefit on June 30, 1995, which has
been increased by RCW 41.32.575.
(4) If otherwise eligible, those receiving an annual adjustment
under RCW 41.32.530(1)(d) shall be eligible for the annual increase
adjustment in addition to the benefit that would have been received
absent this section.
(5) Those receiving a temporary disability benefit under RCW
41.32.540 shall not be eligible for the benefit provided by this
section.
(6) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to receive this postretirement adjustment not granted prior to
that time.

Sec. 4 RCW 41.32.4851 and 2006 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No one who becomes a beneficiary after June 30, 1995, shall
receive a monthly retirement allowance of less than twenty-four dollars
and twenty-two cents times the number of years of service creditable to
the person whose service is the basis of such retirement allowance.
(2) If the retirement allowance payable was adjusted at the time
benefit payments to the beneficiary commenced, the minimum allowance
provided in this section shall be adjusted in a manner consistent with
that adjustment.
(3) Beginning July 1, 1996, the minimum benefit set forth in
subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted annually by the annual
increase.
(4) Those receiving a temporary disability benefit under RCW
41.32.540 shall not be eligible for the benefit provided by this
section.
(5) ((Beginning July 1, 2004, the minimum benefit set forth in
subsection (1) of this section, prior to adjustments set forth in
subsection (2) of this section, for a beneficiary with at least twenty-five years of service and who has been retired at least twenty years
shall be one thousand dollars per month. On July 1, 2006, and each
year thereafter, the minimum benefit in this subsection shall be
increased by three percent, rounded to the nearest cent.
(6) Beginning July 1, 2006, the minimum benefit set forth in
subsection (1) of this section, prior to adjustments set forth in
subsection (2) of this section, for a beneficiary with at least twenty
years of service and who has been retired at least twenty-five years
shall be one thousand dollars per month. On July 1, 2006, and each
year thereafter, the minimum benefit in this subsection shall be
increased by three percent, rounded to the nearest cent.)) Beginning
July 1, 2011, the minimum benefit set forth in subsection (1) of this
section, prior to adjustments set forth in subsection (2) of this
section, for a beneficiary with either (a) at least twenty years of
service and who has been retired at least twenty-five years, or (b) at
least twenty-five years of service and who has been retired at least
twenty years, shall be one thousand five hundred dollars per month. On
July 1, 2012, and each year thereafter, the minimum benefit in this
subsection shall be increased by three percent, rounded to the nearest
cent.

Sec. 5 RCW 41.40.183 and 2007 c 491 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, the annual increase amount as defined
in RCW 41.40.010(((41))) (4) shall be increased by an amount equal to
$0.40 per month per year of service minus the 2008 gain-sharing
increase amount under RCW 41.31.010 as it exists on July 22, 2007.
This adjustment shall not decrease the annual increase amount, and is
not to exceed $0.20 per month per year of service. The legislature
reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the future and no
member or beneficiary has the contractual right to receive this
adjustment to the annual increase amount not granted prior to that
time.
(2) The adjustment to the annual increase amount as set forth in
section 11, chapter 491, Laws of 2007 was intended by the legislature
as a replacement benefit for gain-sharing. If the repeal of chapter
41.31 RCW is held to be invalid in a final determination of a court of
law, and the court orders reinstatement of gain-sharing or other
alternate benefits as a remedy, then this adjustment to the annual
increase amount shall not be included in future annual increase amounts
paid on or after the date of such reinstatement.
(3) No additional increase under this section shall be provided
after June 30, 2011.

Sec. 6 RCW 41.40.197 and 2007 c 89 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 1995, and annually thereafter through July 1,
2010, the retirement allowance of a person meeting the requirements of
this section shall be increased by the annual increase amount.
(a) After July 1, 2010, those currently receiving benefits under
this section will receive no additional annual increase amounts above
the amount in effect on July 1, 2010, except for those who qualify
under subsection (2)(b) of this section. This subsection shall not
reduce retirement allowances below the amounts in effect on the
effective date of this section.
(b) After July 1, 2010, no annual increase amounts may be provided
to any beneficiaries who are not already receiving benefits under this
section, except for those who qualify under subsection (2)(b) of this
section.
(2) The following persons shall be eligible for the benefit
provided in subsection (1) of this section:
(a) A beneficiary who has received a retirement allowance for at
least one year by July 1st in the calendar year in which the annual
increase is given and has attained at least age sixty-six by December
31st in the calendar year in which the annual increase is given; or
(b) A beneficiary whose retirement allowance is lower than the
minimum benefit provided under RCW 41.40.1984.
(3) If otherwise eligible, those receiving an annual adjustment
under RCW 41.40.188(1)(c) shall be eligible for the annual increase
adjustment in addition to the benefit that would have been received
absent this section.
(4) Those receiving a benefit under RCW 41.40.220(1), or a survivor
of a disabled member under RCW 41.44.170(5) shall be eligible for the
benefit provided by this section.
(5) The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this
section in the future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual
right to receive this postretirement adjustment not granted prior to
that time.

Sec. 7 RCW 41.40.1984 and 2006 c 244 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section,
no one who becomes a beneficiary after June 30, 1995, shall receive a
monthly retirement allowance of less than twenty-four dollars and
twenty-two cents times the number of years of service creditable to the
person whose service is the basis of such retirement allowance.
(2) Where the retirement allowance payable was adjusted at the time
benefit payments to the beneficiary commenced, the minimum allowance
provided in this section shall be adjusted in a manner consistent with
that adjustment.
(3) Beginning July 1, 1996, the minimum benefit set forth in
subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted annually by the annual
increase.
(4) Those receiving a benefit under RCW 41.40.220(1) or under RCW
41.44.170 (3) and (5) shall not be eligible for the benefit provided by
this section.
(5) For persons who served as elected officials and whose
accumulated employee contributions and credited interest was less than
seven hundred fifty dollars at the time of retirement, the minimum
benefit under subsection (1) of this section shall be ten dollars per
month per each year of creditable service.
(6) ((Beginning July 1, 2004, the minimum benefit set forth in
subsection (1) of this section, prior to adjustments set forth in
subsection (2) of this section, for a beneficiary with at least twenty-five years of service and who has been retired at least twenty years
shall be one thousand dollars per month. On July 1, 2006, and each
year thereafter, the minimum benefit in this subsection shall be
increased by three percent, rounded to the nearest cent.
(7) Beginning July 1, 2006, the minimum benefit set forth in
subsection (1) of this section, prior to adjustments set forth in
subsection (2) of this section, for a beneficiary with at least twenty
years of service and who has been retired at least twenty-five years
shall be one thousand dollars per month. On July 1, 2006, and each
year thereafter, the minimum benefit in this subsection shall be
increased by three percent, rounded to the nearest cent.)) Beginning
July 1, 2011, the minimum benefit set forth in subsection (1) of this
section, prior to adjustments set forth in subsection (2) of this
section, for a beneficiary with either (a) at least twenty years of
service and who has been retired at least twenty-five years, or (b) at
least twenty-five years of service and who has been retired at least
twenty years, shall be one thousand five hundred dollars per month. On
July 1, 2012, and each year thereafter, the minimum benefit in this
subsection shall be increased by three percent, rounded to the nearest
cent.

Sec. 8 RCW 41.45.150 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 26 s 7 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2015, maximum
annual contribution rates are established for the portion of the
employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system
and the public safety employees' retirement system that is used for the
sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1
that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit
improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015

1.25% 1.25% 3.75% 4.50% 5.25% 6.00%

(2) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2015,
maximum annual contribution rates are established for the portion of
the employer contribution rate for the school employees' retirement
system that is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of
the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize
plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum
rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015

1.25% 1.25% 3.75% 4.50% 5.25% 6.00%

(3) Beginning September 1, 2009, and ending August 31, 2015,
maximum annual contribution rates are established for the portion of
the employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system that
is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded
actuarial accrued liability in the teachers' retirement system plan 1
that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit
improvements effective after June 30, 2009. The maximum rates are:

Fiscal Year ending:

2010 2011 2012 2013 2014 2015

2.04% 2.04% 6.50% 7.50% 8.50% 9.50%

(4) Beginning July 1, 2015, a minimum ((5.25)) 3.50 percent
contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution
rate for the public employees' retirement system and the public safety
employees' retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of
amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any
amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective
after June 30, 2009. This minimum contribution rate shall remain
effective until the actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the public
employees' retirement system equals one hundred percent of the
actuarial accrued liability.
(5) Beginning September 1, 2015, a minimum ((5.25)) 3.50 percent
contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution
rate for the school employees' retirement system, to be used for the
sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial
accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1
that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit
improvements effective after June 30, 2009. This minimum contribution
rate shall remain effective until the actuarial value of assets in plan
1 of the public employees' retirement system equals one hundred percent
of the actuarial accrued liability.
(6) Beginning September 1, 2015, a minimum ((8.00)) 5.75 percent
contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution
rate for the teachers' retirement system, to be used for the sole
purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability in the teachers' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any
amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective
after June 30, 2009. This minimum contribution rate shall remain
effective until the actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the
teachers' retirement system equals one hundred percent of the actuarial
accrued liability.
(7) Upon completion of each biennial actuarial valuation, the state
actuary shall review the appropriateness of the minimum contribution
rates and recommend to the council any adjustments as may be needed due
to material changes in benefits or actuarial assumptions, methods, or
experience. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to
revision by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 30, 2011.

--- END ---