BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.600.310 and 2009 c 450 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Eleventh and twelfth grade students or students who have not
yet received the credits required for the award of a high school
diploma and are eligible to be in the eleventh or twelfth grades may
apply to a participating institution of higher education to enroll in
courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education. A
student receiving home-based instruction enrolling in a public high
school for the sole purpose of participating in courses or programs
offered by institutions of higher education shall not be counted by the
school district in any required state or federal accountability
reporting if the student's parents or guardians filed a declaration of
intent to provide home-based instruction and the student received home-based instruction during the school year before the school year in
which the student intends to participate in courses or programs offered
by the institution of higher education. Students receiving home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW and students attending private
schools approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW shall not be required to
meet the student learning goals, obtain a certificate of academic
achievement or a certificate of individual achievement to graduate from
high school, or to master the essential academic learning requirements.
However, students are eligible to enroll in courses or programs in
participating universities only if the board of directors of the
student's school district has decided to participate in the program.
Participating institutions of higher education, in consultation with
school districts, may establish admission standards for these students.
If the institution of higher education accepts a secondary school pupil
for enrollment under this section, the institution of higher education
shall send written notice to the pupil and the pupil's school district
within ten days of acceptance. The notice shall indicate the course
and hours of enrollment for that pupil.
(b) Running start students shall pay to the institution of higher
education a maximum of ten percent of tuition and fees, as defined in
RCW 28B.15.020. The state board for community and technical colleges
shall determine the annual rate for tuition and fees charged to and
collected from students participating in the running start program.
The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall determine the
annual rate for tuition and fees charged to and collected from students
participating in the running start program. The institution of higher
education shall prorate the mandatory fees based on credit load.
(2) In ((lieu of tuition and fees, as defined in RCW 28B.15.020 and
28B.15.041)) addition to tuition and fees authorized in subsection
(1)(b) of this section, running start students shall pay to the
community or technical college all other mandatory fees as established
by each community or technical college; and all other institutions of
higher education operating a running start program may charge
technology fees. The fees charged shall be prorated based on credit
load.
(3) The institutions of higher education must make available
tuition and fee waivers for low-income running start students. Each
institution must establish a written policy for the determination of
low-income students before offering the fee waiver. A student shall be
considered low income and eligible for a fee waiver upon proof that the
student is currently qualified to receive free or reduced-price lunch.
Acceptable documentation of low-income status may also include, but is
not limited to, documentation that a student has been deemed eligible
for free or reduced-price lunches in the last five years, or other
criteria established in the institution's policy. Use of tuition and
fee waivers for qualified low-income running start students shall not
be included in determining total state tuition waiver authority at each
participating institution of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.15.910.
(4) The pupil's school district shall transmit to the institution
of higher education an amount per each full-time equivalent college
student at statewide uniform rates for vocational and nonvocational
students. The superintendent of public instruction shall separately
calculate and allocate moneys appropriated for basic education under
RCW 28A.150.260 to school districts for purposes of making such
payments and for granting school districts seven percent thereof to
offset program related costs. The calculations and allocations shall
be based upon the estimated statewide annual average per full-time
equivalent high school student allocations under RCW 28A.150.260,
excluding small high school enhancements, and applicable rules adopted
under chapter 34.05 RCW. The superintendent of public instruction, the
higher education coordinating board, and the state board for community
and technical colleges shall consult on the calculation and
distribution of the funds. The funds received by the institution of
higher education from the school district shall not be deemed tuition
or operating fees and may be retained by the institution of higher
education. A student enrolled under this subsection shall be counted
for the purpose of meeting enrollment targets in accordance with terms
and conditions specified in the omnibus appropriations act.
(5) ((The state board for community and technical colleges, in
collaboration with the other institutions of higher education that
participate in the running start program and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall identify, assess, and
report on alternatives for providing ongoing and adequate financial
support for the program. Such alternatives shall include but are not
limited to student tuition, increased support from local school
districts, and reallocation of existing state financial support among
the community and technical college system to account for differential
running start enrollment levels and impacts. The state board for
community and technical colleges shall report the assessment of
alternatives to the governor and to the appropriate fiscal and policy
committees of the legislature by September 1, 2010.)) The office of the
superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration with the state
board for community and technical colleges and the other institutions
of higher education that participate in the running start program,
shall monitor enrollment in the running start program and shall report
any enrollment declines in the running start program as a result of
charging a maximum of ten percent of tuition and fees, in particular
any declines in enrollment of running start students with family
incomes at or below one hundred twenty-five percent of the median
family income, annually to the governor and to the appropriate fiscal
and policy committees of the legislature. The first report shall be
submitted no later than September 1, 2012.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.600.370 and 1994 c 205 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any state institution of higher education may award postsecondary
credit for college level academic and vocational courses successfully
completed by a student while in high school and taken at an institution
of higher education. ((The state institution of higher education shall
not charge a fee for the award of the credits.))

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.15.910 and 2008 c 188 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of providing state general fund support to
public institutions of higher education, except for revenue waived
under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and
unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations
act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen
State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial
management, before granting any waivers. This limitation applies to
all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1, 1992.
(a) University of Washington 21 percent
(b) Washington State University 20 percent
(c) Eastern Washington University 11 percent
(d) Central Washington University 10 percent
(e) Western Washington University 10 percent
(f) The Evergreen State College 10 percent
(g) Community colleges as a whole 35 percent
(2) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to
waivers, exemptions, or reductions in operating fees contained in the
following:
(a) RCW 28B.15.014;
(b) RCW 28B.15.100;
(c) RCW 28B.15.225;
(d) RCW 28B.15.380;
(e) RCW 28B.15.520;
(f) RCW 28B.15.526;
(g) RCW 28B.15.527;
(h) RCW 28B.15.543;
(i) RCW 28B.15.545;
(j) RCW 28B.15.555;
(k) RCW 28B.15.556;
(l) RCW 28B.15.615;
(m) RCW 28B.15.621 (2) and (4);
(n) RCW 28B.15.730;
(o) RCW 28B.15.740;
(p) RCW 28B.15.750;
(q) RCW 28B.15.756;
(r) RCW 28B.50.259; and
(s) RCW 28B.70.050.
(3) The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply
to waivers, exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees
contained in the following:
(a) RCW 28A.600.310;
(b) RCW 28B.15.522;
(((b))) (c) RCW 28B.15.540;
(((c))) (d) RCW 28B.15.558; and
(((d))) (e) RCW 28B.15.621(3).
(4) The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or
reduced by institutions of higher education participating in the
western interstate commission for higher education western
undergraduate exchange program under RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection.
(a) Washington State University 1 percent
(b) Eastern Washington University 3 percent
(c) Central Washington University 3 percent
(5) The institutions of higher education will participate in
outreach activities to increase the number of veterans who receive
tuition waivers. Colleges and universities shall revise the
application for admissions so that all applicants shall have the
opportunity to advise the institution that they are veterans who need
assistance. If a person indicates on the application for admissions
that the person is a veteran who is in need of assistance, then the
institution of higher education shall ask the person whether they have
any funds disbursed in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill available
to them. Each institution shall encourage veterans to utilize funds
available to them in accordance with the Montgomery GI Bill prior to
providing the veteran a tuition waiver.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The state universities, the regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College must accept the transfer of college-level
courses taken by running start students if a student seeking a transfer
of the college-level courses has been admitted to the state university,
the regional university, or The Evergreen State College, and if the
college-level courses are recognized as transferrable by the admitting
institution of higher education.

--- END ---