BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that for ensuing
biennia, the Washington state patrol, ferry operations, as well as
state and local roadway preservation and maintenance activities will
soon experience significant funding shortfalls. The legislature
further recognizes that existing law, enacted in 2002, requires the
department of licensing to submit a fee study every two years to the
transportation committees of the house of representatives and the
senate, the purpose of which is to ensure cost recovery for
transportation services. Based on the review of the department of
licensing's fee study, the legislature will review and adjust fees
accordingly each biennium to ensure that fees are adjusted and brought
up-to-date. The legislature further recognizes that previous studies
conducted by the joint transportation committee have recommended
various fees adjustments. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to ensure that funding shortfalls in certain transportation
programs are addressed, to provide gap funding for local transportation
entities along with roadway preservation for cities and counties, and
to bring fees in-line with costs.

I. APPROPRIATIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Additive transportation funding is
hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth, the several
amounts specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish
the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several
accounts and funds named to the designated state agencies and offices
for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and
for other specified purposes for the period ending June 30, 2013.
(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout the act:
(a) "Lapse" means the amount shall return to unappropriated status.
(b) "LEAP" means the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee.
(c) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only
for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified
purpose that is not expended subject to the specified conditions and
limitations to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
State Patrol Highway Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,500,000
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,578,000 of the state patrol highway account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the auto theft investigation units
in King county, Spokane, and Tacoma.
(2) $10,000,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely for equipment acquisition, installation,
integration, and financing needs associated with the conversion of the
existing communication system to narrowbanding as required by the
federal communications commission.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the total
appropriation in this section must be used by the Washington state
patrol for the ongoing operations of the agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM M
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $8,057,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely to further reduce the highway maintenance backlog in
order to maintain or increase levels of service.
(2) $4,943,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the department's compliance with its national
pollution discharge elimination system permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM V
Multimodal Transportation Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,760,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to nonprofit providers of
special needs transportation.
(2) $6,240,000 of the multimodal transportation account--state
appropriation is provided solely for grants to transit agencies to
transport persons with special transportation needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--MARINE--PROGRAM X
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $16,600,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the purchase of fuel for marine operations.
(2) $4,400,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to offset potential increases in fares during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium.
(3) $4,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to maintain the same level of service provided in the
2009-2011 fiscal biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 FOR THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to help
cities meet urgent preservation needs.
(2) $12,000,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the urban arterial program.
(3) $1,000,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the small city pavement program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 FOR THE COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the county arterial preservation program to help
counties meet urgent preservation needs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The total appropriation in this section is
provided solely for urgent preservation needs on the state highway
system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation is provided solely for the purposes of constructing a
ferry boat vessel with a carrying capacity of at least one hundred
thirty cars.
(2) The transportation 2003 account (nickel account)--state
appropriation includes up to $144,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of
bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.861.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--LOCAL
PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z--CAPITAL
Highway Safety Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,000,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely to the freight mobility strategic investment board
for grants to meet urgent freight corridor improvement and preservation
needs.
(2) $2,000,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation
is provided solely for safe routes to schools program projects, in rank
order, and identified as contingency projects in the LEAP
Transportation Document 2011-A, pedestrian and bicycle safety program
projects and safe routes to school program projects, referenced in the
omnibus transportation appropriations act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE ACCOUNT AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE
Highway Bond Retirement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--BOND RETIREMENT
AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES
Transportation 2003 Account (Nickel Account)--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,000

II. DRIVER FEES
Sec. 14 RCW 46.20.055 and 2010 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Driver's instruction permit. The department may issue a
driver's instruction permit with or without a photograph to an
applicant who has successfully passed all parts of the examination
other than the driving test, provided the information required by RCW
46.20.091, paid a fee ((of twenty dollars)) as required under
subsection (5) of this section, and meets the following requirements:
(a) Is at least fifteen and one-half years of age; or
(b) Is at least fifteen years of age and:
(i) Has submitted a proper application; and
(ii) Is enrolled in a traffic safety education program offered,
approved, and accredited by the superintendent of public instruction or
offered by a driver training school licensed and inspected by the
department of licensing under chapter 46.82 RCW, that includes practice
driving.
(2) Waiver of written examination for instruction permit. The
department may waive the written examination, if, at the time of
application, an applicant is enrolled in:
(a) A traffic safety education course as defined by RCW
28A.220.020(2); or
(b) A course of instruction offered by a licensed driver training
school as defined by RCW 46.82.280.
The department may require proof of registration in such a course
as it deems necessary.
(3) Effect of instruction permit. A person holding a driver's
instruction permit may drive a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle,
upon the public highways if:
(a) The person has immediate possession of the permit;
(b) The person is not using a wireless communications device,
unless the person is using the device to report illegal activity,
summon medical or other emergency help, or prevent injury to a person
or property; and
(c) An approved instructor, or a licensed driver with at least five
years of driving experience, occupies the seat beside the driver.
(4) Term of instruction permit. A driver's instruction permit is
valid for one year from the date of issue.
(a) The department may issue one additional one-year permit.
(b) The department may issue a third driver's permit if it finds
after an investigation that the permittee is diligently seeking to
improve driving proficiency.
(c) A person applying to ((renew an)) receive a second or third
instruction permit must submit the application to the department in
person and pay a twenty-five dollar fee.
(5) Examination fee. An applicant who takes the examination
required under this section must pay a fee of thirty-five dollars for
each examination taken, irrespective of passage or failure.

Sec. 15 RCW 46.20.117 and 2005 c 314 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard, containing
a picture, if the applicant:
(a) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;
(b) Proves his or her identity as required by RCW 46.20.035; and
(c) Pays the required fee. The fee is ((twenty)) thirty dollars
unless an applicant is a recipient of continuing public assistance
grants under Title 74 RCW, who is referred in writing by the secretary
of social and health services. For those persons the fee must be the
actual cost of production of the identicard.
(2) Design and term. The identicard must:
(a) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused with the
official driver's license; and
(b) Expire on the fifth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate
after issuance.
(3) Renewal. An application for identicard renewal may be
submitted by means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her identicard by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of an identicard
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.
An identicard may not be renewed by mail or by electronic commerce
unless the renewal issued by the department includes a photograph of
the identicard holder.
(4) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if the
holder of the identicard used the card or allowed others to use the
card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921.

Sec. 16 RCW 46.20.120 and 2005 c 314 s 306 and 2005 c 61 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
An applicant for a new or renewed driver's license must
successfully pass a driver licensing examination to qualify for a
driver's license. The department shall give examinations at places and
times reasonably available to the people of this state.
(1) Waiver. The department may waive:
(a) All or any part of the examination of any person applying for
the renewal of a driver's license unless the department determines that
the applicant is not qualified to hold a driver's license under this
title; or
(b) All or any part of the examination involving operating a motor
vehicle if the applicant:
(i) Surrenders a valid driver's license issued by the person's
previous home state; or
(ii) Provides for verification a valid driver's license issued by
a foreign driver licensing jurisdiction with which the department has
an informal agreement under RCW 46.20.125; and
(iii) Is otherwise qualified to be licensed.
(2) Fee. Each applicant for a new license must pay an examination
fee of ((twenty)) thirty dollars.
(a) The examination fee is in addition to the fee charged for
issuance of the license.
(b) "New license" means a license issued to a driver:
(i) Who has not been previously licensed in this state; or
(ii) Whose last previous Washington license has been expired for
more than five years.
(3) An application for driver's license renewal may be submitted by
means of:
(a) Personal appearance before the department; or
(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the
department and if the applicant did not renew his or her license by
mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired. ((However, the
department may accept an application for renewal of a driver's license
submitted by means of mail or electronic commerce only if specific
authority and funding is provided for this purpose by June 30, 2004, in
the omnibus transportation appropriations act.))
(4) A person whose license expired or will expire while he or she
is living outside the state, may:
(a) Apply to the department to extend the validity of his or her
license for no more than twelve months. If the person establishes to
the department's satisfaction that he or she is unable to return to
Washington before the date his or her license expires, the department
shall extend the person's license. The department may grant
consecutive extensions, but in no event may the cumulative total of
extensions exceed twelve months. An extension granted under this
section does not change the expiration date of the license for purposes
of RCW 46.20.181. The department shall charge a fee of thirty-five
dollars for each license extension;
(b) Apply to the department to renew his or her license by mail or,
if permitted by rule of the department, by electronic commerce even if
subsection (3)(b) of this section would not otherwise allow renewal by
that means. If the person establishes to the department's satisfaction
that he or she is unable to return to Washington within twelve months
of the date that his or her license expires, the department shall renew
the person's license by mail or, if permitted by rule of the
department, by electronic commerce.
(5) If a qualified person submits an application for renewal under
subsection (3)(b) or (4)(b) of this section, he or she is not required
to pass an examination nor provide an updated photograph. A license
renewed by mail or by electronic commerce that does not include a
photograph of the licensee must be labeled "not valid for
identification purposes."

Sec. 17 RCW 46.20.161 and 2000 c 115 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department, upon receipt of a fee of ((twenty-five)) forty-five
dollars, unless the driver's license is issued for a period other than
five years, in which case the fee shall be ((five)) nine dollars for
each year that the license is issued, which includes the fee for the
required photograph, shall issue to every qualifying applicant a
driver's license. A driver's license issued to a person under the age
of eighteen is an intermediate license, subject to the restrictions
imposed under RCW 46.20.075, until the person reaches the age of
eighteen. The license must include a distinguishing number assigned to
the licensee, the name of record, date of birth, Washington residence
address, photograph, a brief description of the licensee, and either a
facsimile of the signature of the licensee or a space upon which the
licensee shall write his or her usual signature with pen and ink
immediately upon receipt of the license. No license is valid until it
has been so signed by the licensee.

Sec. 18 RCW 46.20.181 and 1999 c 308 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, every
driver's license expires on the fifth anniversary of the licensee's
birthdate following the issuance of the license.
(2) A person may renew his or her license on or before the
expiration date by submitting an application as prescribed by the
department and paying a fee of ((twenty-five)) forty dollars. This fee
includes the fee for the required photograph.
(3) A person renewing his or her driver's license more than sixty
days after the license has expired shall pay a penalty fee of ((ten))
fifteen dollars in addition to the renewal fee, unless his or her
license expired when:
(a) The person was outside the state and he or she renews the
license within sixty days after returning to this state; or
(b) The person was incapacitated and he or she renews the license
within sixty days after the termination of the incapacity.
(4) During the period from July 1, 2000, to July 1, 2006, the
department may issue or renew a driver's license for a period other
than five years, or may extend by mail a license that has already been
issued, in order to evenly distribute, as nearly as possible, the
yearly renewal rate of licensed drivers. The fee for a driver's
license issued or renewed for a period other than five years, or that
has been extended by mail, is five dollars for each year that the
license is issued, renewed, or extended. The department may adopt any
rules as are necessary to carry out this subsection.

Sec. 19 RCW 46.20.200 and 2002 c 352 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If an instruction permit, identicard, or a driver's license is
lost or destroyed, the person to whom it was issued may obtain a
duplicate of it upon furnishing proof of such fact satisfactory to the
department and payment of a fee of ((fifteen)) twenty dollars to the
department.
(2) A replacement permit, identicard, or driver's license may be
obtained to change or correct material information upon payment of a
fee of ((ten)) fifteen dollars and surrender of the permit, identicard,
or driver's license being replaced.

Sec. 20 RCW 46.20.202 and 2007 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may enter into a memorandum of understanding
with any federal agency for the purposes of facilitating the crossing
of the border between the state of Washington and the Canadian province
of British Columbia.
(2) The department may enter into an agreement with the Canadian
province of British Columbia for the purposes of implementing a border-crossing initiative.
(3)(a) The department may issue an enhanced driver's license or
identicard for the purposes of crossing the border between the state of
Washington and the Canadian province of British Columbia to an
applicant who provides the department with proof of: United States
citizenship, identity, and state residency. The department shall
continue to offer a standard driver's license and identicard. If the
department chooses to issue an enhanced driver's license, the
department must allow each applicant to choose between a standard
driver's license or identicard, or an enhanced driver's license or
identicard.
(b) The department shall implement a one-to-many biometric matching
system for the enhanced driver's license or identicard. An applicant
for an enhanced driver's license or identicard shall submit a biometric
identifier as designated by the department. The biometric identifier
must be used solely for the purpose of verifying the identity of the
holders and for any purpose set out in RCW 46.20.037. Applicants are
required to sign a declaration acknowledging their understanding of the
one-to-many biometric match.
(c) The enhanced driver's license or identicard must include
reasonable security measures to protect the privacy of Washington state
residents, including reasonable safeguards to protect against
unauthorized disclosure of data about Washington state residents. If
the enhanced driver's license or identicard includes a radio frequency
identification chip, or similar technology, the department shall ensure
that the technology is encrypted or otherwise secure from unauthorized
data access.
(d) The requirements of this subsection are in addition to the
requirements otherwise imposed on applicants for a driver's license or
identicard. The department shall adopt such rules as necessary to meet
the requirements of this subsection. From time to time the department
shall review technological innovations related to the security of
identity cards and amend the rules related to enhanced driver's
licenses and identicards as the director deems consistent with this
section and appropriate to protect the privacy of Washington state
residents.
(e) Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.118, the department may make images
associated with enhanced drivers' licenses or identicards from the
negative file available to United States customs and border agents for
the purposes of verifying identity.
(4)(a) The department ((may set a)) shall charge the following fees
for the issuance of enhanced drivers' licenses and identicards under
this section:
(i) The fee for an original enhanced driver's license is fifty-five
dollars.
(ii) The fee for a renewed or reissued enhanced driver's license is
thirty dollars.
(iii) The fee for an original enhanced identicard is fifty-five
dollars.
(iv) The fee for a renewed or reissued enhanced identicard is
thirty dollars.
(b) The fees under this section are in addition to the regular
driver's license and identicard fees.

Sec. 21 RCW 46.20.049 and 2005 c 314 s 309 are each amended to
read as follows:
There shall be an additional fee for issuing any class of
commercial driver's license in addition to the prescribed fee required
for the issuance of the original driver's license. The additional fee
for each class shall be thirty-five dollars for the original commercial
driver's license or subsequent renewals. If the commercial driver's
license is renewed or extended for a period other than five years, the
fee for each class shall be ((six)) seven dollars for each year that
the commercial driver's license is renewed or extended. The fee shall
be deposited in the highway safety fund.

Sec. 22 RCW 46.25.060 and 2009 c 339 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) No person may be issued a commercial driver's license unless
that person is a resident of this state, has successfully completed a
course of instruction in the operation of a commercial motor vehicle
that has been approved by the director or has been certified by an
employer as having the skills and training necessary to operate a
commercial motor vehicle safely, and has passed a knowledge and skills
test for driving a commercial motor vehicle that complies with minimum
federal standards established by federal regulation enumerated in 49
C.F.R. part 383, subparts G and H, and has satisfied all other
requirements of the CMVSA in addition to other requirements imposed by
state law or federal regulation. The tests must be prescribed and
conducted by the department. In addition to the fee charged for
issuance or renewal of any license, the applicant shall pay a fee of no
more than ((ten)) thirty dollars for each classified knowledge
examination, classified endorsement knowledge examination, or any
combination of classified license and endorsement knowledge
examinations. The applicant shall pay a fee of no more than one
hundred twenty-five dollars for each classified skill examination or
combination of classified skill examinations conducted by the
department.
(b) The department may authorize a person, including an agency of
this or another state, an employer, a private driver training facility,
or other private institution, or a department, agency, or
instrumentality of local government, to administer the skills test
specified by this section under the following conditions:
(i) The test is the same which would otherwise be administered by
the state;
(ii) The third party has entered into an agreement with the state
that complies with the requirements of 49 C.F.R. part 383.75; and
(iii) The director has adopted rules as to the third party testing
program and the development and justification for fees charged by any
third party.
(c) If the applicant's primary use of a commercial driver's license
is for any of the following, then the applicant shall pay a fee of no
more than seventy-five dollars for each classified skill examination or
combination of classified skill examinations whether conducted by the
department or a third-party tester:
(i) Public benefit not-for-profit corporations that are federally
supported head start programs; or
(ii) Public benefit not-for-profit corporations that support early
childhood education and assistance programs as described in RCW
43.215.405(((4))) (2).
(2) The department shall work with the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to develop modified P1 and P2 skill examinations
that also include the skill examination components required to obtain
an "S" endorsement. In no event may a new applicant for an "S"
endorsement be required to take two separate examinations to obtain an
"S" endorsement and either a P1 or P2 endorsement, unless that
applicant is upgrading his or her existing commercial driver's license
to include an "S" endorsement. The combined P1/S or P2/S skill
examination must be offered to the applicant at the same cost as a
regular P1 or P2 skill examination.
(3)(a) The department may waive the skills test and the requirement
for completion of a course of instruction in the operation of a
commercial motor vehicle specified in this section for a commercial
driver's license applicant who meets the requirements of 49 C.F.R. part
383.77.
(b) An applicant who operates a commercial motor vehicle for
agribusiness purposes is exempt from the course of instruction
completion and employer skills and training certification requirements
under this section. By January 1, 2010, the department shall submit
recommendations regarding the continuance of this exemption to the
transportation committees of the legislature. For purposes of this
subsection (3)(b), "agribusiness" means a private carrier who in the
normal course of business primarily transports:
(i) Farm machinery, farm equipment, implements of husbandry, farm
supplies, and materials used in farming;
(ii) Agricultural inputs, such as seed, feed, fertilizer, and crop
protection products;
(iii) Unprocessed agricultural commodities, as defined in RCW
17.21.020, where such commodities are produced by farmers, ranchers,
vineyardists, or orchardists; or
(iv) Any combination of (b)(i) through (iii) of this subsection.
This subsection (3)(b) expires July 1, 2011.
(4) A commercial driver's license or commercial driver's
instruction permit may not be issued to a person while the person is
subject to a disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle,
or while the person's driver's license is suspended, revoked, or
canceled in any state, nor may a commercial driver's license be issued
to a person who has a commercial driver's license issued by any other
state unless the person first surrenders all such licenses, which must
be returned to the issuing state for cancellation.
(5)(a) The department may issue a commercial driver's instruction
permit to an applicant who is at least eighteen years of age and holds
a valid Washington state driver's license and who has submitted a
proper application, passed the general knowledge examination required
for issuance of a commercial driver's license under subsection (1) of
this section, and paid the appropriate fee for the knowledge
examination and an application fee of ((ten)) thirty-five dollars.
(b) A commercial driver's instruction permit may not be issued for
a period to exceed six months. Only one renewal or reissuance may be
granted within a two-year period.
(c) The holder of a commercial driver's instruction permit may
drive a commercial motor vehicle on a highway only when accompanied by
the holder of a commercial driver's license valid for the type of
vehicle driven who occupies a seat beside the individual for the
purpose of giving instruction in driving the commercial motor vehicle.
The holder of a commercial driver's instruction permit is not
authorized to operate a commercial motor vehicle transporting hazardous
materials.
(d) The department shall transmit the fees collected for commercial
driver's instruction permits to the state treasurer.

Sec. 23 RCW 46.25.100 and 2002 c 272 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
When a person has been disqualified from operating a commercial
motor vehicle, the person is not entitled to have the commercial
driver's license restored until after the expiration of the appropriate
disqualification period required under RCW 46.25.090 or until the
department has received a drug and alcohol assessment and evidence is
presented of satisfactory participation in or completion of any
required drug or alcohol treatment program for ending the
disqualification under RCW 46.25.090(7). After expiration of the
appropriate period and upon payment of a requalification fee of
((twenty)) twenty-five dollars, or ((one)) five hundred ((fifty))
dollars if the person has been disqualified under RCW 46.25.090(7), the
person may apply for a new, duplicate, or renewal commercial driver's
license as provided by law. If the person has been disqualified for a
period of one year or more, the person shall demonstrate that he or she
meets the commercial driver's license qualification standards specified
in RCW 46.25.060.

Sec. 24 RCW 46.20.308 and 2008 c 282 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is
deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW
46.61.506, to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood for the
purpose of determining the alcohol concentration or presence of any
drug in his or her breath or blood if arrested for any offense where,
at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has reasonable grounds
to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or was in violation of RCW 46.61.503. Neither
consent nor this section precludes a police officer from obtaining a
search warrant for a person's breath or blood.
(2) The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the
direction of a law enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to
believe the person to have been driving or in actual physical control
of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or the person to have been driving or
in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having alcohol in
a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her system and
being under the age of twenty-one. However, in those instances where
the person is incapable due to physical injury, physical incapacity, or
other physical limitation, of providing a breath sample or where the
person is being treated in a hospital, clinic, doctor's office,
emergency medical vehicle, ambulance, or other similar facility or
where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person is
under the influence of a drug, a blood test shall be administered by a
qualified person as provided in RCW 46.61.506(5). The officer shall
inform the person of his or her right to refuse the breath or blood
test, and of his or her right to have additional tests administered by
any qualified person of his or her choosing as provided in RCW
46.61.506. The officer shall warn the driver, in substantially the
following language, that:
(a) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's license,
permit, or privilege to drive will be revoked or denied for at least
one year; and
(b) If the driver refuses to take the test, the driver's refusal to
take the test may be used in a criminal trial; and
(c) If the driver submits to the test and the test is administered,
the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive will be suspended,
revoked, or denied for at least ninety days if the driver is age
twenty-one or over and the test indicates the alcohol concentration of
the driver's breath or blood is 0.08 or more, or if the driver is under
age twenty-one and the test indicates the alcohol concentration of the
driver's breath or blood is 0.02 or more, or if the driver is under age
twenty-one and the driver is in violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504; and
(d) If the driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive is
suspended, revoked, or denied the driver may be eligible to immediately
apply for an ignition interlock driver's license.
(3) Except as provided in this section, the test administered shall
be of the breath only. If an individual is unconscious or is under
arrest for the crime of vehicular homicide as provided in RCW 46.61.520
or vehicular assault as provided in RCW 46.61.522, or if an individual
is under arrest for the crime of driving while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs as provided in RCW 46.61.502, which arrest
results from an accident in which there has been serious bodily injury
to another person, a breath or blood test may be administered without
the consent of the individual so arrested.
(4) Any person who is dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a
condition rendering him or her incapable of refusal, shall be deemed
not to have withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (1) of this
section and the test or tests may be administered, subject to the
provisions of RCW 46.61.506, and the person shall be deemed to have
received the warnings required under subsection (2) of this section.
(5) If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under
subsection (2) of this section, the person arrested refuses upon the
request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a test or tests of
his or her breath or blood, no test shall be given except as authorized
under subsection (3) or (4) of this section.
(6) If, after arrest and after the other applicable conditions and
requirements of this section have been satisfied, a test or tests of
the person's blood or breath is administered and the test results
indicate that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood
is 0.08 or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or 0.02 or
more if the person is under the age of twenty-one, or the person
refuses to submit to a test, the arresting officer or other law
enforcement officer at whose direction any test has been given, or the
department, where applicable, if the arrest results in a test of the
person's blood, shall:
(a) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of its intention to suspend, revoke, or deny the person's
license, permit, or privilege to drive as required by subsection (7) of
this section;
(b) Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the
department of his or her right to a hearing, specifying the steps he or
she must take to obtain a hearing as provided by subsection (8) of this
section and that the person waives the right to a hearing if he or she
receives an ignition interlock driver's license;
(c) Mark the person's Washington state driver's license or permit
to drive, if any, in a manner authorized by the department;
(d) Serve notice in writing that the marked license or permit, if
any, is a temporary license that is valid for sixty days from the date
of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event notice is
given by the department following a blood test, or until the
suspension, revocation, or denial of the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8)
of this section, whichever occurs first. No temporary license is valid
to any greater degree than the license or permit that it replaces; and
(e) Immediately notify the department of the arrest and transmit to
the department within seventy-two hours, except as delayed as the
result of a blood test, a sworn report or report under a declaration
authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 that states:
(i) That the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested
person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or drugs, or both, or was under the age of twenty-one years and
had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
while having an alcohol concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503;
(ii) That after receipt of the warnings required by subsection (2)
of this section the person refused to submit to a test of his or her
blood or breath, or a test was administered and the results indicated
that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was 0.08
or more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or was 0.02 or more if
the person is under the age of twenty-one; and
(iii) Any other information that the director may require by rule.
(7) The department of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report
or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under
subsection (6)(e) of this section, shall suspend, revoke, or deny the
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive or any nonresident
operating privilege, as provided in RCW 46.20.3101, such suspension,
revocation, or denial to be effective beginning sixty days from the
date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in the event
notice is given by the department following a blood test, or when
sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8) of this section,
whichever occurs first.
(8) A person receiving notification under subsection (6)(b) of this
section may, within twenty days after the notice has been given,
request in writing a formal hearing before the department. The person
shall pay a fee of ((two)) three hundred seventy-five dollars as part
of the request. If the request is mailed, it must be postmarked within
twenty days after receipt of the notification. Upon timely receipt of
such a request for a formal hearing, including receipt of the required
((two)) three hundred seventy-five dollar fee, the department shall
afford the person an opportunity for a hearing. The department may
waive the required ((two)) three hundred seventy-five dollar fee if the
person is an indigent as defined in RCW 10.101.010. Except as
otherwise provided in this section, the hearing is subject to and shall
be scheduled and conducted in accordance with RCW 46.20.329 and
46.20.332. The hearing shall be conducted in the county of the arrest,
except that all or part of the hearing may, at the discretion of the
department, be conducted by telephone or other electronic means. The
hearing shall be held within sixty days following the arrest or
following the date notice has been given in the event notice is given
by the department following a blood test, unless otherwise agreed to by
the department and the person, in which case the action by the
department shall be stayed, and any valid temporary license marked
under subsection (6)(c) of this section extended, if the person is
otherwise eligible for licensing. For the purposes of this section,
the scope of the hearing shall cover the issues of whether a law
enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had
been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle
within this state while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug or had been driving or was in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her
system in a concentration of 0.02 or more if the person was under the
age of twenty-one, whether the person was placed under arrest, and (a)
whether the person refused to submit to the test or tests upon request
of the officer after having been informed that such refusal would
result in the revocation of the person's license, permit, or privilege
to drive, or (b) if a test or tests were administered, whether the
applicable requirements of this section were satisfied before the
administration of the test or tests, whether the person submitted to
the test or tests, or whether a test was administered without express
consent as permitted under this section, and whether the test or tests
indicated that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or
blood was 0.08 or more if the person was age twenty-one or over at the
time of the arrest, or 0.02 or more if the person was under the age of
twenty-one at the time of the arrest. The sworn report or report under
a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 submitted by a law
enforcement officer is prima facie evidence that the officer had
reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in
actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or the
person had been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her system in
a concentration of 0.02 or more and was under the age of twenty-one and
that the officer complied with the requirements of this section.
A hearing officer shall conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas
for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, and
shall administer oaths to witnesses. The hearing officer shall not
issue a subpoena for the attendance of a witness at the request of the
person unless the request is accompanied by the fee required by RCW
5.56.010 for a witness in district court. The sworn report or report
under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 of the law enforcement
officer and any other evidence accompanying the report shall be
admissible without further evidentiary foundation and the
certifications authorized by the criminal rules for courts of limited
jurisdiction shall be admissible without further evidentiary
foundation. The person may be represented by counsel, may question
witnesses, may present evidence, and may testify. The department shall
order that the suspension, revocation, or denial either be rescinded or
sustained.
(9) If the suspension, revocation, or denial is sustained after
such a hearing, the person whose license, privilege, or permit is
suspended, revoked, or denied has the right to file a petition in the
superior court of the county of arrest to review the final order of
revocation by the department in the same manner as an appeal from a
decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal must be
filed within thirty days after the date the final order is served or
the right to appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ
1.1, or other statutes or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal
shall be limited to a review of the record of the administrative
hearing. The appellant must pay the costs associated with obtaining
the record of the hearing before the hearing officer. The filing of
the appeal does not stay the effective date of the suspension,
revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection must
include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting
petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the
department's final order of suspension, revocation, or denial as
expeditiously as possible. The review must be limited to a
determination of whether the department has committed any errors of
law. The superior court shall accept those factual determinations
supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were
expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be
inferred from the final order of the department. The superior court
may reverse, affirm, or modify the decision of the department or remand
the case back to the department for further proceedings. The decision
of the superior court must be in writing and filed in the clerk's
office with the other papers in the case. The court shall state the
reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a stay or
other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall
not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is
likely to prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant
will suffer irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension,
revocation, or denial it may impose conditions on such stay.
(10)(a) If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to
drive has been or will be suspended, revoked, or denied under
subsection (7) of this section, other than as a result of a breath or
blood test refusal, and who has not committed an offense for which he
or she was granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW,
petitions a court for a deferred prosecution on criminal charges
arising out of the arrest for which action has been or will be taken
under subsection (7) of this section, or notifies the department of
licensing of the intent to seek such a deferred prosecution, then the
license suspension or revocation shall be stayed pending entry of the
deferred prosecution. The stay shall not be longer than one hundred
fifty days after the date charges are filed, or two years after the
date of the arrest, whichever time period is shorter. If the court
stays the suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose conditions
on such stay. If the person is otherwise eligible for licensing, the
department shall issue a temporary license, or extend any valid
temporary license marked under subsection (6) of this section, for the
period of the stay. If a deferred prosecution treatment plan is not
recommended in the report made under RCW 10.05.050, or if treatment is
rejected by the court, or if the person declines to accept an offered
treatment plan, or if the person violates any condition imposed by the
court, then the court shall immediately direct the department to cancel
the stay and any temporary marked license or extension of a temporary
license issued under this subsection.
(b) A suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section,
other than as a result of a breath or blood test refusal, shall be
stayed if the person is accepted for deferred prosecution as provided
in chapter 10.05 RCW for the incident upon which the suspension,
revocation, or denial is based. If the deferred prosecution is
terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or
denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is completed, the stay
shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial canceled.
(c) The provisions of (b) of this subsection relating to a stay of
a suspension, revocation, or denial and the cancellation of any
suspension, revocation, or denial do not apply to the suspension,
revocation, denial, or disqualification of a person's commercial
driver's license or privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle.
(11) When it has been finally determined under the procedures of
this section that a nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle
in this state has been suspended, revoked, or denied, the department
shall give information in writing of the action taken to the motor
vehicle administrator of the state of the person's residence and of any
state in which he or she has a license.

Sec. 25 RCW 46.20.380 and 2008 c 282 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
No person may file an application for an occupational driver's
license, a temporary restricted driver's license, or an ignition
interlock driver's license as provided in RCW 46.20.391 and 46.20.385
unless he or she first pays to the director or other person authorized
to accept applications and fees for driver's licenses a fee of one
hundred ten dollars. The applicant shall receive upon payment an
official receipt for the payment of such fee. All such fees shall be
forwarded to the director who shall transmit such fees to the state
treasurer in the same manner as other driver's license fees.

III. VEHICLE FEES
Sec. 26 RCW 46.17.230 and 2010 c 161 s 519 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before accepting an application for a replacement license tab, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall charge a one dollar and twenty-five cent fee for each
pair of tabs or windshield emblem. The license tab or windshield
emblem replacement fee must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund
created in RCW 46.68.070.

Sec. 27 RCW 46.17.310 and 2010 c 161 s 523 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before accepting an application for a change of class as required
under RCW 46.16A.200(6), the department, county auditor or other agent,
or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant to
pay a one dollar and twenty-five cent fee. The ((one dollar)) change
of class fee must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW
46.68.070.

Sec. 28 RCW 46.17.315 and 2010 c 161 s 524 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before accepting an application for a motor vehicle base plated
in the state of Washington that is subject to highway inspections and
compliance reviews under RCW 46.32.080 or the international
registration plan if base plated in a foreign jurisdiction, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall require the applicant to pay a ((sixteen)) twenty-five
dollar commercial vehicle safety enforcement fee in addition to any
other fees and taxes required by law. The ((sixteen)) twenty-five
dollar fee:
(a) Must be apportioned for those vehicles operating interstate and
registered under the international registration plan;
(b) Does not apply to trailers; and
(c) Is not refundable when the motor vehicle is no longer subject
to RCW 46.32.080.
(2) The department may deduct an amount equal to the cost of
administering the program. All remaining fees must be deposited with
the state treasurer and credited to the state patrol highway account of
the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.

Sec. 29 RCW 46.17.400 and 2010 c 161 s 535 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Before accepting an application for one of the following
permits, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall require the applicant to pay the
following permit fee by permit type in addition to any other fee or tax
required by law:

PERMIT TYPE FEE AUTHORITY DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary $15.00 RCW 46.16A.300 RCW 46.68.030

(b) Department temporary $.50 RCW 46.16A.305 RCW 46.68.450

(c) Farm vehicle trip $6.25 RCW 46.16A.330 RCW 46.68.035

(d) Nonresident military $10.00 RCW 46.16A.340 RCW 46.68.070

(e) Nonresident temporary snowmobile $5.00 RCW 46.10.450 RCW 46.68.350

(f) Special fuel trip $((25.00))
30.00 RCW 82.38.100 RCW 46.68.460

(g) Temporary ORV use $7.00 RCW 46.09.430 RCW 46.68.045

(h) Vehicle trip $((25.00))
40.00 RCW 46.16A.320 RCW 46.68.455

(2) Permit fees as provided in subsection (1) of this section are
in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005, except an
additional filing fee may not be charged for:
(a) Dealer temporary permits;
(b) Special fuel trip permits; and
(c) Vehicle trip permits.
(3) Five dollars of the fifteen dollar dealer temporary permit fee
provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section must be credited to the
payment of vehicle license fees at the time application for
registration is made. The remainder must be deposited to the state
patrol highway account created in RCW 46.68.030.
(((4) A surcharge of five dollars must be collected when issuing a
special fuel trip permit or vehicle trip permit as provided in
subsection (1) of this section and must be distributed as follows:
(a) Under RCW 46.68.460 for special fuel trip permits; and
(b) Under RCW 46.68.455 for vehicle trip permits.))

Sec. 30 RCW 46.17.400 and 2011 c ... (ESB 5061) s 62 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Before accepting an application for one of the following
permits, the department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall require the applicant to pay the
following permit fee by permit type in addition to any other fee or tax
required by law:

PERMIT TYPE FEE AUTHORITY DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary $15.00 RCW 46.16A.300 RCW 46.68.030

(b) Department temporary $.50 RCW 46.16A.305 RCW 46.68.450

(c) Farm vehicle trip $6.25 RCW 46.16A.330 RCW 46.68.035

(d) Nonresident military $10.00 RCW 46.16A.340 RCW 46.68.070

(e) Nonresident temporary snowmobile $5.00 RCW 46.10.450 RCW 46.68.350

(f) Special fuel trip $30.00 RCW 82.38.100 RCW 46.68.460

(g) Temporary ORV use $7.00 RCW 46.09.430 RCW 46.68.045

(h) Vehicle trip $((25.00))
40.00 RCW 46.16A.320 RCW 46.68.455

(2) Permit fees as provided in subsection (1) of this section are
in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 46.17.005, except an
additional filing fee may not be charged for:
(a) Dealer temporary permits;
(b) Special fuel trip permits; and
(c) Vehicle trip permits.
(3) Five dollars of the fifteen dollar dealer temporary permit fee
provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section must be credited to the
payment of vehicle license fees at the time application for
registration is made. The remainder must be deposited to the state
patrol highway account created in RCW 46.68.030.

Sec. 31 RCW 46.68.455 and 2010 c 161 s 815 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The vehicle trip permit fee imposed under RCW 46.17.400(1)(h)
must be distributed as follows:
(a) ((Five)) Twelve dollars to the state patrol highway account for
commercial motor vehicle inspections;
(b) A one dollar excise tax to the state general fund;
(c) The amount of the filing fee imposed under RCW 46.17.005(1)(a)
to be credited as required under RCW 46.68.400; and
(d) The remainder to the credit of the motor vehicle fund created
in RCW 46.68.070 as an administrative fee.
(2) The administrative fee under subsection (1)(d) of this section
must be increased or decreased in an equal amount if the amount of the
filing fee imposed under RCW 46.17.005(1)(a) increases or decreases, so
that the total trip permit fee is adjusted equally to compensate.
(3) The vehicle trip permit surcharge imposed under RCW
46.17.400(4) must be distributed as follows:
(a) The portion of the surcharge paid by motor carriers to the
motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070 for the purpose of
supporting vehicle weigh stations, weigh-in-motion programs, and the
commercial vehicle information systems and networks program; and
(b) The remainder to the motor vehicle fund created in RCW
46.68.070 for the purpose of supporting congestion relief programs.

Sec. 32 RCW 46.17.005 and 2010 c 161 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who applies for a vehicle registration or for any
other right to operate a vehicle on the highways of this state shall
pay a ((three)) seven dollar filing fee in addition to any other fees
and taxes required by law.
(2) A person who applies for a certificate of title shall pay a
((four)) eight dollar filing fee in addition to any other fees and
taxes required by law.
(3) The filing fees established in this section must be distributed
under RCW 46.68.400.

Sec. 33 RCW 46.17.100 and 2010 c 161 s 508 are each amended to
read as follows:
Before accepting an application for a certificate of title as
required in this title, the department, county auditor or other agent,
or subagent appointed by the director shall require the applicant to
pay a ((five)) twelve dollars and fifty cents application fee in
addition to any other fees and taxes required by law. The certificate
of title application fee must be distributed under RCW 46.68.020.

Sec. 34 RCW 46.17.140 and 2010 c 161 s 512 are each amended to
read as follows:
The penalty for a late transfer under RCW 46.12.650(7) is ((twenty-five)) fifty dollars assessed on the sixteenth day after the date of
delivery and two dollars for each additional day thereafter, but the
total penalty must not exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars. The
penalty must be distributed under RCW 46.68.020.

Sec. 35 RCW 46.17.200 and 2010 c 161 s 518 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to all other fees and taxes required by law, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall charge:
(a) The following license plate fees for each license plate, unless
the owner or type of vehicle is exempt from payment:

FEE TYPE FEE DISTRIBUTION

Original issue $ 10.00 RCW 46.68.070

Reflectivity $ 2.00 RCW 46.68.070

Replacement $ 10.00 RCW 46.68.070

Original issue,
motorcycle $ 3.75 RCW 46.68.070

Replacement,
motorcycle $ ((2.00))
$3.75 RCW 46.68.070

Original issue,
moped $ 2.50 RCW 46.68.070

(b) A license plate retention fee, as required under RCW
46.16A.200(10)(a)(iii), of twenty dollars if the owner wishes to retain
the current license plate number upon license plate replacement, unless
the owner or type of vehicle is exempt from payment. The twenty dollar
fee must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created
in RCW 47.66.070.
(c) A ten dollar license plate transfer fee, as required under RCW
46.16A.200(8)(a), when transferring standard issue license plates from
one vehicle to another, unless the owner or type of vehicle is exempt
from payment. The ten dollar license plate transfer fee must be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.
(d) Former prisoner of war license plates, as described in RCW
46.18.235, may be transferred to a replacement vehicle upon payment of
a five dollar license plate fee, in addition to any other fee required
by law.
(2) The department may, upon request, provide license plates that
have been used and returned to the department to individuals for
nonvehicular use. The department may charge a fee of up to five
dollars per license plate to cover costs or recovery for postage and
handling. The department may waive the fee for license plates used in
educational projects and may, by rule, provide standards for the fee
waiver and restrictions on the number of license plates provided to any
one person. The fee must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund
created in RCW 46.68.070.

Sec. 36 RCW 46.17.200 and 2011 c ... (ESB 5061) s 56 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to all other fees and taxes required by law, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall charge:
(a) The following license plate fees for each license plate, unless
the owner or type of vehicle is exempt from payment:

FEE TYPE FEE DISTRIBUTION

Original issue $10.00 RCW 46.68.070

Reflectivity $2.00 RCW 46.68.070

Replacement $10.00 RCW 46.68.070

Original issue,
motorcycle $3.75 RCW 46.68.070

Replacement,
motorcycle $((2.00))
3.75 RCW 46.68.070

Original issue, moped $((1.50))
$2.50 RCW 46.68.070

(b) A license plate retention fee, as required under RCW
46.16A.200(10)(c), of twenty dollars if the owner wishes to retain the
current license plate number upon license plate replacement, unless the
owner or type of vehicle is exempt from payment. The twenty dollar fee
must be deposited in the multimodal transportation account created in
RCW 47.66.070.
(c) A ten dollar license plate transfer fee, as required under RCW
46.16A.200(8)(a), when transferring standard issue license plates from
one vehicle to another, unless the owner or type of vehicle is exempt
from payment. The ten dollar license plate transfer fee must be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.
(d) Former prisoner of war license plates, as described in RCW
46.18.235, may be transferred to a replacement vehicle upon payment of
a five dollar license plate fee, in addition to any other fee required
by law.
(2) The department may, upon request, provide license plates that
have been used and returned to the department to individuals for
nonvehicular use. The department may charge a fee of up to five
dollars per license plate to cover costs or recovery for postage and
handling. The department may waive the fee for license plates used in
educational projects and may, by rule, provide standards for the fee
waiver and restrictions on the number of license plates provided to any
one person. The fee must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund
created in RCW 46.68.070.

IV. MISCELLANEOUS FEES
Sec. 37 RCW 46.87.090 and 1994 c 262 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To replace an apportioned vehicle license plate(s), cab card,
or validation tab(s) due to loss, defacement, or destruction, the
registrant shall apply to the department on forms furnished for that
purpose. The application, together with proper payment and other
documentation as indicated, shall be filed with the department as
follows:
(a) Apportioned plate(s) - a fee of ((ten)) thirteen dollars shall
be charged for vehicles required to display two apportioned plates or
five dollars for vehicles required to display one apportioned plate.
The cab card of the vehicle for which a plate is requested shall
accompany the application. The department shall issue a new
apportioned plate(s) with validation tab(s) and a new cab card upon
acceptance of the completed application form, old cab card, and the
required replacement fee.
(b) Cab card - a fee of two dollars shall be charged for each card.
If this is a duplicate cab card, it will be noted thereon.
(c) Validation year tab(s) - a fee of two dollars shall be charged
for each vehicle.
(2) All fees collected under this section shall be deposited to the
motor vehicle fund.

Sec. 38 RCW 46.87.130 and 2005 c 194 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
In addition to all other fees prescribed for the proportional
registration of vehicles under this chapter, the department shall
collect a vehicle transaction fee of eight dollars each time a vehicle
is added to a Washington-based fleet, and each time the proportional
registration of a Washington-based vehicle is renewed. ((The exact
amount of the vehicle transaction fee shall be fixed by rule but shall
not exceed ten dollars.)) This fee shall be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund.

Sec. 39 RCW 46.52.130 and 2010 c 253 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Upon a proper request, the department may furnish an abstract of a
person's driving record as permitted under this section.
(1) Contents of abstract of driving record. An abstract of a
person's driving record, whenever possible, must include:
(a) An enumeration of motor vehicle accidents in which the person
was driving, including:
(i) The total number of vehicles involved;
(ii) Whether the vehicles were legally parked or moving;
(iii) Whether the vehicles were occupied at the time of the
accident; and
(iv) Whether the accident resulted in a fatality;
(b) Any reported convictions, forfeitures of bail, or findings that
an infraction was committed based upon a violation of any motor vehicle
law;
(c) The status of the person's driving privilege in this state; and
(d) Any reports of failure to appear in response to a traffic
citation or failure to respond to a notice of infraction served upon
the named individual by an arresting officer.
(2) Release of abstract of driving record. An abstract of a
person's driving record may be furnished to the following persons or
entities:
(a) Named individuals. (i) An abstract of the full driving record
maintained by the department may be furnished to the individual named
in the abstract.
(ii) Nothing in this section prevents a court from providing a copy
of the driver's abstract to the individual named in the abstract,
provided that the named individual has a pending or open infraction or
criminal case in that court. A pending case includes criminal cases
that have not reached a disposition by plea, stipulation, trial, or
amended charge. An open infraction or criminal case includes cases on
probation, payment agreement or subject to, or in collections. Courts
may charge a reasonable fee for the production and copying of the
abstract for the individual.
(b) Employers or prospective employers. (i) An abstract of the
full driving record maintained by the department may be furnished to an
employer or prospective employer or an agent acting on behalf of an
employer or prospective employer of the named individual for purposes
related to driving by the individual as a condition of employment or
otherwise at the direction of the employer.
(ii) Release of an abstract of the driving record of an employee or
prospective employee requires a statement signed by: (A) The employee
or prospective employee that authorizes the release of the record; and
(B) the employer attesting that the information is necessary for
employment purposes related to driving by the individual as a condition
of employment or otherwise at the direction of the employer. If the
employer or prospective employer authorizes an agent to obtain this
information on their behalf, this must be noted in the statement.
(iii) Upon request of the person named in the abstract provided
under this subsection, and upon that same person furnishing copies of
court records ruling that the person was not at fault in a motor
vehicle accident, the department must indicate on any abstract provided
under this subsection that the person was not at fault in the motor
vehicle accident.
(c) Volunteer organizations. (i) An abstract of the full driving
record maintained by the department may be furnished to a volunteer
organization or an agent for a volunteer organization for which the
named individual has submitted an application for a position that would
require driving by the individual at the direction of the volunteer
organization.
(ii) Release of an abstract of the driving record of a prospective
volunteer requires a statement signed by: (A) The prospective
volunteer that authorizes the release of the record; and (B) the
volunteer organization attesting that the information is necessary for
purposes related to driving by the individual at the direction of the
volunteer organization. If the volunteer organization authorizes an
agent to obtain this information on their behalf, this must be noted in
the statement.
(d) Transit authorities. An abstract of the full driving record
maintained by the department may be furnished to an employee or agent
of a transit authority checking prospective volunteer vanpool drivers
for insurance and risk management needs.
(e) Insurance carriers. (i) An abstract of the driving record
maintained by the department covering the period of not more than the
last three years may be furnished to an insurance company or its agent:
(A) That has motor vehicle or life insurance in effect covering the
named individual;
(B) To which the named individual has applied; or
(C) That has insurance in effect covering the employer or a
prospective employer of the named individual.
(ii) The abstract provided to the insurance company must:
(A) Not contain any information related to actions committed by law
enforcement officers or firefighters, as both terms are defined in RCW
41.26.030, or by Washington state patrol officers, while driving
official vehicles in the performance of their occupational duty. This
does not apply to any situation where the vehicle was used in the
commission of a misdemeanor or felony;
(B) Include convictions under RCW 46.61.5249 and 46.61.525, except
that the abstract must report the convictions only as negligent driving
without reference to whether they are for first or second degree
negligent driving; and
(C) Exclude any deferred prosecution under RCW 10.05.060, except
that if a person is removed from a deferred prosecution under RCW
10.05.090, the abstract must show the deferred prosecution as well as
the removal.
(iii) Any policy of insurance may not be canceled, nonrenewed,
denied, or have the rate increased on the basis of information
regarding an accident included in the abstract of a driving record,
unless the policyholder was determined to be at fault.
(iv) Any insurance company or its agent, for underwriting purposes
relating to the operation of commercial motor vehicles, may not use any
information contained in the abstract relative to any person's
operation of motor vehicles while not engaged in such employment. Any
insurance company or its agent, for underwriting purposes relating to
the operation of noncommercial motor vehicles, may not use any
information contained in the abstract relative to any person's
operation of commercial motor vehicles.
(v) The director may enter into a contractual agreement with an
insurance company or its agent for the limited purpose of reviewing the
driving records of existing policyholders for changes to the record
during specified periods of time. The department shall establish a fee
for this service, which must be deposited in the highway safety fund.
The fee for this service must be set at a level that will not result in
a net revenue loss to the state. Any information provided under this
subsection must be treated in the same manner and is subject to the
same restrictions as driving record abstracts.
(f) Alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies. An abstract of
the driving record maintained by the department covering the period of
not more than the last five years may be furnished to an alcohol/drug
assessment or treatment agency approved by the department of social and
health services to which the named individual has applied or been
assigned for evaluation or treatment, for purposes of assisting
employees in making a determination as to what level of treatment, if
any, is appropriate, except that the abstract must:
(i) Also include records of alcohol-related offenses, as defined in
RCW 46.01.260(2), covering a period of not more than the last ten
years; and
(ii) Indicate whether an alcohol-related offense was originally
charged as a violation of either RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504.
(g) City attorneys and county prosecuting attorneys. An abstract
of the full driving record maintained by the department, including
whether a recorded violation is an alcohol-related offense, as defined
in RCW 46.01.260(2), that was originally charged as a violation of
either RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, may be furnished to city attorneys
or county prosecuting attorneys. City attorneys and county prosecuting
attorneys may provide the driving record to alcohol/drug assessment or
treatment agencies approved by the department of social and health
services to which the named individual has applied or been assigned for
evaluation or treatment.
(h) State colleges, universities, or agencies, or units of local
government. An abstract of the full driving record maintained by the
department may be furnished to (i) state colleges, universities, or
agencies for employment and risk management purposes or (ii) units of
local government authorized to self-insure under RCW 48.62.031 for
employment and risk management purposes.
(i) Superintendent of public instruction. An abstract of the full
driving record maintained by the department may be furnished to the
superintendent of public instruction for review of public school bus
driver records. The superintendent or superintendent's designee may
discuss information on the driving record with an authorized
representative of the employing school district for employment and risk
management purposes.
(3) Release to third parties prohibited. Any person or entity
receiving an abstract of a person's driving record under subsection
(2)(b) through (i) of this section shall use the abstract exclusively
for his, her, or its own purposes or as otherwise expressly permitted
under this section, and shall not divulge any information contained in
the abstract to a third party.
(4) Fee. The director shall collect a ((ten-dollar)) twelve dollar
fee for each abstract of a person's driving record furnished by the
department. Fifty percent of the fee must be deposited in the highway
safety fund, and fifty percent of the fee must be deposited according
to RCW 46.68.038.
(5) Violation. (a) Any negligent violation of this section is a
gross misdemeanor.
(b) Any intentional violation of this section is a class C felony.

Sec. 40 RCW 46.20.293 and 2007 c 424 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department is authorized to provide juvenile courts with the
department's record of traffic charges compiled under RCW 46.52.101 and
13.50.200, against any minor upon the request of any state juvenile
court or duly authorized officer of any juvenile court of this state.
Further, the department is authorized to provide any juvenile court
with any requested service which the department can reasonably perform
which is not inconsistent with its legal authority which substantially
aids juvenile courts in handling traffic cases and which promotes
highway safety.
The department is authorized to furnish to the parent, parents, or
guardian of any person under eighteen years of age who is not
emancipated from such parent, parents, or guardian, the department
records of traffic charges compiled against the person and shall
collect for the copy a fee of ((ten)) twelve dollars, fifty percent of
which must be deposited in the highway safety fund and fifty percent of
which must be deposited according to RCW 46.68.038.

Sec. 41 RCW 46.82.310 and 2009 c 101 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall engage in the business of conducting a driver
training school without a license issued by the director for that
purpose. The school's license must be displayed before the school may:
(a) Schedule, enroll, or engage any students in a course of
instruction;
(b) Issue a verification of enrollment to any student; or
(c) Begin any classroom or behind-the-wheel instruction.
(2) An application for a driver training school license shall be
filed with the director, containing such information as prescribed by
the director, including a uniform business identifier number,
accompanied by an application fee ((as set by rule of the department))
of seven hundred fifty dollars, which shall in no event be refunded.
Before an application for a driver training school license is approved,
the business practices, facilities, records, vehicles, and insurance of
the proposed school must be inspected and reviewed by authorized
representatives of the director. If an application is approved by the
director, the applicant shall be granted a license valid for a period
of one year from the date of issuance.
(3) A driver training school may apply for a license to establish
a branch office or branch classroom by filing an application with the
director, containing such information as prescribed by the director,
accompanied by an application fee ((as set by rule of the department))
of five hundred dollars, which shall in no event be refunded. Before
an application for a license to establish a branch office or branch
classroom is approved, the business practices, facilities, records,
vehicles, and insurance of the proposed branch location must be
inspected and reviewed by authorized representatives of the director.
If an application is approved by the director, the applicant shall be
granted a license valid for a period of one year from the date of
issuance.
(4) The annual fee for renewal of a driver training school ((or
branch location)) license ((shall be set by rule of the department)) is
five hundred dollars. The annual fee for renewal of a driver training
school branch location license is three hundred seventy-five dollars.
Subject to the department's inspection of the business, the director
shall issue a license certificate to each licensee which shall be
conspicuously displayed in the place of business of the licensee. If
the director has not received a renewal application postmarked on or
before the date a license expires the license will be marked late. If
the renewal application and fee are not received within thirty days
after expiration of the license, the license will be void requiring a
new application as provided for in this chapter, including payment of
all fees. Instruction may not be given beyond the thirty days from the
expiration of the license.
(5) The person to whom a driver training school license has been
issued must notify the director in writing within ten business days
after any change is made in the officers, directors, or location of the
place of business of the school.
(6) Except as otherwise permitted by rule of the department, a
change involving the ownership of a driver training school requires a
new license application, including payment of all fees.
(a) The owner relinquishing the business must notify the director
in writing within ten business days.
(b) The new owner must submit an application and fee ((as
prescribed by rule of the department)) of seven hundred fifty dollars
for transfer of the school's license to the director within ten
business days.
(c) Upon receipt of the required notification and the application
and fees for license transfer, the director shall permit continuance of
the business for a period not to exceed sixty days from the date of
transfer pending approval of the new application for a school license.
(d) The transferred license shall remain subject to suspension,
revocation, or denial in accordance with RCW 46.82.350 and 46.82.360.
(7) Evidence of liability insurance coverage for the instruction
vehicles and the building premises of the driver training school must
be filed with the director prior to the issuance or renewal of a school
license, and shall meet the following standards:
(a) Coverage must be provided by a company authorized to do
business in Washington state;
(b) Automobile liability coverage shall be in the amount of not
less than one million dollars, and shall include property damage and
uninsured motorists coverage;
(c) The required coverage shall be maintained in full force and
effect for the term of the school license;
(d) Changes in insurance coverage due to cancellation or expiration
require notification of the director and proof of continuing coverage
within ten working days following any change; and
(e) Coverage shall be issued in the name of the school and identify
the covered locations and vehicles.

Sec. 42 RCW 46.82.320 and 2009 c 101 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person affiliated with a driver training school shall give
instruction in the operation of an automobile for a fee without a
license issued by the director for that purpose. An application for an
original or renewal instructor's license shall be filed with the
director, containing such information as prescribed by this chapter and
by the director, accompanied by an application fee ((set by rule of the
department)) of three hundred twenty-five dollars for an original
license and three hundred dollars for a renewal license, which shall in
no event be refunded. An application for a renewal instructor's
license must be accompanied by proof of the applicant's continuing
professional development that meets the standards adopted by the
director. If the applicant satisfactorily meets the application
requirements and the examination requirements as prescribed in RCW
46.82.330, the applicant shall be granted a license valid for a period
of two years from the date of issuance.
(2) The director shall issue a license certificate to each
qualified applicant.
(a) An employing driver training school must conspicuously display
an instructor's license at its established place of business and
display copies of the instructor's license at any branch office where
the instructor provides instruction.
(b) Unless revoked, canceled, or denied by the director, the
license shall remain the property of the licensee in the event of
termination of employment or employment by another driver training
school.
(c) If the director has not received a renewal application on or
before the date a license expires, the license will be voided requiring
a new application as provided for in this chapter, including
examination and payment of all fees.
(d) If revoked, canceled, or denied by the director, the license
must be surrendered to the department within ten days following the
effective date of such action.
(3) Each licensee shall be provided with a wallet-size
identification card by the director at the time the license is issued
which shall be in the instructor's immediate possession at all times
while engaged in instructing.
(4) The person to whom an instructor's license has been issued
shall notify the director in writing within ten days of any change of
employment or termination of employment, providing the name and address
of the new driver training school by whom the instructor will be
employed.

Sec. 43 RCW 46.82.330 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 21 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The application for an instructor's license shall document the
applicant's fitness, knowledge, skills, and abilities to teach the
classroom and behind-the-wheel phases of a driver training education
program in a commercial driver training school.
(2) An applicant shall be eligible to apply for an original
instructor's certificate if the applicant possesses and meets the
following qualifications and conditions:
(a) Has been licensed to drive for five or more years and possesses
a current and valid Washington driver's license or is a resident of a
jurisdiction immediately adjacent to Washington state and possesses a
current and valid license issued by such jurisdiction, and does not
have on his or her driving record any of the violations or penalties
set forth in (a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection. The director
shall have the right to examine the driving record of the applicant
from the department of licensing and from other jurisdictions and from
these records determine if the applicant has had:
(i) Not more than one moving traffic violation within the preceding
twelve months or more than two moving traffic violations in the
preceding twenty-four months;
(ii) No drug or alcohol-related traffic violation or incident
within the preceding three years. If there are two or more drug or
alcohol-related traffic violations in the applicant's driving history,
the applicant is no longer eligible to be a driving instructor; and
(iii) No driver's license suspension, cancellation, revocation, or
denial within the preceding two years, or no more than two of these
occurrences in the preceding five years;
(b) Is a high school graduate or the equivalent and at least
twenty-one years of age;
(c) Has completed an acceptable application on a form prescribed by
the director;
(d) Has satisfactorily completed a course of instruction in the
training of drivers acceptable to the director that is no less than
sixty hours in length and includes instruction in classroom and behind-the-wheel teaching methods and supervised practice behind-the-wheel
teaching of driving techniques; and
(e) Has paid an examination fee ((as set by rule of the
department)) of thirty-five dollars and has successfully completed an
instructor's examination.

Sec. 44 RCW 46.82.340 and 2006 c 219 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
In case of the loss, mutilation, or destruction of a driver
training school license certificate or an instructor's license
certificate, the director shall issue a duplicate thereof upon proof of
the facts and payment of a fee ((as set by rule of the department)) of
twenty-five dollars.

Sec. 45 RCW 46.01.230 and 2010 c 161 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department may accept checks and money orders for the
payment of drivers' licenses, certificates of title and vehicle
registrations, vehicle excise taxes, gross weight fees, and other fees
and taxes collected by the department. Whenever registrations,
licenses, or permits have been paid for by checks or money orders that
have been dishonored by nonacceptance or nonpayment, the department
shall:
(a) Cancel the registration, license, or permit;
(b) Send a notice of cancellation by first-class mail using the
last known address in department records for the holder of the
certificate, license, or permit, and complete an affidavit of first-class mail; and
(c) Assess a handling fee((, set by rule)) of thirty-five dollars.
(2) It is a traffic infraction to fail to surrender a certificate
of title, registration certificate, or permit to the department or to
an authorized agent within ten days of being notified that the
certificate, registration, or permit has been canceled.
(3) County auditors, agents, and subagents appointed by the
director may collect restitution for dishonored checks and money orders
and keep the handling fee.
(4) A person who has recently acquired a vehicle by purchase,
exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal action is not liable or
responsible for the payment of uncollected fees and taxes that were
paid for by a predecessor's check or money order that was subsequently
dishonored. The department may not deny an application to transfer
ownership for the uncollected amount.
(5) The director may adopt rules to implement this section. The
rules must provide for the public's convenience consistent with sound
business practice and encourage annual renewal of vehicle registrations
by mail, authorizing checks and money orders for payment.

Sec. 46 RCW 46.70.061 and 2002 c 352 s 23 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The annual fees for original licenses issued for twelve
consecutive months from the date of issuance under this chapter shall
be:
(a) Vehicle dealers, principal place of business for each and every
license classification: One thousand seven hundred fifty dollars;
(b) Vehicle dealers, each subagency, and temporary subagency: One
hundred twenty-five dollars;
(c) Vehicle manufacturers: ((Five)) Seven hundred fifty dollars.
(2) The annual fee for renewal of any license issued pursuant to
this chapter shall be:
(a) Vehicle dealers, principal place of business for each and every
license classification: ((Two)) Nine hundred ((fifty)) dollars;
(b) Vehicle dealer, each and every subagency: ((Twenty-five)) One
hundred dollars;
(c) Vehicle manufacturers: ((Two)) Five hundred ((fifty)) dollars.
If any licensee fails or neglects to apply for such renewal within
thirty days after the expiration of the license, or assigned renewal
date under a staggered licensing system, the license shall be declared
canceled by the director, in which case the licensee will be required
to apply for an original license and pay the fee required for the
original license.
(3) The fee for the transfer to another location of any license
classification issued pursuant to this chapter shall be twenty-five
dollars.
(4) The fee for vehicle dealer license plates and manufacturer
license plates ((shall be the amount required by law for vehicle
license plates exclusive of excise tax and gross weight and tonnage
fees)) is:
(a) For original issue license plates, one hundred dollars;
(b) For replacement license plates, one hundred dollars; and
(c) For renewal license plates, one hundred dollars.
(5) All fees collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the
state treasury and credited to the motor vehicle fund.
(6) The fees prescribed in this section are in addition to any
excise taxes imposed by chapter 82.44 RCW.

Sec. 47 RCW 46.55.030 and 2010 c 8 s 9061 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Application for licensing as a registered tow truck operator
shall be made on forms furnished by the department, shall be
accompanied by an inspection certification from the Washington state
patrol, shall be signed by the applicant or an agent, and shall include
the following information:
(a) The name and address of the person, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation under whose name the business is to be
conducted;
(b) The names and addresses of all persons having an interest in
the business, or if the owner is a corporation, the names and addresses
of the officers of the corporation;
(c) The names and addresses of all employees who serve as tow truck
drivers;
(d) Proof of minimum insurance required by subsection (3) of this
section;
(e) The vehicle license and vehicle identification numbers of all
tow trucks of which the applicant is the registered owner;
(f) Any other information the department may require; and
(g) A certificate of approval from the Washington state patrol
certifying that:
(i) The applicant has an established place of business and that
mail is received at the address shown on the application;
(ii) The address of any storage locations where vehicles may be
stored is correctly stated on the application;
(iii) The place of business has an office area that is accessible
to the public without entering the storage area; and
(iv) The place of business has adequate and secure storage
facilities, as defined in this chapter and the rules of the department,
where vehicles and their contents can be properly stored and protected.
(2) Before issuing a registration certificate to an applicant the
department shall require the applicant to file with the department a
surety bond in the amount of five thousand dollars running to the state
and executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this
state. The bond shall be approved as to form by the attorney general
and conditioned that the operator shall conduct his or her business in
conformity with the provisions of this chapter pertaining to abandoned
or unauthorized vehicles, and to compensate any person, company, or the
state for failure to comply with this chapter or the rules adopted
hereunder, or for fraud, negligence, or misrepresentation in the
handling of these vehicles. Any person injured by the tow truck
operator's failure to fully perform duties imposed by this chapter and
the rules adopted hereunder, or an ordinance or resolution adopted by
a city, town, or county is entitled to recover actual damages,
including reasonable attorney's fees against the surety and the tow
truck operator. Successive recoveries against the bond shall be
permitted, but the aggregate liability of the surety to all persons
shall not exceed the amount of the bond. As a condition of authority
to do business, the operator shall keep the bond in full force and
effect. Failure to maintain the penalty value of the bond or
cancellation of the bond by the surety automatically cancels the
operator's registration.
(3) Before the department may issue a registration certificate to
an applicant, the applicant shall provide proof of minimum insurance
requirements of:
(a) One hundred thousand dollars for liability for bodily injury or
property damage per occurrence; and
(b) Fifty thousand dollars of legal liability per occurrence, to
protect against vehicle damage, including but not limited to fire and
theft, from the time a vehicle comes into the custody of an operator
until it is redeemed or sold.
Cancellation of or failure to maintain the insurance required by
(a) and (b) of this subsection automatically cancels the operator's
registration.
(4) The fee for each original registration is four hundred fifty
dollars, and for each annual registration renewal is ((one)) four
hundred twenty-five dollars, per company, plus fifty dollars per truck.
The department shall forward the registration fee to the state
treasurer for deposit in the motor vehicle fund.
(5) The applicant must submit an inspection certificate from the
state patrol before the department may issue or renew an operator's
registration certificate or tow truck permits.
(6) Upon approval of the application, the department shall issue a
registration certificate to the registered operator to be displayed
prominently at the operator's place of business.

Sec. 48 RCW 46.80.040 and 1995 c 256 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The application, together with a fee of ((twenty-five)) one hundred
dollars, and a surety bond as provided in RCW 46.80.070, shall be
forwarded to the department. Upon receipt of the application the
department shall, if the application is in order, issue a vehicle
wrecker's license authorizing the wrecker to do business as such and
forward the fee to the state treasurer, to be deposited in the motor
vehicle fund. Upon receiving the certificate the owner shall cause it
to be prominently displayed in the place of business, where it may be
inspected by an investigating officer at any time.

Sec. 49 RCW 46.80.050 and 1995 c 256 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
A license issued on this application remains in force until
suspended or revoked and may be renewed annually upon reapplication
according to RCW 46.80.030 and upon payment of a fee of ((ten))
seventy-five dollars. A vehicle wrecker who fails or neglects to renew
the license before the assigned expiration date shall pay the fee for
an original vehicle wrecker license as provided in this chapter.
Whenever a vehicle wrecker ceases to do business as such or the
license has been suspended or revoked, the wrecker shall immediately
surrender the license to the department.

Sec. 50 RCW 46.80.060 and 1995 c 256 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The vehicle wrecker shall obtain a special set of license plates in
addition to the regular licenses and plates required for the operation
of such vehicles. The special plates must be displayed on vehicles
owned and/or operated by the wrecker and used in the conduct of the
business. The fee for these plates ((shall be five)) is fifteen
dollars for the original plates and ((two)) fifteen dollars for each
additional set of plates bearing the same license number. The renewal
fee for these plates is fifteen dollars for the first set, and fifteen
dollars for each additional set. A wrecker with more than one licensed
location in the state may use special plates bearing the same license
number for vehicles operated out of any of the licensed locations.

Sec. 51 RCW 46.79.040 and 2010 c 8 s 9095 are each amended to
read as follows:
Application for a hulk hauler's license, together with a fee of
((ten)) one hundred dollars, or application for a scrap processor's
license, together with a fee of ((twenty-five)) one hundred dollars,
shall be forwarded to the director. Upon receipt of the application
the director shall, if the application be in order, issue the license
applied for authorizing him or her to do business as such and forward
the fee, together with an itemized and detailed report, to the state
treasurer, to be deposited in the motor vehicle fund. Upon receiving
the certificate the owner shall cause it to be prominently displayed at
the address shown in his or her application, where it may be inspected
by an investigating officer at any time.

Sec. 52 RCW 46.79.050 and 1985 c 109 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
A license issued pursuant to this chapter expires on the date
assigned by the director, and may be renewed by filing a proper
application and payment of a fee of ((ten)) seventy-five dollars.
Whenever a hulk hauler or scrap processor ceases to do business or
the license has been suspended or revoked, the license shall
immediately be surrendered to the director.

Sec. 53 RCW 46.79.060 and 2010 c 8 s 9096 are each amended to
read as follows:
The hulk hauler or scrap processor shall obtain a special set of
license plates in addition to the regular licenses and plates required
for the operation of vehicles owned and/or operated by him or her and
used in the conduct of his or her business. Such special license shall
be displayed on the operational vehicles and shall be in lieu of a trip
permit or current license on any vehicle being transported. The fee
for these plates ((shall be five)) is fifteen dollars for the original
plates and ((two)) fifteen dollars for each additional set of plates
bearing the same license number. The renewal fee for these plates is
fifteen dollars for the first set, and fifteen dollars for each
additional set.

Sec. 54 RCW 46.76.040 and 1990 c 250 s 68 are each amended to
read as follows:
The fee for an original transporter's license is ((twenty-five))
one hundred dollars. Transporter license number plates bearing an
appropriate symbol and serial number shall be attached to all vehicles
being delivered in the conduct of the business licensed under this
chapter. The plates may be obtained for a fee of ((two)) fifteen
dollars for each set. The renewal fee for these plates is fifteen
dollars for the first set, and fifteen dollars for each additional set.

Sec. 55 RCW 46.76.050 and 1985 c 109 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A transporter's license expires on the date assigned by the
director, and may be renewed by filing a proper application and paying
an annual fee of ((fifteen)) seventy-five dollars.

Sec. 56 RCW 46.37.420 and 2007 c 140 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) It is unlawful to operate a vehicle upon the public highways of
this state unless it is completely equipped with pneumatic rubber tires
except vehicles equipped with temporary-use spare tires that meet
federal standards that are installed and used in accordance with the
manufacturer's instructions.
(2) No tire on a vehicle moved on a highway may have on its
periphery any block, flange, cleat, or spike or any other protuberance
of any material other than rubber which projects beyond the tread of
the traction surface of the tire, except that it is permissible to use
farm machinery equipped with pneumatic tires or solid rubber tracks
having protuberances that will not injure the highway, and except also
that it is permissible to use tire chains or metal studs imbedded
within the tire of reasonable proportions and of a type conforming to
rules adopted by the state patrol, upon any vehicle when required for
safety because of snow, ice, or other conditions tending to cause a
vehicle to skid. It is unlawful to use metal studs imbedded within the
tire between April 1st and November 1st, except that a vehicle may be
equipped year-round with tires that have retractable studs if: (a) The
studs retract pneumatically or mechanically to below the wear bar of
the tire when not in use; and (b) the retractable studs are engaged
only between November 1st and April 1st. Retractable studs may be made
of metal or other material and are not subject to the lightweight stud
weight requirements under RCW 46.04.272. The state department of
transportation may, from time to time, determine additional periods in
which the use of tires with metal studs imbedded therein is lawful.
(3)(a) There is a five dollar fee on the sale of each new tire sold
that contains studs. The fee imposed under this subsection must be
paid by the buyer to the seller, and each seller shall collect from the
buyer the full amount of the fee. The fee collected from the buyer by
the seller must be paid to the department of revenue in accordance with
RCW 82.32.045. The fee collected must be deposited in the motor
vehicle account and be used for road maintenance.
(b) The department of revenue must collect on the business excise
tax return from the businesses selling new tires that contain studs at
retail the number of tires sold and the fee imposed under this
subsection. The department of revenue must incorporate into the
agency's audit cycle a reconciliation of the number of tires sold and
the amount of revenue collected by the businesses selling new tires
that contain studs.
(c) All other applicable provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW have full
force and application with respect to the fee imposed under this
subsection.
(d) The department of revenue must administer this subsection.
(e) For the purposes of this subsection, "a new tire that contains
studs" means a tire that is manufactured for vehicle purposes and does
not include retreaded vehicle tires.
(4) The state department of transportation and local authorities in
their respective jurisdictions may issue special permits authorizing
the operation upon a highway of traction engines or tractors having
movable tracks with transverse corrugations upon the periphery of the
movable tracks or farm tractors or other farm machinery, the operation
of which upon a highway would otherwise be prohibited under this
section.
(((4))) (5) Tires with metal studs imbedded therein may be used
between November 1st and April 1st upon school buses and fire
department vehicles, any law or regulation to the contrary
notwithstanding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 57 If chapter . . . (Engrossed Senate Bill No.
5061), Laws of 2011 is enacted by June 30, 2011, sections 29 and 35 of
this act are null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 58 If chapter . . . (Engrossed Senate Bill No.
5061), Laws of 2011 is not enacted by June 30, 2011, sections 30 and 36
of this act are null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 59 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 60 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---