BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In the governor's proposed 2011-13 budget,
in-home medicaid hours are being reduced for forty-five thousand
individuals by an average hour reduction of ten percent. These
services, like many other essential governmental functions, are funded
in great part by the state sales tax. The sales tax is paid by all
Washington residents and is duly imposed on the residents of most other
state and foreign jurisdictions. However, a few jurisdictions are
provided a unique exemption from the retail sales tax. Recognizing the
great hardship on Washington residents from the reduction in these
services, it is the intent of the voters to restore partial funding for
these reduced hours by repealing the nonresident sales tax exemption
and directing the receipts from the general fund to the medicaid
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
Decisions as to the hours of in-home care to be provided must be
based solely upon an objective assessment of medical need, as follows:
The department must provide eligible individuals with the hours of
in-home care designated as the "base hours" for their in-home group, as
set forth in WAC 388-106-0125, as it existed on December 1, 2010,
unless the individual is eligible for a modification in hours pursuant
to the objective standards set forth in WAC 388-106-0130 (2) through
(6), as those subsections existed on December 1, 2010. The department
may consider no other factors.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.0273 (Exemptions -- Sales to
nonresidents of tangible personal property, digital goods, and digital
codes for use outside the state -- Proof of nonresident status--Penalties) and 2011 c 7 s 1, 2010 c 106 s 215, 2009 c 535 s 512, 2007
c 135 s 2, 2003 c 53 s 399, 1993 c 444 s 1, 1988 c 96 s 1, 1982 1st
ex.s. c 5 s 1, & 1980 c 37 s 39 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The secretary of state shall submit this
act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at
the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 29A.72.050, the statement of subject and
concise description for the ballot title shall be as follows: "The
legislature has passed Senate Bill No. . . . (this act). This bill
would partially restore funding for in-home long-term care services for
eligible elderly and disabled persons by repealing the sales tax
exemption for nonresidents."

--- END ---