BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW
to read as follows:
The full disclosure of the long-term fiscal impacts of budget
proposals under consideration by the legislature will improve the
informed participation in the budget process of the citizens of the
state and their legislators and contribute to the sustainable use of
the state's limited fiscal resources. For each proposed omnibus
operating appropriations bill reported by a legislative fiscal
committee or approved by either house of the legislature, the relevant
fiscal committee shall provide a public report that documents the
policy-level proposals in the bill and the cost of each proposal in the
current fiscal biennium and the estimated cost in the next ensuing
fiscal biennium. This information shall also be provided by the
governor for each proposed omnibus operating appropriations bill
submitted to the legislature by the governor.

--- END ---