BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.03.260 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 5 s 4 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Each application for permit to appropriate water or to change,
transfer, or amend an existing water right shall set forth the name and
post office address of the applicant, the source of water supply, the
nature and amount of the proposed use, the time during which water will
be required each year, the location and description of the proposed
ditch, canal, or other work, the time within which the completion of
the construction and the time for the complete application of the water
to the proposed use. The department shall post on its web site a
checklist of the information required in the application under this
subsection and subsections (2) through (8) of this section.
(2) If for agricultural purposes, the application shall give the
legal subdivision of the land and the acreage to be irrigated((, as
near as may be,)) and the amount of water expressed in acre feet to be
supplied per season. If for power purposes, it shall give the nature
of the works by means of which the power is to be developed, the head
and amount of water to be utilized, and the uses to which the power is
to be applied.
(3) If for construction of a reservoir, the application shall give
the height of the dam, the capacity of the reservoir, and the uses to
be made of the impounded waters.
(4) If for community or multiple domestic water supply, the
application shall give the projected number of service connections
sought to be served. However, for a municipal water supplier that has
an approved water system plan under chapter 43.20 RCW or an approval
from the department of health to serve a specified number of service
connections, the service connection figure in the application or any
subsequent water right document is not an attribute limiting exercise
of the water right as long as the number of service connections to be
served under the right is consistent with the approved water system
plan or specified number.
(5) If for municipal water supply, the application shall give the
present population to be served, and, as near as may be estimated, the
future requirement of the municipality. However, for a municipal water
supplier that has an approved water system plan under chapter 43.20 RCW
or an approval from the department of health to serve a specified
number of service connections, the population figures in the
application or any subsequent water right document are not an attribute
limiting exercise of the water right as long as the population to be
provided water under the right is consistent with the approved water
system plan or specified number.
(6) If for mining purposes, the application shall give the nature
of the mines to be served and the method of supplying and utilizing the
water; also their location by legal subdivisions.
(7) ((All)) If for industrial or commercial purposes, the
application shall describe how water is proposed to be used in the
production process and in ancillary uses including but not limited to
heat exchange, washing and cleaning, and domestic potable use.
(8) An application to change, transfer, or amend an existing water
right or claimed water right must also include the following
information:
(a) Identification of the water right or claim proposed to be
changed, including a legible copy of the right or claim proposed to be
changed;
(b) The existing and proposed points of diversion, withdrawal, or
storage of water as applicable if proposed to be changed;
(c) The location of the existing place where water is used and the
proposed place of use if the place is proposed to be changed;
(d) The existing purpose or purposes of use and the proposed
purpose or purposes of use if the purpose is proposed to be amended or
added to; and
(e) Any other information required by the department on the
application form prescribed by the department.
(9) Upon receipt of an application containing the basic information
required in subsections (1) through (8) of this section, the
application must be time and date stamped by the department to
establish a priority date.
(10)(a) After an application to appropriate or store water or to
change, transfer, or amend a water right or claim is filed and prior to
the department initiating its investigation of the application under
this chapter or chapter 90.44 RCW, the department must provide in
writing to the applicant an initial assessment that estimates the
probable costs that the applicant will incur for processing the
application. The department shall also convey to the applicant the
scope of issues likely to be encountered in processing the application
as identified under RCW 90.03.380. To the extent possible, the
department shall perform this duty for groups of applications from the
same source or geographic area.
(b) The purpose of this initial assessment is to assist the
applicant in making a decision as to whether to proceed with having the
department make a formal determination on their water right
application. Such an assessment must be made with the department's
best professional judgment based on information available to the
department at that time. If additional information needs to be
collected or studies need to be conducted to answer the applicable
tests for rendering a decision on the application, the department must
disclose to the applicant the estimated time required to collect the
information or to conduct the studies and the estimated cost that the
applicant will incur. The department must establish a deadline by
which the information or studies must be submitted to the department.
If this deadline is not met, the department shall reject or cancel the
application. An applicant may withdraw an application after receiving
the initial assessment by providing written notice to the department.
Upon receiving such a notice, the department shall cancel the
application. The department's initial assessment is not an appealable
action or a final decision by the department and is not a guarantee of
a particular outcome on the application.
(11) Upon receipt of an application containing the basic
information required in subsections (1) through (8) of this section and
after the initial assessment required in subsection (9) of this
section, the department must schedule a conference with the applicant
to review any particular challenges involved in the proposed
appropriation of water from the proposed source. In the conference,
the department shall also discuss the nature and extent of any
additional information to be required from the applicant. The
conference may be held in person or by telephone. The department is
encouraged to hold conferences with groups of applicants with
applications from the same source and shall encourage the applicants to
coordinate information gathering to the extent practicable. An
applicant may withdraw an application after the conference by providing
written notice to the department. Upon receiving such a notice, the
department shall cancel the application.
(12) Applications shall be ((accompanied)) supplemented by such
surveys, investigations, and studies, including maps and drawings, in
duplicate, and such other data, as may be required by the department to
make the determination whether to approve an application for a permit
or a change under this chapter or chapter 90.44 RCW, and such
accompanying ((data)) information shall be considered as a part of the
application. The department shall reject or cancel an application for
failure to submit such accompanying information by the deadline
established in the initial assessment required in subsection (8) of
this section.
(13) An applicant may elect, or the department may require an
applicant, to submit a draft report of examination to the department
that includes findings and conclusions regarding the applicable
statutory tests in this chapter and in chapter 90.44 RCW for issuance
of a new water right or a change, transfer, or amendment of an existing
water right. The draft report of examination must be prepared by or
reviewed and approved by a prequalified consultant from the
department's list of consultants under RCW 90.03.265.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department shall establish streamlined processing of
certain applications for permits and change, transfer, and amendment
applications under this chapter and chapter 90.44 RCW. The types of
applications appropriate for the use of streamlined permits include but
are not limited to those for use of waters reserved for future use,
withdrawal of small quantities of domestic water from lakes, beneficial
use of storm water, change of purpose of use with no increase in
quantity or change in the seasonal pattern of use, and minor changes in
the place of use and the point of diversion or withdrawal.
(2) The establishment of streamlined permits does not require the
adoption of rules under chapter 34.05 RCW. Instead, the department
shall publish and publicize its proposal for a streamlined permit
program. The department shall seek public comments for no less than
sixty days before finalizing and implementing the streamlined permit
program. A streamlined permit must include criteria for qualifications
for coverage by the streamlined permit. The streamlined permit program
must include streamlined consideration of applications for qualifying
water rights and changes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The department of ecology shall conduct
a comprehensive review of its water rights application review
procedures, with the objective of simplifying the procedures,
eliminating unnecessary steps, and decreasing the time required to
fully process an application from filing through a final decision. The
department of ecology shall seek the recommendations from all
stakeholder interests in water resource management and provide
stakeholders an opportunity to comment upon proposals for
administrative or legislative changes to simplify procedures.
(2) The department of ecology shall implement changes for which it
has current administrative authority by January 1, 2012.
(3) The department of ecology shall provide a report to the water
resource policy and fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives by January 1, 2012. The report must summarize the
review conducted, the proposals considered by the department of
ecology, including those forwarded by stakeholders, the changes
implemented, and recommendations for legislation necessary to implement
additional changes.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.03.470 and 2005 c 412 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The fees specified in this section shall be collected by the
department in advance of the requested action.
(1) For the ((examination)) filing of an application for a permit
to appropriate water for a single domestic use that has a single
purpose, a ((minimum)) filing fee of ((fifty)) one hundred twenty-five
dollars must be remitted with the application. For ((an amount of
water exceeding one-half cubic foot per second, the examination fee
shall be assessed at the rate of one dollar per one hundredth cubic
foot per second. In no case will the examination fee be less than
fifty dollars or more than twenty-five thousand dollars)) the filing of
an application for a permit to appropriate water other than for a
single domestic use that has a single purpose, a filing fee of two
hundred fifty dollars for each purpose of use proposed must be remitted
with the application. No fee is required under this subsection (1) for
an application filed by a party to a cost-reimbursement agreement made
under RCW 90.03.265.
(2) For the ((examination)) filing of an application to store
water, a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ((for each acre foot of
storage proposed shall be charged, but a minimum fee of fifty dollars))
must be remitted with the application. ((In no case will the
examination fee for a storage project be less than fifty dollars or
more than twenty-five thousand dollars.)) No fee is required under
this subsection (2) for an application filed by a party to a
cost-reimbursement agreement made under RCW 90.03.265.
(3)(a) For the ((examination)) filing of an application to
transfer, change, or amend a water right or storage certificate,
permit, or claim as authorized by RCW 90.44.100, 90.44.105, or
90.03.380, a ((minimum)) filing fee of ((fifty)) two hundred fifty
dollars for each type of change, transfer, or amendment must be
remitted with the application. ((For an application for change
involving an amount of water exceeding one cubic foot per second, the
total examination fee shall be assessed at the rate of fifty cents per
one hundredth cubic foot per second. For an application for change of
a storage water right, the total examination fee shall be assessed at
the rate of one dollar for each acre foot of water involved in the
change. The fee shall be based on the amount of water subject to
change as proposed in the application, not on the total amount of water
reflected in the water right certificate, permit, or claim. In no case
will the examination fee charged for a change application be less than
fifty dollars or more than twelve thousand five hundred dollars.))
(b) The filing and examination fee for a temporary or seasonal
change under RCW 90.03.390 or a drought-related change or emergency
water approval under RCW 43.83B.410 is ((fifty)) one hundred twenty-five dollars and must be remitted with the application.
(((c))) (4) No filing fee is required under ((this)) subsection (3)
of this section for:
(((i))) (a) An application to process a change relating to donation
of a trust water right to the state;
(((ii) An)) (b) That portion of an application ((to process)) for
a change ((when)), transfer, or amendment under which the department
((otherwise)) acquires a trust water right for purposes of improving
instream flows or for other public purposes;
(((iii))) (c) An application filed with a water conservancy board
according to chapter 90.80 RCW ((or for the review of a water
conservancy board's record of decision submitted to the department
according to chapter 90.80 RCW)); or
(((iv))) (d) An application filed by a party to a
cost-reimbursement agreement made under RCW 90.03.265.
(((d))) (5) For a change, transfer, or amendment involving a single
project operating under more than one water right, including related
secondary diversion rights, or involving the consolidation of multiple
water rights, only one ((examination)) filing fee and one certificate
fee are required to be paid.
(((4) The fifty-dollar minimum fee payable with the application
shall be a credit to the total amount whenever the examination fee
totals more than fifty dollars under the schedule specified in
subsections (1) through (3) of this section and in such case the
further fee due shall be the total computed amount, less the amount
previously paid. Within five working days from receipt of an
application, the department shall notify the applicant by registered
mail of any additional fees due under subsections (1) through (3) of
this section.
(5) The fees specified in subsections (1) through (3) of this
section do not apply to any filings for emergency withdrawal
authorizations or temporary drought-related water right changes
authorized under RCW 43.83B.410 that are received by the department
while a drought condition order issued under RCW 43.83B.405 is in
effect.))
(6) The following fees must be paid in advance of the department's
examination and determination on an application:
(a) For an application to permanently appropriate surface or
groundwater or for a permanent change, transfer, or amendment of an
existing surface or groundwater right or claimed right, a fee of twelve
dollars per one-hundredth cubic foot per second, but not less than one
thousand dollars and not more than thirty-five thousand dollars is
required. For the department's review and determination on a draft
report of examination submitted under RCW 90.03.260(13), a fee of four
dollars per one-hundredth cubic foot per second, but not less than
three hundred dollars and not more than twelve thousand dollars.
(b) For reviewing an application to store water for beneficial use
in a surface reservoir, an underground vault, or an underground
geological formation where the storage capacity would exceed ten acre
feet in volume, a fee of five dollars per acre foot of active storage,
but not less than one thousand dollars and not more than thirty-five
thousand dollars is required. For the department's review and
determination on a draft report of examination submitted under RCW
90.03.260(13), a fee of two dollars per acre foot of water, but not
less than three hundred dollars and not more than twelve thousand
dollars.
(c) For reviewing and making a final decision on an application to
change, transfer, or amend an existing water right or claim that was
filed with and processed by a conservancy board, a fee of four dollars
per one-hundredth cubic foot per second, but not less than three
hundred dollars and not more than four thousand dollars is required.
(d) No fee for examination and determination is required under this
subsection for:
(i) An application to process a change relating to donation of a
trust water right to the state;
(ii) That portion of an application for a change, transfer, or
amendment under which the department acquires a trust water right for
purposes of improving instream flows or for other public purposes;
(iii) An application filed by a party to a cost-reimbursement
agreement made under RCW 90.03.265; or
(iv) An application for a secondary use permit for the use of
stored water if it is filed jointly with the application to store
water.
(7) For applying for each extension of time for beginning
construction work under a permit to appropriate water, for completion
of construction work, or for completing application of water to a
beneficial use, a fee of ((fifty)) one hundred twenty-five dollars is
required. These fees also apply to similar extensions of time
requested under a change or transfer authorization.
(((7))) (8) For the inspection of any hydraulic works to ((insure))
ensure safety to life and property, a fee based on the actual cost of
the inspection, including the expense incident thereto, is required
except as follows: (a) For any hydraulic works less than ten years
old, that the department examined and approved the construction plans
and specifications as to its safety when required under RCW 90.03.350,
there shall be no fee charged; or (b) for any hydraulic works more than
ten years old, but less than twenty years old, that the department
examined and approved the construction plans and specifications as to
its safety when required under RCW 90.03.350, the fee charged shall not
exceed the fee for a significant hazard dam.
(((8))) (9) For the examination of plans and specifications as to
safety of controlling works for storage of ten acre feet or more of
water, a minimum fee of ((ten)) one hundred dollars, or a fee equal to
the actual cost, is required.
(((9))) (10) For recording an assignment either of a permit to
appropriate water or of an application for such a permit, a fee of
fifty dollars is required.
(((10))) (11) For preparing and issuing all water right
certificates, a fee of ((fifty)) one hundred twenty-five dollars is
required.
(((11))) (12) For filing and recording a formal protest against
granting any application, a fee of ((fifty)) one hundred dollars is
required. No fee is required to submit a comment, by mail or
otherwise, regarding an application.
(((12))) (13) For filing an application to amend a water right
claim filed under chapter 90.14 RCW, a fee of ((fifty)) one hundred
twenty-five dollars is required.
(((13))) (14) An application or request for an action as provided
for under this section is incomplete unless accompanied by the fee ((or
the minimum fee)). If no fee or an amount less than the ((minimum))
prescribed fee accompanies an application or other request for an
action as provided under this section, the department shall return the
application or request to the applicant with advice as to the fee that
must be remitted with the application or request for it to be accepted
for processing. If additional fees are due, the department shall
provide timely notification by certified mail with return receipt
requested to the applicant. No action may be taken by the department
until the fee is paid in full. Failure to remit fees within sixty days
of the department's notification is grounds for rejecting the
application or request or canceling the permit. Cash shall not be
accepted. Fees must be paid by check or money order and are
nonrefundable.
(((14))) (15) For purposes of calculating fees for groundwater
filings, one cubic foot per second shall be regarded as equivalent to
four hundred fifty gallons per minute.
(((15) Eighty percent of the fees collected by the department under
this section shall be deposited in the state general fund. Twenty
percent of the fees collected by the department under this section
shall be deposited in the water rights tracking system account
established in RCW 90.14.240.))
(16) Except for the fees relating to the inspection of hydraulic
works and the examination of plans and specifications of controlling
works provided for in subsections (8) and (9) of this section, fees
collected by the department under this section must be deposited in the
water rights processing account established in RCW 90.03.650. Fees
collected under subsections (8) and (9) of this section must be
deposited in the state general fund.
(17) Except for the fees relating to the inspection of hydraulic
works and the examination of plans and specifications of controlling
works provided for in subsections (((7) and)) (8) and (9) of this
section, nothing in this section is intended to grant authority to the
department to amend the fees in this section by adoption of rules or
otherwise.
(18) The fees required in subsection (6) of this section apply to
all examinations and determinations on applications that are initiated
by the department after January 1, 2012, and are intended to apply to
water right appropriation and storage applications and change,
transfer, and amendment applications pending on that date for which the
department has not initiated its examination and determination.

Sec. 5 RCW 90.03.650 and 2010 c 285 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The water rights processing account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from the fees collected under RCW 90.03.655,
90.03.665, ((and)) 90.44.540, and 90.03.470, except the dam safety fees
collected under RCW 90.03.470 (8) and (9), must be deposited into the
account. Money in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may only be used to support the
processing of water right applications for a new appropriation, change,
transfer, or amendment of a water right or claim as provided in this
chapter and chapters 90.42 and 90.44 RCW or for the examination,
certification, ((and)) renewal of certification of water right
examiners as provided in RCW 90.03.665.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2012, the department must prepare preliminary
assessments for each water resource inventory area as established in
chapter 173-500 WAC with pending applications for new water rights and
for changes, transfers, and amendments. Upon completion of this work,
the department must publish available information on its web site,
including maps, regarding the location of those applications and the
factors affecting water availability and the potential impairment of
senior water rights.
(2) Upon completion of the work required in subsection (1) of this
section, the department must gather and inventory existing information
related to water availability for those subbasins and aquifer units
within water resource inventory areas where there are more than fifty
applications pending. The department must identify any information
gaps that effectively block the department's ability to make decisions
on the pending applications in those areas. The department must make
this information available on its web site and bring the information to
the attention of local governments and stakeholders within each water
resource inventory area.
(3) The department must develop and make public a proposed strategy
for addressing the pending applications in each of the water resource
inventory areas assessed in subsection (2) of this section. The
department must solicit public comments on a proposed strategy before
implementing the strategy. The strategies developed under this
subsection are the basis for filling any information gaps and for
making decisions on pending and future applications.
(4) The department must publish on its web site the schedule for
its future assessment and strategy development work and its intended
timing for addressing pending applications in water resource inventory
areas and discrete water sources. Development and implementation of
the assessments and strategies and the scheduling of work by geographic
areas under this section do not require the adoption of rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW or RCW 90.54.050.
(5) For water sources for which the department determines that no
water remains available for further appropriation, the department shall
issue denials of applications to appropriate water unless the
applicants propose a feasible mitigation plan, a storage or
augmentation plan for the source, or other resource management
technique under RCW 90.03.255 or 90.44.055.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In making a tentative determination of the extent and validity
of a water right under this chapter and chapters 90.14, 90.38, 90.42,
and 90.44 RCW, the department shall only evaluate the exercise of the
water right during the most recent twenty-year period prior to the
commencement of the department's tentative determination at issue.
(2) For the purposes of appeal, the department's tentative
determination under this section does not alone constitute an agency
action. Aggrieved parties must appeal the primary action of the
department under which the evaluation under this section applies.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, water right
determinations during a general adjudication, under RCW 90.03.110
through 90.03.245 and 90.03.620 through 90.03.645, are not limited to
a twenty-year period of review.
(4) Nothing in this section limits a superior court's authority in
determining the extent and validity of a water right.

Sec. 8 RCW 90.03.380 and 2009 c 183 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water
right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For
purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the
water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows,
averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right.
Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the point
of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any
person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a
written application therefor with the department, and the application
shall not be granted until notice of the application is published as
provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that such transfer or
such change may be made without injury or detriment to existing rights,
the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate in duplicate
granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of
diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be
made a record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued
to the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner
and with the same effect as provided in the original certificate or
permit to divert water. The time period that the water right was
banked under RCW 90.92.070, in an approved local water plan created
under RCW 90.92.090, or the water right was subject to an agreement to
not divert under RCW 90.92.050 will not be included in the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use for the purpose of
determining the annual consumptive quantity under this section. If the
water right has not been used during the previous five years but the
nonuse of which qualifies for one or more of the statutory good causes
or exceptions to relinquishment in RCW 90.14.140 and 90.44.520, the
period of nonuse is not included in the most recent five-year period of
continuous beneficial use for purposes of determining the annual
consumptive quantity of water under this section.
(2) The department's determination of the extent and validity of
water rights under this section shall be consistent with section 7 of
this act.
(3) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(((3))) (4) A change in place of use by an individual water user or
users of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive
approval for the change from the board of directors of the district if
the use of water continues within the irrigation district, and when
water is provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board
of joint control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be
received from the board of joint control if the use of water continues
within the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(((4))) (5) This section shall not apply to trust water rights
acquired by the state through the funding of water conservation
projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.
(((5))) (6)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not
entitled to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right is
considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (((5))) (6)(c) does not
affect any other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (((5))) (6) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(((6))) (7) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a
water right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's
valid water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights
program, or to other persons as a condition of processing the
application.
(((7))) (8) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(((8))) (9) The development and use of a small irrigation
impoundment, as defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a
change or amendment for the purposes of this section. The exemption
expressly provided by this subsection shall not be construed as
requiring a change or transfer of any existing water right to enable
the holder of the right to store water governed by the right.
(((9))) (10) This section does not apply to a water right involved
in an approved local water plan created under RCW 90.92.090, a water
right that is subject to an agreement not to divert under RCW
90.92.050, or a banked water right under RCW 90.92.070.

Sec. 9 RCW 90.03.380 and 2003 c 329 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The right to the use of water which has been applied to a
beneficial use in the state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land
or place upon which the same is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant
to any other land or place of use without loss of priority of right
theretofore established if such change can be made without detriment or
injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water
right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the
annual consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For
purposes of this section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the
estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the
water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return flows,
averaged over the two years of greatest use within the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right.
Before any transfer of such right to use water or change of the point
of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any
person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a
written application therefor with the department, and the application
shall not be granted until notice of the application is published as
provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it shall appear that such transfer or
such change may be made without injury or detriment to existing rights,
the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate in duplicate
granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of
diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be
made a record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued
to the applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner
and with the same effect as provided in the original certificate or
permit to divert water.
(2) The department's determination of the extent and validity of
water rights under this section shall be consistent with section 7 of
this act.
(3) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights
from one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before
publication of notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation
districts that such transfer or change will not adversely affect the
ability to deliver water to other landowners or impair the financial
integrity of either of the districts.
(((3))) (4) A change in place of use by an individual water user or
users of water provided by an irrigation district need only receive
approval for the change from the board of directors of the district if
the use of water continues within the irrigation district, and when
water is provided by an irrigation entity that is a member of a board
of joint control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be
received from the board of joint control if the use of water continues
within the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights.
(((4))) (5) This section shall not apply to trust water rights
acquired by the state through the funding of water conservation
projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.
(((5))) (6)(a) Pending applications for new water rights are not
entitled to protection from impairment, injury, or detriment when an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right is
considered.
(b) Applications relating to existing surface or ground water
rights may be processed and decisions on them rendered independently of
processing and rendering decisions on pending applications for new
water rights within the same source of supply without regard to the
date of filing of the pending applications for new water rights.
(c) Notwithstanding any other existing authority to process
applications, including but not limited to the authority to process
applications under WAC 173-152-050 as it existed on January 1, 2001, an
application relating to an existing surface or ground water right may
be processed ahead of a previously filed application relating to an
existing right when sufficient information for a decision on the
previously filed application is not available and the applicant for the
previously filed application is sent written notice that explains what
information is not available and informs the applicant that processing
of the next application will begin. The previously filed application
does not lose its priority date and if the information is provided by
the applicant within sixty days, the previously filed application shall
be processed at that time. This subsection (((5))) (6)(c) does not
affect any other existing authority to process applications.
(d) Nothing in this subsection (((5))) (6) is intended to stop the
processing of applications for new water rights.
(((6))) (7) No applicant for a change, transfer, or amendment of a
water right may be required to give up any part of the applicant's
valid water right or claim to a state agency, the trust water rights
program, or to other persons as a condition of processing the
application.
(((7))) (8) In revising the provisions of this section and adding
provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of 2001, the
legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.
(((8))) (9) The development and use of a small irrigation
impoundment, as defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a
change or amendment for the purposes of this section. The exemption
expressly provided by this subsection shall not be construed as
requiring a change or transfer of any existing water right to enable
the holder of the right to store water governed by the right.

Sec. 10 RCW 90.44.100 and 2009 c 183 s 16 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
groundwater right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
groundwaters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public groundwater as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of
an original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public groundwater as the original well
or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the original
public notice published for the application for the water right for the
well.
(5) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring an amendment of any
existing water right to enable the holder of the right to store water
governed by the right.
(6) This section does not apply to a water right involved in an
approved local water plan created under RCW 90.92.090 or a banked water
right under RCW 90.92.070.
(7) The department's tentative determination of the extent and
validity of water rights under this section must be consistent with
section 7 of this act.

Sec. 11 RCW 90.44.100 and 2003 c 329 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) After an application to, and upon the issuance by the
department of an amendment to the appropriate permit or certificate of
groundwater right, the holder of a valid right to withdraw public
groundwaters may, without losing the holder's priority of right,
construct wells or other means of withdrawal at a new location in
substitution for or in addition to those at the original location, or
the holder may change the manner or the place of use of the water.
(2) An amendment to construct replacement or a new additional well
or wells at a location outside of the location of the original well or
wells or to change the manner or place of use of the water shall be
issued only after publication of notice of the application and findings
as prescribed in the case of an original application. Such amendment
shall be issued by the department only on the conditions that: (a) The
additional or replacement well or wells shall tap the same body of
public groundwater as the original well or wells; (b) where a
replacement well or wells is approved, the use of the original well or
wells shall be discontinued and the original well or wells shall be
properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104 RCW; (c) where
an additional well or wells is constructed, the original well or wells
may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from the
original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original permit or certificate; and (d) other existing
rights shall not be impaired. The department may specify an approved
manner of construction and shall require a showing of compliance with
the terms of the amendment, as provided in RCW 90.44.080 in the case of
an original permit.
(3) The construction of a replacement or new additional well or
wells at the location of the original well or wells shall be allowed
without application to the department for an amendment. However, the
following apply to such a replacement or new additional well: (a) The
well shall tap the same body of public groundwater as the original well
or wells; (b) if a replacement well is constructed, the use of the
original well or wells shall be discontinued and the original well or
wells shall be properly decommissioned as required under chapter 18.104
RCW; (c) if a new additional well is constructed, the original well or
wells may continue to be used, but the combined total withdrawal from
the original and additional well or wells shall not enlarge the right
conveyed by the original water use permit or certificate; (d) the
construction and use of the well shall not interfere with or impair
water rights with an earlier date of priority than the water right or
rights for the original well or wells; (e) the replacement or
additional well shall be located no closer than the original well to a
well it might interfere with; (f) the department may specify an
approved manner of construction of the well; and (g) the department
shall require a showing of compliance with the conditions of this
subsection (3).
(4) As used in this section, the "location of the original well or
wells" is the area described as the point of withdrawal in the original
public notice published for the application for the water right for the
well.
(5) The development and use of a small irrigation impoundment, as
defined in RCW 90.03.370(8), does not constitute a change or amendment
for the purposes of this section. The exemption expressly provided by
this subsection shall not be construed as requiring an amendment of any
existing water right to enable the holder of the right to store water
governed by the right.
(6) The department's tentative determination of the extent and
validity of water rights under this section must be consistent with
section 7 of this act.

Sec. 12 RCW 90.14.140 and 2009 c 183 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, the
following constitute "sufficient cause" ((shall be defined as)) for the
nonuse of all or a portion of the water by the owner of a water right
for a period of five or more consecutive years where such nonuse occurs
as a result of:
(a) Drought, or other unavailability of water;
(b) Active service in the armed forces of the United States during
military crisis;
(c) Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;
(d) The operation of legal proceedings;
(e) Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands
or water rights which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the
owner of the water right;
(f) Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either
directly or through the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a
federal program implementing those laws, or acreage limitations, or
production quotas;
(g) Temporarily reduced water need for irrigation use where such
reduction is due to varying weather conditions, including but not
limited to precipitation and temperature, that warranted the reduction
in water use, so long as the water user's diversion and delivery
facilities are maintained in good operating condition consistent with
beneficial use of the full amount of the water right;
(h) Temporarily reduced diversions or withdrawals of irrigation
water directly resulting from the provisions of a contract or similar
agreement in which a supplier of electricity buys back electricity from
the water right holder and the electricity is needed for the diversion
or withdrawal or for the use of the water diverted or withdrawn for
irrigation purposes;
(i) Water conservation measures implemented under the Yakima river
basin water enhancement project, so long as the conserved water is
reallocated in accordance with the provisions of P.L. 103-434;
(j) Reliance by an irrigation water user on the transitory presence
of return flows in lieu of diversion or withdrawal of water from the
primary source of supply, if such return flows are measured or reliably
estimated using a scientific methodology generally accepted as reliable
within the scientific community; or
(k) The reduced use of irrigation water resulting from crop
rotation. For purposes of this subsection, crop rotation means the
temporary change in the type of crops grown resulting from the exercise
of generally recognized sound farming practices. Unused water
resulting from crop rotation will not be relinquished if the remaining
portion of the water continues to be beneficially used.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.180, there shall be no relinquishment of any water right:
(a) If such right is claimed for power development purposes under
chapter 90.16 RCW and annual license fees are paid in accordance with
chapter 90.16 RCW;
(b) If such right is used for a standby or reserve water supply to
be used in time of drought or other low flow period so long as
withdrawal or diversion facilities are maintained in good operating
condition for the use of such reserve or standby water supply;
(c) If such right is claimed for a determined future development to
take place either within fifteen years of July 1, 1967, or the most
recent beneficial use of the water right, whichever date is later;
(d) If such right is claimed for municipal water supply purposes
under chapter 90.03 RCW;
(e) If such waters are not subject to appropriation under the
applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
(f) If such right or portion of the right is leased to another
person for use on land other than the land to which the right is
appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial use of the right in
accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of the right has
been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100;
(g) If such a right or portion of the right is authorized for a
purpose that is satisfied by the use of agricultural industrial process
water as authorized under RCW 90.46.150;
(h) If such right is a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or
90.42 RCW;
(i) If such a right is involved in an approved local water plan
created under RCW 90.92.090, provided the right is subject to an
agreement not to divert under RCW 90.92.050, or provided the right is
banked under RCW 90.92.070; or
(j) If such a right or portion of a right is included in a change
or transfer application awaiting final determination from the
department of ecology, provided that during the waiting period
relinquishment is tolled and the nonuse of water is not included in
calculating whether five or more years of nonuse has occurred.
(3) In adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of
2001, the legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.

Sec. 13 RCW 90.14.140 and 2001 c 240 s 1, 2001 c 237 s 27, and
2001 c 69 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, the
following constitute "sufficient cause" ((shall be defined as)) for the
nonuse of all or a portion of the water by the owner of a water right
for a period of five or more consecutive years where such nonuse occurs
as a result of:
(a) Drought, or other unavailability of water;
(b) Active service in the armed forces of the United States during
military crisis;
(c) Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;
(d) The operation of legal proceedings;
(e) Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands
or water rights which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the
owner of the water right;
(f) Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either
directly or through the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a
federal program implementing those laws, or acreage limitations, or
production quotas;
(g) Temporarily reduced water need for irrigation use where such
reduction is due to varying weather conditions, including but not
limited to precipitation and temperature, that warranted the reduction
in water use, so long as the water user's diversion and delivery
facilities are maintained in good operating condition consistent with
beneficial use of the full amount of the water right;
(h) Temporarily reduced diversions or withdrawals of irrigation
water directly resulting from the provisions of a contract or similar
agreement in which a supplier of electricity buys back electricity from
the water right holder and the electricity is needed for the diversion
or withdrawal or for the use of the water diverted or withdrawn for
irrigation purposes;
(i) Water conservation measures implemented under the Yakima river
basin water enhancement project, so long as the conserved water is
reallocated in accordance with the provisions of P.L. 103-434;
(j) Reliance by an irrigation water user on the transitory presence
of return flows in lieu of diversion or withdrawal of water from the
primary source of supply, if such return flows are measured or reliably
estimated using a scientific methodology generally accepted as reliable
within the scientific community; or
(k) The reduced use of irrigation water resulting from crop
rotation. For purposes of this subsection, crop rotation means the
temporary change in the type of crops grown resulting from the exercise
of generally recognized sound farming practices. Unused water
resulting from crop rotation will not be relinquished if the remaining
portion of the water continues to be beneficially used.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.180, there shall be no relinquishment of any water right:
(a) If such right is claimed for power development purposes under
chapter 90.16 RCW and annual license fees are paid in accordance with
chapter 90.16 RCW;
(b) If such right is used for a standby or reserve water supply to
be used in time of drought or other low flow period so long as
withdrawal or diversion facilities are maintained in good operating
condition for the use of such reserve or standby water supply;
(c) If such right is claimed for a determined future development to
take place either within fifteen years of July 1, 1967, or the most
recent beneficial use of the water right, whichever date is later;
(d) If such right is claimed for municipal water supply purposes
under chapter 90.03 RCW;
(e) If such waters are not subject to appropriation under the
applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
(f) If such right or portion of the right is leased to another
person for use on land other than the land to which the right is
appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial use of the right in
accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of the right has
been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100;
(g) If such a right or portion of the right is authorized for a
purpose that is satisfied by the use of agricultural industrial process
water as authorized under RCW 90.46.150; ((or))
(h) If such right is a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or
90.42 RCW; or
(i) If such a right or portion of a right is included in a change
or transfer application awaiting final determination from the
department of ecology, provided that during the waiting period
relinquishment is tolled and the nonuse of water is not included in
calculating whether five or more years of nonuse has occurred.
(3) In adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of
2001, the legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 8, 10, and 12 of this act expire
June 30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 (1) Section 4 of this act takes effect
January 1, 2012.
(2) Sections 9, 11, and 13 of this act take effect June 30, 2019.

--- END ---