BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.13A.020 and 2009 c 520 s 66 and 2009 c 491 s 9 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary shall issue rules and regulations to assist in
the administration of the program of adoption support authorized by RCW
26.33.320 and 74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080.
(2) Disbursements from the appropriations available from the
general fund shall be made pursuant to this chapter and such rules and
regulations and pursuant to agreements conforming thereto to be made by
the secretary with parents for the purpose of supporting the adoption
of children in, or likely to be placed in, foster homes or child caring
institutions who are found by the secretary to be ((difficult)) hard to
place in adoption because of physical or other reasons; including, but
not limited to, physical or mental handicap, emotional disturbance,
ethnic background, language, race, color, age, or sibling grouping.
(3) Such agreements shall meet the following criteria:
(a) The child whose adoption is to be supported pursuant to such
agreement shall be or have been a child hard to place in adoption.
(b) Such agreement must relate to a child who was or is residing in
a foster home or child-caring institution or a child who, in the
judgment of the secretary, is both eligible for, and likely to be
placed in, either a foster home or a child-caring institution.
(c) Such agreement shall provide that adoption support shall not
continue beyond the time that the adopted child reaches eighteen years
of age, becomes emancipated, dies, or otherwise ceases to need support.
If the secretary finds that continuing dependency of such child after
such child reaches eighteen years of age warrants the continuation of
support pursuant to RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080 the
secretary may do so, subject to all the provisions of RCW 26.33.320 and
74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080, including annual review of the amount of
such support.
(d) Any prospective parent who is to be a party to such agreement
shall be a person who has the character, judgment, sense of
responsibility, and disposition which make him or her suitable as an
adoptive parent of such child.
(4) At least six months before an adoption is finalized under
chapter 26.33 RCW and RCW ((74.13.100)) 74.13A.005 through
((74.13.145)) 74.13A.080, the department must provide to the
prospective adoptive parent, in writing, information describing the
limits of the adoption support program including the following
information:
(a) The limits on monthly cash payments to adoptive families;
(b) The limits on the availability of children's mental health
services and the funds with which to pay for these services;
(c) The process for accessing mental health services for children
receiving adoption support services;
(d) The limits on the one-time cash payments to adoptive families
for expenses related to their adopted children; and
(e) That payment for residential or group care is not available for
adopted children under the adoption support program.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.13A.025 and 1996 c 130 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the factors to be
considered by the secretary in setting the amount of any payment or
payments to be made pursuant to RCW 26.33.320 and ((74.13.100))
74.13A.005 through ((74.13.145)) 74.13A.080 and in adjusting standards
hereunder shall include: The size of the family including the adoptive
child, the usual living expenses of the family, the special needs of
any family member including education needs, the family income, the
family resources and plan for savings, the medical and hospitalization
needs of the family, the family's means of purchasing or otherwise
receiving such care, and any other expenses likely to be needed by the
child to be adopted.
(2)(a) An adoptive parent who adopts a child from the foster care
system after providing foster care services to that child does not
qualify for the adoption support subsidy if he or she received the
basic foster care rate for the child while the child was in care, and
did not spend in excess of the hours one would normally spend meeting
the needs of a typically developing child. The adoptive parent and
child would qualify for all other adoption support services, including
medical care.
(b) An adoptive parent, who was a relative or other unpaid
caregiver during the time an adoptive child was in the dependency
system, and who did not spend in excess of the hours one would normally
spend meeting the needs of a typically developing child and, if
licensed as a foster parent, would have received the basic foster care
rate for the child, does not qualify for the adoption support subsidy
but the child shall qualify for all other adoption support program
services, including medical care.
(3) In setting the amount of any initial payment made pursuant to
RCW 26.33.320 and ((74.13.100)) 74.13A.005 through ((74.13.145))
74.13A.080, the secretary is authorized to establish maximum payment
amounts that are reasonable and allow permanency planning goals related
to adoption of children under RCW 13.34.145 to be achieved at the
earliest possible date.
(4) The amounts paid for the support of a child pursuant to RCW
26.33.320 and ((74.13.100)) 74.13A.005 through ((74.13.145)) 74.13A.080
may vary from family to family and from year to year. Due to changes
in economic circumstances or the needs of the child such payments may
be discontinued and later resumed.
(5) Payments under RCW 26.33.320 and ((74.13.100)) 74.13A.005
through ((74.13.145)) 74.13A.080 may be continued by the secretary
subject to review as provided for herein, if such parent or parents
having such child in their custody establish their residence in another
state or a foreign jurisdiction.
(6) In fixing the standards to govern the amount and character of
payments to be made for the support of adopted children pursuant to RCW
26.33.320 and ((74.13.100)) 74.13A.005 through ((74.13.145)) 74.13A.080
and before issuing rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of
RCW 26.33.320 and ((74.13.100)) 74.13A.005 through ((74.13.145))
74.13A.080, the secretary shall consider the comments and
recommendations of the committee designated by the secretary to advise
him or her with respect to child welfare.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.13A RCW
to read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter prohibits an adoptive parent from seeking
payments or assistance under this chapter after the finalization of the
adoption of a child who was in, or likely to be placed in, foster care
or relative or other unpaid care, prior to the adoption, but who, at
the time of adoption, was not considered hard to place.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.13A.050 and 2009 c 520 s 67 are each amended to
read as follows:
An agreement for adoption support made before January 1, 1985, or
pursuant to RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080, although
subject to review and adjustment as provided for herein, shall, as to
the standard used by the secretary in making such review or reviews and
any such adjustment, constitutes a contract within the meaning of
section 10, Article I of the United States Constitution and section 23,
Article I of the state Constitution. For that reason once such an
agreement has been made any review of and adjustment under such
agreement shall as to the standards used by the secretary, be made only
subject to the provisions of RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13A.005 through
74.13A.080 and such rules and regulations relating thereto as they
exist on the date of the initial determination in connection with such
agreement or such more generous standard or parts of such standard as
may hereafter be provided for by law or regulation. Once made such an
agreement shall constitute a solemn undertaking by the state of
Washington with such adoptive parent or parents. The termination of
the effective period of RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080
or a decision by the state or federal government to discontinue or
reduce general appropriations made available for the purposes to be
served by RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080, shall not
affect the state's specific continuing obligations to support such
adoptions, subject to such annual review and adjustment for all such
agreements as have theretofore been entered into by the state.
The purpose of this section is to assure any such parent that, upon
his or her consenting to assume the burdens of adopting a hard to place
child, the state will not in future so act by way of general reduction
of appropriations for the program authorized by RCW 26.33.320 and
74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080 or ratable reductions, to impair the
trust and confidence necessarily reposed by such parent in the state as
a condition of such parent taking upon himself or herself the
obligations of parenthood of a ((difficult)) hard to place child.
Should the secretary and any such adoptive parent differ as to
whether any standard or part of a standard adopted by the secretary
after the date of an initial agreement, which standard or part is used
by the secretary in making any review and adjustment, is more generous
than the standard in effect as of the date of the initial determination
with respect to such agreement such adoptive parent may invoke his or
her rights, including all rights of appeal under the fair hearing
provisions, available to him or her under RCW 74.13A.055.

Sec. 5 RCW 74.13A.060 and 1990 c 285 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary may authorize the payment, from the appropriations
available from the general fund, of all or part of the nonrecurring
adoption expenses incurred by a prospective parent. "Nonrecurring
adoption expenses" means those expenses incurred by a prospective
parent in connection with the adoption of a ((difficult)) hard to place
child including, but not limited to, attorneys' fees, court costs, and
agency fees. Payment shall be made in accordance with rules adopted by
the department.
This section shall have retroactive application to January 1, 1987.
For purposes of retroactive application, the secretary may provide
reimbursement to any parent who adopted a ((difficult)) hard to place
child between January 1, 1987, and one year following June 7, 1990,
regardless of whether the parent had previously entered into an
adoption support agreement with the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 74.13A RCW
to read as follows:
Any section or provision of this chapter that may be susceptible to
more than one construction shall be interpreted in favor of the
construction most likely to satisfy federal laws entitling this state
to receive federal matching or other funds for the adoption support
program. If any part of this chapter is found to be in conflict with
federal requirements which are a prescribed condition to the receipts
of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this chapter is
hereby inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and such finding or
determination shall not affect the operation of the remainder of the
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 This act applies to adoption support
agreements entered into on or after July 1, 2011.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---