BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the economic
crisis has impacted the many Washington families which do not earn
enough annually to keep pace with increasing health care, child care,
and work-related expenses. The legislature further finds that revenues
are insufficient to maintain necessary funding for education, public
safety, health care, and safety net services for elderly, disabled, and
vulnerable people during the unprecedented economic crisis in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature
to provide a means to stabilize revenue collections by imposing a
temporary sales and use tax. It is also the legislature's intent to
provide relief to lower-income working families in Washington in the
form of a sales and use tax exemption.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.020 and 2010 c 106 s 212 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected a tax equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state
of:
(a) Tangible personal property, unless the sale is specifically
excluded from the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(b) Digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services,
if the sale is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail
sale;
(c) Services, other than digital automated services, included
within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(d) Extended warranties to consumers; and
(e) Anything else, the sale of which is included within the RCW
82.04.050 definition of retail sale.
(2) There is levied and collected an additional tax on each retail
car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this
state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The
revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road and nonhighway vehicles as defined in RCW ((46.09.020))
46.09.310, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW ((46.10.010)) 46.10.300.
(5)(a) From June 1, 2011, until June 30, 2013, subject to (b) of
this subsection (5), in addition to the tax imposed upon each retail
sale under subsection (1) of this section, there is imposed a tax in an
amount equal to one percent of the selling price.
(b)(i) If the state's unemployment rate decreases to six and five-tenths percent for four continuous months, the rate of one percent
under (a) of this subsection (5) is reduced to one-half of one percent.
(ii) If the state's unemployment rate decreases to five percent for
four continuous months, no additional tax may be imposed under (a) of
this subsection (5).
(6) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section must be dedicated to
funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470.
The revenue identified in this subsection must be deposited in the
performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.
(((6))) (7) The taxes imposed under this chapter apply to
successive retail sales of the same property.
(((7))) (8) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes
imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 3 RCW 82.08.064 and 2003 c 361 s 304 and 2003 c 168 s 205
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A sales and use tax rate change under this chapter or chapter
82.12 RCW ((shall be)) is imposed (a) no sooner than seventy-five days
after its enactment into law and (b) only on the first day of January,
April, July, or October.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the tax rate
change in section 301, chapter 361, Laws of 2003 or section 2 of this
act.
(3)(a) A sales and use tax rate increase under this chapter or
chapter 82.12 RCW imposed on services applies to the first billing
period starting on or after the effective date of the increase.
(b) A sales and use tax rate decrease under this chapter or chapter
82.12 RCW imposed on services applies to bills rendered on or after the
effective date of the decrease.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "services" means
retail services such as installing and constructing and retail services
such as telecommunications, but does not include services such as
tattooing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
June 1, 2011.

--- END ---