BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.215.410 and 2006 c 265 s 211 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall administer a state-supported early childhood
education and assistance program to assist eligible children with
educational, social, health, nutritional, and cultural development to
enhance their opportunity for success in the common school system.
Eligible children shall be admitted to approved early childhood
programs to the extent that the legislature provides funds, and
additional eligible children may be admitted to the extent that grants
and contributions from community sources provide sufficient funds for
a program equivalent to that supported by state funds. The department
shall establish a copayment for each eligible child. All copayments
must be deposited into the early childhood education and assistance
account established in section 3 of this act for the sole purpose of
funding the early childhood education and assistance program.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.215.425 and 1994 c 166 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the
administration of the early childhood program, including but not
limited to establishing copayments. Approved early childhood programs
shall conduct needs assessments of their service area, identify any
targeted groups of children, to include but not be limited to children
of seasonal and migrant farmworkers and native American populations
living either on or off reservation, and provide to the department a
service delivery plan, to the extent practicable, that addresses these
targeted populations.
The department in developing rules for the early childhood program
shall consult with the advisory committee, and shall consider such
factors as coordination with existing head start and other early
childhood programs, the preparation necessary for instructors,
qualifications of instructors, adequate space and equipment, and
special transportation needs. The rules shall specifically require the
early childhood programs to provide for parental involvement in
participation with their child's program, in local program policy
decisions, in development and revision of service delivery systems, and
in parent education and training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.215 RCW
to read as follows:
The early childhood education and assistance account is created in
the state treasury. All receipts collected from copayments under RCW
43.215.410 must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may
be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may
be used solely for the purposes of the early childhood education and
assistance program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
July 1, 2011.

--- END ---