BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Each year, nearly one billion dollars in public funds are spent
on the purchase of employee insurance benefits for more than two
hundred thousand public school employees and their dependents;
(b) The legislature and school districts and their employees need
better information to improve current practices and inform future
decisions with regard to health insurance benefits;
(c) Recent work by the state auditor's office and the state health
care authority have advanced discussions throughout the state on
opportunities to improve the current system; and
(d) Two major themes have emerged: (i) The state, school
districts, and employees need better information and data to make
better health insurance purchasing decisions within the K-12 system;
(ii) affordability is a significant concern for all employees,
especially for employees seeking full family insurance coverage and for
the lowest-paid and part-time employees.
(2) The legislature establishes the following goals:
(a) Improve the transparency of health benefit plan claims and
financial data to assure prudent and efficient use of taxpayers' funds
at the state and local levels;
(b) Create greater affordability for full family coverage and
greater equity between premium costs for full family coverage and for
employee only coverage for the same health benefit plan;
(c) Promote health care innovations and cost savings, and
significantly reduce administrative costs; and
(d) Provide greater parity in state allocations for state employee
and K-12 employee health benefits.
(3) The legislature intends to retain current collective bargaining
for benefits, and retain state, school district, and employee
contributions to benefits.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.400.280 and 2011 c 269 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, school
districts may provide employer fringe benefit contributions after
October 1, 1990, only for basic benefits. However, school districts
may continue payments under contracts with employees or benefit
providers in effect on April 13, 1990, until the contract expires.
(2) School districts may provide employer contributions after
October 1, 1990, for optional benefit plans, in addition to basic
benefits, only for employees included in pooling arrangements under
this subsection. Optional benefits may include direct agreements as
defined in chapter 48.150 RCW, but may not include employee beneficiary
accounts that can be liquidated by the employee on termination of
employment. Optional benefit plans may be offered only if:
(a) The school district pools benefit allocations among employees
using a pooling arrangement that includes at least one employee
bargaining unit and/or all nonbargaining group employees;
(b) Each full-time employee included in the pooling arrangement is
offered basic benefits, including coverage for dependents((, without a
payroll deduction for premium charges));
(c) Each employee included in the pooling arrangement who elects
medical benefit coverage pays a minimum premium charge subject to
collective bargaining under chapter 41.59 or 41.56 RCW;
(d) The employee premiums are structured to ensure employees
selecting richer benefit plans pay the higher premium;
(e) Each full-time employee included in the pooling arrangement,
regardless of the number of dependents receiving basic coverage,
receives the same additional employer contribution for other coverage
or optional benefits; and
(((d))) (f) For part-time employees included in the pooling
arrangement, participation in optional benefit plans shall be governed
by the same eligibility criteria and/or proration of employer
contributions used for allocations for basic benefits.
(3) Savings accruing to school districts due to limitations on
benefit options under this section shall be pooled and made available
by the districts to reduce out-of-pocket premium expenses for employees
needing basic coverage for dependents. School districts are not
intended to divert state benefit allocations for other purposes.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.400.350 and 2011 c 269 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of directors of any of the state's school districts
or educational service districts may make available liability, life,
health, health care, accident, disability, and salary protection or
insurance, direct agreements as defined in chapter 48.150 RCW, or any
one of, or a combination of the types of employee benefits enumerated
in this subsection, or any other type of insurance or protection, for
the members of the boards of directors, the students, and employees of
the school district or educational service district, and their
dependents. Such coverage may be provided by contracts or agreements
with private carriers, with the state health care authority after July
1, 1990, pursuant to the approval of the authority administrator, or
through self-insurance or self-funding pursuant to chapter 48.62 RCW,
or in any other manner authorized by law. Any direct agreement must
comply with RCW 48.150.050.
(2) Whenever funds are available for these purposes the board of
directors of the school district or educational service district may
contribute all or a part of the cost of such protection or insurance
for the employees of their respective school districts or educational
service districts and their dependents. The premiums on such liability
insurance shall be borne by the school district or educational service
district.
After October 1, 1990, school districts may not contribute to any
employee protection or insurance other than liability insurance unless
the district's employee benefit plan conforms to RCW 28A.400.275 and
28A.400.280.
(3) For school board members, educational service district board
members, and students, the premiums due on such protection or insurance
shall be borne by the assenting school board member, educational
service district board member, or student. The school district or
educational service district may contribute all or part of the costs,
including the premiums, of life, health, health care, accident or
disability insurance which shall be offered to all students
participating in interschool activities on the behalf of or as
representative of their school, school district, or educational service
district. The school district board of directors and the educational
service district board may require any student participating in
extracurricular interschool activities to, as a condition of
participation, document evidence of insurance or purchase insurance
that will provide adequate coverage, as determined by the school
district board of directors or the educational service district board,
for medical expenses incurred as a result of injury sustained while
participating in the extracurricular activity. In establishing such a
requirement, the district shall adopt regulations for waiving or
reducing the premiums of such coverage as may be offered through the
school district or educational service district to students
participating in extracurricular activities, for those students whose
families, by reason of their low income, would have difficulty paying
the entire amount of such insurance premiums. The district board shall
adopt regulations for waiving or reducing the insurance coverage
requirements for low-income students in order to assure such students
are not prohibited from participating in extracurricular interschool
activities.
(4) All contracts or agreements for insurance or protection written
to take advantage of the provisions of this section shall provide that
the beneficiaries of such contracts may utilize on an equal
participation basis the services of those practitioners licensed
pursuant to chapters 18.22, 18.25, 18.53, 18.57, and 18.71 RCW.
(5) School districts offering medical, vision, and dental benefits
shall:
(a) Offer a high deductible health plan option with a health
savings account that conforms to section 223, part VII of subchapter 1
of the internal revenue code of 1986. School districts shall comply
with all applicable federal standards related to the establishment of
health savings accounts;
(b) Make progress toward employee premiums that are established to
ensure that full family coverage premiums are not more than three times
the premiums for employees purchasing single coverage for the same
coverage plan, unless a subsequent premium differential target is
defined as a result of the review and subsequent actions described in
section 6 of this act;
(c) Offer employees at least one health benefit plan that is not a
high deductible health plan offered in conjunction with a health
savings account in which the employee share of the premium cost for a
full-time employee, regardless of whether the employee chooses
employee-only coverage or coverage that includes dependents, does not
exceed the share of premium cost paid by state employees during the
state employee benefits year that started immediately prior to the
school year.
(6) All contracts or agreements for employee benefits must be held
to responsible contracting standards, meaning a fair, prudent, and
accountable competitive procedure for procuring services that includes
an open competitive process, except where an open process would
compromise cost-effective purchasing, with documentation justifying the
approach.
(7) School districts offering medical, vision, and dental benefits
shall also make progress on promoting health care innovations and cost
savings and significantly reduce administrative costs.
(8) All contracts or agreements for insurance or protection
described in this section shall be in compliance with this act.
(9) Upon notification from the office of the insurance commissioner
of a school district's substantial noncompliance with the data
reporting requirements of RCW 28A.400.275, and the failure is due to
the action or inaction of the school district, and if the noncompliance
has occurred for two reporting periods, the superintendent is
authorized and required to limit the school district's authority
provided in subsection (1) of this section regarding employee health
benefits to the provision of health benefit coverage provided by the
state health care authority.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.400.275 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 11 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any contract or agreement for employee benefits executed after
April 13, 1990, between a school district and a benefit provider or
employee bargaining unit is null and void unless it contains an
agreement to abide by state laws relating to school district employee
benefits. The term of the contract or agreement may not exceed one
year.
(2) School districts and their benefit providers shall annually
submit, by a date determined by the office of the insurance
commissioner, the following information and data for the prior calendar
year to the ((Washington state health care authority a summary
descriptions of all benefits offered under the district's employee
benefit plan. The districts shall also submit data to the health care
authority specifying the total number of employees and, for each
employee, types of coverage or benefits received including numbers of
covered dependents, the number of eligible dependents, the amount of
the district's contribution, additional premium costs paid by the
employee through payroll deductions, and the age and sex of the
employee and each dependent.)) office of the insurance commissioner:
(a) Progress by the district and its benefit providers toward
greater affordability for full family coverage, health care cost
savings, and significantly reduced administrative costs;
(b) Compliance with the requirement to provide a high deductible
health plan option with a health savings account;
(c) An overall plan summary including the following:
(i) The financial plan structure and overall performance of each
health plan including:
(A) Total premium expenses;
(B) Total claims expenses;
(C) Claims reserves; and
(D) Plan administration expenses, including compensation paid to
brokers;
(ii) A description of the plan's use of innovative health plan
features designed to reduce health benefit premium growth and reduce
utilization of unnecessary health services including but not limited to
the use of enrollee health assessments or health coach services, care
management for high cost or high-risk enrollees, medical or health home
payment mechanisms, and plan features designed to create incentives for
improved personal health behaviors;
(iii) Data to provide an understanding of employee health benefit
plan coverage and costs, including: The total number of employees and,
for each employee, the employee's full-time equivalent status, types of
coverage or benefits received including numbers of covered dependents,
the number of eligible dependents, the amount of the district's
contribution to premium, additional premium costs paid by the employee
through payroll deductions, and the age and sex of the employee and
each dependent;
(iv) Data necessary for school districts to more effectively and
competitively manage and procure health insurance plans for employees.
The data must include, but not be limited to, the following:
(A) A summary of the benefit packages offered to each group of
district employees, including covered benefits, employee deductibles,
coinsurance, and copayments, and the number of employees and their
dependents in each benefit package;
(B) Aggregated employee and dependent demographic information,
including age band and gender, by insurance tier and by benefit
package;
(C) Total claim payments by benefit package, including premiums
paid, inpatient facility claims paid, outpatient facility claims paid,
physician claims paid, pharmacy claims paid, capitation amounts paid,
and other claims paid;
(D) Total premiums paid by benefit package;
(E) A listing of large claims defined as annual amounts paid in
excess of one hundred thousand dollars including the amount paid, the
member enrollment status, and the primary diagnosis.
(3) Annually, school districts and their benefit providers shall
jointly report to the office of the insurance commissioner on their
health insurance-related efforts and achievements to:
(a) Significantly reduce administrative costs for school districts;
(b) Improve customer service;
(c) Reduce differential plan premium rates between employee only
and family health benefit premiums;
(d) Protect access to coverage for part-time K-12 employees.
(4) The ((plan descriptions and the)) information and data shall be
submitted in a format and according to a schedule established by the
((health care authority)) office of the insurance commissioner under
section 5 of this act to enable the commissioner to meet the reporting
obligations under that section.
(((3))) (5) Any benefit provider offering a benefit plan by
contract or agreement with a school district under subsection (1) of
this section shall ((agree to)) make available to the school district
the benefit plan descriptions and, where available, the demographic
information on plan subscribers that the district ((is)) and benefit
provider are required to report to the ((Washington state health care
authority)) office of the insurance commissioner under this section.
(((4))) (6) This section shall not apply to benefit plans offered
in the 1989-90 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 48.02 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "benefit provider" has the same
meaning as provided in RCW 28A.400.270.
(2)(a) By December 1, 2013, and December 1st of each year
thereafter, the commissioner shall submit a report to the governor, the
health care authority, and the legislature on school district health
insurance benefits. The report shall be available to the public on the
commissioner's web site. The confidentiality of personally
identifiable district employee data shall be safeguarded consistent
with the provisions of RCW 42.56.400(21).
(b) The report shall include a summary of each school district's
health insurance benefit plans and each district's aggregated financial
data and other information as required in RCW 28A.400.275.
(3) The commissioner shall collect data from school districts or
their benefit providers to fulfill the requirements of this section.
The commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement the data
submission requirements under this section and RCW 28A.400.275,
including, but not limited to, the format, timing of data reporting,
data elements, data standards, instructions, definitions, and data
sources.
(4) In fulfilling the duties under this act, the commissioner shall
consult with school district representatives to ensure that the data
and reports from benefit providers will give individual school
districts sufficient information to enhance districts' ability to
understand, manage, and seek competitive alternatives for health
insurance coverage for their employees.
(5) If the commissioner determines that a school district has not
substantially complied with the reporting requirements of RCW
28A.400.275, and the failure is due to the action or inaction of the
school district, the commissioner will inform the superintendent of
public instruction of the noncompliance.
(6) Data, information, and documents, other than those described in
subsection (2) of this section, that are provided by a school district
or an entity providing coverage pursuant to this section are exempt
from public inspection and copying under this act and chapters 42.17A
and 42.56 RCW.
(7) If a school district or benefit provider does not comply with
the data reporting requirements of this section or RCW 28A.400.275, and
the failure is due to the actions of an entity providing coverage
authorized under Title 48 RCW, the commissioner may take enforcement
actions under this chapter.
(8) The commissioner may enter into one or more personal services
contracts with third-party contractors to provide services necessary to
accomplish the commissioner's responsibilities under this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
By June 1, 2015, the health care authority must report to the
governor, legislature, and joint legislative audit and review committee
the following duties and analyses, based on two years of reports on
school district health benefits submitted to it by the office of the
insurance commissioner:
(1) The director shall establish a specific target to realize the
goal of greater equity between premium costs for full family coverage
and employee only coverage for the same health benefit plan. In
developing this target, the director shall consider the appropriateness
of the three-to-one ratio of employee premium costs between full family
coverage and employee only coverage, and consider alternatives based on
the data and information received from the office of the insurance
commissioner.
(2) The director shall also study and report the advantages and
disadvantages to the state, local school districts, and district
employees:
(a) Whether better progress on the legislative goals could be
achieved through consolidation of school district health insurance
purchasing through a single consolidated school employee health
benefits purchasing plan;
(b) Whether better progress on the legislative goals could be
achieved by consolidating K-12 health insurance purchasing through the
public employees' benefits board program, and whether consolidation
into the public employees' benefits board program would be preferable
to the creation of a consolidated school employee health benefits
purchasing plan;
(c) Whether certificated or classified employees, as separate
groups, would be better served by purchasing health insurance through
a single consolidated school employee health benefits purchasing plan
or through participation in the public employees' benefits board
program; and
(d) Analyses shall include implications of taking any of the
actions described in (a) through (c) of this subsection to include, at
a minimum, the following: The costs for the state and school
employees, impacts for existing purchasing programs, a proposed
timeline for the implementation of any recommended actions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 31, 2015, the joint committee must review the
reports on school district health benefits submitted to it by the
office of the insurance commissioner and the health care authority and
report to the legislature on the progress by school districts and their
benefit providers in meeting the following legislative goals to:
(a) Improve the transparency of health benefit plan claims and
financial data to assure prudent and efficient use of taxpayers' funds
at the state and local levels;
(b) Create greater affordability for full family coverage and
greater equity between premium costs for full family coverage and
employee only coverage for the same health benefit plan;
(c) Promote health care innovations and cost savings and
significantly reduce administrative costs.
(2) The joint committee shall also make a recommendation regarding
a specific target to realize the goal in subsection (1)(b) of this
section.
(3) The joint committee shall report on the status of individual
school districts' progress in achieving the goals in subsection (1) of
this section.
(4)(a) In the 2015-2016 school year, the joint committee shall
determine which school districts have met the requirements of RCW
28A.400.350 (5) and (6), and shall rank order these districts from
highest to lowest in term of their performance in meeting the
requirements.
(b) The joint committee shall then allocate performance grants to
the highest performing districts from a performance fund of five
million dollars appropriated by the legislature for this purpose.
Performance grants shall be used by school districts only to reduce
employee health insurance copayments and deductibles. In determining
the number of school districts to receive awards, the joint committee
must consider the impact of the award on district employee copayments
and deductibles in such a manner that the award amounts have a
meaningful impact.
(5) If the joint committee determines that districts and their
benefit providers have not made adequate progress, in the judgment of
the joint committee, in achieving one or more of the legislative goals
in subsection (1) of this section, the joint committee report to the
legislature must contain advantages, disadvantages, and recommendations
on the following:
(a) Why adequate progress has not been made, to the extent the
joint committee is able to determine the reason or reasons for the
insufficient progress;
(b) What legislative or agency actions would help remove barriers
to improvement;
(c) Whether school district health insurance purchasing should be
accomplished through a single consolidated school employee health
benefits purchasing plan;
(d) Whether school district health insurance purchasing should be
accomplished through the public employees' benefits board program, and
whether consolidation into the public employees' benefits board program
would be preferable to the creation of a consolidated school employee
health benefits purchasing plan; and
(e) Whether certificated or classified employees, as separate
groups, would be better served by purchasing health insurance through
a single consolidated school employee health benefits purchasing plan
or through participation in the public employees' benefits board
program.
(6) The report shall contain any legislation necessary to implement
the recommendations of the joint committee.
(7) The legislature shall take all steps necessary to implement the
recommendations of the joint committee unless the legislature adopts
alternative strategies to meet its goals during the 2016 session.

Sec. 8 RCW 42.56.400 and 2012 c 222 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to insurance and financial
institutions is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals
that are related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed
with the board under RCW 7.68.110;
(2) Information obtained and exempted or withheld from public
inspection by the health care authority under RCW 41.05.026, whether
retained by the authority, transferred to another state purchased
health care program by the authority, or transferred by the authority
to a technical review committee created to facilitate the development,
acquisition, or implementation of state purchased health care under
chapter 41.05 RCW;
(3) The names and individual identification data of either all
owners or all insureds, or both, received by the insurance commissioner
under chapter 48.102 RCW;
(4) Information provided under RCW 48.30A.045 through 48.30A.060;
(5) Information provided under RCW 48.05.510 through 48.05.535,
48.43.200 through 48.43.225, 48.44.530 through 48.44.555, and 48.46.600
through 48.46.625;
(6) Examination reports and information obtained by the department
of financial institutions from banks under RCW 30.04.075, from savings
banks under RCW 32.04.220, from savings and loan associations under RCW
33.04.110, from credit unions under RCW 31.12.565, from check cashers
and sellers under RCW 31.45.030(3), and from securities brokers and
investment advisers under RCW 21.20.100, all of which is confidential
and privileged information;
(7) Information provided to the insurance commissioner under RCW
48.110.040(3);
(8) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.02.065, all of which are confidential and
privileged;
(9) Confidential proprietary and trade secret information provided
to the commissioner under RCW 48.31C.020 through 48.31C.050 and
48.31C.070;
(10) Data filed under RCW 48.140.020, 48.140.030, 48.140.050, and
7.70.140 that, alone or in combination with any other data, may reveal
the identity of a claimant, health care provider, health care facility,
insuring entity, or self-insurer involved in a particular claim or a
collection of claims. For the purposes of this subsection:
(a) "Claimant" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(2).
(b) "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(6).
(c) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in RCW
48.140.010(7).
(d) "Insuring entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(8).
(e) "Self-insurer" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.140.010(11);
(11) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.135.060;
(12) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.060;
(13) Confidential and privileged documents obtained or produced by
the insurance commissioner and identified in RCW 48.37.080;
(14) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.37.140;
(15) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.17.595;
(16) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.102.051(1) and 48.102.140 (3) and (7)(a)(ii);
(17) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner in the commissioner's capacity as receiver under RCW
48.31.025 and 48.99.017, which are records under the jurisdiction and
control of the receivership court. The commissioner is not required to
search for, log, produce, or otherwise comply with the public records
act for any records that the commissioner obtains under chapters 48.31
and 48.99 RCW in the commissioner's capacity as a receiver, except as
directed by the receivership court;
(18) Documents, materials, or information obtained by the insurance
commissioner under RCW 48.13.151;
(19) Data, information, and documents provided by a carrier
pursuant to section 1, chapter 172, Laws of 2010; ((and))
(20) Information in a filing of usage-based insurance about the
usage-based component of the rate pursuant to RCW 48.19.040(5)(b); and
(21) Data, information, and documents, other than those described
in section 5(2) of this act, that are submitted to the office of the
insurance commissioner by an entity providing health care coverage
pursuant to RCW 28A.400.275 and section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 48.62 RCW
to read as follows:
If an individual or joint local government self-insured health and
welfare benefits program formed by a school district or educational
service district does not comply with the data reporting requirements
of RCW 28A.400.275 and section 5 of this act, the self-insured health
and welfare benefits program is no longer authorized to operate in the
state. The state risk manager shall notify the state auditor and the
attorney general of the violation and the attorney general, on behalf
of the state risk manager, must take all necessary action to terminate
the operation of the self-insured health and welfare benefits program.

--- END ---