BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 FINDINGS. The legislature finds that it is
in the public interest to seek revenue opportunities through leasing
and modernizing the state's liquor warehousing and distribution
facilities and related operations. The legislature finds that it is
also in the public interest to conduct a competitive process to select
a private sector lessee for this purpose. Nothing in this act is
intended to affect the private distribution or sale of beer or wine,
the operation by the state of state liquor stores, or the authority of
the Washington state liquor control board to oversee, manage, and
enforce state liquor sales.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 COMPETITIVE PROCUREMENT. (1) Within one
hundred twenty days after the effective date of this section, the
office of financial management, in consultation with the Washington
state liquor control board and the liquor distribution advisory
committee, must establish and conduct a competitive process for the
selection of a private sector entity to lease and modernize the state's
liquor warehousing and distribution facilities and related operations.
The competitive process must assume that the Washington state liquor
control board retains its existing exclusive retail spirits sales
business, be designed to encourage the participation of private sector
entities with previous wholesale distribution experience with a public
partner excluding licensees engaged in the manufacture of liquor or the
retail sale of liquor in the state, and be designed to encourage
competition among such entities.
(2)(a) To implement the competitive process required under
subsection (1) of this section, the office of financial management
must, after consultation with the Washington state liquor control board
and the liquor distribution advisory committee, request proposals for:
(i) The lease of or other contract for the entire state liquor
warehousing and distribution business, including the facilities,
operations, and other assets associated with the warehousing of liquor
and the distribution of liquor; and
(ii) The exclusive right to warehouse spirits and to distribute
spirits in the state.
(b) The request for proposals must include without limitation:
(i) A requirement that proposals demonstrate to the satisfaction of
the office of financial management relevant previous experience as well
as the financial capacity to perform obligations under the contract;
(ii) A requirement that proposals demonstrate to the satisfaction
of the office of financial management positive financial benefit to the
state and local government over the term of the proposed lease or
contract compared to projected financial benefits from liquor
warehousing and distribution including, and taking into account without
limitation, an initial up-front payment to the state during the 2011-2013 biennium and proposed profit sharing payments to the state during
the lease or contract term; and projected business and occupation tax
revenues generated as a result of the lease or contract. The office of
financial management, in consultation with the liquor distribution
advisory committee and interested stakeholders, must develop a
definition and criteria on how to determine "positive financial benefit
to the state and local government";
(iii) A requirement that the prevailing proponent deposit into an
escrow account, within fifteen business days after the announcement of
selection of that proposal and definitive resolution of any appeals to
such selection, the full amount of the initial up-front payment offered
in the proponent's response to the request for proposals, pending and
subject to successful negotiation of a mutually acceptable lease or
other contract;
(iv) A requirement that proposals include a quantified commitment
to invest in capital improvements to warehousing and distribution
facilities and a mechanism to ensure that such investments are timely
made, consistent with requirements in a mutually acceptable lease or
contract;
(v) A requirement that proposals include a commitment to assume
responsibility for the costs associated with the operation of liquor
warehousing and distribution;
(vi) A requirement that proposals demonstrate to the satisfaction
of the office of financial management a commitment to improved
distribution including without limitation logistics and delivery
improvements to improve margins, ensure regularity of deliveries to
state or contract liquor stores to reduce out-of-stock problems,
improve service to stores located in geographically remote areas of the
state, expand liquor selection, provide for bottle rather than minimum
case purchasing and stocking of state or contract liquor stores, if
practicable, and enable electronic funds transfer of payments;
(vii) A requirement that proposals include a commitment to offer
employment to the state employees currently in positions relating to
the wholesale distribution of liquor and to recognize and bargain with
any existing bargaining representative of such employees with respect
to terms and conditions of employment;
(viii) A requirement that the variety of brands and types of liquor
available to licensees, contract liquor stores, and state liquor stores
must be equal to or greater than what is being distributed by the
Washington state liquor control board; and
(ix) Measurable standards for the performance of the contract.
(c) Prior to conducting the competitive process outlined in this
section, the request for proposal developed by the office of financial
management shall be reviewed by the house and senate fiscal committees.
Opportunity for public comment regarding the request for proposal shall
be provided.
(d) The office of financial management must publicly disclose an
analysis of the fiscal impacts to state and local government of each of
the offers in the procurement process.
(e) After consultation with the Washington state liquor control
board, local government, and the liquor distribution advisory
committee, the office of financial management is authorized to
recommend to the Washington state liquor control board the proposal
that in the determination of the office of financial management best
meets the criteria required under this subsection (2), in the best
interests of the state. If, in the determination of the office of
financial management, there is no proposals that meet the best interest
of the state, the office of financial management must notify the
Washington state liquor control board to not accept any of the
proposals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 CONTRACT. (1) Within sixty days after the
recommendation of a proposal under section 2 of this act, the
Washington state liquor control board may accept that proposal and
enter into a long-term contract with that entity for the lease of the
business, facilities, and assets associated with the warehousing and
distribution of liquor in the state. The contract must grant the
exclusive right to distribute spirits in the state for the period of
the contract. The contract must include enforceable performance
standards and minimum financial returns to the state. The contract
must provide a provision that allows the state to terminate the
contract should specific performance standards or financial returns to
the state not be realized. The contract must provide for a reasonable
termination notification process as well as financial terms of
termination should termination of contract take place.
(2) If the state receives an up-front payment of one hundred
million dollars or more as a result of accepting a proposal from the
procurement process in section 2 of this act, the contract must provide
that the private entity place the up-front payment into irrevocable
trust with the state being the beneficiary. The contract must provide
that the trust be created in a manner that the state may not receive
more than one-sixth of the up-front payment placed into the trust in
any fiscal year.
(3) The contract must contain provisions that the Washington state
liquor control board maintains the exclusive authority to select
products and determine which products will be carried in state and
contract liquor stores.
(4) The contract must contain provisions that the Washington state
liquor control board must set the prices of liquor for sales in state
and contract liquor stores as well as sales to licensees.
(5) The contract must contain a provision that any financial
deficiencies or losses of the private entity contracting for the
warehousing and distribution of liquor in the state must not be
compensated for in any way by the state, contract stores, consumers, or
licensees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The director of the office of financial
management must appoint a liquor distribution advisory committee. The
purpose of the committee is to assist and make recommendations to the
office of financial management and the Washington state liquor control
board regarding the provisions of this act including, but not limited
to, setting requirements for the competitive procurement process,
selection of a private entity or recommendation that no entity be
selected, and creating the terms of a contract with a selected private
entity. The advisory committee's recommendations and assistance to the
office of financial management and Washington state liquor control
board in regards to the provisions of this act are advisory in nature
and do not prohibit the office of financial management and Washington
state liquor control board from performing their duties under this act
as they deem fit.
(2) The liquor distribution advisory committee is composed of the
Washington state treasurer or his or her designee, a designee from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate determined by the leaders of
each caucus, and a designee from each of the two largest caucuses of
the house of representatives determined by the leaders of each caucus.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Pursuant to RCW 41.06.142(3), the
competitive procurement process and contract provisions in this chapter
are expressly mandated by the legislature and are not subject to the
processes of RCW 41.06.142 (1), (4), and (5).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 DEFINITIONS. For the purposes of this
chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Liquor" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 66.04.010.
(2) "Spirits" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 66.04.010.
(3) "State liquor stores" includes "stores" and "contract liquor
stores" as those terms are defined in RCW 66.04.010.

Sec. 7 RCW 66.08.050 and 2005 c 151 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board, subject to the provisions of this title and the rules,
shall:
(1) Determine the localities within which state liquor stores shall
be established throughout the state, and the number and situation of
the stores within each locality;
(2) Appoint in cities and towns and other communities, in which no
state liquor store is located, contract liquor stores. In addition,
the board may appoint, in its discretion, a manufacturer that also
manufactures liquor products other than wine under a license under this
title, as a contract liquor store for the purpose of sale of liquor
products of its own manufacture on the licensed premises only. Such
contract liquor stores shall be authorized to sell liquor under the
guidelines provided by law, rule, or contract, and such contract liquor
stores shall be subject to such additional rules and regulations
consistent with this title as the board may require;
(3) If a contract under section 3 of this act is not then in
effect, establish all necessary warehouses for the storing and
bottling, diluting and rectifying of stocks of liquors for the purposes
of this title;
(4) Provide for the leasing for periods not to exceed ten years of
all premises required for the conduct of the business (other than
premises subject to a lease or other contract under section 3 of this
act); and for remodeling the same, and the procuring of their
furnishings, fixtures, and supplies; and for obtaining options of
renewal of such leases by the lessee. The terms of such leases in all
other respects ((shall be)) is subject to the direction of the board;
(5) Determine the nature, form and capacity of all packages to be
used for containing liquor kept for sale under this title;
(6) Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and
documents in the name of the board, under such regulations as the board
may fix;
(7) Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations
whatsoever relating to the business of the board (other than
obligations assumed by the lessee through a contract under section 3 of
this act);
(8) Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the
board, and to determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such
employee;
(9) Perform services for the state lottery commission to such
extent, and for such compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon
between the board and the commission;
(10) Accept and deposit into the general fund-local account and
disburse, subject to appropriation, federal grants or other funds or
donations from any source for the purpose of improving public awareness
of the health risks associated with alcohol consumption by youth and
the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington state. The board's
alcohol awareness program shall cooperate with federal and state
agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an active
public beverage alcohol awareness program;
(11) Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the
foregoing or not, to carry out the provisions of this title, and shall
have full power to do each and every act necessary to the conduct of
its business, including all buying, selling, preparation and approval
of forms, and every other function of the business whatsoever, subject
only to audit by the state auditor((: PROVIDED, That)). However, the
board ((shall have)) has no authority to regulate the content of spoken
language on licensed premises where wine and other liquors are served
and where there is not a clear and present danger of disorderly conduct
being provoked by such language.

Sec. 8 RCW 66.08.070 and 1985 c 226 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every order for the purchase of liquor ((shall)) must be
authorized by the board, and no order for liquor ((shall be)) is valid
or binding unless it is so authorized and signed by the board or its
authorized designee.
(2) A duplicate of every such order ((shall)) must be kept on file
in the office of the board.
(3) All cancellations of such orders made by the board ((shall))
must be signed in the same manner and duplicates thereof kept on file
in the office of the board. Nothing in this title ((shall)) may be
construed as preventing the board from accepting liquor on consignment.
(4) In the purchase of wine or malt beverages the board ((shall))
may not require, as a term or condition of purchase, any warranty or
affirmation with respect to the relationship of the price charged the
board to any price charged any other buyer.
(5) This section does not apply to a contract entered into under
section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 66 RCW.

--- END ---