BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends that:
(1) Out-of-the-family home residential services supporting
individuals with developmental disabilities should be available in the
most integrated setting appropriate to individual needs; and
(2) A person with a developmental disability moving from an
institution to a community setting should have the services and support
arrangements needed to meet the person's assessed health and welfare
needs.

Sec. 2 RCW 71A.10.020 and 2010 c 94 s 21 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this title, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Community residential support services," or "community support
services," and "in-home services" means one or more of the services
listed in RCW 71A.12.040.
(2) "Crisis stabilization services" means services provided persons
with developmental disabilities who demonstrate behaviors that
jeopardize the safety or stability of their current living situation.
Crisis stabilization services include:
(a) Temporary intensive services and supports, typically not to
exceed sixty days, to prevent psychiatric hospitalization or
institutional placement or other out-of-home placement; and
(b) Services designed to stabilize the person and strengthen their
current living situation so the person may continue to reside in the
community during and beyond the crisis period.
(3) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(((3))) (4) "Developmental disability" means a disability
attributable to intellectual disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy,
autism, or another neurological or other condition of an individual
found by the secretary to be closely related to an intellectual
disability or to require treatment similar to that required for
individuals with intellectual disabilities, which disability originates
before the individual attains age eighteen, which has continued or can
be expected to continue indefinitely, and which constitutes a
substantial limitation to the individual. By January 1, 1989, the
department shall promulgate rules which define neurological or other
conditions in a way that is not limited to intelligence quotient scores
as the sole determinant of these conditions, and notify the legislature
of this action.
(((4))) (5) "Eligible person" means a person who has been found by
the secretary under RCW 71A.16.040 to be eligible for services.
(((5))) (6) "Habilitative services" means those services provided
by program personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining
life skills and to raise their levels of physical, mental, social, and
vocational functioning. Habilitative services include education,
training for employment, and therapy.
(((6))) (7) "Legal representative" means a parent of a person who
is under eighteen years of age, a person's legal guardian, a person's
limited guardian when the subject matter is within the scope of the
limited guardianship, a person's attorney-at-law, a person's
attorney-in-fact, or any other person who is authorized by law to act
for another person.
(((7))) (8) "Notice" or "notification" of an action of the
secretary means notice in compliance with RCW 71A.10.060.
(((8))) (9) "Residential habilitation center" means a state-operated facility for persons with developmental disabilities governed
by chapter 71A.20 RCW.
(((9))) (10) "Respite services" means short-term services provided
to people with disabilities unable to care for themselves because of
the absence of or need for relief by caregivers usually providing the
care. "Respite services" includes both in-home and out-of-home care on
an hourly and daily basis, including twenty-four hour care for several
consecutive days. Respite care workers provide supervision,
companionship, and personal care services temporarily replacing those
provided by the primary caregiver of the person with disabilities.
Respite care may include other services needed by the client, including
medical care which must be provided by a licensed health care
practitioner.
(11) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services
or the secretary's designee.
(((10))) (12) "Service" or "services" means services provided by
state or local government to carry out this title.
(((11))) (13) "State-operated living alternative" means community
residential services that may include assistance with activities of
daily living, behavioral, habilitative, interpersonal, protective,
medical, nursing, and mobility supports to individuals who have been
assessed by the department as meeting state and federal requirements
for eligibility in home and community-based waiver programs for
individuals with developmental disabilities. State-operated living
alternatives are staffed with state employees.
(14) "Supported living" means community residential services that
may include assistance with activities of daily living, behavioral,
habilitative, interpersonal, protective, medical, nursing, and mobility
supports provided to individuals with disabilities who have been
assessed by the department as meeting state and federal requirements
for eligibility in home and community-based waiver programs for
individuals with developmental disabilities. Supported living services
are provided under contracts with private agencies or with individuals
who are not state employees.
(15) "Vacancy" means an opening at a residential habilitation
center, which when filled, would not require the center to exceed its
biennially budgeted capacity.

Sec. 3 RCW 71A.20.010 and 1988 c 176 s 701 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter covers the operation of residential habilitation
centers. The selection of persons to be served at the centers is
governed by chapters 71A.16 and 71A.18 RCW. The purposes of this
chapter are: To provide for those ((children and adults)) persons who
are exceptional in their needs for care, treatment, and education by
reason of developmental disabilities, residential care designed to
develop their individual capacities to their optimum; to provide for
admittance, withdrawal and discharge from state residential
habilitation centers upon application; and to insure a comprehensive
program for the education, guidance, care, treatment, and
rehabilitation of all persons admitted to residential habilitation
centers.
(2) Effective no later than July 1, 2012, no person under the age
of twenty-one years may be admitted to receive services at a
residential habilitation center, unless such admission is limited to
the provision of short-term respite or crisis stabilization services.

Sec. 4 RCW 71A.20.020 and 1994 c 215 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following residential habilitation centers are permanently
established to provide services to persons with developmental
disabilities: Lakeland Village, located at Medical Lake, Spokane
county; ((Rainier School, located at Buckley, Pierce county;)) Yakima
Valley School, located at Selah, Yakima county; and Fircrest School,
located at Seattle((, King county; and Frances Haddon Morgan Children's
Center, located at Bremerton, Kitsap county)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) By December 31, 2011, the department shall close Frances Haddon
Morgan residential rehabilitation center and relocate current residents
consistent with the requirements of section 6 of this act.
(2) By June 30, 2014, the department shall close the Rainier school
and relocate current residents consistent with the requirements of
section 6 of this act.
(3) To assure the successful implementation of these closures, the
department, within available funds:
(a) May offer a nonprofit entity or entities the opportunity to
purchase one or more houses located on the grounds of a closing
facility for the purpose of conversion to state-operated living
alternatives. Before commencing any sale of property, the department
shall first determine the fair market value of the property as well as
estimated costs associated with subdividing lots for the purpose of
determining the cost-effectiveness and viability of any transaction
under this section. For houses located at Frances Haddon Morgan
Center, a nonprofit entity must submit a letter to the department by
September 30, 2011, stating the intent to purchase the house or houses
for conversion to state-operated living alternatives by December 31,
2011;
(b) Shall establish state-operated living alternatives to provide
community residential services to residential habilitation center
residents transitioning to the community under this chapter who prefer
a state-operated living alternative. The department shall offer
residential habilitation center employees opportunities to work in
state-operated living alternatives as they are established;
(c) May use existing or establish new supported living program
capacity in the community for former residential habilitation center
residents who prefer a supported living program;
(d) Shall establish community-based crisis stabilization and
respite services for individuals with developmental disabilities
requiring such services;
(e) May establish regional or mobile specialty services, such as
dental care, physical therapy, occupational therapy, and specialized
nursing care, which can be made available to former residents of
residential habilitation centers and, within available funds, other
individuals with developmental disabilities residing in the community;
and
(f) Provide opportunities for employees of the residential
habilitation centers to compete for employment in state-operated living
alternatives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The department shall:
(1) Within sixty days of admission to a residential habilitation
center, ensure that each resident's individual habilitation plan
includes a plan for discharge to the community;
(2) Use a person-centered approach in developing the discharge plan
by assessing the resident's needs and specifying services and supports
in the plan to enable the resident to successfully transition to the
community, including:
(a) Engaging families and guardians of residents by offering
family-to-family mentoring provided by family members who themselves
experienced moving a family member with developmental disabilities from
an institution to the community. The department may contract with the
developmental disabilities council to provide mentoring services;
(b) Providing residents and their families or guardians
opportunities to visit state-operated living alternatives and supported
living options in the community;
(c) Informing residents leaving a residential habilitation center
that they have a "right to return" to a residential habilitation center
during the first year following their move;
(d) Offering to place, with the consent of the resident or his or
her guardian, each resident of the residential habilitation center on
the appropriate home and community-based waiver, as authorized under 42
U.S.C. Sec. 1396n, and provide continued access to all authorized
waiver services that meet his or her assessed needs;
(e) Providing choice of community living options and providers,
consistent with federal requirements and prioritizing community
placement in close proximity to the resident's family, where possible;
(3) Maximize federal funding for transitioning clients, including
the roads to community living grant; and
(4) Limit the ability of state-operated living alternatives to
reject clients.

Sec. 7 RCW 71A.18.040 and 1989 c 175 s 142 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who is receiving a service under this title or the
person's legal representative may request the secretary to authorize a
service that is available under this title in place of a service that
the person is presently receiving.
(2) The secretary upon receiving a request for change of service
shall consult in the manner provided in RCW 71A.10.070 and within
ninety days shall determine whether the following criteria are met:
(a) The alternative plan proposes a less dependent program than the
person is participating in under current service;
(b) The alternative service is appropriate under the goals and
objectives of the person's individual service plan;
(c) The alternative service is not in violation of applicable state
and federal law; and
(d) The service can reasonably be made available.
(3) If the requested alternative service meets all of the criteria
of subsection (2) of this section, the service shall be authorized as
soon as reasonable, but not later than one hundred twenty days after
completion of the determination process, unless the secretary
determines that:
(a) The alternative plan is more costly than the current plan;
(b) Current appropriations are not sufficient to implement the
alternative service without reducing services to existing clients; or
(c) Providing alternative service would take precedence over other
priorities for delivery of service.
(4) The secretary shall give notice as provided in RCW 71A.10.060
of the grant of a request for a change of service. The secretary shall
give notice as provided in RCW 71A.10.060 of denial of a request for
change of service and of the right to an adjudicative proceeding.
(5) When the secretary has changed service from a residential
habilitation center to a setting other than a residential habilitation
center, the secretary shall reauthorize service at the residential
habilitation center if the secretary in reevaluating the needs of the
person finds that the person needs service in a residential
habilitation center. A person who has moved from a residential
habilitation center to a community-based setting shall be offered a
right to return to a residential habilitation center during the first
year following his or her move to the community.
(6) If the secretary determines that current appropriations are
sufficient to deliver additional services without reducing services to
persons who are presently receiving services, the secretary is
authorized to give persons notice under RCW 71A.10.060 that they may
request the services as new services or as changes of services under
this section.

Sec. 8 RCW 71A.20.080 and 1989 c 175 s 143 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Whenever in the judgment of the secretary, the treatment and
training of any resident of a residential habilitation center has
progressed to the point that it is deemed advisable to return such
resident to the community, the secretary may grant placement on such
terms and conditions as the secretary may deem advisable after
consultation in the manner provided in RCW 71A.10.070. The secretary
shall give written notice of the decision to return a resident to the
community as provided in RCW 71A.10.060. The notice must include a
statement advising the recipient of the right to an adjudicative
proceeding under RCW 71A.10.050 and the time limits for filing an
application for an adjudicative proceeding. The notice must also
include a statement advising the recipient of the right to judicial
review of an adverse adjudicative order as provided in chapter 34.05
RCW.
(2) A placement decision shall not be implemented at any level
during any period during which an appeal can be taken or while an
appeal is pending and undecided, unless authorized by court order so
long as the appeal is being diligently pursued.
((The department of social and health services shall periodically
evaluate at reasonable intervals the adjustment of the resident to the
specific placement to determine whether the resident should be
continued in the placement or returned to the institution or given a
different placement.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW
to read as follows:
Beginning November 1, 2012, and annually thereafter through 2015,
the department shall submit information to the appropriate committees
of the legislature regarding persons who have transitioned from
residential habilitation centers to the community under this chapter,
including:
(1) Number of residential habilitation residents moved from each
facility and the type of facility or community placement the resident
was moved to;
(2) Client and guardian satisfaction with services;
(3) Stability of placement and provider turnover, including
information on individuals who have returned to a residential
habilitation center;
(4) Safety and health outcomes;
(5) Types of services received by clients transitioned to the
community; and
(6) Continued accessibility of former residents to family.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 A new section is added to chapter 71A.20
RCW to read as follows:
There is established in the state treasury the community
residential investment account. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Any savings achieved through the
consolidation or closure of a residential habilitation center may be
deposited into the community residential investment account.
Expenditures from the account may only be used to extend service to
people with developmental disabilities currently receiving limited or
no services or to enhance rates paid to community residential service
businesses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Section 6 of this act is necessary for the
immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect June 30, 2011.

--- END ---