BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the multitude
of tax exemptions built into our state tax code have the same effect on
the budgeting of state revenues as expenditures for education, higher
education, physical and mental health care, criminal justice, and
environmental protection.
(2) The legislature further finds that tax exemptions do not
provide an inherently greater benefit than these other allocated public
expenditures, especially during times of an underperforming economy and
when available revenues are inadequate to fund the state's basic
commitments to educate, care for the vulnerable and protect the health
and safety of the public and the environment.
(3) Therefore it is the legislature's intent to request that the
people determine that existing tax exemptions should not be privileged
under the law nor subject to a greater threshold required to modify or
end them than are other expenditures provided for in the state general
fund.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.135.034 and 2011 c 1 s 2 (Initiative Measure No.
1053) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) After July 1, 1995, any action or combination of actions by the
legislature that raises taxes may be taken only if approved by at least
two-thirds legislative approval in both the house of representatives
and the senate. Pursuant to the referendum power set forth in Article
II, section 1(b) of the state Constitution, tax increases may be
referred to the voters for their approval or rejection at an election.
(2)(a) If the legislative action under subsection (1) of this
section will result in expenditures in excess of the state expenditure
limit, then the action of the legislature ((shall)) does not take
effect until approved by a vote of the people at a November general
election. The state expenditure limit committee ((shall)) must adjust
the state expenditure limit by the amount of additional revenue
approved by the voters under this section. This adjustment ((shall))
may not exceed the amount of revenue generated by the legislative
action during the first full fiscal year in which it is in effect. The
state expenditure limit ((shall)) must be adjusted downward upon
expiration or repeal of the legislative action.
(b) The ballot title for any vote of the people required under this
section ((shall)) must be substantially as follows:

"Shall taxes be imposed on . . . . . . . in order to allow a
spending increase above last year's authorized spending adjusted for
personal income growth?"

(3)(a) The state expenditure limit may be exceeded upon declaration
of an emergency for a period not to exceed twenty-four months by a law
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and
signed by the governor. The law ((shall)) must set forth the nature of
the emergency, which is limited to natural disasters that require
immediate government action to alleviate human suffering and provide
humanitarian assistance. The state expenditure limit may be exceeded
for no more than twenty-four months following the declaration of the
emergency and only for the purposes contained in the emergency
declaration.
(b) Additional taxes required for an emergency under this section
may be imposed only until thirty days following the next general
election, unless an extension is approved at that general election.
The additional taxes ((shall)) expire upon expiration of the
declaration of emergency. The legislature ((shall)) may not impose
additional taxes for emergency purposes under this subsection unless
funds in the education construction fund have been exhausted.
(c) The state or any political subdivision of the state ((shall))
may not impose any tax on intangible property listed in RCW 84.36.070
as that statute exists on January 1, 1993.
(4) If the cost of any state program or function is shifted from
the state general fund to another source of funding, or if moneys are
transferred from the state general fund to another fund or account, the
state expenditure limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW
43.135.025(5), shall lower the state expenditure limit to reflect the
shift. For the purposes of this section, a transfer of money from the
state general fund to another fund or account includes any state
legislative action taken that has the effect of reducing revenues from
a particular source, where such revenues would otherwise be deposited
into the state general fund, while increasing the revenues from that
particular source to another state or local government account. This
subsection does not apply to: (a) The dedication or use of lottery
revenues under RCW 67.70.240(3), in support of education or education
expenditures; or (b) a transfer of moneys to, or an expenditure from,
the budget stabilization account.
(5) If the cost of any state program or function and the ongoing
revenue necessary to fund the program or function are shifted to the
state general fund on or after January 1, 2007, the state expenditure
limit committee, acting pursuant to RCW 43.135.025(5), ((shall)) must
increase the state expenditure limit to reflect the shift unless the
shifted revenue had previously been shifted from the general fund.
(6) For the purposes of this chapter, "raises taxes" means any
action or combination of actions, other than a reduction, repeal,
termination, expiration, or other modification of a tax preference as
defined by RCW 43.136.021, by the legislature that increases state tax
revenue deposited in any fund, budget, or account, regardless of
whether the revenues are deposited into the general fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The secretary of state shall submit this act
to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the
next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with
Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to
facilitate its operation.

--- END ---