BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that there is a
critical need to maintain public services that support the high quality
of life in Washington state by providing opportunities for
Washingtonians to live healthy, productive, and successful lives,
providing care and support for those who are unable to care for
themselves, and helping to ensure that Washington remains a safe,
beautiful, vibrant place to live, work, and raise a family.
(2) The legislature finds that the payment of duly owed excise
taxes is the responsibility of a business' corporate officers. By
failing to meet these obligations, such corporate officers shift the
burden of the payment of taxes onto other businesses and provides those
officers with a competitive advantage. The legislature further finds
that during this economic crisis and the necessity to balance the
budget, strengthening compliance measures meets general tax policy
goals and enhances revenue collections without the imposition of new
taxes. At a time when virtually every area of the budget is being
reduced by substantial amounts, corporate officers must meet their
fairly imposed tax obligations so that all citizens bear some of the
burden to balance the budget.
(3) Therefore, it is the legislature's intent that the additional
revenues from enhanced compliance of excise tax payments by responsible
corporate officers in this act be used to support schools, colleges,
health care, public safety, environmental protection, and other core
functions of the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.32.145 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 23 s 801 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever the department has issued a warrant under RCW
82.32.210 for the collection of unpaid ((retail sales tax funds
collected and held in trust under RCW 82.08.050)) taxes from a limited
liability business entity and that business entity has been terminated,
dissolved, or abandoned, or is insolvent, the department may pursue
collection of the entity's unpaid ((sales)) taxes, including penalties
and interest on those taxes, against any or all of the responsible
individuals. For purposes of this subsection, "insolvent" means the
condition that results when the sum of the entity's debts exceeds the
fair market value of its assets. The department may presume that an
entity is insolvent if the entity refuses to disclose to the department
the nature of its assets and liabilities.
(2) Personal liability under this section may be imposed for state
and local sales ((taxes)) and use taxes, state business and occupation
taxes, and any other state and local taxes collected by the department
in respect to which the provisions of this chapter apply, regardless of
whether the tax is denominated a tax, fee, charge, or some other term.
(3)(a) For a responsible individual who is the current or a former
chief executive or chief financial officer, liability under this
section applies regardless of fault or whether the individual was or
should have been aware of the unpaid ((sales)) tax liability of the
limited liability business entity.
(b) For any other responsible individual, liability under this
section applies only if he or she willfully fails to pay or to cause to
be paid to the department the ((sales)) taxes due from the limited
liability business entity.
(4)(a) Except as provided in this subsection (4)(a), a responsible
individual who is the current or a former chief executive or chief
financial officer is liable under this section only for ((sales)) tax
liability accrued during the period that he or she was the chief
executive or chief financial officer. However, if the responsible
individual had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the
limited liability business entity's ((sales)) taxes to the department
during any period of time that the person was not the chief executive
or chief financial officer, that individual is also liable for
((sales)) tax liability that became due during the period that he or
she had the duty to remit payment of the limited liability business
entity's taxes to the department but was not the chief executive or
chief financial officer.
(b) All other responsible individuals are liable under this section
only for ((sales)) tax liability that became due during the period he
or she had the responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited
liability business entity's taxes to the department.
(5) Persons described in subsection (3)(b) of this section are
exempt from liability under this section in situations where nonpayment
of the limited liability business entity's ((sales)) taxes is due to
reasons beyond their control as determined by the department by rule.
(6) Any person having been issued a notice of assessment under this
section is entitled to the appeal procedures under RCW 82.32.160,
82.32.170, 82.32.180, 82.32.190, and 82.32.200.
(7) This section does not relieve the limited liability business
entity of its ((sales)) tax liability or otherwise impair other tax
collection remedies afforded by law.
(8) Collection authority and procedures prescribed in this chapter
apply to collections under this section.
(9) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Chief executive" means: The president of a corporation; or
for other entities or organizations other than corporations or if the
corporation does not have a president as one of its officers, the
highest ranking executive manager or administrator in charge of the
management of the company or organization.
(b) "Chief financial officer" means: The treasurer of a
corporation; or for entities or organizations other than corporations
or if a corporation does not have a treasurer as one of its officers,
the highest senior manager who is responsible for overseeing the
financial activities of the entire company or organization.
(c) "Limited liability business entity" means a type of business
entity that generally shields its owners from personal liability for
the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the entity, or a business
entity that is managed or owned in whole or in part by an entity that
generally shields its owners from personal liability for the debts,
obligations, and liabilities of the entity. Limited liability business
entities include corporations, limited liability companies, limited
liability partnerships, trusts, general partnerships and joint ventures
in which one or more of the partners or parties are also limited
liability business entities, and limited partnerships in which one or
more of the general partners are also limited liability business
entities.
(d) "Manager" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.005.
(e) "Member" has the same meaning as in RCW 25.15.005, except that
the term only includes members of member-managed limited liability
companies.
(f) "Officer" means any officer or assistant officer of a
corporation, including the president, vice president, secretary, and
treasurer.
(g)(i) "Responsible individual" includes any current or former
officer, manager, member, partner, or trustee of a limited liability
business entity with an unpaid tax warrant issued by the department.
(ii) "Responsible individual" also includes any current or former
employee or other individual, but only if the individual had the
responsibility or duty to remit payment of the limited liability
business entity's unpaid ((sales)) tax liability reflected in a tax
warrant issued by the department.
(iii) Whenever any taxpayer has one or more limited liability
business entities as a member, manager, or partner, "responsible
individual" also includes any current and former officers, members, or
managers of the limited liability business entity or entities or of any
other limited liability business entity involved directly in the
management of the taxpayer. For purposes of this subsection
(9)(g)(iii), "taxpayer" means a limited liability business entity with
an unpaid tax warrant issued against it by the department.
(h) "Willfully fails to pay or to cause to be paid" means that the
failure was the result of an intentional, conscious, and voluntary
course of action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect August 1, 2011.

--- END ---