BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the economic
crisis has impacted the many Washington families which do not earn
enough annually to keep pace with increasing health care, child care,
and work-related expenses. The legislature further finds that revenues
are insufficient to maintain necessary funding for education, public
safety, health care, and safety net services for elderly, disabled, and
vulnerable people during the unprecedented economic crisis in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature
to provide a means to stabilize revenue collections by repealing
certain nonessential tax exemptions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 82.08.0272 (Exemptions -- Sales of semen for artificial
insemination of livestock) and 1980 c 37 s 38;
(2) RCW 82.12.0272 (Exemptions -- Use of personal property in single
trade shows) and 2009 c 535 s 616 & 1980 c 37 s 70;
(3) RCW 82.08.910 (Exemptions -- Propane or natural gas to heat
chicken structures) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 3;
(4) RCW 82.12.910 (Exemptions -- Propane or natural gas to heat
chicken structures) and 2001 2nd sp.s. c 25 s 4;
(5) RCW 82.08.920 (Exemptions -- Chicken bedding materials) and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 25 s 5; and
(6) RCW 82.12.920 (Exemptions -- Chicken bedding materials) and 2001
2nd sp.s. c 25 s 6.

--- END ---