BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.41.020 and 2010 c 94 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following
terms, whenever used in this chapter, shall be deemed to have the
following meanings:
(1) "Department" means the Washington state department of health.
(2) "Emergency care to victims of sexual assault" means medical
examinations, procedures, and services provided by a hospital emergency
room to a victim of sexual assault following an alleged sexual assault.
(3) "Emergency contraception" means any health care treatment
approved by the food and drug administration that prevents pregnancy,
including but not limited to administering two increased doses of
certain oral contraceptive pills within seventy-two hours of sexual
contact.
(4) "Freestanding emergency room" means a facility that is
advertised or presented to the public as an emergency department, but
is not physically connected or adjacent to a hospital licensed under
this chapter.
(5) "Hospital" means any institution, place, building, or agency
which provides accommodations, facilities and services over a
continuous period of twenty-four hours or more, for observation,
diagnosis, or care, of two or more individuals not related to the
operator who are suffering from illness, injury, deformity, or
abnormality, or from any other condition for which obstetrical,
medical, or surgical services would be appropriate for care or
diagnosis. "Hospital" as used in this chapter does not include hotels,
or similar places furnishing only food and lodging, or simply
domiciliary care; nor does it include clinics, or physician's offices
where patients are not regularly kept as bed patients for twenty-four
hours or more; nor does it include nursing homes, as defined and which
come within the scope of chapter 18.51 RCW; nor does it include
birthing centers, which come within the scope of chapter 18.46 RCW; nor
does it include psychiatric hospitals, which come within the scope of
chapter 71.12 RCW; nor any other hospital, or institution specifically
intended for use in the diagnosis and care of those suffering from
mental illness, intellectual disability, convulsive disorders, or other
abnormal mental condition. Furthermore, nothing in this chapter or the
rules adopted pursuant thereto shall be construed as authorizing the
supervision, regulation, or control of the remedial care or treatment
of residents or patients in any hospital conducted for those who rely
primarily upon treatment by prayer or spiritual means in accordance
with the creed or tenets of any well recognized church or religious
denominations.
(((5))) (6) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership,
corporation, company, association, or joint stock association, and the
legal successor thereof.
(((6))) (7) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(((7))) (8) "Sexual assault" has the same meaning as in RCW
70.125.030.
(((8))) (9) "Victim of sexual assault" means a person who alleges
or is alleged to have been sexually assaulted and who presents as a
patient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2012, the authority shall not reimburse,
either directly or in contract, facility charges from a freestanding
emergency room, as defined in RCW 70.41.020, unless that freestanding
emergency room is physically connected to a fully serviceable inpatient
operating room.
(2) The amount paid to the freestanding emergency room under this
section, plus any applicable copayment, coinsurance, or deductible
payable by the person who received services at the freestanding
emergency room for professional charges, constitutes payment in full
for the services rendered at the freestanding emergency room. The
person who receives services at the freestanding emergency room is not
responsible for any portion of the facility charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2012, the department shall prohibit
reimbursement, directly or through a managed care contract, for
facility charges from a freestanding emergency room, as defined in RCW
70.41.020, unless that freestanding emergency room is physically
connected to a fully serviceable inpatient operating room.
(2) The amount paid to the freestanding emergency room under this
section, plus any applicable copayment, coinsurance, or deductible
payable by the person who received services at the freestanding
emergency room for professional charges, constitutes payment in full
for the services rendered at the freestanding emergency room. The
person who receives services at the freestanding emergency room is not
responsible for any portion of the facility charge.

Sec. 4 RCW 51.36.080 and 1998 c 245 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All fees and medical charges under this title shall conform to
the fee schedule established by the director and shall be paid within
sixty days of receipt by the department of a proper billing in the form
prescribed by department rule or sixty days after the claim is allowed
by final order or judgment, if an otherwise proper billing is received
by the department prior to final adjudication of claim allowance. The
department shall pay interest at the rate of one percent per month, but
at least one dollar per month, whenever the payment period exceeds the
applicable sixty-day period on all proper fees and medical charges.
Beginning in fiscal year 1987, interest payments under this
subsection may be paid only from funds appropriated to the department
for administrative purposes.
Nothing in this section may be construed to require the payment of
interest on any billing, fee, or charge if the industrial insurance
claim on which the billing, fee, or charge is predicated is ultimately
rejected or the billing, fee, or charge is otherwise not allowable.
In establishing fees for medical and other health care services,
the director shall consider the director's duty to purchase health care
in a prudent, cost-effective manner without unduly restricting access
to necessary care by persons entitled to the care. With respect to
workers admitted as hospital inpatients on or after July 1, 1987, the
director shall pay for inpatient hospital services on the basis of
diagnosis-related groups, contracting for services, or other prudent,
cost-effective payment method, which the director shall establish by
rules adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
(2) The director may establish procedures for selectively or
randomly auditing the accuracy of fees and medical billings submitted
to the department under this title.
(3) Effective January 1, 2012, the director shall prohibit
reimbursement of facility charges from a freestanding emergency room,
as defined in RCW 70.41.020, unless that freestanding emergency room is
physically connected to a fully serviceable inpatient operating room.
The amount paid to the freestanding emergency room under this
subsection, plus any applicable copayment, coinsurance, or deductible
payable by the person who received services at the freestanding
emergency room for professional charges, constitutes payment in full
for the services rendered at the freestanding emergency room. The
person who receives services at the freestanding emergency room is not
responsible for any portion of the facility charge.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2012, a freestanding emergency room
operating under a license issued by this chapter shall not require or
request any state-purchased health care program as defined in RCW
41.05.011, to pay a facility charge for services rendered in a
freestanding emergency room, unless that freestanding emergency room is
physically connected to a fully serviceable inpatient operating room.
Nothing in this section shall preclude a freestanding emergency room
from seeking reimbursement for professional services rendered at the
facility.
(2) The amount paid to the freestanding emergency room under this
act, plus any applicable copayment, coinsurance, or deductible payable
by the person who received services at the freestanding emergency room
for professional charges, constitutes payment in full for the services
rendered at the freestanding emergency room. The person who receives
services at the freestanding emergency room is not responsible for any
portion of the facility charge.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.36.840 and 2007 c 111 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In order to determine whether organizations, associations,
corporations, or institutions, except those exempted under RCW
84.36.020 and 84.36.030, are exempt from property taxes, and before the
exemption ((shall be)) is allowed for any year, the superintendent or
manager or other proper officer of the organization, association,
corporation, or institution claiming exemption from taxation ((shall))
must file with the department of revenue a statement certifying that
the income and the receipts thereof, including donations to it, have
been applied to the actual expenses of operating and maintaining it, or
for its capital expenditures, and to no other purpose. This report
((shall)) must also include a statement of the receipts and
disbursements of the exempt organization, association, corporation, or
institution.
(2) Educational institutions claiming exemption under RCW 84.36.050
((shall)) must also file a list of all property claimed to be exempt,
the purpose for which it is used, the revenue derived from it for the
preceding year, the use to which the revenue was applied, the number of
students who attended the school or college, the total revenues of the
institution with the source from which they were derived, and the
purposes to which the revenues were applied, listing the items of such
revenues and expenditures in detail.
(3) A nonprofit hospital that claims an exemption under RCW
84.36.040 must file an unofficial copy of their federal Schedule H form
990 with the department within five days of filing the form with the
internal revenue service. The department must make each unofficial
copy of the federal Schedule H form 990 available for download on the
department's web site.
(4) The reports required under ((subsections (1) and (2) of)) this
section may be submitted electronically, in a format provided or
approved by the department, or mailed to the department. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, the reports
((shall)) must be submitted on or before March 31st of each year. The
department ((shall)) must remove the tax exemption from the property of
any organization, association, corporation, or institution that does
not file the required report with the department on or before the due
date. However, the department ((shall)) must allow a reasonable
extension of time for filing upon receipt of a written request on or
before the required filing date and for good cause shown therein.

Sec. 7 RCW 84.36.040 and 2010 c 106 s 305 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The real and personal property used by, and for the purposes
of, the following nonprofit organizations is exempt from property
taxation:
(((a))) (i) Child day care centers ((as defined in subsection (4)
of this section));
(((b))) (ii) Free public libraries;
(((c))) (iii) Orphanages and orphan asylums;
(((d))) (iv) Homes for the sick or infirm;
(((e))) (v) Hospitals for the sick; and
(((f))) (vi) Outpatient dialysis facilities.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (1), "hospitals for the
sick" does not include a freestanding emergency room as defined in RCW
70.41.020 if the freestanding emergency room charges a facility rate
for services rendered on an outpatient basis.
(2) The real and personal property leased to and used by a hospital
for hospital purposes is exempt from property taxation if the hospital
is established under chapter 36.62 RCW or is owned and operated by a
public hospital district established under chapter 70.44 RCW.
(3) To be exempt under this section, the property must be used
exclusively for the purposes for which exemption is granted, except as
provided in RCW 84.36.805, and the benefit of the exemption must inure
to the user.
(4) For purposes of ((subsection (1) of)) this section, "child day
care center" means a nonprofit organization that regularly provides
child day care and early learning services for a group of children for
periods of less than twenty-four hours.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.70.052 and 1995 c 267 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) To promote the public interest consistent with the purposes of
chapter 492, Laws of 1993 as amended by chapter 267, Laws of 1995, the
department shall continue to require hospitals to submit hospital
financial and patient discharge information, which shall be collected,
maintained, analyzed, and disseminated by the department. The
department shall, if deemed cost-effective and efficient, contract with
a private entity for any or all parts of data collection. Data
elements shall be reported in conformance with a uniform reporting
system established by the department. This includes data elements
identifying each hospital's revenues, expenses, contractual allowances,
charity care, bad debt, other income, total units of inpatient and
outpatient services, and other financial information reasonably
necessary to fulfill the purposes of this section. Data elements
relating to use of hospital services by patients shall be the same as
those currently compiled by hospitals through inpatient discharge
abstracts and shall also include patient discharge abstracts for all
visits to a freestanding emergency room, as defined in RCW 70.41.020.
The department shall encourage and permit reporting by electronic
transmission or hard copy as is practical and economical to reporters.
(2) In identifying financial reporting requirements, the department
may require both annual reports and condensed quarterly reports from
hospitals, so as to achieve both accuracy and timeliness in reporting,
but shall craft such requirements with due regard of the data reporting
burdens of hospitals.
(3) The health care data collected, maintained, and studied by the
department shall only be available for retrieval in original or
processed form to public and private requestors and shall be available
within a reasonable period of time after the date of request. The cost
of retrieving data for state officials and agencies shall be funded
through the state general appropriation. The cost of retrieving data
for individuals and organizations engaged in research or private use of
data or studies shall be funded by a fee schedule developed by the
department that reflects the direct cost of retrieving the data or
study in the requested form.
(4) The department shall, in consultation and collaboration with
the federally recognized tribes, urban or other Indian health service
organizations, and the federal area Indian health service, design,
develop, and maintain an American Indian-specific health data,
statistics information system. The department rules regarding
confidentiality shall apply to safeguard the information from
inappropriate use or release.
(5) All persons subject to the data collection requirements of this
section shall comply with departmental requirements established by rule
in the acquisition of data.

--- END ---