BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.27.130 and 1993 c 47 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The mayor and members of the town council may be reimbursed for
actual expenses incurred in the discharge of their official duties upon
presentation of a claim therefor and its allowance and approval by
resolution of the town council. The mayor and members of the council
may also receive such salary as the council may fix by ordinance.
The treasurer and treasurer-clerk shall severally receive at stated
times a compensation to be fixed by ordinance.
The compensation of all other officers and employees shall be fixed
from time to time by the council.
Any town that provides a pension for any of its employees under a
plan not administered by the state must notify the state auditor of the
existence of the plan at the time of an audit of the town by the
auditor. No town may establish a pension plan for its employees that
is not administered by the state, except that any ((defined
contribution)) pension plan in existence as of January 1, ((1990))
1999, is deemed to have been authorized. No town that provides a
((defined contribution)) pension plan for its employees as authorized
by this section may make any material changes in the terms or
conditions of the plan after June 7, ((1990)) 1999.

--- END ---