BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that distributing
generation from new solar energy systems broadly throughout the state
advances state energy policy.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.285.030 and 2009 c 565 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are
not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by
a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state
auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.
(3) "Biomass energy system" means a generation facility that
produces biomass energy and the system:
(a) Commenced commercial operation before March 31, 1999; and
(b) Is located in a county in Washington: (i) That has a three-year average unemployment rate that is equal to or greater than one
hundred twenty percent of the state's unemployment rate; or (ii)
adjacent to a county identified in (b)(i) of this subsection.
(4) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(((4))) (5) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption resulting from increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, or distribution.
(((5))) (6) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.52.030.
(((6))) (7) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council within the department of labor and industries.
(((7))) (8) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases
electricity for ultimate consumption and not for resale.
(((8))) (9) "Department" means the department of commerce or its
successor.
(((9))) (10) "Distributed generation" means: (a) An eligible
renewable resource where the generation facility or any integrated
cluster of such facilities has a generating capacity of not more than
five megawatts; (b) no more than twenty average megawatts in any
calendar year from a solar energy system; or (c) no more than ten
average megawatts in any calendar year from a biomass energy system.
(((10))) (11) "Eligible renewable resource" means:
(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable
resource other than fresh water that commences operation after March
31, 1999, where: (i) The facility is located in the Pacific Northwest;
or (ii) the electricity from the facility is delivered into Washington
state on a real-time basis without shaping, storage, or integration
services; ((or))
(b) Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements completed after March 31, 1999, to hydroelectric
generation projects owned by a qualifying utility and located in the
Pacific Northwest or to hydroelectric generation in irrigation pipes
and canals located in the Pacific Northwest, where the additional
generation in either case does not result in new water diversions or
impoundments; or
(c) Electricity from distributed generation that produces biomass
energy.
(((11))) (12) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as
defined in RCW 19.29A.010.
(((12))) (13) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of
electricity delivered in the most recently completed year by a
qualifying utility to its Washington retail customers.
(((13))) (14) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally
related characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and
other electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the
generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not
limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage,
qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided emissions
of pollutants to the air, soil, or water, and avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases.
(((14))) (15) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined
for the Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific
Northwest electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698;
16 U.S.C. Sec. 839a).
(((15))) (16) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 39.35C.010.
(((16))) (17) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as
the term "electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves
more than twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington.
The number of customers served may be based on data reported by a
utility in form 861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the
energy information administration, United States department of energy.
(((17))) (18) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable
certificate of proof of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible
renewable resource where the generation facility is not powered by
fresh water, the certificate includes all of the nonpower attributes
associated with that one megawatt-hour of electricity, and the
certificate is verified by a renewable energy credit tracking system
selected by the department.
(((18))) (19) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c)
solar energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean,
or tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth or first-growth forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; and (i) biomass energy based
on animal waste or solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or field
residues, food waste, yard waste, organic by-products of pulping and
the wood manufacturing process, or dedicated energy crops that do not
include (i) wood pieces that have been treated with chemical
preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) ((black liquor by- product from paper production; (iii)))
wood from old growth forests; or (((iv))) (iii) municipal solid waste.
(((19))) (20) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other
entity of Washington state government to carry out the intent and
purposes of this chapter.
(((20))) (21) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing
January 1st and ending December 31st.
(22) "Solar energy system" means any device or combination of
devices or elements that rely upon direct sunlight as an energy source
for use in the generation of electricity and at least one-half of the
system is manufactured in Washington and the system:
(a) Is located in Washington; and
(b) Has by July 31, 2012, either:
(i) A site certification from the energy facility site evaluation
council; or
(ii) A land use permit from a local government.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---