BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.51A.010 and 2010 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cannabis" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether
growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of
the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture,
or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or resin. For the purposes of
this chapter, "cannabis" does not include the mature stalks of the
plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil, or cake made from the seeds
of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,
mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks, except the resin
extracted therefrom, fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the
plant which is incapable of germination. The term "cannabis" includes
cannabis products and useable cannabis.
(2) "Collective garden" means qualifying patients or their
designated providers sharing responsibility for acquiring and supplying
the resources required to produce and process cannabis for medical use
such as: A location for a collective garden; equipment, supplies, and
labor necessary to plant, grow, and harvest cannabis; cannabis plants,
seeds, and cuttings; and equipment, supplies, and labor necessary for
proper construction, plumbing, wiring, and ventilation of a garden of
cannabis plants.
(3) "Correctional facility" has the meaning provided in RCW
72.09.015.
(4) "Corrections agency or department" means any agency or
department in the state of Washington, including local governments or
jails, that is vested with the responsibility to manage those
individuals who are being supervised in the community for a criminal
conviction and has established a written policy for determining when
the medical use of cannabis, including possession, manufacture, or
delivery of, or for possession with intent to manufacture or deliver,
is inconsistent with and contrary to the person's supervision.
(5)(a) "Designated provider" means a person who:
(((a))) (i) Is eighteen years of age or older;
(((b))) (ii) Has been designated in ((writing)) a written document
signed and dated by a qualifying patient to serve as a designated
provider under this chapter;
(((c) Is prohibited from consuming marijuana obtained for the
personal, medical use of the patient for whom the individual is acting
as designated provider; and
(d))) (iii) Is the designated provider to only one qualifying
patient ((at any one time)); and
(iv) Is in compliance with the terms and conditions set forth in
RCW 69.51A.040.
(b) "Designated provider" includes a qualifying patient who serves
as the designated provider for another qualifying patient and who may
be in possession of both patients' cannabis at the same time.
(6) "Dispense" means the selection, measuring, packaging, labeling,
delivery, or sale of cannabis by a collective garden or nonprofit
patient cooperative to a qualifying patient or designated provider who
is a member of that collective garden or nonprofit patient cooperative.
(((2))) (7) "Health care professional," for purposes of this
chapter only, means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, a
physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, an osteopathic
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, an osteopathic physicians'
assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, a naturopath licensed
under chapter 18.36A RCW, or an advanced registered nurse practitioner
licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.
(((3))) (8) "Jail" has the meaning provided in RCW 70.48.020.
(9) "Labeling" means all labels and other written, printed, or
graphic matter upon any cannabis intended for medical use or
accompanying such cannabis.
(10) "Medical cannabis registry" means the registry established in
section 8 of this act and administered by and within the department of
health.
(11) "Medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis" means the production,
possession, dispensing, manufacture, delivery, or administration of
((marijuana, as defined in RCW 69.50.101(q),)) cannabis for the
exclusive benefit of a qualifying patient in the treatment of his or
her terminal or debilitating ((illness)) medical condition.
(((4))) (12) "Nonprofit patient cooperative" means a member run
nonprofit corporation registered with the secretary of state under
chapter 24.03 or 24.06 RCW but which is not required to be recognized
as an organization under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) by the federal
internal revenue service. Nonprofit patient cooperatives must meet the
requirements of sections 6 and 10 of this act in order to dispense
cannabis for the medical use of its members. Members of a nonprofit
patient cooperative must be qualifying patients or their designated
providers.
(13) "Peace officer" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.101.010.
(14) "Personally identifiable information" means any information
that:
(a) Includes data that uniquely identify, distinguish, or trace a
person's identity, such as the person's name, date of birth, or
address, either alone or when combined with other sources, that
establish the person is a qualifying patient or designated provider for
purposes of registration with the department of health;
(b) Is used by the department of health to identify a person as a
qualifying patient or designated provider;
(c) Identifies a location as being the location of a collective
garden, nonprofit patient cooperative, qualifying patient, or
designated provider; or
(d) Identifies the qualifying patients or designated providers who
are members of the collective garden or nonprofit patient cooperative.
(15) "Plant" means an organism having at least three
distinguishable and distinct leaves, each leaf being at least three
centimeters in diameter, and a readily observable root formation
consisting of at least two separate and distinct roots, each being at
least two centimeters in length. Multiple stalks emanating from the
same root ball or root system shall be considered part of the same
single plant.
(16) "Public place" includes: Streets and alleys of incorporated
cities and towns; state or county or township highways or roads;
buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance halls and
grounds adjacent thereto; premises where goods and services are offered
to the public for retail sale; public buildings, public meeting halls,
lobbies, halls and dining rooms of hotels, restaurants, theatres,
stores, garages, and filling stations which are open to and are
generally used by the public and to which the public is permitted to
have unrestricted access; railroad trains, stages, buses, ferries, and
other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and the depots,
stops, and waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are open
to unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned bathing
beaches, parks, or playgrounds; and all other places of like or similar
nature to which the general public has unrestricted right of access,
and which are generally used by the public.
(17)(a) "Qualifying patient" means a person who:
(((a))) (i) Is a patient of a health care professional;
(((b))) (ii) Has been diagnosed by that health care professional as
having a terminal or debilitating medical condition;
(((c))) (iii) Is a resident of the state of Washington at the time
of such diagnosis;
(((d))) (iv) Has been advised by that health care professional
about the risks and benefits of the medical use of ((marijuana))
cannabis;((and
(e))) (v) Has been advised by that health care professional that
((they)) he or she may benefit from the medical use of ((marijuana))
cannabis; and
(vi) Is otherwise in compliance with the terms and conditions of
this chapter.
(b) The term "qualifying patient" does not include a person who is
actively being supervised for a criminal conviction by a corrections
agency or department that has determined that the terms of this chapter
are inconsistent with and contrary to his or her supervision and all
related processes and procedures related to that supervision.
(((5))) (18) "Tamper-resistant paper" means paper that meets one or
more of the following industry-recognized features:
(a) One or more features designed to prevent copying of the paper;
(b) One or more features designed to prevent the erasure or
modification of information on the paper; or
(c) One or more features designed to prevent the use of counterfeit
valid documentation.
(((6))) (19) "Terminal or debilitating medical condition" means:
(a) Cancer, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), multiple sclerosis,
epilepsy or other seizure disorder, or spasticity disorders; or
(b) Intractable pain, limited for the purpose of this chapter to
mean pain unrelieved by standard medical treatments and medications; or
(c) Glaucoma, either acute or chronic, limited for the purpose of
this chapter to mean increased intraocular pressure unrelieved by
standard treatments and medications; or
(d) Crohn's disease with debilitating symptoms unrelieved by
standard treatments or medications; or
(e) Hepatitis C with debilitating nausea or intractable pain
unrelieved by standard treatments or medications; or
(f) Diseases, including anorexia, which result in nausea, vomiting,
((wasting)) cachexia, appetite loss, cramping, seizures, muscle spasms,
or spasticity, when these symptoms are unrelieved by standard
treatments or medications; or
(g) Any other medical condition duly approved by the Washington
state medical quality assurance commission in consultation with the
board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as directed in this chapter.
(((7))) (20) "Useable cannabis" means dried flowers of the Cannabis
plant. Useable cannabis excludes stems, stalks, leaves, seeds, and
roots. The term "useable cannabis" does not include cannabis products.
(21)(a) "Valid documentation" means:
(((a) A)) (i) An original statement signed and dated by a
qualifying patient's health care professional written on tamper-resistant paper and valid for up to one year from the date of the
health care professional's signature, which states that, in the health
care professional's professional opinion, the patient may benefit from
the medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis; and
(((b))) (ii) Proof of identity such as a Washington state driver's
license or identicard, as defined in RCW 46.20.035.
(b) In the case of a designated provider, "valid documentation"
means the signed and dated document valid for up to one year from the
date of signature executed by the qualifying patient who has designated
the provider.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.51A.030 and 2011 c 181 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following acts do not constitute crimes under state law or
unprofessional conduct under chapter 18.130 RCW, and a health care
professional may not be arrested, searched, prosecuted, disciplined, or
subject to other criminal sanctions or civil consequences or liability
under state law, or have real or personal property searched, seized, or
forfeited pursuant to state law, notwithstanding any other provision of
law as long as the health care professional complies with subsection
(2) of this section:
(a) Advising a patient about the risks and benefits of medical use
of cannabis or that the patient may benefit from the medical use of
cannabis; or
(b) Providing a patient meeting the criteria established under RCW
69.51A.010(((26))) (17) with valid documentation, based upon the health
care professional's assessment of the patient's medical history and
current medical condition, where such use is within a professional
standard of care or in the individual health care professional's
medical judgment.
(2)(a) A health care professional may only provide a patient with
valid documentation authorizing the medical use of cannabis or register
the patient with the medical cannabis registry ((established in section
901 of this act)) if he or she has a newly initiated or existing
documented relationship with the patient, as a primary care provider or
a specialist, relating to the diagnosis and ongoing treatment or
monitoring of the patient's terminal or debilitating medical condition,
and only after:
(i) Completing a physical examination of the patient as
appropriate, based on the patient's condition and age;
(ii) Documenting the terminal or debilitating medical condition of
the patient in the patient's medical record and that the patient may
benefit from treatment of this condition or its symptoms with medical
use of cannabis;
(iii) Informing the patient of other options for treating the
terminal or debilitating medical condition; and
(iv) Documenting other measures attempted to treat the terminal or
debilitating medical condition that do not involve the medical use of
cannabis.
(b) A health care professional shall not:
(i) Accept, solicit, or offer any form of pecuniary remuneration
from or to a ((licensed dispenser, licensed producer, or licensed
processor of cannabis products)) collective garden or nonprofit patient
cooperative;
(ii) Offer a discount or any other thing of value to a qualifying
patient who is a ((customer)) member of, or agrees to be a ((customer))
member of, a particular ((licensed dispenser, licensed producer, or
licensed processor of cannabis products)) collective garden or
nonprofit patient cooperative;
(iii) Examine or offer to examine a patient for purposes of
diagnosing a terminal or debilitating medical condition at a location
where cannabis is produced, processed, or dispensed;
(iv) Have a business or practice which consists solely of
authorizing the medical use of cannabis;
(v) Include any statement or reference, visual or otherwise, on the
medical use of cannabis in any advertisement for his or her business or
practice; or
(vi) Hold an economic interest in an enterprise that produces,
processes, or dispenses cannabis if the health care professional
authorizes the medical use of cannabis.
(3) A violation of any provision of subsection (2) of this section
constitutes unprofessional conduct under chapter 18.130 RCW.

Sec. 3 RCW 69.51A.040 and 2011 c 181 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The medical use of cannabis in accordance with the terms and
conditions of this chapter does not constitute a crime and a qualifying
patient or designated provider in compliance with the terms and
conditions of this chapter may not be arrested, prosecuted, or subject
to other criminal sanctions or civil consequences, for possession,
manufacture, or delivery of, or for possession with intent to
manufacture or deliver, cannabis under state law, or have real or
personal property seized or forfeited for possession, manufacture, or
delivery of, or for possession with intent to manufacture or deliver,
cannabis under state law, and investigating peace officers and law
enforcement agencies may not be held civilly liable for failure to
seize cannabis in this circumstance, if:
(((1)))(a) The qualifying patient or designated provider possesses
no more than fifteen cannabis plants and:
(i) No more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis;
(ii) No more cannabis product than what could reasonably be
produced with no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis; or
(iii) A combination of useable cannabis and cannabis product that
does not exceed a combined total representing possession and processing
of no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis((.));
(b) ((If a)) The person is both a qualifying patient and a
designated provider for another qualifying patient, ((the person may))
and possesses no more than twice the amounts described in (a) of this
subsection, whether the plants, useable cannabis, and cannabis product
are possessed individually or in combination between the qualifying
patient and his or her designated provider;
(((2))) (c) The qualifying patient or designated provider is
registered with the medical cannabis registry and presents his or her
proof of registration with the ((department of health,)) medical
cannabis registry to any peace officer who questions the patient or
provider regarding his or her medical use of cannabis;
(((3))) (d) The qualifying patient or designated provider keeps a
copy of his or her proof of registration with the medical cannabis
registry ((established in section 901 of this act)) and the qualifying
patient or designated provider's contact information posted prominently
next to any cannabis plants, cannabis products, or useable cannabis
located at his or her residence;
(((4))) (e) The investigating peace officer does not possess
evidence that((:
(a))) the designated provider has converted cannabis produced or
obtained for the qualifying patient for his or her own personal use or
benefit; ((or
(b) The qualifying patient has converted cannabis produced or
obtained for his or her own medical use to the qualifying patient's
personal, nonmedical use or benefit;)) and
(((5))) (f) The investigating peace officer does not possess
evidence that the designated provider has ((served)) violated RCW
69.51A.--- (section 404, chapter 181, Laws of 2011) by serving as a
designated provider to more than one qualifying patient ((within a
fifteen-day period; and)) until fifteen days have elapsed.
(((6))) (2) A qualifying patient or designated provider is not
provided protection from arrest under subsection (1) of this section if
the investigating peace officer has ((not)) observed evidence of any of
the circumstances identified in section ((901(4))) 8(3) of this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.51A.--- and 2011 c 181 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A qualifying patient or designated provider who is not
registered with the medical cannabis registry ((established in section
901 of this act)) may raise the affirmative defense set forth in
subsection (2) of this section, if:
(a) ((The qualifying patient or designated provider presents his or
her valid documentation to any peace officer who questions the patient
or provider regarding his or her medical use of cannabis;
(b))) The qualifying patient or designated provider possesses no
more cannabis than the limits set forth in RCW 69.51A.040(1); and
(((c))) (b) The qualifying patient or designated provider is in
compliance with all other terms and conditions of this chapter((;
(d) The investigating peace officer does not have probable cause to
believe that the qualifying patient or designated provider has
committed a felony, or is committing a misdemeanor in the officer's
presence, that does not relate to the medical use of cannabis;
(e) No outstanding warrant for arrest exists for the qualifying
patient or designated provider; and
(f) The investigating peace officer has not observed evidence of
any of the circumstances identified in section 901(4) of this act)).
(2) A qualifying patient or designated provider who is not
registered with the medical cannabis registry ((established in section
901 of this act, but who presents his or her valid documentation to any
peace officer who questions the patient or provider regarding his or
her medical use of cannabis,)) may assert an affirmative defense to
charges of violations of state law relating to cannabis through proof
at trial, by a preponderance of the evidence, that he or she otherwise
meets the requirements of RCW 69.51A.040. ((A qualifying patient or
designated provider meeting the conditions of this subsection but
possessing more cannabis than the limits set forth in RCW 69.51A.040(1)
may, in the investigating peace officer's discretion, be taken into
custody and booked into jail in connection with the investigation of
the incident.))

Sec. 5 RCW 69.51A.--- and 2011 c 181 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is not a violation of state criminal or civil law if
qualifying patients ((may)) or their designated providers create and
participate in collective gardens ((for the purpose of producing,
processing, transporting, and delivering)) to produce, process,
transport, or deliver cannabis for the medical use of its members or,
in the case of designated providers, the qualifying patients they
serve, or nonprofit patient cooperatives under section 6 of this act,
subject to the following conditions:
(a) Qualifying patients and designated providers may only be
members of one collective garden and one nonprofit patient cooperative;
(b) A collective garden may have no more than ten ((qualifying
patients may participate in a single collective garden at any time))
members;
(((b))) (c) Contributions by members may not be solely monetary;
(d) No more than one collective garden is permitted per property
tax parcel;
(e) Beginning January 1, 2013, collective gardens must register
their locations with the medical cannabis registry;
(f) A collective garden may contain no more than fifteen plants per
((patient)) member up to a total of forty-five plants;
(((c))) (g) A collective garden may contain no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis per ((patient)) member up to a total of
seventy-two ounces of useable cannabis;
(((d))) (h) A copy of each ((qualifying patient's)) member's valid
documentation or proof of registration with the medical cannabis
registry ((established in section 901 of this act, including)) and a
copy of the ((patient's)) member's proof of identity, must be available
at all times on the premises of the collective garden; and
(((e))) (i) No useable cannabis from the collective garden ((is))
may be delivered to anyone other than one of the ((qualifying patients
participating in)) members of the collective garden or a nonprofit
patient cooperative.
(2) ((For purposes of this section, the creation of a "collective
garden" means qualifying patients sharing responsibility for acquiring
and supplying the resources required to produce and process cannabis
for medical use such as, for example, a location for a collective
garden; equipment, supplies, and labor necessary to plant, grow, and
harvest cannabis; cannabis plants, seeds, and cuttings; and equipment,
supplies, and labor necessary for proper construction, plumbing,
wiring, and ventilation of a garden of cannabis plants.
(3))) A person who knowingly violates a provision of ((subsection
(1) of)) this section is not entitled to the protections of this
chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is not a violation of state criminal or civil law for a
nonprofit patient cooperative to distribute cannabis for the medical
use of its members if a city, town, or county in which the nonprofit
patient cooperative is located has enacted an ordinance stating that
nonprofit patient cooperatives are not prohibited by local ordinance
from operation within its jurisdiction. A nonprofit patient
cooperative must comply with all city, town, or county requirements
adopted under RCW 69.51A.--- (section 1102, chapter 181, Laws of 2011)
and the following criteria:
(a) A nonprofit patient cooperative must be registered as a
nonprofit corporation with the secretary of state under chapter 24.03
or 24.06 RCW;
(b) Only qualifying patients or their designated providers may
become members of the nonprofit patient cooperative. Before accepting
a member, the nonprofit patient cooperative must contact that patient's
health care professional and confirm that the patient qualifies for the
medical use of cannabis;
(c) A nonprofit patient cooperative may obtain cannabis from a
collective garden or collective gardens operating under RCW 69.51A.---
(section 403, chapter 181, Laws of 2011), and may produce and process
cannabis subject to the following limits:
(i) A nonprofit patient cooperative may contain no more than
fifteen plants per member up to a total of ninety-nine plants; and
(ii) A nonprofit patient cooperative may contain no more than
twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis per member up to a total of one
hundred forty-four ounces;
(d) Members of a nonprofit patient cooperative are not required to
provide work as part of their membership;
(e) A copy of each member's valid documentation or proof of
registration with the medical cannabis registry and a copy of the
member's proof of identity, must be available at all times on the
premises of a nonprofit patient cooperative;
(f) No useable cannabis from the nonprofit patient cooperative may
be delivered to anyone other than one of the members of the nonprofit
patient cooperative;
(g) Beginning January 1, 2013, a nonprofit patient cooperative must
register its location with the medical cannabis registry;
(h) A nonprofit patient cooperative must ensure that no cannabis or
cannabis paraphernalia may be viewed from outside the facility;
(i) A nonprofit patient cooperative may not be located within one
thousand feet of a community center, child care center, elementary or
secondary school, or college or university. A city, town, or county
may adopt an ordinance providing for distance requirements that are
greater than or less than the distance requirements under this
subsection (1)(i);
(j) A nonprofit patient cooperative may hire staff to assist in the
operation of the nonprofit patient cooperative;
(k) A nonprofit patient cooperative may only sell cannabis and
charge membership fees to its members at a price determined to defray
operating costs of the nonprofit patient cooperative. Fees may be
adjusted based on individual consumption rates and level of
participation in the nonprofit patient cooperative;
(l) A nonprofit patient cooperative may not advertise cannabis for
sale to the general public and may not include pictures or drawings of
cannabis in any facility displays;
(m) A nonprofit patient cooperative may not permit cannabis to be
consumed on the premises of the nonprofit patient cooperative;
(n) A nonprofit patient cooperative must exclude from its premises
people who are not members or employees of the nonprofit patient
cooperative;
(o) A nonprofit patient cooperative must permit city, town, or
county employees to access records at the cooperative in order to
verify patient documentation required by (e) of this subsection.
(2) A person who knowingly violates a provision of this section is
not entitled to the protections of this chapter. If charged with a
violation of state law relating to cannabis, an employee of a nonprofit
patient cooperative is deemed to have established an affirmative
defense to such charges by proof of compliance with this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 69.51A.050 and 1999 c 2 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The lawful possession, dispensing, delivery, or manufacture of
medical ((marijuana as authorized by)) cannabis under this chapter
shall not result in the forfeiture or seizure of any real or personal
property including, but not limited to, cannabis intended for medical
use, items used to facilitate the medical use of cannabis or its
production or dispensing for medical use, or proceeds of sales of
cannabis for medical use made by nonprofit patient cooperatives.
(2) No person shall be prosecuted for constructive possession,
conspiracy, or any other criminal offense solely for being in the
presence or vicinity of ((medical marijuana)) cannabis intended for
medical use or its use as authorized by this chapter.
(3) The state shall not be held liable for any deleterious outcomes
from the medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis by any qualifying
patient.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The medical cannabis registry is established in the department
of health as a secure and confidential registration system for
qualifying patients, designated providers, collective gardens, and
nonprofit patient cooperatives. By January 1, 2013, the department of
health shall adopt rules to create, implement, administer, and maintain
the medical cannabis registry. Beginning January 1, 2013, the medical
cannabis registry must allow:
(a) A health care professional to register a qualifying patient or
designated provider, including locations where the qualifying patient
or designated provider plans to grow cannabis;
(b) A qualifying patient or designated provider to register himself
or herself; and
(c) A collective garden or nonprofit patient cooperative to
register its location.
(2) A peace officer must be able to access the medical cannabis
registry at any time to verify whether a person or location is
registered as a qualifying patient, designated provider, collective
garden, or nonprofit patient cooperative. Such access may be made only
in connection with a specific, legitimate criminal investigation
regarding cannabis.
(3) Before seeking a nonvehicle search warrant or arrest warrant,
a peace officer investigating a cannabis-related incident must make
reasonable efforts to ascertain whether the location or person under
investigation is registered in the medical cannabis registry, and
include the results of this inquiry in the affidavit submitted in
support of the application for the warrant. This requirement does not
apply to investigations in which:
(a) The peace officer has observed evidence of an apparent cannabis
operation that is not a collective garden, nonprofit patient
cooperative, or the personal garden of a qualifying patient or
designated provider;
(b) The peace officer has observed evidence of theft of electrical
power;
(c) The peace officer has observed evidence of illegal drugs other
than cannabis at the premises;
(d) The peace officer has observed frequent and numerous short-term
visits over an extended period that are consistent with commercial
activity, if the subject of the investigation is not a collective
garden or nonprofit patient cooperative;
(e) The peace officer has observed violent crime or other
demonstrated dangers to the community;
(f) The peace officer has probable cause to believe the subject of
the investigation has committed a felony, or a misdemeanor in the
officer's presence, that does not relate to cannabis; or
(g) The subject of the investigation has an outstanding arrest
warrant.
(4) Registration is voluntary for qualifying patients and
designated providers. However, nonprofit patient cooperatives and
collective gardens must register their locations.
(5) Registrations in the medical cannabis registry are valid for
one year; however, qualifying patients or designated providers must be
able to remove themselves from the registry or change their designated
providers at any time.
(6) The department of health must adopt rules providing for:
(a) Registration renewals;
(b) Removing expired registrations from the registry;
(c) Health care professionals' entry of qualifying patients and
designated providers into the registry;
(d) Qualified patients or designated providers to self-register or
remove themselves from the registry;
(e) Collective gardens and nonprofit patient cooperatives to
register their locations; and
(f) Registration fees. Fees, including renewal fees, for
qualifying patients and designated providers participating in the
medical cannabis registry shall be limited to the cost to the state of
implementing, maintaining, and enforcing the provisions of this section
and the rules adopted to carry out its purposes. The fee shall also
include any costs for the department of health to disseminate
information to employees of state and local law enforcement agencies
relating to whether a person is a qualifying patient or designated
provider, or that a location is the address of a qualifying patient,
designated provider, collective garden, or nonprofit patient
cooperative, and for the dissemination of log records relating to such
requests for information to the subjects of those requests. No fee may
be charged to local law enforcement agencies for accessing the
registry.
(7) During the rule-making process, the department of health shall
consult with stakeholders and persons with relevant expertise, to
include, but not be limited to, qualifying patients, designated
providers, health care professionals, state and local law enforcement
agencies, and the University of Washington computer science and
engineering security and privacy research lab.
(8) The medical cannabis registry shall meet the following
requirements:
(a) Any personally identifiable information included in the
registration system must be nonreversible, pursuant to definitions and
standards set forth by the national institute of standards and
technology;
(b) Any personally identifiable information included in the
registration system must not be susceptible to linkage by use of data
external to the registration system;
(c) The registration system must incorporate current best
differential privacy practices, allowing for maximum accuracy of
registration system queries while minimizing the chances of identifying
the personally identifiable information included therein; and
(d) The registration system must be upgradeable and updated in a
timely fashion to keep current with state of the art privacy and
security standards and practices.
(9) The registration system shall maintain a log of each
verification query submitted by a peace officer, including the peace
officer's name, agency, and identification number, for a period of no
less than three years from the date of the query. Personally
identifiable information of qualifying patients and designated
providers included in the log shall be confidential and exempt from
public disclosure, inspection, or copying under chapter 42.56 RCW:
PROVIDED, That:
(a) Names and other personally identifiable information from the
list may be released only to:
(i) Authorized employees of the department of health as necessary
to perform official duties; or
(ii) Authorized employees of state or local law enforcement
agencies, only as necessary to verify that the person or location is a
qualifying patient, designated provider, collective garden, or
nonprofit patient cooperative. Authorized employees who obtain
personally identifiable information under this subsection may not
release or use the information for any purpose other than verification
that a person or location is a qualifying patient, designated provider,
collective garden, or nonprofit patient cooperative or as otherwise
provided in this section;
(b) Information contained in the registration system may be
released in aggregate form, with all personally identifying information
redacted, for the purpose of statistical analysis and oversight of
agency performance and actions;
(c) The subject of a registration query may appear during ordinary
department of health business hours and inspect or copy log records
relating to him or her upon adequate proof of identity; and
(d) The subject of a registration query may submit a written
request to the department of health, along with adequate proof of
identity, for copies of log records relating to him or her.
(10) Fees collected under this section must be deposited into the
health professions account under RCW 43.70.320.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Records containing names and other personally identifiable
information relating to qualifying patients, designated providers,
collective gardens, and nonprofit patient cooperatives, under section
8 of this act are exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

Sec. 10 RCW 69.51A.--- and 2011 c 181 s 1102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Nothing in this chapter is intended to preempt the authority
of cities and towns ((may adopt and enforce any of the following
pertaining to the production, processing, or dispensing of cannabis or
cannabis products within their jurisdiction:)) to impose zoning
requirements, ((business)) licensing requirements, permitting
requirements, health and safety requirements, ((and)) taxes, or other
conditions upon any entity producing, processing, or dispensing
cannabis within its jurisdiction.
((Nothing in this act is intended to limit the authority of cities
and towns to impose zoning requirements or other conditions upon
licensed dispensers, so long as)) However, such requirements ((do)) may
not preclude the possibility of siting ((licensed dispensers))
collective gardens within the jurisdiction. ((If the jurisdiction has
no commercial zones, the jurisdiction is not required to adopt zoning
to accommodate licensed dispensers.))
(b) A city or town may enact an ordinance stating that nonprofit
patient cooperatives as provided in section 6 of this act are not
prohibited within the city's or town's jurisdiction. Cities and towns
may adopt and enforce requirements for nonprofit patient cooperatives
that include but are not limited to: Security requirements; inspection
standards, including policies on verifying qualified patient records;
limits on size of membership; and limits on number of plants and
amounts of useable cannabis so long as such limits do not exceed the
maximum amount allowed under section 6 of this act.
(2)(a) Nothing in this chapter is intended to preempt the authority
of counties ((may adopt and enforce any of the following pertaining to
the production, processing, or dispensing of cannabis or cannabis
products within their jurisdiction in locations outside of the
corporate limits of any city or town:)) to impose zoning requirements,
business licensing requirements, ((and)) permitting requirements,
health and safety requirements, taxes, or other conditions upon any
entity producing, processing, or dispensing cannabis within its
jurisdiction in locations outside the corporate limits of any city or
town.
((Nothing in this act is intended to limit the authority of
counties to impose zoning requirements or other conditions upon
licensed dispensers, so long as)) However, such requirements ((do)) may
not preclude the possibility of siting ((licensed dispensers))
collective gardens within the jurisdiction. ((If the jurisdiction has
no commercial zones, the jurisdiction is not required to adopt zoning
to accommodate licensed dispensers.))
(b) A county may enact an ordinance stating that nonprofit patient
cooperatives as provided in section 6 of this act are not prohibited
within its jurisdiction in locations outside of the corporate limits of
any city or town. Counties may adopt and enforce requirements for
nonprofit patient cooperatives that include but are not limited to:
Security requirements; inspection standards, including policies on
verifying qualified patient records; limits on size of membership; and
limits on number of plants and amounts of useable cannabis so long as
such limits do not exceed the maximum amount allowed under section 6 of
this act.

Sec. 11 RCW 69.51A.--- and 2011 c 181 s 1105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The arrest and prosecution protections established in RCW
69.51A.040 may not be asserted in a supervision revocation or violation
hearing by a person who is supervised by a corrections agency or
department, including local governments or jails, that has determined
that the terms of this section are inconsistent with and contrary to
his or her supervision.
(b) The affirmative defenses established in RCW 69.51A.--- (section
402, chapter 181, Laws of 2011)((,)) and 69.51A.--- (section 405,
chapter 181, Laws of 2011)((, 69.51A.--- (section 406, chapter 181,
Laws of 2011), and section 407 of this act)) may not be asserted in a
supervision revocation or violation hearing by a person who is
supervised by a corrections agency or department, including local
governments or jails, that has determined that the terms of this
section are inconsistent with and contrary to his or her supervision.
(2) The provisions of RCW 69.51A.040, 69.51A.--- (section 403,
chapter 181, Laws of 2011), and 69.51A.--- (section 413, chapter 181,
Laws of 2011) do not apply to a person who is supervised for a criminal
conviction by a corrections agency or department, including local
governments or jails, that has determined that the terms of this
chapter are inconsistent with and contrary to his or her supervision.
(((3) A person may not be licensed as a licensed producer, licensed
processor of cannabis products, or a licensed dispenser under section
601, 602, or 701 of this act if he or she is supervised for a criminal
conviction by a corrections agency or department, including local
governments or jails, that has determined that licensure is
inconsistent with and contrary to his or her supervision.))

Sec. 12 RCW 82.08.0281 and 2004 c 153 s 108 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
drugs for human use dispensed or to be dispensed to patients, pursuant
to a prescription.
(2) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
drugs or devices used for family planning purposes, including the
prevention of conception, for human use dispensed or to be dispensed to
patients, pursuant to a prescription.
(3) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
drugs and devices used for family planning purposes, including the
prevention of conception, for human use supplied by a family planning
clinic that is under contract with the department of health to provide
family planning services.
(4) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of
cannabis for medical use by a nonprofit patient cooperative to
qualifying patients or designated providers if the sale is made in
compliance with the provisions of chapter 69.51A RCW. The definitions
in chapter 69.51A RCW apply to this subsection.
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section.
(a) "Prescription" means an order, formula, or recipe issued in any
form of oral, written, electronic, or other means of transmission by a
duly licensed practitioner authorized by the laws of this state to
prescribe.
(b) "Drug" means a compound, substance, or preparation, and any
component of a compound, substance, or preparation, other than food and
food ingredients, dietary supplements, or alcoholic beverages:
(i) Recognized in the official United States pharmacopoeia,
official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official
national formulary, or any supplement to any of them; or
(ii) Intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease; or
(iii) Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body.
(c) "Over-the-counter drug" means a drug that contains a label that
identifies the product as a drug required by 21 C.F.R. Sec. 201.66, as
amended or renumbered on January 1, 2003. The label includes:
(i) A "drug facts" panel; or
(ii) A statement of the "active ingredient(s)" with a list of those
ingredients contained in the compound, substance, or preparation.

Sec. 13 RCW 82.12.0275 and 2003 c 168 s 406 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of drugs dispensed or to be dispensed to patients, pursuant to
a prescription, if the drugs are for human use.
(2) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of drugs or devices used for family planning purposes,
including the prevention of conception, for human use dispensed or to
be dispensed to patients, pursuant to a prescription.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of drugs or devices used for family planning purposes,
including the prevention of conception, for human use supplied by a
family planning clinic that is under contract with the department of
health to provide family planning services.
(4) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to
the use of cannabis provided or to be provided to qualifying patients
by a nonprofit patient cooperative, if the cannabis is for medical use
in compliance with the provisions of chapter 69.51A RCW. The
definitions in chapter 69.51A RCW apply to this subsection.
(5) As used in this section, "prescription" and "drug" have the
same meanings as in RCW 82.08.0281.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 RCW 69.51A.--- and 2011 c 181 s 406 are
each repealed.

--- END ---