BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.50.204 and 2010 c 177 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless specifically excepted by state or federal law or regulation
or more specifically included in another schedule, the following
controlled substances are listed in Schedule I:
(a) Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters,
ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers whenever the
existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible
within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide);
(2) Acetylmethadol;
(3) Allylprodine;
(4) Alphacetylmethadol, except levo-alphacetylmethadol, also known
as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM;
(5) Alphameprodine;
(6) Alphamethadol;
(7) Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl) ethyl-4-piperidyl] propionanilide); (1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido) piperidine);
(8) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(9) Benzethidine;
(10) Betacetylmethadol;
(11) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(12) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl, some trade or other names: N-[1-(2-hydrox-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide;
(13) Betameprodine;
(14) Betamethadol;
(15) Betaprodine;
(16) Clonitazene;
(17) Dextromoramide;
(18) Diampromide;
(19) Diethylthiambutene;
(20) Difenoxin;
(21) Dimenoxadol;
(22) Dimepheptanol;
(23) Dimethylthiambutene;
(24) Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
(25) Dipipanone;
(26) Ethylmethylthiambutene;
(27) Etonitazene;
(28) Etoxeridine;
(29) Furethidine;
(30) Hydroxypethidine;
(31) Ketobemidone;
(32) Levomoramide;
(33) Levophenacylmorphan;
(34) 3-Methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylprop anamide);
(35) 3-Methylthiofentanyl (N-[(3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(36) Morpheridine;
(37) MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);
(38) Noracymethadol;
(39) Norlevorphanol;
(40) Normethadone;
(41) Norpipanone;
(42) Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl] propanamide);
(43) PEPAP(1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine);
(44) Phenadoxone;
(45) Phenampromide;
(46) Phenomorphan;
(47) Phenoperidine;
(48) Piritramide;
(49) Proheptazine;
(50) Properidine;
(51) Propiram;
(52) Racemoramide;
(53) Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-propanaminde);
(54) Tilidine;
(55) Trimeperidine.
(b) Opium derivatives. Unless specifically excepted or unless
listed in another schedule, any of the following opium derivatives,
including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the
existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible
within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Acetorphine;
(2) Acetyldihydrocodeine;
(3) Benzylmorphine;
(4) Codeine methylbromide;
(5) Codeine-N-Oxide;
(6) Cyprenorphine;
(7) Desomorphine;
(8) Dihydromorphine;
(9) Drotebanol;
(10) Etorphine, except hydrochloride salt;
(11) Heroin;
(12) Hydromorphinol;
(13) Methyldesorphine;
(14) Methyldihydromorphine;
(15) Morphine methylbromide;
(16) Morphine methylsulfonate;
(17) Morphine-N-Oxide;
(18) Myrophine;
(19) Nicocodeine;
(20) Nicomorphine;
(21) Normorphine;
(22) Pholcodine;
(23) Thebacon.
(c) Hallucinogenic substances. Unless specifically excepted or
unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or
preparation which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic
substances, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers
whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation. For the purposes of
this subsection only, the term "isomer" includes the optical, position,
and geometric isomers:
(1) Alpha-ethyltryptamine: Some trade or other names:
Etryptamine; monase; a-ethyl-1H-indole-3-ethanamine; 3-(2-aminobutyl)
indole; a-ET; and AET;
(2) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine: Some trade or other names:
4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; 4-bromo-2,5-DMA;
(3) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine: Some trade or other
names: 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-1-aminoethane; alpha-desmethyl
DOB; 2C-B, nexus;
(4) 2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine: Some trade or other names: 2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; 2,5-DMA;
(5) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine (DOET);
(6) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine: Other name:
2C-T-7;
(7) 4-methoxyamphetamine: Some trade or other names: 4-methoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; paramethoxyamphetamine, PMA;
(8) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine;
(9) 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine: Some trade and other
names: 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; "DOM"; and
"STP";
(10) 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
(11) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);
(12) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine, also known as N-ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, MDE, MDEA;
(13) N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine also known as
N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine,N-hydroxy MDA;
(14) 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine;
(15) Alpha-methyltryptamine: Other name: AMT;
(16) Bufotenine: Some trade or other names: 3-(beta-Dimethylaminoethyl)-5-hydroxindole; 3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl)-5-indolol;
N, N-dimethylserotonin; 5-hydroxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine; mappine;
(17) Diethyltryptamine: Some trade or other names: N,N-Diethyltryptamine; DET;
(18) Dimethyltryptamine: Some trade or other names: DMT;
(19) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine: Other name: 5-MeO-DIPT;
(20) Ibogaine: Some trade or other names: 7-Ethyl-6,6
beta,7,8,9,10,12,13,-octahydro-2-methoxy-6,9-methano-5H-pyndo (1',2'
1,2) azepino (5,4-b) indole; Tabernanthe iboga;
(21) Lysergic acid diethylamide;
(22) ((Marihuana or marijuana;
(23))) Mescaline;
(((24))) (23) Parahexyl-7374: Some trade or other names: 3-Hexyl-1-hydroxy-7, 8, 9, 10-tetrahydro-6, 6, 9-trimethyl-6H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran; synhexyl;
(((25))) (24) Peyote, meaning all parts of the plant presently
classified botanically as Lophophora Williamsii Lemaire, whether
growing or not, the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of such
plant, and every compound, manufacture, salts, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of such plant, its seeds, or extracts; (interprets 21
U.S.C. Sec. 812 (c), Schedule I (c)(12));
(((26))) (25) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
(((27))) (26) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
(((28))) (27) Psilocybin;
(((29))) (28) Psilocyn;
(((30) Tetrahydrocannabinols, meaning tetrahydrocannabinols
naturally contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis (cannabis plant),
as well as synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the
plant, or in the resinous extractives of Cannabis, species, and/or
synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar
chemical structure and pharmacological activity such as the following:
(i) 1 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical
isomers, excluding tetrahydrocannabinol in sesame oil and encapsulated
in a soft gelatin capsule in a drug product approved by the United
States Food and Drug Administration;
(ii) 6 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical
isomers;
(iii) 3,4 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical
isomers;
(Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally
standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical
designation of atomic positions covered.)
(31))) (29) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine: Some trade or
other names: N-ethyl-1phenylcyclohexalymine, (1-phenylcyclohexl)
ethylamine; N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)ethylamine; cyclohexamine; PCE;
(((32))) (30) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine: Some trade or
other names: 1-(1-phencyclohexyl)pyrrolidine; PCPy; PHP;
(((33))) (31) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine: Some trade or
other names: 1-(1-[2-thenyl]-cyclohexly)-pipendine; 2-thienylanalog of
phencyclidine; TPCP; TCP;
(((34))) (32) 1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrrolidine: A trade or
other name is TCPy.
(d) Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant
effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation.
(1) Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid: Some other names include GHB;
gamma-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutanoic acid;
sodium oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate;
(2) Mecloqualone;
(3) Methaqualone.
(e) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant
effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers:
(1) Aminorex: Some other names: aminoxaphen; 2-amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline; or 4, 5-dihydro-5-phenly-2-oxazolamine;
(2) N-Benzylpiperazine: Some other names: BZP,1-benzylpiperazine;
(3) Cathinone, also known as 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone,
alpha-aminopropiophenone, 2-aminopropiophenone and norephedrone;
(4) Fenethylline;
(5) Methcathinone: Some other names: 2-(methylamino)-propiophenone; alpha-(methylamino)propiophenone; 2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpropan-1-one; alpha-N-methylaminopropiophenone;
monomethylpropion; ephedrone; N-methylcathinone; methylcathinone; AL-464; AL-422; AL-463 and UR1432, its salts, optical isomers, and salts
of optical isomers;
(6) (+-)cis-4-methylaminorex ((+-)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine);
(7) N-ethylamphetamine;
(8) N,N-dimethylamphetamine: Some trade or other names: N,N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine; N,N-alpha-trimethylphenoethylene.
The controlled substances in this section may be added,
rescheduled, or deleted as provided for in RCW 69.50.201.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.206 and 2010 c 177 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(a) The drugs and other substances listed in this section, by
whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand
name designated, are included in Schedule II.
(b) Substances. (Vegetable origin or chemical synthesis.) Unless
specifically excepted, any of the following substances, except those
listed in other schedules, whether produced directly or indirectly by
extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by
means of chemical synthesis, or by combination of extraction and
chemical synthesis:
(1) Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or
preparation of opium or opiate, excluding apomorphine, thebaine-derived
butorphanol, dextrorphan, nalbuphine, nalmefene, naloxone, and
naltrexone, and their respective salts, but including the following:
(i) Raw opium;
(ii) Opium extracts;
(iii) Opium fluid;
(iv) Powdered opium;
(v) Granulated opium;
(vi) Tincture of opium;
(vii) Codeine;
(viii) Dihydroetorphine;
(ix) Ethylmorphine;
(x) Etorphine hydrochloride;
(xi) Hydrocodone;
(xii) Hydromorphone;
(xiii) Metopon;
(xiv) Morphine;
(xv) Oripavine;
(xvi) Oxycodone;
(xvii) Oxymorphone; and
(xviii) Thebaine.
(2) Any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof
that is chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances
referred to in subsection (b)(1) of this section, but not including the
isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.
(3) Opium poppy and poppy straw.
(4) Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation
of coca leaves including cocaine and ecgonine, and their salts,
isomers, derivatives, and salts of isomers and derivatives, and any
salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically
equivalent or identical with any of these substances, except that the
substances shall not include decocainized coca leaves or extractions of
coca leaves which do not contain cocaine or ecgonine.
(5) Concentrate of poppy straw (The crude extract of poppy straw in
either liquid, solid, or powder form which contains the phenanthrene
alkaloids of the opium poppy.)
(6) Marihuana or marijuana.
(7) Tetrahydrocannabinols, meaning tetrahydrocannabinols naturally
contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis (cannabis plant), as well as
synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, or in
the resinous extractives of Cannabis, species, and/or synthetic
substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical
structure and pharmacological activity such as the following:
(i) 1 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical
isomers, excluding tetrahydrocannabinol in sesame oil and encapsulated
in a soft gelatin capsule in a drug product approved by the United
States Food and Drug Administration;
(ii) 6 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical
isomers;
(iii) 3,4 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical
isomers;
(Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally
standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical
designation of atomic positions covered.)
(c) Opiates. Unless specifically excepted or unless in another
schedule, any of the following synthetic opiates, including its
isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and
ethers, whenever the existence of such isomers, esters, ethers, and
salts is possible within the specific chemical designation, dextrorphan
and levopropoxyphene excepted:
(1) Alfentanil;
(2) Alphaprodine;
(3) Anileridine;
(4) Bezitramide;
(5) Bulk dextropropoxyphene (nondosage forms);
(6) Carfentanil;
(7) Dihydrocodeine;
(8) Diphenoxylate;
(9) Fentanyl;
(10) Isomethadone;
(11) Levo-alphacetylmethadol, also known as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM;
(12) Levomethorphan;
(13) Levorphanol;
(14) Metazocine;
(15) Methadone;
(16) Methadone—Intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4, 4-diphenyl
butane;
(17) Moramide—Intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1, 1-diphenylpropane-carboxylic acid;
(18) Pethidine (meperidine);
(19) Pethidine—Intermediate-A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine;
(20) Pethidine—Intermediate-B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylate;
(21) Pethidine-Intermediate-C, 1-methyl-4-phenylpiperidine-4-carboxylic acid;
(22) Phenazocine;
(23) Piminodine;
(24) Racemethorphan;
(25) Racemorphan;
(26) Remifentanil;
(27) Sufentanil;
(28) Tapentadol.
(d) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant
effect on the central nervous system:
(1) Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of its
optical isomers;
(2) Methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers;
(3) Phenmetrazine and its salts;
(4) Methylphenidate;
(5) Lisdexamfetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers.
(e) Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant
effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Amobarbital;
(2) Glutethimide;
(3) Pentobarbital;
(4) Phencyclidine;
(5) Secobarbital.
(f) Hallucinogenic substances.
Nabilone: Some trade or other names are ( ± )-trans3-(1,1-dimethlheptyl)-6,6a,7,8,10,10a-hexahydro-1-hydroxy-6,6-dimethyl-9H-dibenzol[b,d]pyran-9-one.
(g) Immediate precursors. Unless specifically excepted or unless
listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or
preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances:
(1) Immediate precursor to amphetamine and methamphetamine:
(i) Phenylacetone: Some trade or other names phenyl-2-propanone,
P2P, benzyl methyl ketone, methyl benzyl ketone.
(2) Immediate precursors to phencyclidine (PCP):
(i) 1-phenylcyclohexylamine;
(ii) 1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC).
The controlled substances in this section may be added,
rescheduled, or deleted as provided for in RCW 69.50.201.

--- END ---