BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.400.201 and 2010 c 236 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that providing students with the
opportunity to access a world-class educational system depends on our
continuing ability to provide students with access to world-class
educators. The legislature also understands that continuing to attract
and retain the highest quality educators will require increased
investments. The legislature intends to enhance the current salary
allocation model and recognizes that changes to the current model
cannot be imposed without great deliberation and input from teachers,
administrators, and classified employees. Therefore, it is the intent
of the legislature to begin the process of developing an enhanced
salary allocation model that is collaboratively designed to ensure the
rationality of any conclusions regarding what constitutes adequate
compensation.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2011, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, in collaboration with the office of financial
management, shall convene a technical working group to recommend the
details of an enhanced salary allocation model that aligns state
expectations for educator development and certification with the
compensation system and establishes recommendations for a concurrent
implementation schedule. In addition to any other details the
technical working group deems necessary, the technical working group
shall consider how a new compensation system should reward educational
attainment, years of service, multiple measures of performance
including those described in RCW 28A.405.100, service in high-demand
fields, and national board for professional teaching standards
certification. The working group shall also make recommendations on
the following:
(a) How to reduce the number of tiers within the existing salary
allocation model;
(b) How to account for labor market adjustments;
(c) How to account for different geographic regions of the state
where districts may encounter difficulty recruiting and retaining
teachers;
(d) The role of and types of bonuses available;
(e) Ways to eliminate or phase out grandfathered salaries for
certificated, classified, and administrative employees to accomplish
salary equalization over a set number of years; ((and))
(f) Initial fiscal estimates for implementing the recommendations
including a recognition that staff on the existing salary allocation
model would have the option to grandfather in permanently to the
existing schedule; and
(g) How to use school-based incentives to encourage and reward
school-wide improvements.
(3) As part of its work, the technical working group shall conduct
or contract for a preliminary comparative labor market analysis of
salaries and other compensation for school district employees to be
conducted and shall include the results in any reports to the
legislature. For the purposes of this subsection, "salaries and other
compensation" includes average base salaries, average total salaries,
average employee basic benefits, and retirement benefits.
(4) The analysis required under subsection (1) of this section
must:
(a) Examine salaries and other compensation for teachers, other
certificated instructional staff, principals, and other building-level
certificated administrators, and the types of classified employees for
whom salaries are allocated;
(b) Be calculated at a statewide level that identifies labor
markets in Washington through the use of data from the United States
bureau of the census and the bureau of labor statistics; and
(c) Include a comparison of salaries and other compensation to the
appropriate labor market for at least the following subgroups of
educators: Beginning teachers and types of educational staff
associates.
(5) The working group shall include four legislators, with one
member from each of the major caucuses in the house of representatives
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and one
member from each of the major caucuses in the senate appointed by the
president of the senate. Additional members shall include
representatives of the department of personnel, the professional
educator standards board, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the Washington education association, the Washington
association of school administrators, the association of Washington
school principals, the Washington state school directors' association,
the public school employees of Washington, and other interested
stakeholders with appropriate expertise in compensation related
matters. The working group may convene advisory subgroups on specific
topics as necessary to assure participation and input from a broad
array of diverse stakeholders.
(6) The working group shall be monitored and overseen by the
legislature and the quality education council created in RCW
28A.290.010. The working group shall make an initial report to the
legislature by June 30, 2012, and shall include in its report
recommendations for whether additional further work of the group is
necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) When reductions in the workforce occur due to enrollment
decline or revenue loss, the employment contracts of any
postprobationary certificated classroom teachers who received the
lowest evaluation rating, as described in RCW 28A.405.100, must have
their contracts nonrenewed first and be recalled last if a recall
occurs.
(2) The board of directors of each school district shall adopt a
written policy governing procedures for the nonrenewal of employment
contracts for certificated classroom teachers as provided for in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) All collective bargaining agreements and other contracts
entered into between a school district and an employee bargaining unit
or an employee after the effective date of this section, as well as
bargaining agreements existing on the effective date of this section,
but renewed or extended after the effective date of this section, must
be consistent with this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
Any policy adopted by a school district board of directors after
the effective date of this section under RCW 28A.150.230 or in a
locally bargained agreement must contain provisions that prohibit
assignment of a certificated classroom teacher to a school in the
lowest tier of the state board of education's accountability index,
unless agreed to by the building principal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---