BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART 1
INTENT
NEW SECTION. Sec. 101 The legislature finds that access to water
is fundamental to a robust economy. The legislature further finds that
in order to ensure that water is accessible to public and private
interests, the state needs to clarify the statutes governing water
management in order to process water right applications in a more
timely way and to ensure that information used to process water right
applications is available and accurate.
The legislature further finds that improvements to water management
will reduce costs to the public as well as water right holders and
benefit the state's economy as well as the needs of instream and out-of-stream interests.
The legislature further finds that additional certainty will be
achieved by clarifying and simplifying the extent to which water usage
records must be retained and by providing clearly articulated policies
for efficient and fair administration of the water resource statutes.
The legislature further finds that this clarification and
simplification will ensure all interests are equally protected because
it will be based on contemporary beneficial use and accurate assessment
of potential impacts on other water right holders as well as the
resource in general. The legislature intends to encourage the use of
changes and transfers of existing water rights to satisfy future water
needs.
Therefore, the legislature declares that reform to the water
resource management system will provide certainty, clarity, and
efficiency in the system, and help ensure a healthy state economy.

PART 2
REVIEW OF WATER RIGHTS AND RELINQUISHMENT
Sec. 201 RCW 90.14.130 and 1987 c 109 s 13 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) When it appears to the department of ecology that a person
entitled to the use of water has not beneficially used ((his)) the
person's water right or some portion thereof, and it appears that said
right has or may have reverted to the state because of such nonuse, as
provided by RCW 90.14.160, 90.14.170, or 90.14.180, the department of
ecology shall notify such person by order: PROVIDED, That where a
company, association, district, or the United States has filed a
blanket claim under the provisions of RCW 90.14.060 for the total
benefits of those served by it, the notice shall be served on such
company, association, district or the United States and not upon any of
its individual water users who may not have used the water or some
portion thereof which they were entitled to use. The order shall
contain: (((1))) (a) A description of the water right, including the
approximate location of the point of diversion, the general description
of the lands or places where such waters were used, the water source,
the amount involved, the purpose of use, and the apparent authority
upon which the right is based; (((2))) (b) a statement that unless
sufficient cause ((be)) is shown on appeal the water right will be
declared relinquished; and (((3))) (c) a statement that such an order
may be appealed to the pollution control hearings board. Any person
aggrieved by such an order may appeal it to the pollution control
hearings board pursuant to RCW 43.21B.310. The order shall be served
by registered or certified mail to the last known address of the person
and be posted at the point of division or withdrawal. The order by
itself shall not alter the recipient's right to use water, if any.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, there is
no relinquishment of any water right if the end of the period of nonuse
of such a right occurred more than twenty years before the date upon
which an order is issued under this section as of the effective date of
this section.

Sec. 202 RCW 90.14.140 and 2009 c 183 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, the
following constitute "sufficient cause" ((shall be defined as)) for the
nonuse of all or a portion of the water by the owner of a water right
((for a period of five or more consecutive years where such nonuse
occurs as a result of)):
(a) Drought, or other unavailability of water;
(b) Active service in the armed forces of the United States during
military crisis;
(c) Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;
(d) The operation of legal proceedings;
(e) Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands
or water rights which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the
owner of the water right;
(f) Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either
directly or through the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a
federal program implementing those laws, or acreage limitations, or
production quotas;
(g) Temporarily reduced water need for irrigation use where such
reduction is due to varying weather conditions, including but not
limited to precipitation and temperature, that warranted the reduction
in water use, so long as the water user's diversion and delivery
facilities are maintained in good operating condition consistent with
beneficial use of the full amount of the water right;
(h) Temporarily reduced diversions or withdrawals of irrigation
water directly resulting from the provisions of a contract or similar
agreement in which a supplier of electricity buys back electricity from
the water right holder and the electricity is needed for the diversion
or withdrawal or for the use of the water diverted or withdrawn for
irrigation purposes;
(i) Water conservation measures implemented under the Yakima river
basin water enhancement project, so long as the conserved water is
reallocated in accordance with the provisions of P.L. 103-434;
(j) Reliance by an irrigation water user on the transitory presence
of return flows in lieu of diversion or withdrawal of water from the
primary source of supply, if such return flows are measured or reliably
estimated using a scientific methodology generally accepted as reliable
within the scientific community; or
(k) The reduced use of irrigation water resulting from crop
rotation. For purposes of this subsection, crop rotation means the
temporary change in the type of crops grown resulting from the exercise
of generally recognized sound farming practices. Unused water
resulting from crop rotation will not be relinquished if the remaining
portion of the water continues to be beneficially used.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.180, there shall be no relinquishment of any water right:
(a) If such right is claimed for power development purposes under
chapter 90.16 RCW and annual license fees are paid in accordance with
chapter 90.16 RCW;
(b) If such right is used for a standby or reserve water supply to
be used in time of drought or other low flow period so long as
withdrawal or diversion facilities are maintained in good operating
condition for the use of such reserve or standby water supply;
(c) If such right is claimed for a determined future development to
take place either within fifteen years of July 1, 1967, or the most
recent beneficial use of the water right, whichever date is later;
(d) If such right is claimed for municipal water supply purposes
under chapter 90.03 RCW;
(e) If such waters are not subject to appropriation under the
applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
(f) If such right or portion of the right is leased to another
person for use on land other than the land to which the right is
appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial use of the right in
accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of the right has
been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100;
(g) If such a right or portion of the right is authorized for a
purpose that is satisfied by the use of agricultural industrial process
water as authorized under RCW 90.46.150;
(h) If such right is a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or
90.42 RCW;
(i) If such a right is involved in an approved local water plan
created under RCW 90.92.090, provided the right is subject to an
agreement not to divert under RCW 90.92.050, or provided the right is
banked under RCW 90.92.070; or
(j) If the end of the period of nonuse of such a right occurred
more than twenty years before the date: (i) Upon which an order is
issued under RCW 90.14.130; (ii) of filing of the department's report
of findings under RCW 90.03.640; or (ii) of a final decision by the
department or a water conservancy board on an application for change or
transfer of a water right under RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.100.
(3) In adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of
2001, the legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.

Sec. 203 RCW 90.14.140 and 2001 c 240 s 1, 2001 c 237 s 27, and
2001 c 69 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, the
following constitute "sufficient cause" ((shall be defined as)) for the
nonuse of all or a portion of the water by the owner of a water right
((for a period of five or more consecutive years where such nonuse
occurs as a result of)):
(a) Drought, or other unavailability of water;
(b) Active service in the armed forces of the United States during
military crisis;
(c) Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;
(d) The operation of legal proceedings;
(e) Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands
or water rights which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the
owner of the water right;
(f) Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either
directly or through the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a
federal program implementing those laws, or acreage limitations, or
production quotas;
(g) Temporarily reduced water need for irrigation use where such
reduction is due to varying weather conditions, including but not
limited to precipitation and temperature, that warranted the reduction
in water use, so long as the water user's diversion and delivery
facilities are maintained in good operating condition consistent with
beneficial use of the full amount of the water right;
(h) Temporarily reduced diversions or withdrawals of irrigation
water directly resulting from the provisions of a contract or similar
agreement in which a supplier of electricity buys back electricity from
the water right holder and the electricity is needed for the diversion
or withdrawal or for the use of the water diverted or withdrawn for
irrigation purposes;
(i) Water conservation measures implemented under the Yakima river
basin water enhancement project, so long as the conserved water is
reallocated in accordance with the provisions of P.L. 103-434;
(j) Reliance by an irrigation water user on the transitory presence
of return flows in lieu of diversion or withdrawal of water from the
primary source of supply, if such return flows are measured or reliably
estimated using a scientific methodology generally accepted as reliable
within the scientific community; or
(k) The reduced use of irrigation water resulting from crop
rotation. For purposes of this subsection, crop rotation means the
temporary change in the type of crops grown resulting from the exercise
of generally recognized sound farming practices. Unused water
resulting from crop rotation will not be relinquished if the remaining
portion of the water continues to be beneficially used.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through
90.14.180, there shall be no relinquishment of any water right:
(a) If such right is claimed for power development purposes under
chapter 90.16 RCW and annual license fees are paid in accordance with
chapter 90.16 RCW;
(b) If such right is used for a standby or reserve water supply to
be used in time of drought or other low flow period so long as
withdrawal or diversion facilities are maintained in good operating
condition for the use of such reserve or standby water supply;
(c) If such right is claimed for a determined future development to
take place either within fifteen years of July 1, 1967, or the most
recent beneficial use of the water right, whichever date is later;
(d) If such right is claimed for municipal water supply purposes
under chapter 90.03 RCW;
(e) If such waters are not subject to appropriation under the
applicable provisions of RCW 90.40.030;
(f) If such right or portion of the right is leased to another
person for use on land other than the land to which the right is
appurtenant as long as the lessee makes beneficial use of the right in
accordance with this chapter and a transfer or change of the right has
been approved by the department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100;
(g) If such a right or portion of the right is authorized for a
purpose that is satisfied by the use of agricultural industrial process
water as authorized under RCW 90.46.150; ((or))
(h) If such right is a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or
90.42 RCW; or
(i) If the end of the period of nonuse of such a right occurred
more than twenty years before the date: (i) Upon which an order is
issued under RCW 90.14.130; (ii) of filing of the department's report
of findings under RCW 90.03.640; or (iii) of a final decision by the
department or a water conservancy board on an application for change or
transfer of a water right under RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.100.
(3) In adding provisions to this section by chapter 237, Laws of
2001, the legislature does not intend to imply legislative approval or
disapproval of any existing administrative policy regarding, or any
existing administrative or judicial interpretation of, the provisions
of this section not expressly added or revised.

Sec. 204 RCW 90.14.200 and 1989 c 175 s 180 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) All matters relating to the implementation and enforcement of
this chapter by the department of ecology shall be carried out in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act,
except where the provisions of this chapter expressly conflict with
chapter 34.05 RCW. Proceedings held pursuant to RCW 90.14.130 are
adjudicative proceedings within the meaning of chapter 34.05 RCW.
Final decisions of the department of ecology in these proceedings are
subject to review in accordance with chapter 43.21B RCW.
(2) RCW 90.14.130 provides nonexclusive procedures for determining
a relinquishment of water rights under RCW 90.14.160, 90.14.170, and
90.14.180. RCW 90.14.160, 90.14.170, and 90.14.180 may be applied in,
among other proceedings, general adjudication proceedings initiated
under RCW 90.03.110 or 90.44.220((: PROVIDED, That)). Notwithstanding
any other provisions of this chapter, there is no relinquishment of any
water right if the end of the period of nonuse of such a right occurred
more than twenty years before the date of filing of the department's
report of findings under RCW 90.03.640 or the date of a final decision
by the department or a water conservancy board on an application for
change or transfer of a water right under RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.100.
(3) Nothing ((herein)) in this section shall apply to litigation
involving determinations of the department of ecology under RCW
90.03.290 relating to the impairment of existing rights.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205 A new section is added to chapter 90.03
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Sections 201 through 204 of this act do not apply to water
right determinations issued by a superior court in a general
adjudication that is pending as of the effective date of this section.
Upon the entry of a final decree by a superior court in a general
adjudication, sections 201 through 204 of this act apply to subsequent
relinquishment orders under RCW 90.14.130 and decisions on applications
for changes, transfers, or amendments of water rights under RCW
90.03.380 or 90.44.100.
(2) Sections 201 through 204 of this act do not apply to
relinquishment orders entered prior to the effective date of this
section under RCW 90.14.130 or to final decisions issued prior to the
effective date of this section by the department on applications for
changes, transfers, or amendments of water rights under RCW 90.03.380
or 90.44.100.
(3) Sections 201 through 204 of this act do not apply to orders of
the pollution control hearings board entered prior to the effective
date of this section in appeals of relinquishment orders under RCW
90.14.130 or decisions on applications for changes, transfers, or
amendments of water rights under RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.100.

PART 3
INSTREAM FLOWS
Sec. 301 RCW 90.03.255 and 1997 c 360 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall, when evaluating an application for a
water right, transfer, or change filed pursuant to RCW 90.03.250 or
90.03.380 that includes provision for any water impoundment or other
resource management technique, take into consideration the benefits and
costs, including environmental effects, of any water impoundment or
other resource management technique that is included as a component of
the application. The department's consideration shall extend to any
increased water supply that results from the impoundment or other
resource management technique, including but not limited to any
recharge of groundwater that may occur, as a means of making water
available or otherwise offsetting the impact of the diversion of
surface water proposed in the application for the water right,
transfer, or change. Provision for an impoundment or other resource
management technique in an application shall be made solely at the
discretion of the applicant and shall not otherwise be made by the
department as a condition for approving an application that does not
include such provision.
(2) The department shall not deny an application for a new water
right or change, transfer, or amendment of a water right based on the
presumption that an instream flow trust water right established as
mitigation for the water right application may be diverted by junior
water right holders.
(3) This section does not lessen, enlarge, or modify the rights of
any riparian owner, or any existing water right acquired by
appropriation or otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302 A new section is added to chapter 90.42
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Upon permanently acquiring a water right under a permit,
certificate, or claim in the trust water rights program for instream
flow purposes, the department may file suit in superior court to
protect its water right from impairment. In any such action by the
department, the court shall join only those parties holding water
rights with priority dates junior in time to the trust water right,
whose diversion or withdrawal of water is alleged by the department to
be impairing the trust water right. Prior to filing such an action,
the department shall comply with the procedures of RCW 90.03.605.
(2)(a) If the court concludes that any permit, certificate, or
claim is causing impairment of the department's trust water right, the
court shall issue an order enabling the department to regulate the
permits, certificates, or claims to prevent impairment of the trust
water right.
(b) After the court has issued an order under (a) of this
subsection, and after all appeals have been exhausted, the department
may issue a notice and order, consistent with its authority under RCW
43.27A.190, to protect a permanent instream flow trust water right from
impairment. The department may serve a notice and order claiming
impairment upon the holder of a permit, certificate, or claim that is
subject to the court's order.
(c) Any water right holder may appeal the notice and order issued
by the department under (b) of this subsection to the pollution control
hearings board under chapter 43.21B RCW.

PART 4
FEES
NEW SECTION. Sec. 401 A new section is added to chapter 90.03
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person other than
the permit applicant who wishes to protest a decision of the department
must pay a protest fee of five hundred dollars in addition to the
appropriate fee required under RCW 90.03.470(11).
(2) Except for the applicant, for any party who appeals a decision
made by the department by filing an appeal with the pollution control
hearings board under chapter 43.21B RCW, a fee of one thousand dollars
is required.
(3) All fees collected under this section must be paid to the
department and deposited into the water rights processing account under
RCW 90.03.650.

PART 5
PROGRAM EFFICIENCIES AND ACCOUNTABILITY
NEW SECTION. Sec. 501 A new section is added to chapter 90.03
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) The department shall process all water right applications
pending as of the effective date of this section by July 1, 2021,
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.
(b) As used in this subsection, water right applications include:
(i) Applications for a new appropriation; (ii) transfers, changes, or
amendments to existing permits, water right or storage certificates, or
claimed rights; and (iii) applications for water use mitigation credits
issued as a result of water banking.
(2) By December 31, 2011, the department shall provide the
legislature with a schedule, by water resource inventory area or source
of water, showing where and when the department will process water
right applications between the effective date of this section and July
1, 2021.
(3) By July 1, 2017, the department shall provide all applicants
with permit applications pending as of the effective date of this
section with the opportunity to be processed by the department either
individually or pursuant to a coordinated cost-reimbursement agreement.
If an applicant is offered the opportunity to be processed by the
department prior to July 1, 2017, but declines, the department may
limit future processing of that application to either the cost-reimbursement process pursuant to RCW 90.03.265 or require the
applicant to submit the applicant's own draft report of examination at
such time the applicant is prepared to have the applicant's water right
application processed.
(4) The department shall conduct a comprehensive review of its
water right application review procedures, with the objective of
simplifying the procedures, eliminating unnecessary steps, and
decreasing the time required to fully process an application from
filing through a final decision. The department shall seek
recommendations from a diverse group of stakeholders and government
representatives familiar with the department's water right processing
and water resource management activities and provide stakeholders an
opportunity to comment upon proposals for administrative or legislative
changes to simplify procedures.
(5) The department shall implement changes to improve water right
processing for which it has current administrative authority by January
1, 2012.
(6)(a) The department shall provide a report to the legislature,
consistent with RCW 43.01.036, by December 31, 2011, and shall
supplement and update the report every even-numbered year thereafter to
document continuing process improvements.
(b) The report must summarize:
(i) The review conducted;
(ii) The proposals considered by the department, including those
forwarded by stakeholders;
(iii) The changes implemented; and
(iv) Recommendations for any legislation necessary to implement
additional changes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 502 A new section is added to chapter 90.03
RCW to read as follows:
The department shall establish and maintain up-to-date records of
the entities that hold water rights and claimed rights. It is the
responsibility of all water right holders and claimants to inform the
department when there is a change in ownership or contact information.
The department shall make forms available, including electronically,
for use by persons reporting a change in this information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503 A new section is added to chapter 90.42
RCW to read as follows:
After notice and opportunity for public hearing, the department may
issue general permits on a watershed or subwatershed basis for new uses
of water relying on water rights accepted into the trust water rights
program. Any general permit issued shall: (1) Be based on
requirements adopted by the department under chapter 173-539A WAC as it
exists on the effective date of this section; and (2) set forth the
requirements and standards that apply to any activity authorized by
such a general permit.

PART 6
ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS
NEW SECTION. Sec. 601 Section 202 of this act expires June 30,
2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 602 Section 203 of this act takes effect June
30, 2019.

--- END ---