BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.02 RCW
to read as follows:
There is established, within the office of the insurance
commissioner, the volunteer position of health care authority ombudsman
to assist retirees enrolled in the public employees benefits board
program. The volunteer position shall be trained as part of the
existing volunteer training provided to the statewide health insurance
benefit advisors. The position shall help retirees with questions and
concerns, assist the public employees benefits board program with
identification of retiree concerns, and maintain access to updated
program information.

--- END ---