BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:
PART I
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 101 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($29,934,000))
$30,205,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,465,000))
$27,258,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,316,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,715,000))
$58,779,000

Sec. 102 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SENATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,770,000))
$21,794,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($23,864,000))
$21,133,000
Motor Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,034,000))
$44,327,000

Sec. 103 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,680,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,741,000))
$2,604,000
Medical Aid Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,000
Accident Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $85,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,591,000))
$5,454,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the joint
legislative audit and review committee may adjust the due dates for
projects included on the committee's 2011-13 work plan as necessary to
efficiently manage workload.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the committee
shall conduct a review of the state's workplace safety and health
program. The review shall examine workplace safety inspection,
enforcement, training, and outreach efforts compared to other states
and federal programs; analyze workplace injury and illness rates and
trends in Washington; identify factors that may influence workplace
safety and health; and identify practices that may improve workplace
safety and health and/or impact insurance rates.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the committee
shall conduct a review of marketing and vendor expenditures and
incentive payment programs at the state lottery commission to identify
cost savings and efficiencies to maximize contributions to
beneficiaries under this act. This review shall include examination of
the following:
(a) An analysis of marketing expenses and the impact on ticket
sales; the impact to sales of tickets from the change in lottery
beneficiaries; the competitive contracting processes for marketing
services and vendors and comparison to other states; identification of
whether there are duplicative or unproductive marketing activities; and
identification of whether savings may occur from changing vendors.
(b) A description of how the employee incentive payment program at
the state lottery commission operates, and comparison to best practices
for outcome-based performance payments.
(4) $85,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation and
$85,000 of the accident account--state appropriation are provided
solely for the purposes of House Bill No. 2123 (workers' compensation).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.
(5) The joint legislative audit and review committee will assess
the costs of the department of fish and wildlife to produce trout to
achieve the department's desired freshwater stocking objectives and
compare these costs to the costs of the alternatives for producing
trout such as contracting for services. As part of its assessment, the
committee will consider the following:
(a) The total costs to the department for producing trout at
department trout production facilities, by category of trout
production, to achieve the department's desired freshwater stocking
objectives;
(b) The availability of alternative approaches to trout production,
including opportunities to contract with registered aquatic farmers,
and the costs of these alternative approaches; and
(c) A review of the experience of other states in contracting or
other alternative approaches to trout production.
(d) The committee will complete its assessment and report to the
legislature by December 1, 2012.

Sec. 104 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,027,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,193,000))
$1,708,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,220,000))
$3,735,000

Sec. 105 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,016,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,911,000))
$7,516,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,927,000))
$15,532,000

Sec. 106 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,248,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,689,000))
$4,455,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,937,000))
$8,703,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 107 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,016,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 108 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES
In order to achieve operating efficiencies within the financial
resources available to the legislative branch, the executive rules
committee of the house of representatives and the facilities and
operations committee of the senate by joint action may transfer funds
among the house of representatives, senate, joint legislative audit and
review committee, legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee, legislative transportation committee, office of the state
actuary, joint legislative systems committee, statute law committee,
office of legislative support services, and redistricting commission.

Sec. 109 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPREME COURT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,724,000))
$6,765,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,738,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,462,000))
$13,503,000

Sec. 110 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE LAW LIBRARY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,506,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,466,000))
$466,000
Judicial Information System Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,972,000

Sec. 111 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,692,000))
$50,756,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($50,235,000))
$48,668,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,532,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $390,000
Judicial Information Systems Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $42,414,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,414,000))
$7,354,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($151,677,000))
$152,114,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for school districts for petitions
to juvenile court for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030
and 28A.225.035. The office of the administrator for the courts shall
develop an interagency agreement with the superintendent of public
instruction to allocate the funding provided in this subsection.
Allocation of this money to school districts shall be based on the
number of petitions filed. This funding includes amounts school
districts may expend on the cost of serving petitions filed under RCW
28A.225.030 by certified mail or by personal service or for the
performance of service of process for any hearing associated with RCW
28A.225.030.
(2)(a) $8,252,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $8,253,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for distribution
to county juvenile court administrators to fund the costs of processing
truancy, children in need of services, and at-risk youth petitions.
The administrator for the courts, in conjunction with the juvenile
court administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution
formula. The formula shall neither reward counties with higher than
average per-petition processing costs nor shall it penalize counties
with lower than average per-petition processing costs.
(b) Each fiscal year during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, each
county shall report the number of petitions processed and the total
actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions. Counties shall submit the reports to the
administrator for the courts no later than 45 days after the end of the
fiscal year. The administrator for the courts shall electronically
transmit this information to the chairs and ranking minority members of
the house of representatives and senate ways and means committees no
later than 60 days after a fiscal year ends. These reports are deemed
informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing
funds.
(3) The distributions made under this subsection and distributions
from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant to
section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs
for any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW
43.135.060.
(4) $265,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the office of public guardianship to
provide guardianship services for low-income incapacitated persons.
(5) $1,178,000 of the judicial information systems account--state
appropriation is provided solely for replacing computer equipment at
state courts and state judicial agencies.
(6) No later than September 30, 2011, the judicial information
systems committee shall provide a report to the legislature on the
recommendations of the case management feasibility study, including
plans for a replacement of the superior court management information
system (SCOMIS) and plans for completing the data exchange core system
component consistent with a complete data exchange standard. No later
than December 31, 2011, the judicial information systems committee
shall provide a report to the legislature on the status of the data
exchange, the procurement process for a SCOMIS replacement, and a case
management system that is designed to meet the requirements approved by
the superior courts and county clerks of all thirty-nine counties. The
legislature shall solicit input on both reports from judicial,
legislative, and executive stakeholders.
(7) In order to gather better data on juveniles in the criminal
justice system, the administrative office of the courts shall modify
the judgment and sentence form for juvenile and adult sentences to
include one or more check boxes indicating whether (a) the adult
superior court had original jurisdiction for a defendant who was
younger than eighteen years of age at the time the case was filed; (b)
the case was originally filed in juvenile court but transferred to
adult superior court jurisdiction; or (c) the case was originally filed
in adult superior court or transferred to adult superior court but then
returned to the juvenile court.
(8) The Washington association of juvenile court administrators and
the juvenile rehabilitation administration, in consultation with the
community juvenile accountability act advisory committee and the
Washington state institute for public policy, shall analyze and review
data elements available from the administrative office of the courts
for possible integration into the evidence-based program quality
assurance plans and processes. The administrative office of the
courts, the Washington association of juvenile court administrators,
and the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall provide
information necessary to complete the review and analysis. The
Washington association of juvenile court administrators and the
juvenile rehabilitation administration shall report the findings of
their review and analysis, as well as any recommendations, to the
legislature by December 1, 2012.
(9) $540,000 of the judicial stabilization trust account--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for the office of
public guardianship to continue guardianship services for those low-income incapacitated persons who were receiving services on June 30,
2012.

Sec. 112 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,030,000))
$25,027,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,972,000))
$31,031,000
Judicial Stabilization Trust Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,490,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,492,000))
$58,548,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The amounts provided include funding for expert and
investigative services in death penalty personal restraint petitions.
(2) By December 1, 2011, the office of public defense shall submit
to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature a
proposal for office of public defense to assume the effective and
efficient administration of defense services for indigent persons
throughout the state who are involved in proceedings under chapter
71.09 RCW. In developing its proposal, the office of public defense
should consult with interested stakeholders, including the King county
public defender, the Washington defender association, the Washington
association of criminal defense lawyers, the administrative office of
the courts, the superior court judges association, the office of the
attorney general, the King county prosecuting attorney, the Washington
association of counties, and the department of social and health
services. At a minimum, the proposal should identify:
(a) Procedures to control costs and require accountability,
consistent with the state's obligation to ensure the right to counsel
under both the United States Constitution and the Washington
Constitution;
(b) Appropriate practice standards for trial-level defense of
indigent persons involved in proceedings under chapter 71.09 RCW, an
estimated number of attorneys statewide who are qualified to provide
such representation, and reasonable compensation for such defense
services;
(c) The total budget necessary to implement the proposal statewide
for fiscal year 2013, including administrative support; and
(d) Possible savings to the state and counties that might result
from implementing the proposal.
(3) $6,065,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No.
6493 (sexual predator commitment). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 113 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 109 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,311,000))
$4,965,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,292,000))
$5,193,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,103,000))
$11,658,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,500,000 of the economic development strategic reserve
account appropriation is provided solely for efforts to assist with
currently active industrial recruitment efforts that will bring new
jobs to the state or will retain headquarter locations of major
companies currently housed in the state.
(2) (($547,000)) $404,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 and (($547,000)) $418,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
office of the education ombudsman.

Sec. 114 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($687,000))
$653,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($698,000))
$663,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,475,000))
$1,406,000

Sec. 115 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,106,000))
$2,021,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,129,000))
$2,002,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,235,000))
$4,023,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $43,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and $82,000 of the general fund--
state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5021 (election
campaign disclosure).

Sec. 116 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SECRETARY OF STATE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,014,000))
$16,013,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,862,000))
$8,862,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,338,000
Public Records Efficiency, Preservation, and Access
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,950,000))
$7,156,000
Charitable Organization Education Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($452,000))
$362,000
Local Government Archives Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,557,000))
$8,557,000
Election Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,288,000
Washington State Heritage Center Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,028,000))
$5,028,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($73,489,000))
$70,604,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,898,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's
share of primary and general election costs and the costs of conducting
mandatory recounts on state measures. Counties shall be reimbursed
only for those odd-year election costs that the secretary of state
validates as eligible for reimbursement.
(2)(a) $1,847,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $1,926,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for contracting
with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel- to-gavel television
coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
statewide significance during the 2011-2013 biennium. The funding
level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount
provided in this subsection. The nonprofit organization shall be
required to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions,
in cash or in kind, in an amount equal to forty percent of the state
contribution. The office of the secretary of state may make full or
partial payment once all criteria in this subsection have been
satisfactorily documented.
(b) The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding
is necessary to ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage
of public affairs. For that purpose, the secretary of state shall
enter into a contract with the nonprofit organization to provide public
affairs coverage.
(c) The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent
audit, an annual financial statement, and an annual report, including
benchmarks that measure the success of the nonprofit organization in
meeting the intent of the program.
(d) No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection
may be used, directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:
(i) Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any
legislation by the legislature of the state of Washington, by any
county, city, town, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington, or by the congress, or the adoption or rejection of any
rule, standard, rate, or other legislative enactment of any state
agency;
(ii) Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or
(iii) Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel,
lodging, meals, or entertainment to a public officer or employee.
(3) Any reductions to funding for the Washington talking book and
Braille library may not exceed in proportion any reductions taken to
the funding for the library as a whole.

Sec. 117 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($259,000))
$246,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($267,000))
$254,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($526,000))
$500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The office shall assist the department of
enterprise services on providing the government-to-government training
sessions for federal, state, local, and tribal government employees.
The training sessions shall cover tribal historical perspectives, legal
issues, tribal sovereignty, and tribal governments. Costs of the
training sessions shall be recouped through a fee charged to the
participants of each session. The department of enterprise services
shall be responsible for all of the administrative aspects of the
training, including the billing and collection of the fees for the
training.

Sec. 118 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($236,000))
$224,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($219,000))
$208,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($455,000))
$432,000

Sec. 119 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER
State Treasurer's Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,994,000))
$13,488,000

Sec. 120 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE AUDITOR
State Auditing Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,293,000))
$9,253,000
Performance Audit of Government Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,461,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,754,000))
$10,714,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Audits of school districts by the division of municipal
corporations shall include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a)
Student enrollment data; and (b) the experience and education of the
district's certified instructional staff, as reported to the
superintendent of public instruction for allocation of state funding.
(2) $1,461,000 of the performance audits of government account
appropriation is provided solely for staff and related costs to verify
the accuracy of reported school district data submitted for state
funding purposes; conduct school district program audits of state
funded public school programs; establish the specific amount of state
funding adjustments whenever audit exceptions occur and the amount is
not firmly established in the course of regular public school audits;
and to assist the state special education safety net committee when
requested.
(3) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the state
auditor shall continue to complete the annual audit of the state's
comprehensive annual financial report and the annual federal single
audit consistent with the auditing standards generally accepted in the
United States and the standards applicable to financial audits
contained in government auditing standards, issued by the comptroller
general of the United States, and OMB circular A-133, audits of states,
local governments, and nonprofit organizations.

Sec. 121 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($158,000))
$145,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($195,000))
$190,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($353,000))
$335,000

Sec. 122 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,758,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,727,000))
$7,740,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,819,000))
$10,015,000
New Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $972,000
Legal Services Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($206,617,000))
$196,105,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,129,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($224,163,000))
$220,989,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual
legal services expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for
each agency receiving legal services. The report shall be submitted to
the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives no later than ninety days after the
end of each fiscal year. As part of its by agency report to the
legislative fiscal committees and the office of financial management,
the office of the attorney general shall include information detailing
the agency's expenditures for its agency-wide overhead and a breakdown
by division of division administration expenses.
(2) Prior to entering into any negotiated settlement of a claim
against the state that exceeds five million dollars, the attorney
general shall notify the director of financial management and the
chairs of the senate committee on ways and means and the house of
representatives committee on ways and means.
(3) The attorney general shall annually report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature all new cy pres awards and settlements
and all new accounts, disclosing their intended uses, balances, the
nature of the claim or account, proposals, and intended timeframes for
the expenditure of each amount. The report shall be distributed
electronically and posted on the attorney general's web site. The
report shall not be printed on paper or distributed physically.
(4) The attorney general shall enter into an interagency agreement
with the department of social and health services for expenditure of
the state's proceeds from the cy pres settlement in State of Washington
v. AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for the purposes set forth in sections 204
and 213 of this act.
(5) $62,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1770
(state purchasing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $5,924,000 of the legal services revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2123
(workers' compensation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(7) The office of the attorney general is authorized to expend
$2,100,000 from the Zyprexa and other cy pres awards towards consumer
protection costs in accordance with uses authorized in the court
orders.
(8) $96,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5076
(financial institutions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $99,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5769 (coal-fired generation). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(10) $416,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5801 (industrial insurance system). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $31,000 of the legal services revolving fund--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5021 (election campaign disclosure). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(12) The executive ethics board shall: (a) Develop a statewide
plan, with performance measures, to provide overall direction and
accountability in all executive branch agencies and statewide elected
offices; (b) coordinate and work with the commission on judicial
conduct and the legislative ethics board; (c) assess and evaluate each
agency's ethical culture through employee and stakeholder surveys,
review Washington state quality award feedback reports, and publish an
annual report on the results to the public; and (d) solicit outside
evaluations, studies, and recommendations for improvements from
academics, nonprofit organizations, the public disclosure commission,
or other entities with expertise in ethics, integrity, and the public
sector.
(13) $5,743,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the legal costs associated with the
evaluation, filing, prosecution, response to petitions for release, and
appeal of sexually violent predator civil commitment cases as provided
in chapter 71.09 RCW. Within the amount provided in this subsection,
the attorney general may enter into an interagency agreement with a
county prosecutor to perform prosecution services pursuant to chapter
71.09 RCW.

Sec. 123 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,310,000))
$1,243,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,309,000))
$1,241,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,619,000))
$2,484,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section include funding for
activities transferred from the sentencing guidelines commission to the
caseload forecast council pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5891 (criminal justice cost savings). Prior to the effective date
of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5891, the appropriations in
this section may be expended for the continued operations and expenses
of the sentencing guidelines commission pursuant to the expenditure
authority schedule produced by the office of financial management in
accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of Senate
Bill No. 5304 (college bound scholarship).

Sec. 124 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,261,000))
$35,648,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($72,459,000))
$36,826,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($282,185,000))
$338,284,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,989,000))
$4,988,000
Public Works Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,764,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $437,000
Lead Paint Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $65,000
Building Code Council Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Home Security Fund Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,652,000
Affordable Housing for All Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,902,000
County Research Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,081,000))
$512,000
Financial Fraud and Identity Theft Crimes Investigation
and Prosecution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,166,000
Low-Income Weatherization Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,778,000))
$2,430,000
City and Town Research Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,166,000))
$2,447,000
((Manufacturing Innovation and Modernization
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $61,000))
Community and Economic Development Fee Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,488,000))
$6,786,000
Washington Housing Trust Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,498,000))
$23,498,000
Prostitution Prevention and Intervention Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $86,000
Public Facility Construction Loan Revolving
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $755,000
Washington Community Technology Opportunity Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $713,000
Liquor Revolving Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,802,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($487,519,000))
$488,774,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Repayments of outstanding mortgage and rental assistance
program loans administered by the department under RCW 43.63A.640 shall
be remitted to the department, including any current revolving account
balances. The department shall collect payments on outstanding loans,
and deposit them into the state general fund. Repayments of funds owed
under the program shall be remitted to the department according to the
terms included in the original loan agreements.
(2) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a grant to resolution
Washington to building statewide capacity for alternative dispute
resolution centers and dispute resolution programs that guarantee that
citizens have access to low-cost resolution as an alternative to
litigation.
(3) $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $306,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a grant to the retired senior
volunteer program.
(4) The department shall administer its growth management act
technical assistance so that smaller cities receive proportionately
more assistance than larger cities or counties.
(5) $1,800,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided for transitional housing assistance or partial payments for
rental assistance under the independent youth housing program.
(6) $5,000,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
for the operation, repair, and staffing of shelters in the homeless
family shelter program.
(7) (($198,000)) $115,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 ((and $198,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the
Washington new Americans program.
(8) $2,949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,949,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for associate development
organizations.
(9) $127,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1886
(Ruckelshaus center process). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) Up to $200,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation is for a grant to the Washington tourism alliance for the
maintenance of the Washington state tourism web site
www.experiencewa.com and its related sub-sites. The department may
transfer ownership of the web site and other tourism promotion assets
and assign obligations to the Washington tourism alliance for purposes
of tourism promotion throughout the state. The alliance may use the
assets only in a manner consistent with the purposes for which they
were created. Any revenue generated from these assets must be used by
the alliance for the sole purposes of statewide Washington tourism
promotion. The legislature finds that the Washington tourism alliance,
a not-for-profit, 501.c.6 organization established, funded, and
governed by Washington tourism industry stakeholders to sustain
destination tourism marketing across Washington, is an appropriate body
to receive funding and assets from and assume obligations of the
department for the purposes described in this section.
(11) Within the appropriations in this section, specific funding is
provided to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5741 (economic
development commission).
(12) $2,000,000 of the community and economic development fee
account appropriation is provided solely for the department of commerce
for services to homeless families through the Washington families fund.
(13) (($260,000)) $173,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 ((and $259,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the
Washington asset building coalitions.
(14) $1,859,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,859,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for innovative research teams,
also known as entrepreneurial STARS, at higher education research
institutions, and for entrepreneurs-in-residence programs at higher
education research institutions and entrepreneurial assistance
organizations. Of these amounts no more than $50,000 in fiscal year
2012 and no more than $50,000 in fiscal year 2013 may be provided for
the operation of entrepreneurs-in-residence programs at entrepreneurial
assistance organizations external to higher education research
institutions.
(15) Up to $700,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation is for pass-through grants to cities in central Puget
Sound to plan for transfer of development rights receiving areas under
the central Puget Sound regional transfer of development rights
program.
(16) $16,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely to implement section 503 of Substitute
House Bill No. 1277 (licensed settings for vulnerable adults). The
long-term care ombudsman shall convene an adult family home quality
assurance panel to review problems concerning the quality of care for
residents in adult family homes. If Substitute House Bill No. 1277
(licensed settings for vulnerable adults) is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) (($24,605,000)) $4,291,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 ((and $39,527,000)), $6,882,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and
$6,000,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation are provided
solely for establishment of the essential needs and housing support
program created in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2082 (essential
needs and assistance program). The department of commerce shall
contract for these services with counties or community-based
organizations involved in providing essential needs and housing
supports to low-income persons who meet eligibility pursuant to
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2082. The department shall limit
the funding used for administration of the program to no more than five
percent. Counties and community providers shall limit the funding
used for administration of the program to no more than seven percent.
(((a) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $4,000,000 is
provided solely for essential needs to clients who meet the eligibility
established in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2082. Counties and
community-based organizations shall distribute basic essential products
in a manner that prevents abuse. To the greatest extent possible, the
counties or community-based organizations shall leverage local or
private funds, and volunteer support to acquire and distribute the
basic essential products.
(b) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $30,000,000 is
provided solely for housing support services to individuals who are
homeless and eligible for services under this program pursuant to
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2082.
(c) Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $30,000,000 is
provided solely as a contingency fund to provide housing support
services for individuals who may become homeless and are otherwise
eligible for this program pursuant to Engrossed Substitute House Bill
No. 2082.))

Sec. 125 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($674,000))
$639,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($728,000))
$693,000
Lottery Administrative Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,452,000))
$1,382,000

Sec. 126 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,627,000))
$18,112,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,851,000))
$18,027,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,534,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,270,000))
$1,370,000
Performance Audits of Government Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,000))
$198,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000
Department of Personnel Services--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,827,000))
$8,597,000
Data Processing Revolving Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,208,000))
$5,918,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,537,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Forest Fire Protection Assessment Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $250,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($85,259,000))
$85,923,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,210,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementation of House Bill
No. 1178 (regulatory assistance office). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the office of financial management to
contract with an independent consultant to evaluate and recommend the
most cost-effective provision of services required to support the
department of social and health services special commitment center on
McNeil Island. The evaluation shall include island operation services
that include, but are not limited to: (a) Marine transport of
passengers and goods; (b) wastewater treatment; (c) fire protection and
suppression; (d) electrical supply; (e) water supply; and (f) road
maintenance.
The office of financial management shall solicit the input of
Pierce county, the department of corrections, and the department of
social and health services in developing the request for proposal,
evaluating applications, and directing the evaluation. The consultant
shall report to the governor and legislature by November 15, 2011.
(3) $100,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial management
to prepare a report to be used to initiate a comprehensive, long-range
planning process for the future of McNeil Island during the 2013-2015
fiscal biennium.
(a) The report on the initiation of the process must document:
(i) Ownership issues, including consultation with the federal
government about its current legal requirements associated with the
island;
(ii) Federal and state decision-making processes to change use or
ownership;
(iii) Tribal treaty interests;
(iv) Fish and wildlife species and their habitats;
(v) Land use and public safety needs;
(vi) Recreational opportunities for the general public;
(vii) Historic and archaeological resources; and
(viii) Revenue from and necessary to support potential future uses
of the island.
(b) The report shall develop and recommend a comprehensive, long-range planning process for the future of the island and associated
aquatic resources, addressing the items in (a) of this subsection.
(c) The office of financial management may use its own staff and
other public agency and tribal staff or contract for services, and may
create a work group of knowledgeable agencies, organizations, and
individuals to assist in preparing the report.
(d) The office of financial management shall engage in broad
consultation with interested parties, including, but not limited to:
(i) Federal agencies with relevant responsibilities;
(ii) Tribal governments;
(iii) State agencies;
(iv) Local governments and communities in the area, including the
Anderson Island community, Steilacoom, and Pierce county; and
(v) Interested private organizations and individuals.
(e) The report must be submitted to the governor and appropriate
committees of the legislature by October 1, 2012.
(4) The appropriations in this section include funding for
activities transferred from the sentencing guidelines commission to the
office of financial management pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5891 (criminal justice cost savings). Prior to the effective
date of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5891, the appropriations
in this section may be expended for the continued operations and
expenses of the sentencing guidelines commission pursuant to the
expenditure authority schedule produced by the office of financial
management in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.
(5)(a) $250,000 of the forest fire protection assessment account--state appropriation is provided solely for the office of financial
management to contract for analysis and recommendations to improve the
efficiency and effectiveness of the state's mechanisms for funding fire
prevention and suppression activities.
(b) The contract must provide for: (i) Consultation with the
appropriate committees of the legislature, the office of financial
management, the department of natural resources, and appropriate
stakeholders at the onset of the contract regarding the scope of and
timeline for the analysis and recommendations; (ii) by September 1,
2012, development of initial analysis of potential means to improve the
efficiency and effectiveness of the state's mechanisms for funding fire
prevention and suppression activities, including analysis of such
options as the use of private or state insurance, the increased use of
revolving accounts, and any examples where those mechanisms have been
previously utilized; (iii) following development of the initial
analysis under (b)(ii) of this subsection, distribution of the analysis
and solicitation of input from the entities identified in (b)(i) of
this subsection; and (iv) based on the input under (b)(iii) of this
subsection, development of recommendations for implementation of select
potential means to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the
state's mechanisms for funding fire prevention and suppression
activities, including the necessary steps for implementation and
opportunities and risks associated with the identified mechanisms.
(c) By June 30, 2013, and consistent with RCW 43.01.036, the office
of financial management must provide a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature, including the analysis and
recommendations developed under this subsection.
(6) The appropriations in this section for the office of regulatory
assistance assume the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6023 (permit
efficiency).

Sec. 127 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 119 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
Administrative Hearings Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,043,000))
$35,847,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $769,000 of the administrative hearings
revolving account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5921 (social services programs).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 128 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY
Lottery Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,709,000))
$24,908,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding is reduced for administrative and
operating costs that do not impact revenue-generating activities.
Beyond these savings, the state lottery shall consider methods of
achieving other efficiencies, including reductions in unproductive
marketing expenses, reductions in contracted services, adjustments to
prize payments, and disbursements of unclaimed prize moneys in order to
increase distributions to beneficiaries.

Sec. 129 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 132 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($246,000))
$234,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($250,000))
$237,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($496,000))
$471,000

Sec. 130 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 133 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($239,000))
$221,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($238,000))
$232,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($477,000))
$453,000

Sec. 131 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS
Department of Retirement Systems Expense
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,049,000))
$47,128,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $146,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of House Bill No. 2070 (state and local
government employees). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $65,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of House Bill No. 1625 (plan 3 default
investment option). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $133,000 of the department of retirement systems--state
appropriation is provided solely for the administrative costs
associated with implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 1981 as
amended (post-retirement employment). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $15,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative
costs associated with implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2021
(plan 1 annual increase amounts). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2011, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.
(5) $64,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative
costs associated with implementation of House Bill No. 2441 (limiting
excess compensation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $32,000 of the department of retirement systems expense
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the administrative
costs associated with implementation of Senate Bill No. 5159 (transfer
of service into the Washington state patrol retirement system). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 132 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 122 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,927,000))
$101,044,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,801,000))
$101,929,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,940,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,000
Waste Tire Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $87,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,000
Master License Fund--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,012,000))
$14,810,000
Vehicle License Fraud Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000
Performance Audits of Government Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,188,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($225,110,000))
$227,153,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $120,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, $1,133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $798,000 of the master
license fund--state appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6356 (single
portal for business). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 133 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF TAX APPEALS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,241,000))
$1,179,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,219,000))
$1,158,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,460,000))
$2,337,000

Sec. 134 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 123 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
OMWBE Enterprises Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,264,000))
$3,680,000

Sec. 135 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,452,000
Insurance Commissioners Regulatory Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,514,000))
$47,512,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($51,966,000))
$51,964,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $75,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation
of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5445 (health benefit exchange).
(2) $42,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation
of Senate Bill No. 5213 (insurance statutes).

Sec. 136 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,081,000))
$3,063,000
Liquor Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($176,238,000))
$170,409,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($120,000))
$945,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,675,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($186,439,000))
$180,117,000

Sec. 137 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $502,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,175,000
Public Service Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,992,000))
$31,145,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,201,000
Pipeline Safety Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,848,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,718,000))
$48,871,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In accordance with RCW 80.36.610(1), the utilities and
transportation commission is authorized to establish federal
telecommunications act services fees in fiscal year 2012 as necessary
to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation
levels in this section.
(2) $15,000 of the pipeline safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1634 (underground utilities).
(3) $182,000 of the public service revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5769 (coal-fired generation).
(4) $169,000 of the public service revolving account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5034 (private infrastructure).

Sec. 138 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 130 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,175,000))
$7,173,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,175,000))
$7,171,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $159,181,000
Enhanced 911 Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,556,000))
$48,626,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,933,000
Disaster Response Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $66,266,000
Military Department Rent and Lease Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $615,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,165,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($307,066,000))
$309,130,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $18,018,000 of the disaster response account -- state
appropriation and $66,266,000 of the disaster response account--federal
appropriation may be spent only on disasters declared by the governor
and with the approval of the office of financial management. The
military department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees on October 1st and
February 1st of each year detailing information on the disaster
response account, including: (a) The amount and type of deposits into
the account; (b) the current available fund balance as of the reporting
date; and (c) the projected fund balance at the end of the 2011-2013
biennium based on current revenue and expenditure patterns.
(2) $75,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for homeland security, subject to the following
conditions:
(a) Any communications equipment purchased by local jurisdictions
or state agencies shall be consistent with standards set by the
Washington state interoperability executive committee; and
(b) The department shall submit an annual report to the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal committees detailing
the governor's domestic security advisory group recommendations;
homeland security revenues and expenditures, including estimates of
total federal funding for the state; and incremental changes from the
previous estimate.

Sec. 139 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,346,000))
$2,110,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,400,000))
$2,161,000
Higher Education Personnel Services Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $251,000
Department of Personnel Service Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,309,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,306,000))
$7,831,000

Sec. 140 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 132 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,501,000))
$3,328,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,495,000))
$3,265,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $177,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $368,000
Building Code Council Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,187,000
Department of Personnel Service Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,119,000))
$11,131,000
Enterprise Services Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,540,000))
$26,585,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,387,000))
$46,041,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are for the operations and
expenses of the department of enterprise services as established by
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5931 (central service functions of
state government), effective October 1, 2011. Prior to October 1,
2011, the appropriations in this section may be expended for the
continued operations and expenses of the office of financial
management, the department of general administration, the department of
information services, and the department of personnel, pursuant to the
expenditure authority schedules produced by the office of financial
management, in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.
(2) (($3,090,000)) $3,028,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and (($3,090,000)) $2,967,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided
solely for the payment of facilities and services charges, utilities
and contracts charges, public and historic facilities charges, and
capital projects surcharges allocable to the senate, house of
representatives, statute law committee, and joint legislative systems
committee. The department shall allocate charges attributable to these
agencies among the affected revolving funds. The department shall
maintain an interagency agreement with these agencies to establish
performance standards, prioritization of preservation and capital
improvement projects, and quality assurance provisions for the delivery
of services under this subsection. The legislative agencies named in
this subsection shall continue to enjoy all of the same rights of
occupancy and space use on the capitol campus as historically
established.
(3) In accordance with RCW 46.08.172 and 43.135.055, the department
is authorized to increase parking fees in fiscal years 2012 and 2013 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business.
(4) The building code council account appropriation is provided
solely for the operation of the state building code council as required
by statute and modified by the standards established by executive order
10-06. The council shall not consider any proposed code amendment or
take any other action not authorized by statute or in compliance with
the standards established in executive order 10-06. No member of the
council may receive compensation, per diem, or reimbursement for
activities other than physical attendance at those meetings of the
state building code council or the council's designated committees, at
which the opportunity for public comment is provided generally and on
all agenda items upon which the council proposes to take action.
(5) Specific funding is provided for the purposes of section 3 of
House Bill No. 1770 (state purchasing).
(6) The amounts appropriated in this section are for implementation
of Senate Bill No. 5931 (streamlining central service functions).

Sec. 141 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 151 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR INNOVATE WASHINGTON
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,999,000))
$2,911,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,011,000))
$2,798,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,010,000))
$5,709,000

(End of part)

PART II
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 201 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES
(1) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. Appropriations made in this act to the
department of social and health services shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as
expressly provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications
permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be
used for other than that purpose.
(2) The department of social and health services shall not initiate
any services that require expenditure of state general fund moneys
unless expressly authorized in this act or other law. The department
may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282,
federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal
funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in
excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys
under this subsection, the office of financial management shall notify
the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(3) The health care authority and the department are authorized to
develop an integrated health care program designed to slow the
progression of illness and disability and better manage medicaid
expenditures for the aged and disabled population. Under this
Washington medicaid integration partnership (WMIP), the health care
authority and the department may combine and transfer such medicaid
funds appropriated under sections 204, 206, 208, and 213 of this act as
may be necessary to finance a unified health care plan for the WMIP
program enrollment. The WMIP pilot projects shall not exceed a daily
enrollment of 6,000 persons, nor expand beyond one county during the
2011-2013 fiscal biennium. The amount of funding assigned from each
program may not exceed the average per capita cost assumed in this act
for individuals covered by that program, actuarially adjusted for the
health condition of persons enrolled, times the number of clients
enrolled. In implementing the WMIP, the health care authority and the
department may: (a) Withhold from calculations of "available
resources" as set forth in RCW 71.24.025 a sum equal to the capitated
rate for enrolled individuals; and (b) employ capitation financing and
risk-sharing arrangements in collaboration with health care service
contractors licensed by the office of the insurance commissioner and
qualified to participate in both the medicaid and medicare programs.
The health care authority and the department shall conduct an
evaluation of the WMIP, measuring changes in participant health
outcomes, changes in patterns of service utilization, participant
satisfaction, participant access to services, and the state fiscal
impact.
(4) The legislature finds that medicaid payment rates, as
calculated by the department pursuant to the appropriations in this
act, bear a reasonable relationship to the costs incurred by
efficiently and economically operated facilities for providing quality
services and will be sufficient to enlist enough providers so that care
and services are available to the extent that such care and services
are available to the general population in the geographic area. The
legislature finds that cost reports, payment data from the federal
government, historical utilization, economic data, and clinical input
constitute reliable data upon which to determine the payment rates.
(5) The department shall to the maximum extent practicable use the
same system for delivery of spoken-language interpreter services for
social services appointments as the one established for medical
appointments in section 213 of this act. When contracting directly
with an individual to deliver spoken language interpreter services, the
department shall only contract with language access providers who are
working at a location in the state and who are state- certified or
state-authorized, except that when such a provider is not available,
the department may use a language access provider who meets other
certifications or standards deemed to meet state standards, including
interpreters in other states.
(6)(a) The appropriations to the department of social and health
services in this act shall be expended for the programs and in the
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2012, unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
general fund--state appropriations for fiscal year 2012 among programs
after approval by the director of financial management. However, the
department shall not transfer state moneys that are provided solely for
a specified purpose except as expressly provided in (b) of this
subsection.
(b) To the extent that transfers under (a) of this subsection are
insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2012
caseload forecasts and utilization assumptions in the long-term care,
foster care, adoptions support, medicaid personal care, and child
support programs, the department may transfer state moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose. The department shall not
transfer funds, and the director of financial management shall not
approve the transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the
objective of conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the
expenditure of state funds. The director of financial management shall
notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment
modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written
notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of
the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and
appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or
transfers.

Sec. 202 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- CHILDREN AND FAMILY
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($295,011,000))
$285,329,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($294,232,000))
$278,374,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($487,912,000))
$475,927,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,358,000
Home Security Fund--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,741,000
Domestic Violence Prevention Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,154,000))
$1,240,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $725,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,091,133,000))
$1,053,694,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within amounts provided for the foster care and adoption
support programs, the department shall control reimbursement decisions
for foster care and adoption support cases such that the aggregate
average cost per case for foster care and for adoption support does not
exceed the amounts assumed in the projected caseload expenditures.
(2) (($668,000)) $651,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 and (($668,000)) $601,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to
contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care center. The
center shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children
through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served
by the center must be in need of special care as a result of substance
abuse by their mothers. The center shall also provide on-site training
to biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The center shall provide
at least three months of consultation and support to the parents
accepting placement of children from the center. The center may
recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents for infants served
by the center. The department shall not require case management as a
condition of the contract. The department shall collaborate with the
pediatric interim care center to determine if and how the center could
be appropriately incorporated into the performance-based contract model
and report its findings to the legislature by December 1, 2012.
(3)(a) (($85,202,000)) $80,402,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, (($85,408,000)) $80,477,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and
(($79,279,000)) $74,358,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for services for children and families ((subject to
RCW 74.13.360 and House Bill No. 2122 (child welfare). Prior to
approval of contract services pursuant to RCW 74.13.360 and House Bill
No. 2122,)). The amounts provided in this section shall be allotted on
a monthly basis and expenditures shall not exceed allotments based on
a three month rolling average without approval of the office of
financial management following notification to the legislative fiscal
committees.
(b) The department shall use performance-based contracts to provide
services to safely reduce the number of children in out-of-home care,
safely reduce the time spent in out-of-home care prior to achieving
permanency, and safely reduce the number of children returning to
out-of-home care following permanency. The department shall provide an
initial report to the legislature and the governor by January 15, 2012,
regarding the start-up costs associated with performance-based
contracts under RCW 74.13.360 ((and House Bill No. 2122 (child
welfare))).
(4) $176,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $177,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, $656,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation,
$253,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, and $725,000 of
the education legacy trust account--state appropriation are provided
solely for children's administration to contract with an educational
advocacy provider with expertise in foster care educational outreach.
The amounts in this subsection are provided solely for contracted
education coordinators to assist foster children in succeeding in K-12
and higher education systems and to assure a focus on education during
the transition to performance based contracts. Funding shall be
prioritized to regions with high numbers of foster care youth and/or
regions where backlogs of youth that have formerly requested
educational outreach services exist. The department shall utilize
private matching funds to maintain educational advocacy services.
(5) $670,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $670,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for services provided through
children's advocacy centers.
(6) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds
appropriated in this section as required by RCW 74.13A.005 and
74.13A.020, the secretary shall not set the amount of any adoption
assistance payment or payments, made pursuant to RCW 26.33.320 and
74.13A.005 through 74.13A.080, to more than ninety percent of the
foster care maintenance payment for that child had he or she remained
in a foster family home during the same period. This subsection does
not apply to adoption assistance agreements in existence on the
effective date of this section.
(7) $10,741,000 of the home security fund--state appropriation is
provided solely for the department to contract for services pursuant to
RCW 13.32A.030 and 74.15.220. The department shall contract and
collaborate with service providers in a manner that maintains the
availability and geographic representation of secure and semi-secure
crisis residential centers and HOPE centers. To achieve efficiencies
and increase utilization, the department shall allow the co-location of
these centers, except that a youth may not be placed in a secure
facility or the secure portion of a co-located facility except as
specifically authorized by chapter 13.32A RCW. The reductions to
appropriations in this subsection related to semi-secure crisis
residential centers reflect a reduction to the number of beds for semi-secure crisis residential centers and not a reduction in rates. Any
secure crisis residential center or semi-secure crisis residential
center bed reduction shall not be based solely upon bed utilization.
The department is to exercise its discretion in reducing the number of
beds but to do so in a manner that maintains availability and
geographic representation of semi-secure and secure crisis residential
centers.
(8) $47,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $14,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $40,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1697 (dependency
system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(9) $564,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1128 (extended
foster care). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(10) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 and $616,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6555 (child protective services). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 203 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,684,000))
$85,756,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($86,505,000))
$85,816,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,758,000))
$3,809,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,903,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $196,000
Juvenile Accountability Incentive Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,801,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($181,847,000))
$180,281,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $331,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for deposit in the county criminal
justice assistance account for costs to the criminal justice system
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county adult court costs associated
with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be
distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.
(2) $2,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,716,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in
this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts
associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and
shall be distributed to counties as prescribed in the current
consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula.
(3) $3,482,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $3,482,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement community juvenile
accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile
code revisions). Funds provided in this subsection may be used solely
for community juvenile accountability grants, administration of the
grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the grants.
(4) $1,130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,130,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement alcohol and substance
abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a competitive
basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of services
approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist
counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.
(5) $3,123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $3,123,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for grants to county juvenile
courts for the following programs identified by the Washington state
institute for public policy (institute) in its October 2006 report:
"Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to Reduce Future Prison
Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime Rates": Functional
family therapy, multi-systemic therapy, aggression replacement training
and interagency coordination programs, or other programs with a
positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. County
juvenile courts shall apply to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration for funding for program-specific participation and the
administration shall provide grants to the courts consistent with the
per-participant treatment costs identified by the institute.
(6) $1,537,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,537,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for expansion of the following
treatments and therapies in juvenile rehabilitation administration
programs identified by the Washington state institute for public policy
in its October 2006 report: "Evidence-Based Public Policy Options to
Reduce Future Prison Construction, Criminal Justice Costs and Crime
Rates": Multidimensional treatment foster care, family integrated
transitions, and aggression replacement training, or other programs
with a positive benefit-cost finding in the institute's report. The
administration may concentrate delivery of these treatments and
therapies at a limited number of programs to deliver the treatments in
a cost-effective manner.
(7)(a) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall administer
a block grant, rather than categorical funding, of consolidated
juvenile service funds, community juvenile accountability act grants,
the chemical dependency disposition alternative funds, the mental
health disposition alternative, and the sentencing disposition
alternative for the purpose of serving youth adjudicated in the
juvenile justice system. In making the block grant, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall follow the following formula and
will prioritize evidence-based programs and disposition alternatives
and take into account juvenile courts program-eligible youth in
conjunction with the number of youth served in each approved evidence-based program or disposition alternative: (i) Thirty-seven and one-half percent for the at-risk population of youth ten to seventeen years
old; (ii) fifteen percent for moderate and high-risk youth; (iii)
twenty-five percent for evidence-based program participation; (iv)
seventeen and one-half percent for minority populations; (v) three
percent for the chemical dependency disposition alternative; and (vi)
two percent for the mental health and sentencing dispositional
alternatives. Funding for the special sex offender disposition
alternative (SSODA) shall not be included in the block grant, but
allocated on the average daily population in juvenile courts. Funding
for the evidence-based expansion grants shall be excluded from the
block grant formula. Funds may be used for promising practices when
approved by the juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile
courts, through the community juvenile accountability act committee,
based on the criteria established in consultation with Washington state
institute for public policy and the juvenile courts.
(b) The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall phase the
implementation of the formula provided in subsection (1) of this
section by including a stop-loss formula of five percent in fiscal year
2012 and five percent in fiscal year 2013.
(c) The juvenile rehabilitation administration and the juvenile
courts shall establish a block grant funding formula oversight
committee with equal representation from the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the juvenile courts. The purpose of this committee
is to assess the ongoing implementation of the block grant funding
formula, utilizing data-driven decision making and the most current
available information. The committee will be cochaired by the juvenile
rehabilitation administration and the juvenile courts, who will also
have the ability to change members of the committee as needed to
achieve its purpose. Initial members will include one juvenile court
representative from the finance committee, the community juvenile
accountability act committee, the risk assessment quality assurance
committee, the executive board of the Washington association of
juvenile court administrators, the Washington state center for court
research, and a representative of the superior court judges
association; two representatives from the juvenile rehabilitation
administration headquarters program oversight staff, two
representatives of the juvenile rehabilitation administration regional
office staff, one representative of the juvenile rehabilitation
administration fiscal staff and a juvenile rehabilitation
administration division director. The committee may make changes to
the formula categories other than the evidence-based program and
disposition alternative categories if it is determined the changes will
increase statewide service delivery or effectiveness of evidence-based
program or disposition alternative resulting in increased cost benefit
savings to the state. Long-term cost benefit must be considered.
Percentage changes may occur in the evidence-based program or
disposition alternative categories of the formula should it be
determined the changes will increase evidence-based program or
disposition alternative delivery and increase the cost benefit to the
state. These outcomes will also be considered in determining when
evidence-based expansion or special sex offender disposition
alternative funds should be included in the block grant or left
separate.
(d) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts
shall be responsible for collecting and distributing information and
providing access to the data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the Washington state institute for public policy
related to program and outcome data. The juvenile rehabilitation
administration and the juvenile courts will work collaboratively to
develop program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost benefit to
the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices and
disposition alternatives.
(8) The juvenile courts and administrative office of the courts
shall collect and distribute information related to program outcome and
provide access to these data systems to the juvenile rehabilitation
administration and Washington state institute for public policy.
Consistent with chapter 13.50 RCW, all confidentiality agreements
necessary to implement this information-sharing shall be approved
within 30 days of the effective date of this section. The agreements
between administrative office of the courts, the juvenile courts, and
the juvenile rehabilitation administration shall be executed to ensure
that the juvenile rehabilitation administration receives the data that
the juvenile rehabilitation administration identifies as needed to
comply with this subsection. This includes, but is not limited to,
information by program at the statewide aggregate level, individual
court level, and individual client level for the purpose of the
juvenile rehabilitation administration providing quality assurance and
oversight for the locally committed youth block grant and associated
funds and at times as specified by the juvenile rehabilitation
administration as necessary to carry out these functions. The data
shall be provided in a manner that reflects the collaborative work the
juvenile rehabilitation administration and juvenile courts have
developed regarding program outcomes that reinforce the greatest cost
benefit to the state in the implementation of evidence-based practices
and disposition alternatives.
(9) The Washington association of juvenile court administrators and
the juvenile rehabilitation administration, in consultation with the
community juvenile accountability act advisory committee and the
Washington state institute for public policy, shall analyze and review
data elements available from the administrative office of the courts
for possible integration into the evidence-based program quality
assurance plans and processes. The administrative office of the courts
shall provide to the Washington association of juvenile court
administrators and the juvenile rehabilitation administration
information necessary to complete the review and analysis. The
Washington association of juvenile court administrators and the
juvenile rehabilitation administration shall report the findings of
their review and analysis, as well as any recommendations, to the
legislature by December 1, 2012.

Sec. 204 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- MENTAL HEALTH
PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($317,392,000))
$317,548,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($322,982,000))
$324,319,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($448,732,000))
$449,368,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,864,000
Hospital Safety Net Assessment Fund--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,802,000))
$5,251,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,113,772,000))
$1,114,350,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $109,342,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $109,341,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for persons and
services not covered by the medicaid program. This is a reduction of
$4,348,000 each fiscal year from the nonmedicaid funding that was
allocated for expenditure by regional support networks during fiscal
year 2011 prior to supplemental budget reductions. This $4,348,000
reduction shall be distributed among regional support networks
proportional to each network's share of the total state population. To
the extent possible, levels of regional support network spending shall
be maintained in the following priority order: (i) Crisis and
commitment services; (ii) community inpatient services; and (iii)
residential care services, including personal care and emergency
housing assistance.
(b) $6,590,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $6,590,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $7,620,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the department and regional
support networks to continue to contract for implementation of high-intensity programs for assertive community treatment (PACT) teams. In
determining the proportion of medicaid and nonmedicaid funding provided
to regional support networks with PACT teams, the department shall
consider the differences between regional support networks in the
percentages of services and other costs associated with the teams that
are not reimbursable under medicaid. The department may allow regional
support networks which have nonmedicaid reimbursable costs that are
higher than the nonmedicaid allocation they receive under this section
to supplement these funds with local dollars or funds received under
section 204(1)(a) of this act. The department and regional support
networks shall maintain consistency with all essential elements of the
PACT evidence-based practice model in programs funded under this
section.
(c) $5,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $5,850,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $1,300,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the western Washington regional
support networks to provide either community- or hospital campus-based
services for persons who require the level of care previously provided
by the program for adaptive living skills (PALS) at western state
hospital.
(d) The number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional
support networks at eastern state hospital shall be 192 per day. The
number of nonforensic beds allocated for use by regional support
networks at western state hospital shall be 557 per day through
September 2012, 529 per day through January 2013, and 505 per day from
February 2013 through the remainder of fiscal year 2013.
(e) From the general fund--state appropriations in this subsection,
the secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional
support networks reimburse the aging and disability services
administration for the general fund--state cost of medicaid personal
care services that enrolled regional support network consumers use
because of their psychiatric disability.
(f) $4,582,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $4,582,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for mental health services for
mentally ill offenders while confined in a county or city jail and for
facilitating access to programs that offer mental health services upon
release from confinement.
(g) The department is authorized to continue to contract directly,
rather than through contracts with regional support networks, for
children's long-term inpatient facility services.
(h) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to continue performance-based
incentive contracts to provide appropriate community support services
for individuals with severe mental illness who were discharged from the
state hospitals as part of the expanding community services initiative.
These funds will be used to enhance community residential and support
services provided by regional support networks through other state and
federal funding.
(i) $1,125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Spokane regional support
network to implement services to reduce utilization and the census at
eastern state hospital. Such services shall include:
(i) High intensity treatment team for persons who are high
utilizers of psychiatric inpatient services, including those with co-occurring disorders and other special needs;
(ii) Crisis outreach and diversion services to stabilize in the
community individuals in crisis who are at risk of requiring inpatient
care or jail services;
(iii) Mental health services provided in nursing facilities to
individuals with dementia, and consultation to facility staff treating
those individuals; and
(iv) Services at the sixteen-bed evaluation and treatment facility.
At least annually, the Spokane regional support network shall
assess the effectiveness of these services in reducing utilization at
eastern state hospital, identify services that are not optimally
effective, and modify those services to improve their effectiveness.
(j) $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to reimburse Pierce and Spokane
counties for the cost of conducting 180-day commitment hearings at the
state psychiatric hospitals.
(k) Regional support networks may use local funds to earn
additional federal medicaid match, provided the locally matched rate
does not exceed the upper-bound of their federally allowable rate
range, and provided that the enhanced funding is used only to provide
medicaid state plan or waiver services to medicaid clients.
Additionally, regional support networks may use a portion of the state
funds allocated in accordance with (a) of this subsection to earn
additional medicaid match, but only to the extent that the application
of such funds to medicaid services does not diminish the level of
crisis and commitment, community inpatient, residential care, and
outpatient services presently available to persons not eligible for
medicaid.
(l) Given the recent approval of federal medicaid matching funds
for the disability lifeline and the alcohol and drug abuse treatment
support act programs, the department shall charge regional support
networks for only the state share rather than the total cost of
community psychiatric hospitalization for persons enrolled in those
programs.
(m) $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $1,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely to adjust regional support network capitation rates
to account for the per diem rates actually paid for psychiatric care
provided at hospitals participating in the certified public expenditure
program operated pursuant to section 213 of this act.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($115,317,000))
$115,088,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($114,111,000))
$110,201,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($153,324,000))
$153,780,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,325,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($450,077,000))
$446,394,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state psychiatric hospitals may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital group
purchasing organizations when it is cost-effective to do so.
(b) $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a community partnership
between western state hospital and the city of Lakewood to support
community policing efforts in the Lakewood community surrounding
western state hospital. The amounts provided in this subsection (2)(b)
are for the salaries, benefits, supplies, and equipment for one full-time investigator, one full-time police officer, and one full-time
community service officer at the city of Lakewood.
(c) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for payment to the city of
Lakewood for police services provided by the city at western state
hospital and adjacent areas.
(d) $20,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $20,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to maintain staffed capacity to
serve an average daily census in forensic wards at western state
hospital of 270 patients per day.
(e) The appropriations in this section reflect efficiencies to be
achieved through enactment of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6492
(competency to stand trial). These efficiencies are expected to enable
the hospitals to substantially increase the timeliness with which
evaluations of defendant competency to stand trial are completed, and
treatment to restore competency is initiated, without corresponding
increases in state appropriations.

(3) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,168,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,164,000))
$1,162,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,109,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,141,000))
$7,139,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $1,161,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,161,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for children's evidence based
mental health services. Funding is sufficient to continue serving
children at the same levels as fiscal year 2009.
(b) $700,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is
provided solely for the University of Washington's evidence based
practice institute which supports the identification, evaluation, and
implementation of evidence-based or promising practices for serving
children and youth with mental health disorders. The department shall
enter into an interagency agreement with the office of the attorney
general for expenditure of $700,000 of the state's proceeds of the cy
pres settlement in State of Washington v. AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for
this purpose.

(4) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,476,000))
$4,486,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,261,000))
$4,280,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,227,000))
$7,242,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $446,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,410,000))
$16,454,000

(a) The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: In accordance with RCW
43.20B.110, 43.135.055, and 71.24.035, the department is authorized to
increase license and certification fees in fiscal years 2012 and 2013
to support the costs of the regulatory program. The fee schedule
increases must be developed so that the maximum amount of additional
fees paid by providers statewide in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium is
$446,000. The department's fee schedule shall have differential rates
for providers with proof of accreditation from organizations that the
department has determined to have substantially equivalent standards to
those of the department, including but not limited to the joint
commission on accreditation of health care organizations, the
commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities, and the
council on accreditation. To reflect the reduced costs associated with
regulation of accredited programs, the department's fees for
organizations with such proof of accreditation must reflect the lower
costs of licensing for these programs than for other organizations
which are not accredited.
(b) $19,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $17,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $34,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are
provided solely to support a partnership among the department of social
and health services, the department of health, and agencies that
deliver medical care and behavioral health services in Cowlitz county.
The partnership shall identify and recommend strategies for resolving
regulatory, licensing, data management, reporting, and funding barriers
to more effective integration of primary medical and behavioral health
care services in the county.

Sec. 205 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM
(1) COMMUNITY SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($418,815,000))
$405,477,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($422,854,000))
$421,762,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($743,532,000))
$753,200,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $184,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,585,385,000))
$1,580,623,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) Amounts appropriated in this subsection reflect a reduction to
funds appropriated for in-home care. The department shall reduce the
number of in-home hours authorized. The reduction shall be scaled
based on the acuity level of care recipients. The largest hour
reductions shall be to lower acuity patients and the smallest hour
reductions shall be to higher acuity patients.
(c) Amounts appropriated in this subsection are sufficient to
develop and implement the use of a consistent, statewide outcome-based
vendor contract for employment and day services by July 1, 2012. The
rates paid to vendors under this contract shall also be made
consistent. In its description of activities the agency shall include
activity listings and dollars appropriated for: Employment services,
day services, child development services and county administration of
services to the developmentally disabled. The department shall begin
reporting to the office of financial management on these activities
beginning in fiscal year 2010.
(d) $944,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $944,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $1,888,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for state contributions for individual provider
health care benefits. Pursuant to the collective bargaining agreement
negotiated with the exclusive bargaining representative of individual
providers established under RCW 74.39A.270, the state shall contribute
to the multiemployer health benefits trust fund (($1.96)) $2.21 per
paid hour worked by individual providers.
(e) (($1,871,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $1,995,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013, and $3,865,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for home care agencies to purchase
health coverage for home care providers. The department shall
calculate and distribute payments for health care benefits to home care
agencies at $558 per month for each worker who cares for publicly
funded clients at 86 hours or more per month. In order to negotiate
the most comprehensive health benefits package for its employees, each
agency may determine benefit levels according to the hours an employee
works providing state-funded personal care. Health benefits shall be
offered to all employees who care for publicly funded clients for 86
hours per month or more. At a minimum, employees who care for publicly
funded clients at 140 hours a month or greater must receive a
comprehensive medical benefit. Benefits shall not be provided to
employees who care for publicly funded clients at 85 hours or less per
month or as interim respite workers. The department shall not pay an
agency for benefits provided to an employee who otherwise receives
health care coverage through other family members, other
employment-based coverage, or military or veteran's coverage. The
department shall require annually, each home care agency to review each
of its employee's available health coverage and to provide a written
declaration to the department verifying that health benefits purchased
with public funds are solely for employees that do not have other
available coverage. Home care agencies may determine a reasonable
employee co-premium not to exceed 20 percent of the total benefit
cost.)) $104,669,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 and $104,669,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided to the department to provide personal care
services to waiver and nonwaiver in home clients. Pursuant to Senate
Bill No. 6609 (medicaid personal care services program), the department
shall provide a personal care services benefit for adult clients under
section 1915 (i) of the social security act exclusively utilizing the
option that allows for client self-direction of an individualized
budget. Clients will be able to spend their budget to secure services
from appropriate providers, purchase other support services and
therapies, and purchase equipment or make other expenditures as
necessary to address the clients' health and safety. The per-client
individualized budget shall be established using a methodology that is
objective and evidence-based, uses valid, reliable cost data; includes
a calculation of the expected cost of each service available under this
option; and can be applied consistently to individuals. The department
shall operate the program within the amounts specifically provided.
(f) $1,127,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $1,199,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $2,322,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
training partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, for instructional
costs associated with the training of individual providers. House Bill
No. 1548 and Senate Bill No. 5473 (long-term care worker requirements)
make statutory changes to the increased training requirements and
therefore the state shall contribute to the partnership $0.17 per paid
hour worked by all home care workers. This amount is pursuant to the
collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270. Expenditures for the purposes specified in this subsection
shall not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection.
(g)(i) Within the amounts appropriated in this subsection, the
department shall revise the current working age adult policy to allow
clients to choose between employment and community access activities.
Clients age 21 and older who are receiving services through a home- and
community-based medicaid waiver shall be offered the choice to
transition to a community access program after nine months of
enrollment in an employment program, and the option to transition from
a community access program to an employment program at any time. The
department shall inform clients and their legal representatives of all
available options for employment and day services. Information
provided to the client and the client's legal representative shall
include the types of activities each service option provides, and the
amount, scope, and duration of service for which the client would be
eligible under each service option. An individual client may be
authorized for only one service option, either employment services or
community access services. Clients may not participate in more than
one of these services at any given time.
(ii) The department shall work with counties and stakeholders to
strengthen and expand the existing community access program. The
program must emphasize support for the client so they are able to
participate in activities that integrate them into their community and
support independent living and skills.
(iii) The appropriation in this subsection includes funding to
provide employment or community access services to 168 medicaid
eligible young adults with developmental disabilities living with their
families who need employment opportunities and assistance after high
school graduation.
(h) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the restoration of direct
support to local organizations that utilize parent-to-parent networks
and communication to promote access and quality of care for individuals
with developmental disabilities and their families.
(i) In accordance with Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1277
(licensed settings for vulnerable adults), adult family home license
fees are increased in fiscal years 2012 and 2013 to support the costs
of conducting licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs.
(i) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes
shall be increased to $100 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2012 and
$175 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2013. Adult family homes shall
receive a corresponding vendor rate increase per medicaid patient day
of $0.22 in fiscal year 2012 and $0.43 in fiscal year 2013 to cover the
cost of the license fee increase for publicly funded beds.
(ii) Beginning in fiscal year 2012, a processing fee of $2,750
shall be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially
licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.
(j) Clients with developmental disabilities have demonstrated a
need and a desire for a day services program as verified by over 900
clients currently accessing day programs through a long- term care
service model. In addition, every individual, to include those with a
developmental disability, should have the opportunity for meaningful
employment which allows them to contribute to their communities and to
become as self-sufficient as possible. Providing choice empowers
recipients of publicly funded services and their families by expanding
their degree of control over the services and supports they need.
The department shall work with legislators and stakeholders to
develop a new approach to employment and day services. The objective
of this plan is to ensure that adults with developmental disabilities
have optimum choices, and that employment and day offerings are
comprehensive enough to meet the needs of all clients currently served
on a home and community based waiver. The proposal shall be submitted
to the 2012 legislature for consideration and shall be constructed such
that a client ultimately receives employment, community access, or the
community day option but not more than one service at a time. The
proposal shall include options for program efficiencies within the
current employment and day structure and shall provide details on the
plan to implement a consistent, statewide outcome-based vendor contract
for employment and day services as specified in (c) of this subsection.

(2) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,815,000))
$75,503,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($79,939,000))
$80,271,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($154,388,000))
$154,403,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,043,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($337,185,000))
$332,220,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(b) $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $721,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are for the department to fulfill its contracts with
the school districts under chapter 28A.190 RCW to provide
transportation, building space, and other support services as are
reasonably necessary to support the educational programs of students
living in residential habilitation centers.
(c) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for operations of the Rainier school
vision development committee, hereby established to create a long-range
vision and development plan for the Rainier school.
(a) The committee shall consist of:
(i) Three members of the legislature representing the thirty-first
legislative district;
(ii) Two persons representing the cities of Enumclaw and Buckley;
(iii) Two persons representing the chambers of commerce of the
cities of Enumclaw and Buckley;
(iv) Two persons representing the friends of Rainier school
organization; and
(v) One person representing the Pierce county developmental
disabilities board.
(b) The committee shall create and submit to the legislature a
long-range community vision and development plan for the efficient use
of the Rainier school facility to best serve the needs of persons with
developmental disabilities, including the establishment of a respite
care center for families and other caregivers of persons with
developmental disabilities.

(3) PROGRAM SUPPORT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,380,000))
$1,382,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,371,000))
$1,374,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,323,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,074,000))
$4,079,000

(4) SPECIAL PROJECTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,648,000))
$4,658,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,637,000))
$4,657,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,575,000))
$9,588,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $998,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,858,000))
$19,901,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
Amounts appropriated in this subsection are for the purposes of
transitioning clients with developmental disabilities into community
settings. The department is authorized as needed to use these funds to
either pay for clients residing within a residential habilitation
center or for placements in the community. Pursuant to Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5459 (services for people with developmental
disabilities), funding in this subsection must be prioritized for the
purpose of facilitating the consolidation and closure of Frances Haddon
Morgan Center. The department shall use a person-centered approach in
developing the discharge plan to assess each resident's needs and
identify services the resident requires to successfully transition to
the community or another residential habilitation center. The
department is authorized to use any savings from this effort for the
purpose of developing community resources to address the needs of
clients with developmental disabilities who are in crisis or in need of
respite. The department shall track the costs and savings of closing
Frances Haddon Morgan Center and any investments into community
placements and resources. The department shall provide a fiscal
progress report to the legislature by December 5, 2011.

Sec. 206 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- AGING AND ADULT
SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($781,995,000))
$791,974,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($804,465,000))
$812,180,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,680,450,000))
$1,693,938,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,517,000
Traumatic Brain Injury Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,388,000
Nursing Facility Quality Assurance Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($88,071,000))
$88,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,385,886,000))
$3,416,997,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For purposes of implementing chapter 74.46 RCW, the weighted
average nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $170.37 for
fiscal year 2012 and shall not exceed $171.43 for fiscal year 2013,
including the rate add-ons described in (a) and (b) of this subsection.
However, if the waiver requested from the federal centers for medicare
and medicaid services in relation to the safety net assessment created
by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (nursing home payments) is
for any reason not approved and implemented, the weighted average
nursing facility payment rate shall not exceed $159.87 for fiscal year
2012 and shall not exceed $160.93 for fiscal year 2013. There will be
no adjustments for economic trends and conditions in fiscal years 2012
and 2013. The economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined
in the biennial appropriations act shall not be compounded with the
economic trends and conditions factor or factors defined in any other
biennial appropriations acts before applying it to the component rate
allocations established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW. When no
economic trends and conditions factor for either fiscal year is defined
in a biennial appropriations act, no economic trends and conditions
factor or factors defined in any earlier biennial appropriations act
shall be applied solely or compounded to the component rate allocations
established in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW.
(a) Within the funds provided, the department shall continue to
provide an add-on per medicaid resident day per facility not to exceed
$1.57. The add-on shall be used to increase wages, benefits, and/or
staffing levels for certified nurse aides; or to increase wages and/or
benefits for dietary aides, housekeepers, laundry aides, or any other
category of worker whose statewide average dollars-per-hour wage was
less than $15 in calendar year 2008, according to cost report data.
The add-on may also be used to address resulting wage compression for
related job classes immediately affected by wage increases to low-wage
workers. The department shall continue reporting requirements and a
settlement process to ensure that the funds are spent according to this
subsection.
(b) The department shall do a comparative analysis of the facility-based payment rates calculated on July 1, ((2011)) 2012, using the
payment methodology defined in ((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5581 (nursing home payments))) chapter 74.46 RCW and including the add-on in (a) of this subsection, to the facility-based payment rates in
effect June 30, 2010. If the facility-based payment rate calculated on
July 1, ((2011)) 2012, is smaller than the facility-based payment rate
on June 30, 2010, then the difference shall be provided to the
individual nursing facilities as an add-on payment per medicaid
resident day.
(c) During the comparative analysis performed in subsection (b) of
this section, if it is found that the direct care rate for any facility
calculated using the payment methodology defined in ((Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (nursing home payments))) chapter 74.46
RCW and including the add-on in (a) of this subsection is greater than
the direct care rate in effect on June 30, 2010, then the facility
shall receive a ten percent direct care rate add-on to compensate that
facility for taking on more acute clients than they have in the past.
(d) The department shall provide a medicaid rate add-on to
reimburse the medicaid share of the skilled nursing facility safety net
assessment as a medicaid allowable cost. The nursing facility safety
net rate add-on may not be included in the calculation of the annual
statewide weighted average nursing facility payment rate.
(e) If the waiver requested from the federal centers for medicare
and medicaid services in relation to the safety net assessment created
by Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (nursing home payments) is
for any reason not approved and implemented, subsections (b), (c), and
(d) of this subsection do not apply.
(2) After examining actual nursing facility cost information, the
legislature finds that the medicaid nursing facility rates calculated
pursuant to ((Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5581 (nursing home
payments))) chapter 74.46 RCW and as funded in this section provide
sufficient reimbursement to efficiently and economically operating
nursing facilities and bear a reasonable relationship to costs.
(3) In accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW, the department shall
issue no additional certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2012 and no new certificates of capital authorization for fiscal
year 2013 and shall grant no rate add-ons to payment rates for capital
improvements not requiring a certificate of need and a certificate of
capital authorization for fiscal years 2012 and 2013.
(4) The long-term care program may develop and pay enhanced rates
for exceptional care to nursing homes for persons with traumatic brain
injuries who are transitioning from hospital care. The cost per
patient day for caring for these clients in a nursing home setting may
be equal to or less than the cost of caring for these clients in a
hospital setting.
(5) Amounts appropriated in this section reflect a reduction to
funds appropriated for in-home care. The department shall reduce the
number of in-home hours authorized. The reduction shall be scaled
based on the acuity level of care recipients. The largest hour
reductions shall be to lower acuity patients and the smallest hour
reductions shall be to higher acuity patients.
(6) $1,883,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $1,883,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $3,766,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for state contributions for
individual provider health care benefits. Pursuant to the collective
bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive bargaining
representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270, the state shall contribute to the multiemployer health
benefits trust fund (($1.96)) $2.21 per paid hour worked by individual
providers.
(7) (($16,835,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $17,952,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013, and $34,786,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for home care agencies to purchase
health coverage for home care providers. The department shall
calculate and distribute payments for health care benefits to home care
agencies at $558 per month for each worker who cares for publicly
funded clients at 86 hours or more per month. In order to negotiate
the most comprehensive health benefits package for its employees, each
agency may determine benefit levels according to the hours an employee
works providing state-funded personal care. Health benefits shall be
offered to all employees who care for publicly funded clients for 86
hours per month or more. At a minimum, employees who care for publicly
funded clients at 140 hours a month or greater must receive a
comprehensive medical benefit. Benefits shall not be provided to
employees who care for publicly funded clients at 85 hours or less per
month or as interim respite workers. The department shall not pay an
agency for benefits provided to an employee who otherwise receives
health care coverage through other family members, other
employment-based coverage, or military or veteran's coverage. The
department shall require annually, each home care agency to review each
of its employee's available health coverage and to provide a written
declaration to the department verifying that health benefits purchased
with public funds are solely for employees that do not have other
available coverage. Home care agencies may determine a reasonable
employee co-premium not to exceed 20 percent of the total benefit
cost.)) $338,550,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 and $338,500,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided to the department to provide personal care
services to waiver and nonwaiver in home clients. Pursuant to Senate
Bill No. 6609 (medicaid personal care services program), the department
shall provide a personal care services benefit for adult clients under
section 1915 (i) of the social security act exclusively utilizing the
option that allows for client self-direction of an individualized
budget. Clients will be able to spend their budget to secure services
from appropriate providers, purchase other support services and
therapies, and purchase equipment or make other expenditures as
necessary to address the clients' health and safety. The per-client
individualized budget shall be established using a methodology that is
objective and evidence-based, uses valid, reliable cost data; includes
a calculation of the expected cost of each service available under this
option; and can be applied consistently to individuals. The department
shall operate the program within the amounts specifically provided.
(8) $2,063,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $2,195,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $4,260,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the state's contribution to the
training partnership, as provided in RCW 74.39A.360, for instructional
costs associated with the training of individual providers. House Bill
No. 1548 and Senate Bill No. 5473 (long-term care worker requirements)
make statutory changes to the increased training requirements and
therefore the state shall contribute to the partnership $0.17 per paid
hour worked by all home care workers. This amount is pursuant to the
collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the exclusive
bargaining representative of individual providers established under RCW
74.39A.270. Expenditures for the purposes specified in this subsection
shall not exceed the amounts provided in this subsection.
(9) Individuals receiving services as supplemental security income
(SSI) state supplemental payments shall not become eligible for medical
assistance under RCW 74.09.510 due solely to the receipt of SSI state
supplemental payments.
(10) The department shall eliminate the adult day health program
under the state plan 1915(i) option and shall reestablish it under the
long-term care home and community-based waiver.
(11) (($4,588,000)) $4,713,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, (($4,559,000)) $6,427,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and
(($9,237,000)) $11,230,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for the continued operation of community
residential and support services for persons who are older adults or
who have co-occurring medical and behavioral disorders and who have
been discharged or diverted from a state psychiatric hospital. These
funds shall be used to serve individuals whose treatment needs
constitute substantial barriers to community placement, who no longer
require active psychiatric treatment at an inpatient hospital level of
care, and who no longer meet the criteria for inpatient involuntary
commitment. The department shall prioritize services in order to
reduce utilization and maintain a reduction of 60 beds at western state
hospital that were previously used for long-term placements for clients
with dementia, traumatic brain injuries, or other organic brain
disorders. The department shall ensure that a sufficient number of
individuals have been transitioned and diverted from western state
hospital to enable closure of a 30-bed ward by October 1, 2012, and of
another 30-bed ward by February 1, 2013. Coordination of these
services must be done in partnership between the mental health program
and the aging and disability services administration.
(12) $1,840,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,877,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer
services program. Funding shall be prioritized towards serving
populations traditionally served by long-term care services to include
senior citizens and persons with disabilities.
(13) In accordance with Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1277
(licensed settings for vulnerable adults), nursing facility fees are
increased in fiscal year 2012 and adult family home fees are increased
in fiscal year 2012 and fiscal year 2013 to support the costs of
conducting licensure, inspection, and regulatory programs.
(a) The current annual renewal license fee for nursing facilities
shall be increased to $359 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2012 and
assumes $517,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation.
Nursing facilities shall receive a vendor rate increase of $0.08 per
medicaid patient day to cover the license fee increase for publicly
funded beds.
(b) The current annual renewal license fee for adult family homes
shall be increased to $100 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2012 and
assumes $1,449,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation;
and $175 per bed beginning in fiscal year 2013 and assumes $2,463,000
of the general fund--private/local appropriation. Adult family homes
shall receive a corresponding vendor rate increase per medicaid patient
day of $0.22 in fiscal year 2012 and $0.43 in fiscal year 2013 to cover
the license fee increase for publicly funded beds.
(c) Beginning in fiscal year 2012, a processing fee of $2,750 shall
be charged to each adult family home when the home is initially
licensed. This fee is nonrefundable.
(d) $72,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $708,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation
and $708,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely to implement sections 501 through 503 of Engrossed Substitute
House Bill No. 1277 (licensed settings for vulnerable adults). The
department shall use additional investigative resources to address
complaints about provider practices as well as alleged abuse, neglect,
abandonment, and exploitation of residents in adult family homes. The
department shall develop a statewide internal quality review and
accountability program to improve the accountability of staff and the
consistent application of investigative activities, and shall convene
a quality assurance panel to review problems in the quality of care in
adult family homes.
(14) $3,316,000 of the traumatic brain injury account--state
appropriation is provided solely to continue services for persons with
traumatic brain injury (TBI) as defined in chapter 143, Laws of 2011
(traumatic brain injury strategic partnership).
(15) The department is authorized to place long-term care clients
residing in nursing homes and paid for with state only funds into less
restrictive community care settings while continuing to meet the
client's care needs.

Sec. 207 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ECONOMIC SERVICES
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($487,305,000))
$409,071,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($503,362,000))
$355,949,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,167,467,000))
$1,167,708,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,592,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,188,726,000))
$1,963,320,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($258,880,000)) $187,423,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, (($297,296,000)) $165,563,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and
(($710,173,000)) $710,843,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for all components of the WorkFirst
program. Under section 2 of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5921
(social services programs), the amounts in this subsection assume that
any participant in the temporary assistance for needy families where
their participation is suspended and does not volunteer to participate
in WorkFirst services or unsubsidized employment does not receive child
care subsidies or WorkFirst subsidies as a condition of the suspension.
Within the amounts provided for the WorkFirst program, the department
may provide assistance using state-only funds for families eligible for
temporary assistance for needy families.
(a) Within the amounts provided for WorkFirst in this subsection,
the department shall continue to implement WorkFirst program
improvements that are designed to achieve progress against outcome
measures specified in RCW 74.08A.410.
(b) The department may establish a career services work transition
program.
(c) Within the amounts provided in this subsection, (($1,414,000))
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2012
and (($5,150,000)) $950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation and
administration of the electronic benefit transfer system under section
12 of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5921 (social services
programs). The department shall transfer these amounts to the
department of early learning for the implementation and administration
of the project.
(d) Within amounts appropriated in this section, the legislature
expressly mandates that the department exercise its authority, granted
in 1997 under RCW 74.08A.290, to contract for work activities services
pursuant to that statutory authority and RCW 41.06.142(3).
(e) The department shall create a temporary assistance for needy
families budget structure that allows for more transparent tracking of
budget units and subunits of expenditures where these units and
subunits are mutually exclusive from other department budget units.
The budget structure shall include budget units for the following:
Grants, child care, WorkFirst activities, and administration of the
program.
(2)(a) $11,825,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for a contingency reserve in the event ((the temporary
assistance for needy families cash benefit is)) that expenditures in
subsection (1) of this section are projected to exceed ((forecasted
amounts by more than one percent)) the appropriated amounts. The
department shall only expend an amount equal to the forecasted over-expenditure. For purposes of this subsection, the temporary assistance
forecast shall be completed every quarter and follow a similar schedule
of the caseload forecast council forecasts.
(b) If sufficient savings in subsection (1) of this section are
achieved, the department of early learning shall increase the number of
child care slots available for the working connections child care
program.
(3) (($23,494,000)) $23,679,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, in addition to supplemental
security income recoveries, is provided solely for financial assistance
and other services to recipients in the program established in section
4, chapter 8, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess., until the program terminates
on October 31, 2011.
(4)(a) (($13,086,000)) $12,457,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and (($24,788,000)) $21,959,000 of
the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013, in addition
to supplemental security income recoveries, are provided solely for the
programs created in Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2082 (essential
needs and assistance program) beginning November 1, 2011.
(b) The department shall review clients receiving services through
the aged, blind, or disabled assistance program, to determine whether
they would benefit from assistance in becoming naturalized citizens,
and thus be eligible to receive federal supplemental security income
benefits. Those cases shall be given high priority for naturalization
funding through the department.
(c) The department shall continue the interagency agreement with
the department of veterans' affairs to establish a process for referral
of veterans who may be eligible for veterans' services. This agreement
must include out-stationing department of veterans' affairs staff in
selected community service office locations in King and Pierce counties
to facilitate applications for veterans' services.
(5) $1,657,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,657,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for naturalization services.
(6) $2,366,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for refugee employment services, of which
$1,774,000 is provided solely for the department to pass through to
statewide refugee assistance organizations for limited English
proficiency pathway services; and $2,366,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for refugee
employment services, of which $1,774,000 is provided solely for the
department to pass through to statewide refugee assistance
organizations for limited English proficiency pathway services.
(7) On December 1, 2011, and annually thereafter, the department
must report to the legislature on all sources of funding available for
both refugee and immigrant services and naturalization services during
the current fiscal year and the amounts expended to date by service
type and funding source. The report must also include the number of
clients served and outcome data for the clients.
(((8) To ensure expenditures remain within available funds
appropriated in this section, the legislature establishes the benefit
under the state food assistance program, pursuant to RCW 74.08A.120, to
be fifty percent of the federal supplemental nutrition assistance
program benefit amount.))

Sec. 208 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ALCOHOL AND
SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,287,000))
$71,649,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($74,422,000))
$66,986,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($141,514,000))
$164,526,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,086,000))
$13,486,000
Criminal Justice Treatment Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,748,000
Problem Gambling Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,448,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($314,505,000))
$338,843,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
may contract with the University of Washington and community-based
providers for the provision of the parent-child assistance program.
For all contractors, indirect charges for administering the program
shall not exceed ten percent of the total contract amount.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall continue to provide for chemical dependency treatment services
for adult medicaid eligible, pregnant and parenting women, disability
lifeline, and alcoholism and drug addiction treatment and support act,
and medical care services clients.
(3) In accordance with RCW 70.96A.090 and 43.135.055, the
department is authorized to increase fees for the review and approval
of treatment programs in fiscal years 2012 and 2013 as necessary to
support the costs of the regulatory program. The department's fee
schedule shall have differential rates for providers with proof of
accreditation from organizations that the department has determined to
have substantially equivalent standards to those of the department,
including but not limited to the joint commission on accreditation of
health care organizations, the commission on accreditation of
rehabilitation facilities, and the council on accreditation. To
reflect the reduced costs associated with regulation of accredited
programs, the department's fees for organizations with such proof of
accreditation must reflect the lower cost of licensing for these
programs than for other organizations which are not accredited.
(4) $3,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation (from the
substance abuse prevention and treatment federal block grant) is
provided solely for the continued funding of existing county drug and
alcohol use prevention programs.

Sec. 209 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,874,000))
$10,854,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,861,000))
$10,822,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,091,000))
$105,095,000
Telecommunications Devices for the Hearing and
Speech Impaired -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,766,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($129,592,000))
$129,537,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $480,000 of the telecommunications devices
for the hearing and speech impaired account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the office of deaf and hard of hearing to contract
for services that provide employment support and help with life
activities for deaf-blind individuals in King county.

Sec. 210 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- SPECIAL COMMITMENT
PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,719,000))
$47,890,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,292,000))
$35,928,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($94,011,000))
$83,818,000

Sec. 211 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,125,000))
$25,764,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($24,586,000))
$23,718,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,223,000))
$38,807,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,116,000
Performance Audits of State Government--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,812,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($96,862,000))
$95,217,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) (($300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington state mentors
program to continue its public-private partnerships to provide
technical assistance and training to mentoring programs that serve
at-risk youth.
(2) $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for funding of the teamchild
project.
(3) $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $178,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the juvenile detention
alternatives initiative.
(4))) $4,812,000 of the performance audits of state government--state appropriation is provided solely for support and expansion of the
division of fraud investigation. The division shall conduct
investigatory and enforcement activities for all department programs,
including the child support and TANF programs.
(((5))) (2) $1,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 is provided solely for the department to distribute as
support to community public health and safety networks that have a
history of providing training and services related to adverse childhood
experiences. Distribution of these funds is contingent upon securing
funding from a private entity or entities to provide one dollar in
matching funds for each dollar in state funds received by a network so
that the funding received by a community public health and safety
network will be equal portions of state and private funding.

Sec. 212 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES -- PAYMENTS TO OTHER
AGENCIES PROGRAM
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,778,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,927,000))
$58,940,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($183,105,000))
$180,118,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $469,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2011 and $270,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2012 are provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5921 (social
services programs). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 213 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,130,229,000))
$2,022,521,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,185,617,000))
$1,980,272,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,389,627,000))
$5,227,652,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($45,512,000))
$51,726,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,077,000
Hospital Safety Net Assessment Fund--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($394,905,000))
$433,255,000
State Health Care Authority Administration Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,118,000))
$34,117,000
Basic Health Plan Stabilization Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($44,000,000))
$49,000,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $529,000
Medicaid Fraud Penalty Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,200,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,239,614,000))
$9,823,349,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
The appropriations to the authority in this act shall be expended
for the purposes and in the amounts specified in this act. To the
extent that appropriations in this section are insufficient to fund
actual expenditures in excess of caseload forecasts and utilization
assumptions, the authority, after May 1, 2012, may transfer general
fund--state appropriations for fiscal year 2012 that are provided
solely for a specified purpose. The authority shall not transfer
funds, and the director of financial management shall not approve the
transfer, unless the transfer is consistent with the objective of
conserving, to the maximum extent possible, the expenditure of state
funds. The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing seven days prior to approving any allotment
modifications or transfers under this subsection. The written
notification shall include a narrative explanation and justification of
the changes, along with expenditures and allotments by budget unit and
appropriation, both before and after any allotment modifications or
transfers.
(1) Within amounts appropriated in this section and sections 205
and 206 of this act, the health care authority shall continue to
provide an enhanced basic health plan subsidy for foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care
programs. Under this enhanced subsidy option, foster parents eligible
to participate in the basic health plan as subsidized enrollees and
home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal
poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic health plan at
the minimum premium amount charged to enrollees with incomes below
sixty-five percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services and
that choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan
to pay 133 percent of the premium amount which would otherwise be due
from the sponsored enrollees.
(3)(a) $1,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 is provided solely to plan the implementation of a
system of consolidated public school employee health benefits
purchasing.
It is the intent of the legislature to improve the administration,
transparency, and equity in delivering a K-12 employees' health
benefits system. In addition, the legislature intends that any cost
savings that result from changes to K-12 health benefits be dedicated
to public schools.
To further this legislative intent, the state health care authority
shall develop a plan to implement a consolidated health benefits'
system for K-12 employees for the 2013-14 school year. The health care
authority shall deliver a report to the legislature by December 15,
2011, that sets forth the implementation plan to the ways and means
committees of the house of representatives and the senate.
(b) The report prepared by the health care authority shall compare
and contrast the costs and benefits, both long and short term, of:
(i) The current K-12 health benefits system;
(ii) A new K-12 employee benefits pool; and
(iii) Enrolling K-12 employees into the health benefits pool for
state employees.
(c) In addition to the implementation plan, the report shall
include the following information:
(i) The costs and benefits of the current K-12 health benefits
system;
(ii) The costs and benefits of providing a new statewide K-12
employees' health benefits pool to school districts and school
employees;
(iii) The costs and benefits of enrolling K-12 employees into the
existing health benefits pool for state employees;
(iv) Recommendations of ways to limit administrative duplication
and costs, improve transparency to employees, the legislature, and the
public and assure equity among beneficiaries of publicly provided
employee health benefits;
(v) Recommendations for standardizing benefit packages and
purchasing efforts in a manner that seeks to maximize funding and
equity for all school employees;
(vi) Recommendations regarding the use of incentives, including how
changes to state health benefit allocations could provide employees
with benefits that would encourage participation;
(vii) Recommendations regarding the implementation of a new K-12
employee benefit plan, with separate options for voluntary
participation and mandatory statewide participation;
(viii) Recommendations regarding methods to reduce inequities
between individual and family coverage;
(ix) Consolidation of the purchasing and budget accountability for
school employee benefits to maximize administrative efficiency and
leverage existing skills and resources; and
(x) Other details the health care authority deems necessary,
including but not limited to recommendations on the following:
(A) Approaches for implementing the transition to a statewide pool,
including administrative and statutory changes necessary to ensure a
successful transition, and whether the pool should be separate from, or
combined with, the public employees' benefits pool;
(B) The structure of a permanent governing group to provide ongoing
oversight to the consolidated pool, in a manner similar to the public
employees benefits board functions for employee health benefits,
including statutory duties and authorities of the board; and
(C) Options for including potential changes to: Eligibility
standardization, the public employees benefits risk pools, the movement
of school employee retirees into the new K-12 pool or pools, and the
movement of educational service district employees into the new K-12
pool or pools.
(d) In determining its costs and benefits of a new statewide K-12
employees' health benefits pool for school districts and school
employees, the health care authority shall assume the following:
(i) School district enrollees must constitute an entire bargaining
unit, or an entire group of nonrepresented employees;
(ii) Staffing and administration for benefits purchasing shall be
provided by the health care authority; and
(iii) The new K-12 pool would operate on a schedule that
coordinates with the financing and enrollment schedule used for school
districts.
(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and the
office of the insurance commissioner shall provide information and
technical assistance to the health care authority as requested by the
health care authority. The health care authority shall not implement
the new school employee benefits pool until authorized to do so by the
legislature.
(4) The administrator shall take at least the following actions to
assure that persons participating in the basic health plan are eligible
for the level of assistance they receive: (a) Require submission of
(i) income tax returns, and recent pay history, from all applicants, or
(ii) other verifiable evidence of earned and unearned income from those
persons not required to file income tax returns; (b) check employment
security payroll records at least once every twelve months on all
enrollees; (c) require enrollees whose income as indicated by payroll
records exceeds that upon which their subsidy is based to document
their current income as a condition of continued eligibility; (d)
require enrollees for whom employment security payroll records cannot
be obtained to document their current income at least once every six
months; (e) not reduce gross family income for self-employed persons by
noncash-flow expenses such as, but not limited to, depreciation,
amortization, and home office deductions, as defined by the United
States internal revenue service; and (f) pursue repayment and civil
penalties from persons who have received excessive subsidies, as
provided in RCW 70.47.060(9).
(5) Enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan shall be limited
to only include persons who qualify as subsidized enrollees as defined
in RCW 70.47.020 and who (a) qualify for services under 1115 medicaid
demonstration project number 11-W-00254/10; or (b) are foster parents
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.
(6) $23,700,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is
provided solely for planning and implementation of a health benefit
exchange under the federal patient protection and affordable care act.
Within the amounts provided in this subsection, funds used by the
authority for information technology projects are conditioned on the
authority satisfying the requirements of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5931 (central service agencies).
(7) Based on quarterly expenditure reports and caseload forecasts,
if the health care authority estimates that expenditures for the
medical assistance program will exceed the appropriations, the health
care authority shall take steps including but not limited to reduction
of rates or elimination of optional services to reduce expenditures so
that total program costs do not exceed the annual appropriation
authority.
(8) In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded
services, the health care authority is authorized to disregard
recoveries by Holocaust survivors of insurance proceeds or other
assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.
(9) The legislature affirms that it is in the state's interest for
Harborview medical center to remain an economically viable component of
the state's health care system.
(10) When a person is ineligible for medicaid solely by reason of
residence in an institution for mental diseases, the health care
authority shall provide the person with the same benefits as he or she
would receive if eligible for medicaid, using state-only funds to the
extent necessary.
(11) $4,261,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $4,261,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $8,522,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for low-income disproportionate share
hospital payments under RCW 74.09.730(1)(a).
(12) (($5,905,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $5,905,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013, and $11,810,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for nonrural indigent assistance
disproportionate share hospital payments in accordance with RCW
74.09.730(1).
(13) $665,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $665,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $1,330,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for small rural indigent assistance
disproportionate share hospital payments in accordance with RCW
74.09.730(1).
(14))) $6,000,000 of the general fund -- federal appropriation is
provided solely for supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by
public hospital districts. The public hospital district shall be
responsible for providing the required nonfederal match for the
supplemental payment, and the payments shall not exceed the maximum
allowable under federal rules. It is the legislature's intent that the
payments shall be supplemental to and shall not in any way offset or
reduce the payments calculated and provided in accordance with part E
of chapter 74.46 RCW. It is the legislature's further intent that
costs otherwise allowable for rate-setting and settlement against
payments under chapter 74.46 RCW shall not be disallowed solely because
such costs have been paid by revenues retained by the nursing home from
these supplemental payments. The supplemental payments are subject to
retrospective interim and final cost settlements based on the nursing
homes' as-filed and final medicare cost reports. The timing of the
interim and final cost settlements shall be at the health care
authority's discretion. During either the interim cost settlement or
the final cost settlement, the health care authority shall recoup from
the public hospital districts the supplemental payments that exceed the
medicaid cost limit and/or the medicare upper payment limit. The
health care authority shall apply federal rules for identifying the
eligible incurred medicaid costs and the medicare upper payment limit.
(((15))) (13) The health care authority shall continue the
inpatient hospital certified public expenditures program for the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium. The program shall apply to all public hospitals,
including those owned or operated by the state, except those classified
as critical access hospitals or state psychiatric institutions. The
health care authority shall submit reports to the governor and
legislature by November 1, 2011, and by November 1, 2012, that evaluate
whether savings continue to exceed costs for this program. If the
certified public expenditures (CPE) program in its current form is no
longer cost-effective to maintain, the health care authority shall
submit a report to the governor and legislature detailing
cost-effective alternative uses of local, state, and federal resources
as a replacement for this program. During fiscal year 2012 and fiscal
year 2013, hospitals in the program shall be paid and shall retain one
hundred percent of the federal portion of the allowable hospital cost
for each medicaid inpatient fee-for-service claim payable by medical
assistance and one hundred percent of the federal portion of the
maximum disproportionate share hospital payment allowable under federal
regulations. Inpatient medicaid payments shall be established using an
allowable methodology that approximates the cost of claims submitted by
the hospitals. Payments made to each hospital in the program in each
fiscal year of the biennium shall be compared to a baseline amount.
The baseline amount will be determined by the total of (a) the
inpatient claim payment amounts that would have been paid during the
fiscal year had the hospital not been in the CPE program based on the
reimbursement rates developed, implemented, and consistent with
policies approved in the 2011-13 biennial operating appropriations act
and in effect on July 1, 2011, (b) ((one half of the indigent
assistance)) eighty percent of the low-income disproportionate share
hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during
fiscal year 2005, and (c) all of the other disproportionate share
hospital payment amounts paid to and retained by each hospital during
fiscal year 2005 to the extent the same disproportionate share hospital
programs exist in the 2011-13 biennium. If payments during the fiscal
year exceed the hospital's baseline amount, no additional payments will
be made to the hospital except the federal portion of allowable
disproportionate share hospital payments for which the hospital can
certify allowable match. If payments during the fiscal year are less
than the baseline amount, the hospital will be paid a state grant equal
to the difference between payments during the fiscal year and the
applicable baseline amount. Payment of the state grant shall be made
in the applicable fiscal year and distributed in monthly payments. The
grants will be recalculated and redistributed as the baseline is
updated during the fiscal year. The grant payments are subject to an
interim settlement within eleven months after the end of the fiscal
year. A final settlement shall be performed. To the extent that
either settlement determines that a hospital has received funds in
excess of what it would have received as described in this subsection,
the hospital must repay the excess amounts to the state when requested.
(($24,677,000)) $4,168,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012((, of which $6,570,000 is appropriated)) in section
204(1) of this act, and (($21,531,000)) $2,251,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013((, of which $6,570,000
is appropriated)) in section 204(1) of this act, are provided solely
for state grants for the participating hospitals. CPE hospitals will
receive the inpatient and outpatient reimbursement rate restorations in
RCW 74.60.080 and rate increases in RCW 74.60.090 funded through the
hospital safety net assessment fund rather than through the baseline
mechanism specified in this subsection.
(((16))) (14) The health care authority shall seek public-private
partnerships and federal funds that are or may become available to
provide on-going support for outreach and education efforts under the
federal children's health insurance program reauthorization act of
2009.
(((17))) (15) The health care authority shall target funding for
maternity support services towards pregnant women with factors that
lead to higher rates of poor birth outcomes, including hypertension, a
preterm or low birth weight birth in the most recent previous birth, a
cognitive deficit or developmental disability, substance abuse, severe
mental illness, unhealthy weight or failure to gain weight, tobacco
use, or African American or Native American race. The health care
authority shall prioritize evidence-based practices for delivery of
maternity support services. To the extent practicable, the health care
authority shall develop a mechanism to increase federal funding for
maternity support services by leveraging local public funding for those
services.
(((18))) (16) For children with family incomes above 200 percent of
the federal poverty level in the state-funded children's health program
for children who are not eligible for coverage under the federally
funded children's health insurance program, premiums shall be set every
two years in an amount equal to the average state-only share of the per
capita cost of coverage in the state-funded children's health program
for children in families with incomes at or less than two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level.
(((19) $704,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $726,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $1,431,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for)) (17) Within the amounts appropriated in this
section, the health care authority shall provide disproportionate share
hospital payments to hospitals that provide services to children in the
children's health program who are not eligible for services under Title
XIX or XXI of the federal social security act due to their citizenship
status.
(((20) $998,000)) (18) $859,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, $979,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and (($1,980,000)) $1,841,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to increase
prior authorization activities for advanced imaging procedures.
(((21) $249,000)) (19) $196,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, $246,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and (($495,000)) $442,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to increase
prior authorization activities for surgical procedures, which may
include orthopedic procedures, spinal procedures and interventions, and
nerve procedures.
(((22))) (20) $300,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation and $300,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
are provided solely for a prescriptive practices improvement
collaborative focusing upon atypical antipsychotics and other
medications commonly used in the treatment of severe and persistent
mental illnesses among adults. The project shall promote collaboration
among community mental health centers, other major prescribers of
atypical antipsychotic medications to adults enrolled in state medical
assistance programs, and psychiatrists, pharmacists, and other
specialists at the University of Washington department of psychiatry
and/or other research universities. The collaboration shall include
patient-specific prescriber consultations by psychiatrists and
pharmacists specializing in treatment of severe and persistent mental
illnesses among adults; production of profiles to assist prescribers
and clinics in tracking their prescriptive practices and their
patients' medication use and adherence relative to evidence-based
practices guidelines, other prescribers, and patients at other clinics;
and in-service seminars at which participants can share and increase
their knowledge of evidence- based and other effective prescriptive
practices. The health care authority shall enter into an interagency
agreement with the office of the attorney general for expenditure of
$300,000 of the state's proceeds of the cy pres settlement in State of
Washington v. AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for this purpose.
(((23))) (21) $570,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation is provided solely for continued operation of the
partnership access line for child mental health consultations. The
health care authority shall enter into an interagency agreement with
the office of the attorney general for expenditure of $570,000 of the
state's proceeds of the cy pres settlement in State of Washington v.
AstraZeneca (Seroquel) for this purpose.
(((24))) (22) $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $80,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $160,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to fund the Tacoma-Pierce county
health department for access and outreach activities to reduce infant
mortality.
(((25))) (23) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $150,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to assist with development and
implementation of evidence-based strategies regarding the appropriate,
safe, and effective role of C-section surgeries and early induced labor
in births and neonatal care. The strategies shall be identified and
implemented in consultation with clinical research specialists,
physicians, hospitals, advanced registered nurse practitioners, and
organizations concerned with maternal and child health.
(((26) $2,400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $2,435,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013, $7,253,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation, and $12,455,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for continued provision of)) (24)
Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the health care
authority shall continue to provide school-based medical services by
means of an intergovernmental transfer arrangement. ((Under the
arrangement,)) Until April 1, 2012, the state shall provide forty
percent and school districts sixty percent of the nonfederal matching
funds required for receipt of federal medicaid funding for the service.
After that date, participating school districts shall provide all of
the required nonfederal matching funds.
(((27))) (25) $263,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $88,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $351,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for development and submission to the
federal government by October 1, 2011, of a demonstration project
proposal as provided in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5596 (medicaid
demonstration waiver).
(((28) $5,600,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $4,094,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013, and $11,332,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for)) (26) Within the amounts
appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall provide
spoken-language interpreter services. The authority shall develop and
implement a new model for delivery of such services no later than
January 1, 2012. The model shall include:
(a) Development by the authority in consultation with subject-area
experts of guidelines to assist medical practitioners identify the
circumstances under which it is appropriate to use telephonic or video-remote interpreting;
(b) The requirement that the state contract with delivery
organizations, including foreign language agencies, who employ or
subcontract only with language access providers or interpreters working
in the state who are certified or authorized by the state. When a
state-certified or state-authorized in-state language access provider
or interpreter is not available, the delivery organization, including
foreign language agencies, may use a provider with other certifications
or qualifications deemed to meet state standards, including
interpreters in other states; and
(c) Provision of a secure, web-based tool that medical
practitioners will use to schedule appointments for interpreter
services and to identify the most appropriate, cost-effective method of
service delivery in accordance with the state guidelines.
Nothing in this subsection affects the ability of health care
providers to provide interpretive services through employed staff or
through telephone and video remote technologies when not reimbursed
directly by the department. The amounts in this subsection do not
include federal administrative funds provided to match nonstate
expenditures by local health jurisdictions and governmental hospitals.
(((29))) (27) In its procurement of contractors for delivery of
medical managed care services for nondisabled, nonelderly persons, the
medical assistance program shall (a) place substantial emphasis upon
price competition in the selection of successful bidders; and (b) not
require delivery of any services that would increase the actuarial cost
of service beyond the levels included in current healthy options
contracts.
(((30))) (28) $1,430,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012, $1,430,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $2,860,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely to pay
federally-designated rural health clinics their standard encounter rate
for prenatal and well-child visits, whether delivered under a managed
care contract or fee-for-service. In reconciling managed care
enhancement payments for calendar years 2009 and 2010, the department
shall treat well-child and prenatal care visits as encounters subject
to the clinic's encounter rate.
(((31))) (29) $280,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $282,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to increase utilization management of
drugs and drug classes for which there is evidence of over-utilization,
off-label use, excessive dosing, duplicative therapy, or opportunities
to shift utilization to less expensive, equally effective formulations.
(((32))) (30) $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $140,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to continue operation by a nonprofit
organization of a toll-free hotline that assists families to learn
about and enroll in the apple health for kids program.
(((33))) (31) $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for the local outreach, case
management, and coordination with dental providers needed to execute
the access to baby and child dentistry program, which provides dental
care to Medicaid eligible children up to age six.
(((34) $1,868,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $1,873,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013, and $3,154,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely to continue to)) (32) Within the
amounts appropriated in this section, the health care authority shall
provide dental services to pregnant women. Services shall include
preventive, routine, and emergent dental care.
(((35))) (33) $395,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $395,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $790,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for continued operation of the
dental education in care of persons with disabilities (DECOD) program
at the University of Washington.
(((36) $112,000)) (34) $159,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012, (($112,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013)) $302,000 of the general
fund--private/local appropriation, and $1,928,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the provider incentive
program and other initiatives related to the health information
technology Medicaid plan. The general fund--private/local
appropriation in this subsection shall be funded with proceeds from
settlements in the case of State of Washington vs. GlaxoSmithKline.
The authority and the office of the attorney general shall enter an
interagency agreement regarding use of these funds.
(((37))) (35) $2,926,000 of the general fund--local appropriation
and $2,928,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely to support medical airlift services.
(((38))) (36) The authority shall collect data on enrollment and
utilization to study whether the expansion of family planning coverage
under Substitute Senate Bill No. 5912 is reducing state medical
expenditures by reducing unwanted pregnancies. The authority shall
report its findings to the legislature by December 1, 2012.
(((39))) (37) $480,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $480,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $824,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for customer services staff. The
authority will attempt to improve the phone answer rate to 40 percent
and reduce the response times to written questions to ten days for
clients and 25 days for providers. The authority will report to the
legislature on its progress toward achieving these goals by January 1,
2012. If the authority has not achieved these goals by July 1, 2012,
then the authority shall reduce expenditures on management staff in
order to increase expenditures on customer service staff until the
goals are achieved.
(((40))) (38) The department shall purchase a brand name drug when
it determines that the cost of the brand name drug after rebates is
less than the cost of generic alternatives and that purchase of the
brand rather than generic version can save at least $250,000. The
department may purchase generic alternatives when changes in market
prices make the price of the brand name drug after rebates more
expensive than the generic alternatives.
(((41))) (39) The department shall collaborate closely with the
Washington state hospital and medical associations in identification of
the diagnostic codes and retroactive review procedures that will be
used to determine whether an emergency room visit is a nonemergency
condition to assure that conditions that require emergency treatment
continue to be covered.
(40) If Substitute Senate Bill No. 6442 is enacted, the health care
authority shall provide a loan in the amount of $12,393,000 from the
public employees' and retirees insurance account to the school
employees' insurance administrative account in order to fund startup
costs during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium for the school employees'
benefits board, with the following terms:
(a) Repayment of the loan shall not commence earlier than January
1, 2014;
(b) Repayment of the loan shall not be completed later than June
30, 2017; and
(c) Interest shall be charged on the amount lent at a rate equal to
that which the balance would have been expected to earn in the event
that the loan were not made, plus five-tenths of a percent per annum.
The state treasurer shall maintain a record of the loan and must
calculate repayment obligations for the school employees' insurance
administrative account.
(41) For periods subsequent to May 31, 2012, no funds are
appropriated in this act for medical care services for persons eligible
for such services under RCW 74.09.035(1)(a) or 74.09.035(c). The
administrator shall therefore immediately commence such actions as may
be necessary to disenroll such persons effective June 1, 2012,
including but not limited to terminating the state's demonstration
waiver agreement with the federal department of health and human
services.
(42) Prior to entering into a contract for medicaid managed care
services for the period commencing July 1, 2012, the director of the
health care authority shall certify to the governor and to the health
care committees of the legislature that the contractor has established
a network of acute, primary, and specialty care providers that is
sufficient to meet the needs of the contractor's anticipated enrollee
population. If no plan is able to certify an adequate provider network
in a county, the health care authority shall request re-bids from all
plans which originally submitted bids for the county during the regular
procurement process until award is successful. No county, that is
currently served by Medicaid managed care services shall revert to
fee-for-service as a result of the procurement process.
(43) The authority shall apply the dispense-as-written prior
authorization provisions of RCW 69.41.190(1)(a) to any drug formulary
limitations adopted to operate within the appropriations provided in
this section.

Sec. 214 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,240,000))
$2,015,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,242,000))
$2,017,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,903,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,385,000))
$5,935,000

Sec. 215 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,690,000))
$19,689,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,689,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,389,000))
$39,388,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $36,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$36,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are solely
provided for Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5068 (industrial
safety and health act). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(2) $16,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$16,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are solely
provided for Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801 (industrial insurance
system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(3) $1,893,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$1,893,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2123 (workers'
compensation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 216 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,850,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,711,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $456,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,048,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $148,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $460,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,597,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $43,270,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, are provided to the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs solely to verify the address and residency
of registered sex offenders and kidnapping offenders under RCW
9A.44.130.
(2) $321,000 of the general fund--local appropriation is provided
solely to purchase ammunition for the basic law enforcement academy.
Jurisdictions shall reimburse to the criminal justice training
commission the costs of ammunition, based on the average cost of
ammunition per cadet, for cadets that they enroll in the basic law
enforcement academy.
(3) The criminal justice training commission may not run a basic
law enforcement academy class of fewer than 30 students.
(4) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a school safety program. The
commission, in collaboration with the school safety center advisory
committee, shall provide the school safety training for all school
administrators and school safety personnel hired after the effective
date of this section.
(5) $96,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $90,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the school safety center
within the commission. The safety center shall act as an information
dissemination and resource center when an incident occurs in a school
district in Washington or in another state, coordinate activities
relating to school safety, and review and approve manuals and curricula
used for school safety models and training. Through an interagency
agreement, the commission shall provide funding for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction to continue to develop and
maintain a school safety information web site. The school safety
center advisory committee shall develop and revise the training
program, using the best practices in school safety, for all school
safety personnel. The commission shall provide research-related
programs in school safety and security issues beneficial to both law
enforcement and schools.
(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for grants to counties enforcing
illegal drug laws and which have been underserved by federally funded
state narcotics task forces. The Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs, the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys,
and the Washington association of county officials shall jointly
develop funding allocations for the offices of the county sheriff,
county prosecutor, and county clerk in qualifying counties. The
commission shall not impose an administrative cost on this program.

Sec. 217 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,433,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,374,000))
$18,272,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,636,000
Asbestos Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($395,000))
$379,000
Electrical License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,019,000))
$36,520,000
Farm Labor Revolving Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($949,000))
$922,000
Public Works Administration Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,814,000))
$7,007,000
Manufactured Home Installation Training Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $334,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($252,809,000))
$253,453,000
Accident Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,622,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($264,202,000))
$265,298,000
Medical Aid Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,186,000
Plumbing Certificate Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,688,000))
$1,684,000
Pressure Systems Safety Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,068,000))
$4,070,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($632,557,000))
$633,844,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase fees related to factory assembled structures, contractor
registration, electricians, plumbers, asbestos removal, boilers,
elevators, and manufactured home installers. These increases are
necessary to support expenditures authorized in this section,
consistent with chapters 43.22, 18.27, 19.28, and 18.106 RCW, RCW
49.26.130, and chapters 70.79, 70.87, and 43.22A RCW.
(2) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the crime victims compensation
program to pay claims for mental health services for crime victim
compensation program clients who have an established relationship with
a mental health provider and subsequently obtain coverage under the
medicaid program or the medical care services program under chapter
74.09 RCW. Prior to making such payment, the program must have
determined that payment for the specific treatment or provider is not
available under the medicaid or medical care services program. In
addition, the program shall make efforts to contact any healthy options
or medical care services health plan in which the client may be
enrolled to help the client obtain authorization to pay the claim on an
out-of-network basis.
(3) $1,281,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$1,281,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1725
(workers' compensation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(4) $51,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$51,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1367
(for hire vehicles, operators). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(5) $8,727,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5801
(industrial insurance system). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(6) $625,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $625,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, $1,250,000 of the public works administration account--state
appropriation, $708,000 of the accident account--state appropriation,
and $708,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are
provided solely for the purposes of expanding the detecting
unregistered employers targeting system and to support field staff in
investigation and enforcement. Within the funds appropriated in this
subsection, the department shall aggressively combat the underground
economy in construction. Of the amounts provided in this subsection,
$800,000 shall be used for investigation and enforcement.
(7) $8,583,000 of the accident account--state appropriation and
$18,278,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of House Bill No. 2123 (workers'
compensation). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 218 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) HEADQUARTERS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,832,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,826,000
Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,668,000

(2) FIELD SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,006,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,001,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,356,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,737,000
Veterans Innovations Program Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $812,000
Veteran Estate Management Account--Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,083,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,995,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $821,000 of the veterans innovations
program account--state appropriation is provided solely for the
department to continue support for returning combat veterans through
the veterans innovation program, including emergency financial
assistance through the defenders' fund and long-term financial
assistance through the competitive grant program.

(3) INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($899,000))
$1,755,000
((General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,000))
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($59,177,000))
$61,734,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,094,000))
$29,724,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($92,241,000))
$93,213,000

Sec. 219 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($79,888,000))
$78,999,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($79,718,000))
$51,357,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($555,563,000))
$552,931,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($148,362,000))
$148,361,000
Hospital Data Collection Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $214,000
Health Professions Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($94,469,000))
$99,514,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $604,000
Emergency Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems
Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,302,000
Safe Drinking Water Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,480,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,875,000
Waterworks Operator Certification -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,532,000
Drinking Water Assistance Administrative Account --
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $326,000
Site Closure Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $79,000
Biotoxin Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,167,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,649,000))
$20,352,000
Medical Test Site Licensure Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,321,000
Youth Tobacco Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,512,000
Community and Economic Development Fee Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($596,000))
$298,000
Public Health Supplemental Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,598,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $297,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000
Tobacco Prevention and Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,000))
$1,737,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,013,560,000))
$1,004,906,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The department of health shall not initiate any services that
will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department of health and the
state board of health shall not implement any new or amended rules
pertaining to primary and secondary school facilities until the rules
and a final cost estimate have been presented to the legislature, and
the legislature has formally funded implementation of the rules through
the omnibus appropriations act or by statute. The department may seek,
receive, and spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal
moneys not anticipated in this act as long as the federal funding does
not require expenditure of state moneys for the program in excess of
amounts anticipated in this act. If the department receives
unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that
provides appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated
state moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees. As used in this subsection,
"unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and other funds
that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically defined
projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.
(2) In accordance with RCW 43.70.250 and 43.135.055, the department
is authorized to establish and raise fees in fiscal year 2012 as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the
appropriation levels in this section. This authorization applies to
fees required for: The review of health care facility construction;
review of health facility requests for certificate of need; the
regulation and inspection of farm worker housing, hospital licensing,
in-home health service agencies, and producers of radioactive waste;
the regulation and inspection of shellfish sanitary control, surgical
facility licensing, and; fees associated with the following
professions: Dieticians and nutritionists, occupational therapists,
pharmacy, veterinarian, orthotics and prosthetics, surgical
technicians, nursing home administrators, health care assistants,
hearing and speech, psychology, hypnotherapy, chiropractic, social
workers, physicians, and physician assistants.
(3) In accordance with RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized
to adopt fees set forth in and previously authorized in chapter 92,
Laws of 2010.
(4) $1,969,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement online licensing for
health care providers. The department must submit a detailed
investment plan for this project to the office of financial management.
The office of financial management must review and approve this plan
before funding may be expended. The department of health must
successfully implement online application and renewal for at least one
profession as a pilot project before pursuing additional professions.
The department must report to the office of financial management on the
outcome of the pilot project.
(((4))) (5) $16,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill
No. 1181 (board of naturopathy). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((5))) (6) $21,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
House Bill No. 1304 (health care assistants). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((6))) (7) $54,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill
No. 1353 (pharmacy technicians). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((7))) (8) $142,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5020 (social workers). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((8))) (9) $336,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill
No. 5480 (physicians and physician assistants). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((9))) (10) $46,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5071 (online access for midwives and marriage and
family therapists). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((10))) (11) $137,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1133 (massage practitioner license). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(((11))) (12) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 ((and $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the developmental
disabilities council to contract for a family-to-family mentor program
to provide information and support to families and guardians of persons
who are transitioning out of residential habilitation centers. To the
maximum extent allowable under federal law, these funds shall be
matched under medicaid through the department of social and health
services and federal funds shall be transferred to the department for
the purposes stated in this subsection. If Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5459 (people with developmental disabilities) is not enacted
by June 30, 2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(((12))) (13) $57,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $58,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the midwifery licensure
and regulatory program to offset a reduction in revenue from fees.
There shall be no change to the current annual fees for new or renewed
licenses for the midwifery program, except from online access to HEAL-WA. The department shall convene the midwifery advisory committee on
a quarterly basis to address issues related to licensed midwifery.
(((13))) (14) $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $118,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for prevention of youth
suicides.
(((14))) (15) $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $87,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the senior falls
prevention program.
(16) $19,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Senate Bill No. 6290 (military
spouses and partners). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(17) $50,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6237 (career pathway/medical assistants). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(18) $21,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
6328 (mental health professionals). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(19) $148,000 of the health professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6103 (reflexologists). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(20) $28,000 of the health professions account--state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5620 (dental anesthesia assistants). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(21) Appropriations for fiscal year 2013 include funding for
consolidation of the department of ecology's low-level radioactive
waste site use permit program in the department of health.

Sec. 220 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(1) ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,529,000))
$52,529,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($53,210,000))
$53,419,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($107,739,000))
$105,948,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $35,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
support of a statewide council on mentally ill offenders that includes
as its members representatives of community-based mental health
treatment programs, current or former judicial officers, and directors
and commanders of city and county jails and state prison facilities.
The council will investigate and promote cost-effective approaches to
meeting the long-term needs of adults and juveniles with mental
disorders who have a history of offending or who are at-risk of
offending, including their mental health, physiological, housing,
employment, and job training needs.

(2) CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($609,105,000))
$599,191,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($602,804,000))
$582,174,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,324,000
Washington Auto Theft Prevention Authority Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,079,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,229,312,000))
$1,198,768,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) During the 2011-13 biennium, when contracts are established or
renewed for offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to
inmates, the department shall select the contractor or contractors
primarily based on the following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged
to both the inmate and the person paying for the telephone call; and
(ii) the lowest commission rates paid to the department, while
providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs of the department
to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide sufficient
revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account.
(b) The Harborview medical center and the University of Washington
medical center shall provide inpatient and outpatient hospital services
to offenders confined in department of corrections facilities at a rate
no greater than the average rate that the department has negotiated
with other community hospitals in Washington state.
(c) $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1290
(health care employee overtime). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2011, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(d) $32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $33,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill
No. 1718 (offenders with developmental disabilities). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(e) The department of corrections shall contract with local and
tribal governments for the provision of jail capacity to house
offenders. A contract shall not have a cost of incarceration in excess
of $85 per day per offender. A contract shall not have a year-to-year
increase in excess of three percent per year. The contracts may
include rates for the medical care of offenders which exceed the daily
cost of incarceration and the limitation on year-to-year increase,
provided that medical payments conform to the department's offender
health plan, pharmacy formulary, and all off-site medical expenses are
preapproved by department utilization management staff.
(f) $41,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $165,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the department to maintain the
facility, property and assets at the institution formerly known as the
Maple Lane school in Rochester. The department may not house
incarcerated offenders at the Maple Lane site until specifically
directed by the legislature.

(3) COMMUNITY SUPERVISION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($129,635,000))
$127,625,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($128,049,000))
$130,441,000
Federal Narcotics Forfeiture Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $372,000
Controlled Substances Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($258,088,000))
$258,470,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) $875,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House
Bill No. 5891 (criminal justice cost savings). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(b) Within the funds provided in this section, the department of
corrections must establish a transitional reentry housing pilot program
by contracting with housing providers to continuously make available no
fewer than fifty beds in transitional reentry housing to meet the needs
of offenders transitioning to the community on earned early release and
who are in need of housing pursuant to RCW 9.94A.729(5)(d). The
department must give preference to housing providers that provide a
small, family-oriented living environment with between three and ten
beds and provide transition support that enables an offender to
participate in programming or services. The department shall track the
housing and recidivism status of offenders who participate in
transitional reentry housing and report to the governor and appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2013.

(4) CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,535,000))
$2,513,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,458,000))
$2,435,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,993,000))
$4,948,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $66,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 is provided solely for transfer to
the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts provided
only for administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and technical
assistance associated with advising cities and counties in developing,
promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and efficient offender
work programs.

(5) INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,053,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,549,000))
$35,550,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($72,602,000))
$72,603,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(a) The state prison institutions may use funds appropriated in
this subsection to rent uniforms from correctional industries in
accordance with existing legislative mandates.
(b) The state prison medical facilities may use funds appropriated
in this subsection to purchase goods and supplies through hospital or
other group purchasing organizations when it is cost effective to do
so.
(c) The department shall reduce payments to the department of
information services or its successor by $213,000 in fiscal year 2012
and by $1,150,000 in fiscal year 2013. The reduction in payment shall
be related to the elimination of the offender base tracking system,
including moving remaining portions of the offender base tracking
system into the offender management network information system.

Sec. 221 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,278,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,264,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,082,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $30,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,654,000

Sec. 222 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($267,301,000))
$267,298,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,931,000
Unemployment Compensation Administration Account --
Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($350,622,000))
$350,598,000
Administrative Contingency Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,948,000
Employment Service Administrative Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,721,000))
$33,720,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($706,523,000))
$706,495,000

The appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $39,666,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the
state by section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed
act). This amount is provided solely for continuing current
unemployment insurance functions and department services to employers
and job seekers.
(2) $35,584,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the
state by section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed
act). This amount is provided solely for the replacement of the
unemployment insurance tax information system for the employment
security department. The employment security department shall support
the department of revenue and department of labor and industries to
develop a common vision to ensure technological compatibility between
the three agencies to facilitate a coordinated business tax system for
the future that improves services to business customers. The amounts
provided in this subsection are conditioned on the department
satisfying the requirements of the project management oversight
standards and policies established by the office of the chief
information officer created in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5931 (information technology management).
(3) $25,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is from amounts made available to the
state by section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed
act). This amount is provided solely for implementation of system
changes to the unemployment insurance tax information system required
under chapter 4, Laws of 2011 (unemployment insurance program).
(4) $1,459,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is from amounts available to the state
by section 903 (d), (f), and (g) of the social security act (Reed act).
This amount is provided solely for implementation of chapter 4, Laws of
2011 (unemployment insurance program).
(5) $60,000 of the unemployment compensation administration
account--federal appropriation is provided solely for costs associated
with the initial review and evaluation of the training benefits program
as directed in section 15(2), chapter 4, Laws of 2011 (unemployment
insurance program). The initial review shall be developed by the joint
legislative audit and review committee. This appropriation is provided
from funds made available to the state by section 903 (d), (f), and (g)
of the social security act (Reed act).

(End of part)

PART III
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 301 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,630,000))
$28,948,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($46,226,000))
$24,642,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($77,452,000))
$100,154,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,691,000))
$16,730,000
Special Grass Seed Burning Research Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000
Reclamation Revolving Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,642,000))
$4,643,000
Flood Control Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,940,000))
$1,933,000
State Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $270,000
Waste Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($11,478,000))
$9,762,000
State Drought Preparedness Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($118,000))
$204,000
State and Local Improvements Revolving Account
(Water Supply Facilities) -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($423,000))
$422,000
Freshwater Aquatic Algae Control Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $509,000
Water Rights Tracking System Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,000
Site Closure Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($703,000))
$622,000
Wood Stove Education and Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($612,000))
$723,000
Worker and Community Right-to-Know Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,668,000))
$1,661,000
Water Rights Processing Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($136,000))
$135,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($112,575,000))
$148,563,000
State Toxics Control Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($968,000))
$966,000
Local Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,390,000))
$26,207,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,748,000))
$39,066,000
Underground Storage Tank Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,254,000))
$3,239,000
Biosolids Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,805,000))
$1,797,000
Hazardous Waste Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,857,000))
$5,835,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,468,000))
$2,545,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,566,000))
$5,542,000
Air Operating Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,746,000))
$3,285,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,700,000))
$1,698,000
Oil Spill Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,076,000
Metals Mining Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($611,000))
$610,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account -- Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,517,000))
$2,509,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($421,842,000))
$440,359,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $170,000 of the oil spill prevention account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for a contract with the University of
Washington's sea grant program to continue an educational program
targeted to small spills from commercial fishing vessels, ferries,
cruise ships, ports, and marinas.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase the following fees as necessary to meet the actual costs of
conducting business and the appropriation levels in this section:
Wastewater discharge permit, not more than 4.34 percent in fiscal year
2012 and 4.62 percent in fiscal year 2013; biosolids permit fee, not
more than 10 percent during the biennium; and air contaminate source
registration fee, not more than 36 percent during the biennium;
agricultural burning acreage and pile burning fees, not more than 25
percent and 100 percent respectively, in fiscal year 2013; and dam
safety and inspection fees, not more than 35 percent in fiscal year
2012 and 4.62 percent in fiscal year 2013. Any fee increase
implemented to offset general fund--state reductions in the 2011-2013
fiscal biennium may be made effective on or before July 1, 2012.
(3) If Substitute House Bill No. 1294 (Puget Sound corps) is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, $322,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and $322,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 shall be transferred to the
department of natural resources.
(4) $463,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1186 (state's oil spill program). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) Pursuant to RCW 70.93.180(5), the appropriations in this
section from the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account
shall only be expended on activities listed under RCW 70.93.180(1) (a)
and (b), and the department shall not expend appropriations on RCW
70.93.180(1)(c). The department may not spend waste reduction,
recycling, and litter control account funds to support the following
activities: The beyond waste plan, work on national solid waste
recycling issues, work on construction and demolition recycling and
green building alternatives, education programs including the green
schools initiative, and management of the 1-800-recycle hotline and
database on school awards. Waste reduction, recycling, and litter
account control funds must be prioritized to support litter pickup
using correctional crews, regulatory programs, and technical assistance
to local governments.
(6) The department shall make every possible effort through its
existing statutory authorities to obtain federal funding for public
participation grants regarding the Hanford nuclear reservation and
associated properties and facilities. Such federal funding shall not
limit the total state funding authorized under this section for public
participation grants made pursuant to RCW 70.105D.070(5), but the
amount of any individual grant from such federal funding shall be
offset against any grant award amount to an individual grantee from
state funds under RCW 70.105D.070(5).
(7) The department shall review its water rights application review
procedures to simplify the procedures, eliminate unnecessary steps, and
decrease the time required to issue decisions. The department shall
implement changes to improve water rights processing for which it has
current administrative authority. The department shall report on
reforms implemented and efficiencies achieved as demonstrated through
enhanced permit processing to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on December 1, 2011, and October 1, 2012.
(a) The department shall consult with key stakeholders on statutory
barriers to efficient water rights processing and effective water
management, including identification of obsolete, confusing, or
conflicting statutory provisions. The department shall report
stakeholder recommendations to appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2011, and October 1, 2012.
(b) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for processing water right permit
applications only if the department of ecology issues at least five
hundred water right decisions in fiscal year 2012, and if the
department of ecology does not issue at least five hundred water right
decisions in fiscal year 2012 the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse and remain unexpended. The department of ecology shall
submit a report to the office of financial management and the state
treasurer by June 30, 2012, that documents whether five hundred water
right decisions were issued in fiscal year 2012. For the purposes of
this subsection, applications that are voluntarily withdrawn by an
applicant do not count towards the five hundred water right decision
requirement. For the purposes of water budget-neutral requests under
chapter 173-539A WAC, multiple domestic connections authorized within
a single water budget-neutral decision are considered one decision for
the purposes of this subsection.
(c) The department shall maintain an ongoing accounting of water
right applications received and acted on and shall post that
information to the department's internet site.
(8) $1,075,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,075,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for processing the backlog of
pending water rights permit applications in the water resources
program.
(9) As soon as possible after filing CR-102 proposed draft rule
language that establishes standards or criteria for human health based
on fish consumption rates under chapter 173-204 WAC, and prior to
expending any funds to implement such rules, the department shall
present to the appropriate environment and fiscal committees of the
legislature technical support document No. 11-09-050. The department
must include proposed revised standards or criteria together with the
statements, determination and documentation set forth in RCW 34.05.328
including without limitation a cost-benefit analysis, a least
burdensome alternative analysis, an implementation plan and substantial
evidence that any difference between the proposed criteria and the
national toxics rule is necessary to achieve the general and specific
objectives of chapter 90.48 RCW.
(10) To increase the focus on processing of water right
applications by reducing certain current workload, the department shall
provide the option for a ministerial development schedule extension for
any water right permit, previously approved permit extension, or water
right change or transfer authorization with a development schedule
deadline prior to June 30, 2013. The extensions require payment of the
fee under RCW 90.03.470 and will be for one year.
(11) Pursuant to House Bill No. 2304 (low-level waste), the
appropriations in this section for the low-level radioactive waste site
use permit program are for fiscal year 2012. Appropriations for fiscal
year 2013 are contained in section 219 of this act.
(12) $128,000 of the wood stove education and enforcement account--state appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Senate
Bill No. 6077 (solid fuel burning devices). If the bill is not enacted
by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(13) Pursuant to RCW 90.16.090(2), the appropriations in this
section from the reclamation account--state appropriation shall be
expended for the activities listed in RCW 90.16.090(1), and the
expenditures need not be proportional to fee revenue sources.
(14) $2,000,000 of the state toxics control account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of uncertified
solid fuel burning devices and solid fuel burning devices manufactured
prior to 1995 for low and middle-income families in air quality
nonattainment areas under the federal clean air act (42 U.S.C. Sec.
7401 et seq.). The replacement heating device may include certified
solid fuel burning devices, pellet stoves, or a cleaner natural gas or
electric home heating device.
(15) $188,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6406 (state natural resources). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 302 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,955,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,379,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,905,000
Winter Recreation Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,761,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $224,000
Snowmobile Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,848,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($363,000))
$4,363,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($116,087,000))
$116,649,000
Parks Renewal and Stewardship Account -- Private/Local
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($146,822,000))
$151,384,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $8,876,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and)), $8,300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2013, and $4,000,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement
account--state appropriation are provided solely to operate and
maintain state parks as the commission implements a new fee structure.
The goal of this structure is to make the parks system self-supporting.
By August 1, 2012, state parks must submit a report to the office of
financial management detailing its progress toward this goal and
outlining any additional statutory changes needed for successful
implementation.
(2) $79,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $79,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a grant for the operation of
the Northwest avalanche center.
(3) $53,928,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5622 (state land recreation access). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(4) Prior to closing any state park, the commission must notify all
affected local governments and relevant nonprofit organizations of the
intended closure and provide an opportunity for the notified local
governments and nonprofit organizations to elect to acquire, or enter
into, a maintenance and operating contract with the commission that
would allow the park to remain open.
(5) $592,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6387 (parks fiscal matters). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(6) Within the appropriations contained in this section, the
commission shall remove trees from Brooks memorial state park that have
been killed or damaged by fire in order to ensure the recovery of value
from the sale of any timber that is surplus to the needs of the park.
The commission shall remove such trees by September 30, 2012, and in a
manner consistent with RCW 79A.05.035.

Sec. 303 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($954,000))
$902,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($973,000))
$845,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,299,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($274,000))
$24,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $278,000
Vessel Response Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $100,000
Firearms Range Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $37,000
Recreation Resources Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,874,000))
$2,914,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $900,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,689,000))
$9,299,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $40,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation, $24,000 of the general fund--private/local
appropriation, $100,000 of the vessel response account--state
appropriation, and $12,000 of the recreation resources account--state
appropriation are provided solely for House Bill No. 1413 (invasive
species council). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 304 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,308,000))
$2,209,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,275,000))
$2,159,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,583,000))
$4,368,000

Sec. 305 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,789,000))
$6,742,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,792,000))
$6,504,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,301,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,882,000))
$14,547,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The conservation commission, in cooperation with all
conservation districts, will seek to minimize conservation district
overhead costs. These efforts may include consolidating conservation
districts.
(2) $122,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided
solely for Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1886 (Ruckelshaus center
process). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 306 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,695,000))
$32,380,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,388,000))
$25,467,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($105,717,000))
$105,719,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($57,025,000))
$57,055,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $391,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,230,000))
$10,718,000
Recreational Fisheries Enhancement -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,550,000))
$2,800,000
Warm Water Game Fish Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,051,000))
$2,851,000
Eastern Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $849,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Prevention Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($719,000))
$852,000
State Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($100,424,000))
$101,434,000
Special Wildlife Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,384,000
Special Wildlife Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Special Wildlife Account -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,415,000
Wildlife Rehabilitation Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $259,000
Regional Fisheries Enhancement Salmonid Recovery
Account -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,001,000
Oil Spill Prevention Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $887,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $921,000
Hydraulic Project Approval Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $415,000
Recreation Resources Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,621,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($360,610,000))
$359,123,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $294,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of hatchery
reform recommendations defined by the hatchery scientific review group.
(2) $355,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $355,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the department to continue a
pilot project with the Confederated Tribes of the Colville Reservation
to develop expanded recreational fishing opportunities on Lake Rufus
Woods and its northern shoreline and to conduct joint enforcement of
lake fisheries on Lake Rufus Woods and adjoining waters, pursuant to
state and tribal intergovernmental agreements developed under the
Columbia River water supply program. For the purposes of the pilot
project:
(a) A fishing permit issued to a nontribal member by the Colville
Tribes shall satisfy the license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on the
waters of Lake Rufus Woods and on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(b) The Colville Tribes have agreed to provide to holders of its
nontribal member fishing permits a means to demonstrate that fish in
their possession were lawfully taken in Lake Rufus Woods;
(c) A Colville tribal member identification card shall satisfy the
license requirement of RCW 77.32.010 on all waters of Lake Rufus Woods;
(d) The department and the Colville Tribes shall jointly designate
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods for the purposes
of enhancing access to the recreational fisheries on the lake; and
(e) The Colville Tribes have agreed to recognize a fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470 or RCW 77.32.490 as satisfying the nontribal
member fishing permit requirements of Colville tribal law on the
reservation portion of the waters of Lake Rufus Woods and at designated
fishing areas on the north shore of Lake Rufus Woods;
(3) Prior to submitting its 2013-2015 biennial operating and
capital budget request related to state fish hatcheries to the office
of financial management, the department shall contract with the
hatchery scientific review group (HSRG) to review this request. This
review shall: (a) Determine if the proposed requests are consistent
with HSRG recommendations; (b) prioritize the components of the
requests based on their contributions to protecting wild salmonid
stocks and meeting the recommendations of the HSRG; and (c) evaluate
whether the proposed requests are being made in the most cost effective
manner. The department shall provide a copy of the HSRG review to the
office of financial management with their agency budget proposal.
(4) $400,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a state match to support the
Puget Sound nearshore partnership between the department and the U.S.
army corps of engineers.
(5) $50,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for removal of derelict gear in
Washington waters.
(6) $100,000 of the eastern Washington pheasant enhancement
account -- state appropriation is provided solely for the department to
support efforts to enhance permanent and temporary pheasant habitat on
public and private lands in Grant, Franklin, and Adams counties. The
department may support efforts by entities including conservation
districts, nonprofit organizations, and landowners, and must require
such entities to provide significant nonstate matching resources, which
may be in the form of funds, material, or labor.
(7) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the department
shall identify additional opportunities for partnerships in order to
keep fish hatcheries operational. Such partnerships shall aim to
maintain fish production and salmon recovery with less reliance on
state operating funds.
(8) By September 1, 2011, the department shall update its
interagency agreement dated September 30, 2010, with the department of
natural resources concerning land management services on the department
of fish and wildlife's wildlife conservation and recreation lands. The
update shall include rates and terms for services.
(9) Prior to opening game management unit 490 to public hunting,
the department shall complete an environmental impact statement that
includes an assessment of how public hunting activities will impact the
ongoing protection of the public water supply.
(10) $18,514,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5385 (state wildlife account). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(11) $9,418,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5622 (state land recreation access). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(12) $50,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for mitigation, claims, and assessment costs for injury
or loss of livestock caused by wolves, black bears, and cougars.
(13) $552,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account--state
appropriation is provided solely for increased law enforcement capacity
to reduce the occurrence of geoduck poaching and illegal harvest
activities. The department shall fill current vacant law enforcement
positions prior to filling the new positions created under this
subsection.
(14) $56,000 of the state wildlife account--state appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
6387 (natural resource fiscal matters). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
(15) $415,000 of the hydraulic project approval--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6406 (state natural resources). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec. 307 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,324,000))
$30,956,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,791,000))
$32,594,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,919,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,374,000
Forest Development Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($41,717,000))
$45,115,000
ORV and Nonhighway Vehicle Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,387,000
Surveys and Maps Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,346,000))
$2,124,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,224,000))
$1,224,000
Resources Management Cost Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,097,000))
$89,699,000
Surface Mining Reclamation Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,484,000))
$3,486,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Forest and Fish Support Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,933,000))
$10,484,000
Aquatic Land Dredged Material Disposal Site
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $838,000
Natural Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,000
Marine Resources Stewardship Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000
Air Pollution Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($669,000))
$540,000
NOVA Program Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $639,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,761,000
Agricultural College Trust Management Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,854,000
Forest Practices Application Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $780,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($257,471,000))
$264,288,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $710,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $915,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for deposit into the agricultural
college trust management account and are provided solely to manage
approximately 70,700 acres of Washington State University's
agricultural college trust lands.
(2) $8,030,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, (($10,037,000)) $8,819,000 of the general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, $595,000 of the forest development
account--state appropriation, and $5,000,000 of the disaster response
account -- state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire
suppression. None of the general fund and disaster response account
amounts provided in this subsection may be used to fund agency indirect
and administrative expenses. Agency indirect and administrative costs
shall be allocated among the agency's remaining accounts and
appropriations. The department of natural resources shall submit a
quarterly report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current and
planned expenditures from the disaster response account. This work
shall be done in coordination with the military department.
(3) (($4,000,000 of the forest and fish support account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to tribes. If federal funding for this
purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $333,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for adaptive management, monitoring,
and participation grants to nongovernmental organizations.)) $4,250,000
of the forest and fish support account--state appropriation is provided
solely for outcome-based, performance contracts with tribes to
participate in the implementation of the forest practices program.
Contracts awarded in fiscal year 2013 may only contain indirect cost
set at or below the rate in the contracting tribe's indirect cost
agreement with the federal government. If federal funding for this
purpose is reinstated, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(4) $468,000 of the forest and fish support account--state
appropriation is provided solely for outcome-based performance
contracts with nongovernmental organizations to participate in the
implementation of the forest practices program. Contracts awarded in
fiscal year 2013 may only contain indirect cost set at or below a rate
of eighteen percent.
(5) (($487,000)) $717,000 of the ((general fund)) forest and fish
support account--state appropriation is provided solely to fund
interagency agreements with the department of ecology and the
department of fish and wildlife as part of the adaptive management
process.
(6) $1,000,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation and
$1,000,000 of the forest and fish support account--state appropriation
are provided solely for continuing scientific studies already underway
as part of the adaptive management process. Funds may not be used to
initiate new studies unless the department secures new federal funding
for the adaptive management process.
(7) The department is authorized to increase the silviculture
burning permit fee in the 2011-2013 biennium by up to eighty dollars
plus fifty cents per ton for each ton of material burned in excess of
one hundred tons.
(8) $440,000 of the state general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and $440,000 of the state general fund -- state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for forest work
crews that support correctional camps and are contingent upon
continuing operations of Naselle youth camp.
(9) By September 1, 2011, the department shall update its
interagency agreement dated September 30, 2010, with the department of
fish and wildlife concerning land management services on the department
of fish and wildlife's wildlife conservation and recreation lands. The
update shall include rates and terms for services.
(10) In partnership with the department of ecology, the departments
shall deliver a report to the governor, the appropriate committees of
the legislature, and the forest practices board by September 1, 2012,
documenting forest practices adaptive management program reforms
implemented, or recommended, that streamline existing processes to
increase program efficiencies and effectiveness. The departments shall
collaborate with interested adaptive management program participants in
the development of the report.
(11) $780,000 of the forest practices application account--state
appropriation, $18,000 of the forest development account--state
appropriation, $22,000 of the resources management cost account--state
appropriation, and $2,000 of the surface mining reclamation account--state appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6406 (state natural resources). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(12) $2,400,000 of the marine resources stewardship account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6263 (marine management planning). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 308 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,484,000))
$12,942,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,875,000))
$12,181,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,940,000))
$22,897,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $190,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,553,000))
$2,548,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,118,000))
$10,132,000
Water Quality Permit Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $60,000
Freshwater Aquatic Weeds Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $280,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($61,500,000))
$61,230,000

(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $5,308,445 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and $5,302,905 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for
implementing the food assistance program as defined in RCW 43.23.290.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase the following fees in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium as
necessary to meet the actual costs of conducting business: Fruit and
vegetable platform inspections; grain program services; warehouse
audits; requested inspections; seed inspections, testing, sampling and
certifications; phytosanitary certifications for seed; commission
merchants; and sod quality seed tags and tagging. In addition,
pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, 17.21.134, and 15.58.240, the department is
authorized to establish pesticide license examination fees.

Sec. 309 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 311 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,399,000))
$2,278,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,424,000))
$2,280,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,581,000))
$12,449,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $493,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $665,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,587,000))
$18,190,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $665,000 of the state toxics control account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for activities that contribute to
Puget Sound protection and recovery, including provision of independent
advice and assessment of the state's oil spill prevention,
preparedness, and response programs, including review of existing
activities and recommendations for any necessary improvements. The
partnership may carry out this function through an existing committee,
such as the ecosystem coordination board or the leadership council, or
may appoint a special advisory council. Because this is a unique
statewide program, the partnership may invite participation from
outside the Puget Sound region.
(2) Within the amounts appropriated in this section, the Puget
Sound partnership shall facilitate an ongoing monitoring consortium to
integrate monitoring efforts for storm water, water quality, watershed
health, and other indicators to enhance monitoring efforts in Puget
Sound.

(End of part)

PART IV
TRANSPORTATION
Sec. 401 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,167,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,307,000
Architects' License Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,084,000
Professional Engineers' Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,518,000
Real Estate Commission Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,833,000
Uniform Commercial Code Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,120,000
Real Estate Education Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $276,000
Real Estate Appraiser Commission Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,687,000
Business and Professions Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,592,000
Real Estate Research Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $622,000
Geologists' Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $51,000
Derelict Vessel Removal Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,288,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, the department is authorized to
increase fees for collection agencies and the camping resorts program.
This increase is necessary to support the expenditures authorized in
this section, consistent with RCW 43.24.086.
(2) $8,000 of the business and professions account--state
appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5574 (collection agencies).

Sec. 402 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE PATROL
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,352,000))
$37,332,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($35,108,000))
$34,082,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,081,000
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,021,000
Death Investigations Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,551,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,215,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,290,000
Fire Service Trust Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $131,000
Disaster Response Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,002,000
Fire Service Training Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,394,000
Aquatic Invasive Species Enforcement Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $54,000
State Toxics Control Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $505,000
Fingerprint Identification Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,090,000))
$10,091,000
Vehicle License Fraud Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($339,000))
$439,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($130,133,000))
$130,188,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $200,000 of the fire service training account -- state
appropriation is provided solely for two FTEs in the office of the
state director of fire protection to exclusively review K-12
construction documents for fire and life safety in accordance with the
state building code. It is the intent of this appropriation to provide
these services only to those districts that are located in counties
without qualified review capabilities.
(2) $8,000,000 of the disaster response account--state
appropriation is provided solely for Washington state fire service
resource mobilization costs incurred in response to an emergency or
disaster authorized under RCW 43.43.960 and 43.43.964. $500,000 of
this appropriation is available for mobilization to all risk disasters,
other than fires, in accordance with these statutes. The state patrol
shall submit a report quarterly to the office of financial management
and the legislative fiscal committees detailing information on current
and planned expenditures from this account. This work shall be done in
coordination with the military department.
(3) $400,000 of the fire service training account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the firefighter apprenticeship
training program.
(4) In accordance with RCW 43.43.742 the state patrol is authorized
to increase the following fees in fiscal year 2012 as necessary to meet
the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in
this section: Notary service fee.
(5) $59,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1776 (child care center licensing). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(6) $6,000 of the fingerprint identification account--state
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1494 (vulnerable adult referrals). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART V
EDUCATION
Sec. 501 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($25,406,000))
$25,137,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,502,000))
$15,739,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $77,065,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($128,973,000))
$121,941,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) A maximum of (($16,139,000)) $15,878,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and (($13,335,000))
$12,681,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2013 is for state agency operations.
(a) $9,775,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $8,532,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the operation and expenses of
the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
(i) Within the amounts provided in this subsection (1)(a), the
superintendent shall recognize the extraordinary accomplishments of
four students who have demonstrated a strong understanding of the
civics essential learning requirements to receive the Daniel J. Evans
civic education award.
(ii) By January 1, 2012, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall issue a report to the legislature with a timeline and
an estimate of costs for implementation of the common core standards.
The report must incorporate feedback from an open public forum for
recommendations to enhance the standards, particularly in math.
(iii) Within the amounts provided, and in consultation with the
public school employees of Washington and the Washington school
counselors' association, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop a model policy that further defines the
recommended roles and responsibilities of graduation coaches and
identifies best practices for how graduation coaches work in
coordination with school counselors and in the context of a
comprehensive school guidance and counseling program.
(iv) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall,
no later than August 1, 2011, establish a standard statewide definition
of unexcused absence. The definition shall be reported to the ways and
means committees of the senate and house of representatives for
legislative review in the 2012 legislative session. Beginning no later
than January 1, 2012, districts shall report to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, daily student unexcused absence
data by school.
(b) $1,964,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,017,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for activities associated with the
implementation of new school finance systems required by chapter 236,
Laws of 2010 (K-12 education funding) and chapter 548, Laws of 2009
(state's education system), including technical staff, systems
reprogramming, and workgroup deliberations, including the quality
education council and the data governance working group.
(c) (($851,000)) $808,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 and (($851,000)) $766,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the
operation and expenses of the state board of education, including basic
education assistance activities.
(d) (($1,744,000)) $1,526,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2012 and (($1,362,000)) $913,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided
solely to the professional educator standards board for the following:
(i) (($1,050,000)) $832,000 in fiscal year 2012 and (($1,050,000))
$913,000 in fiscal year 2013 are for the operation and expenses of the
Washington professional educator standards board; and
(ii) $694,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $312,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is for conditional scholarship loans and mentor
stipends provided through the alternative routes to certification
program administered by the professional educator standards board,
including the pipeline for paraeducators program and the retooling to
teach conditional loan programs. Funding within this subsection
(1)(d)(ii) is also provided for the recruiting Washington teachers
program. Funding reductions in this subsection (1)(d)(ii) in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium are intended to be one-time.
(e) $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
240, Laws of 2010, including staffing the office of equity and civil
rights.
(f) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the ongoing work of the
education opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee.
(g) $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 380, Laws of 2009 (enacting the interstate compact on
educational opportunity for military children).
(h) $159,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $93,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
185, Laws of 2011 (bullying prevention), which requires the office of
the superintendent of public instruction to convene an ongoing
workgroup on school bullying and harassment prevention. Within the
amounts provided, $140,000 is for youth suicide prevention activities.
(i) $1,227,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $1,227,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for implementing a comprehensive
data system to include financial, student, and educator data, including
development and maintenance of the comprehensive education data and
research system (CEDARS).
(j) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for project citizen, a
program sponsored by the national conference of state legislatures and
the center for civic education to promote participation in government
by middle school students.
(k) $166,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 192,
Laws of 2011 (school district insolvency). Funding is provided to
develop a clear legal framework and process for dissolution of a school
district.
(l) $128,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely pursuant to Substitute House Bill No. 2254
(foster care outcomes). The office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall report on the implementation of the state's plan of
cross-system collaboration to promote educational stability and improve
education outcomes of foster youth. The first report is due December
1, 2012, and annually thereafter through 2015. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(2) $9,267,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and (($9,167,000)) $2,941,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are for statewide programs.

(a) HEALTH AND SAFETY
(i) $2,541,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,541,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for a corps of nurses located at
educational service districts, as determined by the superintendent of
public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy schools to
provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.
(ii) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for a nonviolence and
leadership training program provided by the institute for community
leadership.

(b) TECHNOLOGY
$1,221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2012 ((and $1,221,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for K-20 telecommunications
network technical support in the K-12 sector to prevent system
failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization of the data
processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network. These
funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical
support for the network.

(c) GRANTS AND ALLOCATIONS
(i) $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $675,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the Washington state
achievers scholarship program. The funds shall be used to support
community involvement officers that recruit, train, and match community
volunteer mentors with students selected as achievers scholars.
(ii) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for contracting with a
college scholarship organization with expertise in conducting outreach
to students concerning eligibility for the Washington college bound
scholarship consistent with chapter 405, Laws of 2007.
(iii) $2,808,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 ((and $2,808,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the
dissemination of the navigation 101 curriculum to all districts. The
funding shall support electronic student planning tools and software
for analyzing the impact of navigation 101 on student performance, as
well as grants to a maximum of one hundred school districts each year,
based on progress and need for the implementation of the navigation 101
program. The implementation grants shall be awarded to a cross-section
of school districts reflecting a balance of geographic and demographic
characteristics. Within the amounts provided, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction will create a navigation 101
accountability model to analyze the impact of the program.
(iv) $337,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $337,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for implementation of the
building bridges statewide program for comprehensive dropout
prevention, intervention, and reengagement strategies.
(v) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for dropout prevention
programs at the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
including the jobs for America's graduates (JAG) program.
(vi) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $400,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the implementation of chapter
340, Laws of 2011 (assessment of students in state-funded full-day
kindergarten classrooms), including the development and implementation
of the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills (WaKIDS).

Sec. 502 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,253,769,000))
$5,241,233,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,205,868,000))
$5,162,497,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,078,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,481,715,000))
$10,425,808,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such
funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal
year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(b) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate general apportionment funding to school districts as
provided in the funding formulas and salary schedules in sections 502
and 503 of this act, excluding (c) of this subsection.
(c) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate general apportionment funding to school districts programs as
provided in sections 502 and 504, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as amended
through sections 1402 and 1403 of this act.
(d) The appropriations in this section include federal funds
provided through section 101 of P.L. No. 111-226 (education jobs fund),
which shall be used to support general apportionment program funding.
In distributing general apportionment allocations under this section
for the 2011-12 school year, the superintendent shall include the
additional amount of $3,078,000 allocated by the United States
department of education on September 16, 2011, provided through 101 of
P.L. No. 111-226 (education jobs fund) as part of each district's
general apportionment allocation.
(e) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the fourth day of school in
September and on the first school day of each month October through
June, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. Any school district concluding its basic education
program in May must report the enrollment of the last school day held
in May in lieu of a June enrollment.

(2) CERTIFICATED INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for certificated instructional staff salaries for the
2011-12 and 2012-13 school years are determined using formula-generated
staff units calculated pursuant to this subsection.
(a) Certificated instructional staff units, as defined in RCW
28A.150.410, shall be allocated to reflect the minimum class size
allocations, requirements, and school prototypes assumptions as
provided in RCW 28A.150.260. The superintendent shall make allocations
to school districts based on the district's annual average full-time
equivalent student enrollment in each grade.
(b) Additional certificated instructional staff units provided in
this subsection (2) that exceed the minimum requirements in RCW
28A.150.260 are enhancements outside the program of basic education,
except as otherwise provided in this section.
(c)(i) The superintendent shall base allocations for each level of
prototypical school on the following regular education average class
size of full-time equivalent students per teacher, except as provided
in (c)(ii) of this subsection:

General education class size:

Grade RCW 28A.150.260

Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

The superintendent shall base allocations for career and technical
education (CTE) and skill center programs average class size as
provided in RCW 28A.150.260.
(ii) For each level of prototypical school at which more than fifty
percent of the students were eligible for free and reduced-price meals
in the prior school year, the superintendent shall allocate funding
based on the following average class size of full-time equivalent
students per teacher:

General education class size in high poverty school:

Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 24.10

Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00

Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53

Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(iii) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(4)(a), the assumed teacher
planning period, expressed as a percentage of a teacher work day, is
13.42 percent in grades K-6, and 16.67 percent in grades 7-12; and
(iv) Laboratory science, advanced placement, and international
baccalaureate courses are funded at the same class size assumptions as
general education schools in the same grade; and
(d)(i) Funding for teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors is allocated
based on the school prototypes as provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and is
considered certificated instructional staff, except as provided in
(d)(ii) of this subsection.
(ii) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated instructional staff units to
provide for the services of teacher librarians, school nurses, social
workers, school psychologists, and guidance counselors at the following
combined rate per 1000 students:

Career and Technical Education
students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.02 per 1000 student FTE's
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.36 per 1000 student FTE's

(3) ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF ALLOCATIONS
(a) Allocations for school building-level certificated
administrative staff salaries for the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years
for general education students are determined using the formula-generated staff units provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based
on a district's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment
in each grade.
(b) Students in approved career and technical education and skill
center programs generate certificated school building-level
administrator staff units at per student rates that exceed the general
education rate in (a) of this subsection by the following percentages:

Career and Technical Education students . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.5 percent
Skill Center students . . . . . . . . . . . . 19.75 percent

(4) CLASSIFIED STAFF ALLOCATIONS
Allocations for classified staff units providing school building-level and district-wide support services for the 2011-12 and 2012-13
school years are determined using the formula-generated staff units
provided in RCW 28A.150.260, and adjusted based on each district's
annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment in each grade.

(5) CENTRAL OFFICE ALLOCATIONS
In addition to classified and administrative staff units allocated
in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, classified and
administrative staff units are provided for the 2011-12 and 2012-13
school year for the central office administrative costs of operating a
school district, at the following rates:
(a) The total central office staff units provided in this
subsection (5) are calculated by first multiplying the total number of
eligible certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and
classified staff units providing school-based or district-wide support
services, as identified in RCW 28A.150.260(6)(b), by 5.3 percent.
(b) Of the central office staff units calculated in (a) of this
subsection, 74.53 percent are allocated as classified staff units, as
generated in subsection (4) of this section, and 25.47 percent shall be
allocated as administrative staff units, as generated in subsection (3)
of this section.
(c) Staff units generated as enhancements outside the program of
basic education to the minimum requirements of RCW 28A.150.260, and
staff units generated by skill center and career-technical students,
are excluded from the total central office staff units calculation in
(a) of this subsection.
(d) For students in approved career-technical and skill center
programs, central office classified units are allocated at the same
staff unit per student rate as those generated for general education
students of the same grade in this subsection (5), and central office
administrative staff units are allocated at staff unit per student
rates that exceed the general education rate established for students
in the same grade in this subsection (5) by 3.69 percent for career and
technical education students, and 21.92 percent for skill center
students.

(6) FRINGE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 16.33
percent in the 2011-12 school year and ((16.33)) 16.34 percent in the
2012-13 school year for certificated salary allocations provided under
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section, and a rate of 18.73
percent in the 2011-12 school year and 18.73 percent in the 2012-13
school year for classified salary allocations provided under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section.

(7) INSURANCE BENEFIT ALLOCATIONS
Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the
maintenance rate specified in section 504 of this act, based on the
number of benefit units determined as follows:
(a) The number of certificated staff units determined in
subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section; and
(b) The number of classified staff units determined in subsections
(4) and (5) of this section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is
intended to adjust allocations so that, for the purposes of
distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent classified
employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per
year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time
equivalent.

(8) MATERIALS, SUPPLIES, AND OPERATING COSTS (MSOC) ALLOCATIONS
Funding is allocated per annual average full-time equivalent
student for the materials, supplies, and operating costs (MSOC)
incurred by school districts, consistent with the requirements of RCW
28A.150.260.
(a) MSOC funding for general education students are allocated at
the following per student rates:

MSOC RATES/STUDENT FTE

MSOC Component 2011-12
SCHOOL YEAR 2012-13
SCHOOL YEAR

Technology $57.42 (($58.17)) $58.29

Utilities and Insurance $156.03 (($158.05))
$158.36

Curriculum and Textbooks $61.65 (($62.45)) $62.58

Other Supplies and Library Materials $130.89 (($132.59))
$132.85

Instructional Professional Development for Certificated and Classified Staff $9.53 (($9.66)) $9.68

Facilities Maintenance $77.30 (($78.30)) $78.46

Security and Central Office $53.55 (($54.25)) $54.35

TOTAL BASIC EDUCATION MSOC/STUDENT FTE $546.37 (($553.47))
$554.57

(b) Students in approved skill center programs generate per student
FTE MSOC allocations which equal the rate for general education
students calculated in (a) of this subsection, multiplied by a factor
of 2.171.
(c) Students in approved exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education programs generate a per student MSOC allocation
that is equal to the rate for general education students calculated in
(a) of this subsection, multiplied by a factor of 2.442.
(d) Students in laboratory science courses generate per student FTE
MSOC allocations which equal the per student FTE rate for general
education students established in (a) of this subsection.

(9) SUBSTITUTE TEACHER ALLOCATIONS
For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, funding for substitute
costs for classroom teachers is based on four (4) funded substitute
days per classroom teacher unit generated under subsection (2) of this
section, at a daily substitute rate of $151.86.

(10) ALTERNATIVE LEARNING EXPERIENCE PROGRAM FUNDING
(a) Amounts provided in this section are adjusted to reflect
provisions of House Bill No. 2065 (allocation of funding for funding
for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences).
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall require all
districts receiving general apportionment funding for alternative
learning experience (ALE) programs as defined in WAC 392-121-182 to
provide separate financial accounting of expenditures for the ALE
programs offered in district or with a provider, including but not
limited to private companies and multidistrict cooperatives, as well as
accurate, monthly headcount and FTE enrollment claimed for basic
education, including separate counts of resident and nonresident
students.

(11) VOLUNTARY FULL DAY KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS
Funding in this section is sufficient to fund voluntary full day
kindergarten programs in qualifying high poverty schools, pursuant to
RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.315. Each kindergarten student who enrolls
for the voluntary full-day program in a qualifying school shall count
as one-half of one full-time equivalent student for purpose of making
allocations under this section. Funding in this section provides full-day kindergarten programs for 21 percent of kindergarten enrollment in
the 2011-12 school year, and 22 percent in the 2012-13 school year.
Funding priority shall be given to schools with the highest poverty
levels, as measured by prior year free and reduced price lunch
eligibility rates in each school. Funding in this section is
sufficient to fund voluntary full day kindergarten programs for July
and August of the 2010-11 school year.

(12) ADDITIONAL FUNDING FOR SMALL SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND REMOTE AND
NECESSARY PLANTS
For small school districts and remote and necessary school plants
within any district which have been judged to be remote and necessary
by the superintendent of public instruction, additional staff units are
provided to ensure a minimum level of staffing support. Additional
administrative and certificated instructional staff units provided to
districts in this subsection shall be reduced by the general education
staff units, excluding career and technical education and skills center
enhancement units, otherwise provided in subsections (2) through (5) of
this section on a per district basis.
(a) For districts enrolling not more than twenty-five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small
school plants within any school district which have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction and
enroll not more than twenty-five average annual full-time equivalent
students in grades K-8:
(i) For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76
certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-twentieth of a certificated instructional staff unit
for each additional student enrolled; and
(ii) For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68
certificated instructional staff units and 0.32 certificated
administrative staff units for enrollment of not more than five
students, plus one-tenth of a certificated instructional staff unit for
each additional student enrolled;
(b) For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than
twenty-five but not more than one hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which enroll more than twenty-five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8 and have been judged to be
remote and necessary by the superintendent of public instruction:
(i) For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units; and
(ii) For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative staff units;
(c) For districts operating no more than two high schools with
enrollments of less than three hundred average annual full-time
equivalent students, for enrollment in grades 9-12 in each such school,
other than alternative schools, except as noted in this subsection:
(i) For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any
grades 9-12 but no more than twenty-five average annual full-time
equivalent students in grades K-12, four and one-half certificated
instructional staff units and one-quarter of a certificated
administrative staff unit;
(ii) For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine
certificated instructional staff units and one-half of a certificated
administrative staff unit for the first sixty average annual full-time
equivalent students, and additional staff units based on a ratio of
0.8732 certificated instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated
administrative staff units per each additional forty-three and one-half
average annual full-time equivalent students;
(iii) Districts receiving staff units under this subsection shall
add students enrolled in a district alternative high school and any
grades nine through twelve alternative learning experience programs
with the small high school enrollment for calculations under this
subsection;
(d) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than seventy annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades
1-8 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(e) For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades
1-6 program, an additional one-half of a certificated instructional
staff unit;
(f)(i) For enrollments generating certificated staff unit
allocations under (a) through (e) of this subsection, one classified
staff unit for each 2.94 certificated staff units allocated under such
subsections;
(ii) For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more
than fifty annual average full-time equivalent students and less than
one hundred eighty students, an additional one-half of a classified
staff unit; and
(g) School districts receiving additional staff units to support
small student enrollments and remote and necessary plants under
subsection (12) of this section shall generate additional MSOC
allocations consistent with the nonemployee related costs (NERC)
allocation formula in place for the 2010-11 school year as provided
section 502, chapter 37, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. (2010 supplemental
budget), adjusted annually for inflation.
(13) Any school district board of directors may petition the
superintendent of public instruction by submission of a resolution
adopted in a public meeting to reduce or delay any portion of its basic
education allocation for any school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall approve such reduction or delay if it does not impair
the district's financial condition. Any delay shall not be for more
than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have no impact on
levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort assistance
pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.
(14) The superintendent may distribute funding for the following
programs outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2012
and 2013 as follows:
(a) $589,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and (($597,000)) $598,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for fire
protection for school districts located in a fire protection district
as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW.
(b) $436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for programs providing skills
training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day
school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public
instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500
per full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.
(c) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund adjustments to
school districts' allocations resulting from the implementation of the
prototypical school funding formula, pursuant to chapter 236, Laws of
2010 (K-12 education funding). The funding in this section is intended
to hold school districts harmless in total for funding changes
resulting from conversion to the prototypical school formula in the
general apportionment program, the learning assistance program, the
transitional bilingual program, and the highly capable program, after
adjustment for changes in enrollment and other caseload adjustments.
(15) $208,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $211,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for school district emergencies as
certified by the superintendent of public instruction. At the close of
the fiscal year the superintendent of public instruction shall report
to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature on the allocations provided to districts
and the nature of the emergency.
(16) Funding in this section is sufficient to fund a maximum of
1.6 FTE enrollment for skills center students pursuant to chapter 463,
Laws of 2007.
(17) ((Beginning in the 2011-12 school year,)) Students
participating in running start programs may be funded up to a combined
maximum enrollment of 1.2 FTE for the 2011-12 school year and 1.0 FTE
for the 2012-13 school year including school district and institution
of higher education enrollment. In calculating the combined 1.2 or 1.0
FTE, the office of the superintendent of public instruction may
((average the participating student's September through June enrollment
to account for differences in the start and end dates for courses
provided by the high school and higher education institution)) utilize
the average of the student's running start FTE enrollment on nine count
dates from the institution of higher education and the average of the
student's high school FTE enrollment from September through June,
adjusting for any differences in start and end dates provided by the
institution of higher education and the high school, provided the final
per-student FTE does not exceed the 1.2 maximum specified in this
section. Additionally, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, in consultation with the state board for community and
technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, and the
education data center, shall annually track and report to the fiscal
committees of the legislature on the combined FTE experience of
students participating in the running start program, including course
load analyses at both the high school and community and technical
college system.
(18) If two or more school districts consolidate and each district
was receiving additional basic education formula staff units pursuant
to subsection (12) of this section, the following apply:
(a) For three school years following consolidation, the number of
basic education formula staff units shall not be less than the number
of basic education formula staff units received by the districts in the
school year prior to the consolidation; and
(b) For the fourth through eighth school years following
consolidation, the difference between the basic education formula staff
units received by the districts for the school year prior to
consolidation and the basic education formula staff units after
consolidation pursuant to subsection (12) of this section shall be
reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.
(19)(a) Indirect cost charges by a school district to approved
career and technical education middle and secondary programs shall not
exceed 15 percent of the combined basic education and career and
technical education program enhancement allocations of state funds.
Middle and secondary career and technical education programs are
considered separate programs for funding and financial reporting
purposes under this section.
(b) Career and technical education program full-time equivalent
enrollment shall be reported on the same monthly basis as the
enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and payments shall
be adjusted for reported career and technical education program
enrollments on the same monthly basis as those adjustments for
enrollment for students eligible for basic support.

Sec. 503 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION
(1) The following calculations determine the salaries used in the
state allocations for certificated instructional, certificated
administrative, and classified staff units as provided in RCW
28A.150.280 and under section 503 of this act:
(a) Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units
are determined for each district by multiplying the district's
certificated instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 2
by the district's average staff mix factor for certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP document
1; and
(b) Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units
and classified staff units for each district are determined based on
the district's certificated administrative and classified salary
allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document 2.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "LEAP Document 1" means the staff mix factors for certificated
instructional staff according to education and years of experience, as
developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on May 23, 2011, at 16:10 hours; and
(b) "LEAP Document 2" means the school year salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff and classified staff and derived and
total base salaries for certificated instructional staff as developed
by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee on
May 23, 2011, at 16:10 hours.
(3) Incremental fringe benefit factors are applied to salary
adjustments at a rate of 15.69 percent for school year 2011-12 and
((15.69)) 15.70 percent for school year 2012-13 for certificated
instructional and certificated administrative staff and 15.23 percent
for school year 2011-12 and 15.23 percent for the 2012-13 school year
for classified staff.
(4)(a) Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state-wide salary
allocation schedules for certificated instructional staff are
established for basic education salary allocations:

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff For School Year 2011-12
***Education Experience***

Years MA+90

of OR

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 Ph.D.

0 33,401 34,303 35,238 36,175 39,180 41,116 40,045 43,051 44,989

1 33,851 34,765 35,712 36,690 39,727 41,652 40,490 43,527 45,452

2 34,279 35,202 36,159 37,212 40,241 42,186 40,938 43,966 45,912

3 34,720 35,653 36,620 37,706 40,729 42,722 41,363 44,384 46,377

4 35,153 36,127 37,099 38,224 41,264 43,271 41,808 44,849 46,857

5 35,600 36,578 37,561 38,748 41,777 43,824 42,261 45,291 47,339

6 36,060 37,017 38,032 39,279 42,293 44,352 42,725 45,740 47,797

7 36,868 37,839 38,868 40,182 43,241 45,356 43,594 46,652 48,768

8 38,050 39,074 40,127 41,550 44,651 46,844 44,961 48,063 50,254

9 40,353 41,459 42,933 46,106 48,373 46,343 49,518 51,785

10 42,806 44,387 47,602 49,945 47,798 51,014 53,356

11 45,883 49,169 51,558 49,295 52,581 54,969

12 47,332 50,777 53,238 50,850 54,188 56,650

13 52,425 54,959 52,460 55,836 58,370

14 54,081 56,745 54,117 57,600 60,157

15 55,488 58,221 55,523 59,098 61,721

16 or more 56,597 59,385 56,634 60,279 62,955

Table Of Total Base Salaries For Certificated Instructional Staff For School Year 2012-13
***Education Experience***

Years MA+90

of OR

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90 BA+135 MA MA+45 Ph.D.

0 33,401 34,303 35,238 36,175 39,180 41,116 40,045 43,051 44,989

1 33,851 34,765 35,712 36,690 39,727 41,652 40,490 43,527 45,452

2 34,279 35,202 36,159 37,212 40,241 42,186 40,938 43,966 45,912

3 34,720 35,653 36,620 37,706 40,729 42,722 41,363 44,384 46,377

4 35,153 36,127 37,099 38,224 41,264 43,271 41,808 44,849 46,857

5 35,600 36,578 37,561 38,748 41,777 43,824 42,261 45,291 47,339

6 36,060 37,017 38,032 39,279 42,293 44,352 42,725 45,740 47,797

7 36,868 37,839 38,868 40,182 43,241 45,356 43,594 46,652 48,768

8 38,050 39,074 40,127 41,550 44,651 46,844 44,961 48,063 50,254

9 40,353 41,459 42,933 46,106 48,373 46,343 49,518 51,785

10 42,806 44,387 47,602 49,945 47,798 51,014 53,356

11 45,883 49,169 51,558 49,295 52,581 54,969

12 47,332 50,777 53,238 50,850 54,188 56,650

13 52,425 54,959 52,460 55,836 58,370

14 54,081 56,745 54,117 57,600 60,157

15 55,488 58,221 55,523 59,098 61,721

16 or more 56,597 59,385 56,634 60,279 62,955

(b) As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer
to the number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate
degree.
(c) For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before
the masters degree, any credits in excess of forty-five credits may be
counted after the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection,
the column headings "MA+(N)" refer to the total of:
(i) Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and
(ii) Any credits in excess of forty-five credits that were earned
after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "BA" means a baccalaureate degree.
(b) "MA" means a masters degree.
(c) "PHD" means a doctorate degree.
(d) "Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction.
(e) "Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent
in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and
28A.415.023.
(6) No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by
any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine
compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule and
LEAP documents referenced in this part V, or any replacement schedules
and documents, unless:
(a) The employee has a masters degree; or
(b) The credits were used in generating state salary allocations
before January 1, 1992.
(7) The salary allocation schedules established in this section are
for allocation purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

Sec. 504 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR SCHOOL EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) Additional salary adjustments as necessary to fund the base
salaries for certificated instructional staff as listed for each
district in LEAP Document 2, defined in section 504(2)(b) of this act.
Allocations for these salary adjustments shall be provided to all
districts that are not grandfathered to receive salary allocations
above the statewide salary allocation schedule, and to certain
grandfathered districts to the extent necessary to ensure that salary
allocations for districts that are currently grandfathered do not fall
below the statewide salary allocation schedule.
(b) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for
certificated administrative staff as listed for each district in LEAP
Document 2, defined in section 504(2)(b) of this act.
(c) Additional salary adjustments to certain districts as necessary
to fund the per full-time-equivalent salary allocations for classified
staff as listed for each district in LEAP Document 2, defined in
section 504(2)(b) of this act.
(d) The appropriations in this subsection (1) include associated
incremental fringe benefit allocations at 15.69 percent for the 2011-12
school year and ((15.69)) 15.70 percent for the 2012-13 school year for
certificated instructional and certificated administrative staff and
15.23 percent for the 2011-12 school year and 15.23 percent for the
2012-13 school year for classified staff.
(e) The appropriations in this section include the increased or
decreased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all
relevant state-funded school programs in part V of this act. Changes
for general apportionment (basic education) are based on the salary
allocation schedules and methodology in sections 503 and 504 of this
act. Changes for special education result from changes in each
district's basic education allocation per student. Changes for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the
methodology for general apportionment salaries and benefits in sections
503 and 504 of this act.
(f) The appropriations in this section include no salary
adjustments for substitute teachers.
(2) The maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is
$768.00 per month for the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years. The
appropriations in this section reflect the incremental change in cost
of allocating rates of $768.00 per month for the 2011-12 school year
and $768.00 per month for the 2012-13 school year.
(3) The rates specified in this section are subject to revision
each year by the legislature.

Sec. 505 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR PUPIL TRANSPORTATION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($322,033,000))
$322,243,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($273,380,000))
$273,642,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($595,413,000))
$595,885,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for the
transportation of students as provided in RCW 28A.160.192.
(b) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts programs for the transportation of
students as provided in section 505, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1404 of this act.
(3) Any amounts appropriated for maintenance level funding for
pupil transportation that exceed actual maintenance level expenditures
as calculated under the funding formula that takes effect September 1,
2011, shall be distributed to districts according to RCW
28A.160.192(2)(b).
(4) A maximum of $892,000 of this fiscal year 2012 appropriation
and a maximum of $892,000 of the fiscal year 2013 appropriation may be
expended for regional transportation coordinators and related
activities. The transportation coordinators shall ensure that data
submitted by school districts for state transportation funding shall,
to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide reimbursement funding to a school district for school bus
purchases only after the superintendent of public instruction
determines that the school bus was purchased from the list established
pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195(2) or a comparable competitive bid process
based on the lowest price quote based on similar bus categories to
those used to establish the list pursuant to RCW 28A.160.195.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall base
depreciation payments for school district buses on the pre-sales tax
five-year average of lowest bids in the appropriate category of bus.
In the final year on the depreciation schedule, the depreciation
payment shall be based on the lowest bid in the appropriate bus
category for that school year.
(7) Funding levels in this section reflect waivers granted by the
state board of education for four-day school weeks as allowed under RCW
28A.305.141.
(8) Starting with the 2012-13 school year, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall disburse payments for bus
depreciation in August.
(9) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop, in consultation with the Washington association of school
business officials and Washington association for pupil transportation,
a unit-cost transportation formula or hybrid formula for legislative
consideration and potential adoption. The transportation-allocation
formula shall take into account statistically significant cost drivers,
recognize fixed costs, and simplify the current regression-analysis
transportation-allocation method. The formula or hybrid formula
developed should be based on currently-collected data identified under
RCW 28A.160.192(1)(a). These data are to include basic and special
student loads, school district land area, average distance to school,
roadway miles, and number of locations served. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall report to the legislative
fiscal committees, the education committees of the senate and the house
of representatives, and to the office of financial management, by
September 30, 2012, for legislative consideration and possible
amendment or adoption of the unit-cost or hybrid formula for the 2013-14 school year.

Sec. 506 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR SPECIAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($653,904,000))
$648,369,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($694,237,000))
$680,439,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $486,936,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $756,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,835,833,000))
$1,816,500,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess
cost basis, pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure
that special education students as a class receive their full share of
the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an
appropriate education for special education students under chapter
28A.155 RCW through the general apportionment allocation, it shall
provide services through the special education excess cost allocation
funded in this section.
(2)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that:
(i) Special education students are basic education students first;
(ii) As a class, special education students are entitled to the
full basic education allocation; and
(iii) Special education students are basic education students for
the entire school day.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall continue to
implement the full cost method of excess cost accounting, as designed
by the committee and recommended by the superintendent, pursuant to
section 501(1)(k), chapter 372, Laws of 2006.
(c) Beginning with the 2010-11 school year award cycle, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall make award
determinations for state safety net funding in August of each school
year. Determinations on school district eligibility for state safety
net awards shall be based on analysis of actual expenditure data from
the current school year.
(3) Each fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.
(4)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for special
education students as provided in RCW 28A.150.390.
(b) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school district programs for special education
students as provided in section 507, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1406 of this act.
(5) The following applies throughout this section: The definitions
for enrollment and enrollment percent are as specified in RCW
28A.150.390(3). Each district's general fund--state funded special
education enrollment shall be the lesser of the district's actual
enrollment percent or 12.7 percent.
(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education
students of the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum
enrollment percent shall be calculated in accordance with RCW
28A.150.390(3) (c) and (d), and shall be calculated in the aggregate
rather than individual district units. For purposes of this
subsection, the average basic education allocation per full-time
equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than
individual district units.
(7) $8,914,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, (($34,200,000)) $34,805,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $29,574,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for safety net awards
for districts with demonstrated needs for special education funding
beyond the amounts provided in subsection (4) of this section. If the
federal safety net awards based on the federal eligibility threshold
exceed the federal appropriation in this subsection (7) in any fiscal
year, the superintendent shall expend all available federal
discretionary funds necessary to meet this need. At the conclusion of
each school year, the superintendent shall recover safety net funds
that were distributed prospectively but for which districts were not
subsequently eligible.
(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, safety net funds
shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee as
provided in section 109(1) chapter 548, Laws of 2009 (ESHB 2261).
(b) From July 1, 2011 to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
operate the safety net oversight committee and shall award safety net
funds as provided in section 507, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as amended
through section 1406 of this act.
(8) A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund--state appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1
full-time equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and
medical center. This amount is in lieu of money provided through the
home and hospital allocation and the special education program.
(9) The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal
flow-through to school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other
purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.
(10) A school district may carry over from one year to the next
year up to 10 percent of the general fund--state funds allocated under
this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special
education program.
(11) $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $251,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for two additional full-time
equivalent staff to support the work of the safety net committee and to
provide training and support to districts applying for safety net
awards.
(12) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013, and $100,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
shall be expended to support a special education ombudsman program
within the office of superintendent of public instruction.

Sec. 507 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR EDUCATIONAL SERVICE
DISTRICTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,889,000))
$7,894,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,904,000))
$7,388,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,793,000))
$15,282,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The educational service districts shall continue to furnish
financial services required by the superintendent of public instruction
and RCW 28A.310.190 (3) and (4).
(2) Funding within this section is provided for regional
professional development related to mathematics and science curriculum
and instructional strategies. Funding shall be distributed among the
educational service districts in the same proportion as distributions
in the 2007-2009 biennium. Each educational service district shall use
this funding solely for salary and benefits for a certificated
instructional staff with expertise in the appropriate subject matter
and in professional development delivery, and for travel, materials,
and other expenditures related to providing regional professional
development support.
(3) The educational service districts, at the request of the state
board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.310.010 and 28A.310.340, may
receive and screen applications for school accreditation, conduct
school accreditation site visits pursuant to state board of education
rules, and submit to the state board of education post-site visit
recommendations for school accreditation. The educational service
districts may assess a cooperative service fee to recover actual plus
reasonable indirect costs for the purposes of this subsection.

Sec. 508 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR LOCAL EFFORT
ASSISTANCE
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($300,761,000))
$300,768,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($299,276,000))
$298,166,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($600,037,000))
$603,334,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the
increase per full-time equivalent student is 3 percent from the 2010-11
school year to the 2011-12 school year and 5 percent from the 2011-12
school year to the 2012-13 school year.

Sec. 509 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,507,000))
$16,694,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,969,000))
$15,867,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($34,476,000))
$32,561,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund--state fiscal year appropriation includes
such funds as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the
fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2) State funding provided under this section is based on salaries
and other expenditures for a 220-day school year. The superintendent
of public instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans
for institutional education programs to ensure that districts plan for
a full-time summer program.
(3) State funding for each institutional education program shall be
based on the institution's annual average full-time equivalent student
enrollment. Staffing ratios for each category of institution shall
remain the same as those funded in the 1995-97 biennium.
(4) The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles
age 18 or less in department of corrections facilities shall be the
same as those provided in the 1997-99 biennium.
(5) (($669,000)) $585,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 and (($669,000)) $549,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to
maintain at least one certificated instructional staff and related
support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is not
sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated
instructional staff to furnish the educational program. The following
types of institutions are included: Residential programs under the
department of social and health services for developmentally disabled
juveniles, programs for juveniles under the department of corrections,
programs for juveniles under the juvenile rehabilitation
administration, and programs for juveniles operated by city and county
jails.
(6) Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be
carried over from one year to the next.

Sec. 510 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,759,000))
$8,745,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,842,000))
$8,773,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,601,000))
$17,518,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school district programs for highly capable
students as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(c). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following: (i)
Additional instruction of 2.1590 hours per week per funded highly
capable program student; (ii) fifteen highly capable program students
per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900
instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the district's average staff
mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this
act.
(b) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts programs for highly capable
students as provided in section 511, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1409 of this act.
(3) $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $85,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the centrum program at Fort
Worden state park.

Sec. 511 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--EDUCATION REFORM
PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,078,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($98,309,000))
$72,279,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $219,161,000
General Fund--Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,598,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($381,146,000))
$355,116,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $40,822,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $41,613,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, $1,350,000 of the education legacy trust
account--state appropriation, and $15,868,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for development and
implementation of the Washington state assessment system, including:
(a) Development and implementation of retake assessments for high
school students who are not successful in one or more content areas and
(b) development and implementation of alternative assessments or
appeals procedures to implement the certificate of academic
achievement. The superintendent of public instruction shall report
quarterly on the progress on development and implementation of
alternative assessments or appeals procedures. Within these amounts,
the superintendent of public instruction shall contract for the early
return of 10th grade student assessment results, on or around June 10th
of each year. State funding shall be limited to one collection of
evidence payment per student, per content-area assessment.
(2) $356,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $356,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the Washington state
leadership and assistance for science education reform (LASER) regional
partnership activities coordinated at the Pacific science center,
including instructional material purchases, teacher and principal
professional development, and school and community engagement events.
(3) $980,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $980,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for improving technology
infrastructure, monitoring and reporting on school district technology
development, promoting standards for school district technology,
promoting statewide coordination and planning for technology
development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.
(4) $3,852,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,624,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for continued implementation of
chapter 235, Laws of 2010 (education reform) including development of
new performance-based evaluation systems for certificated educators.
(5)(a) (($40,681,000)) $21,555,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for the following
bonuses for teachers who hold valid, unexpired certification from the
national board for professional teaching standards and who are teaching
in a Washington public school, subject to the following conditions and
limitations:
(i) For national board certified teachers, a bonus of (($5,090))
$2,500 per teacher in the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, adjusted
for inflation in each school year in which Initiative 732 cost of
living adjustments are provided;
(ii) An additional $5,000 annual bonus shall be paid to national
board certified teachers who teach in either: (A) High schools where
at least 50 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for
federal free or reduced price lunch, (B) middle schools where at least
60 percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free
or reduced price lunch, or (C) elementary schools where at least 70
percent of student headcount enrollment is eligible for federal free or
reduced price lunch;
(iii) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
ensure that national board certified teachers meet the qualifications
for bonuses under (a)(ii) of this subsection for less than one full
school year receive bonuses in a pro-rated manner. Beginning in the
2011-12 school year, all bonuses in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection
will be paid in July of each school year. Bonuses in (a)(((i) and))
(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced by a factor of 40 percent for
first year NBPTS certified teachers, to reflect the portion of the
instructional school year they are certified; and
(iv) During the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, and within
available funds, certificated instructional staff who have met the
eligibility requirements and have applied for certification from the
national board for professional teaching standards may receive a
conditional loan of two thousand dollars or the amount set by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction to contribute toward
the current assessment fee, not including the initial up-front
candidacy payment. The fee shall be an advance on the first annual
bonus under RCW 28A.405.415. The conditional loan is provided in
addition to compensation received under a district's salary schedule
and shall not be included in calculations of a district's average
salary and associated salary limitation under RCW 28A.400.200.
Recipients who fail to receive certification after three years are
required to repay the conditional loan. The office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to define the
terms for initial grant of the assessment fee and repayment, including
applicable fees. To the extent necessary, the superintendent may use
revenues from the repayment of conditional loan scholarships to ensure
payment of all national board bonus payments required by this section
in each school year.
(6) $477,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $477,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the leadership internship
program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.
(7) $950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $950,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the Washington reading
corps. The superintendent shall allocate reading corps members to low-performing schools and school districts that are implementing
comprehensive, proven, research-based reading programs. Two or more
schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.
(8) $810,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $810,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the development of a
leadership academy for school principals and administrators. The
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an independent
organization to design, field test, and implement a state-of-the-art
education leadership academy that will be accessible throughout the
state. Initial development of the content of the academy activities
shall be supported by private funds. Semiannually the independent
organization shall report on amounts committed by foundations and
others to support the development and implementation of this program.
Leadership academy partners shall include the state level organizations
for school administrators and principals, the superintendent of public
instruction, the professional educator standards board, and others as
the independent organization shall identify.
(9) $3,234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $3,234,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for grants to school
districts to provide a continuum of care for children and families to
help children become ready to learn. Grant proposals from school
districts shall contain local plans designed collaboratively with
community service providers. If a continuum of care program exists in
the area in which the school district is located, the local plan shall
provide for coordination with existing programs to the greatest extent
possible.
(10) $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for the implementation of
chapter 288, Laws of 2011 (actual student success program), including
allocations to the opportunity internship program, the jobs for
America's graduates program, the building bridges program, services
provided by a college scholarship organization. Funding shall not be
used in the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium to provide awards for schools and
school districts.
(11) $859,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, (($846,000)) $720,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $248,000 of the education
legacy trust account--state appropriation are for administrative
support of education reform programs.
(12) $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $2,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for a statewide information
technology (IT) academy program. This public-private partnership will
provide educational software, as well as IT certification and software
training opportunities for students and staff in public schools.
(13) $977,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $977,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for secondary career and
technical education grants pursuant to chapter 170, Laws of 2008. If
equally matched by private donations, $300,000 of the 2012
appropriation and $300,000 of the 2013 appropriation shall be used to
support FIRST robotics programs.
(14) $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for (a) staff at the office
of the superintendent of public instruction to coordinate and promote
efforts to develop integrated math, science, technology, and
engineering programs in schools and districts across the state; and (b)
grants of $2,500 to provide twenty middle and high school teachers each
year with professional development training for implementing integrated
math, science, technology, and engineering programs in their schools.
(15) $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $135,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for science, technology,
engineering and mathematics lighthouse projects((, consistent with
chapter 238, Laws of 2010)).
(16) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 ((and $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are)) is provided solely for a beginning educator
support program. School districts and/or regional consortia may apply
for grant funding. The superintendent shall implement this program in
5 to 15 school districts and/or regional consortia. The program
provided by a district and/or regional consortia shall include: A paid
orientation; assignment of a qualified mentor; development of a
professional growth plan for each beginning teacher aligned with
professional certification; release time for mentors and new teachers
to work together; and teacher observation time with accomplished peers.
$250,000 may be used to provide statewide professional development
opportunities for mentors and beginning educators.
(17) $5,767,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely pursuant to Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5895 (certificated employee evaluations). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec. 512 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($79,496,000))
$79,575,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($82,856,000))
$80,666,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $71,001,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($233,353,000))
$231,242,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds
as are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year
and for prior fiscal year adjustments.
(2)(a) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual
programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages:
(i) Additional instruction of 4.7780 hours per week per transitional
bilingual program student; (ii) fifteen transitional bilingual program
students per teacher; (iii) 36 instructional weeks per year; (iv) 900
instructional hours per teacher; and (v) the district's average staff
mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of this
act.
(b) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent shall
allocate funding to school districts for transitional bilingual
instruction programs as provided in section 514, chapter 564, Laws of
2009, as amended through section 1411 of this act.
(c) The allocations in this section reflect the implementation of
a new funding formula for the transitional bilingual instructional
program, effective September 1, 2011, as specified in RCW
28A.150.260(10)(b).
(3) The superintendent may withhold allocations to school districts
in subsection (2) of this section solely for the central provision of
assessments as provided in RCW 28A.180.090 (1) and (2) up to the
following amounts: 2.79 percent for school year 2011-12 and ((2.09))
2.11 percent for school year 2012-13.
(4) The general fund--federal appropriation in this section is for
migrant education under Title I Part C and English language
acquisition, and language enhancement grants under Title III of the
elementary and secondary education act.
(5)(a) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
implement a funding model for the transitional bilingual program,
beginning in school year 2012-13, that is scaled to provide more
support to students requiring most intensive intervention, (students
with beginning levels of English language proficiency) and less support
to students requiring less intervention. The funding model shall also
provide up to two years of ((bonus)) additional funding upon successful
exit from the bilingual program to facilitate successful transition to
a standard program of education, except for students that successfully
exit the bilingual program prior to grade two. This additional funding
shall begin in school year 2013-14 with students achieving proficiency
in school year 2012-13 and transitioning to a standard program of
education for school year 2013-14. The amount of the additional
funding shall be established in the biennial omnibus budget.
(b) It is expected that per-pupil funding for all students served
in kindergarten and grade one will be the same as would have been
necessary to maintain the statewide average prior to establishing
differential per-pupil amounts. For all other students served in the
program, it is expected that level 2 proficiency will be set at ((the
same)) a level ((as would have been provided)) that represents the
median funding level necessary to maintain the statewide average prior
to establishing differential per-pupil amounts; ((level 1 will be 125
percent of level 2; level 3 through the level prior to exit will be 75
percent of level 2; and two bonus years upon successful demonstration
of proficiency will be 100 percent of level 2)) levels 1 and 3 shall be
set such that level 1 is substantially greater than level 2, and level
3 is substantially less; each of the two years of additional per-pupil
funding is expected to be equivalent to level 2. Total funding in
aggregate for all levels for the 2012-13 school year is equivalent to
what total funding in aggregate would have been prior to the
application of differential per-pupil amounts. For school year 2012-13
when funds are not yet distributed for proficient students exiting the
program, auxiliary funds shall be provided in a similarly differential
distribution, such that total program allocations are not less than
what total program allocations would have been prior to establishing
differential per-pupil amounts. Prior to implementing in school year
2012-13, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide to the senate and house of representatives ways and means
committees recommended rates based on the results of proficiency test
procurement, expressed as both per- pupil rates and hours of
instruction as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(b).
(c) Each bilingual student shall be tested for proficiency level
and, therefore, eligibility for the transitional bilingual program each
year. The ((bonus)) additional payments for up to two school years
following successful exit from the transitional bilingual program, for
students in grades two through twelve, shall be allocated to the
((exiting)) school district in which the student is enrolled. If the
student graduates or ((transfers to another district prior to the
district receiving both years' bonuses)) or otherwise leaves the
system, the district shall receive the ((bonus)) additional payments
for only the length of time the student remains enrolled in the
((exiting)) district.
(d) ((The quality education council shall examine the revised
funding model developed under this subsection and provide a report to
the education and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 1,
2011, that includes recommendations for:
(i) Changing the prototypical school funding formula for the
transitional bilingual program to align with the revised model in an
accurate and transparent manner;
(ii) Reconciling the revised model with statutory requirements for
categorical funding of the transitional bilingual instructional program
that is restricted to students eligible for and enrolled in that
program;
(iii) Clarifying the elements of the transitional bilingual
instructional program that fall under the definition of basic education
and the impact of the revised model on them; and
(iv) The extent that the disparate financial impact of the revised
model on different school districts should be addressed and options for
addressing it.
(e))) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
report to the senate and house of representatives ways and means
committees and education committees annually by December 31st of each
year, through 2018, regarding any measurable changes in proficiency,
time-in-program, and transition experience.
(6) $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to track current and former
transitional bilingual program students.

Sec. 513 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION--FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($102,470,000))
$102,619,000
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($103,666,000))
$104,789,000
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $492,207,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,980,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($746,323,000))
$747,595,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The general fund--state appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(a) The appropriations include such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal
year adjustments.
(b)(i) For the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance
programs as provided in RCW 28A.150.260(10)(a). In calculating the
allocations, the superintendent shall assume the following averages:
(A) Additional instruction of 1.51560 hours per week per funded
learning assistance program student; (B) fifteen learning assistance
program students per teacher; (C) 36 instructional weeks per year; (D)
900 instructional hours per teacher; and (E) the district's average
staff mix and compensation rates as provided in sections 503 and 504 of
this act.
(ii) From July 1, 2011, to August 31, 2011, the superintendent
shall allocate funding to school districts for learning assistance
programs as provided in section 515, chapter 564, Laws of 2009, as
amended through section 1412 of this act.
(c) A school district's funded students for the learning assistance
program shall be the sum of the district's full-time equivalent
enrollment in grades K-12 for the prior school year multiplied by the
district's percentage of October headcount enrollment in grades K-12
eligible for free or reduced price lunch in the prior school year.
(2) Allocations made pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
shall be adjusted to reflect ineligible applications identified through
the annual income verification process required by the national school
lunch program, as recommended in the report of the state auditor on the
learning assistance program dated February, 2010.
(3) The general fund--federal appropriation in this section is
provided for Title I Part A allocations of the no child left behind act
of 2001.
(4) A school district may carry over from one year to the next up
to 10 percent of the general fund-state or education legacy trust funds
allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be
expended for the learning assistance program.
(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
research and recommend options for an adjustment factor for middle
school and high school free and reduced price lunch eligibility
reporting rates pursuant to RCW 28A.150.260(12)(a), and submit a report
to the fiscal committees of the legislature by June 1, 2012. For the
2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the adjustment factor is 1.0.

Sec. 514 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
(1) Amounts distributed to districts by the superintendent through
part V of this act are for allocations purposes only and do not entitle
a particular district, district employee, or student to a specific
service, beyond what has been expressly provided in statute. Part V of
this act restates the requirements of various sections of Title 28A
RCW. If any conflict exists, the provisions of Title 28A RCW control
unless this act explicitly states that it is providing an enhancement.
Any amounts provided in part V of this act in excess of the amounts
required by Title 28A RCW provided in statute, are not within the
program of basic education.
(2) To the maximum extent practicable, when adopting new or revised
rules or policies relating to the administration of allocations in part
V of this act that result in fiscal impact, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall attempt to seek legislative
approval through the budget request process.
(3) Appropriations made in this act to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall initially be allotted as
required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as
expressly provided in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The appropriations to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction in this act shall be expended for the programs and
amounts specified in this act. However, after May 1, 2012, unless
specifically prohibited by this act and after approval by the director
of financial management, the superintendent of public instruction may
transfer state general fund appropriations for fiscal year 2012 among
the following programs to meet the apportionment schedule for a
specified formula in another of these programs: General apportionment;
employee compensation adjustments; pupil transportation; special
education programs; institutional education programs; transitional
bilingual programs; and learning assistance programs.
(5) The director of financial management shall notify the
appropriate legislative fiscal committees in writing prior to approving
any allotment modifications or transfers under this section.

(End of part)

PART VI
HIGHER EDUCATION
Sec. 601 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($533,009,000))
$532,975,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($525,644,000))
$512,491,000
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,037,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $95,370,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,162,060,000))
$1,148,873,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $28,761,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $28,761,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely as special funds for training and
related support services, including financial aid, as specified in RCW
28C.04.390. Funding is provided to support at least 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in fiscal year 2012 and at least 6,200 full-time
equivalent students in fiscal year 2013.
(2) $2,725,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $2,725,000 of the general fund -- state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for administration and customized
training contracts through the job skills program. The state board
shall make an annual report by January 1st of each year to the governor
and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature
regarding implementation of this section, listing the scope of grant
awards, the distribution of funds by educational sector and region of
the state, and the results of the partnerships supported by these
funds.
(3) $4,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $4,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 is provided solely for worker retraining.
(4) Of the amounts appropriated in this section, $5,000,000 is
provided solely for the student achievement initiative.
(5) When implementing the appropriations in this section, the state
board and the trustees of the individual community and technical
colleges shall minimize impact on academic programs, maximize
reductions in administration, and shall at least maintain, and endeavor
to increase, enrollment opportunities and degree and certificate
production in high employer-demand fields of study at their academic
year 2008-09 levels.
(6) Community and technical colleges are not required to send mass
mailings of course catalogs to residents of their districts. Community
and technical colleges shall consider lower cost alternatives, such as
mailing postcards or brochures that direct individuals to online
information and other ways of acquiring print catalogs.
(7) Bellevue college is authorized to offer applied baccalaureate
degrees in information technology, health care services and management,
biotechnology, and preprofessional preparation for medical fields.
These degrees shall be directed at high school graduates and transfer-oriented degree and professional and technical degree holders. In
fiscal year 2012, Bellevue college will develop a two-year plan for
offering these new degrees. The plan will assume funding for these new
degrees shall come through redistribution of its current per full-time
enrollment funding. The plan shall be delivered to the legislature by
June 30, 2012.
(8) The Seattle community college district is authorized to offer
applied baccalaureate degree programs in business/international
business and technology management, interactive and artistic digital
media, sustainability, building science technology, and allied and
global health. These degrees shall be directed at high school
graduates and professional and technical degree holders. In fiscal
year 2012, Seattle community colleges shall develop a two-year plan for
offering these new degrees. The plan will assume that funding for
these new degrees comes through redistribution of its current per full-time enrollment funding. The plan shall be delivered to the
legislature by June 30, 2012.

Sec. 602 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 602 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($201,388,000))
$200,943,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($206,358,000))
$193,444,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,579,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account--
State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000
State Toxics Control Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
Biotoxin Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $450,000
Accident Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,699,000
Medical Aid Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,502,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($439,976,000))
$433,117,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and regents shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the development of integrated
medical curriculum for the Washington/Wyoming/Alaska/Montana/Idaho
(WWAMI) medical education program in Spokane and eastern Washington.
Funding is contingent on appropriations being provided to Washington
State University for WWAMI program expansion in Spokane and eastern
Washington.
(3) $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $52,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the center for international
trade in forest products in the college of forest resources.
(4) $88,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided solely for implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5485 (state's natural resources). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2011, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.
(5) $143,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $144,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the ongoing management of the
Washington park arboretum.
(6) $3,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for an expansion in engineering
enrollments.
(7) $1,500,000 of the economic development strategic reserve
account--state appropriation is provided solely to implement Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5982 (aerospace technology center). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.
(8) $242,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6406 (state's natural resources). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 603 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($134,512,000))
$133,994,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($136,087,000))
$126,313,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $33,065,000
State Toxics Control Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($303,664,000))
$298,372,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and regents shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) Within available funds, Washington State University shall serve
an additional cohort of fifteen full-time equivalent students in the
mechanical engineering program located at Olympic College.
(3) $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $300,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the expansion of health
sciences capacity through the Washington/Wyoming/Alaska/Montana/Idaho
(WWAMI) medical education program in Spokane and eastern Washington.
Funding is contingent on appropriations being provided to the
University of Washington for integrated medical curriculum development
for WWAMI.
(4) $3,800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for an expansion in engineering
enrollments.
(5) $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington State
University extension energy program to conduct a study of densified
biomass as a renewable fuel used for heating homes, businesses, and
other facilities. A report of the findings shall be submitted to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by December
1, 2012.

Sec. 604 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,257,000))
$26,255,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,541,000))
$25,774,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,087,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($68,885,000))
$68,116,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) At least $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012 and at least $200,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013 shall be expended on the Northwest
autism center.

Sec. 605 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,468,000))
$23,277,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,525,000))
$22,611,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $19,076,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($64,069,000))
$64,964,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In implementing the appropriations in this
section, the president and governing board shall seek to minimize
impacts on student services and instructional programs by maximizing
reductions in administration and other noninstructional activities.

Sec. 606 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,595,000))
$15,594,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,339,000))
$15,022,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,450,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,384,000))
$36,066,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In implementing the appropriations in this section, the
president and governing board shall seek to minimize impacts on student
services and instructional programs by maximizing reductions in
administration and other noninstructional activities.
(2) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the Washington state institute
for public policy to conduct a detailed study of the commitment of
sexually violent predators to the special commitment center pursuant to
chapter 71.09 RCW and the subsequent release of those persons to
less-restrictive alternatives.
(a) Specifically, the institute's study shall examine:
(i) The projected future demand for the special commitment center,
including profiles and characteristics of persons referred and
committed to the special commitment center since its inception, whether
the profiles of those persons have changed over time, and, given
current trends, the likelihood of the continuing rate of referral;
(ii) Residents' participation in treatment over time and the impact
of treatment on eventual release to a less-restrictive alternative;
(iii) The annual review process and the process for a committed
person to petition for conditional or unconditional release,
specifically:
(A) The time frames for conducting mandatory reviews;
(B) The role of the special commitment center clinical team;
(C) Options and standards utilized by other jurisdictions or
similar processes to conduct periodic reviews, including specialized
courts, parole boards, independent review boards, and other commitment
proceedings;
(iv) The capacity and future demand for appropriate less
restrictive alternatives for moving residents out of the special
commitment center, including:
(A) The capacity and demand for secure community transition
facilities;
(B) Options for specialized populations such as the elderly or
those with developmental disabilities and whether more cost-efficient
options might be used to house those populations while keeping the
public safe;
(C) Prospects for moving residents to noninstitutionalized settings
beyond a secure community transition facility.
(b) The department of social and health services shall cooperate
with the institute in conducting its examination and must provide the
institute with requested data and records in a timely manner.
(c) The institute shall provide a status report to the governor and
the legislature no later than November 1, 2011, with a final report due
no later than November 1, 2012.
(3) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely for the institute for public
policy to provide research support to the council on quality education.
(4) To the extent federal or private funding is available for this
purpose, the Washington state institute for public policy and the
center for reinventing public education at the University of Washington
shall examine the relationship between participation in pension systems
and teacher quality and mobility patterns in the state. The department
of retirement systems shall facilitate researchers' access to necessary
individual-level data necessary to effectively conduct the study. The
researchers shall ensure that no individually identifiable information
will be disclosed at any time. An interim report on project findings
shall be completed by November 15, 2010, and a final report shall be
submitted to the governor and to the relevant committees of the
legislature by October 15, 2011.
(5) Funding provided in this section is sufficient for The
Evergreen State College to continue operations of the Longhouse Center
and the Northwest Indian applied research institute.
(6) If, and to the extent that private funding is available for
this purpose, the Washington state institute for public policy shall
study and report on the child welfare and educational characteristics
and outcomes for foster youth who are served by educational advocates.
The department of social and health services and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall facilitate researchers'
access to data necessary to effectively complete the study. The
institute shall submit an interim report with baseline characteristics
of youth served by educational advocates by December 2011 and a final
report by October 31, 2012, to the governor and to the appropriate
committees of the legislature.
(7) $75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 is provided to the Washington state institute for public
policy (WSIPP) to conduct a review of state investments in the family
caregiver and support program. Funding for this program is provided by
assumed savings from diverting seniors from entering into long-term
care medicaid placements by supporting informal caregivers. WSIPP
shall work with the department of social and health services to
establish and review outcome data for this investment. A preliminary
report on the outcomes of the investment into this program is due to
the appropriate legislative committees by December 15, 2011, and a
final report is due to the appropriate legislative committees by August
30, 2012.
(8) $17,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No.
6492 (competency to stand trial). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec. 607 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,754,000))
$33,664,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($33,743,000))
$32,104,000
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,266,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($80,763,000))
$79,034,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: In implementing the appropriations in this
section, the president and governing board shall seek to minimize
impacts on student services and instructional programs by maximizing
reductions in administration and other noninstructional activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608 COUNCIL FOR HIGHER EDUCATION
2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 610 (uncodified) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 614
(uncodified) are repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 609 OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE
2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 611 (uncodified) and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 615
(uncodified) are repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 610 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL--POLICY COORDINATION
AND ADMINISTRATION
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,973,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,377,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,350,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The office of the student achievement council is authorized to
increase or establish fees for initial degree authorization, degree
authorization renewal, degree authorization reapplication, new program
applications, and new site applications pursuant to RCW 28B.85.060.
(2) $1,043,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6232 (higher education coordination). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 611 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL--OFFICE OF STUDENT
FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $245,989,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,816,000
Washington Opportunity Pathways Account--State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $73,500,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $325,305,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $237,018,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $73,500,000 of the opportunity pathways account--state appropriation are provided solely for student financial aid
payments under the state need grant and the state work study programs
including up to a four percent administrative allowance for the state
work study program.
(2) Within the funds appropriated in this section, eligibility for
the state need grant shall include students with family incomes at or
below 70 percent of the state median family income (MFI), adjusted for
family size, and shall include students enrolled in three to five
credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits.
The office of student financial assistance shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2013, regarding the number of students
enrolled in three to five credit-bearing quarter credits, or the
equivalent semester credits, and their academic progress including
degree completion. Awards for all students shall be adjusted by the
estimated amount by which Pell grant increases exceed projected
increases in the noninstructional costs of attendance. Awards for
students with incomes between 51 and 70 percent of the state median
shall be prorated at the following percentages of the award amount
granted to those with incomes below 51 percent of the MFI: 70 percent
for students with family incomes between 51 and 55 percent MFI; 65
percent for students with family incomes between 56 and 60 percent MFI;
60 percent for students with family incomes between 61 and 65 percent
MFI; and 50 percent for students with family incomes between 66 and 70
percent MFI. For the 2012-13 academic year, awards for eligible
students attending for-profit institutions of higher education shall
not be subject to a fifty percent reduction.
(3) $1,250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for implementation of the aerospace
training scholarship and student loan program as specified in Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1846 (aerospace student loans). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.
(4) For fiscal year 2013, the board shall defer loan or conditional
scholarship repayments to the future teachers conditional scholarship
and loan repayment program for up to one year for each participant if
the participant has shown evidence of efforts to find a teaching job
but has been unable to secure a teaching job per the requirements of
the program.
(5) $1,000,000 of the education legacy trust account--state
appropriation is provided solely for the gaining early awareness and
readiness for undergraduate programs project.
(6) $500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the leadership 1000 program.
(7) $2,436,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2013 is provided solely for the passport to college program. The
maximum scholarship award shall be $5,000. The board shall contract
with a nonprofit organization to provide support services to increase
student completion in their postsecondary program and shall, under this
contract, provide a minimum of $500,000 in fiscal year 2013 for this
purpose.

Sec. 612 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 616 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,382,000))
$1,274,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,388,000))
$1,280,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $62,758,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($65,528,000))
$65,312,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium the
board shall not designate recipients of the Washington award for
vocational excellence or recognize them at award ceremonies as provided
in RCW 28C.04.535.

Sec. 613 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,571,000))
$25,244,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,558,000))
$25,265,000
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($261,753,000))
$279,884,000
Home Visiting Services Account--Federal
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Opportunity Pathways Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $80,000,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($396,882,000))
$410,593,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $16,028,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012, $16,028,000 of the general fund--state appropriation of
fiscal year 2013, $80,000,000 of the opportunity pathways account
appropriation, and $2,256,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for the early childhood education
assistance program services. Of these amounts, $10,284,000 is a
portion of the biennial amount of state maintenance of effort dollars
required to receive federal child care and development fund grant
dollars.
(2) In accordance to RCW 43.215.255(2) and 43.135.055, the
department is authorized to increase child care center and child care
family home licensure fees in fiscal years 2012 and 2013 for costs to
the department for the licensure activity, including costs of necessary
inspection. These increases are necessary to support expenditures
authorized in this section.
(3) (($638,000)) $64,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012 ((and)), $638,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $574,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for child care resource and
referral network services.
(4) (($200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2012 and $200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013 are provided solely to develop and provide culturally
relevant supports for parents, family, and other caregivers.
(5))) The department is the lead agency for and recipient of the
federal child care and development fund grant. Amounts within this
grant shall be used to fund child care licensing, quality initiatives,
agency administration, and other costs associated with child care
subsidies. The department shall transfer a portion of this grant to
the department of social and health services to fund the child care
subsidies paid by the department of social and health services on
behalf of the department of early learning.
(((6))) (5) The appropriations in this section reflect reductions
in the appropriations for the department's administrative expenses. It
is the intent of the legislature that these reductions shall be
achieved, to the greatest extent possible, by reducing those
administrative costs that do not affect direct client services or
direct service delivery or program.
(((7))) (6) $934,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2012, $934,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2013, and $2,400,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for expenditure into the home
visiting services account. This funding is intended to meet federal
maintenance of effort requirements and to secure private matching
funds.
(a) All federal funds received by the department for home visiting
activities must be deposited into the home visiting services account.
(b) The department must consult with stakeholders during the
development of the Washington home visiting plan and any future
proposals for federal funding.
(c) $200,000 of the home visiting services account--federal
appropriation is provided solely for program administration pursuant to
RCW 43.215.130. No other funds may be expended for that purpose.
(((8))) (7) In addition to groups that were given prioritized
access to the working connections child care program effective March 1,
2011, the department shall also give prioritized access into the
program to families in which a parent of a child in care is a minor who
is not living with a parent or guardian and who is a full-time student
in a high school that has a school-sponsored on-site child care center.
(((9))) (8) Within available amounts, the department in
consultation with the office of financial management and the department
of social and health services shall report quarterly enrollments and
active caseload for the working connections child care program to the
legislative fiscal committees. The report shall also identify the
number of cases participating in both temporary assistance for needy
families and working connections child care.
(((10))) (9) $2,522,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2012, $2,522,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2013, and $4,304,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the medicaid
treatment child care (MTCC) program. The department shall contract for
MTCC services to provide therapeutic child care and other specialized
treatment services to abused, neglected, at-risk, and/or drug-affected
children. Priority for services shall be given to children referred
from the department of social and health services children's
administration. In addition to referrals made by children's
administration, the department shall authorize services for children
referred to the MTCC program, as long as the children meet the
eligibility requirements as outlined in the Washington state plan for
the MTCC program. Of the amounts appropriated in this subsection,
$60,000 per fiscal year may be used by the department for administering
the MTCC program, if needed.

Sec. 614 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,782,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,749,000))
$5,461,000
((General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,961,000))
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($13,492,000))
$11,243,000

((The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $271,000 of the general fund--private/local appropriation is provided solely for the school for the
blind to offer short course programs, allowing students the opportunity
to leave their home schools for short periods and receive intensive
training. The school for the blind shall provide this service to the
extent that it is funded by contracts with school districts and
educational services districts.))

Sec. 615 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING
LOSS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,449,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,446,000))
$8,041,000
((General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $526,000))
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($17,421,000))
$16,490,000

(End of part)

PART VII
SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 701 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT
LIMIT
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($919,198,000))
$911,643,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($967,749,000))
$950,740,000
State Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,866,000
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $121,000
Hood Canal Aquatic Rehabilitation Bond Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $90,000
Gardner-Evans Higher Education Construction
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $13,000
Debt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retire Account -- State
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,300,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,893,341,000))
$1,868,777,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriations are for
expenditure into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account.
The entire general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year 2012 shall
be expended into the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account by
June 30, 2012.

Sec. 702 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING
BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO
BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($27,516,000))
$27,400,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($30,758,000))
$30,572,000
Nondebt-Limit Reimbursable Bond Retirement
Account -- State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $140,128,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($198,402,000))
$198,100,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The general fund appropriation is for
expenditure into the nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement
account. The entire general fund -- state appropriation for fiscal year
2012 shall be expended into the nondebt-limit general fund bond
retirement account by June 30, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 703 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--REVISED EMPLOYER HEALTH
BENEFIT RATES
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($32,946,000)
General Fund--Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($4,720,000)
General Fund--Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($518,000)
Education Legacy Trust Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($178,000)
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($7,684,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($46,046,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Appropriations are adjusted to reflect
changes to appropriations to reflect the change in the employer funding
rate providing employee health and insurance coverage for fiscal year
2013 from $850 to $800 per estimated eligible employee per month. The
office of financial management shall update agency appropriations
schedules to reflect the changes in funding levels in this section as
identified by agency and fund in LEAP document H-HB1 dated February 17,
2012. From the applicable accounts, the office of financial management
shall adjust allotments to the respective agencies by an amount that
conforms with funding adjustments enacted in the 2012 supplemental
omnibus operating appropriations act. Any allotment reductions under
this section must be placed in reserve status and remain unexpended.

Sec. 704 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS -- CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS
(1) The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement
officers' and firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a
monthly basis beginning July 1, 2011, consistent with chapter 41.45
RCW, and the appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement
systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent with chapters
2.10 and 2.12 RCW.
(((1))) (2) The contribution rates adopted under RCW 41.45.0604 and
41.26.720 for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters'
retirement system plan 2 are hereby modified. The following
contribution rates will be in effect for the law enforcement officers'
and firefighters' retirement system plan 2:
(a) Beginning March 1, 2012, a member contribution rate of 6.53
percent will be charged;
(b) Beginning March 1, 2012, an employer contribution rate of 3.92
percent will be charged; and
(c) Beginning March 1, 2012, a state contribution rate of 2.61
percent will be charged.
These contribution rates will be in effect through June 30, 2013.
(3) There is appropriated for state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($54,547,000))
$50,405,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($56,729,000))
$43,809,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($111,276,000))
$94,214,000

(((2))) (4) There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial
retirement system:
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,100,000
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,100,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . $18,200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,150,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the disaster response account.

Sec. 706 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 715 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE
COSTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($591,000))
$1,102,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The director of financial management shall
distribute (($338,000)) $501,000 to Franklin county, $128,000 to
Jefferson county, ((and)) $125,000 to Okanogan county, $161,000 to
Yakima county, and $187,000 to King county for extraordinary criminal
justice costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 707 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--EDUCATION LEGACY TRUST ACCOUNT
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
expenditure into the education legacy trust account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 708 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--ARROW COMMISSION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6345 (agency
reallocation and realignment of Washington commission). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 2012, the appropriation in this section shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 709 CENTRAL SERVICE EFFICIENCIES
2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 705 (uncodified) is repealed.

Sec. 710 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 707 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--PERSONNEL SERVICES
((From appropriations to state agencies for the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, the office of financial management shall reduce general
fund--state allotments by $9,537,000 for fiscal year 2013 to reflect
reduced billings and related charges to client agencies for central
personnel services, pursuant to allotment schedules prepared by the
office of financial management. The allotment reductions under this
section shall be placed in unallotted status and remain unexpended.))
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($745,000)
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($763,000)
Other Appropriated Funds . . . . . . . . . . . . ($1,176,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($2,684,000)

The appropriations in this section are solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:
(1) Appropriations are adjusted to reflect adjustments in funding
for charges associated with a personnel services rate reduction.
(2) The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriation schedules to reflect the changes to funding levels in
this section as identified by agency and in the amounts specified in
LEAP Document GLP-2012 dated February 18, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 711 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES--DISTRIBUTION OF EXCESS FUNDS
FROM THE FOREST DEVELOPMENT ACCOUNT
Forest Development Account--State Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

The appropriation in this section is provided solely for
distribution of state forest land revenues to taxing authorities that
received such revenue from fiscal year 2002 through fiscal year 2011
and is subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1) Within fifteen days of the effective date of this section, the
department shall transmit funds in the amounts specified in subsection
(3) of this section to the county treasurers of the counties receiving
the funds.
(2) The county treasurers of the counties listed in this section
shall distribute funds received from this appropriation to taxing
authorities in proportion to the state forest transfer land funds
distributed to the taxing authorities based on information available
for the fiscal years 2002 through 2011. Funds to be credited to the
state of Washington and funds credited to school district general
levies shall be remitted to the state of Washington within thirty days
after the effective date of this section for deposit into the state
general fund.
(3) Funds shall be distributed in the following amounts:

Clallam $848,854

Clark $630,368

Cowlitz $418,159

Grays Harbor $266,365

Jefferson $239,722

King $328,725

Kitsap $73,839

Klickitat $197,968

Lewis $887,679

Mason $425,935

Okanogan $4

Pacific $352,540

Pierce $334,179

Skagit $1,534,497

Skamania $66,648

Snohomish $1,565,549

Stevens $6,709

Thurston $783,735

Wahkiakum $285,339

Whatcom $753,186

Total $10,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 712 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CENTRAL SERVICE CHARGES
ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($702,000)
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($1,410,000)
Other Appropriated Funds . . . . . . . . . . . . ($3,222,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($5,334,000)

The appropriations in this section are solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:
(1) Appropriations are adjusted to reflect adjustments in funding
for charges associated with central services.
(2) The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriation schedules to reflect the changes to funding levels in
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 713 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--AUDIT SERVICES ADJUSTMENTS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($169,000)
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($341,000)
Other Appropriated Funds . . . . . . . . . . . . $208,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($302,000)

The appropriations in this section are solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:
(1) Appropriations are adjusted to reflect adjustments in funding
for charges associated with audit services.
(2) The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriation schedules to reflect the changes to funding levels in
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 714 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--LEGAL SERVICES REDUCTION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($896,000)
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($1,805,000)
Other Appropriated Funds . . . . . . . . . . . . ($4,918,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($7,619,000)

The appropriations in this section are solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:
(1) Appropriations are adjusted to reflect savings associated with
a reduction in expenditures related to legal services.
(2) The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriation schedules to reflect the changes to funding levels in
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 715 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--ARCHIVE SERVICES REDUCTION
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($110,000)
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($229,000)
Other Appropriated Funds . . . . . . . . . . . . ($244,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($583,000)

The appropriations in this section are solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:
(1) Appropriations are adjusted to reflect savings associated with
a reduction in expenditures related to archive services.
(2) The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriation schedules to reflect the changes to funding levels in
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 716 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CENTRAL SERVICE SAVINGS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($62,000)
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($127,000)
Other Appropriated Funds . . . . . . . . . . . . ($207,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($396,000)

The appropriations in this section are solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:
(1) Appropriations are adjusted to reflect savings associated with
a reduction in billing to various state agencies for central services.
(2) The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriation schedules to reflect the changes to funding levels in
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 717 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--CENTRAL SERVICE REDUCTIONS
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2012) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($894,000)
General Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($3,586,000)
Other Appropriated Funds . . . . . . . . . . . . ($3,295,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($7,775,000)

The appropriations in this section are solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:
(1) Appropriations are adjusted to reflect savings associated with
a reduction to various state agencies for central services pursuant to
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6607.
(2) The office of financial management shall update agency
appropriation schedules to reflect the changes to funding levels in
this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 718 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR SUNDRY CLAIMS
The following sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary, are
appropriated from the general fund, unless otherwise indicated, for
relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for sundry
claims. These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved
by the director of financial management, except as otherwise provided,
for reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of
self-defense, pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110, as follows:

(1) Clint L. Powell, Jr., claim number 99970048 . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,155.10
(2) Chance L. Hawkins, claim number 99970049 . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,838.95
(3) Edgar L. Hawkins, claim number 99970050 . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,507.00
(4) James Abbott, claim number 99970051 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,880.00
(5) Richard Frisk, claim number 99970052 . . . . . . . . . . . . $32,788.50
(6) Brian Barnd-Spjut, claim number 99970053 . . . . . . . . . . . . $122,821.79

NEW SECTION. Sec. 719 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--STATE AGENCY RETIREMENT SYSTEM
CONTRIBUTIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($44,301,000)
General Fund -- Federal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($10,049,000)
General Fund -- Private/Local Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($1,038,000)
Dedicated Funds and Accounts Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . ($49,989,000)
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . ($105,377,000)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriations in this section are provided solely to
reduce agency and institution appropriations to reflect reduced pension
contributions. The office of financial management shall allocate the
moneys appropriated in this section in the amounts specified and adjust
appropriation schedules accordingly. The office of financial
management shall make any further allotment adjustments necessary to
reflect agency mergers or consolidations assumed in this act. The
allotment reductions under this section shall be placed in unallotted
status and remain unexpended.
(2) The appropriations in this section reflect reduced retirement
system contributions resulting from the provisions of Senate Bill No.
6378 (reforming the state retirement plans). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amounts provided in this section shall
lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 720 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--SCHOOL DISTRICT RETIREMENT
SYSTEM CONTRIBUTIONS
General Fund -- State Appropriation (FY 2013) . . . . . . . . . . . . ($88,699,000)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for
adjustments to allocations to school districts to reflect reduced
retirement system contributions resulting from the provisions of Senate
Bill No. 6378 (reforming the state retirement plans). The office of
financial management shall reduce allotments for the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by these amounts. The allotment
reductions under this section shall be placed in unallotted status and
remain unexpended.
(2) The appropriation in this section reflects reduced retirement
system contributions resulting from the provisions of Senate Bill No.
6378 (reforming the state retirement plans). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2012, the amount provided in this section shall
lapse.

(End of part)

PART VIII
OTHER TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 801 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION
General Fund Appropriation for fire insurance
premium distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,368,000))
$8,289,000
General Fund Appropriation for public utility
district excise tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,418,000))
$44,078,000
General Fund Appropriation for prosecuting
attorney distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,281,000
General Fund Appropriation for boating safety
and education distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
General Fund Appropriation for other tax distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $58,000
General Fund Appropriation for habitat conservation
program distributions . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000
Death Investigations Account Appropriation for
distribution to counties for publicly funded
autopsies . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,960,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation for
harbor improvement revenue distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . $160,000
Timber Tax Distribution Account Appropriation for
distribution to "timber" counties . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,421,000))
$58,229,000
County Criminal Justice Assistance Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,801,000))
$69,566,000
Municipal Criminal Justice Assistance
Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($26,950,000))
$26,843,000
City-County Assistance Account Appropriation for local
government financial assistance distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,589,000))
$12,159,000
Liquor Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor
excise tax distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($52,152,000))
$25,617,000
Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Mitigation Account
Appropriation for distribution to local taxing
jurisdictions to mitigate the unintended revenue
redistribution effect of the sourcing law
changes . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,635,000))
$49,309,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation for
the Confederated Tribes of the Colville
Reservation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,441,000))
$7,478,000
Columbia River Water Delivery Account Appropriation for
the Spokane Tribe of Indians . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,748,000))
$4,794,000
Liquor Revolving Account Appropriation for liquor
profits distribution . . . . . . . . . . . . (($69,318,000))
$86,878,000
TOTAL APPROPRIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . (($411,301,000))
$409,699,000

The total expenditures from the state treasury under the
appropriations in this section shall not exceed the funds available
under statutory distributions for the stated purposes.

Sec. 802 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- FOR THE COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE
ACCOUNT
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,501,000))
$2,439,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This funding is provided to counties
for the costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including,
but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving
penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998
(DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock
violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication
levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter
215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 803 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT
Impaired Driver Safety Account Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,666,000))
$1,626,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The amount appropriated in this section
shall be distributed quarterly during the 2011-2013 biennium to all
cities ratably based on population as last determined by the office of
financial management. The distributions to any city that substantially
decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1, 1990, and
that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in
which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not
limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties);
chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998
(deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations);
chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215,
Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

Sec. 804 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read
as follows:
FOR THE STATE TREASURER -- TRANSFERS
State Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $16,300,000
for fiscal year 2012 and (($21,300,000))
$24,800,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($37,600,000))
$41,100,000
Waste Reduction, Recycling, and Litter Control
Account: For transfer to the state general
fund, (($3,500,000)) $4,847,000 for fiscal year
2012 and (($3,500,000)) $4,847,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,000,000))
$9,694,000
Aquatics Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to
the state general fund, $3,500,000 for fiscal
year 2012 and $3,500,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000
Savings Incentive Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $44,618,000 for fiscal year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $44,618,000
Distinguished Professorship Trust Fund: For transfer to
the state general fund for fiscal year 2012, an amount
not to exceed the actual cash balance of the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,024,000
Washington Graduate Fellowship Trust Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2012, an
amount not to exceed the actual cash balance of
the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,028,000
College Faculty Awards Trust Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund for fiscal year 2012, an amount
not to exceed the actual cash balance of the fund . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,996,000
Data Processing Revolving Account: For transfer
to the state general fund, $5,960,000 for fiscal
year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,960,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account: For transfer to
the drinking water assistance repayment account . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,000,000
Economic Development Strategic Reserve Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $2,100,000
for fiscal year 2012 and $2,100,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,200,000
General Fund: For transfer to the streamlined sales
and use tax account, (($24,846,000)) $24,520,000
for fiscal year 2012 and $24,789,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,635,000))
$49,309,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
water pollution control revolving account,
$7,750,000 for fiscal year 2012 and $7,750,000 for
fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,500,000
The Charitable, Educational, Penal, and Reformatory
Institutions Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $4,500,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$4,500,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,000,000
Thurston County Capital Facilities Account: For
transfer to the state general fund, $4,000,000
for fiscal year 2012 and $4,000,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
drinking water assistance account, $10,000,000 for
fiscal year 2012 and $5,000,000 for fiscal year
2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $15,000,000
Liquor Control Board Construction and Maintenance
Account: For transfer to the state general fund,
$500,000 for fiscal year 2012 ((and $500,000 for
fiscal year 2013)) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,000,000))
$500,000
Education Savings Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $54,431,000 for fiscal year 2012
and (($22,500,000)) $92,411,000 for fiscal
year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($76,931,000))
$146,842,000
Department of Retirement Systems Expense Account:
For transfer to the state general fund, (($250,000))
$2,330,000 for fiscal year 2012 and (($250,000))
$2,330,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($500,000))
$4,660,000
Education Construction Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $102,000,000 for fiscal year
2012 and $102,000,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $204,000,000
Public Works Assistance Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $25,000,000 for fiscal year 2012
and $25,000,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,000,000
Foster Care Endowed Scholarship Trust Fund: For transfer
to the state general fund, $200,000 for fiscal year
2012 and $200,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000
Affordable Housing For All Account: For transfer to
the home security fund, $1,000,000 for fiscal year
2012 and $1,000,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, in an amount not to exceed the actual
amount of the annual base payment to the tobacco
settlement account . . . . . . . . . . . . $158,205,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the basic
health plan stabilization account from the amounts
deposited in the account that are attributable to the
annual strategic contribution payment received in
fiscal year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $22,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the basic
health plan stabilization account from the amounts
deposited in the account that are attributable to the
annual strategic contribution payment received in
fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,000,000))
$27,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
the actual remaining amount of the annual strategic
contribution payment to the tobacco settlement account
for fiscal year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,000,000
Tobacco Settlement Account: For transfer to the life
sciences discovery fund, in an amount not to exceed
the actual remaining amount of the annual strategic
contribution payment to the tobacco settlement account
for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,000,000))
$1,000,000

The transfer to the life sciences discovery fund is subject to the
following conditions: All new grants awarded during the 2011-2013
fiscal biennium shall support and accelerate the commercialization of
an identifiable product.
Coastal Protection Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $500,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$500,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000
Water Quality Capital Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $157,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $157,000
Oyster Reserve Land Account: For transfer to the state
general fund, $58,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$58,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $116,000
State Nursery Revolving Account: For transfer to the
state general fund, $250,000 for fiscal year 2012 and
$250,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account: For transfer to
the marine resources stewardship trust account,
$2,400,000 for fiscal year 2013. However, if
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6263 (marine
planning) is not enacted by June 30, 2012, then
the transfer shall not occur . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,400,000
Financial Services Regulation Fund: For transfer to
the state general fund, $4,000,000 for fiscal
year 2012 . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,000,000
Local Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the state
toxics control account, $23,300,000 for fiscal
year 2012 and $23,300,000 for fiscal year 2013 . . . . . . . . . . . . $46,600,000

(End of part)

PART IX
MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 901 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 910 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2012--TERMS AND
CONDITIONS
For fiscal year 2012, no agreements have been reached between the
governor and the following unions: Washington public employees
association, Washington public employees association higher education
community college coalition, Washington federation of state employees
higher education community college coalition, Washington federation of
state employees Central Washington University, Washington federation of
state employees Western Washington University, Washington federation of
state employees The Evergreen State College, and public school
employees Western Washington University, under the provisions of
chapter 41.80 RCW ((for the 2011-2013 biennium)) for fiscal year 2012.
Appropriations in this act provide funding to continue the terms and
conditions of the 2009-2011 general government and higher education
agreements negotiated by the office of financial management's labor
relations office under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for fiscal
year 2012. For fiscal year 2012, appropriations have been reduced in
an amount equal to a 3 percent salary reduction for all represented
employees whose monthly full-time equivalent salary is $2,500 or more
per month. This reduction will be implemented according to the terms
and conditions of the 2009-2011 agreements. ((For fiscal year 2013,
funding is reduced to reflect a 3.0 percent temporary salary reduction
for all employees whose monthly full-time equivalent salary is $2,500
or more per month through June 29, 2013. Effective June 30, 2013, the
salary schedules effective July 1, 2009, through June 30, 2011, will be
reinstated. For employees entitled to leave, temporary salary
reduction leave is granted for fiscal year 2013. These changes will be
implemented according to law.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 902 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--FISCAL YEAR 2013--WPEA, WPEA CC
COALITION, WFSE CC COALITION, WFSE CWU, WFSE TESC
Agreements have been reached between the governor and the following
unions: Washington public employees association, Washington public
employees association higher education community college coalition,
Washington federation of state employees higher education community
college coalition, Washington federation of state employees Central
Washington University, and Washington federation of state employees The
Evergreen State College, under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for
fiscal year 2013. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, funding is reduced to reflect a 3.0 percent temporary salary
reduction for all employees whose monthly full-time equivalent salary
is $2,500 or more per month through June 29, 2013. Effective June 30,
2013, the salary schedules effective July 1, 2009, through June 30,
2011, will be reinstated. For employees entitled to leave, temporary
salary reduction leave is granted for fiscal year 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 903 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--FISCAL YEAR 2013--YAKIMA VALLEY
COMMUNITY COLLEGE--WASHINGTON PUBLIC EMPLOYEES ASSOCIATION
An agreement has been reached between Yakima Valley Community
College and Washington public employees association under the
provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for fiscal year 2013. The agreement is
consistent with the funding reduction provided in the 2011-2013 omnibus
appropriations act, which reflected a 3.0 percent temporary salary
reduction to all employees whose monthly full-time equivalent salary is
$2,500 or more per month through June 29, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 904 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--FISCAL YEAR 2013--WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY--PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEES OF WASHINGTON
An agreement has been reached between Western Washington University
and the Washington public school employees of Washington bargaining
units D and PTE under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for fiscal
year 2013. The agreement is consistent with the funding reduction
provided in the 2011-2013 omnibus appropriations act, which reflected
a 3.0 percent temporary salary reduction to all employees whose monthly
full-time equivalent salary is $2,500 or more per month through June
29, 2013. The reduction will be implemented according to the terms and
conditions of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 905 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--FISCAL YEAR 2013--WESTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY--WFSE
An agreement has been reached between Western Washington University
and the Washington federation of state employees bargaining units A, B,
and E under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW for fiscal year 2013.
The agreement is consistent with the funding reduction provided in the
2011-2013 omnibus appropriations act, which reflected a 3.0 percent
temporary salary reduction to all employees whose monthly full-time
equivalent salary is $2,500 or more per month through June 29, 2013.
The reduction will be implemented according to the terms and conditions
of this agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 906 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 50 (uncodified) to read as follows:
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT--FISCAL YEAR 2013--EASTERN WASHINGTON
UNIVERSITY--WFSE
An agreement has been reached between Eastern Washington University
and the Washington federation of state employees under the provisions
of chapter 41.80 RCW for fiscal year 2013. The agreement is consistent
with the funding reduction provided in the 2011-2013 omnibus
appropriations act, which reflected a 3.0 percent temporary salary
reduction to all employees whose monthly full-time equivalent salary is
$2,500 or more per month through June 29, 2013. The reduction will be
implemented according to the terms and conditions of this agreement.

Sec. 907 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 920 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
COMPENSATION--NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS
Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for
nonrepresented state employee health benefits for state agencies,
including institutions of higher education, and are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $850 per eligible employee for
fiscal year 2012. For fiscal year 2013 the monthly employer funding
rate shall not exceed (($850)) $800 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or
make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2012 and 2013, the subsidy shall be
$150.00 per month.
(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $66.01 per month beginning
September 1, 2011, and (($67.91)) $65.17 beginning September 1, 2012;
(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $66.01 each month beginning September 1, 2011, and
(($67.91)) $65.17 beginning September 1, 2012, prorated by the
proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time
employee that the part-time employee receives. The remittance
requirements specified in this subsection shall not apply to employees
of a technical college, school district, or educational service
district who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the
health care authority.

Sec. 908 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 921 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE
BENEFITS
Appropriations for state agencies in this act are sufficient for
represented employees outside the super coalition for health benefits,
and are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $850 per eligible employee for
fiscal year 2012. For fiscal year 2013 the monthly employer funding
rate shall not exceed (($850)) $800 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or
make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2012 and 2013, the subsidy shall be
$150.00 per month.
(3) Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service
districts shall remit to the health care authority for deposit into the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account established in RCW
41.05.120 the following amounts:
(a) For each full-time employee, $66.01 per month beginning
September 1, 2011, and (($67.91)) $65.17 beginning September 1, 2012;
(b) For each part-time employee, who at the time of the remittance
is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or
41.40.010 and is eligible for employer fringe benefit contributions for
basic benefits, $66.01 each month beginning September 1, 2011, and
(($67.91)) $65.17 beginning September 1, 2012, prorated by the
proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time
employee that the part-time employee receives. The remittance
requirements specified in this subsection shall not apply to employees
of a technical college, school district, or educational service
district who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the
health care authority.

Sec. 909 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 922 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
COMPENSATION--REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE
BENEFITS
The collective bargaining agreement negotiated with the super
coalition under chapter 41.80 RCW includes employer premiums at 85
percent of the total weighted average of the projected health care
premiums across all plans and tiers. Appropriations in this act for
state agencies, including institutions of higher education are
sufficient to fund state employees health benefits for employees
represented by the super coalition on health benefits, and are subject
to the following conditions and limitations:
(1)(a) The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit
premiums, public employees' benefits board administration, and the
uniform medical plan, shall not exceed $850 per eligible employee for
fiscal year 2012. For fiscal year 2013 the monthly employer funding
rate shall not exceed (($850)) $800 per eligible employee.
(b) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board shall require any or all
of the following: Employee premium copayments, increases in point-of-service cost sharing, the implementation of managed competition, or
make other changes to benefits consistent with RCW 41.05.065.
(c) The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on
behalf of the uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on
prescription drugs, audits of hospitals, subrogation payments, or any
other moneys recovered as a result of prior uniform medical plan claims
payments, into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account to
be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts shall not be used for
administrative expenditures.
(2) The health care authority, subject to the approval of the
public employees' benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health
benefit premiums to eligible retired or disabled public employees and
school district employees who are eligible for medicare, pursuant to
RCW 41.05.085. For calendar years 2012 and 2013, the subsidy shall be
$150.00 per month.

Sec. 910 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 10 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning in the 2011-12 academic year, reductions or increases
in full-time tuition fees shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act for resident undergraduate students at community and
technical colleges. The governing boards of the state universities,
regional universities, and The Evergreen State College; and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including nonresident students, summer school students, and students in
other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition may exceed the fiscal growth factor. Except during the
2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the state board for community and technical
colleges may pilot or institute differential tuition models. The board
may define scale, scope, and rationale for the models.
(3)(a) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year and through the end
of the 2014-15 academic year, the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State
College may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. Except for resident undergraduate
students during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, reductions or increases
may be made for all or portions of an institution's programs, campuses,
courses, or students.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Governing boards shall be required to
provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial
aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of
attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the state board for community and technical college system shall
consult with existing student associations or organizations with
undergraduate student representation regarding the impacts of potential
tuition increases. The state board for community and technical
colleges shall provide data regarding the percentage of students
receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of
total costs of attendance paid for by aid.
(4) Beginning with the 2015-16 academic year through the 2018-19
academic year, the governing boards of the state universities, regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College may set tuition for
resident undergraduates as follows:
(a) If state funding for a college or university falls below the
state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year 2011,
the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in (d) of
this subsection, reduce enrollments, or both;
(b) If state funding for a college or university is at least at the
level of state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year
2011, the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in
(d) of this subsection and shall continue to at least maintain the
actual enrollment levels for fiscal year 2011 or increase enrollments
as required in the omnibus appropriations act; ((and))
(c) If state funding is increased so that combined with resident
undergraduate tuition the sixtieth percentile of the total per-student
funding at similar public institutions of higher education in the
global challenge states under RCW 28B.15.068 is exceeded, the governing
board shall decrease tuition by the amount needed for the total per-student funding to be at the sixtieth percentile under RCW 28B.15.068;
and
(d) The amount of tuition set by the governing board for an
institution under this subsection (4) may not exceed the sixtieth
percentile of the resident undergraduate tuition of similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement program
through an interlocal agreement between a school district and a
community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through
28A.175.110.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose
of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8) Beginning in the 2019-20 academic year, reductions or increases
in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduates at four-year
institutions of higher education shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(9) The legislative advisory committee to the committee on advanced
tuition payment established in RCW 28B.95.170 shall:
(a) Review the impact of differential tuition rates on the funded
status and future unit price of the Washington advanced college tuition
payment program; and
(b) No later than January 14, 2013, make a recommendation to the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature regarding
how differential tuition should be addressed in order to maintain the
ongoing solvency of the Washington advanced college tuition payment
program.

Sec. 911 RCW 2.68.020 and 2009 c 564 s 1802 and 2009 c 564 s 918
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
There is created an account in the custody of the state treasurer
to be known as the judicial information system account. The
administrative office of the courts shall maintain and administer the
account, in which shall be deposited all moneys received from in-state
noncourt users and any out-of-state users of the judicial information
system and moneys as specified in RCW 2.68.040 for the purposes of
providing judicial information system access to noncourt users and
providing an adequate level of automated services to the judiciary.
The legislature shall appropriate the funds in the account for the
purposes of the judicial information system. The account shall be used
for the acquisition of equipment, software, supplies, services, and
other costs incidental to the acquisition, development, operation, and
administration of information services, telecommunications, systems,
software, supplies, and equipment, including the payment of principal
and interest on items paid in installments. ((During the 2007-2009
fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the judicial
information system account to the state general fund such amounts as
reflect the excess fund balance of the account.)) During the ((2009-2011)) 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may ((transfer))
appropriate from the judicial information system account to the state
((general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
account)) law library.

Sec. 912 RCW 41.05.120 and 2005 c 518 s 921 and 2005 c 143 s 3
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The public employees' and retirees' insurance account is hereby
established in the custody of the state treasurer, to be used by the
administrator for the deposit of contributions, the remittance paid by
school districts and educational service districts under RCW
28A.400.410, reserves, dividends, and refunds, for payment of premiums
for employee and retiree insurance benefit contracts and subsidy
amounts provided under RCW 41.05.085, and transfers from the
((medical)) flexible spending administrative account as authorized in
RCW 41.05.123. Moneys from the account shall be disbursed by the state
treasurer by warrants on vouchers duly authorized by the administrator.
Moneys from the account may be transferred to the medical flexible
spending account to provide reserves and start-up costs for the
operation of the medical flexible spending account program.
(2) The state treasurer and the state investment board may invest
moneys in the public employees' and retirees' insurance account. All
such investments shall be in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 or
43.84.150, whichever is applicable. The administrator shall determine
whether the state treasurer or the state investment board or both shall
invest moneys in the public employees' insurance account.
(3) During the 2005-07 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the public employees' and retirees' insurance account
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.
(4) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, moneys in the public
employees' and retirees' insurance account may be lent to the school
employees' insurance administrative account as directed by the
legislature.

Sec. 913 RCW 43.30.720 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 938 are each
amended to read as follows:
All receipts from the sale of stock or seed shall be deposited in
a state forest nursery revolving fund to be maintained by the
department, which is hereby authorized to use all money in said fund
for the maintenance of the state tree nursery or the planting of
denuded state owned lands.
During the ((2003-2005)) 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the state forest nursery revolving fund to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
fund.

Sec. 914 RCW 43.320.110 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 934 are each
amended to read as follows:
There is created a local fund known as the "financial services
regulation fund" which shall consist of all moneys received by the
divisions of the department of financial institutions, except for the
division of securities which shall deposit thirteen percent of all
moneys received, except as provided in RCW 43.320.115, and which shall
be used for the purchase of supplies and necessary equipment; the
payment of salaries, wages, and utilities; the establishment of
reserves; and other incidental costs required for the proper regulation
of individuals and entities subject to regulation by the department.
The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund. Disbursements
from the fund shall be on authorization of the director of financial
institutions or the director's designee. In order to maintain an
effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be subject in
all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to
permit expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.
During the ((2009-2011)) 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature
may transfer from the financial services regulation fund to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the
fund.

Sec. 915 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 964 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship;
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150;
(xiii) During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, shoreline
update technical assistance;
(xiv) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, multijurisdictional
permitting teams; ((and))
(xv) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, actions for reducing
public exposure to toxic air pollution; and
(xvi) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the University of
Washington college of environment and Washington State University
college of agriculture, human, and natural resources.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Remedial actions;
(ii) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(iii) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(iv) Funds for a program to assist in the assessment and cleanup of
sites of methamphetamine production, but not to be used for the initial
containment of such sites, consistent with the responsibilities and
intent of RCW 69.50.511; and
(v) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment.
(b) Funds for plans and programs shall be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW, except that any applicant that
is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, along with any
project that is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget
Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, shall, except as conditioned by
RCW 70.105D.120, receive priority for any available funding for any
grant or funding programs or sources that use a competitive bidding
process. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account
may also be used for grants to local governments to retrofit public
sector diesel equipment and for storm water planning and implementation
activities.
(c) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department shall
partner with local communities and liable parties for cleanups. The
department is authorized to use the following additional strategies in
order to ensure a healthful environment for future generations:
(i) The director may alter grant-matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational, or habitat restoration opportunities that would
not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of vacant, orphaned, or abandoned property under RCW
70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;
(ii) The use of outside contracts to conduct necessary studies;
(iii) The purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance, when
necessary to expedite multiparty clean-up efforts.
(d) To facilitate and expedite cleanups using funds from the local
toxics control account, during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium the
director may establish grant-funded accounts to hold and disperse local
toxics control account funds and funds from local governments to be
used for remedial actions.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) Except during the ((2009-2011)) 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, one
percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local toxics control
accounts shall be allocated only for public participation grants to
persons who may be adversely affected by a release or threatened
release of a hazardous substance and to not-for-profit public interest
organizations. The primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate
the participation by persons and organizations in the investigation and
remedying of releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances
and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management
priorities. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be
renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from
either account which are not expended at the close of any biennium
shall revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation, or, after January 1,
2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound,
funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the
action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2007-2009 and 2009-2011 fiscal biennia, the
legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to
either the state general fund or the oil spill prevention account, or
both such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the account.
(9) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control
account may also be used for a standby rescue tug at Neah Bay, local
government shoreline update grants, private and public sector diesel
equipment retrofit, and oil spill prevention, preparedness, and
response activities.
(10) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state toxics control account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.
(11) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control
account may also be used for local government shoreline update grants
and actions for reducing public exposure to toxic air pollution.

Sec. 916 RCW 70.146.100 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 37 s 948 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The water quality capital account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the water quality capital account may be spent
only after appropriation.
(2) Expenditures from the water quality capital account may only be
used: (a) To make grants or loans to public bodies, including grants
to public bodies as cost-sharing moneys in any case where federal,
local, or other moneys are made available on a cost-sharing basis, for
the capital component of water pollution control facilities and
activities; (b) for purposes of assisting a public body to obtain an
ownership interest in water pollution control facilities; or (c) to
defray any part of the capital component of the payments made by a
public body to a service provider under a service agreement entered
into under RCW 70.150.060. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the water quality capital account to the
state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of
the account. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the water quality capital account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

Sec. 917 RCW 76.04.610 and 2007 c 110 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) If any owner of forest land within a forest protection zone
neglects or fails to provide adequate fire protection as required by
RCW 76.04.600, the department shall provide such protection and shall
annually impose the following assessments on each parcel of such land:
(i) A flat fee assessment of seventeen dollars and fifty cents; and
(ii) twenty-seven cents on each acre exceeding fifty acres.
(b) Assessors may, at their option, collect the assessment on tax
exempt lands. If the assessor elects not to collect the assessment,
the department may bill the landowner directly.
(2) An owner who has paid assessments on two or more parcels, each
containing fewer than fifty acres and each within the same county, may
obtain the following refund:
(a) If all the parcels together contain less than fifty acres, then
the refund is equal to the flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the
total of (i) seventeen dollars and (ii) the total of the amounts
retained by the county from such assessments under subsection (5) of
this section.
(b) If all the parcels together contain fifty or more acres, then
the refund is equal to the flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the
total of (i) seventeen dollars, (ii) twenty-seven cents for each acre
exceeding fifty acres, and (iii) the total of the amounts retained by
the county from such assessments under subsection (5) of this section.
Applications for refunds shall be submitted to the department on a
form prescribed by the department and in the same year in which the
assessments were paid. The department may not provide refunds to
applicants who do not provide verification that all assessments and
property taxes on the property have been paid. Applications may be
made by mail.
In addition to the procedures under this subsection, property
owners with multiple parcels in a single county who qualify for a
refund under this section may apply to the department on an application
listing all the parcels owned in order to have the assessment computed
on all parcels but billed to a single parcel. Property owners with the
following number of parcels may apply to the department in the year
indicated:

Year Number of Parcels

2002 10 or more parcels

2003 8 or more parcels

2004 and thereafter 6 or more parcels

The department must compute the correct assessment and allocate one
parcel in the county to use to collect the assessment. The county must
then bill the forest fire protection assessment on that one allocated
identified parcel. The landowner is responsible for notifying the
department of any changes in parcel ownership.
(3) Beginning January 1, 1991, under the administration and at the
discretion of the department up to two hundred thousand dollars per
year of this assessment shall be used in support of those rural fire
districts assisting the department in fire protection services on
forest lands.
(4) For the purpose of this chapter, the department may divide the
forest lands of the state, or any part thereof, into districts, for
fire protection and assessment purposes, may classify lands according
to the character of timber prevailing, and the fire hazard existing,
and place unprotected lands under the administration of the proper
district. Amounts paid or contracted to be paid by the department for
protection of forest lands from funds at its disposal shall be a lien
upon the property protected, unless reimbursed by the owner within ten
days after October 1st of the year in which they were incurred. The
department shall be prepared to make statement thereof, upon request,
to a forest owner whose own protection has not been previously approved
as to its adequacy, the department shall report the same to the
assessor of the county in which the property is situated. The assessor
shall extend the amounts upon the tax rolls covering the property, and
upon authorization from the department shall levy the forest protection
assessment against the amounts of unimproved land as shown in each
ownership on the county assessor's records. The assessor may then
segregate on the records to provide that the improved land and
improvements thereon carry the millage levy designed to support the
rural fire protection districts as provided for in RCW 52.16.170.
(5) The amounts assessed shall be collected at the time, in the
same manner, by the same procedure, and with the same penalties
attached that general state and county taxes on the same property are
collected, except that errors in assessments may be corrected at any
time by the department certifying them to the treasurer of the county
in which the land involved is situated. Assessments shall be known and
designated as assessments of the year in which the amounts became
reimbursable. Upon the collection of assessments the county treasurer
shall place fifty cents of the total assessments paid on a parcel for
fire protection into the county current expense fund to defray the
costs of listing, billing, and collecting these assessments. The
treasurer shall then transmit the balance to the department.
Collections shall be applied against expenses incurred in carrying out
the provisions of this section, including necessary and reasonable
administrative costs incurred by the department in the enforcement of
these provisions. The department may also expend sums collected from
owners of forest lands or received from any other source for necessary
administrative costs in connection with the enforcement of RCW
76.04.660.
(6) When land against which forest protection assessments are
outstanding is acquired for delinquent taxes and sold at public
auction, the state shall have a prior lien on the proceeds of sale over
and above the amount necessary to satisfy the county's delinquent tax
judgment. The county treasurer, in case the proceeds of sale exceed
the amount of the delinquent tax judgment, shall immediately remit to
the department the amount of the outstanding forest protection
assessments.
(7) All nonfederal public bodies owning or administering forest
land included in a forest protection zone shall pay the forest
protection assessments provided in this section and the special forest
fire suppression account assessments under RCW 76.04.630. The forest
protection assessments and special forest fire suppression account
assessments shall be payable by nonfederal public bodies from available
funds within thirty days following receipt of the written notice from
the department which is given after October 1st of the year in which
the protection was provided. Unpaid assessments are not a lien against
the nonfederal publicly owned land but shall constitute a debt by the
nonfederal public body to the department and are subject to interest
charges at the legal rate. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the
forest fire protection assessment account may be used by the office of
financial management to contract for analysis and recommendations to
improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the state's mechanisms for
funding fire prevention and suppression activities.
(8) A public body, having failed to previously pay the forest
protection assessments required of it by this section, which fails to
suppress a fire on or originating from forest lands owned or
administered by it, is liable for the costs of suppression incurred by
the department or its agent and is not entitled to reimbursement of
costs incurred by the public body in the suppression activities.
(9) The department may adopt rules to implement this section,
including, but not limited to, rules on levying and collecting forest
protection assessments.

Sec. 918 RCW 77.12.201 and 2009 c 479 s 63 are each amended to
read as follows:
The legislative authority of a county may elect, by giving written
notice to the director and the treasurer prior to January 1st of any
year, to obtain for the following year an amount in lieu of real
property taxes on game lands as provided in RCW 77.12.203. Upon the
election, the county shall keep a record of all fines, forfeitures,
reimbursements, and costs assessed and collected, in whole or in part,
under this title for violations of law or rules adopted pursuant to
this title, with the exception of the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, and
shall monthly remit an amount equal to the amount collected to the
state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund. The election
shall continue until the department is notified differently prior to
January 1st of any year.

Sec. 919 RCW 77.12.203 and 2005 c 303 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section and
notwithstanding RCW 84.36.010 or other statutes to the contrary, the
director shall pay by April 30th of each year on game lands in each
county, if requested by an election under RCW 77.12.201, an amount in
lieu of real property taxes equal to that amount paid on similar
parcels of open space land taxable under chapter 84.34 RCW or the
greater of seventy cents per acre per year or the amount paid in 1984
plus an additional amount for control of noxious weeds equal to that
which would be paid if such lands were privately owned. This amount
shall not be assessed or paid on department buildings, structures,
facilities, game farms, fish hatcheries, tidelands, or public fishing
areas of less than one hundred acres.
(2) "Game lands," as used in this section and RCW 77.12.201, means
those tracts one hundred acres or larger owned in fee by the department
and used for wildlife habitat and public recreational purposes. All
lands purchased for wildlife habitat, public access or recreation
purposes with federal funds in the Snake River drainage basin shall be
considered game lands regardless of acreage.
(3) This section shall not apply to lands transferred after April
23, 1990, to the department from other state agencies.
(4) The county shall distribute the amount received under this
section in lieu of real property taxes to all property taxing districts
except the state in appropriate tax code areas the same way it would
distribute local property taxes from private property. The county
shall distribute the amount received under this section for weed
control to the appropriate weed district.
(5) For the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the director shall pay by
April 30th of each year on game lands in each county, if requested by
an election under RCW 77.12.201, an amount in lieu of real property
taxes and shall be distributed as follows:

County

Adams . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,909

Asotin . . . . . . . . . . . . 36,123

Chelan . . . . . . . . . . . . 24,757

Columbia . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,795

Ferry . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,781

Garfield . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,840

Grant . . . . . . . . . . . . 37,443

Grays Harbor . . . . . . . . . . . . 7,264

Kittitas . . . . . . . . . . . . 143,974

Klickitat . . . . . . . . . . . . 21,906

Lincoln . . . . . . . . . . . . 13,535

Okanogan . . . . . . . . . . . . 151,402

Pend Oreille . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,309

Yakima . . . . . . . . . . . . 126,225

These amounts shall not be assessed or paid on department buildings,
structures, facilities, game farms, fish hatcheries, tidelands, or
public fishing areas of less than one hundred acres.

Sec. 920 RCW 77.95.090 and 2009 c 340 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The dedicated regional fisheries enhancement group account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the commission or
the commission's designee may authorize expenditures from the account.
The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
A portion of each recreational fishing license fee shall be used as
provided in RCW 77.32.440. A surcharge of one hundred dollars shall be
collected on each commercial salmon fishery license, each salmon
delivery license, and each salmon charter license sold in the state.
All receipts shall be placed in the regional fisheries enhancement
group account and shall be used exclusively for regional fisheries
enhancement group projects for the purposes of RCW 77.95.110. For the
2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the regional fisheries enhancement group
account may be used for the purposes of RCW 77.95.070 and hatcheries.
Except as provided in RCW 77.95.320, funds from the regional fisheries
enhancement group account shall not serve as replacement funding for
department operated salmon projects that exist on January 1, 1991.
All revenue from the department's sale of salmon carcasses and eggs
that return to group facilities shall be deposited in the regional
fisheries enhancement group account for use by the regional fisheries
enhancement group that produced the surplus. The commission shall
adopt rules to implement this section pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 921 RCW 79.22.010 and 2003 c 334 s 205 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department has the power to accept gifts and bequests of
money or other property, made in its own name, or made in the name of
the state, to promote generally the interests of reforestation or for
a specific named purpose in connection with reforestation, and to
acquire in the name of the state, by purchase or gift, any lands which
by reason of their location, topography, or geological formation, are
chiefly valuable for purpose of developing and growing timber, and to
designate such lands and any lands of the same character belonging to
the state as state forest lands; and may acquire by gift or purchase
any lands of the same character.
(2) The department has the power to seed, plant, and develop
forests on any lands, purchased, acquired, or designated by it as state
forest lands, and shall furnish such care and fire protection for such
lands as it shall deem advisable.
(3) Upon approval of the board of county commissioners of the
county in which the land is located such gift or donation of land may
be accepted subject to delinquent general taxes thereon, and upon such
acceptance of such gift or donation subject to such taxes, the
department shall record the deed of conveyance thereof and file with
the assessor and treasurer of the county wherein such land is situated,
written notice of acquisition of such land, and that all delinquent
general taxes thereon, except state taxes, shall be canceled, and the
county treasurer shall thereupon proceed to make such cancellation in
the records of the county treasurer. ((Thereafter, such lands))
(4)(a) Lands acquired under this section shall be held in trust,
protected, managed, and administered upon, and the proceeds therefrom
disposed of, under RCW 79.22.040.
(b) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate moneys derived subject to this section from the forest
development account consistent with RCW 79.64.100(4).

Sec. 922 RCW 79.22.040 and 2003 c 334 s 206 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If any land acquired by a county through foreclosure of tax
liens, or otherwise, comes within the classification of land described
in RCW 79.22.010 and can be used as state forest land and if the
department deems such land necessary for the purposes of this chapter,
the county shall, upon demand by the department, deed such land to the
department and the land shall become a part of the state forest lands.
(2) Such land shall be held in trust and administered and protected
by the department in the same manner as other state forest lands.
(3)(a) In the event that the department sells logs using the
contract harvesting process described in RCW 79.15.500 through
79.15.530, the moneys derived subject to this section are the net
proceeds from the contract harvesting sale.
(b) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
appropriate moneys derived subject to this section from the forest
development account consistent with RCW 79.64.100(4).

Sec. 923 RCW 79.64.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 966 and 2011 c
216 s 16 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall determine the amount deemed necessary in order
to achieve the purposes of this chapter and shall provide by rule for
the deduction of this amount from the moneys received from all leases,
sales, contracts, licenses, permits, easements, and rights-of-way
issued by the department and affecting state lands, community forest
trust lands, and aquatic lands, provided that no deduction shall be
made from the proceeds from agricultural college lands.
(2) Moneys received as deposits from successful bidders, advance
payments, and security under RCW 79.15.100, 79.15.080, and 79.11.150
prior to December 1, 1981, which have not been subjected to deduction
under this section are not subject to deduction under this section.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (4) and (6) of this
section, the deductions authorized under this section shall not exceed
twenty-five percent of the moneys received by the department in
connection with any one transaction pertaining to state lands and
aquatic lands other than second-class tide and shore lands and the beds
of navigable waters, and fifty percent of the moneys received by the
department pertaining to second-class tide and shore lands and the beds
of navigable waters.
(4) Deductions authorized under this section for transactions
pertaining to community forest trust lands must be established at a
level sufficient to defray over time the management costs for
activities prescribed in a parcel's management plan adopted pursuant to
RCW 79.155.080, and, if deemed appropriate by the board consistent with
RCW 79.155.090, to reimburse the state and any local entities' eligible
financial contributions for acquisition of the parcel.
(5) In the event that the department sells logs using the contract
harvesting process described in RCW 79.15.500 through 79.15.530, the
moneys received subject to this section are the net proceeds from the
contract harvesting sale.
(6) During the ((2009-2011)) 2011-2013 fiscal biennium ((and fiscal
year 2012)), the twenty-five percent limitation on deductions set in
subsection (3) of this section may be increased up to thirty percent by
the board.

Sec. 924 RCW 79.64.100 and 2003 c 334 s 219 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created a forest development account in the state
treasury. The state treasurer shall keep an account of all sums
deposited therein and expended or withdrawn therefrom.
(2) Any sums placed in the forest development account shall be
pledged for the purpose of paying interest and principal on the bonds
issued by the department under RCW 79.22.080 and 79.22.090 and the
provisions of this chapter, and for the purchase of land for growing
timber. Any bonds issued shall constitute a first and prior claim and
lien against the account for the payment of principal and interest. No
sums for the above purposes shall be withdrawn or paid out of the
account except upon approval of the department.
(3) Appropriations may be made by the legislature from the forest
development account to the department for the purpose of carrying on
the activities of the department on state forest lands, lands managed
on a sustained yield basis as provided for in RCW 79.10.320, and for
reimbursement of expenditures that have been made or may be made from
the resource management cost account in the management of state forest
lands.
(4) For the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, moneys from the forest
development account shall be distributed as directed in section 714 of
this act to the beneficiaries of the revenues derived from state forest
lands. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, appropriations may be
made by the legislature from the forest development account to the
department for the purpose of emergency fire suppression.

Sec. 925 RCW 79.105.150 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 911 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW
79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW 79.115.150(2), all moneys
received by the state from the sale or lease of state-owned aquatic
lands and from the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic
lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which
is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation, these
funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for
the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public
purposes; for providing and improving access to the lands; and for
volunteer cooperative fish and game projects. During the 2009-2011 and
2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the aquatic lands enhancement account may
also be used for scientific research as part of the adaptive management
process and for developing a planning report for McNeil Island. During
the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature may
transfer from the aquatic lands enhancement account to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect excess fund balance of the
account. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the aquatic lands
enhancement account may be used to support the shellfish program, state
parks, hatcheries, the ballast water program, and the Puget Sound toxic
sampling program at the department of fish and wildlife, and the
knotweed program at the department of agriculture. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the aquatic
lands enhancement account to the marine resources stewardship trust
account funds for the purposes of RCW 43.372.070.
(2) In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the
recreation and conservation funding board shall:
(a) Require grant recipients to incorporate the environmental
benefits of the project into their grant applications;
(b) Utilize the statement of environmental benefits, consideration,
except as provided in RCW 79.105.610, of whether the applicant is a
Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, whether a project is
referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound
partnership under RCW 90.71.310, and except as otherwise provided in
RCW 79.105.630, and effective one calendar year following the
development and statewide availability of model evergreen community
management plans and ordinances under RCW 35.105.050, whether the
applicant is an entity that has been recognized, and what gradation of
recognition was received, in the evergreen community recognition
program created in RCW 35.105.030 in its prioritization and selection
process; and
(c) Develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to be
used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.
(3) To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its
performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies
as defined in RCW 43.41.270.
(4) The department shall consult with affected interest groups in
implementing this section.
(5) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the
project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the
Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

Sec. 926 RCW 79A.25.200 and 2007 c 241 s 53 are each amended to
read as follows:
The recreation resource account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys in this account are subject to legislative appropriation. The
board shall administer the account in accordance with this chapter and
chapter 79A.35 RCW and shall hold it separate and apart from all other
money, funds, and accounts of the board. Moneys received from the
marine fuel tax refund account under RCW 79A.25.070 shall be deposited
into the account. Grants, gifts, or other financial assistance,
proceeds received from public bodies as administrative cost
contributions, and moneys made available to the state of Washington by
the federal government for outdoor recreation may be deposited into the
account. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the recreation resource
account may be used by the department of fish and wildlife for the
purposes of activities related to aquatic and marine enforcement.

Sec. 927 RCW 86.26.007 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 976 are each
amended to read as follows:
The flood control assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. At the beginning of the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the
state treasurer shall transfer three million dollars from the general
fund to the flood control assistance account. Each biennium thereafter
the state treasurer shall transfer four million dollars from the
general fund to the flood control assistance account, except that
during the ((2009-2011 and)) 2011-2013 fiscal ((biennia)) biennium, the
state treasurer shall transfer ((two)) one million dollars from the
general fund to the flood control assistance account. Moneys in the
flood control assistance account may be spent only after appropriation
for purposes specified under this chapter.

Sec. 928 RCW 90.48.390 and 2008 c 329 s 925 are each amended to
read as follows:
The coastal protection fund is established to be used by the
department as a revolving fund for carrying out the purposes of
restoration of natural resources under this chapter and chapter 90.56
RCW. To this fund there shall be credited penalties, fees, damages,
charges received pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and chapter
90.56 RCW, compensation for damages received under this chapter and
chapter 90.56 RCW, and an amount equivalent to one cent per gallon from
each marine use refund claim under RCW 82.36.330.
Moneys in the fund not needed currently to meet the obligations of
the department in the exercise of its powers, duties, and functions
under RCW 90.48.142, 90.48.366, 90.48.367, and 90.48.368 shall be
deposited with the state treasurer to the credit of the fund. During
the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the coastal protection fund may also be
used for a standby rescue tug at Neah Bay. During the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may transfer from the coastal protection fund
to the state general fund such amounts as reflect excess fund balance
derived from penalties, forfeits, and seizures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 929 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 930 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of bill)

INDEX PAGE #

ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COURTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 6
ATTORNEY GENERAL . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 89
BOARD OF TAX APPEALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
CENTRAL SERVICE EFFICIENCIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 187
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS . . . . . . . . . . . . 15
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT FOR FISCAL YEAR 2012
TERMS AND CONDITIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 201
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY -- WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 203
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY -- PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEES OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 202
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY -- WFSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 203
WPEA, WPEA CC COALITION, WFSE CC COALITION, WFSE CWU, WFSE TESC . . . . . . . . . . . . 201
YAKIMA VALLEY COMMUNITY COLLEGE -- WASHINGTON PUBLIC EMPLOYEES ASSOCIATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 202
COMMISSION ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
COMMISSION ON ASIAN PACIFIC AMERICAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
COMPENSATION
NONREPRESENTED EMPLOYEES--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 203
REPRESENTED EMPLOYEES OUTSIDE SUPER COALITION--INSURANCE BENEFITS . . . . . . . . . . . . 205, 206
CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 114
COUNCIL FOR HIGHER EDUCATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 90
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE . . . . . . . . . . . . 122
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 18
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 99
DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING . . . . . . . . . . . . 179
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 106
DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE . . . . . . . . . . . . 114
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 95
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 91
DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING . . . . . . . . . . . . 124
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 118
DISTRIBUTION OF EXCESS FUNDS FROM THE FOREST DEVELOPMENT ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 187
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS
CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 185
DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 28
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE . . . . . . . . . . . . 29
DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 103
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 36
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 72
AGING AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 60
ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 70
CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 53
ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 67
JUVENILE REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 73
SPECIAL COMMITMENT PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 71
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 71
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 94
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 172
ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
EMPLOYMENT SECURITY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 104
ENVIRONMENTAL AND LAND USE HEARINGS OFFICE . . . . . . . . . . . . 114
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE . . . . . . . . . . . . 173
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 13
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 89
INNOVATE WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
INSURANCE COMMISSIONER . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
LAW LIBRARY . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
LEGISLATIVE AGENCIES . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 32
OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 26
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
ARCHIVE SERVICES REDUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 190
ARROW COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 186
AUDIT SERVICES ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 189
CENTRAL SERVICE CHARGES ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 189
CENTRAL SERVICE REDUCTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 191
CENTRAL SERVICE SAVINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . 191
DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 186
EDUCATION LEGACY TRUST ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 186
EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 186
LEGAL SERVICES REDUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 190
PERSONNEL SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 187
SCHOOL DISTRICT RETIREMENT SYSTEM CONTRIBUTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 193
STATE AGENCY RETIREMENT SYSTEM CONTRIBUTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 192
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--REVISED EMPLOYER HEALTH BENEFIT RATES . . . . . . . . . . . . 184
OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE SUPPORT SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES . . . . . . . . . . . . 30
OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE . . . . . . . . . . . . 8
OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
OFFICE OF THE STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT COUNCIL
OFFICE OF STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 177
POLICY COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 177
PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 155
PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 10
PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 33
PUGET SOUND PARTNERSHIP . . . . . . . . . . . . 123
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 113
SECRETARY OF STATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 11
SENATE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
STATE AUDITOR . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 168
STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 74
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 111
STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 124
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 182
STATE TREASURER . . . . . . . . . . . . 14
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST: DEBT REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE . . . . . . . . . . . . 183
BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST: DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT . . . . . . . . . . . . 183
COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 195
MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT . . . . . . . . . . . . 196
STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 194
TRANSFERS . . . . . . . . . . . . 196
STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE . . . . . . . . . . . . 4
SUNDRY CLAIMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 191
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 127, 166
BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 143
EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 156
EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
GENERAL APPORTIONMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 132
INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 154
LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM . . . . . . . . . . . . 164
LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 153
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS . . . . . . . . . . . . 146
SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 150
TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL PROGRAMS . . . . . . . . . . . . 161
SUPREME COURT . . . . . . . . . . . . 5
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 170
UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 31
WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 182
WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY . . . . . . . . . . . . 27
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 171
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 176
WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 179
--- END ---