BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The lives of military families are dominated
by frequent deployments, relocations, and extended periods of single
parenthood. Military spouses are some of the most mobile populations
in our country, making the maintenance of professional licenses a
significant obstacle. According to the 2010 defense management data
center, there are thirty-three thousand three hundred eighty active
duty and ten thousand eight hundred thirty-seven reserve military
spouses residing in Washington. Military families depend on two
incomes and want to achieve their goals and aspirations. It is the
intent of the legislature to recognize the sacrifices made by military
families in service to our country and our state and to help alleviate
the hardships military families face due to their highly transient
life.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) For the purposes of this section,
"authority" means any board, commission, or other authority for
issuance of a license, certificate, registration, or permit under this
title.
(2) To the extent resources are available:
(a) Each authority shall establish procedures to expedite the
issuance of a license, certificate, registration, or permit to perform
professional services regulated by each such authority to a person:
(i) Who is certified or licensed, certified, or registered, or has
a permit in another state to perform professional services in that
state;
(ii) Whose spouse is the subject of a military transfer to
Washington; and
(iii) Who left employment in the other state to accompany the
person's spouse to Washington.
(b) The procedure must include a process for issuing the person a
license, certificate, registration, or permit, if, in the opinion of
the authority, the requirements for licensure, certification,
registration, or obtaining a permit of such other state are
substantially equivalent to that required in Washington.
(c) Each authority in this title shall develop a method and adopt
rules to authorize a person who meets the criteria in (a)(i) through
(iii) of this subsection to perform services regulated by the authority
in Washington by issuing the person a temporary license, certificate,
registration, or permit for a limited period of time to allow the
person to perform services regulated by the authority while completing
any specific additional requirements in Washington that are not related
to training or practice standards of the profession that were not
required in the other state in which the person is licensed, certified,
or registered, or has a permit. Nothing in this section requires the
authority to issue a temporary license, certificate, registration, or
permit if the standards of the other state are substantially unequal to
Washington standards.
(d) An applicant must state in the application that he or she:
(i) Has requested verification from the other state or states that
the person is currently licensed, certified, registered, or has a
permit; and
(ii) Is not subject to any pending investigation, charges, or
disciplinary action by the regulatory body of the other state or
states.
(e) If the authority finds reasonable cause to believe that an
applicant falsely affirmed or stated either of the requirements under
(d)(i) or (ii) of this subsection, the authority may summarily suspend
the license, certificate, registration, or permit pending an
investigation or further action to discipline or revoke the license,
certificate, registration, or permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The regulating authorities for the
department of licensing, the department of health, the department of
labor and industries, and the superintendent of public instruction
shall appear before the joint committee on veteran and military affairs
in December 2012 to inform the committee as to their efforts to
implement the requirements of this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.410.010 and 2005 c 497 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The Washington professional educator standards board shall
establish, publish, and enforce rules determining eligibility for and
certification of personnel employed in the common schools of this
state, including certification for emergency or temporary, substitute
or provisional duty and under such certificates or permits as the board
shall deem proper or as otherwise prescribed by law. The rules shall
require that the initial application for certification shall require a
record check of the applicant through the Washington state patrol
criminal identification system and through the federal bureau of
investigation at the applicant's expense. The record check shall
include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal
identification fingerprint card. The superintendent of public
instruction may waive the record check for any applicant who has had a
record check within the two years before application. The rules shall
permit a holder of a lapsed certificate but not a revoked or suspended
certificate to be employed on a conditional basis by a school district
with the requirement that the holder must complete any certificate
renewal requirements established by the state board of education within
two years of initial reemployment.
(b) In establishing rules pertaining to the qualifications of
instructors of American sign language the board shall consult with the
national association of the deaf, "sign instructors guidance network"
(s.i.g.n.), and the Washington state association of the deaf for
evaluation and certification of sign language instructors.
(c) The board shall develop rules consistent with section 2 of this
act for the certification of spouses of military personnel.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall act as the
administrator of any such rules and have the power to issue any
certificates or permits and revoke the same in accordance with board
rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 19.105 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall develop rules consistent with section 2 of this
act for the registration of spouses of military personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 46.82 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall develop rules consistent with section 2 of this
act for the licensure of spouses of military personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 42.44 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall develop rules consistent with section 2 of this
act for the appointment of spouses of military personnel to perform
notarial acts in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 67.08 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall develop rules consistent with section 2 of this
act for the licensure of spouses of military personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 64.36 RCW
to read as follows:
The director shall develop rules consistent with section 2 of this
act for the registration of spouses of military personnel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---