BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 41.04.010 and 2009 c 248 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In all competitive examinations, unless otherwise provided in
this section, to determine the qualifications of applicants for public
offices, positions, or employment, either the state, and all of its
political subdivisions and all municipal corporations, or private
companies or agencies contracted with by the state to give the
competitive examinations shall give a scoring criteria status to all
veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.007, by adding to the passing mark,
grade or rating only, based upon a possible rating of one hundred
points as perfect a percentage in accordance with the following:
(((1))) (a) Ten percent to a veteran who served during a period of
war or in an armed conflict as defined in RCW 41.04.005 ((and does not
receive military retirement)). The percentage shall be added to the
passing mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations until the
veteran's first appointment. The percentage shall not be utilized in
promotional examinations;
(((2))) (b) Five percent to a veteran who did not serve during a
period of war or in an armed conflict as defined in RCW 41.04.005 ((or
is receiving military retirement)). The percentage shall be added to
the passing mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations until
the veteran's first appointment. The percentage shall not be utilized
in promotional examinations;
(((3))) (c) Five percent to a veteran who was called to active
military service from employment with the state or any of its political
subdivisions or municipal corporations. The percentage shall be added
to promotional examinations until the first promotion only;
(((4))) (d) All veterans' scoring criteria may be claimed upon
release from active military service.
(2) Veteran scoring criteria status under this section may be
claimed upon receipt of separation orders issued by the respective
military department if the separation orders indicate an honorable
discharge. The status becomes permanent upon actual separation.

--- END ---