BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.020 and 2011 c 171 s 120 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected a tax equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price on each retail sale in this state
of:
(a) Tangible personal property, unless the sale is specifically
excluded from the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(b) Digital goods, digital codes, and digital automated services,
if the sale is included within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail
sale;
(c) Services, other than digital automated services, included
within the RCW 82.04.050 definition of retail sale;
(d) Extended warranties to consumers; and
(e) Anything else, the sale of which is included within the RCW
82.04.050 definition of retail sale.
(2) There is levied and collected an additional tax on each retail
car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this
state, equal to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The
revenue collected under this subsection must be deposited in the
multimodal transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2003, there is levied and collected an
additional tax of three-tenths of one percent of the selling price on
each retail sale of a motor vehicle in this state, other than retail
car rentals taxed under subsection (2) of this section. The revenue
collected under this subsection must be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3) of this section, "motor vehicle"
has the meaning provided in RCW 46.04.320, but does not include farm
tractors or farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.180 and 46.04.181,
off-road vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.365, nonhighway vehicles as
defined in RCW 46.09.310, and snowmobiles as defined in RCW 46.04.546.
(5)(a) From July 1, 2012, until June 30, 2015, subject to (b) of
this subsection (5), in addition to the tax imposed upon each retail
sale under subsection (1) of this section, there is imposed a tax in an
amount equal to one percent of the selling price.
(b)(i) If the state's unemployment rate decreases to six and five-tenths percent for four continuous months, the rate of one percent
under (a) of this subsection (5) is reduced to one-half of one percent.
(ii) If the state's unemployment rate decreases to five percent for
four continuous months, no additional tax may be imposed under (a) of
this subsection (5).
(6) Beginning on December 8, 2005, 0.16 percent of the taxes
collected under subsection (1) of this section must be dedicated to
funding comprehensive performance audits required under RCW 43.09.470.
The revenue identified in this subsection must be deposited in the
performance audits of government account created in RCW 43.09.475.
(((6))) (7) The taxes imposed under this chapter apply to
successive retail sales of the same property.
(((7))) (8) The rates provided in this section apply to taxes
imposed under chapter 82.12 RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 82.08.064 and 2003 c 361 s 304 and 2003 c 168 s 205
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) A sales and use tax rate change under this chapter or chapter
82.12 RCW ((shall be)) is imposed (a) no sooner than seventy-five days
after its enactment into law and (b) only on the first day of January,
April, July, or October.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the tax rate
change in section 301, chapter 361, Laws of 2003 or section 1 of this
act.
(3)(a) A sales and use tax rate increase under this chapter or
chapter 82.12 RCW imposed on services applies to the first billing
period starting on or after the effective date of the increase.
(b) A sales and use tax rate decrease under this chapter or chapter
82.12 RCW imposed on services applies to bills rendered on or after the
effective date of the decrease.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "services" means
retail services such as installing and constructing and retail services
such as telecommunications, but does not include services such as
tattooing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The secretary of state must submit
sections 1 and 2 of this act to the people for their adoption and
ratification, or rejection, at a special election to be held in this
state on March 13, 2012, in accordance with Article II, section 1 of
the state Constitution and the laws adopted to facilitate its
operation. The special election must be limited to the submission of
this act to the people.
(2) Pursuant to RCW 29A.72.050(6), the statement of subject and
concise description for the ballot title must read: "The legislature
has passed . . . Bill No. . . . (this act), concerning a temporary
sales tax increase. This bill would provide a temporary source of
funding to support essential government services, including K-12
education, higher education, and services for seniors and the
disabled."
(3) Pursuant to RCW 29A.32.060, the committees tasked with writing
and submitting arguments advocating the approval or rejection of this
act must be appointed by January 4, 2012. The committees must submit
their initial argument statements to the secretary of state by January
11, 2012. The final statements and rebuttals prepared according to RCW
29A.32.060 must be submitted by January 16, 2012, for inclusion in the
voter's pamphlet.
(4) The attorney general must prepare the explanatory statement
required by RCW 29A.72.060 and transmit that statement regarding the
referendum to the secretary of state no later than January 16, 2012.
(5) The office of financial management must prepare the fiscal
impact statement required by RCW 29A.72.025 and transmit that statement
regarding the referendum to the secretary of state no later than
January 16, 2012.
(6) The secretary of state must prepare and distribute a voters'
pamphlet addressing this referendum measure following the procedures
and requirements of chapter 29A.32 RCW.
(7) A county auditor may conduct the voting at this special
election in all precincts of the county by mail using the procedures
set forth in RCW 29A.48.020 through 29A.48.060.
(8) Pursuant to RCW 29A.60.190, the county canvassing board in each
county must canvass and certify the votes cast at this special election
in that county to the secretary of state no later than the tenth day
following the election. Pursuant to RCW 29A.60.260, the secretary of
state must canvass and certify the returns from the counties no later
than the fifteenth day following the special election.
(9) The secretary of state must reimburse each county for the cost
of conducting the special election in that county in the same manner as
state primary and general election costs are reimbursed under RCW
29A.04.420.
(10) No other state, county, or local election may be required or
held on any proposition related to or affecting this act.

Sec. 4 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2011 c 349 s 20 and 2011 c 10 s 57 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
fourteen days after a primary or special election and twenty-one days
after a general election, the county canvassing board ((shall)) must
complete the canvass and certify the results. ((The county canvassing
board must complete the canvass and certify the results of the April
17, 2012, special election ten days after election day.)) Each ballot
that was returned before 8:00 p.m. on the day of the special election,
general election, or primary, and each ballot bearing a postmark on or
before the date of the special election, general election, or primary
and received no later than the day before certification, must be
included in the canvass report.
(2) On or before the thirtieth day after an election conducted
under the instant runoff voting method for the pilot project authorized
by RCW 29A.53.020, the canvassing board ((shall)) must complete the
canvass and certify the results.
(3)(a) On or before the tenth day after the election date provided
by the legislature for a special election in a referendum bill, the
canvassing board must complete the canvass and certify the results.
(b) The county canvassing board must complete the canvass and
certify the results of the April 17, 2012, special election ten days
after election day.

Sec. 5 RCW 29A.60.190 and 2011 c 349 s 21 and 2011 c 10 s 58 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, fourteen
days after a primary or special election and twenty-one days after a
general election, the county canvassing board ((shall)) must complete
the canvass and certify the results. Each ballot that was returned
before 8:00 p.m. on the day of the special election, general election,
or primary, and each ballot bearing a postmark on or before the date of
the special election, general election, or primary and received no
later than the day before certification, must be included in the
canvass report.
(2) On or before the tenth day after the election date provided by
the legislature for a special election in a referendum bill, the
canvassing board must complete the canvass and certify the results.

Sec. 6 RCW 29A.60.260 and 2003 c 111 s 1526 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The votes on proposed amendments to the state Constitution,
recommendations for the calling of constitutional conventions and other
questions submitted to the people must be counted, canvassed, and
returned by each county canvassing board in the manner provided by law
for counting, canvassing, and returning votes for candidates for state
offices.
Except as provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section, the
secretary of state ((shall)) must, in the presence of the governor,
within thirty days after the election, canvass the votes upon each
question and certify to the governor the result. The governor
((shall)) must forthwith issue a proclamation giving the whole number
of votes cast in the state for and against such measure and declaring
the result. If the vote cast upon an initiative or referendum measure
is equal to less than one-third of the total vote cast at the election,
the governor ((shall)) must proclaim the measure to have failed.
(2) In the event a specific date is provided by the legislature for
a special election in a referendum bill, the secretary of state must,
in the presence of the governor, within fifteen days after the special
election, canvass the votes upon each question and certify to the
governor the result.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 4 of this act takes effect January
1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Section 4 of this act expires July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1,
2013.

--- END ---