BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
The professional educator standards board shall, in its regular
review and revision of teacher certification standards as required by
RCW 28A.410.210, revise standards for the elementary education
endorsement and middle level and secondary mathematics and science
teacher endorsements as well as other subject area endorsements with
STEM-related components. Standards revisions related to mathematics
shall be adopted by September 1, 2013. Standards revisions related to
science shall be adopted by September 1, 2014. The revised standards
shall include the integration of science, technology, engineering, and
mathematics (STEM) knowledge and skill and be aligned, as appropriate,
with common core mathematics standards, the 2009 revision of state
mathematics student learning standards and performance expectations,
the biology end-of-course assessment, and the 2012 student science
learning standards developed from the conceptual framework for science
education and next generation standards and related student performance
expectations. In addition to appropriate mathematics and science
content, the endorsement standards must also include the concepts and
instructional practices of the interdisciplinary connections with
engineering and technology.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The professional educator standards board shall revise
assessments for prospective teachers and teachers adding subject area
endorsements required for teacher certification under RCW 28A.410.220
to measure the revised standards in section 1 of this act.
(2) In implementing the evidence-based assessment of teaching
effectiveness under RCW 28A.410.280, the professional educator
standards board shall require that successful candidates for the
residency certificate demonstrate effective subject specific
instructional methods that address the revised standards.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The professional educator standards board
shall revise certificate renewal rules for teachers at the elementary
and secondary levels in STEM-related subjects by September 1, 2014.
The revised rules shall include the requirement that continuing
education or professional growth plans for these teachers include a
specific focus on the integration of science, mathematics, technology,
and engineering instruction.

--- END ---