BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.053 and 2011 c 77 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) By December 1, 2011, and by June of each odd-numbered year
thereafter, the institutions of higher education shall collaboratively
develop a master list of postsecondary courses that can be fulfilled by
taking the advanced placement, international baccalaureate, or other
recognized college-level proficiency examinations, including but not
limited to examinations by a national multidisciplinary science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics program, and meeting the
qualifying examination score or demonstrated competencies for lower
division general education requirements or postsecondary professional
technical requirements. The master list of postsecondary courses
fulfilled by proficiency examinations or demonstrated competencies are
those that fulfill lower division general education requirements or
career and technical education requirements and qualify for
postsecondary credit. From the master list, each institution shall
create and publish a list of its courses that can be satisfied by
successful proficiency examination scores or demonstrated competencies
for lower division general education requirements or postsecondary
professional technical requirements. The qualifying examination scores
and demonstrated competencies shall be included in the published list.
The requirements to develop a master list under this section do not
apply if an institution has a clearly published policy of awarding
credit for the advanced placement, international baccalaureate, or
other recognized college-level placement exams and does not require
those credits to meet specific course requirements but generally
applies those credits towards degree requirements.
(2) To the maximum extent possible, institutions of higher
education shall agree on examination qualifying scores and demonstrated
competencies for the credits or courses under subsection (3) of this
section, with scores equivalent to qualified or well-qualified.
Nothing in this subsection shall prevent an institution of higher
education from adopting policies using higher scores for additional
purposes.
(3) Each institution of higher education, in designing its
certificate, technical degree program, two-year academic transfer
program, or freshman and sophomore courses of a baccalaureate program
or baccalaureate degree, must recognize the equivalencies of at least
one year of course credit and maximize the application of the credits
toward lower division general education requirements that can be earned
through successfully demonstrating proficiency on examinations,
including but not limited to advanced placement and international
baccalaureate examinations. The successful completion of the
examination and the award of credit shall be noted on the student's
college transcript.
(4) Each institution of higher education must clearly include in
its admissions materials and on its web site the credits or the
institution's list of postsecondary courses that can be fulfilled by
proficiency examinations or demonstrated competencies and the agreed-upon examination scores and demonstrated competencies that qualify for
postsecondary credit. Each institution must provide the information to
the higher education coordinating board and state board for community
and technical colleges in a form that the superintendent of public
instruction is able to distribute to school districts.

--- END ---