BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that a skilled
workforce is essential for employers and job seekers to compete and
grow Washington's aerospace industry as part of the global economy.
The legislature finds that improved coordination of the state's
training system for skilled aerospace workers will provide better
alignment with industry needs and help increase jobs for Washington's
citizens. The legislature further finds that, through outcome-based
evaluations of the aerospace skill development and education and
training programs, accountability will be increased and the training
programs will keep pace with a rapidly changing industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The center of excellence for aerospace and advanced materials
manufacturing, established under RCW 28B.50.902, shall conduct the
following activities in addition to those required under RCW
28B.50.902(3):
(a) Serve as a repository of up-to-date information about the
aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing training programs in the
state;
(b) Develop and maintain data in partnership with industry about
the demand for training and the current job openings and projected
future job openings for people successfully completing the training in
aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing and related fields;
(c) Provide information about grants and partnerships;
(d) Provide coordination for professional development for training
providers; and
(e) Coordinate and facilitate methods for training programs to
obtain industry certification and meet industry standards.
(2) The center of excellence for aerospace and advanced materials
manufacturing shall create an aerospace and advanced materials
manufacturing pipeline advisory committee with a majority of the
members representing industry. Members of the advisory committee shall
also include education and training providers. The advisory
committee's duties include but are not limited to:
(a) Providing direction for a skills gap analysis that is produced
jointly by the center of excellence and the board using data developed
through the education data center;
(b) Establishing the goals for program completion and employment
rates and earnings targets for aerospace skill areas and the related
education and training programs;
(c) Coordinating industry involvement and contributions to training
programs; and
(d) Recommending specific training programs for review by the board
in coordination with the college board under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The board, working with the state board for community and
technical colleges, shall evaluate the programs identified by the
aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing pipeline advisory
committee under section 2 of this act. This evaluation shall be
conducted annually for the training programs selected and shall include
the outcome results both for the persons receiving the training and the
employers.
(2) Every four years, beginning in September 2016, the board shall
conduct an analysis of the results of the training system for aerospace
and advanced materials manufacturing. This analysis shall include but
not be limited to a specific net-impact and cost-benefit evaluation of
the training system for the aerospace and advanced materials
manufacturing industry.

--- END ---