BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.80.020 and 2011 c 320 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A discover pass is required for any motor vehicle to park or
operate on any recreation site or lands, except for short-term parking
as may be authorized under RCW 79A.80.070.
(2) The cost of the discover pass is thirty dollars ((per motor
vehicle)). Every four years the office of financial management must
review the cost of the discover pass and, if necessary, recommend to
the legislature an adjustment to the cost of the discover pass to
account for inflation.
(3) The discover pass is valid for one year from the date of
issuance.
(4) The discover pass must be made available for purchase
throughout the year through the department of fish and wildlife's
automated licensing system consistent with RCW 77.32.050.
(5) The discover pass must be made available for purchase through
the department of licensing as provided in RCW 46.16A.090. The
department of licensing, county auditor, or other agent or subagent
appointed by the director, is not responsible for delivering a
purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle owner. The agencies must
deliver the purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle owner.
(6) The state parks and recreation commission may make the discover
pass available for purchase through its reservation system and other
outlets authorized by law to sell licenses, permits, or passes.
(7) The discover pass must contain space for ((the)) two motor
vehicle license plate numbers. A discover pass is valid only for those
vehicle license plate numbers written on the pass.
(8) A complimentary discover pass must be provided to a volunteer
who performed twenty-four hours of service on agency-sanctioned
volunteer projects in a year. The agency must provide vouchers to
volunteers identifying the number of volunteer hours they have provided
for each project. The vouchers may be brought to an agency to be
redeemed for a discover pass.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.80.040 and 2011 c 320 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The vehicle access pass is created solely for access to the
department of fish and wildlife recreation sites or lands. The vehicle
access pass is only available to a person who purchases a current
valid: Big game hunting license issued under RCW 77.32.450; small game
hunting license issued under RCW 77.32.460; western Washington pheasant
permit issued under RCW 77.32.575; trapping license issued under RCW
77.65.450; watchable wildlife decal issued under RCW 77.32.560; or
combination, saltwater, or freshwater personal use fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470.
(2) One vehicle access pass must be issued per purchase pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The vehicle access pass is valid for the license year of the
license it is purchased with.
(4) The vehicle access pass must contain space for two motor
vehicle license plate numbers. A vehicle access pass is only valid for
those vehicle license plate numbers written on the pass.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A state agency may not refund money for
a discover pass or vehicle access pass issued prior to the effective
date of this section.
(2) Each discover pass or vehicle access pass issued prior to the
effective date of this section is valid for two license plate numbers
written on the pass.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the terms "discover pass" and
"vehicle access pass" have the same meanings provided under RCW
79A.80.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---