BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.80.090 and 2011 c 320 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The recreation access pass account is created in the state
treasury. All moneys received from the sale of discover passes and
day-use permits must be deposited into the account.
(2) Each fiscal biennium, the first seventy-one million dollars in
revenue must be distributed to the agencies in the following manner:
(a) Eight percent to the department of fish and wildlife and
deposited into the state wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170;
(b) Eight percent to the department of natural resources ((and)),
of which: (i) Thirty percent must be deposited into the park land
trust revolving fund created in RCW 43.30.385; and (ii) seventy percent
must be distributed equitably to the beneficiaries of state lands and
state forest lands, as those terms are defined in RCW 79.02.010, as
determined by the commissioner of public lands; and
(c) Eighty-four percent to the state parks and recreation
commission and deposited into the state parks renewal and stewardship
account created in RCW 79A.05.215.
(3) Each fiscal biennium, revenues in excess of seventy-one million
dollars must be distributed equally among the agencies to the accounts
identified in subsection (2) of this section.

--- END ---