BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 15.49.380 and 2010 c 8 s 6064 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person shall distribute seeds without having obtained a
dealer's license for each regular place of business: PROVIDED, That no
license shall be required of a person who distributes seeds only in
sealed packages of eight ounces or less, packed by a seed labeling
registrant and bearing the name and address of the registrant:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That a license shall not be required of any grower
selling seeds of his or her own production exclusively. Such seed sold
by such grower must be properly labeled as provided in this chapter.
Each dealer's license shall cost one hundred twenty-five dollars, shall
be issued through the master license system, shall bear the date of
issue, shall expire on the master license expiration date, and shall be
prominently displayed in each place of business.
(2) Persons custom conditioning and/or custom treating seeds for
others for remuneration shall be considered dealers for the purpose of
this chapter.
(3) Application for a license to distribute seed shall be through
the master license system and shall include the name and address of the
person applying for the license, the name of a person domiciled in this
state authorized to receive and accept service or legal notices of all
kinds, and any other reasonable and practical information prescribed by
the department necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of
this chapter.

--- END ---