BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The joint center for aerospace
technology innovation is created to:
(a) Pursue joint industry-university research in computing,
manufacturing efficiency, materials/structures innovation, and other
new technologies that can be used in aerospace firms;
(b) Enhance the education of students in the engineering
departments of the University of Washington, Washington State
University, and other participating institutions through industry-focused research; and
(c) Work directly with existing small, medium-sized, and large
aerospace firms and aerospace industry associations to identify
research needs and opportunities to transfer off-the-shelf technologies
that would benefit such firms.
(2) The center shall be operated and administered as a multi-institutional education and research center, conducting research and
development programs in various locations within Washington under the
joint authority of the University of Washington and Washington State
University. The initial administrative offices of the center shall be
west of the crest of the Cascade mountains. The facilities of the
center must be made available to other institutions of higher education
when this would meet aerospace industry identified needs.
(3) The powers of the center are vested in and shall be exercised
by a board of directors. The board shall consist of nine members
appointed by the governor. The governor shall appoint a nonvoting
chair. Of the eight voting members, one member shall represent small
aerospace firms, one member shall represent medium-sized firms, one
member shall represent large aerospace firms, one member shall
represent labor, two members shall represent aerospace industry
associations, and two members shall represent higher education. The
terms of the initial members shall be staggered.
(4) The board shall hire an executive director. The executive
director shall hire such staff as the board deems necessary to operate
the center. Staff support may be provided from among the cooperating
institutions through cooperative agreements to the extent funds are
available. The executive director may enter into cooperative
agreements for programs and research with public and private
organizations including state and nonstate agencies consistent with
policies of the participating institutions.
(5) The board must:
(a) Work with aerospace industry associations and aerospace firms
of all sizes to identify the research areas that will benefit the
intermediate and long-term economic vitality of the Washington
aerospace industry;
(b) Identify entrepreneurial researchers to join or lead research
teams in the research areas specified in (a) of this subsection and the
steps the University of Washington and Washington State University will
take to recruit such researchers;
(c) Assist firms to integrate existing technologies into their
operations and align the activities of the center with those of impact
Washington and innovate Washington to enhance services available to
aerospace firms;
(d) Develop internships, on-the-job training, research, and other
opportunities and ensure that all undergraduate and graduate students
enrolled in an aerospace engineering curriculum have direct experience
with aerospace firms;
(e) Assist researchers and firms in safeguarding intellectual
property while advancing industry innovation;
(f) Develop and strengthen university-industry relationships
through promotion of faculty collaboration with industry, and sponsor,
in collaboration with innovate Washington, at least one annual
symposium focusing on aerospace research in the state of Washington;
(g) Encourage a full range of projects from small research projects
that meet the specific needs of a smaller company to large scale,
multipartner projects;
(h) Develop nonstate support of the center's research activities
through leveraging dollars from federal and private for-profit and
nonprofit sources;
(i) Leverage its financial impact through joint support
arrangements on a project-by-project basis as appropriate;
(j) Establish mechanisms for soliciting and evaluating proposals
and for making awards and reporting on technological progress,
financial leverage, and other measures of impact;
(k) By June 30, 2013, develop an operating plan that includes the
specific processes, methods, or mechanisms the center will use to
accomplish each of its duties as set out in this subsection; and
(l) Report biennially to the legislature and the governor about the
impact of the center's work on the state's economy and the aerospace
sector, with projections of future impact, providing indicators of its
impact, and outlining ideas for enhancing benefits to the state. The
report must be coordinated with the governor's office, the Washington
economic development commission, the department of commerce, and
innovate Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The joint center for aerospace technology
innovation may solicit and receive gifts, grants, donations,
sponsorships, or contributions from any federal, state, or local
governmental agency or program or any private source, and expend the
same for any purpose consistent with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---