BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 35.57 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An independent financial feasibility review under this section
is required to be performed prior to any of the following events:
(a) The formation of a public facilities district under this
chapter;
(b) The issuance of any indebtedness, excluding the issuance of
obligations to refund or replace such indebtedness, by a public
facilities district under this chapter; or
(c) The long-term lease, purchase, or development of a facility
under RCW 35.57.020.
(2) The independent financial feasibility review required by this
section must be conducted by the department of commerce through the
municipal research and services center under RCW 43.110.030 or under a
contract with another entity under the authority of RCW 43.110.080.
The review must examine the potential costs to be incurred by the
public facility district and the adequacy of revenues or expected
revenues to meet those costs. The cost of the independent financial
feasibility review must be borne by the public facility district or the
local government proposing to form a public facility district.
(3) The independent financial feasibility review, upon completion,
must be a public document and must be submitted to the governor, the
state treasurer, the state auditor, the public facility district and
participating local political subdivisions, and appropriate committees
of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 36.100 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An independent financial feasibility review under this section
is required to be performed prior to any of the following events:
(a) The formation of a public facilities district under this
chapter;
(b) The issuance of any indebtedness, excluding the issuance of
obligations to refund or replace such indebtedness, by a public
facilities district under this chapter; or
(c) The long-term lease, purchase, or development of a facility
under this chapter.
(2) The independent financial feasibility review required by this
section must be conducted by the department of commerce through the
municipal research and services center under RCW 43.110.030 or under a
contract with another entity under the authority of RCW 43.110.080.
The review must examine the potential costs to be incurred by the
public facility district and the adequacy of revenues or expected
revenues to meet those costs. The cost of the independent financial
feasibility review must be borne by the public facility district or the
local government proposing to form a public facility district.
(3) The independent financial feasibility review, upon completion,
must be a public document and must be submitted to the governor, the
state treasurer, the state auditor, the public facility district and
participating local political subdivisions, and appropriate committees
of the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35.57 RCW
to read as follows:
After the effective date of this section, the statutorily
authorized taxing authority of a public facility district may not be
restricted in any manner by the forming jurisdiction or jurisdictions
or by any action of the public facility district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 36.100 RCW
to read as follows:
After the effective date of this section, the statutorily
authorized taxing authority of a public facility district may not be
restricted in any manner by the forming jurisdiction or jurisdictions
or by any action of the public facility district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 In enacting section 6 of this act, the
legislature finds that providing local tools to enable solutions for
public facilities districts that are in default on bond anticipation
notes or bonds is in the best interest of the state, its
municipalities, and its citizens as a whole. The legislature further
finds it is necessary to act swiftly to provide the tools necessary to
address any defaults on debt issued by public facilities districts.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.14.048 and 2009 c 533 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following definitions apply throughout this section unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Distressed public facilities district" means a public
facilities district that has defaulted on bond anticipation notes or
bonds in excess of forty million dollars on or before April 1, 2012;
and
(b) "Anchor jurisdiction" means a city that has entered into an
agreement to form a public facilities district under RCW
35.57.010(1)(c) that constitutes a distressed public facilities
district under this chapter and in which the largest asset of such
public facilities district is located.
(2)(a) The governing board of a public facilities district under
chapter 36.100 or 35.57 RCW may submit an authorizing proposition to
the voters of the district, and if the proposition is approved by a
majority of persons voting, impose a sales and use tax in accordance
with the terms of this chapter.
(((2))) (b) In addition to the tax authorized pursuant to (a) of
this subsection and in addition to any other authority conferred by
law, the legislative authority of an anchor jurisdiction may impose a
sales and use tax within the geographical boundaries of the anchor
jurisdiction in accordance with the terms of this chapter without
submitting an authorizing proposition to the voters of the anchor
jurisdiction or the distressed public facilities district.
(3) The tax authorized in this section ((shall be)) is in addition
to any other taxes authorized by law and ((shall)) must be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the
public facilities district. The rate of tax ((shall)) may not exceed
two-tenths of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales
tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax. A public
facilities district formed under RCW 35.57.010(1)(e) may not impose the
tax authorized under this ((subsection)) section at a rate that exceeds
two-tenths of one percent minus the rate of the highest tax authorized
by this ((subsection)) section that is imposed by any other public
facilities district within its boundaries. An anchor jurisdiction may
impose the tax authorized by subsection (2)(b) of this section at a
rate not to exceed two-tenths of one percent, regardless of whether any
other public facilities district (including a distressed public
facilities district) within its boundaries imposes the tax authorized
by this section or the rate of such tax imposed by the public
facilities district. If a public facilities district formed under RCW
35.57.010(1)(e) has imposed a tax under this ((subsection)) section and
issued or incurred obligations pledging that tax, so long as those
obligations are outstanding no other public facilities district within
its boundaries may thereafter impose a tax under this ((subsection))
section at a rate that would reduce the rate of the tax that was
pledged to the repayment of those obligations. A public facilities
district that imposes a tax under this ((subsection)) section is
responsible for the payment of any costs incurred for the purpose of
administering the provisions of this ((subsection)) section, RCW
35.57.010(1)(e), and 35.57.020(1)(b), including any administrative
costs associated with the imposition of ((a)) the tax under this
((subsection)) section incurred by either the department of revenue or
local government, or both.
(((3))) (4)(a) Moneys received by a public facilities district from
any tax imposed by the public facilities district under the authority
of this section ((shall)) must be used for the purpose of providing
funds for the costs associated with the financing, refinancing, design,
acquisition, construction, equipping, operating, maintaining,
remodeling, repairing, and reequipping of its public facilities.
(b) Moneys received by an anchor jurisdiction from any tax imposed
by the anchor jurisdiction under the authority of this section must be
used for the purpose of providing funds for the costs associated with
the financing, refinancing, design, acquisition, construction,
equipping, operating, maintaining, remodeling, repairing, and
reequipping of the public facilities of the distressed public
facilities district, and for all litigation, investigation, and related
costs and expenses incurred by the anchor jurisdiction toward resolving
matters related to the defaults of the distressed public facilities
district. To the extent the distressed public facilities district owes
money to an anchor jurisdiction, the anchor jurisdiction may apply
money from the sales tax imposed under this section to any such
obligations. Any sales tax imposed by an anchor jurisdiction under
this section must terminate no later than thirty years after it is
first imposed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 Sections 5 and 6 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety,
or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

--- END ---