BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.80.020 and 2011 c 320 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A discover pass is required for any motor vehicle to park or
operate on any recreation site or lands, except for short-term parking
as may be authorized under RCW 79A.80.070.
(2) The cost of the discover pass is thirty dollars per motor
vehicle. Every four years the office of financial management must
review the cost of the discover pass and, if necessary, recommend to
the legislature an adjustment to the cost of the discover pass to
account for inflation.
(3) The discover pass is valid for one year from the date of
issuance.
(4) The discover pass must be made available for purchase
throughout the year through the department of fish and wildlife's
automated licensing system consistent with RCW 77.32.050.
(5) The discover pass must be made available for purchase through
the department of licensing as provided in RCW 46.16A.090. The
department of licensing, county auditor, or other agent or subagent
appointed by the director, is not responsible for delivering a
purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle owner. The agencies must
deliver the purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle owner.
(6) The state parks and recreation commission may make the discover
pass available for purchase through its reservation system and other
outlets authorized by law to sell licenses, permits, or passes.
(7) The discover pass may be transferred between two vehicles and
must contain space for the motor vehicle license plate numbers of each
vehicle.
(8) A complimentary discover pass must be provided to a volunteer
who performed twenty-four hours of service on agency-sanctioned
volunteer projects in a year. The agency must provide vouchers to
volunteers identifying the number of volunteer hours they have provided
for each project. The vouchers may be brought to an agency to be
redeemed for a discover pass.

--- END ---