BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.68A.001 and 2010 c 227 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The legislature finds that the prevention of sexual exploitation
and abuse of children constitutes a government objective of surpassing
importance. The care of children is a sacred trust and should not be
abused by those who seek commercial gain or personal gratification
based on the exploitation of children.
The legislature further finds that the protection of children from
sexual exploitation can be accomplished without infringing on a
constitutionally protected activity. The definition of "sexually
explicit conduct" and other operative definitions demarcate a line
between protected and prohibited conduct and should not inhibit
legitimate scientific, medical, or educational activities.
The legislature further finds that children engaged in sexual
conduct for financial compensation are frequently the victims of sexual
abuse. Approximately eighty to ninety percent of children engaged in
sexual activity for financial compensation have a history of sexual
abuse victimization. It is the intent of the legislature to encourage
these children to engage in prevention and intervention services and to
hold those who pay to engage in the sexual abuse of children
accountable for the trauma they inflict on children.
The legislature further finds that due to the changing nature of
technology, offenders are now able to access child pornography in
different ways and in increasing quantities. By amending current
statutes governing depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit
conduct, it is the intent of the legislature to ensure that intentional
viewing of and dealing in child pornography over the internet is
subject to a criminal penalty without limiting the scope of existing
prohibitions on the possession of or dealing in child pornography,
including the possession of electronic depictions of a minor engaged in
sexually explicit conduct. It is also the intent of the legislature to
clarify, in response to State v. Sutherby, 204 P.3d 916 (2009), the
unit of prosecution for the statutes governing possession of and
dealing in depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct.
It is the intent of the legislature that the first degree offenses
under RCW 9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, and 9.68A.070 have a per depiction or
image unit of prosecution, while the second degree offenses under RCW
9.68A.050, 9.68A.060, and 9.68A.070 have a per incident unit of
prosecution as established in State v. Sutherby, 204 P.3d 916 (2009).
Furthermore, it is the intent of the legislature to set a different
unit of prosecution for the new offense of viewing of depictions of a
minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct such that each separate
session of intentionally viewing over the internet of visual depictions
or images of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct constitutes
a separate offense.
In response to State v. Boyd, 158 P.3d 54 (2007) it is further the
intent of the legislature to place reasonable limitations on the
possession and viewing of evidence by a pro se defendant or the defense
in a case prosecuted under this chapter consistent with the United
States Constitution and the Washington state Constitution to avoid
dissemination of such material and potential revictimization of the
children exploited in these crimes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.68A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any criminal proceeding, any property or material that
constitutes visual or printed matter that depicts a minor engaged in
sexually explicit conduct shall remain in the care, custody, and
control of either the law enforcement agency seizing the material or
the court.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding superior court criminal rule (CrR) 4.7, a
court shall deny, in any criminal proceeding, any request by the
defendant to copy, photograph, duplicate, or otherwise reproduce any
property or material that constitutes visual or printed matter that
depicts a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, so long as the
law enforcement agency seizing the material makes the property or
material reasonably available to the defendant.
(b) For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, property or
material shall be deemed to be reasonably available to the defendant if
the government provides ample opportunity for inspection, viewing, and
examination at a law enforcement agency facility of the property or
material by the defendant, his or her attorney, and any individual the
defendant may seek to qualify to furnish expert testimony at trial.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---