BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.34.020 and 2011 c 101 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is required by
the context:
(1) "Open space land" means (a) any land area so designated by an
official comprehensive land use plan adopted by any city or county and
zoned accordingly, or (b) any land area, the preservation of which in
its present use would (i) conserve and enhance natural or scenic
resources, or (ii) protect streams or water supply, or (iii) promote
conservation of soils, wetlands, beaches or tidal marshes, or (iv)
enhance the value to the public of abutting or neighboring parks,
forests, wildlife preserves, nature reservations or sanctuaries or
other open space, or (v) enhance recreation opportunities, or (vi)
preserve historic sites, or (vii) preserve visual quality along
highway, road, and street corridors or scenic vistas, or (viii) retain
in its natural state tracts of land not less than one acre situated in
an urban area and open to public use on such conditions as may be
reasonably required by the legislative body granting the open space
classification, or (c) any land meeting the definition of farm and
agricultural conservation land under subsection (8) of this section.
As a condition of granting open space classification, the legislative
body may not require public access on land classified under (b)(iii) of
this subsection for the purpose of promoting conservation of wetlands.
(2) "Farm and agricultural land" means:
(a) Any parcel of land that is twenty or more acres or multiple
parcels of land that are contiguous and total twenty or more acres:
(i) Devoted primarily to the production of livestock or
agricultural commodities for commercial purposes;
(ii) Enrolled in the federal conservation reserve program or its
successor administered by the United States department of agriculture;
or
(iii) Other similar commercial activities as may be established by
rule;
(b)(i) Any parcel of land that is five acres or more but less than
twenty acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses, which has produced
a gross income from agricultural uses equivalent to, as of January 1,
1993:
(A) One hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the
five calendar years preceding the date of application for
classification under this chapter for all parcels of land that are
classified under this subsection or all parcels of land for which an
application for classification under this subsection is made with the
granting authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(B) On or after January 1, 1993, two hundred dollars or more per
acre per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date
of application for classification under this chapter;
(ii) For the purposes of (b)(i) of this subsection, "gross income
from agricultural uses" includes, but is not limited to, the wholesale
value of agricultural products donated to nonprofit food banks or
feeding programs;
(c) Any parcel of land of less than five acres devoted primarily to
agricultural uses which has produced a gross income as of January 1,
1993, of:
(i) One thousand dollars or more per year for three of the five
calendar years preceding the date of application for classification
under this chapter for all parcels of land that are classified under
this subsection or all parcels of land for which an application for
classification under this subsection is made with the granting
authority prior to January 1, 1993; and
(ii) On or after January 1, 1993, fifteen hundred dollars or more
per year for three of the five calendar years preceding the date of
application for classification under this chapter. Parcels of land
described in (b)(i)(A) and (c)(i) of this subsection will, upon any
transfer of the property excluding a transfer to a surviving spouse or
surviving state registered domestic partner, be subject to the limits
of (b)(i)(B) and (c)(ii) of this subsection;
(d) Any parcel of land that is five acres or more but less than
twenty acres devoted primarily to agricultural uses, which meet one of
the following criteria:
(i) Has produced a gross income from agricultural uses equivalent
to two hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the five
calendar years preceding the date of application for classification
under this chapter;
(ii) Has standing crops with an expectation of harvest within seven
years, except as provided in (d)(iii) of this subsection, and a
demonstrable investment in the production of those crops equivalent to
one hundred dollars or more per acre in the current or previous
calendar year. For the purposes of this subsection (2)(d)(ii),
"standing crop" means Christmas trees, vineyards, fruit trees, or other
perennial crops that: (A) Are planted using agricultural methods
normally used in the commercial production of that particular crop; and
(B) typically do not produce harvestable quantities in the initial
years after planting; or
(iii) Has a standing crop of short rotation hardwoods with an
expectation of harvest within fifteen years and a demonstrable
investment in the production of those crops equivalent to one hundred
dollars or more per acre in the current or previous calendar year;
(e) Any lands including incidental uses as are compatible with
agricultural purposes, including wetlands preservation, provided such
incidental use does not exceed twenty percent of the classified land
and the land on which appurtenances necessary to the production,
preparation, or sale of the agricultural products exist in conjunction
with the lands producing such products. Agricultural lands also
include any parcel of land of one to five acres, which is not
contiguous, but which otherwise constitutes an integral part of farming
operations being conducted on land qualifying under this section as
"farm and agricultural lands";
(f) The land on which housing for employees and the principal place
of residence of the farm operator or owner of land classified pursuant
to (a) of this subsection is sited if: The housing or residence is on
or contiguous to the classified parcel; and the use of the housing or
the residence is integral to the use of the classified land for
agricultural purposes; or
(g) Any land that is used primarily for equestrian related
activities for which a charge is made, including, but not limited to,
stabling, training, riding, clinics, schooling, shows, or grazing for
feed and that otherwise meet the requirements of (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection.
(3) "Timber land" means any parcel of land that is five or more
acres or multiple parcels of land that are contiguous and total five or
more acres which is or are devoted primarily to the growth and harvest
of timber for commercial purposes. Timber land means the land only and
does not include a residential homesite. The term includes land used
for incidental uses that are compatible with the growing and harvesting
of timber but no more than ten percent of the land may be used for such
incidental uses. It also includes the land on which appurtenances
necessary for the production, preparation, or sale of the timber
products exist in conjunction with land producing these products.
(4) "Current" or "currently" means as of the date on which property
is to be listed and valued by the assessor.
(5) "Owner" means the party or parties having the fee interest in
land, except that where land is subject to real estate contract "owner"
means the contract vendee.
(6)(a) "Contiguous" means land adjoining and touching other
property held by the same ownership. Land divided by a public road,
but otherwise an integral part of a farming operation, is considered
contiguous.
(b) For purposes of this subsection (6):
(i) "Same ownership" means owned by the same person or persons,
except that parcels owned by different persons are deemed held by the
same ownership if the parcels are:
(A) Managed as part of a single operation; and
(B) Owned by:
(I) Individuals who are all members of the same family;
(II) Legal entities that are wholly owned by members of the same
family; or
(III) ((An individual who owns at least one of the parcels and a
legal entity or entities that own the other parcel or parcels if the
entity or entities are wholly owned by that individual, members of his
or her family, or that individual and members of his or her family))
Any combination of one or more individuals and legal entities, where
the individuals and all of the owners of the legal entities are members
of the same family. As used in (b)(i)(B) of this subsection (6),
"legal entity" includes a trust in which all the beneficial owners of
the trust's real property are members of the same family.
(ii)(A) "Family" means both immediate and extended family and
includes ((only)):
(((A))) (I) An individual and his or her spouse or domestic
partner, child, stepchild, adopted child, grandchild, great-grandchild,
parent, stepparent, grandparent, great-grandparent, cousin, ((or))
sibling, aunt, uncle, niece, or nephew;
(((B))) (II) The spouse or domestic partner of an individual's
child, stepchild, adopted child, grandchild, great-grandchild, parent,
stepparent, grandparent, great-grandparent, cousin, ((or)) sibling,
aunt, uncle, niece, or nephew;
(((C))) (III) A child, stepchild, adopted child, grandchild, great-grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, great-grandparent, cousin,
((or)) sibling, aunt, uncle, niece, or nephew of the individual's
spouse or the individual's domestic partner; and
(((D))) (IV) The spouse or domestic partner of any individual
described in (b)(ii)(((C))) (A)(III) of this subsection (6).
(B) For the purposes of (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection, the term
"cousin" includes only those individuals who are a direct lineal
descendant of a family member who has held title to the property and
who share one or more common ancestors with all other persons making an
application under RCW 84.34.030.
(7) "Granting authority" means the appropriate agency or official
who acts on an application for classification of land pursuant to this
chapter.
(8) "Farm and agricultural conservation land" means either:
(a) Land that was previously classified under subsection (2) of
this section, that no longer meets the criteria of subsection (2) of
this section, and that is reclassified under subsection (1) of this
section; or
(b) Land that is traditional farmland that is not classified under
chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, that has not been irrevocably devoted to a
use inconsistent with agricultural uses, and that has a high potential
for returning to commercial agriculture.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.34.030 and 1989 c 378 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) An owner of agricultural land desiring current use
classification under ((subsection (2) of)) RCW 84.34.020 ((shall)) (2)
must make application to the county assessor upon forms prepared by the
state department of revenue and supplied by the county assessor.
(2) An owner of open space or timber land desiring current use
classification under ((subsections (1) and (3) of)) RCW 84.34.020
((shall)) (1) and (3) must make application to the county legislative
authority upon forms prepared by the state department of revenue and
supplied by the county assessor.
(3) The application ((shall)) must be accompanied by a reasonable
processing fee if such processing fee is established by the city or
county legislative authority. ((Said))
(4)(a) The application ((shall)) must require only such information
reasonably necessary to properly classify an area of land under this
chapter ((with a notarized verification of the truth thereof and
shall)). The application must include a declaration from each
applicant, in accordance with the requirements of RCW 9A.72.085, that
the information provided in the application is true; and, if
applicable, the parcels for which classification under this chapter is
sought meet the definition of contiguous in RCW 84.34.020. The
application must also include a statement that the applicant is aware
of the potential tax liability involved when such land ceases to be
designated as open space, farm and agricultural, or timber land.
(b) Applications must be made during the calendar year preceding
that in which such classification is to begin.
(5) The assessor ((shall)) must make necessary information,
including copies of this chapter and applicable regulations, readily
available to interested parties, and ((shall)) must render reasonable
assistance to such parties upon request.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.33.130 and 2003 c 170 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, lands that were
assessed as classified forest land before July 22, 2001, ((shall)) must
be designated forest land for the purposes of this chapter. The owners
of previously classified forest land ((shall)) are not ((be)) required
to apply for designation under this chapter. As of July 22, 2001, the
land and timber on such land ((shall)) must be assessed and taxed in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
(2) An owner of land desiring that it be designated as forest land
and valued under RCW 84.33.140 as of January 1st of any year ((shall))
must submit an application to the assessor of the county in which the
land is located before January 1st of that year. The application
((shall)) must be accompanied by a reasonable processing fee when the
county legislative authority has established the requirement for such
a fee.
(3) No application of designation is required when publicly owned
forest land is exchanged for privately owned forest land designated
under this chapter. The land exchanged and received by an owner
subject to ad valorem taxation ((shall be)) is automatically granted
designation under this chapter if the following conditions are met:
(a) The land will be used to grow and harvest timber; and
(b) The owner of the land submits a document to the assessor's
office that explains the details of the forest land exchange within
sixty days of the closing date of the exchange. However, if the owner
fails to submit information regarding the exchange by the end of this
sixty-day period, the owner must file an application for designation as
forest land under this chapter and the regular application process
((will)) must be followed.
(4) The application ((shall)) must be made upon forms prepared by
the department and supplied by the assessor, and ((shall)) must include
the following:
(a) A legal description of, or assessor's parcel numbers for, all
land the applicant desires to be designated as forest land;
(b) The date or dates of acquisition of the land;
(c) A brief description of the timber on the land, or if the timber
has been harvested, the owner's plan for restocking;
(d) A copy of the timber management plan, if one exists, for the
land prepared by a trained forester or any other person with adequate
knowledge of timber management practices;
(e) If a timber management plan exists, an explanation of the
nature and extent to which the management plan has been implemented;
(f) Whether the land is used for grazing;
(g) Whether the land has been subdivided or a plat has been filed
with respect to the land;
(h) Whether the land and the applicant are in compliance with the
restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect and disease
control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or any applicable
rules under Title 76 RCW;
(i) Whether the land is subject to forest fire protection
assessments under RCW 76.04.610;
(j) Whether the land is subject to a lease, option, or other right
that permits it to be used for any purpose other than growing and
harvesting timber;
(k) A summary of the past experience and activity of the applicant
in growing and harvesting timber;
(l) A summary of current and continuing activity of the applicant
in growing and harvesting timber;
(m) A statement that the applicant is aware of the potential tax
liability involved when the land ceases to be designated as forest
land;
(n) ((An affirmation)) A declaration from each applicant, in
accordance with the requirements of RCW 9A.72.085, that the statements
contained in the application are true ((and that)); the land described
in the application meets the definition of forest land in RCW
84.33.035; and, if applicable, the parcels for which designation under
this chapter is sought meet the definition of contiguous in RCW
84.34.020; and
(o) A description and/or drawing showing what areas of land for
which designation is sought are used for incidental uses compatible
with the definition of forest land in RCW 84.33.035.
(5) The assessor ((shall)) must afford the applicant an opportunity
to be heard if the applicant so requests.
(6) The assessor ((shall)) must act upon the application with due
regard to all relevant evidence and without any one or more items of
evidence necessarily being determinative, except that the application
may be denied for one of the following reasons, without regard to other
items:
(a) The land does not contain a "merchantable stand of timber" as
defined in chapter 76.09 RCW and applicable rules. This reason ((shall
not)) alone ((be)) is not sufficient to deny the application (i) if the
land has been recently harvested or supports a growth of brush or
noncommercial type timber, and the application includes a plan for
restocking within three years or a longer period necessitated by
unavailability of seed or seedlings, or (ii) if only isolated areas
within the land do not meet the minimum standards due to rock
outcroppings, swamps, unproductive soil or other natural conditions;
(b) The applicant, with respect to the land, has failed to comply
with a final administrative or judicial order with respect to a
violation of the restocking, forest management, fire protection, insect
and disease control, and forest debris provisions of Title 76 RCW or
any applicable rules under Title 76 RCW; or
(c) The land abuts a body of salt water and lies between the line
of ordinary high tide and a line paralleling the ordinary high tide
line and two hundred feet horizontally landward from the high tide
line. However, if the assessor determines that a higher and better use
exists for the land but this use would not be permitted or economically
feasible by virtue of any federal, state, or local law or regulation,
the land shall be assessed and valued under RCW 84.33.140 without being
designated as forest land.
(7) The application ((shall be)) is deemed to have been approved
unless, prior to May 1st of the year after the application was mailed
or delivered to the assessor, the assessor notifies the applicant in
writing of the extent to which the application is denied.
(8) An owner who receives notice that his or her application has
been denied, in whole or in part, may appeal the denial to the county
board of equalization in accordance with the provisions of RCW
84.40.038.

--- END ---