BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.30.820 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 74 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) The Olympic natural resources center shall operate under the
authority of the board of regents of the University of Washington. It
shall be administered by a director appointed jointly by the ((deans))
directors of the ((college)) school of environmental and forest
((resources)) sciences and the ((college)) school of ((ocean)) aquatic
and fishery sciences. The director of the center shall be a member of
the faculty of one of those ((colleges)) schools. The director of the
center shall appoint and maintain a scientific or technical committee,
and other committees as necessary, to advise the director on the
efficiency, effectiveness, and quality of the center's activities.
(2) The governor must appoint a policy advisory board consisting of
eleven members to advise the directors of the school of environmental
and forest sciences, the school of aquatic and fishery sciences, and
the Olympic natural resources center on policies for the center that
are consistent with its purposes. Membership on the policy advisory
board must broadly represent the various interests concerned with the
purposes of the center, including the Washington state department of
natural resources and state and federal government, environmental,
local community, timber industry, and tribal interests.
(3) Service on boards and committees of the Olympic natural
resources center is without compensation but actual travel expenses
incurred in connection with service to the center may be reimbursed
from appropriated funds in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.30.810 and 1991 c 316 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The Olympic natural resources center is hereby created at the
University of Washington in the ((college)) school of environmental and
forest ((resources)) sciences and the ((college)) school of ((ocean))
aquatic and fishery sciences.
(2) The Olympic natural resources center shall maintain facilities
and programs in the western portion of the Olympic Peninsula. ((Its))
The purpose ((shall be)) of the center is to demonstrate innovative
management methods which successfully integrate environmental, energy,
marine, and economic interests into pragmatic management of forest and
ocean resources. The center shall combine research and educational
opportunities with experimental forestry, oceans management, and
traditional management knowledge into an overall program which
demonstrates that management based on sound economic principles is made
superior when combined with new methods of management based on
ecological principles. The programs developed by the center shall
include the following:
(((1))) (a) Research and education on a broad range of ocean
resources problems and opportunities in the region, such as estuarine
processes, ocean and coastal management, renewable energy production,
offshore development, fisheries and shellfish enhancement, and coastal
business development, tourism, and recreation. In developing this
component of the center's program, the center shall collaborate with
coastal educational institutions such as Grays Harbor community college
and Peninsula community college;
(((2))) (b) Research and education on forest resources management
issues on the landscape, ecosystem, or regional level, including issues
that cross legal and administrative boundaries;
(((3))) (c) Research and education that broadly integrates marine
and terrestrial issues, including interactions of marine, aquatic, and
terrestrial ecosystems, and that identifies options and opportunities
to integrate the production of commodities with the preservation of
ecological values. Where appropriate, programs shall address issues
and opportunities that cross legal and administrative boundaries;
(((4))) (d) Research and education on natural resources and their
social and economic implications, and on alternative economic and
social bases for sustainable, healthy, resource-based communities;
(((5))) (e) Educational opportunities such as workshops, short
courses, and continuing education for resource professionals, policy
forums, information exchanges including international exchanges where
appropriate, conferences, student research, and public education; and
(((6))) (f) Creation of a neutral forum where parties with diverse
interests are encouraged to address and resolve their conflicts.

--- END ---