BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.80.020 and 2011 c 320 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A discover pass is required for any motor vehicle to park or
operate on any recreation site or lands, except for short-term parking
as may be authorized under RCW 79A.80.070.
(2) The cost of the discover pass is thirty dollars ((per motor
vehicle)). Every four years the office of financial management must
review the cost of the discover pass and, if necessary, recommend to
the legislature an adjustment to the cost of the discover pass to
account for inflation.
(3) The discover pass is valid for one year from the date of
issuance.
(4) The discover pass must be made available for purchase
throughout the year through the department of fish and wildlife's
automated licensing system consistent with RCW 77.32.050.
(5) The discover pass must be made available for purchase through
the department of licensing as provided in RCW 46.16A.090. The
department of licensing, county auditor, or other agent or subagent
appointed by the director, is not responsible for delivering a
purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle owner. The agencies must
deliver the purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle owner.
(6) The state parks and recreation commission may make the discover
pass available for purchase through its reservation system and other
outlets authorized by law to sell licenses, permits, or passes.
(7) The discover pass must contain space for ((the)) two motor
vehicle license plate numbers. A discover pass is valid only for those
vehicle license plate numbers written on the pass.
(8) A complimentary discover pass must be provided to a volunteer
who performed twenty-four hours of service on agency-sanctioned
volunteer projects in a year. The agency must provide vouchers to
volunteers identifying the number of volunteer hours they have provided
for each project. The vouchers may be brought to an agency to be
redeemed for a discover pass.

Sec. 2 RCW 79A.80.040 and 2011 c 320 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The vehicle access pass is created solely for access to the
department of fish and wildlife recreation sites or lands. The vehicle
access pass is only available to a person who purchases a current
valid: Big game hunting license issued under RCW 77.32.450; small game
hunting license issued under RCW 77.32.460; western Washington pheasant
permit issued under RCW 77.32.575; trapping license issued under RCW
77.65.450; watchable wildlife decal issued under RCW 77.32.560; or
combination, saltwater, or freshwater personal use fishing license
issued under RCW 77.32.470.
(2) One vehicle access pass must be issued per purchase pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The vehicle access pass is valid for the license year of the
license it is purchased with.
(4) The vehicle access pass must contain space for two motor
vehicle license plate numbers. A vehicle access pass is only valid for
those vehicle license plate numbers written on the pass.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A state agency may not refund money for
a pass or permit purchased prior to the effective date of this section.
(2) Each pass or permit purchased prior to the effective date of
this section is valid for two license plate numbers written on the
pass.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "pass or permit" refers to
the passes and permits defined in RCW 79A.80.010.

Sec. 4 RCW 79A.80.080 and 2011 c 320 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The)) A valid discover pass, ((the)) vehicle access pass, or
((the)) day-use permit must be visibly displayed in the front
windshield of any motor vehicle:
(a) Operating on a recreation site or lands; or
(b) Parking at a recreation site or lands.
(2) The discover pass, the vehicle access pass, or the day-use
permit is not required on private lands, state-owned aquatic lands
other than water access areas, or at agency offices, hatcheries, or
other facilities where public business is conducted.
(3)(a) The discover pass, the vehicle access pass, or the day-use
permit is not required for persons who use, possess, or enter lands
owned or managed by the agencies for purposes consistent with a written
authorization from the agency, including but not limited to leases,
contracts, and easements.
(b) The discover pass or the day-use permit is not required on
department of fish and wildlife lands for persons possessing a current
vehicle access pass pursuant to RCW 79A.80.040.
(4) Failure to comply with subsection (1) of this section is a
natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW. An agency is
authorized to issue a notice of infraction to any person who fails to
comply with subsection (1)(a) of this section or to any motor vehicle
that fails to comply with subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(5) The penalty for failure to comply with the requirements of this
section is ninety-nine dollars. This penalty is reduced to fifty-nine
dollars if an individual provides proof of purchase of the discover
pass to the court within fifteen days after the issuance of the notice
of violation.

Sec. 5 RCW 79A.80.010 and 2011 c 320 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Agency" or "agencies" means the department of fish and
wildlife, the department of natural resources, and the parks and
recreation commission.
(2) "Annual natural investment permit" means the annual permit
issued by the parks and recreation commission for the purpose of
launching boats from the designated state parks boat launch sites.
(3) "Camper registration" means proof of payment of a camping fee
on recreational lands managed by the parks and recreation commission.
(4) "Day-use permit" means the permit created in RCW 79A.80.030.
(5) "Discover pass" means the annual pass created in RCW
79A.80.020.
(6) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
46.04.320 and which are required to be registered under chapter 46.16A
RCW. "Motor vehicle" does not include those motor vehicles exempt from
registration under RCW 46.16A.080 and state and publicly owned motor
vehicles as provided in RCW 46.16A.170.
(7) "Recreation site or lands" means:
(a) A state park; ((or))
(b) Fish and wildlife conservation sites including water access
areas, boat ramps, wildlife areas, parking areas, roads, and
trailheads((,)); or
(c) Department of natural resources developed ((or designated))
recreation ((areas,)) sites, including campgrounds, trails and
trailheads, and the associated parking areas.
(8) "Sno-park seasonal permit" means the seasonal permit issued by
the parks and recreation commission for providing access to winter
recreational facilities for the period of November 1st through March
31st.
(9) "Vehicle access pass" means the pass created in RCW 79A.80.040.

--- END ---