BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that one if its
foremost duties is the prioritization and wise use of taxpayer funds.
During times of economic downturn, it is incumbent upon the legislature
to ensure limited state resources are spent prudently. Therefore, the
legislature intends to suspend spending on art related to capital
projects for the remainder of the 2011-2013 biennium and the 2013-2015
biennium.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.17.200 and 2005 c 36 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
All state agencies including all state departments, boards,
councils, commissions, and quasi public corporations ((shall)) must
allocate, as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for
the original construction of any public building, an amount of one-half
of one percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington
state arts commission for the acquisition of works of art. However, no
moneys may be expended, as of the effective date of this section, on
the acquisition of works of art for the 2011-2013 biennium through the
end of the 2013-2015 biennium, unless a contract for the acquisition of
art existed prior to the effective date of this section. The works of
art may be placed on public lands, integral to or attached to a public
building or structure, detached within or outside a public building or
structure, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a
temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public
facilities. In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half
of one percent of the appropriation as provided herein ((shall)) must
be used to provide for the administration of the visual arts program,
including conservation of the state art collection, by the Washington
state arts commission and all costs for installation of the works of
art. For the purpose of this section building ((shall)) does not
include highway construction sheds, warehouses or other buildings of a
temporary nature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act expires July 1, 2015.

--- END ---