BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that synthetic
substances have been developed for research purposes. Legitimate
nonresearch uses have neither been identified for synthetic
cannabimimetics or certain substituted cathinones nor have they been
approved for human consumption by the United States food and drug
administration.
The legislature further finds that the popularity of synthetic
cannabimimetics and certain substituted cathinones has greatly
increased in the United States and they are being abused for their
psychoactive properties. Products containing synthetic cannabimimetics
are marketed as legal alternatives to marijuana and are being sold over
the internet and in tobacco and smoke shops, drug paraphernalia shops,
and convenience stores. Due to their method of manufacture and high
pharmacological potency, synthetic cannabimimetics are potentially
extremely harmful; for some users, smoking synthetic cannabimimetics
for the purpose of achieving intoxication and experiencing the
psychoactive effects has led to emergency room visits and calls to
poison control centers. Certain substituted cathinones are similarly
being deceptively marketed as bath salts, and have been abused by
persons in the state in order to achieve intoxication, resulting in
emergency calls and hospitalizations. Consequently, placement of the
synthetic cannabimimetics listed in RCW 69.50.204(c)(30) and certain
substituted cathinones into schedule I of the uniform controlled
substances act is necessary to avoid an imminent hazard to public
safety.

Sec. 2 RCW 69.50.204 and 2010 c 177 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless specifically excepted by state or federal law or regulation
or more specifically included in another schedule, the following
controlled substances are listed in Schedule I:
(a) Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters,
ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers whenever the
existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible
within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide);
(2) Acetylmethadol;
(3) Allylprodine;
(4) Alphacetylmethadol, except levo-alphacetylmethadol, also known
as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM;
(5) Alphameprodine;
(6) Alphamethadol;
(7) Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl) ethyl-4-piperidyl] propionanilide); (1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido) piperidine);
(8) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(9) Benzethidine;
(10) Betacetylmethadol;
(11) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(12) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl, some trade or other names: N-[1-(2-hydrox-2-phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide;
(13) Betameprodine;
(14) Betamethadol;
(15) Betaprodine;
(16) Clonitazene;
(17) Dextromoramide;
(18) Diampromide;
(19) Diethylthiambutene;
(20) Difenoxin;
(21) Dimenoxadol;
(22) Dimepheptanol;
(23) Dimethylthiambutene;
(24) Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
(25) Dipipanone;
(26) Ethylmethylthiambutene;
(27) Etonitazene;
(28) Etoxeridine;
(29) Furethidine;
(30) Hydroxypethidine;
(31) Ketobemidone;
(32) Levomoramide;
(33) Levophenacylmorphan;
(34) 3-Methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylprop anamide);
(35) 3-Methylthiofentanyl (N-[(3-methyl-1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide);
(36) Morpheridine;
(37) MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);
(38) Noracymethadol;
(39) Norlevorphanol;
(40) Normethadone;
(41) Norpipanone;
(42) Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl] propanamide);
(43) PEPAP(1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine);
(44) Phenadoxone;
(45) Phenampromide;
(46) Phenomorphan;
(47) Phenoperidine;
(48) Piritramide;
(49) Proheptazine;
(50) Properidine;
(51) Propiram;
(52) Racemoramide;
(53) Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-propanaminde);
(54) Tilidine;
(55) Trimeperidine.
(b) Opium derivatives. Unless specifically excepted or unless
listed in another schedule, any of the following opium derivatives,
including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the
existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible
within the specific chemical designation:
(1) Acetorphine;
(2) Acetyldihydrocodeine;
(3) Benzylmorphine;
(4) Codeine methylbromide;
(5) Codeine-N-Oxide;
(6) Cyprenorphine;
(7) Desomorphine;
(8) Dihydromorphine;
(9) Drotebanol;
(10) Etorphine, except hydrochloride salt;
(11) Heroin;
(12) Hydromorphinol;
(13) Methyldesorphine;
(14) Methyldihydromorphine;
(15) Morphine methylbromide;
(16) Morphine methylsulfonate;
(17) Morphine-N-Oxide;
(18) Myrophine;
(19) Nicocodeine;
(20) Nicomorphine;
(21) Normorphine;
(22) Pholcodine;
(23) Thebacon.
(c) Hallucinogenic substances. Unless specifically excepted or
unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or
preparation which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic
substances, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers
whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is
possible within the specific chemical designation. For the purposes of
this subsection only, the term "isomer" includes the optical, position,
and geometric isomers:
(1) Alpha-ethyltryptamine: Some trade or other names:
Etryptamine; monase; a-ethyl-1H-indole-3-ethanamine; 3-(2-aminobutyl)
indole; a-ET; and AET;
(2) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine: Some trade or other names:
4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; 4-bromo-2,5-DMA;
(3) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine: Some trade or other
names: 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-1-aminoethane; alpha-desmethyl
DOB; 2C-B, nexus;
(4) 2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine: Some trade or other names: 2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; 2,5-DMA;
(5) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine (DOET);
(6) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine: Other name:
2C-T-7;
(7) 4-methoxyamphetamine: Some trade or other names: 4-methoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; paramethoxyamphetamine, PMA;
(8) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine;
(9) 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine: Some trade and other
names: 4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-a-methylphenethylamine; "DOM"; and
"STP";
(10) 3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine;
(11) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);
(12) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine, also known as N-ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, MDE, MDEA;
(13) N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine also known as
N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine,N-hydroxy MDA;
(14) 3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine;
(15) Alpha-methyltryptamine: Other name: AMT;
(16) Bufotenine: Some trade or other names: 3-(beta-
Dimethylaminoethyl)-5-hydroxindole; 3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl)-5-indolol;
N, N-dimethylserotonin; 5-hydroxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine; mappine;
(17) Diethyltryptamine: Some trade or other names: N,N-Diethyltryptamine; DET;
(18) Dimethyltryptamine: Some trade or other names: DMT;
(19) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine: Other name: 5-MeO-DIPT;
(20) Ibogaine: Some trade or other names: 7-Ethyl-6,6
beta,7,8,9,10,12,13,-octahydro-2-methoxy-6,9-methano-5H-pyndo (1',2'
1,2) azepino (5,4-b) indole; Tabernanthe iboga;
(21) Lysergic acid diethylamide;
(22) Marihuana or marijuana;
(23) Mescaline;
(24) Parahexyl-7374: Some trade or other names: 3-Hexyl-1-hydroxy-7, 8, 9, 10-tetrahydro-6, 6, 9-trimethyl-6H-dibenzo[b,d]pyran;
synhexyl;
(25) Peyote, meaning all parts of the plant presently classified
botanically as Lophophora Williamsii Lemaire, whether growing or not,
the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of such plant, and every
compound, manufacture, salts, derivative, mixture, or preparation of
such plant, its seeds, or extracts; (interprets 21 U.S.C. Sec. 812 (c),
Schedule I (c)(12));
(26) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
(27) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
(28) Psilocybin;
(29) Psilocyn;
(30) Any of the following synthetic cannabimimetics, their salts,
isomers, and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever
the existence of these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible
within the specific chemical designation:
(i) Naphthoylindoles: Any compound containing a
3-(1-naphthoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom
of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or
2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the
indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the
naphthyl ring to any extent;
(ii) Naphthylmethylindoles: Any compound containing a
1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane structure with substitution at the
nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or
2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the
indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the
naphthyl ring to any extent;
(iii) Naphthoylpyrroles: Any compound containing a
3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom
of the pyrrole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or
2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the
pyrrole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the
naphthyl ring to any extent;
(iv) Naphthylmethylindenes: Any compound containing a
naphthylideneindene structure with substitution at the 3-position of
the indene ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or
2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the
indene ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the
naphthyl ring to any extent;
(v) Phenylacetylindoles: Any compound containing a
3-phenylacetylindole structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom
of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or
2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted in the
indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in the phenyl
ring to any extent;
(vi) Cyclohexylphenols: Any compound containing a
2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure with substitution at the
5-position of the phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or
2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not substituted in the
cyclohexyl ring to any extent;
(vii) Benzoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by
an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group,
whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and
whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent;
(viii) 2,3-Dihydro-5-methyl-3-(4-morpholinylmethyl)pyrrolo
[1,2,3-de]-1,4-benzoxazin-6-yl]-1-napthalenylmethanone: Some trade or
other names: WIN 55,212-2;
(31) Tetrahydrocannabinols, meaning tetrahydrocannabinols naturally
contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis (cannabis plant), as well as
synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, or in
the resinous extractives of Cannabis, species, and/or synthetic
substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical
structure and pharmacological activity such as the following:
(i) 1 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical
isomers, excluding tetrahydrocannabinol in sesame oil and encapsulated
in a soft gelatin capsule in a drug product approved by the United
States Food and Drug Administration;
(ii) 6 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical
isomers;
(iii) 3,4 - cis - or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical
isomers;
(iv) (6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6, 6-dimethyl-3-
(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10, 10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol: Some
trade or other names: HU-210;
(Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally
standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical
designation of atomic positions covered.)
(((31))) (32) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine: Some trade or
other names: N-ethyl-1phenylcyclohexalymine, (1-phenylcyclohexl)
ethylamine; N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)ethylamine; cyclohexamine; PCE;
(((32))) (33) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine: Some trade or
other names: 1-(1-phencyclohexyl)pyrrolidine; PCPy; PHP;
(((33))) (34) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine: Some trade or
other names: 1-(1-[2-thenyl]-cyclohexly)-pipendine; 2-thienylanalog of
phencyclidine; TPCP; TCP;
(((34))) (35) 1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrrolidine: A trade or
other name is TCPy.
(d) Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant
effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation.
(1) Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid: Some other names include GHB;
gamma-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutanoic acid;
sodium oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate;
(2) Mecloqualone;
(3) Methaqualone.
(e) Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which
contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant
effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers:
(1) Aminorex: Some other names: aminoxaphen; 2-amino-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline; or 4, 5-dihydro-5-phenly-2-oxazolamine;
(2) N-Benzylpiperazine: Some other names: BZP,1-benzylpiperazine;
(3) Cathinone, also known as 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone,
alpha-aminopropiophenone, 2-aminopropiophenone and norephedrone;
(4) Fenethylline;
(5) Methcathinone: Some other names: 2-(methylamino)-propiophenone; alpha-(methylamino)propiophenone; 2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpropan-1-one; alpha-N-methylaminopropiophenone;
monomethylpropion; ephedrone; N-methylcathinone; methylcathinone; AL-464; AL-422; AL-463 and UR1432, its salts, optical isomers, and salts
of optical isomers;
(6) (+-)cis-4-methylaminorex ((+-)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine);
(7) N-ethylamphetamine;
(8) N,N-dimethylamphetamine: Some trade or other names: N,N-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine; N,N-alpha-trimethylphenoethylene;
(9) Any compound structurally derived from 2-amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone (cathinone), including its salts, isomers, and salts of
isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of such
salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation, in one or more of the following ways:
(i) By substitution of the phenyl ring with alkyl, haloalkyl,
alkoxy, alkylenedioxy, or halide groups, whether or not further
substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent;
(ii) By substitution at the 3-position with an alkyl group;
(iii) By substitution at the nitrogen atom with alkyl or dialky
groups, or by inclusion of the nitrogen in a pyrrolidino or phthalimido
group;
(iv) The following compounds excepted: Bupropion.
The controlled substances in this section may be added,
rescheduled, or deleted as provided for in RCW 69.50.201.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---