BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.36.100 and 1988 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of custodial assault if that person is not
guilty of an assault in the first or second degree and where the
person:
(a) Assaults a full or part-time staff member or volunteer, any
educational personnel, any personal service provider, or any vendor or
agent thereof at any juvenile corrections institution or local juvenile
detention facilities who was performing official duties at the time of
the assault;
(b) Assaults a full or part-time staff member or volunteer, any
educational personnel, any personal service provider, or any vendor or
agent thereof at any adult corrections institution or local adult
detention facilities who was performing official duties at the time of
the assault;
(c)(((i))) Assaults a full or part-time community corrections
officer, other full or part-time community corrections office employee,
or volunteer while the officer, employee, or volunteer is performing
official duties; or
(((ii) Assaults any other full or part-time employee who is
employed in a community corrections office while the employee is
performing official duties; or))
(d) Assaults ((any volunteer who was assisting a person described
in (c) of this subsection)) a full or part-time staff member or
volunteer, any educational personnel, any personal service provider, or
any vendor or agent thereof at any state hospital under RCW 72.23.010
who was performing official duties at the time of the assault.
(2) Custodial assault is a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW
to read as follows:
A jail may not refuse to book a patient of a state hospital solely
based on the patient's status as a state hospital patient, but may
consider other relevant factors that apply to the individual
circumstances in each case.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A state hospital may administer antipsychotic medication
without consent to an individual who is committed under this chapter as
criminally insane by following the same procedures applicable to the
administration of antipsychotic medication without consent to a civilly
committed patient under RCW 71.05.217, except for the following:
(a) The maximum period during which the court may authorize the
administration of medication without consent under a single involuntary
medication petition shall be the time remaining on the individual's
current order of commitment or one hundred eighty days, whichever is
shorter; and
(b) A petition for involuntary medication may be filed in either
the superior court of the county that ordered the commitment or the
superior court of the county in which the individual is receiving
treatment, provided that a copy of any order that is entered must be
provided to the superior court of the county that ordered the
commitment following the hearing. The superior court of the county of
commitment shall retain exclusive jurisdiction over all hearings
concerning the release of the patient.
(2) The state has a compelling interest in providing antipsychotic
medication to a patient who has been committed as criminally insane
when refusal of antipsychotic medication would result in a likelihood
of serious harm or substantial deterioration or substantially prolong
the length of involuntary commitment and there is no less intrusive
course of treatment than medication in the best interest of the
patient.

--- END ---