BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21M.010 and 2009 c 519 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The departments of ecology, agriculture, ((community, trade,
and economic development)) commerce, fish and wildlife, natural
resources, and transportation shall develop an integrated climate
change response strategy to better enable state and local agencies,
public and private businesses, nongovernmental organizations, and
individuals to prepare for, address, and adapt to the impacts of
climate change. The integrated climate change response strategy should
be developed, where feasible and consistent with the direction of the
strategy, in collaboration with local government agencies with climate
change preparation and adaptation plans.
(2) The department of ecology shall serve as a central
clearinghouse for relevant scientific and technical information about
the impacts of climate change on Washington's ecology, economy, and
society, as well as serve as a central convener for the development of
vital programs and necessary policies to help the state adapt to a
rapidly changing climate.
(3) The department of ecology shall consult and collaborate with
the departments of fish and wildlife, agriculture, ((community, trade,
and economic development)) commerce, natural resources, and
transportation in developing an integrated climate change response
strategy and plans of action to prepare for and adapt to climate change
impacts.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.21M.020 and 2009 c 519 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The integrated climate change response strategy should address
the impact of and adaptation to climate change, as well as the regional
capacity to undertake actions, existing ecosystem and resource
management concerns, and health and economic risks. In addition, the
departments of ecology, agriculture, ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce, fish and wildlife, natural resources, and
transportation should include a range of scenarios for the purposes of
planning in order to assess project vulnerability and, to the extent
feasible, reduce expected risks and increase resiliency to the impacts
of climate change.
(2)(a) By December 1, 2011, and every ten years thereafter, the
department of ecology shall compile ((an initial)) a climate change
response strategy, including information and data from the departments
of fish and wildlife, agriculture, ((community, trade, and economic
development)) commerce, natural resources, and transportation that:
Summarizes the best known science on climate change impacts to
Washington; assesses Washington's vulnerability to the identified
climate change impacts; prioritizes solutions that can be implemented
within and across state agencies; and identifies recommended funding
mechanisms and technical and other essential resources for implementing
solutions.
(b) The ((initial)) strategy must include:
(i) Efforts to identify priority planning areas for action, based
on vulnerability and risk assessments;
(ii) Barriers challenging state and local governments to take
action, such as laws, policies, regulations, rules, and procedures that
require revision to adequately address adaptation to climate change;
(iii) Opportunities to integrate climate science and projected
impacts into planning and decision making; and
(iv) Methods to increase public awareness of climate change, its
projected impacts on the community, and to build support for meaningful
adaptation policies and strategies.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.21M.030 and 2009 c 519 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
The departments of ecology, agriculture, ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce, fish and wildlife, natural resources,
and transportation may consult with qualified nonpartisan experts from
the scientific community as needed to assist with developing an
integrated climate change response strategy. The qualified nonpartisan
experts from the scientific community may assist the department of
ecology on the following components:
(1) Identifying the timing and extent of impacts from climate
change;
(2) Assessing the effects of climate variability and change in the
context of multiple interacting stressors or impacts;
(3) Developing forecasting models;
(4) Determining the resilience of the environment, natural systems,
communities, and organizations to deal with potential or actual impacts
of climate change and the vulnerability to which a natural or social
system is susceptible to sustaining damage from climate change impacts;
and
(5) Identifying other issues, as determined by the department of
ecology, necessary to develop policies and actions for the integrated
climate change response strategy.

--- END ---