BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Consistent with RCW 43.01.036, the
department of ecology must submit a report to the appropriate standing
committees of the senate and house of representatives by September 1,
2012, that includes: A summary of and update on actions taken to
implement chapter 122, Laws of 2011, which dealt with oil spills and
the state's oil spill program; and legislative recommendations, if any.
(2) This section expires December 31, 2012.

--- END ---