BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Consistent with RCW 43.01.036, the
department of ecology must submit a report to the appropriate standing
committees of the senate and house of representatives by September 1,
2012, that includes: A summary of and update on its ongoing actions
under the shoreline management act, chapter 90.58 RCW; significant
developments and issues regarding local shoreline master programs; and
relevant legislative recommendations, if any.
(2) This section expires December 31, 2012.

--- END ---