BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.09.260 and 2009 c 564 s 927 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The examination of the financial affairs of all local
governments shall be made at such reasonable, periodic intervals as the
state auditor shall determine. However, an examination of the
financial affairs of all local governments shall be made at least once
in every three years, and an examination of individual local government
health and welfare benefit plans and local government self-insurance
programs shall be made at least once every two years.
(2) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the state auditor shall
conduct audits no more often than once every two years of local
governments with annual general fund revenues of ten million dollars or
less and no findings of impropriety for the three-year period
immediately preceding the audit period. This subsection does not
prohibit the state auditor from conducting audits: (a) To address
suspected fraud or irregular conduct; (b) at the request of the local
government governing body; or (c) as required by federal laws or
regulations.
(3) The term local governments for purposes of this chapter
includes but is not limited to all counties, cities, and other
political subdivisions, municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal
corporations, however denominated.
(4) The state auditor shall establish a schedule to govern the
auditing of local governments which shall include: A designation of
the various classifications of local governments; a designation of the
frequency for auditing each type of local government; and a description
of events which cause a more frequent audit to be conducted.
(5) On every such examination, inquiry shall be made as to the
financial condition and resources of the local government; whether the
Constitution and laws of the state, the ordinances and orders of the
local government, and the requirements of the state auditor have been
properly complied with; and into the methods and accuracy of the
accounts and reports. If a local government has received a formal or
informal opinion from the attorney general on a specific matter
relating to the exercise of its duties, the state auditor must
interpret any questions of law regarding that local government's
exercise of its duties consistent with the attorney general. This
requirement only relates to instances where the attorney general has
issued an opinion regarding a specific set of facts and a specific
local government, and it is limited to the state auditor's financial
audits of that local government during that audit period. The state
auditor does not have to rely on formal or informal opinions from the
attorney general if there has been a subsequent court decision on the
issue or if the state law in question has been amended since the formal
or informal opinion was issued.
(6) A report of such examination shall be made and filed in the
office of state auditor, and one copy shall be transmitted to the local
government. A copy of any report containing findings of noncompliance
with state law shall be transmitted to the attorney general. If any
such report discloses malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in
office on the part of any public officer or employee, within thirty
days from the receipt of his or her copy of the report, the attorney
general shall institute, in the proper county, such legal action as is
proper in the premises by civil process and prosecute the same to final
determination to carry into effect the findings of the examination.
(7) It shall be unlawful for any local government or the
responsible head thereof, to make a settlement or compromise of any
claim arising out of such malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance, or
any action commenced therefor, or for any court to enter upon any
compromise or settlement of such action, without the written approval
and consent of the attorney general and the state auditor.

--- END ---