BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that small alternative
energy resource facilities provide various benefits to local
communities such as: Reducing emissions of air, soil, and water
pollutants; creating local jobs; securing a diversified energy supply;
and contributing to the development of a clean, sustainable energy
industry. The legislature finds that the implementation of state
policies that support the development of small alternative energy
resource facilities may be hindered by the lack of appropriate local
ordinances to permit the siting of these facilities.
The legislature finds that the energy facility site evaluation
council maintains the necessary expertise to evaluate proposed energy
projects, balancing the demand for new energy facilities with
protection of environmental quality and safety of energy facilities.
The legislature intends to ensure that small alternative energy
resource facilities are sited in a timely manner in local jurisdictions
where there are no existing ordinances to permit these facilities,
where applicable ordinances have not been updated in over ten years, or
where ordinances have been adopted that impede the timely permitting of
these facilities.
Additionally, it is the intent of the legislature to encourage
local governments to enter into interlocal agreements with the energy
facility site evaluation council for the purpose of authorizing the
council to issue permits for small alternative energy resource
facilities that are proposed within the geographic jurisdiction of a
local government, if the local government determines that it would be
more cost-effective for the council to permit these facilities.
The legislature finds that it may be more cost-effective in some
cases for the state to provide a centralized small renewable energy
resource facility permitting agency than for each county and
municipality to maintain individual permitting staff.

Sec. 2 RCW 80.50.040 and 2001 c 214 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
The council shall have the following powers:
(1) To adopt, ((promulgate,)) amend, or rescind suitable rules and
regulations, pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, to carry out the provisions
of this chapter, and the policies and practices of the council in
connection therewith;
(2) To develop and apply environmental and ecological guidelines in
relation to the type, design, location, construction, and operational
conditions of certification of energy facilities subject to this
chapter;
(3) To establish rules of practice for the conduct of public
hearings pursuant to the provisions of the administrative procedure
act, as found in chapter 34.05 RCW;
(4) To prescribe the form, content, and necessary supporting
documentation for site certification;
(5) To receive applications for energy facility locations and to
investigate the sufficiency thereof;
(6) To make and contract, when applicable, for independent studies
of sites proposed by the applicant;
(7) To conduct hearings on the proposed location of the energy
facilities;
(8) To prepare written reports to the governor which shall include:
(a) A statement indicating whether the application is in compliance
with the council's guidelines, (b) criteria specific to the site and
transmission line routing, (c) a council recommendation as to the
disposition of the application, and (d) a draft certification agreement
when the council recommends approval of the application;
(9) To prescribe the means for monitoring of the effects arising
from the construction and the operation of energy facilities to
((assure)) ensure continued compliance with terms of certification
and/or permits issued by the council pursuant to chapter 90.48 RCW or
subsection (12) of this section: PROVIDED, That any on-site inspection
required by the council shall be performed by other state and local
agencies pursuant to interagency agreement: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
council may retain authority for determining compliance relative to
monitoring or may delegate authority for ensuring compliance with the
terms of the certificate and/or permits to other state or local
agencies;
(10) To integrate its site evaluation activity with activities of
federal agencies having jurisdiction in such matters to avoid
unnecessary duplication;
(11) To present state concerns and interests to other states,
regional organizations, and the federal government on the location,
construction, and operation of any energy facility which may affect the
environment, health, or safety of the citizens of the state of
Washington;
(12) To issue permits in compliance with applicable provisions of
the federally approved state implementation plan adopted in accordance
with the federal clean air act, as now existing or hereafter amended,
for the new construction, reconstruction, or enlargement or operation
of energy facilities: PROVIDED, That such permits shall become
effective only if the governor approves an application for
certification and executes a certification agreement pursuant to this
chapter: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That all such permits be conditioned
upon compliance with all provisions of the federally approved state
implementation plan which apply to energy facilities covered within the
provisions of this chapter; ((and))
(13) To serve as an interagency coordinating body for energy-related issues; and
(14) To issue site permits, using generally established safety
standards as provided under section 7(5) of this act, for the
construction, reconstruction, or enlargement of small alternative
energy resource facilities.

Sec. 3 RCW 80.50.060 and 2007 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction of
energy facilities which includes the new construction of energy
facilities and the reconstruction or enlargement of existing energy
facilities where the net increase in physical capacity or dimensions
resulting from such reconstruction or enlargement meets or exceeds
those capacities or dimensions set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (((7) and
(15))) (12) and (21). No construction of such energy facilities may be
undertaken, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, after July
15, 1977, without first obtaining certification in the manner provided
in this chapter.
(2) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction,
reconstruction, or enlargement of a new or existing energy facility
that exclusively uses alternative energy resources and chooses to
receive certification under this chapter, regardless of the generating
capacity of the project.
(3)(a) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction,
reconstruction, or modification of electrical transmission facilities
when:
(i) The facilities are located in a national interest electric
transmission corridor as specified in RCW 80.50.045;
(ii) An applicant chooses to receive certification under this
chapter, and the facilities are: (A) Of a nominal voltage of at least
one hundred fifteen thousand volts and are located in a completely new
corridor, except for the terminus of the new facility or
interconnection of the new facility with the existing grid, and the
corridor is not otherwise used for electrical transmission facilities;
and (B) located in more than one jurisdiction that has promulgated land
use plans or zoning ordinances; or
(iii) An applicant chooses to receive certification under this
chapter, and the facilities are: (A) Of a nominal voltage in excess of
one hundred fifteen thousand volts; and (B) located outside an
electrical transmission corridor identified in (a)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection (3).
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "modify" means a
significant change to an electrical transmission facility and does not
include the following: (i) Minor improvements such as the replacement
of existing transmission line facilities or supporting structures with
equivalent facilities or structures; (ii) the relocation of existing
electrical transmission line facilities; (iii) the conversion of
existing overhead lines to underground; or (iv) the placing of new or
additional conductors, supporting structures, insulators, or their
accessories on or replacement of supporting structures already built.
(4) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to normal
maintenance and repairs which do not increase the capacity or
dimensions beyond those set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (((7) and (15)))
(12) and (21).
(5) Applications for certification of energy facilities made prior
to July 15, 1977, shall continue to be governed by the applicable
provisions of law in effect on the day immediately preceding July 15,
1977, with the exceptions of RCW 80.50.190 and 80.50.071 which shall
apply to such prior applications and to site certifications
prospectively from July 15, 1977.
(6) Applications for certification shall be upon forms prescribed
by the council and shall be supported by such information and technical
studies as the council may require.
(7) The provisions of this chapter apply to the installation of a
small alternative energy resource facility if a person chooses to apply
to the council in order to receive site certification for a small
alternative energy resource facility under this chapter.

Sec. 4 RCW 80.50.071 and 2011 c 261 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The council shall receive all applications for energy facility
site certification. Except as provided under sections 8 and 9 of this
act, each applicant shall pay such reasonable costs as are actually and
necessarily incurred by the council in processing an application.
(a) Each applicant shall, at the time of application submission,
deposit fifty thousand dollars, or such greater amount as may be
specified by the council after consultation with the applicant. Costs
that may be charged against the deposit include, but are not limited
to, independent consultants' costs, councilmember's wages, employee
benefits, costs of a hearing examiner, costs of a court reporter, staff
salaries, wages and employee benefits, goods and services, travel
expenses, and miscellaneous direct expenses as arise directly from
processing an application.
(b) The council may commission its own independent consultant study
to measure the consequences of the proposed energy facility on the
environment or any matter that it deems essential to an adequate
appraisal of the site. The council shall provide an estimate of the
cost of the study to the applicant and consider applicant comments.
(c) The council shall submit to each applicant a statement of such
expenditures made during the preceding calendar quarter which shall be
in sufficient detail to explain such expenditures. The applicant shall
pay the state treasurer the amount of such statement to restore the
total amount on deposit to the originally established level: PROVIDED,
That such applicant may, at the request of the council, increase the
amount of funds on deposit to cover anticipated expenses during peak
periods of application processing. Any funds remaining unexpended at
the conclusion of application processing shall be refunded to the
applicant, or at the applicant's option, credited against required
deposits of certificate holders.
(2) Each certificate holder shall pay such reasonable costs as are
actually and necessarily incurred by the council for inspection and
determination of compliance by the certificate holder with the terms of
the certification relative to monitoring the effects of construction,
operation, and site restoration of the facility.
(a) Each certificate holder, within thirty days of execution of the
site certification agreement, shall have on deposit fifty thousand
dollars, or such greater amount as may be specified by the council
after consultation with the certificate holder. Costs that may be
charged against the deposit include, but are not limited to, those
specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section as arise from inspection
and determination of compliance by the certificate holder with the
terms of the certification.
(b) The council shall submit to each certificate holder a statement
of such expenditures actually made during the preceding calendar
quarter which shall be in sufficient detail to explain such
expenditures. The certificate holder shall pay the state treasurer the
amount of such statement to restore the total amount on deposit to the
originally established level: PROVIDED, That if the actual
expenditures for inspection and determination of compliance in the
preceding calendar quarter have exceeded the amount of funds on
deposit, such excess costs shall be paid by the certificate holder.
(3) If an applicant or certificate holder fails to provide the
initial deposit, or if subsequently required payments are not received
within thirty days following receipt of the statement from the council,
the council may (a) in the case of the applicant, suspend processing of
the application until payment is received; or (b) in the case of a
certificate holder, suspend the certification.
(4) All payments required of the applicant or certificate holder
under this section are to be made to the state treasurer who shall make
payments as instructed by the council from the funds submitted. All
such funds shall be subject to state auditing procedures. Any
unexpended portions thereof shall be returned to the applicant or
certificate holder.
(5)(a) Upon receipt of an application for an energy facility site
certification proposing an energy plant or alternative energy resource
that is connected to electrical transmission facilities of a nominal
voltage of at least one hundred fifteen thousand volts, the council
shall notify in writing the United States department of defense. The
notification shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
(i) A description of the proposed energy plant or alternative
energy resource;
(ii) The location of the site;
(iii) The placement of the energy plant or alternative energy
resource on the site;
(iv) The date and time by which comments must be received by the
council; and
(v) Contact information of the council and the applicant.
(b) The purpose of the written notification is to provide an
opportunity for the United States department of defense to comment upon
the application, and to identify potential issues relating to the
placement and operations of the energy plant or alternative energy
resource, before a site certification application is approved. The
time period set forth by the council for receipt of such comments shall
not extend the time period for the council's processing of the
application.
(c) In order to assist local governments required to notify the
United States department of defense under RCW 35.63.270, 35A.63.290,
and 36.01.320, the council shall post on its web site the appropriate
information for contacting the United States department of defense.

Sec. 5 RCW 80.50.090 and 2006 c 205 s 3 and 2006 c 196 s 6 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The council shall conduct an informational public hearing in
the county of the proposed site as soon as practicable but not later
than sixty days after receipt of an application for site certification.
However, the place of such public hearing shall be as close as
practical to the proposed site.
(2) Subsequent to the informational public hearing, the council
shall conduct a public hearing to determine whether or not the proposed
site is consistent and in compliance with city, county, or regional
land use plans or zoning ordinances. If it is determined that the
proposed site does conform with existing land use plans or zoning
ordinances in effect as of the date of the application, the city,
county, or regional planning authority shall not thereafter change such
land use plans or zoning ordinances so as to affect the proposed site.
(3) Prior to the issuance of a council recommendation to the
governor under RCW 80.50.100 a public hearing, conducted as an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act, shall be held. At such public hearing any person shall
be entitled to be heard in support of or in opposition to the
application for certification.
(4) Additional public hearings shall be held as deemed appropriate
by the council in the exercise of its functions under this chapter.
(5) This section does not apply to sections 7 and 8 of this act.

Sec. 6 RCW 80.50.100 and 2011 c 180 s 109 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The council shall report to the governor its recommendations
as to the approval or rejection of an application for certification
within twelve months of receipt by the council of such an application,
or such later time as is mutually agreed by the council and the
applicant.
(b) In the case of an application filed prior to December 31, 2025,
for certification of an energy facility proposed for construction,
modification, or expansion for the purpose of providing generating
facilities that meet the requirements of RCW 80.80.040 and are located
in a county with a coal-fired electric ((generating [generation]))
generation facility subject to RCW 80.80.040(3)(c), the council shall
expedite the processing of the application pursuant to RCW 80.50.075
and shall report its recommendations to the governor within one hundred
eighty days of receipt by the council of such an application, or a
later time as is mutually agreed by the council and the applicant.
(2) If the council recommends approval of an application for
certification, it shall also submit a draft certification agreement
with the report. The council shall include conditions in the draft
certification agreement to implement the provisions of this chapter,
including, but not limited to, conditions to protect state or local
governmental or community interests affected by the construction or
operation of the energy facility, and conditions designed to recognize
the purpose of laws or ordinances, or rules or regulations promulgated
thereunder, that are preempted or superseded pursuant to RCW 80.50.110
as now or hereafter amended.
(3)(a) Within sixty days of receipt of the council's report the
governor shall take one of the following actions:
(i) Approve the application and execute the draft certification
agreement; or
(ii) Reject the application; or
(iii) Direct the council to reconsider certain aspects of the draft
certification agreement.
(b) The council shall reconsider such aspects of the draft
certification agreement by reviewing the existing record of the
application or, as necessary, by reopening the adjudicative proceeding
for the purposes of receiving additional evidence. Such
reconsideration shall be conducted expeditiously. The council shall
resubmit the draft certification to the governor incorporating any
amendments deemed necessary upon reconsideration. Within sixty days of
receipt of such draft certification agreement, the governor shall
either approve the application and execute the certification agreement
or reject the application. The certification agreement shall be
binding upon execution by the governor and the applicant.
(4) The rejection of an application for certification by the
governor shall be final as to that application but shall not preclude
submission of a subsequent application for the same site on the basis
of changed conditions or new information.
(5) This section does not apply to sections 7 and 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 80.50 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may apply to the council for a site permit for a small
alternative energy resource facility if one or more of the following
conditions is met:
(a) The facility is located in a county or municipality that has
not adopted ordinances for the permitting of small alternative energy
resource facilities;
(b) The facility is located in a county or municipality that has
not updated its ordinances for the permitting of small alternative
energy resource facilities in over ten years; or
(c) The county or municipal permitting process for a proposed small
alternative energy resource facility exceeds six months from time of
application and the proposed facility meets generally established
safety standards.
(2) The application for small alternative energy resource facility
processing must be submitted to the council in the form and manner as
may be determined by motion and vote of the council.
(3)(a) Any person, before submitting an application for a small
alternative energy resource facility site permit, may submit a letter
to the council to inquire as to whether a proposed small alternative
energy resource facility would require mitigation and receive a written
estimate from the council of the cost of processing the application.
(b) Within thirty days of receiving such a letter of inquiry, the
council must provide a response to what mitigation, at a minimum, might
be required and a written estimate of the cost of processing the site
permit application.
(4) The council shall develop a site permitting process for small
alternative energy resource facilities.
(5)(a) The council must survey for and determine generally
established safety standards for each type of small alternative energy
resource facility and adopt site permitting standards based on the
council's review of these standards.
(b)(i) In surveying for and determining generally established
safety standards, the council must use existing local municipal and
county small alternative energy resource facility ordinances in
Washington adopted in the last ten years giving preference to
ordinances established in neighboring jurisdictions to the jurisdiction
where the small alternative energy resource facility is proposed.
(ii) If there are no existing local municipal and county ordinances
in Washington relating to small alternative energy resource facilities
adopted in the last ten years, then the council must use existing
state, local, or municipal ordinances in the western electric
coordinating council geographic area adopted in the last ten years.
(iii) If there are no existing state, local, or municipal
ordinances relating to small alternative energy resource facilities in
the western electric coordinating council geographic area adopted in
the last ten years, then the council must use existing state, local, or
municipal ordinances adopted in the United States in the last ten
years.
(6) The council may charge a fee that covers the costs incurred by
the council in reviewing a small alternative energy resource facility
site permit and of compliance inspection costs delegated to local
governments where compliance is not preempted by other state agencies
by statute. The council must develop and charge a fee that provides
the lowest possible cost to the applicant.
(7) The council may delegate authority to council staff, as deemed
necessary by the council, to issue small alternative energy resource
facility site permits.
(8) A small alternative energy resource facility site permit issued
by the council under this section may not be revoked or superseded by
any local ordinance adopted by the local jurisdiction after the permit
is issued, even if the small alternative energy resource facility
permitted under this section is inconsistent with the newly adopted
local ordinance.
(9) For the purposes of this chapter, "small alternative energy
resource facility" means any facility that meets the definition of a
"net metering system" under RCW 80.60.010 and does not use biomass as
a fuel.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 80.50 RCW
to read as follows:
The council and any local government in the state may enter into,
and are encouraged to enter into, an interlocal agreement as provided
under chapter 39.34 RCW for the purpose of authorizing the council to
issue permits for small alternative energy resource facilities within
the geographic jurisdiction of the local government. The council may
serve as the permitting authority for a local government if the local
government determines that it would be more cost-effective for the
council to permit small alternative energy resource facilities within
their jurisdiction. Such an agreement supersedes the provisions
provided under section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 80.50 RCW
to read as follows:
A permitting decision regarding a small alternative energy resource
facility under section 7 of this act is subject to judicial review
under chapter 34.05 RCW. A petition for a review of a permitting
decision by the council must be filed within thirty days after the date
of the permitting decision by the council.

--- END ---