BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.305.141 and 2009 c 543 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) In addition to waivers authorized under RCW 28A.305.140 and
28A.655.180, the state board of education may grant waivers from the
requirement for a one hundred eighty-day school year under RCW
28A.150.220 ((and 28A.150.250)) to school districts that propose to
operate one or more schools on a flexible calendar for purposes of
economy and efficiency as provided in this section. The requirement
under RCW 28A.150.220 that school districts offer an annual average
instructional hour offering of at least one thousand hours shall not be
waived.
(2) A school district seeking a waiver under this section must
submit an application that includes:
(a) A proposed calendar for the school day and school year that
demonstrates how the instructional hour requirement will be maintained;
(b) An explanation and estimate of the economies and efficiencies
to be gained from compressing the instructional hours into fewer than
one hundred eighty days;
(c) An explanation of how monetary savings from the proposal will
be redirected to support student learning;
(d) A summary of comments received at one or more public hearings
on the proposal and how concerns will be addressed;
(e) An explanation of the impact on students who rely upon free and
reduced-price school child nutrition services and the impact on the
ability of the child nutrition program to operate an economically
independent program;
(f) An explanation of the impact on the ability to recruit and
retain employees in education support positions;
(g) An explanation of the impact on students whose parents work
during the missed school day; and
(h) Other information that the state board of education may request
to assure that the proposed flexible calendar will not adversely affect
student learning.
(3) The state board of education shall adopt criteria to evaluate
waiver requests. No more than five districts may be granted waivers.
Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, waivers may be
granted for up to three years. After each school year, the state board
of education shall analyze empirical evidence to determine whether the
reduction is affecting student learning. If the state board of
education determines that student learning is adversely affected, the
school district shall discontinue the flexible calendar as soon as
possible but not later than the beginning of the next school year after
the determination has been made. All waivers expire August 31, 2014.
(a) Two of the five waivers granted under this subsection shall be
granted to school districts with student populations of less than one
hundred fifty students.
(b) Three of the five waivers granted under this subsection shall
be granted to school districts with student populations of between one
hundred fifty-one and five hundred students.
(4) The state board of education shall examine the waivers granted
under this section and make a recommendation to the education
committees of the legislature by December 15, 2013, regarding whether
the waiver program should be continued, modified, or allowed to
terminate. This recommendation should focus on whether the program
resulted in improved student learning as demonstrated by empirical
evidence. Such evidence includes, but is not limited to: Improved
scores on the ((Washington)) statewide student assessment ((of student
learning)), results of the dynamic indicators of basic early literacy
skills, student grades, and attendance.
(5) For school districts that received an initial waiver under this
section that will expire before August 31, 2014, waivers must be
extended until August 31, 2014, unless the state board's annual review
determines that student learning has been adversely affected by the
waiver.
(6) This section expires August 31, 2014.

--- END ---