BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 2012 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 1163) s 307 (uncodified)
is amended to read as follows:
This act takes effect ((sixty days from its enactment by the
people)) July 1, 2014.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---