BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that in 2010, to
spur economic development and job creation during an economic and
financial crisis, the legislature authorized multiagency permitting
teams to coordinate permitting and integrate regulatory decision making
for certain targeted public and private projects, at the request of
proponents of those projects.
(2) The legislature declares that in the continuing economic and
financial crisis, to help restore Washington's economic vitality a
process must be established to select priority economic recovery
projects for review by multiagency permitting teams and to monitor the
teams' progress in coordinating permitting and integrating regulatory
decision making for those projects, and ensure cost-reimbursement
resources are effectively used to address permit agency staffing and
capacity limitations as may be relevant.
(3) The legislature therefore creates the permit efficiency and
accountability committee to:
(a) Select priority economic recovery projects;
(b) Assign the projects to multiagency permitting teams to
coordinate permitting and integrate regulatory decision making while
maintaining important public health, safety, and environmental
standards; and
(c) Monitor the progress of multiagency permitting teams in
completing their tasks.
(4) In addition, the legislature intends to facilitate cost-reimbursement agreements to enable multiagency permitting teams to
complete their tasks.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.42.030 and 2009 c 97 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Director" means the director of the office of regulatory
assistance.
(2) "Fully coordinated permit process" means a comprehensive
coordinated permitting assistance approach supported by a written
agreement between the project proponent, the office of regulatory
assistance, and the agencies participating in the fully coordinated
permit process.
(3) "General coordination services" means services that bring
interested parties together to explore opportunities for cooperation
and to resolve conflicts. General coordination services may be
provided as a stand-alone event or as an element of broader project
assistance, nonproject-related interagency coordination, or policy and
planning teamwork.
(4) "Multiagency permitting team" means representatives of permit
agencies authorized to coordinate permitting and integrate regulatory
decision making for a project, as provided in RCW 43.42.092.
(5) "Office" means the office of regulatory assistance established
in RCW 43.42.010.
(((5))) (6) "Permit" means any permit, license, certificate, use
authorization, or other form of governmental review or approval
required in order to construct, expand, or operate a project in the
state of Washington.
(((6))) (7) "Permit agency" means any state, local, or federal
agency authorized by law to issue permits.
(((7))) (8)(a) "Priority economic recovery project" means a project
that is:
(i) Supported by a locally impacted community or communities; and
(ii) Creates a substantial number of new jobs or may be necessary
to retain a substantial number of existing jobs.
(b) "Priority economic recovery project" does not include siting or
construction of residential dwelling units.
(9) "Project" means any activity, the conduct of which requires a
permit or permits from one or more permit agencies. "Project" may
include a priority economic recovery project.
(((8))) (10) "Project proponent" means a citizen, business, or any
entity applying for or seeking a permit or permits in the state of
Washington.
(((9))) (11) "Project scoping" means the identification of relevant
issues and information needs of a project proponent and the permitting
agencies, and reaching a common understanding regarding the process,
timing, and sequencing for obtaining applicable permits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 43.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The permit efficiency and accountability committee is created,
consisting of nine voting members and up to ten nonvoting members. The
office must convene the committee and facilitate committee meetings.
(2) Voting members of the committee must include:
(a) Two members from the senate representing each of the two
largest caucuses, designated by the chairs of each caucus;
(b) Two members from the house of representatives representing each
of the two largest caucuses, designated by the chairs of each caucus;
(c) One member representing the department of ecology, designated
by the director of that agency;
(d) One member representing the department of fish and wildlife,
designated by the director of that agency;
(e) One member representing the department of natural resources,
designated by the commissioner of public lands;
(f) One member representing the association of Washington cities,
designated by that organization; and
(g) One member representing the Washington state association of
counties, designated by that organization.
(3) Nonvoting members of the committee shall include:
(a) One member representing the associated general contractors of
Washington, designated by that organization;
(b) One member representing the association of Washington business,
designated by that organization; and
(c) One member representing statewide environmental organizations.
(4) The committee may include the following nonvoting members, who
must be invited to participate:
(a) One member representing the Northwest Indian fisheries
commission, designated by that organization;
(b) One member representing the Columbia river intertribal fish
commission, designated by that organization;
(c) One member representing the upper Columbia united tribes,
designated by that organization;
(d) One member representing the United States environmental
protection agency;
(e) One member representing the national oceanic and atmospheric
administration;
(f) One member representing the United States army corps of
engineers; and
(g) One member representing the United States fish and wildlife
service.
(5) Voting members of the committee must elect one of the four
legislators on the committee as the chair of the committee. The
committee may meet on a regular basis once every two months. The
committee may also meet at other times determined by the chair, who
must give reasonable prior notice to the members.
(6) Members of the committee are not compensated, but must receive
reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The committee may:
(a) Select, by consensus resolution of the voting members of the
committee, priority economic recovery projects, as provided in
subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Assign the selected priority economic recovery projects to
multiagency permitting teams to coordinate permitting and integrate
regulatory decision making, as provided in RCW 43.42.092; and
(c) Require quarterly reports from multiagency permitting teams
regarding assigned priority economic recovery projects, including
information regarding project work plans, progress, and any permitting
and regulatory decision making issues that may have arisen.
(2) The committee may select up to two priority economic recovery
projects prior to July 31, 2012, and subsequently select additional
priority economic recovery projects, considering the resources of
project proponents and permit agencies and the costs, impacts to, and
priorities of permit agencies.
(3) Multiagency permitting teams assigned to provide coordinated
permitting and integrated regulatory decision making for priority
economic recovery projects must:
(a) Use the most efficient and effective methods available; and
(b) Adapt their structure and operations to reflect varying permit
applications, approvals, and processes that may be required.
(4) The committee may require that a project proponent agree to
reimburse the office and permit agencies participating in multiagency
permitting teams their reasonable costs, pursuant to RCW 43.42.070.
(5) The committee must submit, consistent with RCW 43.01.036,
annual reports to the legislature by December 1st, commencing in 2012.
(6) Neither the committee nor its work groups may supersede the
permitting authority of a permitting agency, or otherwise supersede
existing statutes, administrative rules, or local ordinances or
regulations.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.42.070 and 2010 c 162 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office may enter into cost-reimbursement agreements with a
project proponent to recover from the project proponent the reasonable
costs incurred by the office in carrying out the provisions of ((RCW
43.42.050, 43.42.060, 43.42.090, and 43.42.092)) this chapter. The
agreement must include provisions for covering the costs incurred by
the permit agencies that are participating in the cost-reimbursement
project and carrying out permit processing or project review tasks
referenced in the cost-reimbursement agreement.
(2) The office must maintain policies or guidelines for
coordinating cost-reimbursement agreements with participating agencies,
project proponents, and ((outside)) independent consultants. Policies
or guidelines must ensure that, in developing cost-reimbursement
agreements, conflicts of interest are eliminated. ((Contracts with
independent consultants hired by the office under this section must be
based on competitive bids that are awarded for each agreement from a
prequalified consultant roster.)) The policies must also support
effective use of cost-reimbursement resources to address staffing and
capacity limitations as may be relevant within the office or
participating permit agencies.
(3) For fully coordinated permit processes and priority economic
recovery projects selected pursuant to section 4 of this act, the
office must coordinate the negotiation of all cost-reimbursement
agreements executed under RCW 43.21A.690, 43.30.490, 43.70.630,
43.300.080, and 70.94.085. The office, project proponent, and ((the))
participating permit agencies must be signatories to the cost-reimbursement agreement or agreements. Each participating permit
agency must manage performance of its portion of the cost-reimbursement
agreement. Independent consultants hired under a cost-reimbursement
agreement ((shall)) must report directly to the hiring office or
participating permit agency. Any cost-reimbursement agreement must
require that final decisions are made by the participating permit
agency and not by a hired independent consultant.
(4) For ((a fully coordinated project using cost reimbursement, the
office and participating permit agencies must include a cost-reimbursement work plan, including deliverables and schedules for
invoicing and reimbursement in the fully coordinated project work plan
described in RCW 43.42.060. Upon request, the office must verify that
the agencies have met the obligations contained in the cost-reimbursement work plan and agreement. The cost-reimbursement
agreement must identify the tasks of each agency and the maximum costs
for work conducted under the agreement. The agreement must include a
schedule that states:
(a) The estimated number of weeks for initial review of the permit
application for comparable projects;
(b) The anticipated number of revision cycles;
(c) The estimated number of weeks for review of subsequent revision
submittals;
(d) The estimated number of billable hours of employee time;
(e) The rate per hour; and
(f) A process for revision of the agreement if necessary.
(5) If a permit agency or the project proponent foresees, at any
time, that it will be unable to meet its obligations under the cost-reimbursement agreement and fully coordinated project work plan, it
must notify the office and state the reasons, along with proposals for
resolving the problems and potentially amending the timelines. The
office must notify the participating permit agencies and the project
proponent and, upon agreement of all parties, adjust the schedule, or,
if necessary, coordinate revision of the cost-reimbursement agreement
and fully coordinated project work plan)) any project using cost
reimbursement, the cost-reimbursement agreement must require the office
and participating permit agencies to develop and periodically update a
project work plan, which the office must provide on the internet and
share with each party to the agreement.
(5)(a) The cost-reimbursement agreement must identify the proposed
project, the desired outcomes, and the maximum costs for work to be
conducted under the agreement. The desired outcomes must refer to the
decision-making process and may not prejudge or predetermine whether
decisions will be to approve or deny any required permit or other
application. Each participating permit agency must agree to give
priority to the cost-reimbursement project but may in no way reduce or
eliminate regulatory requirements as part of the priority review.
(b) Reasonable costs are determined based on time and materials
estimates with a provision for contingencies, or set as a flat fee tied
to a reasonable estimate of staff hours required.
(c) The cost-reimbursement agreement may include deliverables and
schedules for invoicing and reimbursement. The office may require
advance payment of some or all of the agreed reimbursement, to be held
in reserve and distributed to participating permit agencies and the
office upon approval of invoices by the project proponent. The project
proponent has thirty days to request additional information or
challenge an invoice. If an invoice is challenged, the office must
respond and attempt to resolve the challenge within thirty days. If
the office is unable to resolve the challenge within thirty days, the
challenge must be submitted to the office of financial management. A
decision on such a challenge must be made by the office of financial
management and approved by the director of the office of financial
management and is binding on the parties.
(d) Upon request, the office must verify whether participating
permit agencies have met the obligations contained in the project work
plan and cost-reimbursement agreement.
(6) If a party to the cost-reimbursement agreement foresees, at any
time, that it will be unable to meet its obligations under the
agreement, it must notify the office and state the reasons, along with
proposals for resolving the problems. The office must notify the other
parties to the cost-reimbursement agreement and seek to resolve the
problems by adjusting invoices, deliverables, or the project work plan,
or through some other accommodation.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.42.092 and 2010 c 162 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The office of regulatory assistance is authorized to develop
and advertise the availability of optional multiagency permitting teams
to provide coordinated permitting and integrated regulatory decision
making starting in the Puget Sound basin.
(b) New expenses associated with operating the optional multiagency
permitting teams must be recovered by the office of regulatory
assistance using existing state cost-reimbursement and interagency
cost-sharing authorities as applicable. The cost-reimbursement process
is subject to the requirements and limitations set forth in RCW
43.42.070. ((Initial)) Staffing, consultant, technology, and other
administrative costs and other costs that may ((not be recoverable
through cost-reimbursement or cost-sharing mechanisms)) arise may be
covered by funds from the multiagency permitting team account created
in RCW 43.42.095.
(c) The director of the office of regulatory assistance must
solicit donations and such other funds as the director deems
appropriate from public and private sources ((for the purposes of
covering)) to cover the initial administrative costs and other costs
associated with operation of optional multiagency permitting teams
((which)) that are not recoverable through cost-reimbursement
agreements or cost-sharing mechanisms. All such solicited funds must
be placed in the multiagency permitting team account created in RCW
43.42.095.
(2) Optional multiagency permitting teams must be:
(a) Mobile, capable of traveling or working together as teams,
initially throughout the Puget Sound basin;
(b) Located initially in central Puget Sound;
(c) Staffed by appropriate senior-level permitting and regulatory
decision-making personnel representing the Washington state departments
of ecology, fish and wildlife, and natural resources and having
expertise in regulatory issues relating to the project; and
(d) Managed by the office of regulatory assistance through a team
leader responsible for:
(i) Managing or monitoring team activities to ensure the
cost-reimbursement schedule and agreement is followed;
(ii) Developing and maintaining partnerships and working
relationships with local, state, tribal, and federal organizations not
core to the optional multiagency permitting teams that can be called
upon to join the team on a project-by-project basis;
(iii) Developing, defining, and providing a set of coordinated
permitting and integrated decision-making services consistent with
those set forth in subsection (3) of this section;
(iv) Developing and executing funding agreements with applicants,
project proponents, regulatory agencies, and others as necessary to
ensure the financial viability of the optional multiagency permitting
teams;
(v) Measuring and regularly reporting on team performance, results
and outcomes achieved, including improved: Permitting predictability,
interagency early project coordination, interagency accessibility,
interagency relationships, project delivery, and environmental results,
including the avoidance or prevention of environmental harm and the
effectiveness of mitigation;
(vi) Conducting outreach, marketing, and advertising of team
services and team availability, focusing initially on projects such as
large-scale public, private, and port development projects with complex
aquatics, wetland, or other environmental impacts; environmental
cleanup, restoration, and enhancement projects; aquaculture projects;
and energy, power generation, and utility projects;
(vii) Implementing issue and dispute resolution protocols;
(viii) Incorporating and using virtual tools for online
collaboration to support permitting and regulatory coordination and
expedited decision making; and
(ix) Extending and subsequently implementing the optional
multiagency permitting team approach to other significant geographic
regions of the state.
(3) The optional multiagency permitting teams must at a minimum
work with the office of regulatory assistance to provide the following
core services:
(a) Project scoping, as set forth in RCW 43.42.050 (1) through (4),
to help applicants identify applicable permits and regulatory
approvals;
(b) A preapplication coordination service, which may be combined
with project scoping, to help applicants understand applicable
requirements and plan out with the assistance of the regulatory
agencies an optimally sequenced permitting and regulatory decision-making strategy and approach for the overall project;
(c) Fully coordinated project review as set forth in RCW 43.42.060
to set schedules and agreed-upon time frames for the applicant and
regulatory decision makers consistent with statutory requirements and
with regard to available agency resources and to track, monitor, and
report progress made in meeting those schedules and time frames;
(d) Mitigation coordination to help applicants and regulatory
agencies collaborate on and implement mitigation obligations within a
watershed context so superior environmental results can be achieved
when impacts cannot be avoided or further minimized.
(4) Local and federal permitting and regulatory personnel should be
incorporated into the optional multiagency permitting teams whenever
possible and at least on a project-by-project basis. Moneys recouped
through state cost-reimbursement and interagency cost-sharing
authorities, or as otherwise solicited for deposit into the multiagency
permitting team account created in RCW 43.42.095, may also be used to
cover local and federal participation.
(5) The optional multiagency permitting teams will provide services
for complex projects requiring multiple permits and regulatory
approvals and having multiple points of regulatory jurisdiction. The
optional multiagency permitting teams are not intended to support state
transportation projects capable of being serviced by multiagency
permitting teams specifically established for state transportation
projects. Use of the optional multiagency permitting teams for a fully
coordinated permit process must be allowed unless the office of
regulatory assistance notifies a project proponent in writing of other
means of effective and efficient project review that are available and
are recommended.

Sec. 7 RCW 43.42.095 and 2010 c 162 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The multiagency permitting team account is created in the custody
of the state ((treasury)) treasurer. All receipts from cost-reimbursement agreements authorized in RCW 43.42.070 and section 4 of
this act and solicitations authorized in RCW 43.42.092 must be
deposited into the account. ((Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation.)) Expenditures from the account may be used only
for covering ((the initial)) staffing, consultant, technology, and
other administrative costs of multiagency permitting teams and ((such))
other costs associated with ((the teams as may arise that are not
recoverable through cost-reimbursement or cost-sharing mechanisms))
multiagency project review and management that may arise. Only the
director of the office of regulatory assistance or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.79A.040 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 37 s 603 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080
in the same manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the
state treasury, and may be commingled with moneys in the state treasury
for cash management and cash balance purposes.
(2) All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust
fund must be set aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be
known as the investment income account.
(3) The investment income account may be utilized for the payment
of purchased banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and
disbursement functions for the state treasurer or affected state
agencies. The investment income account is subject in all respects to
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to
financial institutions. Payments must occur prior to distribution of
earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4)(a) Monthly, the state treasurer must distribute the earnings
credited to the investment income account to the state general fund
except under (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection.
(b) The following accounts and funds must receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period: The Washington promise
scholarship account, the college savings program account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
accessible communities account, the community and technical college
innovation account, the agricultural local fund, the American Indian
scholarship endowment fund, the foster care scholarship endowment fund,
the foster care endowed scholarship trust fund, the students with
dependents grant account, the basic health plan self-insurance reserve
account, the contract harvesting revolving account, the Washington
state combined fund drive account, the commemorative works account, the
county enhanced 911 excise tax account, the Washington international
exchange scholarship endowment fund, the toll collection account, the
developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account,
the fair fund, the family leave insurance account, the food animal
veterinarian conditional scholarship account, the fruit and vegetable
inspection account, the future teachers conditional scholarship
account, the game farm alternative account, the GET ready for math and
science scholarship account, the Washington global health technologies
and product development account, the grain inspection revolving fund,
the industrial insurance rainy day fund, the juvenile accountability
incentive account, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' plan
2 expense fund, the local tourism promotion account, the multiagency
permitting team account, the pilotage account, the produce railcar pool
account, the regional transportation investment district account, the
rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, the children's
trust fund, the Washington horse racing commission Washington bred
owners' bonus fund and breeder awards account, the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account, the individual
development account program account, the Washington horse racing
commission operating account (earnings from the Washington horse racing
commission operating account must be credited to the Washington horse
racing commission class C purse fund account), the life sciences
discovery fund, the Washington state heritage center account, the
reduced cigarette ignition propensity account, and the reading
achievement account.
(c) The following accounts and funds must receive eighty percent of
their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or
fund's average daily balance for the period: The advanced right-of-way
revolving fund, the advanced environmental mitigation revolving
account, the federal narcotics asset forfeitures account, the high
occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service assistance account,
and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.
(d) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the custody of the
state treasurer that deposits funds into a fund or account in the
custody of the state treasurer pursuant to an agreement with the office
of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for
the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

Sec. 9 RCW 43.84.092 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 6, 2011 1st sp.s.
c 7 § 22, 2011 c 369 § 6, 2011 c 339 § 1, 2011 c 311 § 9, 2011 c 272 §
3, 2011 c 120 § 3, and 2011 c 83 § 7 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:
(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state
treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which
account is hereby established in the state treasury.
(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive
funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash
management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is
subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by
the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the
federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act
fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The
office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or
from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or
allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set
forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income
account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services
on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository,
safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and
affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to
distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings
credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall
credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury
income account except:
(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's
average daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the
aircraft search and rescue account, the budget stabilization account,
the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building
construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the cleanup settlement account, the Columbia
river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin
taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin
water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction
fund, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization
account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred
compensation principal account, the department of licensing services
account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the
developmental disabilities community trust account, the drinking water
assistance account, the drinking water assistance administrative
account, the drinking water assistance repayment account, the Eastern
Washington University capital projects account, the Interstate 405
express toll lanes operations account, the education construction fund,
the education legacy trust account, the election account, the energy
freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail
assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects
account, the federal forest revolving account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the freight congestion relief account, the freight
mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account,
the grade crossing protective fund, the public health services account,
the health system capacity account, the high capacity transportation
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway bond retirement fund, the
highway infrastructure account, the highway safety account, the high
occupancy toll lanes operations account, the hospital safety net
assessment fund, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the
judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold
excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust
account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund,
the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, ((the
multiagency permitting team account,)) the multimodal transportation
account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding
stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the public facilities construction loan revolving account beginning
July 1, 2004, the public health supplemental account, the public
transportation systems account, the public works assistance account,
the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry
operations account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the real
estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account,
the regional mobility grant program account, the resource management
cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility
grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the site closure
account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small
city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the
state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state route number 520
civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account,
the state wildlife account, the supplemental pension account, the
Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and
plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account),
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain
injury account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building
account, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' relief and
pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve
officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement
system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement
account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state economic development
commission account, the Washington state health insurance pool account,
the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the
normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the
scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts
or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that
deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to
an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's
average daily balance for the period.
(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings
without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act may be known and cited as the
economic recovery through permitting efficiency act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 This act expires July 1, 2015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Any action taken by an agency to implement
the provisions of this act must be accomplished within existing
resources.

--- END ---