BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.56.010 and 2011 c 79 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Assistance" means emergency responders and resources provided
by a responding member jurisdiction in response to a request from a
requesting member jurisdiction.
(2) "Department" means the state military department.
(3) "Emergency" means an event or set of circumstances that: (a)
Demand immediate action to preserve public health, protect life,
protect public property, or to provide relief to any stricken community
overtaken by such occurrence; or (b) reach such a dimension or degree
of destructiveness as to warrant the governor declaring a state of
emergency pursuant to RCW 43.06.010.
(4) "Emergency responder" means an employee of a responding member
jurisdiction who is designated in writing by that responding member
jurisdiction as possessing skills, qualifications, training, knowledge,
or experience that may be needed, pursuant to a request for assistance
under this chapter, for: (a) Response, mitigation, or recovery
activities related to an emergency; or (b) participation in drills or
exercises in preparation for an emergency.
(5) "Operational control" means the limited authority to direct
tasks, assignments, and use of assistance provided pursuant to a
request for assistance under this chapter to address: (a) Response,
mitigation, or recovery activities related to an emergency; or (b)
participation in drills or exercises in preparation for an emergency.
"Operational control" does not include any right, privilege, or benefit
of ownership or employment such as disposition, compensation, wages,
salary, pensions, health benefits, leave, seniority, discipline,
promotion, hiring, or firing.
(6) "Political subdivision" means any county, city, ((or)) town, or
water-sewer district in the state of Washington.
(7) "Requesting member jurisdiction" means a member jurisdiction
that requests assistance from another member jurisdiction under this
chapter.
(8) "Resources" includes supplies, materials, equipment,
facilities, energy, services, information, systems, and other assets
except for emergency responders that may be needed, pursuant to a
request for assistance under this chapter, for: (a) Response,
mitigation, or recovery activities related to an emergency; or (b)
participation in drills or exercises in preparation for an emergency.
(9) "Responding member jurisdiction" means a member jurisdiction
providing or intending to provide assistance to a requesting member
jurisdiction under this chapter.

--- END ---