BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.90 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that:
(a) There is sufficient water in the Columbia river mainstem and
the lower Snake river mainstem to establish an allocation of one
hundred thousand acre feet of water annually to be available for
appropriation for biofuel crop irrigation and organic crop irrigation
without harming instream resources;
(b) A program that makes water available for biofuel crop
irrigation and organic crop irrigation will provide significant
environmental and economic benefits for the state; and
(c) As authorized in this section, new water withdrawals for
biofuel crop irrigation and organic crop irrigation must reach one
hundred thousand acre feet. By 2018, the legislature must review the
economic and environmental benefits resulting from this authorization
and determine whether there is a need to increase the amount of water
allocated under this section, taking into account cumulative
withdrawals from water rights issued under this chapter and the broader
water code.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, an
allocation of an annual aggregate of one hundred thousand acre feet of
water from the Columbia river mainstem and the lower Snake river
mainstem is established in perpetuity. The waters allocated under this
section must be available for appropriation and use for biofuel crop
irrigation and organic crop irrigation. The department is authorized
and directed to issue new permits and certificates for the
uninterruptible appropriation and use of the water allocated under this
section, but solely for the purpose of biofuel crop irrigation and
organic crop irrigation.
(3) For the avoidance of doubt, no application, permit, or
certificate to appropriate and use waters pursuant to this section may
be denied or conditioned to be interruptible on the grounds that such
a denial or condition is necessary to satisfy the instream flow or no
net loss requirements, or any other state law or rule. In addition,
except as specifically provided in this section, water allocated under
the provisions of this section and permits and certificates issued
pursuant to this section are deemed as not requiring any further
mitigation and the allocation of water under this section and permits
and certificates issued pursuant to this section are deemed to satisfy
all consultation requirements under state law related to the issuance
of new water rights.
(4) Any person may apply for a permit to appropriate waters
allocated under this section. The following terms and conditions apply
to permits and certificates issued pursuant to this section:
(a) Water withdrawal locations included in permits and certificates
issued pursuant to this section must be within the Columbia river
mainstem or the lower Snake river mainstem as defined in RCW
90.90.030(12).
(b) Waters appropriated under this section must be for biofuel crop
irrigation or organic crop irrigation use within the Columbia Basin
area.
(c) Except as modified and limited by this section, water rights
issued under the biofuel or organic crop irrigation designation are
subject to existing provisions required under the current water code.
(d) Permits for the use of waters for biofuel crop irrigation and
organic crop irrigation must include a specific designation of the
acreage where the water is to be used and the number of acres to be
irrigated. Changes in the place of use must be approved, provided that
the number of irrigated acres may not be increased and the change does
not impair any existing senior water right. No change to a use other
than biofuel crop irrigation or organic crop irrigation may be
approved.
(e) The total water duty for the biofuel crops and organic crops
grown, using an appropriation under this section, is limited to no more
than 2.8 acre feet per acre (for a single seasonal crop), unless crop
duties can be empirically verified to require a higher level crop duty.
(f) The new water rights issued pursuant to this section may be
used with other water rights to establish suitable, multiyear crop
rotations for long-term production needs.
(g) Except as modified and limited by this section, standard
provisions included in permits and certificates, such as providing
water measuring and fish screens, must be included in permits and
certificates issued pursuant to this section.
(h) Applicants for a biofuel crop irrigation or organic crop
irrigation water right under this section must agree, as a condition of
the department issuing the new water right, that the total water duty
for all existing water rights owned by the applicant be recalibrated
using methodologies that have been jointly agreed upon by the
department and the state's water conservancy boards as of the effective
date of this section, and consistent with the current water code. This
recalibration must be initiated upon issuance of the new biofuel or
organic crop irrigation water rights. Data and technical information
for recalibration of existing water rights must be submitted to the
department by the applicant within one year after the applicant's
receipt of the new water right or rights issued pursuant to this
section. Recalibrated water rights must be reissued after the existing
thirty-day appeal period for department water orders, with existing
public/agency notification standards in place.
(5) The implementation of this section is not limited to, but may
be directly included under, voluntary regional agreements under RCW
90.90.030.
(6) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(b) "Biofuel crop irrigation" means the use of water for the
purpose of irrigating crops that are grown as feedstocks for the
production of ethanol, biodiesel, or other types of engine, heating, or
power generation fuels.
(c) "Columbia river mainstem" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 90.90.030(12).
(d) "Lower Snake river mainstem" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 90.90.030(12).
(e) "Organic crop irrigation" means the use of water for the
purpose of irrigating crops that are certified under United States
department of agriculture or Washington state department of agriculture
standards as "organic products" as defined in chapter 15.86 RCW or 7
C.F.R. part 205 (2011).
(f) "Person" means any firm, association, water users' association,
corporation, limited liability company, irrigation district, municipal
corporation, or other legal entity, as well as an individual.

--- END ---