BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.10.118 and 2011 c 108 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) State universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen
State College may develop accelerated baccalaureate degree programs
that will allow academically qualified students to obtain a
baccalaureate degree in three years without attending summer classes or
enrolling in more than a full-time class load during the regular
academic year. The programs must allow academically qualified students
to begin coursework within their academic field during their first term
or semester of enrollment.
(2) The state universities, regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College shall report on their plans for the accelerated
baccalaureate degree programs to the higher education coordinating
board or its successor agency for approval by July 1, 2012.
(3) By July 1, 2012, each institution of higher education must
clearly include in its admissions materials and on its web site any
opportunities to complete a baccalaureate degree program in three
years. By August 1, 2012, each institution must provide this
information to the higher education coordinating board or its successor
agency in a form that the superintendent of public instruction is able
to distribute to school districts.

--- END ---