BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.50.160 and 2011 c 265 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person has the right to control the disposition of his or her
own remains without the predeath or postdeath consent of another
person. A valid written document expressing the decedent's wishes
regarding the place or method of disposition of his or her remains,
signed by the decedent in the presence of a witness, is sufficient
legal authorization for the procedures to be accomplished.
(2) Prearrangements that are prepaid, or filed with a licensed
funeral establishment or cemetery authority, under RCW 18.39.280
through 18.39.345 and chapter 68.46 RCW are not subject to cancellation
or substantial revision by survivors. Absent actual knowledge of
contrary legal authorization under this section, a licensed funeral
establishment or cemetery authority shall not be held criminally nor
civilly liable for acting upon such prearrangements.
(3) If the decedent has not made a prearrangement as set forth in
subsection (2) of this section or the costs of executing the decedent's
wishes regarding the disposition of the decedent's remains exceeds a
reasonable amount or directions have not been given by the decedent,
the right to control the disposition of the remains of a deceased
person vests in, and the duty of disposition and the liability for the
reasonable cost of preparation, care, and disposition of such remains
devolves upon the following in the order named:
(a) The designated agent of the decedent as directed through a
written document signed and dated by the decedent in the presence of a
witness. The direction of the designated agent is sufficient to direct
the type, place, and method of disposition((.));
(b) The surviving spouse or state registered domestic partner((.));
(c) The majority of the surviving adult children of the
decedent((.));
(d) The surviving parents of the decedent((.)), except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section when a child dies after reaching the
age of majority;
(e) The majority of the surviving siblings of the decedent((.));
(f) A court-appointed guardian for the person at the time of the
person's death.
(4) A parent's right to control the disposition of remains of the
parent's child who dies after reaching the age of majority is governed
by this subsection.
(a) A parent has the right to exercise sole decision-making
authority to direct the type, place, and method of disposition under
the following circumstances:
(i) At the time of death:
(A) There was a valid court order in force restricting or
precluding the other parent's contact with the adult child;
(B) There was a request pending with a court of competent
jurisdiction for a protective order filed by or on behalf of the adult
child against the other parent; or
(C) The other parent was awaiting sentencing, confined, or on
probation for an assault or other injury to the child, regardless of
when the assault or injury occurred;
(ii) At the time the child reached the age of majority, there was
a court order in force that:
(A) Restricted or precluded entirely the other parent's contact
with the child under the provisions of RCW 26.09.191, or under
substantially similar provisions in the laws of another jurisdiction;
or
(B) Granted sole decision-making authority for religious upbringing
or for all matters to the parent seeking to exercise authority
regarding the disposition of remains; or
(iii) For fifteen or more years during the child's minority:
(A) The parent seeking to exercise authority regarding the
disposition of remains was the legal custodian of the child;
(B) There was no court order granting the other parent residential
time or other contact with the child and the other parent never filed
a petition with the court seeking residential time or other contact
with the child; and
(C) There was no order of child support in force on behalf of the
child requiring the other parent to support the child or the other
parent failed to pay child support that was due under a court order.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (4), "court order" means
any valid order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction, including
an order entered by agreement of the parties or by default. Proof of
the existence of such a court order may be made by providing the
cemetery authority or funeral establishment with a certified copy of
the order.
(c) A parent seeking to exercise authority under this subsection
(4) based on the absence of a court order must affirm in writing the
circumstances supporting the parent's exercise of authority.
(d) This subsection (4) does not prohibit the parents of a child
who dies after reaching the age of majority from voluntarily
cooperating in the decision making regarding the disposition of the
child's remains under subsection (3)(d) of this section.
(5) If any person to whom the right of control has vested pursuant
to subsection (3) of this section has been arrested or charged with
first or second degree murder or first degree manslaughter in
connection with the decedent's death, the right of control is
relinquished and passed on in accordance with subsection (3) of this
section.
(((5) If)) (6) A cemetery authority as defined in RCW 68.04.190 or
a funeral establishment licensed under chapter 18.39 RCW may not be
held criminally or civilly liable for burying or cremating the human
remains when:
(a) The cemetery authority or funeral establishment has made a good
faith effort to locate the person cited in subsection (3)(a) through
(f) of this section or the legal representative of the decedent's
estate((, the));
(b) The cemetery authority or funeral establishment relies on
documentation provided under subsection (4)(b) or (c) of this section;
or
(c) Any government agency or charitable organization provides the
funds for the disposition of any human remains. A cemetery authority
or funeral establishment shall have the right to rely on an authority
to bury or cremate the human remains, executed by the most responsible
party available((, and the cemetery authority or funeral establishment
may not be held criminally or civilly liable for burying or cremating
the human remains. In the event any government agency or charitable
organization provides the funds for the disposition of any human
remains, the cemetery authority or funeral establishment may not be
held criminally or civilly liable for cremating the human remains)) and
supported by any documentation provided under subsection (4)(b) or (c)
of this section.
(((6))) (7) The liability for the reasonable cost of preparation,
care, and disposition devolves jointly and severally upon all kin of
the decedent in the same degree of kindred, in the order listed in
subsection (3) of this section, and upon the estate of the decedent.

--- END ---