BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the
responsibilities of state government need to be limited to core
services in support of public safety and welfare. Services provided by
the energy policy division of the department of commerce are primarily
advisory and can be transferred to the office of the governor to
achieve greater efficiency, transparency, and accountability in state
government. The energy policy duties to be performed by the office of
the governor build upon the functions currently fulfilled by staff in
that office and must be prioritized in the following order of public
importance: (a) Protect the public health, safety, and welfare during
energy emergencies; (b) provide energy policy advice to the governor;
(c) receive and disburse federal energy-related programmatic funding to
other agencies; (d) collect and disseminate impartial and objective
information and analysis to the governor and legislature; (e) revise
and update the state energy strategy, as funding is appropriated by the
legislature for that purpose; and (f) develop and maintain a unified
state position on energy facility siting, as funding is provided for
that purpose.
(2) The duties transferred to and to be conducted by the office of
the governor and the energy extension program of Washington State
University must be performed with existing resources. It is the intent
of sections 2 through 8 of this act to perpetually save state general
funds that have historically been appropriated for the performance of
the duties transferred under sections 2 through 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) In addition to the duties prescribed in
this chapter, the office of the governor has the following powers and
duties:
(a) Administer energy allocation and curtailment programs in
accordance with chapter 43.21G RCW. During energy shortage
emergencies, the office of the governor shall give priority in the
allocation of energy resources to maintaining the public health,
safety, and welfare of the state's citizens and industry in order to
minimize adverse impacts on their physical, social, and economic well-being;
(b) Prepare and update contingency plans for implementation in the
event of energy shortages or emergencies. The plans must conform to
chapter 43.21G RCW and must include procedures for determining when
these shortages or emergencies exist, the state officers and agencies
to participate in the determination, and actions to be taken by various
agencies and officers of state government in order to reduce hardship
and maintain the general welfare during these emergencies. The office
of the governor shall coordinate the activities undertaken pursuant to
this subsection (1)(b) with other persons. The components of plans
that require legislation for their implementation must be presented to
the legislature in the form of proposed legislation at the earliest
practicable date. The office of the governor shall report to the
legislature on probable, imminent, and existing energy shortages; and
(c) Obtain all necessary and existing information from energy
producers, suppliers, and consumers, doing business within the state of
Washington, from political subdivisions in this state, or any person as
may be necessary to carry out the provisions of chapter 43.21G RCW.
However, if the information is available in reports made to another
state agency, the office of the governor shall obtain it from that
agency. Further, to the maximum extent practicable, informational
requests to energy companies regulated by the Washington state
utilities and transportation commission must be channeled through the
utilities and transportation commission and must be accepted in the
format normally used by the companies. This information may include
but not be limited to:
(i) Sales volume;
(ii) Forecasts of energy requirements; and
(iii) Energy costs.
(2) In accordance with RCW 42.56.270(22), information furnished
under subsection (1)(c) of this section is confidential and must be
maintained as such if so requested by the person providing the
information if the information is proprietary. It is unlawful to
disclose this information except as otherwise provided. A violation is
punishable, upon conviction, by a fine of not more than one thousand
dollars for each offense. In addition, any person who willfully or
with criminal negligence, as defined in RCW 9A.08.010, discloses
confidential information in violation of this subsection may be subject
to removal from office or immediate dismissal from public employment.
Nothing in this subsection prohibits the use of confidential
information to prepare statistics or other general data for publication
when it is so presented as to prevent identification of particular
persons or sources of confidential information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In addition to the duties prescribed in this
chapter, the office of the governor shall:
(1) Supervise and administer energy-related activities as specified
in section 7(1) of this act and advise the governor and the legislature
with respect to energy matters affecting the state.
(2) Develop and disseminate impartial and objective energy
information and analysis, while taking full advantage of the
capabilities of the state's institutions of higher education, national
laboratory, and other public and private entities, including energy
providers, with relevant expertise and analytical capabilities.
(3) Receive funds obtained from the federal government or other
sources by means of contracts, grants, awards, payments for services,
and other devices: (a) In support of the duties enumerated in this
chapter; and (b) to disseminate to other agencies as appropriate to
effectuate the purposes to which those funds must be used.
(4) Provide assistance, space, and other support as may be
necessary for the activities of the state's two representatives to the
Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning council. To
the extent consistent with federal law, the director of the Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council shall
request that Washington's council members request the administrator of
the Bonneville power administration to reimburse the state for the
expenses associated with the support as provided in the Pacific
Northwest electric power planning and conservation act (P.L. 96-501).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The legislature finds that the state
needs to implement a comprehensive energy planning process that:
(a) Is based on high quality, unbiased analysis;
(b) Engages public agencies and stakeholders in a thoughtful,
deliberative process that creates a cohesive plan that earns sustained
support of the public and organizations and institutions that will
ultimately be responsible for implementation and execution of the plan;
and
(c) Establishes policies and practices needed to ensure the
effective implementation of the strategy.
(2) The legislature further finds that energy drives the entire
modern economy from petroleum for vehicles to electricity to light
homes and power businesses. The legislature further finds that the
nation and the world have started the transition to a clean energy
economy, with significant improvements in energy efficiency and
investments in new clean and renewable energy resources and
technologies. The legislature further finds this transition may
increase or decrease energy costs and efforts should be made to
mitigate cost increases.
(3) The legislature finds and declares that it is the continuing
purpose of state government, consistent with other essential
considerations of state policy, to foster wise and efficient energy use
and to promote energy self-sufficiency through the use of indigenous
and renewable energy sources, consistent with the promotion of reliable
energy sources, the general welfare, and the protection of
environmental quality.
(4) The legislature further declares that a successful state energy
strategy must balance three goals to:
(a) Maintain competitive energy prices that are fair and reasonable
for consumers and businesses and support our state's continued economic
success;
(b) Increase competitiveness by fostering a clean energy economy
and jobs through business and workforce development; and
(c) Meet the state's obligations to reduce greenhouse gas
emissions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Subject to the availability of amounts
appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the governor
shall review the state energy strategy as developed under section 1,
chapter 201, Laws of 1991, periodically with the guidance of an
advisory committee. For each review, an advisory committee must be
established with a membership resembling as closely as possible the
original energy strategy advisory committee specified under section 1,
chapter 201, Laws of 1991. Upon completion of a public hearing
regarding the advisory committee's advice and recommendations for
revisions to the energy strategy, a written report must be conveyed by
the appropriate legislative committees. Any advisory committee
established under this section must be dissolved within three months
after the committee's written report is conveyed.
(2) The office of the governor shall use the following principles
to guide development and implementation of the state's energy strategy
and to meet the goals of section 6 of this act:
(a) Pursue all cost-effective energy efficiency and conservation as
the state's preferred energy resource, consistent with state law;
(b) Ensure that the state's energy system meets the health,
welfare, and economic needs of its citizens with particular emphasis on
meeting the needs of low-income and vulnerable populations;
(c) Maintain and enhance economic competitiveness by ensuring an
affordable and reliable supply of energy resources and by supporting
clean energy technology innovation, access to clean energy markets
worldwide, and clean energy business and workforce development;
(d) Reduce dependence on fossil fuel energy sources through
improved efficiency and development of cleaner energy sources, such as
bioenergy, low-carbon energy sources, and natural gas, and leveraging
the indigenous resources of the state for the production of clean
energy;
(e) Improve efficiency of transportation energy use through
advances in vehicle technology, increased system efficiencies,
development of electricity, biofuels, and other clean fuels, and
regional transportation planning to improve transportation choices;
(f) Meet the state's statutory greenhouse gas limits and
environmental requirements as the state develops and uses energy
resources;
(g) Build on the advantage provided by the state's clean regional
electrical grid by expanding and integrating additional carbon-free and
carbon-neutral generation, and improving the transmission capacity
serving the state;
(h) Make state government a model for energy efficiency, use of
clean and renewable energy, and greenhouse gas-neutral operations; and
(i) Maintain and enhance our state's existing energy
infrastructure.
(3) The office of the governor shall monitor the actions of all
agencies of the state for consistent implementation of the state's
energy policy, including applicable statutory policies and goals
relating to energy supply and use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Subject to the provision of funds
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the office of the governor
must develop guidance applicable to all state agencies for achieving a
unified state position upon matters involving the siting and operation
of renewable energy facilities in the state's coastal and estuarine
marine waters. The guidance must provide procedures for coordinating
the views and responsibilities of any state agency with jurisdiction or
expertise over the matter under consideration, which may include
federal policy proposals, activities, permits, licenses, or the
extension of funding for activities in or affecting the state's marine
waters. In developing the guidance, the office must consult with
agencies with primary responsibilities for permitting and management of
marine waters and bedlands, including the departments of natural
resources, ecology, transportation, and fish and wildlife, and the
state parks and recreation commission, the Puget Sound partnership, and
the energy facility site evaluation council. The office of the
governor must also consult and incorporate relevant information from
the regional activities related to renewable energy siting in marine
waters, including those under the west coast governors' agreement on
ocean health.
(2) The office of the governor may not commence development of the
guidance until federal, private, or other nonstate funding is secured
for this activity. The office of the governor must adopt the guidance
within one year of securing the funding.
(3) This section is intended to promote consistency and multiple
agency coordination in developing positions and exercising jurisdiction
in matters involving the siting and operation of renewable energy
facilities and does not diminish or abrogate the authority or
jurisdiction of any state agency over such matters established under
any other law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the department of commerce
relating to energy resource policy and planning are transferred to the
office of the governor. All references to the director of the
department of commerce in the Revised Code of Washington shall be
construed to mean the office of the governor when referring to the
functions transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the department
pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
delivered to the custody of the office of the governor. All cabinets,
furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the department in carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the
department or the energy extension program of Washington State
University.
(b) All software and database property employed by the department
in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
delivered to the custody of the office of the governor or the
Washington state extension energy program, as determined to be
appropriate by the office of financial management.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds,
books, documents, records, papers, files, software, database,
equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of
the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred,
the director of financial management shall make a determination as to
the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies
concerned.
(d) Any appropriations made to the department for carrying out the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on the effective date
of this section, be transferred and credited to the office of the
governor.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the department
pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
continued and acted upon by the office of the governor. All existing
contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be
performed by the office of the governor.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the
department does not affect the validity of any act performed before the
effective date of this section.
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of the office of
financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies
affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these
shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and
appropriation.
(6) The department shall direct the closure of the financial
records of the energy policy division.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 28B.30 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington State University extension energy program shall:
(1) Actively seek to maximize federal and other nonstate funding
and support to the state for energy efficiency, renewable energy,
emerging energy technologies, and other activities of benefit to the
state's overall energy future.
(2) Establish and maintain a central repository in state government
for collection of existing data on energy resources, including:
(a) Supply, demand, costs, utilization technology, projections, and
forecasts;
(b) Comparative costs of alternative energy sources, uses, and
applications; and
(c) Inventory data on energy research projects in the state
conducted under either public auspices or private auspices, or both,
and the results thereof.
(3) Coordinate federal energy programs appropriate for state-level
implementation, carry out the programs as are assigned to it by the
legislature, and monitor federally funded local energy programs as
required by federal or state regulations.
(4) Not advocate energy policies before the legislature, or any
state or local government agency, nor duplicate an activity performed
by any other state agency and officers and other persons.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 43.06 RCW and codified with the subchapter heading of
"Governor's Energy Office."

Sec. 10 RCW 42.56.270 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
commerce:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW
43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce or the office of the
governor in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion,
retention, or relocation of that person's business and until a siting
decision is made, identifying information of any person supplying
information under this subsection and the locations being considered
for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of commerce based on
information as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, any work product
is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of commerce from a person connected with siting,
recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's
business, information described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be
available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information;
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business;
(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained
by the University of Washington, other than information the university
is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information
relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to
result in private loss to the providers of this information; ((and))
(21) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by innovate Washington in
applications for, or delivery of, grants and loans under chapter 43.333
RCW, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably
be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this
information; and
(22) Proprietary information furnished under section 2(1)(c) of
this act if so requested by the person providing the information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 43.330.904 (Transfer of certain state energy office powers,
duties, and functions -- References to director -- Appointment of assistant
director) and 1996 c 186 s 101;
(2) RCW 43.21F.010 (Legislative findings and declaration) and 2010
c 271 s 401 & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 108 s 1;
(3) RCW 43.21F.025 (Definitions) and 2010 c 271 s 402;
(4) RCW 43.21F.045 (Duties of department -- Transfer of powers and
duties relating to energy education, applied research, technology
transfer, and energy efficiency in public buildings) and 1996 c 186 s
103, 1994 c 207 s 4, 1990 c 12 s 2, 1987 c 505 s 29, & 1981 c 295 s 4;
(5) RCW 43.21F.055 (Intervention in certain regulatory proceedings
prohibited -- Application to energy facility site evaluation council--Avoidance of duplication of activity) and 1996 c 186 s 104 & 1981 c 295
s 5;
(6) RCW 43.21F.060 (Additional duties and authority of department--Obtaining information -- Confidentiality, penalty -- Receiving and
expending funds) and 1996 c 186 s 105, 1981 c 295 s 6, & 1975-'76 2nd
ex.s. c 108 s 6;
(7) RCW 43.21F.062 (Renewable energy facilities in coastal and
estuarine marine waters -- Guidance) and 2010 c 145 s 9;
(8) RCW 43.21F.088 (State energy strategy -- Principles--Implementation) and 2010 c 271 s 403; and
(9) RCW 43.21F.090 (State energy strategy -- Review and report to
legislature) and 1996 c 186 s 106 & 1994 c 207 s 5.

--- END ---