BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.50.105 and 2011 c 61 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Written reports and records of autopsies or postmortems shall
be confidential, except that the following persons may examine and
obtain copies of any such written report or record: The personal
representative of the decedent as defined in RCW 11.02.005, any family
member, the attending physician or advanced registered nurse
practitioner, the prosecuting attorney or law enforcement agencies
having jurisdiction, public health officials, the department of labor
and industries in cases in which it has an interest under RCW
68.50.103, or the secretary of the department of social and health
services or his or her designee in cases being reviewed under RCW
74.13.640. A person, except for public health officials, the
department of labor and industries, or the secretary of the department
of social and health services or his or her designee, who obtains a
copy shall not further disseminate, distribute, or publish the reports
or records in any manner. The willful and knowing dissemination,
distribution, or publication of the reports or records is a class C
felony punishable pursuant to RCW 9A.20.020.
The coroner, the medical examiner, ((or)) the attending physician,
or advanced registered nurse practitioner shall, upon request, meet
with the family of the decedent to discuss the findings of the autopsy
or postmortem. For the purposes of this section, the term "family"
means the surviving spouse, state registered domestic partner, or any
child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, brother, or sister of the
decedent, or any person who was guardian of the decedent at the time of
death.
(2) A photograph, video, or audio recording from an autopsy or
postmortem examination shall be confidential, except that the following
persons must file a petition with the court in order to obtain a court
order that would allow the person to examine, view, copy, listen to, or
record the photograph or video or audio recording: The personal
representative of the decedent as defined in RCW 11.02.005, any family
member, and the attending physician or advanced registered nurse
practitioner. The court shall prescribe any restrictions or
stipulations it deems appropriate.
(3) The right to examine and obtain an autopsy or postmortem report
or record or to meet and discuss the findings of the report or record
is revoked for any person who has plead guilty to or been found guilty
of a crime that lead to or caused the decedent's death unless the
report or record would be used pursuant to court-ordered access as part
of any appeal.

--- END ---