BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt
rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW to ensure that a host school
district is not penalized for the entirety of a shared or colocated
facility when calculations for state school construction assistance are
made.

--- END ---