BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Consumer" means any person who has entered into an agreement
or contract for the lease or purchase of a new home appliance other
than for purposes of resale or sublease.
(2) "Extended warranty" means an agreement for a specified duration
to perform the replacement or repair of a home appliance at no
additional charge or a reduced charge for the home appliance, labor, or
both, or to provide indemnification for the replacement or repair of
the home appliance, based on the occurrence of specified events.
"Extended warranty" does not include an agreement, otherwise meeting
the definition of extended warranty in this subsection, if no separate
charge is made for the agreement and the value of the agreement is
included in the sales price of the home appliance covered by the
agreement.
(3) "Home appliance" includes air conditioners, boilers,
compactors, dehumidifiers, dishwashers, dryers, exhaust fans, freezers,
furnaces, garbage disposals, humidifiers, microwave ovens, range/over
hoods, ranges, refrigerators, thermostats, washing machines, and water
heaters.
(4) "Life expectancy" means the number of years a home appliance is
expected to perform for the intended use in which it was designed and
when used in the usual and customary manner.
(5) "Manufacturer" means a company that directly manufactures,
produces, or assembles a home appliance in whole or substantial part,
but does not include contracting with or otherwise engaging another
person, or that person engaging another person, to develop,
manufacture, produce, or assemble an article or product subject to
section 2 of this act.
(6) "Repair and maintenance costs" means the cost incurred by the
consumer in connection with the repair or maintenance of the home
appliance during the average life of the home appliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If a manufacturer offers an extended
warranty on a home appliance, the manufacturer of the home appliance at
the time of purchase must provide the consumer with a written statement
of the estimated life expectancy and estimated repair and maintenance
costs of the home appliance.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 The legislature finds that the practices
covered by this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public
interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business and is an
unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Nothing in this chapter limits the consumer
from pursuing other rights or remedies under any other law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

--- END ---