BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.630.065 and 2010 c 238 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction shall designate ((up to three))
schools at the elementary, middle ((schools and up to three)), and high
school((s)) level to serve as resources and examples of how to combine
the following best practices:
(a) A small, highly personalized learning community;
(b) An interdisciplinary curriculum with a strong focus on science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics delivered through a project-based instructional approach; and
(c) Active partnerships with businesses and the local community to
connect learning beyond the classroom.
(2) The designated elementary, middle, and high schools shall serve
as lighthouse programs and provide technical assistance and advice to
other ((middle and high)) schools and communities in the initial stages
of creating an alternative learning environment focused on science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics. The designated ((middle and
high)) schools must have proven experience and be recognized as model
programs.
(3) In addition, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction shall work with the designated elementary, middle, and high
schools to publicize the models of best practices in science,
technology, engineering, and mathematics instruction used by the
designated ((middle and high)) schools and shall encourage other
((middle and high)) schools and communities to work with the designated
((middle and high)) schools to replicate similar models.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
The science, technology, engineering, and mathematics education
lighthouse account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
The purpose of the account is to support schools designated as
lighthouse schools under RCW 28A.630.065 to serve as resources to other
schools and communities interested in replicating similar models.
Revenues to the account may include gifts from the private sector,
federal funds, any appropriations made by the state legislature, or
revenues from other sources. Grants to the designated lighthouse
schools and their administration shall be paid from the account. Only
the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

--- END ---