BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.17.200 and 2005 c 36 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
After July 1, 2013, all state agencies including all state
departments, boards, councils, commissions, and quasi-public
corporations shall allocate, as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys
appropriated for the original construction of any public building, an
amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to be expended
by the Washington state arts commission for the acquisition of works of
art. The works of art may be placed on public lands, integral to or
attached to a public building or structure, detached within or outside
a public building or structure, part of a portable exhibition or
collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in
other public facilities. In addition to the cost of the works of art,
the one-half of one percent of the appropriation as provided herein
shall be used to provide for the administration of the visual arts
program, including conservation of the state art collection, by the
Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation of the
works of art. For the purpose of this section building shall not
include highway construction sheds, warehouses or other buildings of a
temporary nature.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.335.210 and 2006 c 263 s 327 are each amended to
read as follows:
After July 1, 2013, the superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate, as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for
state assistance to school districts for the original construction of
any school plant facility the amount of one-half of one percent of the
appropriation to be expended by the Washington state arts commission
for the acquisition of works of art. The works of art may be placed in
accordance with Article IX, sections 2 and 3 of the state Constitution
on public lands, integral to or attached to a public building or
structure, detached within or outside a public building or structure,
part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a temporary
exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public facilities. The
Washington state arts commission shall, in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction, determine the amount to be made
available for the purchase of works of art under this section, and
payments therefor shall be made in accordance with law. The
designation of projects and sites, selection, contracting, purchase,
commissioning, reviewing of design, execution and placement,
acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or disposition of works of
art shall be the responsibility of the Washington state arts commission
in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and
representatives of school district boards of directors. The
superintendent of public instruction and the school district board of
directors of the districts where the sites are selected shall have the
right to:
(1) Waive its use of the one-half of one percent of the
appropriation for the acquisition of works of art before the selection
process by the Washington state arts commission;
(2) Appoint a representative to the body established by the
Washington state arts commission to be part of the selection process
with full voting rights;
(3) Reject the results of the selection process;
(4) Reject the placement of a completed work or works of art on
school district premises if such works are portable.
Rejection at any point before or after the selection process shall
not cause the loss of or otherwise endanger state construction funds
available to the local school district. Any works of art rejected
under this section shall be applied to the provision of works of art
under this chapter, at the discretion of the Washington state arts
commission, notwithstanding any contract or agreement between the
affected school district and the artist involved. In addition to the
cost of the works of art the one-half of one percent of the
appropriation as provided in this section shall be used to provide for
the administration, including conservation of the state art collection,
by the Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation
of the work of art. For the purpose of this section building shall not
include sheds, warehouses, or other buildings of a temporary nature.
The executive director of the arts commission, the superintendent
of public instruction, and the Washington state school directors
association shall appoint a study group to review the operations of the
one-half of one percent for works of art under this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 28B.10.027 and 2005 c 36 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
After July 1, 2013, all universities and colleges shall allocate as
a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the original
construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding two
hundred thousand dollars of any building, an amount of one-half of one
percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state
arts commission with the approval of the board of regents or trustees
for the acquisition of works of art. The works of art may be placed on
public lands of institutions of higher education, integral to or
attached to a public building or structure of institutions of higher
education, detached within or outside a public building or structure of
institutions of higher education, part of a portable exhibition or
collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in
other public facilities.
In addition to the cost of the works of art, the one-half of one
percent of the appropriation shall be used to provide for the
administration of the visual arts program, including conservation of
the state art collection, by the Washington state arts commission and
all costs for installation of the work of art. For the purpose of this
section building shall not include sheds, warehouses, and other
buildings of a temporary nature.

--- END ---