BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 68.52.190 and 1984 c 186 s 58 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Cemetery districts created under this chapter shall be deemed
to be municipal corporations within the purview of the Constitution and
laws of the state of Washington. They shall constitute bodies
corporate and possess all the usual powers of corporations for public
purposes. They shall have full authority to carry out the objects of
their creation, and to that end are empowered to acquire, hold, lease,
manage, occupy, and sell real and personal property or any interest
therein; to enter into and perform any and all necessary contracts; to
appoint and employ necessary officers, agents, and employees; to
contract indebtedness, to borrow money, and to issue general obligation
bonds in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW; to levy and enforce the
collection of taxes against the lands within the district, and to do
any and all lawful acts to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.
(2) No cemetery district may sell monuments, headstones,
tombstones, or any other memorial markers if a private retailer or
wholesaler of these products is located within fifty miles of the
boundary of the cemetery district.

--- END ---