BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW
to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the
contrary, a public utility district bordered by the Columbia river may
supply any water, as authorized by a water right under its control, to
be used in a pumped storage generating facility to any entity that
sells electric energy or water, directly or indirectly, to the public,
and contracts therefor must extend over the period of years and contain
the terms and conditions for the sale thereof as the commission of the
public utility district elects. Such a contract may only be made
pursuant to resolution of the commission authorizing such a contract,
and the resolution must be introduced at a meeting of the commission at
least ten days prior to the date of the adoption of the resolution.
However, the commission shall first make adequate provision for the
needs of the public utility district, both actual and prospective.

--- END ---