BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.51.010 and 1983 c 236 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Nursing home" means any home, place or institution which
operates or maintains facilities providing convalescent or chronic
care, or both, for a period in excess of twenty-four consecutive hours
for three or more patients not related by blood or marriage to the
operator, who by reason of illness or infirmity, are unable properly to
care for themselves. Convalescent and chronic care may include but not
be limited to any or all procedures commonly employed in waiting on the
sick, such as administration of medicines, preparation of special
diets, giving of bedside nursing care, application of dressings and
bandages, and carrying out of treatment prescribed by a duly licensed
practitioner of the healing arts. It may also include care of mentally
incompetent persons. It may also include community-based care.
Nothing in this definition shall be construed to include general
hospitals or other places which provide care and treatment for the
acutely ill and maintain and operate facilities for major surgery or
obstetrics, or both. Nothing in this definition shall be construed to
include any boarding home, guest home, hotel or related institution
which is held forth to the public as providing, and which is operated
to give only board, room and laundry to persons not in need of medical
or nursing treatment or supervision except in the case of temporary
acute illness. The mere designation by the operator of any place or
institution as a hospital, sanitarium, or any other similar name, which
does not provide care for the acutely ill and maintain and operate
facilities for major surgery or obstetrics, or both, shall not exclude
such place or institution from the provisions of this chapter:
PROVIDED, That any nursing home providing psychiatric treatment shall,
with respect to patients receiving such treatment, comply with the
provisions of RCW 71.12.560 and 71.12.570.
(2) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal
successor thereof.
(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services.
(4) "Department" means the state department of social and health
services.
(5) "Community-based care" means but is not limited to the
following:
(a) Home delivered nursing services;
(b) Personal care;
(c) Day care;
(d) Nutritional services, both in-home and in a communal dining
setting;
(e) Habilitation care; and
(f) Respite care.
(6) "Participating facility" means a nursing home that voluntarily
participates in the prescription drug recycling program created in
section 2 of this act.
(7) "Prescribing practitioner" means a health care practitioner
with prescription authority.
(8) "Prescription drug" means any drug which is required by state
law or regulation of the state board of pharmacy to be dispensed on
prescription only or is restricted to use by practitioners only.
(9) "Program" means the prescription drug recycling program.
(10) "Single-unit dose packaging" means a single-unit container for
articles intended for administration as a single dose, direct from the
container.
(11) "Tamper-evident unit dose packaging" means a container within
which a drug is sealed so that the contents cannot be opened without
obvious destruction of the seal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department, in association with the
department of health, must establish a prescription drug recycling
program that permits nursing homes to share unused prescription drugs
and to accept donations of unused prescription drugs from prescription
drug manufacturers and health care practitioners. Participation in the
program is voluntary. Controlled substances may not be donated to or
accepted by the program.
(2) The department may, in consultation with the board of pharmacy,
adopt rules to carry out the prescription drug recycling program,
including:
(a) Eligibility criteria and other standards and procedures for
participating facilities that accept and distribute or dispense donated
prescription drugs; and
(b) Necessary forms for administration of the program, including
forms for use by nursing homes or entities that donate, accept,
distribute, or dispense prescription drugs under the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A prescription drug may only be donated
to, accepted by, or dispensed under the program if it is unopened,
sealed, and tamper-evident unit dose packaging. A prescription drug
packaged in single-unit dose packaging may be donated, accepted, or
dispensed if the outside packaging is opened but the single-unit dose
packaging is unopened.
(2) A prescription drug may not be donated to, accepted by, or
dispensed under the program if it:
(a) Is expired;
(b) Is a controlled substance;
(c) Is adulterated or misbranded; or
(d) Has been in possession of a patient or a member of the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Participating facilities must comply
with state and federal laws on storage, distribution, and dispensing of
prescription drugs received under the program and must inspect all such
drugs before dispensing to determine if they are adulterated or
misbranded. Prescription drugs received under the program may only be
dispensed pursuant to a prescription issued by a prescribing
practitioner or may be distributed to another participating facility
for dispensing.
(2) Participating facilities may charge a handling fee, in
accordance with department rule, for distributing or dispensing
prescription drugs under the program. Prescription drugs donated under
the program may not be resold.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of
this section, any person or entity, including a prescription drug
manufacturer, which exercises reasonable care in donating, accepting,
distributing, or dispensing prescription drugs under this chapter and
rules adopted under this chapter is immune from civil or criminal
liability or professional disciplinary action of any kind for any
injury, death, or loss to person or property relating to such
activities.
(2) The donation of a prescription drug by a prescription drug
manufacturer does not absolve the manufacturer of any criminal or civil
liability that would have existed but for the donation, nor shall such
donation increase the liability of such prescription drug manufacturer
that would have existed but for the donation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department must establish and maintain
a participating facility registry for the program. The participating
facility registry must include the participating facility's name,
address, contact person, and telephone number. The participating
facility registry must be available to any entity wishing to donate
prescription drugs to the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 2 through 6 of this act are each
added to chapter 18.51 RCW.

--- END ---