BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cancer drug" means a prescription drug used to treat:
(a) Cancer or its side effects; or
(b) The side effects of a prescription drug used to treat cancer or
its side effects.
(2) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Donor" means a person, practitioner, health care facility, or
an individual or entity licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW.
(4) "Health care facility" means a hospital, medical clinic,
nursing home, practitioner office, or pharmacy.
(5) "Hospital" has the meaning provided in RCW 70.41.020.
(6) "Pharmacy" means every place properly licensed by the board of
pharmacy where the practice of pharmacy is conducted.
(7) "Practitioner" means a health care practitioner defined in RCW
69.41.010 who is authorized to prescribe cancer drugs.
(8) "Program" means the cancer drug repository program.
(9) "Single-unit dose packaging" means a single-unit container for
articles intended for administration as a single dose, direct from the
container.
(10) "Tamper-evident unit dose packaging" means a container within
which a drug is sealed so that the contents cannot be opened without
obvious destruction of the seal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The department must establish a cancer
drug repository program for accepting cancer drugs from donors and
dispensing donated cancer drugs to Washington residents holding a valid
prescription for such drugs. Participation in the program is
voluntary.
(2) The department, in consultation with the board of pharmacy,
must adopt rules to carry out this chapter, including:
(a) Eligibility criteria and other standards and procedures for
participating practitioners or pharmacies that accept and distribute or
dispense donated cancer drugs. Standards and procedures must require
the inspection of donated cancer drugs by the practitioner or
pharmacist to determine that the packaging is tamper-evident and that
the donated prescription drugs are unadulterated, not misbranded and
safe, and suitable for redistribution, including determining that:
(i) The cancer drug is in its original sealed and tamper-evident
unit dose packaging; and
(ii) In the case of opened packages, that the single-unit dose
packaging remains intact;
(b) Necessary forms for administration of the program, including
forms to be completed by donors, and forms for use by practitioners and
pharmacies that accept, distribute, or dispense cancer drugs under the
program. A person receiving cancer drugs under the program must be
provided a form disclosing that the drug was donated;
(c) The maximum handling fee that may be charged by participating
practitioners or pharmacies for distributing or dispensing cancer drugs
under the program. Handling fees must be paid by the recipient of the
cancer drug and may not be charged, in whole or in part, to any third
party;
(d) Categories of cancer drugs that the program will and will not
accept for dispensing; and
(e) Maintenance and distribution of the participating practitioner
or pharmacy registry under section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A cancer drug may only be donated to,
accepted by, or dispensed under the program if it is in unopened,
sealed, and tamper-evident unit dose packaging or in single-unit dose
packaging if the outside packaging is opened but the single-unit dose
packaging is intact.
(2) A cancer drug may not be donated to, accepted by, or dispensed
under the program if it:
(a) Is expired; or
(b) Is adulterated or misbranded.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Participating practitioners or
pharmacies must comply with state and federal laws on storage,
distribution, and dispensing of cancer drugs received under the
program. Participating practitioners or pharmacies must comply with
department rules on inspecting donated prescription drugs. Cancer
drugs received under the program may only be dispensed pursuant to a
prescription issued by a prescribing practitioner or may be distributed
to another participating practitioner or pharmacy for dispensing.
(2) Participating practitioners or pharmacies may charge a handling
fee, in accordance with department rule, for distributing or dispensing
cancer drugs under the program. Cancer drugs donated under the program
may not be resold or charged, in whole or in part, to any third party.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Any person or entity that donates,
accepts, or dispenses prescription drugs under this section shall not,
in the absence of negligence, be subject to any of the following for
matters related to donating, accepting, or dispensing such prescription
drugs: Criminal prosecution, liability in tort or other civil action
for injury, death, or loss to person or property, or professional
disciplinary action.
A drug manufacturer shall not, in the absence of negligence, be
subject to criminal prosecution or liability in tort or other civil
action for injury, death, or loss to person or property for matters
related to the donation, acceptance, or dispensing of a drug
manufactured by the drug manufacturer that is donated by any person
under the program, including liability for failure to transfer or
communicate product or consumer information or the expiration date of
the donated drug.
(2) The donation of a cancer drug by a cancer drug manufacturer
does not absolve the manufacturer of any criminal or civil liability
that would have existed but for the donation, nor shall such donation
increase the liability of such cancer drug manufacturer that would have
existed but for the donation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 The department must establish and maintain
a participating practitioner or pharmacy registry for the program. The
participating practitioner or pharmacy registry must include the
participating practitioner's or pharmacy's name, address, and telephone
number. The participating practitioner or pharmacy registry must be
available to any person or entity wishing to donate cancer drugs to the
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---