BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.70.500 and 2011 c 352 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Beginning in calendar year 2011, and on an annual basis thereafter,
the lottery will offer a statewide raffle to benefit veterans and their
families to be known as the veterans' raffle. ((The veterans raffle
ticket will go on sale on Labor Day with a drawing to occur on
Veteran's Day, November 11th of each year.))

--- END ---