BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 66.12.240 and 2009 c 361 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Nothing in this title applies to or prevents a day spa, wedding
boutique, or art gallery from offering or supplying without charge wine
or beer by the individual glass to a customer for consumption on the
premises. However, the customer must be at least twenty-one years of
age and may only be offered one glass of wine or beer, and wine or beer
served or consumed shall be purchased from a Washington state licensed
retailer or a Washington state liquor store or agency at full retail
price. A day spa, wedding boutique, or art gallery offering wine or
beer without charge may not advertise the service of complimentary wine
or beer and may not sell wine or beer in any manner. If the wine or
beer is offered by a day spa that provides massages, the wine or beer
may not be offered to the customers until the massage is completed.
Any employee involved in the service of wine or beer must complete a
board-approved limited alcohol server training program.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Art gallery" means a room or building devoted to the
exhibition and/or sale of the works of art.
(b) "Wedding boutique" means a business primarily engaged in the
sale of wedding merchandise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 66.20 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a permit known as a day spa permit to allow the
holder to offer or supply without charge wine or beer by the individual
glass to a customer for consumption on the premises. The customer must
be at least twenty-one years of age and may only be offered one glass
of wine or beer, and wine or beer served or consumed shall be purchased
from a Washington state licensed retailer. A day spa offering wine or
beer without charge may not advertise the service of complimentary wine
or beer and may not sell wine or beer in any manner. If the wine or
beer is offered by a day spa that provides massages, the wine or beer
may not be offered to the customers until the massage is completed.
(2) For the purposes of this section, "day spa" means a business
that offers at least three of the following beauty services:
Shampooing, cutting, styling, or dyeing hair, manicures, pedicures,
facials, massages, and the use of body toning equipment.
(3) The annual fee for this permit is one hundred twenty-five
dollars.

--- END ---