BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.08.0273 and 2011 c 7 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to)) Subject
to the conditions and limitations in this section, an exemption from
the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 in the form of a remittance from the
department is provided for sales to nonresidents of this state of
tangible personal property, digital goods, and digital codes, when:
(a) The property is for use outside this state;
(b) The purchaser is a bona fide resident of a province or
territory of Canada or a state, territory, or possession of the United
States, other than the state of Washington; and
(i) Such state, possession, territory, or province does not impose,
or have imposed on its behalf, a generally applicable retail sales tax,
use tax, value added tax, gross receipts tax on retailing activities,
or similar generally applicable tax, of three percent or more; or
(ii) If imposing a tax described in (b)(i) of this subsection,
provides an exemption for sales to Washington residents by reason of
their residence; and
(c) The purchaser agrees, when requested, to grant the department
of revenue access to such records and other forms of verification at
his or her place of residence to assure that such purchases are not
first used substantially in the state of Washington.
(2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, if
parts or other tangible personal property are installed by the seller
during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving motor
vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a separate charge
for the tangible personal property, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
does not apply to the separately stated charge to a nonresident
purchaser for the tangible personal property but only if the separately
stated charge does not exceed either the seller's current publicly
stated retail price for the tangible personal property or, if no
publicly stated retail price is available, the seller's cost for the
tangible personal property. However, the exemption provided by this
section does not apply if tangible personal property is installed by
the seller during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving motor vehicles, trailers, or campers and the seller makes a
single nonitemized charge for providing the tangible personal property
and service. All of the ((requirements)) provisions in subsections (1)
and (3) through (((6))) (8) of this section apply to this subsection.
(3)(a) Any person claiming exemption from retail sales tax under
the provisions of this section must ((display proof of his or her
current nonresident status as provided in this section)) pay the state
and local sales tax to the seller at the time of purchase and then
request a remittance of the state sales tax from the department in
accordance with this subsection and subsection (4) of this section. A
request for remittance must include proof of his or her status as a
nonresident at the time of the purchase for which a remittance is
requested. The request for a remittance must also include any
additional information and documentation as required by the department,
which may include a description of the item purchased for which a
remittance is requested, the sales price of the item, the amount of
state and local sales tax paid on the item, the date of the purchase,
the name of the seller and the physical address where the sale took
place, and copies of sales receipts or other documents of sale showing
the qualified purchases.
(b) Acceptable proof of a nonresident person's status includes one
piece of identification such as a valid driver's license from the
jurisdiction in which the out-of-state residency is claimed or a valid
identification card which has a photograph of the holder and is issued
by the out-of-state jurisdiction. Identification under this subsection
(3)(b) must show the holder's residential address and have as one of
its legal purposes the establishment of residency in that out-of-state
jurisdiction.
(((c) In lieu of furnishing proof of a person's nonresident status
under (b) of this subsection (3), a person claiming exemption from
retail sales tax under the provisions of this section may provide the
seller with an exemption certificate in compliance with subsection
(4)(b) of this section.
(4)(a) Nothing in this section requires the vendor to make tax
exempt retail sales to nonresidents. A vendor may choose to make sales
to nonresidents, collect the sales tax, and remit the amount of sales
tax collected to the state as otherwise provided by law. If the vendor
chooses to make a sale to a nonresident without collecting the sales
tax, the vendor must examine the purchaser's proof of nonresidence,
determine whether the proof is acceptable under subsection (3)(b) of
this section, and maintain records for each nontaxable sale which shall
show the type of proof accepted, including any identification numbers
where appropriate, and the expiration date, if any.
(b) In lieu of using the method provided in (a) of this subsection
to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may accept from
the purchaser a properly completed uniform exemption certificate
approved by the streamlined sales and use tax agreement governing board
or any other exemption certificate as may be authorized by the
department and properly completed by the purchaser. A nonresident
purchaser who uses an exemption certificate authorized in this
subsection (4)(b) must include the purchaser's driver's license number
or other state-issued identification number and the state of issuance.
(c) In lieu of using the methods provided in (a) and (b) of this
subsection to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller may
capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement.)) (4)(a)(i) Beginning January 1, 2013,
through December 31, 2013, a person may request a remittance from the
department for state sales taxes paid by the person on qualified retail
purchases made in Washington between July 1, 2012, and December 31,
2012.
(ii) Beginning January 1, 2014, a person may request a remittance
from the department during any calendar year for state sales taxes paid
by the person on qualified retail purchases made in Washington during
the immediately preceding calendar year only. No application may be
made with respect to purchases made before the immediately preceding
calendar year.
(b) The remittance request, including proof of nonresident status
and any other documentation and information required by the department,
must be made using an electronic application process as prescribed by
the department. Only one remittance request may be made by a person
per calendar year.
(c) The total amount of a remittance request must be at least
twenty-five dollars. The department must deny any request for a
remittance that is less than twenty-five dollars.
(d) The department must examine the applicant's proof of
nonresident status and any other documentation and information as
required in the application to determine whether the applicant is
entitled to a remittance under this section.
(5)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements to the department,
which includes the offer of fraudulent ((identification or fraudulently
procured identification to a vendor, in order to purchase goods without
paying)) or fraudulently procured identification or fraudulent sales
receipts or other documents of sale, in order to receive a remittance
of retail sales tax, is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.
(b) Any person ((making tax exempt purchases under this section by
displaying)) requesting a remittance of sales tax from the department
by providing proof of identification or documents of sale that are not
his or her own, or counterfeit identification or documents of sale,
with intent to violate the provisions of this section, is guilty of a
misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and subject to a
penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the tax due on
such purchases and is ineligible to receive any further remittances
from the department under this section.
(6)(((a) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the tax and
who fails to maintain records of sales to nonresidents as provided in
this section is personally liable for the amount of tax due.
(b) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the retail sales
tax under this section and who has actual knowledge that the
purchaser's proof of identification establishing out-of-state residency
is fraudulent is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable
for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one
thousand dollars or the tax due on such sales. In addition, both the
purchaser and the vendor are liable for any penalties and interest
assessable under chapter 82.32 RCW)) The exemption provided by this
section is for the state sales tax but not the local sales taxes. For
purposes of this section, "local sales tax" means a sales tax imposed
by a local government under the authority of RCW 81.104.170, chapter
82.14 RCW, or other provision of law, and which is imposed on the same
taxable event as the state sales tax imposed in this chapter.
(7) A nonresident who receives a refund of sales tax from the
seller for any reason with respect to a purchase made in this state is
not entitled to a remittance for the tax paid on the purchase. A
person who receives both a remittance under this section and a refund
from the seller with respect to the same purchase must immediately
repay the remittance to the department. Interest as provided in
chapter 82.32 RCW is assessed on amounts due under this section. A
person who receives a remittance with respect to a purchase for which
the person had, at the time the person submitted the application for a
remittance, already received a refund of sales tax from the seller is
also liable for the evasion penalty in RCW 82.32.090(7) and is
ineligible to receive any further remittances from the department under
this section.
(8) Remittances paid under this section do not include interest.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---