BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.04.330 and 2009 c 275 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) "Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle designed to travel on not
more than three wheels in contact with the ground, on which the driver:
(((1))) (a) Rides on a seat or saddle and the motor vehicle is
designed to be steered with a handlebar; or
(((2))) (b) Rides on a seat in a partially or completely enclosed
seating area that is equipped with safety belts and the motor vehicle
is designed to be steered with a steering wheel.
(2) "Motorcycle" includes a motor vehicle as described in
subsection (1)(a) of this section that is originally designed to travel
on two wheels but is modified using a conversion kit that adds two
stabilizing wheels on the rear of the motor vehicle.
(3) "Motorcycle" excludes a farm tractor, a power wheelchair, an
electric personal assistive mobility device, a motorized foot scooter,
an electric-assisted bicycle, and a moped.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Single-track motorcycle" means a motorcycle that the operator must
countersteer to turn at speeds of thirty or more miles per hour and
typically leaves a single ground track as it moves forward in a
straight line.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Multitrack motorcycle" means a motorcycle that the operator need
not countersteer to turn at speeds of thirty or more miles per hour and
typically leaves two or more ground tracks as it moves forward in a
straight line.

Sec. 4 RCW 46.20.500 and 2009 c 275 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may drive either a ((two-wheeled)) single-track or a
((three-wheeled)) multitrack motorcycle, or a motor-driven cycle unless
such person has a valid driver's license specially endorsed by the
director to enable the holder to drive such vehicles.
(2) However, a person sixteen years of age or older, holding a
valid driver's license of any class issued by the state of the person's
residence, may operate a moped without taking any special examination
for the operation of a moped.
(3) No driver's license is required for operation of an electric-assisted bicycle if the operator is at least sixteen years of age.
Persons under sixteen years of age may not operate an electric-assisted
bicycle.
(4) No driver's license is required to operate an electric personal
assistive mobility device or a power wheelchair.
(5) No driver's license is required to operate a motorized foot
scooter. Motorized foot scooters may not be operated at any time from
a half hour after sunset to a half hour before sunrise without
reflectors of a type approved by the state patrol.
(6) A person holding a valid driver's license may operate a
motorcycle as defined under RCW 46.04.330(((2))) (1)(b) without a
motorcycle endorsement.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.20.505 and 2007 c 97 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Every person applying for a special endorsement of a driver's
license authorizing such person to drive a ((two)) single-track or
((three-wheeled)) multitrack motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle shall
pay a fee of five dollars, which is not refundable. In addition, the
endorsement fee for the initial motorcycle endorsement shall not exceed
ten dollars, and the subsequent renewal endorsement fee shall not
exceed twenty-five dollars, unless the endorsement is renewed or
extended for a period other than five years, in which case the
subsequent renewal endorsement fee shall not exceed five dollars for
each year that the endorsement is renewed or extended. Fees collected
under this section shall be deposited in the motorcycle safety
education account of the highway safety fund.

Sec. 6 RCW 46.20.515 and 2011 c 370 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The motorcycle endorsement examination must emphasize maneuvers
necessary for on-street operation, including emergency braking and
turning as may be required to avoid an impending collision.
(2) The examination for a ((two-wheeled)) single-track motorcycle
endorsement and the examination for a ((three-wheeled)) multitrack
motorcycle endorsement must be separate and distinct examinations
emphasizing the skills and maneuvers necessary to operate each type of
motorcycle.
(3) The department may authorize an entity that has entered into a
contract under RCW 46.20.520 to administer the motorcycle endorsement
examination.
(4) The department may waive all or part of the examination for
persons who satisfactorily complete the voluntary motorcycle operator
training and education program authorized under RCW 46.20.520 or who
satisfactorily complete a private motorcycle skills education course
that has been certified by the department under RCW 46.81A.020.

Sec. 7 RCW 46.81A.010 and 2003 c 353 s 11 and 2003 c 41 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Motorcycle skills education program" means a motorcycle rider
skills training program to be administered by the department.
(2) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(3) "Director" means the director of licensing.
(4) "Motorcycle" ((means a motor vehicle designed to travel on not
more than three wheels in contact with the ground, on which the driver
rides astride the motor unit or power train and is designed to be
steered with a handlebar, but excluding farm tractors, electric
personal assistive mobility devices, mopeds, motorized foot scooters,
motorized bicycles, and)) has the same meaning as provided in RCW
46.04.330, excluding off-road motorcycles.

Sec. 8 RCW 46.81A.020 and 2007 c 97 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall administer and enforce the law pertaining to
the motorcycle skills education program as set forth in this chapter.
(2) The director may adopt and enforce reasonable rules that are
consistent with this chapter.
(3) The director shall revise the Washington motorcycle safety
program to:
(a) Institute separate novice and advanced motorcycle skills
education courses for both ((two-wheeled)) single-track and ((three-wheeled)) multitrack motorcycles that are each a minimum of eight hours
and no more than sixteen hours at a cost of (i) no more than fifty
dollars for Washington state residents under the age of eighteen, and
(ii) no more than one hundred twenty-five dollars for Washington state
residents who are eighteen years of age or older and military personnel
of any age stationed in Washington state;
(b) Encourage the use of loaned or used motorcycles for use in the
motorcycle skills education course if the instructor approves them;
(c) Require all instructors for ((two-wheeled)) single-track
motorcycles to conduct at least three classes in a one-year period, and
all instructors for ((three-wheeled)) multitrack motorcycles to conduct
at least one class in a one-year period, to maintain their teaching
eligibility.
(4) The department may enter into agreements to review and certify
that a private motorcycle skills education course meets educational
standards equivalent to those required of courses conducted under the
motorcycle skills education program. An agreement entered into under
this subsection must provide that the department may conduct periodic
audits to ensure that educational standards continue to meet those
required for courses conducted under the motorcycle skills education
program, and that the costs of the review, certification, and audit
process will be borne by the party seeking certification.
(5) The department shall obtain and compile information from
applicants for a motorcycle endorsement regarding whether they have
completed a state approved or certified motorcycle skills education
course.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 This act takes effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---