BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.10.420 and 2009 c 75 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following public bodies are authorized to use the job order
contracting procedure:
(a) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services;
(b) The University of Washington;
(c) Washington State University;
(d) Every city with a population greater than seventy thousand and
any public authority chartered by such city under RCW 35.21.730 through
35.21.755;
(e) Every county with a population greater than four hundred fifty
thousand;
(f) Every port district with total revenues greater than fifteen
million dollars per year;
(g) Every public utility district with revenues from energy sales
greater than twenty-three million dollars per year;
(h) Every school district; ((and))
(i) The state ferry system; and
(j) Regional transit authorities.
(2)(a) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services may issue job order contract work orders for Washington state
parks department projects.
(b) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services, the University of Washington, and Washington State University
may issue job order contract work orders for the state regional
universities and The Evergreen State College.
(3) Public bodies may use a job order contract for public works
projects when a determination is made that the use of job order
contracts will benefit the public by providing an effective means of
reducing the total lead-time and cost for the construction of public
works projects for repair and renovation required at public facilities
through the use of unit price books and work orders by eliminating
time-consuming, costly aspects of the traditional public works process,
which require separate contracting actions for each small project.

--- END ---