BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 3.62.010 and 1984 c 258 s 305 are each amended to read
as follows:
The district court may at the time of sentencing or at any time
thereafter suspend a portion or all of a fine or penalty except, the
district court shall not suspend any fees, fines, or assessments
imposed by RCW 3.62.090 or 46.63.110 (7) and (8).

Sec. 2 RCW 35.20.250 and 1987 c 202 s 198 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The municipal court shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the
superior court and district court in all civil and criminal matters as
now provided by law for district judges, and a judge thereof may sit in
preliminary hearings as magistrate. Fines, penalties, and forfeitures
before the court under the provisions of this section shall be paid to
the county treasurer as provided for district court and commitments
shall be to the county jail. Appeals from judgment or order of the
court in such cases shall be governed by the law pertaining to appeals
from judgments or orders of district judges operating under chapter
3.30 RCW.
(2) A municipal court shall not suspend any fees, fines, or
assessments imposed by RCW 3.62.090 or 46.63.110 (7) and (8).

--- END ---