BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A stakeholder group comprised of homeowner
advocates, lenders and their servicers, representatives of county
governments, and representatives of electronic registry systems are to
convene to discuss the issue of recording deeds of trust of residential
real property, including assignments and transfers, amongst other
related issues. The stakeholder group is to provide at least one
specific legislative proposal to the legislature by December 1, 2012.

--- END ---