BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
protect employees who are acting in furtherance of any public policy.
Common law in this area is inadequate to protect public policy and the
employees who act in furtherance of public policy. Section 2 of this
act creates a cause of action, separate from the common law tort of
wrongful discharge, protecting employees from materially adverse
actions in retaliation for conduct that promotes local, state, or
federal public policy. This act intends to encourage employees to act
to protect public policy by deterring employer retaliation.
Illustrative examples of activities that are protected include, but are
not limited to, reporting crimes or opposing unlawful actions or unsafe
conditions, professional misconduct, and exercising legal rights or
performing legal duties, such as voting, testifying, and attending jury
duty.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) It is unlawful for an employer to take
materially adverse action against an employee or independent contractor
where retaliation is a substantial factor in the employer's decision to
take action. An adverse action is not material if it has only a
trivial effect.
(2) An employee or independent contractor who is retaliated against
has a civil cause of action in a court of competent jurisdiction to
enjoin further violations, and to recover actual damages sustained by
the employee or contractor, together with the cost of suit including
reasonable attorneys' fees and any other appropriate remedy authorized
by the Washington law against discrimination, RCW 49.60.030(2).
(3) A civil cause of action is available for a violation of this
section notwithstanding the existence of any other local, state, or
federal statutory or administrative means of protecting public policy,
and is independent of any civil cause of action or remedy that may
exist at common law.
(4) A three-year statute of limitations applies to violations of
this section.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "retaliate" means to commit
a materially adverse action against an employee or independent
contractor for conduct that the employee or independent contractor
reasonably believes promotes a clear mandate of any public policy.
Protected conduct includes, but is not limited to, the refusal to
commit an illegal act, performing a legal duty or obligation,
exercising a legal right or privilege, or reporting employer misconduct
or whistleblowing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added
to chapter 49.60 RCW.

--- END ---