BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A supplemental capital budget is hereby
adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in this act, the
several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof as
shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during
the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2013, out of the several funds specified in this act.

PART 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Sec. 1001 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1011 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (20084001)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The projects must comply with RCW 43.63A.125 and other
requirements for community projects administered by the department.
(2) The reappropriation is subject to the provisions of section
1008, chapter 328, Laws of 2008 and section 1003, chapter 36, Laws of
2010 1st sp. sess.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,387,000))
$18,477,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($106,757,000))
$106,667,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $125,144,000

Sec. 1002 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1028 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects (30000166)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation in this section for the Roslyn Renaissance
project is subject to the following conditions and limitations: It is
the intent of this appropriation to undertake a feasibility study of
structural and program integrity of historic buildings including (a)
the northwest improvement company store, (b) the Sylvia's house, and
(c) vacant commercial lots within the city of Roslyn. The study will
analyze the adaptability of relocating the city offices to the
renovated city hall building. The Roslyn downtown association shall
submit the completed study to the department by July 1, 2012, including
a detailed cost estimate for the property acquisition and
redevelopment, and a capital fundraising plan to support the
acquisitions through multiple funding sources.
(8) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Authorized
Amount

Adna Athletic and Fitness Facility $80,000

American Lake Veterans' Golf
Course $250,000

Anacortes Depot $380,000

Bothell North Creek Forest Land
Acquisition $200,000

Boys and Girls Federal Way $50,000

Bucoda Odd Fellows Community
Center $150,000

Central WA State Fair
Association $35,000

City of Kirkland Athletic Fields $150,000

Colville Tribal Museum $250,000

Daybreak Youth Services Pre-Construction Activities $100,000

Dekalb Pier Project $700,000

Gig Harbor Maritime Pier $390,000

Grays Harbor Historical Seaport
Lady Washington Rehabilitation $169,000

Legion Park Visitors Center and
Trailhead Project $110,000

Match FEMA funds for Sprague
Response Center $300,000

North Mason Senior Center $1,360,000

Port of Bremerton $1,100,000

Puyallup Transit Oriented
Development $1,500,000

Redmond Central Connector $850,000

Roslyn Renaissance $300,000

Seattle Children's Hospital
Emergency Department $1,000,000

Skagit Valley Hospital $750,000

South Tacoma Community Center
Playground $380,000

Spokane Food Bank Distribution
Center Capacity and Renovation $1,250,000

Spokane Valley Partners Boiler
Replacement $100,000

Sultan Boys and Girls Club $500,000

Tacoma Hilltop Health Center $1,500,000

The Arc of Tri-Cities Facility $350,000

Traumatic Brain Injury Center $900,000

Vancouver Waterfront Park Pre-Construction Activities $500,000

Veteran's Memorial $210,000

West Hill Skyway
Redevelopment $750,000

YWCA Yakima $203,000

Total $16,817,000

(9) Up to $80,000 of the Roslyn Renaissance project authorized
amount may be used to acquire Sylvia House.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,817,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,817,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1003 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Local and Community Projects 2012 (91000437)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) Except as directed otherwise prior to the effective date of
this section, the department shall not expend the appropriations in
this section unless and until the nonstate share of project costs have
been either expended, or firmly committed, or both, in an amount
sufficient to complete the project or a distinct phase of the project
that is useable to the public for the purpose intended by the
legislature.
(2) Prior to receiving funds, project recipients must demonstrate
that the project site is under control for a minimum of ten years,
either through ownership or a long-term lease. This requirement does
not apply to appropriations for preconstruction activities or
appropriations whose sole purpose is to purchase real property that
does not include a construction or renovation component.
(3) Projects funded in this section may be required to comply with
Washington's high performance building standards as required by chapter
39.35D RCW.
(4) Project funds are available on a reimbursement basis only, and
shall not be advanced under any circumstances.
(5) Projects funded in this section must be held by the recipient
for a minimum of ten years and used for the same purpose or purposes
intended by the legislature as required in RCW 43.63A.125(6).
(6) Projects funded in this section, including those that are owned
and operated by nonprofit organizations, are generally required to pay
state prevailing wages.
(7) The appropriation is provided solely for the following list of
projects:

Project Authorized
Amount

Low Income Housing Institute -Housing for Homeless Young
Adults $1,800,000

Roslyn Northwest Improvement
Building $1,035,000

Total $2,835,000

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,800,000
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,035,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,835,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,835,000

Sec. 1004 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1024 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Temporary Public Works Grant Program (92000021)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the provisions of
section 1050, chapter 497, Laws of 2009.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,106,000
State Taxable Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,298,000))
$328,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($18,404,000))
$17,434,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,936,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,340,000))
$41,370,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1005 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
CERB Administered Economic Development, Innovation & Export Grants
(92000096)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
a competitive economic development and community revitalization grant
program administered by the community economic revitalization board
(board) in consultation with the public works board and for the
economic development projects specified in subsection (2) of this
section.
(1) The intent of the competitive program is to provide grants to
local governments, including ports, and innovation partnership zones
for public infrastructure, facilities, and related improvements that
enable and encourage private sector business creation or expansion, the
redevelopment of brownfields, and to enhance the vitality and
livability of the community. The board shall establish all grant
application requirements. The board may choose to establish two
separate grant competitions for the economic development projects and
the community revitalization projects.
(2) The boards shall prioritize economic development grants by
considering at a minimum the following criteria:
(a) The number of jobs created by the expected business creation or
expansion and the average wage of those expected jobs. In evaluating
proposals for their job creation potential, the board may adjust the
job estimates in applications based on the board's judgment of the
credibility of the job estimates;
(b) The board shall also consider the need for job creation based
on the unemployment rate of the county or counties in which the project
is located. In evaluating the average wages of the jobs created, the
board shall compare those wages to median wages of private sector jobs
in the county or counties surrounding the project location;
(c) When evaluating the jobs created by the project, the board may
consider the area labor supply and readily available skill sets of the
labor pool in the county or counties surrounding the project location;
(d) How the expected business creation or expansion fits within the
region's preferred economic growth strategy as indicated by the efforts
of nearby innovation partnership zones, industry clusters as defined by
the Washington Economic Development Commission, future export
prospects, or local government equivalent if available;
(e) The speed with which the project can begin construction;
(f) The extent that the final list of grant awards provides broad
geographic distribution, leverages nonstate funds, and achieves overall
the greatest benefit in job creation at good wages for the amount of
money provided;
(g) In no event shall the board award a grant that supplants
previously committed project resources.
(3) The board shall prioritize community revitalization grants by
considering at a minimum the following criteria:
(a) The value of the project to the community. In evaluating the
value of the project, the board shall, at a minimum, consider the
difficulty the applicant has in financing main street improvement
projects with their own local resources and the extent the project will
increase economic activity for existing businesses, improve safety and
enjoyment of pedestrians and bicyclists, enhance in-city recreational
opportunities, and revitalize downtown business districts.
(b) The extent to which businesses and local governments in the
affected area support the project;
(c) Whether or not the project is in the local government's adopted
capital facility plan, comprehensive plan, or equivalent. Additional
consideration is given to projects located within one of the
aforementioned plans;
(d) The extent to which the project promotes infill and
redevelopment of the downtown area;
(e) The speed with which the project can begin construction;
(f) The extent that the final list of grant awards provides broad
geographic distribution, leverages nonstate funds, and achieves overall
the greatest benefit for the amount of money provided;
(g) The extent to which the applicant demonstrates the ability to
maintain the project funded through the grant program;
(h) In no event shall the board award a grant that supplants
previously committed project resources.
(4) $4,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
Satsop wastewater improvement project.

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1006 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Brownfield Redevelopment Grants (92000100)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for redevelopment of the Bellingham waterfront.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1007 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Main Street Improvement Grants (92000098)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the Scriber Creek pedestrian bridge project.

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $800,000

Sec. 1008 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 1018 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Loan Program (30000095)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: For projects involving repair,
replacement, or improvement of a clean water infrastructure facility or
other public works facility for which an investment grade audit is
obtainable, the public works board must require as a contract condition
that the project sponsor undertake an investment grade audit. The
project sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its
drinking water state revolving fund program loan.

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,000,000
Drinking Water Assistance Repayment Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($32,000,000))
$92,000,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($48,000,000))
$108,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $192,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($240,000,000))
$300,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1009 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for People with Developmental Disabilities (91000410)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
People with Developmental Disabilities" in LEAP capital document No.
2012-7A, developed April 3, 2012. The department shall evaluate
projects on the LEAP list and allocate the funding based on the
requirements of RCW 43.185.050 and 43.185.070. Upon review of a
completed application, if the department determines that a project is
not eligible or is not ready to proceed, the department may allocate
funding to a project in another category on the LEAP list, or to any
type of alternate project. The department shall, at its discretion,
determine the actual amount of funding to be allocated to each project,
provided that the total allocation does not exceed the appropriation
provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,900,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1010 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for People with Chronic Mental Illness (91000412)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
People with Chronic Mental Illness" in LEAP capital document No.
2012-7A, developed April 3, 2012. The department shall evaluate
projects on the LEAP list and allocate the funding based on the
requirements of RCW 43.185.050 and 43.185.070. Upon review of a
completed application, if the department determines that a project is
not eligible or is not ready to proceed, the department may allocate
funding to a project in another category on the LEAP list, or to any
type of alternate project. The department shall, at its discretion,
determine the actual amount of funding to be allocated to each project,
provided that the total allocation does not exceed the appropriation
provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,125,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,125,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1011 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for the Homeless (91000413)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
the Homeless" in LEAP capital document No. 2012-7A, developed April 3,
2012. The department shall evaluate projects on the LEAP list and
allocate the funding based on the requirements of RCW 43.185.050 and
43.185.070. Upon review of a completed application, if the department
determines that a project is not eligible or is not ready to proceed,
the department may allocate funding to a project in another category on
the LEAP list, or to any type of alternate project. The department
shall, at its discretion, determine the actual amount of funding to be
allocated to each project, provided that the total allocation does not
exceed the appropriation provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,944,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $28,944,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1012 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Farmworkers (91000414)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
Farmworkers" in LEAP capital document No. 2012-7A, developed April 3,
2012. The department shall evaluate projects on the LEAP list and
allocate the funding based on the requirements of RCW 43.185.050 and
43.185.070. Upon review of a completed application, if the department
determines that a project is not eligible or is not ready to proceed,
the department may allocate funding to a project in another category on
the LEAP list, or to any type of alternate project. The department
shall, at its discretion, determine the actual amount of funding to be
allocated to each project, provided that the total allocation does not
exceed the appropriation provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,215,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,215,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1013 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing for Low-Income Households (91000416)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided for the ranked list of projects in the category "Housing for
Low Income Households" in LEAP capital document No. 2012-7A, developed
April 3, 2012. The department shall evaluate projects on the LEAP list
and allocate the funding based on the requirements of RCW 43.185.050
and 43.185.070. Upon review of a completed application, if the
department determines that a project is not eligible or is not ready to
proceed, the department may allocate funding to a project in another
category on the LEAP list, or to any type of alternate project. The
department shall, at its discretion, determine the actual amount of
funding to be allocated to each project, provided that the total
allocation does not exceed the appropriation provided in this section.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,982,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,982,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1014 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Housing Competitive Pool (91000432)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $1,500,000 of the appropriation is
provided solely for a demonstration project that supports homeless
individuals with low cost living quarters and shared facilities such as
kitchens, showers, and community meeting space. The project must meet
all local zoning requirements and have the support of the local
jurisdiction in which it is located. The department must require the
project to report cost and outcome measures after the first five years
of operation, and must report this information to the appropriate
committees of the legislature.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,530,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,530,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1015 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Weatherization (91000247)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for low-income weatherization through the energy matchmakers
program.
(2) $15,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided
solely for continuation of the community energy efficiency program
administered by WSU energy extension.

Appropriation:
State Taxable Building Construction Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1016 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Public Works Assistance Account Program 2013 Loan List (30000184)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for
the list of projects in LEAP capital document No. 2012-1B, developed
February 18, 2012.

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,781,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $152,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1017 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Public Works Pre-Construction Loan Program (91000319)

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1018 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Financing Energy/Water Efficiency (30000180)

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Sec. 1019 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1017 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Youth Recreational Facilities Grants (30000007)

The reappropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Funding for the Allen Place project is
reduced by $673,000.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,774,000))
$2,101,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,776,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,550,000))
$5,877,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1020 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Loan Program Consolidation Board (91000005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The legislature intends to consolidate under a single financing
authority all existing state lending programs currently dispersed under
the management of separate agencies, including, but not limited to,
infrastructure and student loan programs. The purposes of this
consolidation are to: Increase the effective and accountable use of
state resources; increase efficiency and decrease costs through
economies of scale; and streamline access for customers to financial
and technical assistance.
(2)(a) To assist the legislature in planning for this
consolidation, a loan program consolidation board is established, with
members as provided in this subsection:
(i) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one
member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives, as voting members.
(ii) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each
of the two largest caucuses of the senate, as voting members.
(iii) The speaker of the house and the president of the senate
jointly shall appoint five citizen members with backgrounds in the
financing of infrastructure and student loans, as voting members.
(b) The board shall choose its chair or cochairs from among its
membership. The director of the office of financial management shall
convene the initial meeting of the board.
(c) Staff support for the board shall be provided by the office of
financial management, the house of representatives office of program
research and the senate committee services. The relevant state
agencies must provide technical assistance as the board may reasonably
request.
(d) Legislative members of the loan program consolidation board
must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except those representing an
employer or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(3) The following agencies shall each designate a representative to
provide information to the board and participate in its discussions:
The office of financial management; the state treasurer; the department
of health; the department of ecology; the department of transportation;
the public works board; the higher education coordinating board, or
successor agency; and the state housing finance commission.
(4)(a) By December 15, 2012, the loan program consolidation board
shall develop and submit to the governor and appropriate legislative
committees a recommended consolidation plan that includes, but is not
limited to, infrastructure and educational lending programs
administered by the departments of commerce, health, and ecology; the
housing finance commission; the office of the state treasurer; and the
higher education coordinating board, or successor agency.
(b) The plan must include recommendations on: The organizational
structure for the umbrella authority; the process and timeline for
transferring existing programs and adding new programs to the umbrella
authority; and any statutory and budgetary changes necessary to
implement the plan in the 2013-2015 biennium, and thereafter.
(c) The plan must also include recommendations on sources of
capital that could be used to make low-interest educational loans to
students under the higher education loan program (HELP) authorized in
RCW 28B.97.010.
(5) The appropriation in this section is provided solely for:
(a) Contracting with additional persons who have specific technical
expertise to carry out the requirements of this section; and
(b) Paying travel expenses of nonlegislative members of the loan
program consolidation board.

Appropriation:
Public Works Assistance Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $150,000

Sec. 1021 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1036 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT
Bid Savings Contingency Pool (92000002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,500,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,500,000))
$0

Sec. 1022 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1046 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((GENERAL ADMINISTRATION)) ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Engineering and Architectural Services: Staffing (91000005)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
Up to $75,000 is for the department of enterprise services to
conduct a review of the state's current public works procurement
processes and provide a report by December 15, 2012, to the appropriate
committees of the legislature and the governor with procurement reform
recommendations. For recommendations that require a statutory change,
the report should include draft legislation needed to accomplish the
report's recommendations. The director may contract with a private
entity for assistance to conduct the study. The capital projects
advisory review board will provide advice and assistance as required by
the director. The report will include historical data on (1) the use
of change orders; (2) the use of job order contracting; (3) how are
competitive public works contracts advertised; and (4) contract
closeout procedures. State agencies that will participate include one
research university, one natural resource agency, and one general
government agency.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($5,282,000))
$7,751,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,250,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($39,532,000))
$42,001,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1023 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Legislative Building Critical Repairs (92000004)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,400,000

Sec. 1024 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1047 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ((GENERAL ADMINISTRATION)) ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Natural Resource Building Roof Replacement and Exterior Foam
Insulation System Repairs (30000546)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,482,000))
$982,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,482,000))
$982,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1025 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Natural Resource Building Roof Replacement and Exterior Foam
Insulation System Repairs (30000546)

Appropriation:
Capitol Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1026 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Thurston County Readiness Center (91000005)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $75,000

Sec. 1027 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 1054 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION
Courthouse Preservation (30000006)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $150,000 of the appropriation in this
section is provided solely for the Mason County Courthouse Renovation
Project.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $750,000

(End of part)

PART 2
HUMAN SERVICES
Sec. 2001 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 2005 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
Drinking Water Assistance Program (30000013)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation from the drinking water
assistance account--federal stimulus is provided solely for the city of
Tacoma McMillan Reservoir project and the city of Seattle Maple Leaf
Reservoir project.

Reappropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $38,348,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal
Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,373,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,721,000

Appropriation:
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $49,868,000
Drinking Water Assistance Account--Federal Stimulus . . . . . . . . . . . . $832,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $50,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $29,089,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $199,472,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($326,150,000))
$326,982,000

Sec. 2002 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 2006 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works Preservation: Facilities Preservation (90000001)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,722,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,728,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,450,000))
$0

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Minor Works Preservation: Facilities Preservation (90000001)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,722,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,008,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $8,730,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2004 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Walla Walla Nursing Facility (20082008)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $31,200,000

Sec. 2005 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 2027 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Washington State Penitentiary: Housing Units, Kitchen and Site
Work (30000482)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,810,000
Public Safety Reimbursable Bond Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $546,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $6,356,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($42,453,000))
$40,753,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $463,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($49,272,000))
$47,572,000

Sec. 2006 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 2034 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
New Prison Reception Center (30000570)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,200,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($246,181,000))
$252,226,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($252,381,000))
$252,226,000

(End of part)

PART 3
NATURAL RESOURCES
Sec. 3001 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 3027 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Habitat Mitigation (91000007)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,900,000))
$3,648,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,500,000))
$752,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $4,400,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3002 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxic Sites - Puget Sound (91000032)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the following ranked list of projects. If a
specified project has not met the requirements for executing a contract
with the department by April 30, 2013, the department may allocate the
amount specified to additional projects awarded on a competitive basis
provided that the awardee is ready to proceed with the project.

Project Authorized
Amount

Port Gamble Bay - Open up 90
acres of geoduck tracks $2,000,000

Port Gamble Bay - Source
control, habitat preservation, and
cleanup sustainability $7,000,000

Administration $270,000

Total $9,270,000

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,270,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $9,270,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3003 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Eastern Washington Clean Sites Initiative (91000033)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the following ranked list of projects. If a
specified project has not met the requirements for executing a contract
with the department by April 30, 2013, the department may allocate the
amount specified to additional projects awarded on a competitive basis
provided that the awardee is ready to proceed with the project.

Project Authorized
Amount

Cashmere Mill Site $1,500,000

Administration $45,000

Total $1,545,000

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,545,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,545,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3004 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
FY 2012 Statewide Storm Water Grant Program (91000053)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the following ranked list of projects. If a
specified project has not met the requirements for executing a contract
with the department by April 30, 2013, the department may allocate the
amount specified to additional grants awarded on a competitive basis
provided that the grant awardee is ready to proceed with the project.

Project Authorized
Amount

Lakewood 2012 Drywell
Replacement Project $330,000

Ferndale Southwest Storm Water
Management Facility $871,000

Tacoma Cheney Stadium Storm
Water LID Retrofit $1,000,000

Bellingham Central Business
District Raingarden Retrofits $450,000

Walla Walla 13th Avenue Storm
Water LID Project $290,000

Spokane County Regional Decant
Facility $684,000

Milton 5th Avenue Storm Water
Treatment Facility $112,000

Pierce County Clarks/Rody Creek
Storm Water Retrofits $829,000

Mount Vernon Downtown Plaza $351,000

Vancouver Water Quality
Retrofits for Existing Drywells $562,000

Camas Vactor Waste Facility
Retrofit $150,000

Tumwater Valley Regional Storm
Water Facility $469,000

West Richland Bombing Range
Outfall Elimination Project $479,000

Kitsap County Parks: Replace
and Installation of Pervious
Parking Lots $735,000

Woodinville Lake Leota Storm
Water Quality Retrofit Project $866,000

Richland Leslie Groves Park
Regional Infiltration Facility $199,000

Spokane County Country Homes
Boulevard Restoration Project $1,000,000

Redmond NE 84th Street Storm
Water Retrofit $1,000,000

Pierce County Groundwater
Pollutant Reduction Project $578,000

Kitsap County Illahee Storm
Water - LID Retrofit Project $625,000

Bellingham Storm Water Retrofit
- Bloedel Donovan Park $384,000

Puyallup Porus Alley Initiative
Program $665,000

Lacey Vactor Waste Decant
Facility $342,000

Fife 70th Avenue East Phase 2 $786,000

Kent James Street Storm Water
Outfall Retrofit $75,000

Renton Sunset Terrace Regional
Storm Water Facility $983,000

Sumner Site A.2 Outfall
Treatment Retrofit $1,000,000

Asotin Second Street Storm
Water Project $172,000

University Place Bridgeport Way
Low Impact Development Project $758,000

Sumner Site J Outfall Treatment
Retrofit $538,000

Richland Canyon Terrace Storm
Water Treatment Project $211,000

Olympia SPSCC Storm Water
Retrofit for Water Quality $312,000

Renton Harrington Avenue NE
Green Connection $913,000

Longview Municipal Pervious
Concrete $86,000

Kirkland Northeast King County
Co-op Recycling Decant Center $2,250,000

Burlington Gages Slough Storm
Water LID Improvements $204,000

Clark County Columbia River
High School Storm Water
Retrofit $267,000

Bainbridge Island Lynwood
Center Outfall Improvement
Project $188,000

Puyallup Clarks Creek Targeted
Outfall Retrofit Project $551,000

Pierce County Tacoma Narrows
Airport Pavement Removal $326,000

Pierce County Spanaway Lake
Park Storm Water Retrofit $690,000

Administrative Costs $792,000

Total $24,073,000

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,073,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,073,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3005 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Storm Water Retrofit and LID Competitive Grants (91000054)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the following ranked list of projects. If a
specified project has not met the requirements for executing a contract
with the department by April 30, 2013, the department may allocate the
amount specified to additional grants awarded on a competitive basis
provided that the grant awardee is ready to proceed with the project.

Project Authorized
Amount

Burien Miller Creek Storm Water
Management Facility $1,000,000

Tacoma Asotin Court LID
Retrofit $710,000

Seattle Public Utilities Midvale
Storm Water Facility $1,000,000

Mukilteo Smuggler's Gulch
Drainage Basin LID and Storm
Water Retrofit $1,000,000

Kirkland Park Lane Pedestrian
Corridor $739,000

Port Angeles 4th Street Storm
Water Project $1,000,000

Snohomish County Department of
Parks & Recreation Kayak Park
Storm Water Treatment $1,000,000

Renton Rainier Avenue Storm
Water Retrofit $644,000

Vancouver Peterson Channel
Industrial LID Improvements $287,000

Wenatchee Snowmelt Facility $975,000

Port Orchard Cedar Heights
Junior High Sidewalks $135,000

Centralia Downtown Rain Garden
Revitalization Project $487,000

Snohomish County Paine Field
Drainage Subbasin SC-5 $967,000

Seattle Public Utilities West
Seattle Decant Facility $289,000

Skagit County LID
Demonstration Project $291,000

Snohomish LID Improvements
Project $104,000

Douglas County 23rd Street
(Baker to SR 28) $165,000

Renton NE 10th St and Anacortes
Ave NE Detention Pond Retrofit $206,000

Redmond Public Works Kelsey
Creek Erosion Reduction Facility $1,000,000

Whatcom County Upper Silver
Beach Creek Restoration $988,000

Port of Vancouver Terminal 4
Storm Water Pond Retrofit $1,000,000

Administrative Costs $476,000

Total $14,463,000

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,463,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $14,463,000

Sec. 3006 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 3008 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development Program (20062950)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to the
Columbia basin groundwater management area for the following projects:
(a) $600,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to construct
localized hydrologic models for municipal supply sources and aquifer
storage and recovery potential; and
(b) $400,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to develop and
implement methods to identify sustainable wells near the East Low
Canal.
(2) $6,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the
Sunnyside Valley Irrigation District Water Conservation program.
(3) The department must reexamine its method of accounting for in-stream and out-of-stream benefits and develop a means of accounting for
the indirect but substantial and tangible out-of-stream benefits that
accrue from conservation, pump exchanges, and other projects. The
department must report the results of this reexamination to the
legislature by September 15, 2011.

Reappropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $23,987,000
Appropriation:
Columbia River Basin Water Supply Development
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($47,000,000))
$36,596,000
Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water
Supply Development Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,404,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $47,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,513,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $128,700,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $220,200,000

Sec. 3007 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 3024 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Centennial Clean Water Program (30000208)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $3,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely to the city
of Snohomish to implement the near-term wastewater treatment plant
improvement project required under agreed order No. 7973 between the
department of ecology and the city.
(2) $3,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant
for the Freeland sewer project.
(3) (($540,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the city
of Connell's Klindworth Campbell waterline distribution project.
(4))) $600,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant
for the town of Mabton's wastewater treatment project.
(((5))) (4) For projects involving repair, replacement, or
improvement of a wastewater treatment plant or other public works
facility for which an investment grade audit is obtainable, the
department of ecology must require as a contract condition that the
project sponsor undertake an investment grade audit. The project
sponsor may finance the costs of the audit as part of its centennial
clean water program grant.

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,100,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $34,100,000

Sec. 3008 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 3028 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Protect Communities from Flood and Drought (92000002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($6,475,000))
$8,172,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,500,000))
$6,609,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($14,975,000))
$14,781,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3009 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Flood Levee Improvements (92000057)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation in this section is
provided solely for the King county flood district for the Briscoe-Desimone levee improvement project.

Appropriation:
Local Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,000,000

Sec. 3010 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 3025 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund Program (30000209)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) For projects involving repair, replacement, or improvement of
a wastewater treatment plant or other public works facility for which
an investment grade audit is obtainable, the department of ecology must
require as a contract condition that the project sponsor undertake an
investment grade audit. The project sponsor may finance the costs of
the audit as part of its water pollution control revolving fund program
loan.
(2) $7,939,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the LOTT
clean water alliance primary sedimentation basins project.

Appropriation:
Water Pollution Control Revolving
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($102,000,000))
$109,939,000
Water Pollution Control Revolving Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $82,205,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($184,205,000))
$192,144,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $736,820,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($921,025,000))
$928,964,000

Sec. 3011 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 3036 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Clean Up Toxics Sites - Puget Sound (30000265)

Appropriation:
((Local Toxics Control Account--State)) State
Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $16,400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $11,248,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $27,648,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3012 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY
Solid Waste Reduction - Compost (91000197)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,694,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,694,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3013 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Deferred Maintenance (91000030)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $250,000 of the appropriation is provided
solely for improvements at Mt. Spokane state park.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,070,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,070,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3014 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Picnic Shelters (91000018)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $500,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3015 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Wallace Falls Footbridge (91000047)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $486,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $486,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3016 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Energy Conservation (91000040)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $215,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3017 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Lake Sammamish Concession and Event Facility (91000034)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3018 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION
Culverts (91000046)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3019 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Family Forest Fish Passage Program (91000097)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $10,000,000

Sec. 3020 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 3070 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD
Puget Sound Estuary and Salmon Restoration Program (30000148)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $750,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for
acquisition of land in Dabob Bay by the nature conservancy for transfer
to the department of natural resources.
(2) The balance of the appropriation shall not be expended on the
acquisition of lands by state agencies.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $25,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3021 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION
Livestock Nutrient Program (30000001)

Appropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3022 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Point Ruston Sediment Capping and Shoreline Restoration
Stabilization (91000065)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) The appropriation in this section is provided solely to the
department of natural resources to complete sediment capping and
shoreline stabilization on aquatic lands located adjacent to the Asarco
clean-up site in Commencement Bay. However, funds shall only be
expended if the department has entered into agreements with the
environmental protection agency or the adjacent land owner known as
Point Ruston, LLC which fully relieves the state from any further
liability or contributions relating to the cleanup of such aquatic
lands.
(2) This appropriation from the cleanup settlement account is a
loan payable over an eight-year period half from the aquatic lands
enhancement account and half from the state toxics control account.
The state treasurer must maintain a record of expenditures against this
appropriation and must calculate repayment obligations to the cleanup
settlement account at an interest rate that is five-tenths of a one
percent higher than the interest rate that the account would have
earned without the expenditures against this appropriation. The state
treasurer must submit a report of this repayment obligation to the
office of financial management by September 1st of each year. The
governor's budget request under RCW 43.88.060 must include sufficient
funds to meet the biennial repayment obligation.

Appropriation:
Cleanup Settlement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $7,200,000

Sec. 3023 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 3083 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
((Elk River Estuarine)) National Coastal Wetland Conservation
Program Lands Acquisition (91000007)

Reappropriation:
General Fund--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,000,000

Sec. 3024 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 3108 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Fire Hazard Reductions (30000201)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriations in this section are
provided solely for forest ((improvement)) treatments ((on)) that
benefit state trust lands in eastern Washington.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3025 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Puget SoundCorps (91000046)

The appropriation is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriation in this section is provided solely for
water quality and habitat protection and restoration projects that
benefit Puget Sound recovery and that are primarily on public lands.
The department of natural resources must contract with the department
of ecology for Puget SoundCorps crews of youth and military veterans to
implement these projects pursuant to chapter 20, Laws of 2011.

Appropriation:
Aquatic Lands Enhancement Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,000,000

(End of part)

PART 4
TRANSPORTATION
NEW SECTION. Sec. 4001 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Fire Training Academy Self Contained Breathing Apparatus Building
(30000067)

Appropriation:
Fire Service Training Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $244,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $244,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4002 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL
Fire Training Academy Master Plan/Environmental Impact Study
(30000066)

Appropriation:
Fire Service Training Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $400,000

(End of part)

PART 5
EDUCATION
Sec. 5001 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5002 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Vocational Skills Centers (20084300)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,187,000))
$2,226,000
School Construction and Skills Centers Building
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $119,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,306,000))
$2,345,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $67,401,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($70,707,000))
$69,746,000

Sec. 5002 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5008 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Skills Centers Minor Works - Facility Preservation (30000111)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,000,000))
$2,942,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($12,000,000))
$20,000,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($15,000,000))
$22,942,000

Sec. 5003 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5009 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Yakima Valley Technical Skills Center (30000076)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,461,000))
$25,443,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($28,461,000))
$25,443,000

Sec. 5004 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5004 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2009-11 School Construction Assistance Grant Program (30000031)

The reappropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Up to $14,000,000 of the state building
construction account--state reappropriation in this section is for the
Grand Coulee Dam school district school project, contingent on the
availability of sufficient contributions from federal, local, ((or))
private, or other sources to make up the remainder of the total cost of
the project. The Grand Coulee Dam school district is faced with a
unique set of local funding barriers and federal or other funds may
substitute as the usual requirement for school district participation.
In the event sufficient matching contributions are not secured by the
Grand Coulee Dam school district, these funds shall lapse.

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $129,681,000
School Construction and Skill Centers Building
Account--Bond--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $40,885,000
Subtotal Reappropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $170,566,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $144,862,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $315,428,000

Sec. 5005 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 5003 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) $1,337,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for study and survey grants and for
completing inventory and building condition assessments for all public
school districts once every six years.
(2) In calculating square foot eligibility for state assistance
grants, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced by fifty
percent.
(3) $952,000 of the common school construction account--state
appropriation is provided solely for mapping the design of new
facilities and remapping the design of facilities to be remodeled, for
school construction projects funded through the school construction
assistance program.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($314,960,000))
$307,558,000
Common School Construction Account--Federal . . . . . . . . . . . . (($600,000))
$1,600,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . (($315,560,000))
$309,158,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,351,581,000))
$1,351,139,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,667,141,000))
$1,660,297,000

Sec. 5006 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5006 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
2011-13 School Construction Assistance Program (30000071)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations:
(1) In calculating square foot eligibility for state assistance
grants, kindergarten student headcount shall not be reduced by fifty
percent.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
review the impact of students enrolled in alternative learning
experiences on the calculation of student enrollment projections for
determining school district eligibility for school construction
assistance, and shall work with interested stakeholders to analyze
whether the calculation should be changed. The results of the
analysis, including possible recommendations for an adjustment factor,
shall be submitted to the senate ways and means committee and the house
capital budget committee no later than December 31, 2011.

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($345,754,000))
$247,404,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,581,765,000))
$1,586,015,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,927,519,000))
$1,833,419,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5007 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
Transition to New ALE-Adjusted Construction Asst. Formula
(92000002)

The appropriation is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriation is provided solely for reimbursement of
demonstrated direct and actual preconstruction costs incurred by the
Meridian, Eastmont, and Yakima school districts through January 31,
2012, related to project square footage affected under Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6002. These funds may also be used to provide
assistance to the aforementioned districts for revising plans,
redesigning projects, or otherwise managing the transition to the
amended formula with preference given to those districts with
alternative learning experience student full-time equivalent
enrollments making up less than five percent of total student full-time
equivalent enrollments.

Appropriation:
Common School Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $350,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5008 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS
Lloyd Auditorium Emergency Repairs (30000012)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,858,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,858,000

Sec. 5009 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 5007 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING
LOSS
Minor Public Works (30000013)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($536,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,811,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,347,000))
$0

Sec. 5010 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 5006 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND
General Campus Preservation (30000018)

Appropriation:
Charitable, Educational, Penal and Reformatory
Institutions Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($550,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($2,557,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,107,000))
$0

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5011 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Tacoma Campus Development and Soil
Remediation (92000002)

Appropriation:
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $700,000

Sec. 5012 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5022 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
Anderson Hall Renovation (20091002)

Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($1,553,000))
$0

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $200,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($19,997,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($21,750,000))
$200,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5013 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON
University of Washington Bothell (20082006)

In conjunction with the appropriation in this section, the
University of Washington is authorized to issue a bond or bonds in an
amount not to exceed $30,000,000 in value for construction of the
Bothell Phase 3 project identified in this section. The bond shall be
financed from building fee and trust land revenues deposited into the
university's bond retirement account, in accordance with RCW 28B.20.700
through 28B.20.740.

Appropriation:
University of Washington Building Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,963,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $12,963,000

Sec. 5014 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 5014 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY
Washington State University Spokane - Riverpoint Biomedical and
Health Sciences (20162953)

In conjunction with the appropriations in this section, the
Washington State University is authorized to issue a bond or bonds in
an amount not to exceed $29,775,000 in value for construction of the
Riverpoint biomedical and health sciences project identified in this
section. The bond shall be financed from building fee and trust land
revenues deposited into the university's bond retirement account, in
accordance with RCW 28B.30.700 through 28B.30.780.

Appropriation:
Washington State University Building Account--
State . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,770,000
State Toxics Control Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,300,000
Subtotal Appropriation . . . . . . . . . . . . $5,070,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($3,770,000))
$5,070,000

Sec. 5015 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 5027 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works Preservation: Preservation (30000444)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital
Projects Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($7,000,000))
$7,430,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($10,000,000))
$9,570,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $17,000,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5016 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Combined Utilities (30000448)

Appropriation:
Central Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $273,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $273,000

Sec. 5017 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5030 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Health, Safety, and Code Requirements (20081002)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($286,000))
$129,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,871,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($4,157,000))
$4,000,000

Sec. 5018 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 5022 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Preservation (30000427)

Appropriation:
Eastern Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,205,000))
$11,745,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($9,205,000))
$11,745,000

Sec. 5019 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 5040 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY
Minor Works: Preservation (30000431)

Appropriation:
Western Washington University Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($8,264,000))
$9,794,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($16,600,000))
$15,070,000
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $24,864,000

Sec. 5020 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5070 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Clover Park Technical College - Allied Health Care Facility
(20062699)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $317,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($20,706,000))
$20,585,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,748,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($22,771,000))
$22,650,000

Sec. 5021 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5082 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Everett Community College: Index Hall Replacement (20081221)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,468,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . (($31,988,000))
$31,357,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $3,489,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($36,945,000))
$36,314,000

Sec. 5022 2011 1st sp.s. c 49 s 5088 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
FOR THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
Tacoma Community College: Health Careers Center (20082701)

Reappropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $906,000
Appropriation:
State Building Construction Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $39,107,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $1,160,000
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . (($38,819,000))
$0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . (($40,885,000))
$41,173,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5023 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 48 (uncodified) to read as follows:
FOR THE STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES
Equipment Pool (92000011)

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: The appropriation is for major equipment
in high demand fields from among the list as specified in LEAP capital
document No. 2012-34, developed March 7, 2012. The state board for
community and technical colleges may allocate amounts among the
equipment items specified to cover differences in actual bid prices,
but may not allocate amounts to equipment items not on the list.

Appropriation:
Community/Technical College Capital Projects
Account--State . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000

Prior Biennia (Expenditures) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
Future Biennia (Projected Costs) . . . . . . . . . . . . $0
TOTAL . . . . . . . . . . . . $2,700,000

(End of part)

PART 6
MISCELLANEOUS
Sec. 6001 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7011 (uncodified) is amended to
read as follows:
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS
The following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid
from any funds of an agency, appropriated or nonappropriated, for the
purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section,
agencies shall use the most economical financial contract option
available, including long-term leases, lease-purchase agreements,
lease-development with option to purchase agreements or financial
contracts using certificates of participation. Expenditures made by an
agency for one of the indicated purposes before the issue date of the
authorized financial contract and any certificates of participation
therein are intended to be reimbursed from proceeds of the financial
contract and any certificates of participation therein to the extent
provided in the agency's financing plan approved by the state finance
committee.
State agencies may enter into agreements with the department of
general administration and the state treasurer's office to develop
requests to the legislature for acquisition of properties and
facilities through financial contracts. The agreements may include
charges for services rendered.
Those noninstructional facilities of higher education institutions
authorized in this section to enter into financial contracts are not
eligible for state funded maintenance and operations. Instructional
space that is available for regularly scheduled classes for academic
transfer, basic skills, and workforce training programs may be eligible
for state funded maintenance and operations.
(1) Community and technical colleges:
(a) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia basin
college for up to $2,500,000 plus financing and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to add space to the delta high school for
the science technology engineering math program.
(b) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Peninsula college
for up to $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate the Forks Satellite building.
(c) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Peninsula college
for up to $800,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a wellness center on the Port
Angeles campus.
(d) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase up to 40
acres of land.
(e) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Walla Walla
Community College for up to $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the water and
environment center.
(f) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley
Community College for up to $2,700,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a music
and art center.
(g) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom community
college for up to $3,916,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build an auxiliary services
building.
(h) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Skagit Valley
Community College for up to $30,574,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build an academic
and student services building.
(i) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Lower Columbia
Community College for up to $38,615,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to build a health and
science building.
(j) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Everett Community
College for up to $4,000,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to renovate a corporate and
continuing education building.
(k) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community
College for up to $3,100,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to replace the institute for
extended learning building.
(l) Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the state board
for community and technical colleges for up to $50,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the administrative system replacement project pursuant to RCW
28B.50.515(4).
(m) Enter into a long-term lease on behalf of Spokane Community
College at Geiger Field suitable for the Aerospace Training Center
Program, subject to the approval of the Office of Financial Management
as required by chapter 43.82 RCW.
(2) Central Washington University: Enter into a financing contract
for up to $2,500,000 plus financing and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the Albertsons's building.
(3) Department of general administration:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $6,000,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the rehabilitation of the John L. O'Brien building.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $250,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the "Perry Street child care site" land purchase.
(4) Department of social and health services: Enter into a
financing contract for up to $15,850,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct or
renovate specialized housing and treatment facilities for youth
committed to the juvenile rehabilitation administration. The debt
service is to be paid with the savings associated with closure of the
Maple Lane school.
(5) Washington State Parks:
(a) Enter into a financing contract for up to $1,620,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for revenue generating facilities including cabins and yurts.
(b) Enter into a financing contract for up to $2,135,000 plus
financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW
for the Lake Sammamish concession and event facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6002 FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
The department of commerce shall work with stakeholders to develop
recommendations for a competitive grant program to assist the following
nonprofit arts and cultural organizations in acquiring, constructing,
or rehabilitating their facilities: Zoos, aquariums, and technology
and science centers. To be eligible, a zoo or aquarium must be an
organization accredited by the association of zoos and aquariums and a
technology and science center must be an organization that meets the
membership requirements of the association of science - technology
centers. The department and stakeholders shall consider the inclusion
of the conditions used in RCW 43.63A.750 to establish eligibility and
prioritization of funding. The department shall submit final
recommendations in the form of draft legislation to the office of
financial management and the legislature by October 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6003 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature that the state dispose of its
interest in the Wellington Hills property. Net proceeds from the sale
of the Wellington Hills property shall be deposited into the University
of Washington building account. The University of Washington must
report to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal
committees of the legislature upon the sale of the property the total
sale value and net proceeds deposited into the University of Washington
building account.

Sec. 6004 RCW 43.155.050 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 951 are each
amended to read as follows:
The public works assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance
account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature
or from any other lawful source. Money in the public works assistance
account shall be used to make loans and to give financial guarantees to
local governments for public works projects. Moneys in the account may
also be appropriated to provide for state match requirements under
federal law for projects and activities conducted and financed by the
board under the drinking water assistance account. Not more than
fifteen percent of the biennial capital budget appropriation to the
public works board from this account may be expended or obligated for
preconstruction loans, emergency loans, or loans for capital facility
planning under this chapter; of this amount, not more than ten percent
of the biennial capital budget appropriation may be expended for
emergency loans and not more than one percent of the biennial capital
budget appropriation may be expended for capital facility planning
loans. ((For the 2007-2009 biennium, moneys in the account may be used
for grants for projects identified in section 138, chapter 488, Laws of
2005 and section 1033, chapter 520, Laws of 2007. During the 2009-2011
fiscal biennium, sums in the public works assistance account may be
used for the water pollution control revolving fund program match in
section 3013, chapter 36, Laws of 2010 1st sp. sess. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the job
development fund to the general fund such amounts as reflect the excess
fund balance of the fund.)) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the public works assistance account to
the general fund, the water pollution control revolving account, and
the drinking water assistance account such amounts as reflect the
excess fund balance of the account. During the 2011-2013 fiscal
biennium, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the account for
economic development, innovation, and export grants, including
brownfields; main street improvement grants; and the loan program
consolidation board.

Sec. 6005 RCW 70.105D.070 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 964 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The state toxics control account and the local toxics control
account are hereby created in the state treasury.
(2) The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics
control account: (a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax
imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion
of the rate equal to thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent; (b)
the costs of remedial actions recovered under this chapter or chapter
70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered under this chapter;
and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the account by
the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry out
the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the
following activities:
(i) The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(ii) The state's responsibility for solid waste planning,
management, regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public
education required under chapter 70.95 RCW;
(iii) The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this
chapter;
(iv) State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;
(v) Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with
chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(vi) State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling,
or disposal of hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and
agriculture;
(vii) Hazardous materials emergency response training;
(viii) Water and environmental health protection and monitoring
programs;
(ix) Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;
(x) A public participation program, including regional citizen
advisory committees;
(xi) Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for
the costs of remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under
RCW 70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such
funding are established under a settlement agreement under RCW
70.105D.040(4) and when the director has found that the funding will
achieve both (A) a substantially more expeditious or enhanced cleanup
than would otherwise occur, and (B) the prevention or mitigation of
unfair economic hardship;
(xii) Development and demonstration of alternative management
technologies designed to carry out the hazardous waste management
priorities of RCW 70.105.150;
(xiii) During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, shoreline
update technical assistance;
(xiv) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, multijurisdictional
permitting teams; and
(xv) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, actions for reducing
public exposure to toxic air pollution, and actions taken through the
family forest fish passage program to correct barriers to fish passage
on privately owned small forest lands.
(3) The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics
control account: Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed
under RCW 82.21.030 and which are attributable to that portion of the
rate equal to thirty-seven one-hundredths of one percent.
(a) Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be
used by the department for grants or loans to local governments for the
following purposes in descending order of priority:
(i) Remedial actions;
(ii) Hazardous waste plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW;
(iii) Solid waste plans and programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C,
70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;
(iv) Funds for a program to assist in the assessment and cleanup of
sites of methamphetamine production, but not to be used for the initial
containment of such sites, consistent with the responsibilities and
intent of RCW 69.50.511; and
(v) Cleanup and disposal of hazardous substances from abandoned or
derelict vessels, defined for the purposes of this section as vessels
that have little or no value and either have no identified owner or
have an identified owner lacking financial resources to clean up and
dispose of the vessel, that pose a threat to human health or the
environment.
(b) Funds for plans and programs shall be allocated consistent with
the priorities and matching requirements established in chapters
70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.95 RCW, except that any applicant that
is a Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, along with any
project that is referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget
Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310, shall, except as conditioned by
RCW 70.105D.120, receive priority for any available funding for any
grant or funding programs or sources that use a competitive bidding
process. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account
may also be used for grants to local governments to retrofit public
sector diesel equipment and for storm water planning and implementation
activities.
(c) To expedite cleanups throughout the state, the department shall
partner with local communities and liable parties for cleanups. The
department is authorized to use the following additional strategies in
order to ensure a healthful environment for future generations:
(i) The director may alter grant-matching requirements to create
incentives for local governments to expedite cleanups when one of the
following conditions exists:
(A) Funding would prevent or mitigate unfair economic hardship
imposed by the clean-up liability;
(B) Funding would create new substantial economic development,
public recreational, or habitat restoration opportunities that would
not otherwise occur; or
(C) Funding would create an opportunity for acquisition and
redevelopment of vacant, orphaned, or abandoned property under RCW
70.105D.040(5) that would not otherwise occur;
(ii) The use of outside contracts to conduct necessary studies;
(iii) The purchase of remedial action cost-cap insurance, when
necessary to expedite multiparty clean-up efforts.
(d) To facilitate and expedite cleanups using funds from the local
toxics control account, during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium the
director may establish grant-funded accounts to hold and disperse local
toxics control account funds and funds from local governments to be
used for remedial actions.
(4) Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through
43.79.282, moneys in the state and local toxics control accounts may be
spent only after appropriation by statute.
(5) Except during the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, one percent of the
moneys deposited into the state and local toxics control accounts shall
be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who may be
adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous
substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The
primary purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by
persons and organizations in the investigation and remedying of
releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances and to
implement the state's solid and hazardous waste management priorities.
No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed
annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from either
account which are not expended at the close of any biennium shall
revert to the state toxics control account.
(6) No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics
control account may be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility
studies, construction, maintenance, or operation, or, after January 1,
2010, for projects designed to address the restoration of Puget Sound,
funded in a competitive grant process, that are in conflict with the
action agenda developed by the Puget Sound partnership under RCW
90.71.310.
(7) The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and
performance.
(8) During the 2007-2009 and 2009-2011 fiscal biennia, the
legislature may transfer from the local toxics control account to
either the state general fund or the oil spill prevention account, or
both such amounts as reflect excess fund balance in the account.
(9) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control
account may also be used for a standby rescue tug at Neah Bay, local
government shoreline update grants, private and public sector diesel
equipment retrofit, and oil spill prevention, preparedness, and
response activities.
(10) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the state toxics control account to the state general
fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.
(11) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the local toxics control
account may also be used for local government shoreline update grants
and actions for reducing public exposure to toxic air pollution;
funding to local governments for flood levee improvements; and grants
to local governments for brownfield redevelopment.

Sec. 6006 RCW 79.17.010 and 2009 c 497 s 6024 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, with the approval of the board, may exchange
any state land and any timber thereon for any land of equal value in
order to:
(a) Facilitate the marketing of forest products of state lands;
(b) Consolidate and block-up state lands;
(c) Acquire lands having commercial recreational leasing potential;
(d) Acquire county-owned lands;
(e) Acquire urban property which has greater income potential or
which could be more efficiently managed by the department in exchange
for state urban lands as defined in RCW 79.19.100; or
(f) Acquire any other lands when such exchange is determined by the
board to be in the best interest of the trust for which the state land
is held.
(2) Land exchanged under this section shall not be used to reduce
the publicly owned forest land base.
(3) The board shall determine that each land exchange is in the
best interest of the trust for which the land is held prior to
authorizing the land exchange.
(4) During the biennium ending June 30, ((2011)) 2013, for the
purposes of maintaining working farm and forest landscapes or acquiring
natural resource lands at risk of development, the department, with
approval of the board of natural resources, may exchange any state land
and any timber thereon for any land and proceeds of equal value, when
it can be demonstrated that the trust fiduciary obligations can be
better fulfilled after an exchange is completed. Proceeds may be in
the form of cash or services in order to achieve the purposes
established in this section. Any cash received as part of an exchange
transaction shall be deposited in the resource management cost account
to pay for administrative expenses incurred in carrying out an exchange
transaction. These administrative expenses include road maintenance
and abandonment expenses. The amount of proceeds received from the
exchange partner may not exceed five percent of the total value of the
exchange. The receipt of proceeds shall not change the character of
the transaction from an exchange to a sale.
(5) Prior to executing an exchange under this section, and in
addition to the public notice requirements set forth in RCW 79.17.050,
the department shall consult with legislative members, other state and
federal agencies, local governments, tribes, local stakeholders,
conservation groups, and any other interested parties to identify and
address cultural resource issues and the potential of the state lands
proposed for exchange to be used for open space, park, school, or
critical habitat purposes.

Sec. 6007 RCW 79.17.020 and 2009 c 497 s 6025 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of county commissioners of any county and/or the
mayor and city council or city commission of any city or town and/or
the board shall have authority to exchange, each with the other, or
with the federal forest service, the federal government or any proper
agency thereof and/or with any private landowner, county land of any
character, land owned by municipalities of any character, and state
forest land owned by the state under the jurisdiction of the
department, for real property of equal value for the purpose of
consolidating and blocking up the respective land holdings of any
county, municipality, the federal government, or the state of
Washington or for the purpose of obtaining lands having commercial
recreational leasing potential.
(2) During the biennium ending June 30, ((2011)) 2013, for the
purposes of maintaining working farm and forest landscapes or acquiring
natural resource lands at risk of development, the department, with
approval of the board of natural resources, may exchange any state land
and any timber thereon for any land and proceeds of equal value, when
it can be demonstrated that the trust fiduciary obligations can be
better fulfilled after an exchange is completed. Proceeds may be in
the form of cash or services in order to achieve the purposes
established in this section. Any cash received as part of an exchange
transaction shall be deposited in the forest development account to pay
for administrative expenses incurred in carrying out an exchange
transaction. These administrative expenses include road maintenance
and abandonment expenses. The amount of proceeds received from the
exchange partner may not exceed five percent of the total value of the
exchange. The receipt of proceeds shall not change the character of
the transaction from an exchange to a sale.
(3) Prior to executing an exchange under this section, and in
addition to the public notice requirements set forth in RCW 79.17.050,
the department shall consult with legislative members, other state and
federal agencies, local governments, tribes, local stakeholders,
conservation groups, and any other interested parties to identify and
address cultural resource issues, and the potential of the state lands
proposed for exchange to be used for open space, park, school, or
critical habitat purposes.

Sec. 6008 RCW 79.105.150 and 2011 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 6009 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) After deduction for management costs as provided in RCW
79.64.040 and payments to towns under RCW 79.115.150(2), all moneys
received by the state from the sale or lease of state-owned aquatic
lands and from the sale of valuable material from state-owned aquatic
lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement account which
is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation, these
funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for
the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public
purposes; for providing and improving access to the lands; and for
volunteer cooperative fish and game projects. During the 2009-2011 and
2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the aquatic lands enhancement account may
also be used for scientific research as part of the adaptive management
process and for developing a planning report for McNeil Island. During
the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature may
transfer from the aquatic lands enhancement account to the state
general fund such amounts as reflect excess fund balance of the
account. During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, the aquatic lands
enhancement account may be used to support the shellfish program, the
ballast water program, and the Puget Sound toxic sampling program at
the department of fish and wildlife, ((and)) the knotweed program at
the department of agriculture, and the Puget SoundCorps program.
(2) In providing grants for aquatic lands enhancement projects, the
recreation and conservation funding board shall:
(a) Require grant recipients to incorporate the environmental
benefits of the project into their grant applications;
(b) Utilize the statement of environmental benefits, consideration,
except as provided in RCW 79.105.610, of whether the applicant is a
Puget Sound partner, as defined in RCW 90.71.010, whether a project is
referenced in the action agenda developed by the Puget Sound
partnership under RCW 90.71.310, and except as otherwise provided in
RCW 79.105.630, and effective one calendar year following the
development and statewide availability of model evergreen community
management plans and ordinances under RCW 35.105.050, whether the
applicant is an entity that has been recognized, and what gradation of
recognition was received, in the evergreen community recognition
program created in RCW 35.105.030 in its prioritization and selection
process; and
(c) Develop appropriate outcome-focused performance measures to be
used both for management and performance assessment of the grants.
(3) To the extent possible, the department should coordinate its
performance measure system with other natural resource-related agencies
as defined in RCW 43.41.270.
(4) The department shall consult with affected interest groups in
implementing this section.
(5) After January 1, 2010, any project designed to address the
restoration of Puget Sound may be funded under this chapter only if the
project is not in conflict with the action agenda developed by the
Puget Sound partnership under RCW 90.71.310.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6009 FOR THE STATE TREASURER--TRANSFERS
State Taxable Building Construction Account: For transfer to the
Columbia River Basin Taxable Bond Water Supply Development Account, an
amount not to exceed $10,404,000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6010 A new section is added to 2011 1st sp.s.
c 49 (uncodified) to read as follows:
NONTAXABLE AND TAXABLE BOND PROCEEDS
Portions of the appropriation authority granted by this act from
the state building construction account, or any other account receiving
bond proceeds, may be transferred to the state taxable building
construction account as deemed necessary by the state finance committee
to comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and
regulations pertaining to the use of nontaxable bond proceeds.
Portions of the general obligation bond proceeds authorized by chapter
49, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. for deposit into the state taxable
building construction account that are in excess of amounts required to
comply with the federal internal revenue service rules and regulations
shall be deposited into the state building construction account. The
state treasurer shall submit written notification to the director of
financial management if it is determined that a shift of appropriation
authority between the state building construction account, or any other
account receiving bond proceeds, and the state taxable building
construction account is necessary, or that a shift of appropriation
authority from the state taxable building construction account to the
state building construction account may be made.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6011 The office of financial management, in
consultation with the legislative fiscal committees, shall choose a
consultant to identify and evaluate options for the efficient and cost-effective incarceration by the department of corrections of adult
prison offenders forecasted over the next ten years. Options to be
evaluated must include, but are not limited to: (1) Construction of
one or more new prisons; (2) construction of new prison units at
existing facilities; (3) replacement, remodeling, or repurposing of
existing, aged, inefficient capacity; and (4) management and use of
emergency beds. The study must include, for each option, the estimated
capital, operating, and debt service costs for the next ten years. The
study must also discuss the risks, advantages, and disadvantages of
each option. In addition, the department must identify all emergency
beds, their current status, and the cost to bring on-line and operate
any currently empty emergency beds and projected needs. The report
must be submitted to the governor and the fiscal committees of the
legislature no later than October 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6012 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6013 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

(End of Bill)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
DEPARTMENT OF ARCHAEOLOGY AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION . . . . . . . . . . . . 21
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE . . . . . . . . . . . . 2
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . 23
DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY . . . . . . . . . . . . 25
DEPARTMENT OF ENTERPRISE SERVICES . . . . . . . . . . . . 19
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS . . . . . . . . . . . . 22
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 49
MILITARY DEPARTMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 20
OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT . . . . . . . . . . . . 16
RECREATION AND CONSERVATION FUNDING BOARD . . . . . . . . . . . . 37
STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES . . . . . . . . . . . . 51
STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 38
STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION . . . . . . . . . . . . 35
STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION . . . . . . . . . . . . 42
UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON . . . . . . . . . . . . 47
WASHINGTON STATE CENTER FOR CHILDHOOD DEAFNESS AND HEARING LOSS . . . . . . . . . . . . 46
WASHINGTON STATE PATROL . . . . . . . . . . . . 41
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 48
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY . . . . . . . . . . . . 50
--- END ---