BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.94.483 and 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 932 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The woodstove education and enforcement account is hereby
created in the state treasury. Money placed in the account ((shall))
must include all money received under subsections (2) and (3) of this
section and any other money appropriated by the legislature. Money in
the account ((shall)) must be spent for the purposes of the woodstove
education program established under RCW 70.94.480 and for enforcement
of the woodstove program, and ((shall be)) is subject to legislative
appropriation. ((However, during the 2003-05 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may transfer from the woodstove education and enforcement
account to the air pollution control account such amounts as specified
in the omnibus operating budget bill.))
(2) The department of ecology, with the advice of the advisory
committee, shall set a flat fee of thirty dollars, on the retail sale,
as defined in RCW 82.04.050, of each solid fuel burning device after
January 1, 1992.
(3) An additional fee of fifteen dollars is assessed on the retail
sale of each solid fuel burning device. Revenue from the additional
fee is solely for use by the department to carry out its
responsibilities under RCW 70.94.480.
(4) The ((fee shall be)) fees in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section are imposed upon the consumer and ((shall not be)) are not
subject to the retail sales tax provisions of chapter((s)) 82.08 ((and
82.12)) RCW. The fees may be adjusted annually ((above thirty
dollars)) to account for inflation as determined by the state office of
the economic and revenue forecast council. The fees ((shall)) must be
collected by the department of revenue in conjunction with the retail
sales tax under chapter 82.08 RCW. If the seller fails to collect the
fees herein imposed or fails to remit the fees to the department of
revenue in the manner prescribed in chapter 82.08 RCW, the seller
((shall be)) is personally liable to the state for the amount of the
fees. The collection provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW ((shall)) apply.
The department of revenue ((shall)) must deposit fees collected under
this section in the woodstove education and enforcement account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---