BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that: The state's
natural resources agencies have faced significant budget reductions,
including administrative reductions, as a result of the great economic
challenges faced by the state in recent years; these reductions have
required the natural resources agencies to explore potential
efficiencies, and resulted in the beginnings of increased collaboration
among the agencies; and the state will benefit from continued progress
achieving efficiencies in and increased collaboration among the natural
resources agencies.
(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to establish an ongoing and
collaborative process for the natural resources agencies to identify,
analyze, and, where appropriate, implement opportunities to achieve
efficiencies in or improve the effectiveness of natural resources
agency operations and resource management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) The natural resources agencies shall, in
consultation with the office of financial management, develop and
effectuate an ongoing process to identify, analyze, and, where
appropriate, implement opportunities to achieve efficiencies in or
improve the effectiveness of agency operations and resource management.
(2) Process outcomes: In developing and effectuating this process,
the agencies shall identify and document significant examples of
interagency collaboration, office or facility colocation, and sharing
or consolidation of administrative functions.
(3) Interagency collaboration:
(a) In developing and effectuating this process, the agencies shall
identify and analyze opportunities to achieve efficiencies in or
improve the effectiveness of agency operations and resource management
through actions such as interagency collaboration, sharing or
consolidation of administrative functions, and other relevant actions
identified by the agencies.
(b) The agencies shall implement those actions that are consistent
with the criteria in (a) of this subsection and reasonably practicable,
as determined by the agencies.
(4) Office and facility colocation:
(a) In developing and effectuating this process, the agencies shall
identify and analyze opportunities to achieve efficiencies in or
improve the effectiveness of agency operations and resource management
through the colocation of offices and facilities.
(b) In identifying opportunities for analysis, the agencies shall
consider current and future opportunities for colocation resulting from
circumstances such as an existing or anticipated office or facility
vacancy, lease expiration, or the presence of multiple offices or
facilities in a particular geographic area. The agencies may also
consider opportunities for colocation with appropriate entities other
than natural resources agencies.
(c) The agencies shall implement those colocation opportunities
that are consistent with the criteria in (a) of this subsection and
reasonably practicable, as determined by the agencies and consistent
with RCW 43.82.010. The agencies shall seek to align the
implementation of this subsection with the development and
implementation of the six-year facility plan required under RCW
43.82.055 wherever possible in order to promote efficiencies. The
office of financial management may exercise the authority provided
under section 3 of this act regarding colocation opportunities.
(5) In developing and effectuating this process, the agencies must
provide a structure for and maintain regular communication. Each
agency must participate in the development and effectuation of the
process in a collaborative and, as appropriate, active manner.
(6) Consistent with RCW 43.01.036, the agencies must collectively
submit a report to the appropriate standing committees of the senate
and house of representatives by September 1st of each year. The report
must include an update on the process required under this section,
opportunities identified and analyzed under the process, outcomes
resulting from the process, and any budget or legislative
recommendations.
(7) For the purposes of this section, the terms "agency" and
"natural resources agency" includes the department of agriculture, the
department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, the
department of natural resources, the recreation and conservation
office, the Puget Sound partnership, the state conservation commission,
and the state parks and recreation commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) The office of financial management may
identify colocation opportunities for analysis by the agencies under
section 2(4) of this act.
(2) If the agencies determine that a colocation opportunity does
not meet the criteria for implementation under section 2(4) of this
act, the office of financial management shall review that
determination. The director of the office of financial management may
require the agencies to reconsider the initial determination or
implement the opportunity if the director determines that the
opportunity: Meets the criteria for implementation under section 2(4)
of this act; would result in significant cost savings or efficiencies;
and is in the best interest of the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The legislature finds that the process
required under section 2 of this act consists of a series of activities
that are an inherent part of efficient and effective natural resource
agency management, and must be conducted within existing resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Sections 2 and 3 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

--- END ---