BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 36.54 RCW
to read as follows:
A county or ferry district operating ferries under this chapter may
impose a vessel replacement surcharge on every ferry fare sold. The
surcharge must be at least equal to the surcharge amount included in
Washington state ferry fares identified in RCW 47.60.315(7). Revenues
generated from the surcharge may be used only for the construction or
purchase of ferry vessels and to pay the principal and interest on
bonds authorized for the construction or purchase of ferry vessels.
The surcharge must be clearly indicated to ferry passengers and drivers
and, if possible, on the fare media itself.

--- END ---