BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon request, the department shall conduct biological surveys,
provide assistance with habitat or other management plans, and provide
relevant information and other technical assistance to a person seeking
such assistance in order to comply with the requirements of local
critical area ordinances under RCW 36.70A.060(2) that relate to the
protection of the Mazama pocket gopher (Thomomys mazama) or its
habitat.
(2) Cities and counties may only apply those provisions of critical
area ordinances under RCW 36.70A.060(2) to protect the Mazama pocket
gopher where the department provides assistance upon request as
provided under subsection (1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of fish and wildlife shall
provide assistance as provided in section 1 of this act within existing
resources.

--- END ---