BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.545.020 (Reimbursement not a tuition charge) and 1983
c 3 s 32 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.44.095;
(2) RCW 28A.545.030 (Purposes) and 1990 c 33 s 488 & 1981 c 264 s
1;
(3) RCW 28A.545.040 ("Student residing in a nonhigh school
district" defined) and 2010 c 99 s 7, 1995 c 77 s 25, 1990 c 33 s 489,
& 1981 c 264 s 2;
(4) RCW 28A.545.050 (Amounts due from nonhigh districts) and 1985
c 341 s 11 & 1981 c 264 s 3;
(5) RCW 28A.545.060 (Enrollment data for computation of amounts
due) and 1990 c 33 s 490 & 1981 c 264 s 4;
(6) RCW 28A.545.070 (Superintendent's annual determination of
estimated amount due -- Process) and 1990 c 33 s 491 & 1981 c 264 s 5;
(7) RCW 28A.545.080 (Estimated amount due paid in May and November
installments) and 1990 c 33 s 492 & 1981 c 264 s 6;
(8) RCW 28A.545.090 (Assessing nonhigh school lesser amount -- Notice
of) and 1990 c 33 s 493 & 1981 c 264 s 7;
(9) RCW 28A.545.100 (Amount due reflects cost of education and
transportation of students) and 1995 c 77 s 26, 1990 c 33 s 494, 1983
1st ex.s. c 61 s 7, & 1981 c 264 s 8;
(10) RCW 28A.545.110 (Rules to effect purposes and implement
provisions) and 1990 c 33 s 495 & 1981 c 264 s 9; and
(11) RCW 28A.545.120 (New programs or grades -- Approval -- Rules) and
2010 c 99 s 8 & 2006 c 263 s 325.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2010 c 237 s 1 and 2010 c 99 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) ((For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2))) For excess levies for collection in calendar year ((1998))
2012 and thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a)
plus or minus (b)((,)) and (c)((, and (d))) of this subsection minus
(((e))) (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsections (2) and (3)
((and (4))) of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy
percentage as defined in subsection (((6))) (5) of this section;
(b) ((For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) Except for nonhigh districts under (d) of this subsection,))
For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (((3))) (2) of
this section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (((6))) (5) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(((d))) (c) The levy bases of nonhigh districts participating in an
innovation academy cooperative established under RCW 28A.340.080 shall
be adjusted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to reflect each district's proportional share of student enrollment in
the cooperative;
(((e))) (d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by
the maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(((3))) (2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 2005
and thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations
in (a) through (c) of this subsection received by the district for the
prior school year and the amounts determined under subsection (((4)))
(3) of this section, including allocations for compensation increases,
plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by the percent increase per
full time equivalent student as stated in the state basic education
appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior school
year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property
tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(((4))) (3) For levy collections in calendar years 2005 through
2017, in addition to the allocations included under subsection (((3)))
(2)(a) through (c) of this section, a district's levy base shall also
include the following:
(a)(i) For levy collections in calendar year 2010, the difference
between the allocation the district would have received in the current
school year had RCW 84.52.068 not been amended by chapter 19, Laws of
2003 1st sp. sess. and the allocation the district received in the
current school year pursuant to RCW 28A.505.220;
(ii) For levy collections in calendar years 2011 through 2017, the
difference between the allocation rate the district would have received
in the prior school year using the Initiative 728 rate and the
allocation rate the district received in the prior school year pursuant
to RCW 28A.505.220 multiplied by the full-time equivalent student
enrollment used to calculate the Initiative 728 allocation for the
prior school year; and
(b) The difference between the allocations the district would have
received the prior school year using the Initiative 732 base and the
allocations the district actually received the prior school year
pursuant to RCW 28A.400.205.
(((5))) (4) For levy collections in calendar years 2011 through
2017, in addition to the allocations included under subsections (((3)))
(2)(a) through (c) and (((4))) (3)(a) and (b) of this section, a
district's levy base shall also include the difference between an
allocation of fifty-three and two-tenths certificated instructional
staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades
kindergarten through four enrolled in the prior school year and the
allocation of certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through four that the
district actually received in the prior school year, except that the
levy base for a school district whose allocation in the 2009-10 school
year was less than fifty-three and two-tenths certificated
instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent students in
grades kindergarten through four shall include the difference between
the allocation the district actually received in the 2009-10 school
year and the allocation the district actually received in the prior
school year.
(((6))) (5)(a) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be
twenty-four percent in 2010 and twenty-eight percent in 2011 through
2017 and twenty-four percent every year thereafter;
(b) For qualifying districts, in addition to the percentage in (a)
of this subsection the grandfathered percentage determined as follows:
(i) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; and
(ii) For 2011 through 2017, the percentage calculated as follows:
(A) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (((3))) (2) of
this section;
(B) Reduce the result of (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (((7))) (6) of this section
that are to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(C) Divide the result of (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(D) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(ii)(C) of this subsection.
(((7))) (6) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state
funds from the prior school year for programs included under
subsections (((3))) (2) and (((4))) (3) of this section: (a) That are
not attributable to enrollment changes, compensation increases, or
inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are or were specifically
identified as levy reduction funds in the appropriations act. If levy
reduction funds are dependent on formula factors which would not be
finalized until after the start of the current school year, the
superintendent of public instruction shall estimate the total amount of
levy reduction funds by using prior school year data in place of
current school year data. Levy reduction funds shall not include
moneys received by school districts from cities or counties.
(((8))) (7) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Prior school year" means the most recent school year completed
prior to the year in which the levies are to be collected.
(b) "Current school year" means the year immediately following the
prior school year.
(c) "Initiative 728 rate" means the allocation rate at which the
student achievement program would have been funded under chapter 3,
Laws of 2001, if all annual adjustments to the initial 2001 allocation
rate had been made in previous years and in each subsequent year as
provided for under chapter 3, Laws of 2001.
(d) "Initiative 732 base" means the prior year's state allocation
for annual salary cost-of-living increases for district employees in
the state-funded salary base as it would have been calculated under
chapter 4, Laws of 2001, if each annual cost-of-living increase
allocation had been provided in previous years and in each subsequent
year.
(((9))) (8) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax
levies shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(((10))) (9) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
rules and inform school districts of the pertinent data necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section.
(((11))) (10) For calendar year 2009, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall recalculate school district
levy authority to reflect levy rates certified by school districts for
calendar year 2009.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.52.0531 and 2010 c 237 s 2 and 2010 c 99 s 11 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school
district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:
(1) ((For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the
maximum dollar amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and
rules in effect in November 1996.
(2))) For excess levies for collection in calendar year ((1998))
2012 and thereafter, the maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a)
plus or minus (b)((,)) and (c)((, and (d))) of this subsection minus
(((e))) (d) of this subsection:
(a) The district's levy base as defined in subsection (((3))) (2)
of this section multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as
defined in subsection (((4))) (3) of this section;
(b) ((For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to
the estimated amount of the nonhigh payment due to the high school
district under RCW 28A.545.030(3) and 28A.545.050 for the school year
commencing the year of the levy;
(c) Except for nonhigh districts under (d) of this subsection,))
For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the
nonresident school district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and
the resident school district's maximum levy amount shall be increased
by an amount equal to the per pupil basic education allocation included
in the nonresident district's levy base under subsection (((3))) (2) of
this section multiplied by:
(i) The number of full-time equivalent students served from the
resident district in the prior school year; multiplied by:
(ii) The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined
under subsection (((4))) (3) of this section; increased by:
(iii) The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as
stated in the state basic education appropriation section of the
biennial budget between the prior school year and the current school
year divided by fifty-five percent;
(((d))) (c) The levy bases of nonhigh districts participating in an
innovation academy cooperative established under RCW 28A.340.080 shall
be adjusted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction
to reflect each district's proportional share of student enrollment in
the cooperative;
(((e))) (d) The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by
the maximum amount of state matching funds for which the district is
eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.
(((3))) (2) For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998
and thereafter, a district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations
in (a) ((through (c))) and (b) of this subsection received by the
district for the prior school year, including allocations for
compensation increases, plus the sum of such allocations multiplied by
the percent increase per full time equivalent student as stated in the
state basic education appropriation section of the biennial budget
between the prior school year and the current school year and divided
by fifty-five percent. A district's levy base shall not include local
school district property tax levies or other local revenues, or state
and federal allocations not identified in (a) ((through (c))) and (b)
of this subsection.
(a) The district's basic education allocation as determined
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;
(b) State and federal categorical allocations for the following
programs:
(i) Pupil transportation;
(ii) Special education;
(iii) Education of highly capable students;
(iv) Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning
assistance, migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and
bilingual education;
(v) Food services; and
(vi) Statewide block grant programs; and
(c) Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary
school programs, including direct grants, other than federal impact aid
funds and allocations in lieu of taxes.
(((4))) (3)(a) A district's maximum levy percentage shall be
twenty-four percent in 2010 and twenty-eight percent in 2011 through
2017 and twenty-four percent every year thereafter;
(b) For qualifying districts, in addition to the percentage in (a)
of this subsection the grandfathered percentage determined as follows:
(i) For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum
levy percentage and twenty percent; ((and))
(ii) For 2011 through 2017, the percentage calculated as follows:
(A) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (((3))) (2) of
this section;
(B) Reduce the result of (b)(ii)(A) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (((5))) (4) of this section
that are to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(C) Divide the result of (b)(ii)(B) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(D) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(ii)(C) of this subsection;
(iii) For 2018 and thereafter, the percentage shall be calculated
as follows:
(A) Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times
the district's levy base determined under subsection (((3))) (2) of
this section;
(B) Reduce the result of (b)(iii)(A) of this subsection by any levy
reduction funds as defined in subsection (((5))) (4) of this section
that are to be allocated to the district for the current school year;
(C) Divide the result of (b)(iii)(B) of this subsection by the
district's levy base; and
(D) Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in
(b)(iii)(C) of this subsection.
(((5))) (4) "Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state
funds from the prior school year for programs included under subsection
(((3))) (2) of this section: (a) That are not attributable to
enrollment changes, compensation increases, or inflationary
adjustments; and (b) that are or were specifically identified as levy
reduction funds in the appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are
dependent on formula factors which would not be finalized until after
the start of the current school year, the superintendent of public
instruction shall estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by
using prior school year data in place of current school year data.
Levy reduction funds shall not include moneys received by school
districts from cities or counties.
(((6))) (5) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year"
means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which
the levies are to be collected.
(((7))) (6) For the purposes of this section, "current school year"
means the year immediately following the prior school year.
(((8))) (7) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax
levies shall not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.
(((9))) (8) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
rules ((and regulations)) and inform school districts of the pertinent
data necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Section 1 of this act takes effect August 1,
2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 2 of this act takes effect January
1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 3 of this act takes effect January
1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 Section 2 of this act expires January 1,
2018.

--- END ---