BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the free
exercise of religion is a fundamental right and that Washington state
should refrain from inhibiting religious activities when those
activities are not in conflict or inconsistent with the state's
interests.
(2) The legislature further finds that there is a need to clarify
ambiguous language under Article I, section 11, of the Washington state
Constitution, which states that "No public money or property shall be
appropriated for or applied to any religious worship, exercise or
instruction, or the support of any religious establishment . . ."
(3) The legislature finds Article I, section 11, of the Washington
state Constitution was intended to ensure public money and property was
not directly used for the primary purpose of supporting a religious
establishment, and this provision was not meant to prohibit the free
exercise of religion on state property that is open to general use by
the public.
(4) The legislature intends to provide the department of enterprise
services statutory guidance in interpreting and applying Article I,
section 11, of the state Constitution in order to allow the use of
capitol grounds for religious activity and provide consistency in the
application of rules regarding use of capitol grounds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of enterprise services shall not prohibit the
use of capitol grounds for religious purposes, provided that the
particular portion of the capitol grounds to be used is open to the
public for events of a similar size and nature and the impact to the
state as a result of the use is no greater than the impact by other
allowed uses.
(2) The department of enterprise services shall apply policies
regarding the use of state grounds consistently to various religious
activities, including religious activities that involve elements of
cultural and societal significance.
(3) This section shall not allow the direct appropriation or
application of state resources for a religious purpose, other than the
use of capitol grounds consistent with this section.

--- END ---