BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.640.020 and 1994 c 213 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
((regulations)) rules and guidelines to eliminate sex discrimination as
it applies to public school employment, counseling and guidance
services to students, recreational and athletic activities for
students, access to course offerings, and in textbooks and
instructional materials used by students.
(((a))) (2) Specifically with respect to public school employment,
all schools shall be required to:
(((i))) (a) Maintain credential requirements for all personnel
without regard to sex;
(((ii))) (b) Make no differentiation in pay scale on the basis of
sex;
(((iii))) (c) Assign school duties without regard to sex except
where such assignment would involve duty in areas or situations, such
as but not limited to a shower room, where persons might be disrobed;
(((iv))) (d) Provide the same opportunities for advancement to
males and females; and
(((v))) (e) Make no difference in conditions of employment
including, but not limited to, hiring practices, leaves of absence,
hours of employment, and assignment of, or pay for, instructional and
noninstructional duties, on the basis of sex.
(((b))) (3) Specifically with respect to counseling and guidance
services for students, they shall be made available to all students
equally. All certificated personnel shall be required to stress access
to all career and vocational opportunities to students without regard
to sex.
(((c))) (4)(a) Specifically with respect to recreational and
athletic activities, they shall be offered to all students without
regard to sex. Schools may provide separate teams for each sex.
Schools which provide the following shall do so with no disparities
based on sex: Equipment and supplies; medical care; services and
insurance; transportation and per diem allowances; opportunities to
receive coaching and instruction; laundry services; assignment of game
officials; opportunities for competition, publicity and awards;
scheduling of games and practice times including use of courts, gyms,
and pools: PROVIDED, That such scheduling of games and practice times
shall be determined by local administrative authorities after
consideration of the public and student interest in attending and
participating in various recreational and athletic activities. Each
school which provides showers, toilets, or training room facilities for
athletic purposes shall provide comparable facilities for both sexes.
Such facilities may be provided either as separate facilities or shall
be scheduled and used separately by each sex.
(b) The superintendent of public instruction shall also be required
to develop a student survey to distribute every three years to each
local school district in the state to determine student interest for
male/female participation in specific sports.
(((d))) (5) Specifically with respect to course offerings, all
classes shall be required to be available to all students without
regard to sex: PROVIDED, That separation is permitted within any class
during sessions on sex education ((or)), gym classes, or as provided in
subsection (6) of this section.
(((e))) (6)(a) A single-sex class may be provided if:
(i) The single-sex class is substantially related to the school's
objective of improving the educational achievement of its students; or
(ii) The single-sex class is substantially related to meeting the
educational needs of its students; and
(iii) Student enrollment in a single-sex class is completely
voluntary.
(b) A school that provides a single-sex class must provide a
substantially equal single-sex class for students of the excluded sex.
(c) The school must conduct periodic evaluations at least every two
years to ensure that single-sex classes are substantially related to
the achievement of the important objective for the classes.
(7) Specifically with respect to textbooks and instructional
materials, which shall also include, but not be limited to, reference
books and audio-visual materials, they shall be required to adhere to
the guidelines developed by the superintendent of public instruction to
implement the intent of this chapter: PROVIDED, That this subsection
shall not be construed to prohibit the introduction of material deemed
appropriate by the instructor for educational purposes.
(((2))) (8)(a) By December 31, 1994, the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop criteria for use by school districts in
developing sexual harassment policies as required under (b) of this
subsection. The criteria shall address the subjects of grievance
procedures, remedies to victims of sexual harassment, disciplinary
actions against violators of the policy, and other subjects at the
discretion of the superintendent of public instruction. Disciplinary
actions must conform with collective bargaining agreements and state
and federal laws. The superintendent of public instruction also shall
supply sample policies to school districts upon request.
(b) By June 30, 1995, every school district shall adopt and
implement a written policy concerning sexual harassment. The policy
shall apply to all school district employees, volunteers, parents, and
students, including, but not limited to, conduct between students.
(c) School district policies on sexual harassment shall be reviewed
by the superintendent of public instruction considering the criteria
established under (a) of this subsection as part of the monitoring
process established in RCW 28A.640.030.
(d) The school district's sexual harassment policy shall be
conspicuously posted throughout each school building, and provided to
each employee. A copy of the policy shall appear in any publication of
the school or school district setting forth the rules, regulations,
procedures, and standards of conduct for the school or school district.
(e) Each school shall develop a process for discussing the
district's sexual harassment policy. The process shall ensure the
discussion addresses the definition of sexual harassment and issues
covered in the sexual harassment policy.
(((f))) (9) "Sexual harassment" as used in this section means
unwelcome sexual advances, requests for sexual favors, sexually
motivated physical contact, or other verbal or physical conduct or
communication of a sexual nature if:
(((i))) (a) Submission to that conduct or communication is made a
term or condition, either explicitly or implicitly, of obtaining an
education or employment;
(((ii))) (b) Submission to or rejection of that conduct or
communication by an individual is used as a factor in decisions
affecting that individual's education or employment; or
(((iii))) (c) That conduct or communication has the purpose or
effect of substantially interfering with an individual's educational or
work performance, or of creating an intimidating, hostile, or offensive
educational or work environment.

--- END ---