BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 42.56.380 and 2010 c 128 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The following information relating to agriculture and livestock is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Business-related information under RCW 15.86.110;
(2) Information provided under RCW 15.54.362;
(3) Production or sales records required to determine assessment
levels and actual assessment payments to commodity boards and
commissions formed under chapters 15.24, 15.26, 15.28, 15.44, 15.65,
15.66, 15.74, 15.88, 15.115, 15.100, 15.89, and 16.67 RCW or required
by the department of agriculture to administer these chapters or the
department's programs;
(4) Consignment information contained on phytosanitary certificates
issued by the department of agriculture under chapters 15.13, 15.49,
and 15.17 RCW or federal phytosanitary certificates issued under 7
C.F.R. 353 through cooperative agreements with the animal and plant
health inspection service, United States department of agriculture, or
on applications for phytosanitary certification required by the
department of agriculture;
(5) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
persons (a) to the department of agriculture for the purpose of
conducting a referendum for the potential establishment of a commodity
board or commission; or (b) to the department of agriculture or
commodity boards or commissions formed under chapter 15.24, 15.28,
15.44, 15.65, 15.66, 15.74, 15.88, 15.115, 15.100, 15.89, or 16.67 RCW
with respect to domestic or export marketing activities or individual
producer's production information;
(6) Information obtained regarding the purchases, sales, or
production of an individual American ginseng grower or dealer, except
for providing reports to the United States fish and wildlife service
under RCW 15.19.080;
(7) Information collected regarding packers and shippers of fruits
and vegetables for the issuance of certificates of compliance under RCW
15.17.140(2) and 15.17.143;
(8) Financial statements obtained under RCW 16.65.030(1)(d) for the
purposes of determining whether or not the applicant meets the minimum
net worth requirements to construct or operate a public livestock
market;
(9) Information submitted by an individual or business to the
department of agriculture under the requirements of chapters 16.36,
16.57, and 43.23 RCW for the purpose of ((participating in a state or
national animal identification system)) herd inventory management for
animal disease traceability. This information includes animal
ownership, numbers of animals, locations, contact information,
movements of livestock, financial information, the purchase and sale of
livestock, account numbers or unique identifiers issued by government
to private entities, and information related to livestock disease or
injury that would identify an animal, a person, or location.
Disclosure to local, state, and federal officials is not public
disclosure. This exemption does not affect the disclosure of
information used in reportable animal health investigations under
chapter 16.36 RCW once they are complete; ((and))
(10) Results of testing for animal diseases ((not required to be
reported under chapter 16.36 RCW that is done at the request of)) from
samples submitted by or at the direction of the animal owner or his or
her designee that can be identified to a particular business or
individual;
(11) Records of international livestock importation that can be
identified to a particular animal, business, or individual received
from the United States department of homeland security or the United
States department of agriculture that are not disclosable by the
federal agency under federal law including 5 U.S.C. Sec. 552; and
(12) Records related to the entry of prohibited agricultural
products imported into Washington state or that had Washington state as
a final destination received from the United States department of
homeland security or the United States department of agriculture that
are not disclosable by the federal agency under federal law including
5 U.S.C. Sec. 552.

--- END ---