BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.32.110 and 1989 c 373 s 27 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of revenue or its duly authorized agent may
examine any books, papers, records (excluding individually identifiable
health information), or other data, or stock of merchandise bearing
upon the amount of any tax payable or upon the correctness of any
return, or for the purpose of making a return where none has been made,
or in order to ascertain whether a return should be made; and may
require the attendance of any person at a time and place fixed in a
summons served by any sheriff in the same manner as a subpoena is
served in a civil case, or served in like manner by an agent of the
department of revenue.
(2) The persons summoned may be required to testify and produce any
books, papers, records (excluding individually identifiable health
information), or data required by the department with respect to any
tax, or the liability of any person therefor.
(3) The director of the department of revenue, or any duly
authorized agent thereof, ((shall have)) has power to administer an
oath to the person required to testify; and any person giving false
testimony after the administration of such oath ((shall be)) is guilty
of perjury in the first degree.
(4) If any person summoned as a witness before the department, or
its authorized agent, fails or refuses to obey the summons, or refuses
to testify or answer any material questions, or to produce any book,
record (excluding individually identifiable health information), paper,
or data when required to do so, the person is subject to proceedings
for contempt, and the department ((shall thereupon)) must institute
contempt of court proceedings in the superior court of Thurston county
or of the county in which such person resides.
(5) For purposes of this section, "individually identifiable health
information" means information that relates to the past, present, or
future physical or mental health or condition of an individual,
identifies the individual, or identifies the provision of health care
to an individual.

--- END ---