BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 79A.80.080 and 2011 c 320 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The discover pass, the vehicle access pass, or the day-use
permit must be visibly displayed in the front windshield of any motor
vehicle:
(a) Operating on a recreation site or lands; or
(b) Parking at a recreation site or lands.
(2) The discover pass, the vehicle access pass, or the day-use
permit is not required:
(a) On private lands, state-owned aquatic lands other than water
access areas, or at agency offices, hatcheries, or other facilities
where public business is conducted; or
(b) For a motor vehicle operating on a recreation site or
recreation lands in order to access private lands or agency-managed
lands other than a recreation site or recreation lands.
(3)(a) The discover pass, the vehicle access pass, or the day-use
permit is not required for persons who use, possess, or enter lands
owned or managed by the agencies for purposes consistent with a written
authorization from the agency, including but not limited to leases,
contracts, and easements.
(b) The discover pass or the day-use permit is not required on
department of fish and wildlife lands for persons possessing a current
vehicle access pass pursuant to RCW 79A.80.040.
(4) Failure to comply with subsection (1) of this section is a
natural resource infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW. An agency is
authorized to issue a notice of infraction to any person who fails to
comply with subsection (1)(a) of this section or to any motor vehicle
that fails to comply with subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(5) The penalty for failure to comply with the requirements of this
section is ninety-nine dollars. This penalty is reduced to fifty-nine
dollars if an individual provides proof of purchase of the discover
pass to the court within fifteen days after the issuance of the notice
of violation.

--- END ---