BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.165.030 and 1995 c 277 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
An applicant must meet the following minimum requirements to obtain
a private investigator license:
(1) Be at least eighteen years of age;
(2) Be a citizen or resident alien of the United States;
(3) Not have been convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction, if the
director determines that the applicant's particular crime directly
relates to his or her capacity to perform the duties of a private
investigator and the director determines that the license should be
withheld to protect the citizens of Washington state. The director
shall make her or his determination to withhold a license because of
previous convictions notwithstanding the restoration of employment
rights act, chapter 9.96A RCW;
(4) Be employed by or have an employment offer from a private
investigator agency or be licensed as a private investigator agency;
(5) Submit a set of fingerprints; however, if an applicant has been
issued a license as a private security guard under chapter 18.170 RCW
within the last twelve months, the applicant is not required to undergo
a separate background check to become licensed under this chapter;
(6) Pay the required nonrefundable fee for each application; and
(7) Submit a fully completed application that includes proper
identification on a form prescribed by the director for each company of
employment.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.170.030 and 1995 c 277 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
An applicant must meet the following minimum requirements to obtain
a private security guard license:
(1) Be at least eighteen years of age;
(2) Be a citizen of the United States or a resident alien;
(3) Not have been convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction, if the
director determines that the applicant's particular crime directly
relates to his or her capacity to perform the duties of a private
security guard, and the director determines that the license should be
withheld to protect the citizens of Washington state. The director
shall make her or his determination to withhold a license because of
previous convictions notwithstanding the restoration of employment
rights act, chapter 9.96A RCW;
(4) Be employed by or have an employment offer from a licensed
private security company or be licensed as a private security company;
(5) Satisfy the training requirements established by the director;
(6) Submit a set of fingerprints; however, if an applicant has been
issued a license as a private investigator under chapter 18.165 RCW
within the last twelve months, the applicant is not required to undergo
a separate background check to become licensed under this chapter;
(7) Pay the required nonrefundable fee for each application; and
(8) Submit a fully completed application that includes proper
identification on a form prescribed by the director for each company of
employment.

--- END ---