BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.108 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of ascertaining violations of this chapter and
chapter 18.130 RCW the secretary shall have the authority to inspect
the premises of any business establishment during hours such business
is open. If the secretary is denied access to any premises or
establishment advertising or offering massage the secretary may apply
to any court of competent jurisdiction for a warrant authorizing access
to such premises or establishment for such purposes. The court may,
upon such application, issue a warrant for the purpose requested.

--- END ---