BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.60.010 and 2007 c 323 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly ((indicates)) requires otherwise.
(1) "Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.
(2) "Customer-generator" means a user of a net metering system.
(3) "Electrical company" means a company owned by investors that
meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010.
(4) "Electric cooperative" means a cooperative or association
organized under chapter 23.86 or 24.06 RCW.
(5) "Electric utility" means any electrical company, public utility
district, irrigation district, port district, electric cooperative, or
municipal electric utility that is engaged in the business of
distributing electricity to retail electric customers in the state.
(6) "Irrigation district" means an irrigation district under
chapter 87.03 RCW.
(7) "Meter aggregation" means the administrative combination of
readings from and billing for all meters, regardless of the rate class,
on premises owned or leased by a customer-generator located within the
service territory of a single electric utility.
(8) "Municipal electric utility" means a city or town that owns or
operates an electric utility authorized by chapter 35.92 RCW.
(9) "Net metering" means measuring the difference between the
electricity supplied by an electric utility and the electricity
generated by a customer-generator over the applicable billing period.
(10)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, "net metering
system" means a fuel cell, a facility that produces electricity and
used and useful thermal energy from a common fuel source, or a facility
for the production of electrical energy that generates renewable
energy, and that:
(((a))) (i) Has an electrical generating capacity of not more than
one hundred kilowatts;
(((b))) (ii) Is located on the customer-generator's premises;
(((c))) (iii) Operates in parallel with the electric utility's
transmission and distribution facilities; and
(((d))) (iv) Is intended primarily to offset part or all of the
customer-generator's requirements for electricity.
(b) In addition to meeting the conditions of (a)(ii) through (iv)
of this subsection, "net metering system" also means a facility that
generates electricity using water and that:
(i) Has an electrical generating capacity of not more than two
megawatts;
(ii) Is owned and operated by a municipality east of the crest of
the Cascade mountains with a population between thirty-one thousand and
thirty-two thousand based on the census 2010 summary file number one
prepared by the United States census bureau; and
(iii) Is served by an investor-owned electric utility whose rates
are regulated by the commission.
(11) "Premises" means any residential property, commercial real
estate, or lands, owned or leased by a customer-generator within the
service area of a single electric utility.
(12) "Port district" means a port district within which an
industrial development district has been established as authorized by
Title 53 RCW.
(13) "Public utility district" means a district authorized by
chapter 54.04 RCW.
(14) "Renewable energy" means energy generated by a facility that
uses water, wind, solar energy, or biogas from animal waste as a fuel.

--- END ---