BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Video and audio recordings of any portion of an executive session
from which the public is excluded pursuant to RCW 42.30.110 are exempt
from public disclosure under this chapter. A majority of the
statutorily or otherwise legally authorized, voting positions of the
governing body of the public agency may waive this exemption for any
portion of a recording not made confidential by some other law without
waiving this exemption for other recordings.

--- END ---