BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 It is the intent of the legislature to
clarify when a fee can be imposed by a city or town on a county in
connection with a county's operation of a sewerage system. While fees
that are imposed in conjunction with a franchise agreement are seen as
regulatory fees, these fees often exceed the amount necessary for the
cost and administration of a franchise. While the state supreme court
held in Lakewood v. Pierce County, 106 Wn. App. 63 (2001) that a
franchise fee was permissible as long as the amount of the fee is
limited to the costs associated with the franchise, the state supreme
court has condoned under specific facts the imposition of other fees in
conjunction with a franchise agreement in Burns v. The City of Seattle,
161 Wn.2d 129 (2007). The legislature finds that publicly provided
essential service such as sewerage should not be utilized by cities and
towns as a source of general fund revenue outside their legislatively
authorized taxing authority. Therefore, the legislature intends to
limit fees and charges associated with a franchise agreement to the
amount necessary to administer the franchise, prohibit any other fee or
charge of any nature, and require all revenue be reserved in a
dedicated account for the allowed purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No city or town may impose a franchise fee or any other fee or
charge of whatever nature or description upon a county in connection
with a franchise to allow the use of the right-of-way when the purpose
of the franchise is to allow the county to construct, own, operate, or
maintain a sewerage system.
(2) No city or town may impose a fee or charge of whatever nature
or description for foregoing the right to establish a sewerage system
as provided in RCW 36.94.170, the promise not to compete with a county
sewerage system by establishing their own sewerage system as provided
for in RCW 36.94.170, or foregoing the right to assume all or part of
a county sewerage system pursuant to an annexation as provided for in
RCW 36.94.180.
(3) No city or town may impose any fee or charge of whatever nature
in relation to or in conjunction with a franchise agreement with a
county relating to the county's ability to construct, own, operate, or
maintain a sewerage system unless the fee or charge compensates such
city or town for its reasonable costs, expenses, and obligations
actually incurred or contracted which are directly related to and which
benefit the area which the county proposes to serve.
(4) Any fee or charge of whatever nature or description collected
by a city or town from a county in relation to or in conjunction with
a franchise agreement relating to sewerage system shall be placed in a
dedicated account and used for the specific purposes provided in
subsection (3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 35A.47 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) No code city may impose a franchise fee or any other fee or
charge of whatever nature or description upon a county in connection
with a franchise to allow the use of the right-of-way when the purpose
of the franchise is to allow the county to construct, own, operate, or
maintain a sewerage system.
(2) No code city may impose a fee or charge of whatever nature or
description for foregoing the right to establish a sewerage system as
provided in RCW 36.94.170, the promise not to compete with a county
sewerage system by establishing their own sewerage system as provided
for in RCW 36.94.170, or foregoing the right to assume all or part of
a county sewerage system pursuant to an annexation as provided for in
RCW 36.94.180.
(3) No code city may impose any fee or charge of whatever nature in
relation to or in conjunction with a franchise agreement with a county
relating to the county's ability to construct, own, operate, or
maintain a sewerage system unless the fee or charge compensates such
code city for its reasonable costs, expenses, and obligations actually
incurred or contracted which are directly related to and which benefit
the area which the county proposes to serve.
(4) Any fee or charge of whatever nature or description collected
by a code city from a county in relation to or in conjunction with a
franchise agreement relating to sewerage system shall be placed in a
dedicated account and used for the specific purposes provided in
subsection (3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 35.22 RCW
to read as follows:
The authority to grant franchises is subject to the restriction
under section 2 of this act regarding agreements between cities and
counties relating to sewerage systems.

Sec. 5 RCW 35.23.251 and 1965 c 7 s 35.24.250 are each amended to
read as follows:
No ordinance or resolution granting any franchise for any purpose
shall be passed by the city council on the day of its introduction, nor
for five days thereafter, nor at any other than a regular meeting nor
without first being submitted to the city attorney.
No franchise or valuable privilege shall be granted unless by the
vote of at least five members of the city council.
The city council may require a bond in a reasonable amount for any
person or corporation obtaining a franchise from the city conditioned
for the faithful performance of the conditions and terms of the
franchise and providing a recovery on the bond in case of failure to
perform the terms and conditions of franchise.
The authority granted in this section is subject to the restriction
under section 2 of this act regarding agreements between cities and
counties relating to sewerage systems.

Sec. 6 RCW 35.27.330 and 2009 c 549 s 2063 are each amended to
read as follows:
No ordinance or resolution granting any franchise for any purpose
shall be passed by the council on the day of its introduction, nor
within five days thereafter, nor at any other than a regular meeting,
and no such ordinance or resolution shall have any validity or effect
unless passed by the vote of at least three councilmembers. The town
council may require a bond in a reasonable amount from any persons and
corporations obtaining a franchise from the town conditioned for the
faithful performance of the conditions and terms of the franchise and
providing a recovery on the bond in case of failure to perform the
terms and conditions of the franchise.
The authority granted in this section is subject to the restriction
under section 2 of this act regarding agreements between towns and
counties relating to sewerage systems.

Sec. 7 RCW 35A.47.040 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.47.040 are each
amended to read as follows:
Every code city shall have authority to permit and regulate under
such restrictions and conditions as it may set by charter or ordinance
and to grant nonexclusive franchises for the use of public streets,
bridges or other public ways, structures or places above or below the
surface of the ground for railroads and other routes and facilities for
public conveyances, for poles, conduits, tunnels, towers and
structures, pipes and wires and appurtenances thereof for transmission
and distribution of electrical energy, signals and other methods of
communication, for gas, steam and liquid fuels, for water, sewer and
other private and publicly owned and operated facilities for public
service. The power hereby granted shall be in addition to the
franchise authority granted by general law to cities.
No ordinance or resolution granting any franchise in a code city
for any purpose shall be adopted or passed by the city's legislative
body on the day of its introduction nor for five days thereafter, nor
at any other than a regular meeting nor without first being submitted
to the city attorney, nor without having been granted by the approving
vote of at least a majority of the entire legislative body, nor without
being published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in
the city before becoming effective.
The city council may require a bond in a reasonable amount for any
person or corporation obtaining a franchise from the city conditioned
upon the faithful performance of the conditions and terms of the
franchise and providing a recovery on the bond in case of failure to
perform the terms and conditions of the franchise.
A code city may exercise the authority hereby granted,
notwithstanding a contrary limitation of any preexisting charter
provision.
The authority granted in this section is subject to the restriction
under section 3 of this act regarding agreements between code cities
and counties relating to sewerage systems.

Sec. 8 RCW 36.94.170 and 1971 ex.s. c 96 s 7 are each amended to
read as follows:
The primary authority to construct, operate and maintain a system
of sewerage and/or water within the boundaries of a municipal
corporation which lies within the area of the county's sewerage and/or
water general plan shall remain with such municipal corporation. A
county, after it has adopted and received the necessary approvals of
its sewer and/or water general plan under the provisions of chapter
36.94 RCW may construct, own, operate and maintain a system of sewerage
and/or water within the boundaries of a city or town with the written
consent of such city or town and within any other municipal corporation
provided such municipal corporation (1) has the legislative authority
to operate such a utility; and (2)(a) has given its written consent to
the county to operate therein; or (b) after adoption of a comprehensive
plan or an amendment thereto for the area involved, the municipal
corporation has not within twelve months after receiving notice by the
county of its intention to serve that area held a formation hearing for
a utility local improvement district.
Prior to exercising any authority granted in this section, the
county shall compensate such municipal corporation for its reasonable
costs, expenses and obligations actually incurred or contracted which
are directly related to and which benefit the area which the county
proposes to serve. The county may contract with a municipal
corporation to furnish such utility service within any municipal
corporation.
Except in the case of annexations provided for in RCW 36.94.180,
once a county qualifies under this section to serve within a municipal
corporation, no municipal corporation may construct or operate a
competing utility in the same territory to be served by the county if
the county proceeds within a reasonable period of time with the
construction of its proposed facilities including the sale of any bonds
to finance the same.
When the county has established a sewerage system under this
subsection in part or throughout all of a city or town, the city or
town may not impose a fee or charge of whatever nature or description
in relation to or in conjunction with the county's franchise agreement
relating to sewerage system, including a fee in exchange for the city
or town's promise not to compete with the county in any part of the
town or city, unless the fee is directly related to its reasonable
costs, expenses, and obligations actually incurred or contracted which
are directly related to and which benefit the area which the county is
serving.
The authority granted in this section shall be subject to the
restriction under sections 2 and 3 of this act regarding agreements
between cities or towns and counties relating to sewerage.
As may be permitted by other statutes, a city or town may provide
water or sewer service outside of its corporate limits, but such
service may not conflict with the county plan or any county, sewer or
water facilities installed or being installed.
A county proposing to exercise any authority granted in this
section shall give written notice of such intention to the municipal
corporation involved and to the boundary review board, if any, of such
county. Within sixty days of the filing of such notice of intention,
review by the boundary review board of the proposed action may be
requested as provided by the provisions of RCW 36.93.100 through
36.93.180. In the event of such review, the board shall consider the
factors set forth in this section in addition to the factors and
objectives set forth in RCW 36.93.170 and 36.93.180.

Sec. 9 RCW 36.94.180 and 1986 c 234 s 34 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In the event of the annexation to a city or town of an area, or
incorporation of an area, in which a county is operating a sewerage
and/or water system, the property, facilities, and equipment of such
sewerage and/or water system lying within the annexed or incorporated
area may be transferred to the city or town if such transfer will not
materially affect the operation of any of the remaining county system,
subject to the assumption by the city or town of the county's
obligations relating to such property, facilities, and equipment, under
the procedures specified in, and pursuant to the authority contained
in, chapter 35.13A RCW.
(2) The right to assume a sewerage system provided in subsection
(1) of this section shall not be used by the city or town to impose a
fee or charge of whatever nature or description in relation to or in
conjunction with a franchise agreement relating to sewerage system,
including a fee in exchange for the city or town's promise not to
compete with the county in the newly annexed area, on a county unless
the fee is directly related to its reasonable costs, expenses, and
obligations actually incurred or contracted that are directly related
to and that benefit the area that is being annexed and the county is
serving.
(3) The authority granted in this section is subject to the
restriction under sections 2 and 3 of this act, regarding agreements
between cities or towns and counties relating to sewerage systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 This act applies to all agreements between
a city or town and a county that exist on or after the effective date
of this section, regardless of when the agreement was entered into. To
this extent, this act applies retroactively, but in all other respects
it applies prospectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---