BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.58.580 and 2008 c 123 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Persons traveling on public transportation operated by a
metropolitan municipal corporation or a city-owned transit system shall
pay the fare established by the metropolitan municipal corporation or
the city-owned transit system and shall produce proof of payment in
accordance with the terms of use established by the metropolitan
municipal corporation or the city-owned transit system. Such persons
shall produce proof of payment when requested by a person designated to
monitor fare payment. The required manner of producing proof of
payment specified in the terms of use established by the metropolitan
municipal corporation or the city-owned transit system may include, but
is not limited to, requiring a person using an electronic fare payment
card to validate the card by presenting the card to an electronic card
reader before or upon entering a public transportation vehicle or a
restricted fare paid area.
(2) The following constitute civil infractions punishable according
to the schedule of fines and penalties established by a metropolitan
municipal corporation or a city-owned transit system under RCW
35.58.585:
(a) Failure to pay the required fare;
(b) Failure to ((display)) produce proof of payment in the manner
required by the terms of use established by the metropolitan municipal
corporation or the city-owned transit system including, but not limited
to, the failure to produce a validated fare payment card when requested
to do so by a person designated to monitor fare payment; and
(c) Failure to depart the bus or other mode of public
transportation when requested to do so by a person designated to
monitor fare payment.

Sec. 2 RCW 81.112.220 and 2009 c 279 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Persons traveling on facilities operated by an authority shall
pay the fare established by the authority and shall produce proof of
payment in accordance with the terms of use established by the
authority. Such persons shall produce proof of payment when requested
by a person designated to monitor fare payment. The required manner of
producing proof of payment specified in the terms of use established by
the authority may include, but is not limited to, requiring a person
using an electronic fare payment card to validate the card by
presenting the card to an electronic card reader before or upon
entering a public transportation vehicle or a restricted fare paid
area.
(2) The following constitute civil infractions punishable according
to the schedule of fines and penalties established by the authority
under RCW 81.112.210(1):
(a) Failure to pay the required fare;
(b) Failure to ((display)) produce proof of payment in the manner
required by the terms of use established by the authority including,
but not limited to, the failure to produce a validated fare payment
card when requested to do so by a person designated to monitor fare
payment; and
(c) Failure to depart the facility when requested to do so by a
person designated to monitor fare payment.

--- END ---