BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28C.18.010 and 2009 c 151 s 5 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this title.
(1) "Adult basic education" means instruction designed to achieve
mastery of skills in reading, writing, oral communication, and
computation at a level sufficient to allow the individual to function
effectively as a parent, worker, and citizen in the United States,
commensurate with that individual's actual ability level, and includes
English as a second language and preparation and testing service for
the general education development exam.
(2) "Board" means the workforce training and education coordinating
board.
(3) "Director" means the director of the workforce training and
education coordinating board.
(4) "Industry skill panel" means a regional partnership of
business, labor, and education leaders that identifies skill gaps in a
key economic cluster and enables the industry and public partners to
respond to and be proactive in addressing workforce skill needs.
(5) "Task force" means the health care personnel shortage task
force.
(6) "Training system" means programs and courses of secondary
vocational education, technical college programs and courses, community
college vocational programs and courses, private career school and
college programs and courses, employer-sponsored training, adult basic
education programs and courses, programs and courses funded by the
federal workforce investment act, programs and courses funded by the
federal vocational act, programs and courses funded under the federal
adult education act, publicly funded programs and courses for adult
literacy education, and apprenticeships, and programs and courses
offered by private and public nonprofit organizations that are
representative of communities or significant segments of communities
and provide job training or adult literacy services.
(((6))) (7) "Vocational education" means organized educational
programs offering a sequence of courses which are directly related to
the preparation or retraining of individuals in paid or unpaid
employment in current or emerging occupations requiring other than a
baccalaureate or advanced degree. Such programs shall include
competency-based applied learning which contributes to an individual's
academic knowledge, higher-order reasoning, and problem-solving skills,
work attitudes, general employability skills, and the occupational-specific skills necessary for economic independence as a productive and
contributing member of society. Such term also includes applied
technology education.
(((7))) (8) "Workforce development council" means a local workforce
investment board as established in P.L. 105-220 Sec. 117.
(((8))) (9) "Workforce skills" means skills developed through
applied learning that strengthen and reinforce an individual's academic
knowledge, critical thinking, problem solving, and work ethic and,
thereby, develop the employability, occupational skills, and management
of home and work responsibilities necessary for economic independence.

Sec. 2 RCW 28C.18.120 and 2003 c 278 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The board shall convene a health care personnel shortage task
force. The task force shall meet biannually to establish and maintain
a state strategic plan ensuring an adequate supply of health care
personnel and safeguarding the ability of the health care delivery
system in Washington state to provide quality, accessible health care
to Washington residents. The task force must:
(1) ((Facilitate ongoing collaboration among stakeholders in
order)) Consist of stakeholders who shall work collaboratively with
each other and the board to address the health care personnel shortage.
The stakeholder groups are to be selected by the board, but must
include at least one representative of long-term care workers;
(2) ((In collaboration with stakeholders, establish and maintain a
state strategic plan for ensuring an adequate supply of health care
personnel that safeguards the ability of the health care delivery
system in Washington state to provide quality, accessible health care
to residents of Washington; and)) Work with the University of
Washington school of nursing to ensure that degree offerings and
elimination of programs, including changes to or elimination of the
school's midwife program, are in alignment with the state strategic
plan and that degree offerings are made with the goal of supporting the
social good and public health of the state;
(3) Make recommendations on development of a single web portal for
entry into the health care professions in order to recruit more
individuals into entry level health care occupations and promote
adequate preparation prior to entry;
(4) Identify ways to increase educational capacity and efficiency
in health care training programs to enable more people to qualify to
work in health care occupations. This must include methods to train
people currently in the workforce and development of a career ladder to
move people from entry level health care occupations to positions that
require more training and experience;
(5) Identify ways to monitor, manage, and retain critical
professions where they are most needed. Recommendations may include:
(a) Creation of new professions in both dental and medical fields
that are trained and compensated for work in underserved communities;
and
(b) Ways to coordinate between health professions, education and
training opportunities including apprenticeships, and ways to expand
use of professionals trained in other states;
(6) Examine the scope of practice of health care licensees to
ensure that licensees work at the top of the scope of their licenses
and also issue recommendations on scope of practice issues as they
relate to ensuring an adequate supply of qualified health care
personnel. The task force may assist the department of health in
performing sunrise reviews relating to scope of practice;
(7) Develop a data collection and analysis system to assist health
workforce supply and demand;
(8) Enable local communities to implement strategies to alleviate
the health care personnel shortage in their areas. This includes
assisting local fire departments in developing a community worker
program under section 6 of this act;
(9) Develop a mechanism to ensure continued collaboration among
stakeholders, track progress, create accountability, and to plan for
future health workforce needs;
(10) Investigate other activities as the task force deems necessary
to develop a qualified health care workforce;
(11) Coordinate grant activity as provided in section 5 of this
act; and
(12) Report to the governor and legislature by December 31, 2003,
and annually thereafter, on progress on the state strategic plan and
make additional recommendations as necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The University of Washington school of nursing must consult with
the health care personnel shortage task force as described in RCW
28C.18.120. This consultation must be made when the school of nursing
makes changes to degree requirements or proposes to eliminate or add
degree offerings. Any change, elimination, or addition to a degree
program must be in accordance with the health care personnel shortage
task force's state strategic plan and must further the social good and
public health of the people in the state of Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The task force may receive and expend federal funds and private
gifts or grants, which funds must be expended in accordance with any
conditions upon which the funds are contingent. Money received under
this section may be used to support task force activities, including
providing job training funding to entry level professions identified in
the state strategic plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW
to read as follows:
The task force must develop a health care workforce grant
assistance program. The program must provide assistance to Washington-based grant applicants of state and federal health care workforce
grants and must:
(1) Coordinate with the activities of grantees who have received
federal grants for health care workforce activities to ensure they are
consulting with the state strategic plan;
(2) Provide grant writing assistance to grant applicants; and
(3) Coordinate with local economic development councils.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any fire department may develop a community assistance referral
and education services program to provide community outreach and
assistance to residents of its district in order to advance injury and
illness prevention within their communities. The program should
identify members of the community who use the 911 system for low acuity
assistance calls and connect them to their primary care providers,
other health care professionals, low-cost medication programs, and
other social services. The program may also provide a fire department-based nonemergency contact in order to provide an alternative resource
to the 911 system. The program may hire health care professionals as
needed.
(2) A fire department may seek grant opportunities and private
gifts in order to support its community assistance referral and
education services program.
(3) In developing a community assistance referral and education
services program, a fire department may consult with the health care
personnel shortage task force to identify health care professions
capable of working in a nontraditional setting and providing
assistance, referral, and education services.
(4) Community assistance referral and education services programs
implemented under this section must, at least annually, measure any
reduction of repeated use of the 911 emergency system and any reduction
in avoidable emergency room trips attributable to implementation of the
program. Results of findings under this subsection are reportable to
the legislature or other local governments upon request.

--- END ---