BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.05 RCW
to read as follows:
A local board of health may adopt and manage an on-site sewage
program management plan required pursuant to RCW 70.118A.030 or
otherwise required by the state board of health, and impose and collect
reasonable rates or charges only in an amount sufficient to pay for the
actual costs of administration and operation of the plan. A local
board of health may contract with the county treasurer to collect the
rates or charges imposed under this section in accordance with RCW
84.56.035. A local board of health does not have the authority to
impose a lien on real property for failure to pay rates and charges
imposed by this section.

--- END ---