BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.657.040 and 2010 c 235 s 104 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an
external review team to conduct an academic performance audit of the
district and each persistently lowest-achieving school in a required
action district to identify the potential reasons for the school's low
performance and lack of progress. The review team must consist of
persons under contract with the superintendent who have expertise in
comprehensive school and district reform and may not include staff from
the agency, the school district that is the subject of the audit, or
members or staff of the state board of education.
(2) The audit must be conducted based on criteria developed by the
superintendent of public instruction and must include but not be
limited to an examination of the following:
(a) Student demographics;
(b) Mobility patterns;
(c) School feeder patterns;
(d) The performance of different student groups on assessments;
(e) Effective school leadership;
(f) Strategic allocation of resources;
(g) Clear and shared focus on student learning;
(h) High standards and expectations for all students;
(i) High level of collaboration and communication;
(j) Aligned curriculum, instruction, and assessment to state
standards;
(k) Frequency of monitoring of learning and teaching;
(l) Focused professional development;
(m) Supportive learning environment;
(n) High level of family and community involvement;
(o) The level of student participation in school activities and
extracurricular activities;
(p) The level of social emotional learning provided;
(q) Alternative secondary schools best practices; and
(((p))) (r) Any unique circumstances or characteristics of the
school or district.
(3) Audit findings must be made available to the local school
district, its staff, the community, and the state board of education.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "social emotional learning"
includes age-appropriate and culturally responsive behavioral and
emotional management, relationship skills, conflict resolution,
interpersonal communication, cooperation, decision making, and
planning.

--- END ---