BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to implement the
recommendations of the 2010 working group regarding the programs for
highly capable students, including standardizing the process since the
legislature has designated the program as part of basic education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.185
RCW to read as follows:
For the purposes of the program for highly capable students under
this chapter, a highly capable student means a student who performs, or
shows potential for performing, at significantly advanced levels when
compared to others of his or her age, experience, or environment.
Outstanding capabilities are seen with the student's general
intellectual aptitudes, specific academic abilities, creative
productivities within a specific domain, or leadership skills. Highly
capable students are present in all cultural and linguistic groups and
across all socioeconomic strata; coexist with all manner of disabling
conditions both visible and invisible; and manifest across all areas of
human endeavor.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.185.020 and 2009 c 548 s 708 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that, for highly capable students, access
to accelerated learning and enhanced instruction is access to a basic
education. The education of highly capable students may include
supports and services that are in addition to those ordinarily provided
as part of general education.
(2) There are multiple definitions of highly capable, from
intellectual to academic to artistic. The research literature strongly
supports using multiple criteria to identify highly capable students,
and therefore, the legislature does not intend to prescribe a single
method. Instead, the legislature intends to allocate funding based on
two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school
district's population and authorize school districts to identify
through the use of multiple, objective criteria those students most
highly capable and eligible to receive accelerated learning and
enhanced instruction in the program offered by the district. Access to
accelerated learning and enhanced instruction through the program for
highly capable students does not constitute an individual entitlement
for any particular student.
(((2))) (3) Supplementary funds provided by the state for the
program for highly capable students under RCW 28A.150.260 shall be
categorical funding to provide services to highly capable students as
determined by a school district under RCW 28A.185.030.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.185.030 and 2009 c 380 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
Local school districts may establish and operate, either separately
or jointly, programs for highly capable students. Such authority shall
include the right to employ and pay special instructors and to operate
such programs jointly with a public institution of higher education.
Local school districts which establish and operate programs for highly
capable students shall adopt identification procedures and provide
educational opportunities as follows:
(1) In accordance with rules adopted by the superintendent of
public instruction, school districts shall implement procedures for
nomination, assessment and selection of their most highly capable
students for the purposes of the highly capable program. ((Nominations
shall be based upon data from teachers, other staff, parents, students,
and members of the community. Assessment shall be based upon a review
of each student's capability as shown by multiple criteria intended to
reveal, from a wide variety of sources and data, each student's unique
needs and capabilities. Selection shall be made by a broadly based
committee of professionals, after consideration of the results of the
multiple criteria assessment.)) Under the procedures, no single
criterion should prevent a student's identification. However, any
single criterion, if strong enough, may indicate a need for services.
The rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction must
include but are not limited to consistent procedures for:
(a) Universal screening;
(b) Regular public notification;
(c) Use of multiple criteria;
(d) Involvement of qualified professionals in the identification
process;
(e) Family involvement in decision making;
(f) Notification of parents or legal guardians;
(g) Safeguards to reduce cultural, linguistic, socioeconomic, and
gender bias, and to mitigate impacts resulting from disabilities; and
(h) Periodic reviews, including input from families.
(2) When a student, who is a child of a military family in
transition, has been assessed or enrolled as highly capable by a
sending school, the receiving school shall initially honor placement of
the student into a like program.
(a) The receiving school shall determine whether the district's
program is a like program when compared to the sending school's
program; and
(b) The receiving school may conduct subsequent assessments to
determine appropriate placement and continued enrollment in the
program.
(3) Students selected pursuant to procedures outlined in this
section shall be provided, to the extent feasible, an educational
opportunity which takes into account each student's unique needs and
capabilities and the limits of the resources and program options
available to the district, including those options which can be
developed or provided by using funds allocated by the superintendent of
public instruction for that purpose.
(4) The definitions in Article II of RCW 28A.705.010 apply to
subsection (2) of this section.

--- END ---