BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 9.08 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person engaged in the business of caring for or medically
treating a pet animal who leaves the animal unattended while the animal
is secured around the neck with a choke chain, and who injures or kills
the pet animal is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable according to
chapter 9A.20 RCW and by a mandatory fine of not less than five hundred
dollars per animal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.92 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person licensed under this chapter is prohibited from leaving
any pet animal with a choke chain unattended.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 18.240 RCW
to read as follows:
Any person licensed under this chapter is prohibited from leaving
any pet animal with a choke chain unattended.

--- END ---