BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.48.450 and 1981 c 297 s 31 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Prior to issuing a notice of violation related to discharges
from agricultural activity on agricultural land, the department shall
consider whether an enforcement action would contribute to the
conversion of agricultural land to nonagricultural uses. Any
enforcement action shall attempt to minimize the possibility of such
conversion.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Agricultural activity" means ((the growing, raising, or
production of horticultural or viticultural crops, berries, poultry,
livestock, grain, mint, hay and dairy products)) an agricultural use
and practice, including but not limited to: Producing, breeding, or
increasing agricultural products; rotating and changing agricultural
crops; allowing land used for agricultural activities to lie fallow in
which it is plowed and tilled but left unseeded; allowing land used for
agricultural activities to lie dormant as a result of adverse
agricultural market conditions; allowing land used for agricultural
activities to lie dormant because the land is enrolled in a local,
state, or federal conservation program, or the land is subject to a
conservation easement; conducting agricultural operations; maintaining,
repairing, and replacing agricultural equipment; maintaining,
repairing, and replacing agricultural facilities; and maintaining
agricultural lands under production or cultivation.
(b) "Agricultural land" means ((at least five acres of land devoted
primarily to the commercial production of livestock or agricultural
commodities)) those specific land areas on which agriculture activities
are conducted.

--- END ---