BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 35.21.278 and 1988 c 233 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Without regard to competitive bidding laws for public works, a
county, city, town, school district, metropolitan park district, park
and recreation district, port district, or park and recreation service
area may contract with a chamber of commerce, a service organization,
a community, youth, or athletic association, or other similar
association located and providing service in the immediate
neighborhood, for drawing design plans, making improvements to a park,
school playground, ((or)) public square, or port habitat site,
installing equipment or artworks, or providing maintenance services for
((the)) a facility or facilities as a community or neighborhood
project, or environmental stewardship project, and may reimburse the
contracting association its expense. The contracting association may
use volunteers in the project and provide the volunteers with clothing
or tools; meals or refreshments; accident/injury insurance coverage;
and reimbursement of their expenses. The consideration to be received
by the public entity through the value of the improvements, artworks,
equipment, or maintenance shall have a value at least equal to three
times that of the payment to the contracting association. All payments
made by a public entity under the authority of this section for all
such contracts in any one year shall not exceed twenty-five thousand
dollars or two dollars per resident within the boundaries of the public
entity, whichever is greater.
(2) A county, city, town, school district, metropolitan park
district, park and recreation district, or park and recreation service
area may ratify an agreement, which qualifies under subsection (1) of
this section and was made before June 9, 1988.

--- END ---