BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the right to
vote is a fundamental right of citizens. The legislature also
recognizes that voter turnout is statistically better in states that
allow election day registration. In the 2008 presidential election,
the average voter turnout for states with election day registration was
sixty-nine percent, compared to sixty-two percent for all other states.
Nine states have enacted election day registration. Therefore, it is
the intent of the legislature to increase voter turnout by enacting
election day registration.

Sec. 2 RCW 29A.08.140 and 2011 c 10 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In order to vote in any primary, special election, or general
election, a person who is not registered to vote in Washington must:
(a) Submit a registration application no later than twenty-nine
days before the day of the primary, special election, or general
election; ((or))
(b) Register in person at the county auditor's office, or other
location designated by the county auditor, in his or her county of
residence no later than ((eight days before)) 5:00 p.m. on the day of
the primary, special election, or general election; or
(c) Submit an online application no later than eight days before
the day of the primary, special election, or general election.
(2) A person who is already registered to vote in Washington may
update his or her registration no later than twenty-nine days before
the day of the primary, special election, or general election to be in
effect for that primary, special election, or general election. A
registered voter who fails to transfer his or her residential address
by this deadline may vote according to his or her previous registration
address.

--- END ---