BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95M.010 and 2010 c 130 s 18 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Bulk mercury" includes any elemental, nonamalgamated mercury,
regardless of volume quantity or weight and does not include mercury-added products as defined in this section or products containing
mercury collected for recycling or disposal at a permitted disposal
facility.
(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of ecology.
(4) "Health care facility" includes a hospital, nursing home,
extended care facility, long-term care facility, clinical or medical
laboratory, state or private health or mental institution, clinic,
physician's office, or health maintenance organization.
(5) "Manufacturer" includes any person, firm, association,
partnership, corporation, governmental entity, organization, or joint
venture that produces a mercury-added product or an importer or
domestic distributor of a mercury-added product produced in a foreign
country. In the case of a multicomponent product containing mercury,
the manufacturer is the last manufacturer to produce or assemble the
product. If the multicomponent product or mercury-added product is
produced in a foreign country, the manufacturer is the first importer
or domestic distributor.
(6) "Mercury-added button-cell battery" means a button-cell battery
to which the manufacturer intentionally introduces mercury for the
operation of the battery.
(7) "Mercury-added novelty" means a mercury-added product intended
mainly for personal or household enjoyment or adornment. Mercury-added
novelties include, but are not limited to, items intended for use as
practical jokes, figurines, adornments, toys, games, cards, ornaments,
yard statues and figures, candles, jewelry, holiday decorations, items
of apparel, and other similar products. Mercury-added novelty does not
include games, toys, or products that require a button-cell or lithium
battery, liquid crystal display screens, or a lamp that contains
mercury.
(8) "Mercury-added product" means a product, commodity, or
chemical, or a product with a component that contains mercury or a
mercury compound intentionally added to the product, commodity, or
chemical in order to provide a specific characteristic, appearance, or
quality, or to perform a specific function, or for any other reason.
Mercury-added products include those products listed in the interstate
mercury education and reduction clearinghouse mercury-added products
database, but are not limited to, mercury thermometers, mercury
thermostats, mercury barometers, lamps, and mercury switches or relays.
(9) "Mercury manometer" means a mercury-added product that is used
for measuring blood pressure.
(10) "Mercury thermometer" means a mercury-added product that is
used for measuring temperature.
(11) "Retailer" means a retailer of a mercury-added product.
(12) "Switch" means any device, which may be referred to as a
switch, sensor, valve, probe, control, transponder, or any other
apparatus, that directly regulates or controls the flow of electricity,
gas, or other compounds, such as relays or transponders. "Switch"
includes all components of the unit necessary to perform its flow
control function. "Automotive mercury switch" includes a convenience
switch, such as a switch for a trunk or hood light, and a mercury
switch in antilock brake systems. "Utility switch" includes, but is
not limited to, all devices that open or close an electrical circuit,
or a liquid or gas valve. "Utility relay" includes, but is not limited
to, all products or devices that open or close electrical contacts to
control the operation of other devices in the same or other electrical
circuit.
(13) "Wholesaler" means a wholesaler of a mercury-added product.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.95M.050 and 2010 c 130 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Effective January 1, 2006, no person may sell, offer for sale,
or distribute for sale or use in this state a mercury-added novelty.
A manufacturer of mercury-added novelties must notify all retailers
that sell the product about the provisions of this section and how to
properly dispose of any remaining mercury-added novelty inventory.
(2)(a) Effective January 1, 2006, no person may sell, offer for
sale, or distribute for sale or use in this state a manometer used to
measure blood pressure or a thermometer that contains mercury. This
subsection (2)(a) does not apply to:
(i) An electronic thermometer with a button-cell battery containing
mercury;
(ii) A thermometer that contains mercury and that is used for food
research and development or food processing, including meat, dairy
products, and pet food processing;
(iii) A thermometer that contains mercury and that is a component
of an animal agriculture climate control system or industrial
measurement system or for veterinary medicine until such a time as the
system is replaced or a nonmercury component for the system or
application is available;
(iv) A thermometer or manometer that contains mercury that is used
for calibration of other thermometers, manometers, apparatus, or
equipment, unless a nonmercury calibration standard is approved for the
application by the national institute of standards and technology;
(v) A thermometer that is provided by prescription. A manufacturer
of a mercury thermometer shall supply clear instructions on the careful
handling of the thermometer to avoid breakage and proper cleanup should
a breakage occur; or
(vi) A manometer or thermometer sold or distributed to a hospital,
or a health care facility controlled by a hospital, if the hospital has
adopted a plan for mercury reduction consistent with the goals of the
mercury chemical action plan developed by the department under section
302, chapter 371, Laws of 2002.
(b) A manufacturer of thermometers that contain mercury must notify
all retailers that sell the product about the provisions of this
section and how to properly dispose of any remaining thermometer
inventory.
(3) Effective January 1, 2006, no person may sell, install, or
reinstall a commercial or residential thermostat that contains mercury
unless the manufacturer of the thermostat conducts or participates in
a thermostat recovery or recycling program designed to assist
contractors in the proper disposal of thermostats that contain mercury
in accordance with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901, et seq., the federal resource
conservation and recovery act.
(4) No person may sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale or
use in this state a motor vehicle manufactured after January 1, 2006,
if the motor vehicle contains an automotive mercury switch.
(5) Nothing in this section restricts the ability of a
manufacturer, importer, or domestic distributor from transporting
products through the state, or storing products in the state for later
distribution outside the state.
(6) Effective June 30, 2012, the sale or purchase and delivery of
bulk mercury is prohibited, including sales through the internet or
sales by private parties. However, the prohibition in this subsection
does not apply to immediate dangerous waste recycling facilities or
treatment, storage, and disposal facilities as approved by the
department and sales to research facilities, or industrial facilities
that provide products or services to entities exempted from this
chapter. ((The facilities described in this subsection must submit an
inventory of their purchase and use of bulk mercury to the department
on an annual basis, as well as any mercury waste generated from such
actions.))

Sec. 3 RCW 70.95M.100 and 2003 c 260 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter applies to prescription drugs and devices
regulated by the food and drug administration under the federal food,
drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.), to biological
products regulated by the food and drug administration under the public
health service act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 262 et seq.), or to any substance
that may be lawfully sold over-the-counter without a prescription under
the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.).

--- END ---