BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The completion of a two-year pilot program
mandated by chapter 83, Laws of 2008 determined that small-scale ocean
beach prospecting and mining poses no identifiable threat to fish,
their habitats, or conflicts with other beach users. As a result, the
Washington state parks and recreation commission adopted new rules for
beach prospecting that became effective October 2011. The rules allow
for prospecting and mining year-round with limited types of small
hand-operated and motorized equipment on certain ocean beaches within
the seashore conservation area without a permit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 77.55 RCW
to read as follows:
All ocean beach prospecting and mining activity is exempt from the
requirements of this chapter provided the activity complies with the
provisions of WAC 352-37-340 as existing on the effective date of this
section.

--- END ---