BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.15.120 and 2000 c 107 s 236 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful taking of endangered fish or
wildlife in the second degree if the person hunts, fishes, possesses,
maliciously harasses or kills fish or wildlife, or maliciously destroys
the nests or eggs of fish or wildlife and the fish or wildlife is
designated by the commission as endangered, and the taking is not
consistent with RCW 77.36.030 or has not been authorized by rule of the
commission.
(2) A person is guilty of unlawful taking of endangered fish or
wildlife in the first degree if the person has been:
(a) Convicted under subsection (1) of this section or convicted of
any crime under this title involving the killing, possessing,
harassing, or harming of endangered fish or wildlife; and
(b) Within five years of the date of the prior conviction the
person commits the act described by subsection (1) of this section.
(3)(a) Unlawful taking of endangered fish or wildlife in the second
degree is a gross misdemeanor.
(b) Unlawful taking of endangered fish or wildlife in the first
degree is a class C felony. The department shall revoke any licenses
or tags used in connection with the crime and order the person's
privileges to hunt, fish, trap, or obtain licenses under this title to
be suspended for two years.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.36.030 and 2009 c 333 s 61 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Subject to limitations and conditions established by the
commission, the owner, the owner's immediate family member, the owner's
documented employee, or a tenant of real property may trap, consistent
with RCW 77.15.194, or kill wildlife that is threatening human safety
or causing property damage on that property, without the licenses
required under RCW 77.32.010 or authorization from the director under
RCW 77.12.240.
(2) The commission shall establish the limitations and conditions
of this section by rule. The rules must include:
(a) Appropriate protection for threatened or endangered species;
(b) Instances when verbal or written permission is required to kill
wildlife;
(c) Species that may be killed under this section; and
(d) Requirements for the disposal of wildlife trapped or killed
under this section.
(3) The commission's rules must allow for an owner, the owner's
immediate family member, or the owner's documented employee to kill a
gray wolf, regardless of state classification, without a permit when
there is physical evidence that the wolf is in the act of attacking the
owner's livestock, subject to conditions imposed by the commission by
rule.
(4) In establishing the limitations and conditions of this section,
the commission shall take into consideration the recommendations of the
Washington state wolf conservation and management plan.

--- END ---