BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the issuance
of taxable nonrecourse revenue bonds by the Washington economic
development finance authority has provided a number of Washington firms
with the financing necessary to grow and create jobs. The legislature
further finds that municipal authority to issue taxable nonrecourse
revenue bonds does not exist and that authorizing the local issuance of
taxable bonds for economic development purposes will increase local
capacity to strengthen businesses and create jobs.
(2) It is the purpose of this chapter to permit cities, counties
and port districts that created public corporations created under
chapter 39.84 RCW prior to 2012 to create local economic development
finance authorities to act as a financial conduit that, without using
state or local government funds or lending the credit of the state or
local governments, can issue taxable and nontaxable nonrecourse revenue
bonds, and participate in federal, state, and local economic
development programs to help facilitate access to needed capital by
Washington businesses. It is also a primary purpose of this chapter to
encourage the development of local innovative approaches to the problem
of unmet capital needs. This chapter must be construed liberally to
carry out its purposes and objectives.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Authority" means a local economic development finance
authority created under this chapter. An authority is a public body
within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.
(2) "Board of directors" means the board of directors of an
authority.
(3) "Bonds" means any bonds, notes, debentures, interim
certificates, conditional sales or lease financing agreements, lines of
credit, forward purchase agreements, investment agreements, and other
banking or financial arrangements, guaranties, or other obligations
issued by or entered into by the authority. Such bonds may be issued
on either a tax-exempt or taxable basis.
(4) "Borrower" means one or more public or private persons or
entities acting as lessee, purchaser, mortgagor, or borrower who has
obtained or is seeking to obtain financing either from an authority or
from an eligible banking organization that has obtained or is seeking
to obtain funds from the authority to finance a project. A borrower
may include a party who transfers the right of use and occupancy to
another party by lease, sublease, or otherwise, or a party who is
seeking or has obtained a financial guaranty from the authority.
(5) "Economic development activities" means activities related to:
Manufacturing, processing, the commercialization of research,
production, assembly, tooling, warehousing, exporting products made in
Washington or services provided by Washington firms, airports, docks
and wharves, mass commuting facilities, high-speed intercity rail
facilities, public broadcasting, pollution control, solid waste
disposal, federally qualified hazardous waste facilities, energy
generating, conservation, or transmission facilities, sports
facilities, industrial parks, and activities conducted within a
federally designated enterprise or empowerment zone or geographic area
of similar nature.
(6) "Eligible banking organization" means any organization subject
to regulation by the director of the department of financial
institutions, any national bank, federal savings and loan association,
and federal credit union located within this state.
(7) "Eligible person" means an individual, partnership,
corporation, or joint venture carrying on business, or proposing to
carry on business, within the state and seeking financial assistance
under this act.
(8) "Financial assistance" means the infusion of capital to persons
for use in the development and exploitation of specific inventions and
products.
(9) "Financing agreements" means, and includes without limitation,
a contractual arrangement with an eligible person whereby an authority
obtains rights from or in an invention or product or proceeds from an
invention or product in exchange for the granting of financial and
other assistance to the person.
(10) "Financing document" means an instrument executed by an
authority and one or more persons or entities pertaining to the
issuance of or security for bonds, or the application of the proceeds
of bonds or other funds of, or payable to, the authority. A financing
document may include, but need not be limited to, a lease, installment
sale agreement, conditional sale agreement, mortgage, loan agreement,
trust agreement or indenture, security agreement, letter or line of
credit, reimbursement agreement, insurance policy, guaranty agreement,
or currency or interest rate swap agreement. A financing document also
may be an agreement between the authority and an eligible banking
organization which has agreed to make a loan to a borrower.
(11) "Municipality" means a city, town, county, or port district of
this state.
(12) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking official
action or adopting a legislative decision by any municipality, whether
known as a resolution, ordinance, or otherwise.
(13) "Plan" means the general plan of economic development finance
objectives developed and adopted by the authority, and updated from
time to time, as required under RCW 43.163.090.
(14) "Product" means a product, device, technique, or process that
is or may be exploitable commercially. "Product" does not refer to
pure research, but does apply to products, devices, techniques, or
processes that have advanced beyond the theoretic stage and are readily
capable of being, or have been, reduced to practice.
(15) "Project costs" means costs of:
(a) Acquisition, lease, construction, reconstruction, remodeling,
refurbishing, rehabilitation, extension, and enlargement of land,
rights to land, buildings, structures, docks, wharves, fixtures,
machinery, equipment, excavations, paving, landscaping, utilities,
approaches, roadways and parking, handling and storage areas, and
similar ancillary facilities, and any other real or personal property
included in an economic development activity;
(b) Architectural, engineering, consulting, accounting, and legal
costs related directly to the development, financing, acquisition,
lease, construction, reconstruction, remodeling, refurbishing,
rehabilitation, extension, and enlargement of an activity included
under subsection (5) of this section, including costs of studies
assessing the feasibility of an economic development activity;
(c) Finance costs, including the costs of credit enhancement and
discounts, if any, the costs of issuing revenue bonds, and costs
incurred in carrying out any financing document;
(d) Start-up costs, working capital, capitalized research and
development costs, capitalized interest during construction and during
the eighteen months after estimated completion of construction, and
capitalized debt service or repair and replacement or other appropriate
reserves;
(e) The refunding of any outstanding obligations incurred for any
of the costs outlined in this subsection; and
(f) Other costs incidental to any of the costs listed in this
subsection.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A municipality that formed a public
corporation under chapter 39.84 RCW prior to January 1, 2012, may, if
that public corporation is still in existence, enact an ordinance
creating an economic development finance authority for the purposes
authorized in this chapter. The ordinance creating the authority must
approve a charter for the authority containing such provisions as are
authorized by and not in conflict with this chapter. Any charter
issued under this chapter must contain in substance the limitations set
forth in section 4 of this act. In any suit, action, or proceeding
involving the validity or enforcement of or relating to any contract of
the authority, the authority is conclusively presumed to be established
and authorized to transact business and exercise its powers under this
chapter upon proof of the adoption of the ordinance creating the
authority by the governing body. A copy of the ordinance duly
certified by the clerk of the governing body of the municipality is
admissible in evidence in any suit, action, or proceeding.
(2) An authority created by a municipality pursuant to this chapter
may be dissolved by the municipality if: (a) The authority has no
property to administer, other than funds or property, if any, to be
paid or transferred to the municipality by which it was established;
and (b) all the authority's outstanding obligations have been
satisfied. Such a dissolution must be accomplished by the governing
body of the municipality adopting an ordinance providing for the
dissolution.
(3) The creating municipality may, at its discretion and at any
time, alter or change the structure, organizational programs, or
activities of an authority, including termination of the authority if
contracts entered into by the authority are not impaired. Any net
earnings of an authority, beyond those necessary for retirement of
indebtedness incurred by it, do not inure to the benefit of any person
other than the creating municipality. Upon dissolution of an
authority, title to all property owned by the authority vests in the
municipality.
(4) The ordinance creating an authority must include provisions
establishing a board of directors to govern the affairs of the
authority, what constitutes a quorum of the board of directors, and how
the authority must conduct its affairs. The board of directors may be
composed, in whole or in part, of members who also serve on the board
of directors of the public corporation created by the municipality
under chapter 39.84 RCW.
(5) For a period of ten years after any financing through an
authority, it is illegal for a director, officer, agent, or employee of
an authority to have, directly or indirectly, any financial interest in
any property to be included in or any contract for property, services,
or materials to be furnished or used in connection with any economic
development activity financed through the authority. Violation of any
provision of this section is a gross misdemeanor.
(6) The finances of any authority are subject to examination by the
state auditor's office pursuant to RCW 43.09.260.
(7) The creating municipality may obligate the authority to assume
and administer some or all of the obligations and functions of the
public corporation created by such municipality pursuant to chapter
39.84 RCW, but only if contracts previously entered into by the public
corporation are not thereby impaired.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 No municipality may give or lend any money
or property in aid of an authority. The municipality that creates an
authority must annually review any financial statements of the
authority and at all times must have access to the books and records of
the authority. No authority may issue revenue obligations under this
chapter except upon the approval of both the municipality under the
auspices of which it was created and the county, city, or town within
whose planning jurisdiction the economic development activity to be
financed lies. Upon receiving approval from these jurisdictions, a
letter of credit from an investment grade bank certifying the credit
worthiness of the borrower and its ability to repay the principal and
interest debt incurred must be obtained by the authority before bonds
may be issued or the authority must confirm the borrower has made an
arrangement for private placement of the bonds with an institutional
investor before bonds may be issued. An authority established under
the terms of this chapter constitutes an authority and an
instrumentality (within the meaning of those terms in the regulations
of the United States treasury and the rulings of the internal revenue
service prescribed pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 103 of the federal
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended) may act on behalf of the
municipality under whose auspices it is created for the specific public
purposes authorized by this chapter. The authority is not a municipal
corporation within the meaning of the state Constitution and the laws
of the state, or a political subdivision within the meaning of the
state Constitution and the laws of the state, including without
limitation, Article VIII, section 7 of the Washington state
Constitution. A municipality may not delegate to an authority any of
the municipality's attributes of sovereignty including, without
limitation, the power to tax, the power of eminent domain, and the
police power.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) An authority established pursuant to
this chapter may develop and conduct a program or programs to provide
nonrecourse revenue bond financing for the project costs for economic
development activities.
(2) An authority is authorized to participate fully in federal and
other governmental economic development finance programs and to take
such actions as are necessary and consistent with this chapter to
secure the benefits of those programs and to meet their requirements.
(3) An authority may develop and conduct a program that will
stimulate and encourage the development of new products within
Washington state by the infusion of financial aid for invention and
innovation in situations in which the financial aid would not otherwise
be reasonably available from commercial sources. The authority is
authorized to provide nonrecourse revenue bond financing for this
program.
(a) For the purposes of this program, the authority has the
following powers and duties:
(i) To enter into financing agreements with eligible persons doing
business in Washington state, upon terms and on conditions consistent
with the purposes of this chapter, for the advancement of financial and
other assistance to the persons for the development of specific
products, procedures, and techniques, to be developed and produced in
this state, and to condition the agreements upon contractual assurances
that the benefits of increasing or maintaining employment and tax
revenues remain in this state and accrue to it;
(ii) Own, possess, and take license in patents, copyrights, and
proprietary processes and negotiate and enter into contracts and
establish charges for the use of the patents, copyrights, and
proprietary processes when the patents and licenses for products result
from assistance provided by the authority;
(iii) Negotiate royalty payments to the authority on patents and
licenses for products arising as a result of assistance provided by the
authority;
(iv) Negotiate and enter into other types of contracts with
eligible persons that assure that public benefits will result from the
provision of services by the authority; provided that the contracts are
consistent with the state Constitution;
(v) Encourage and provide technical assistance to eligible persons
in the process of developing new products;
(vi) Refer eligible persons to researchers or laboratories for the
purpose of testing and evaluating new products, processes, or
innovations; and
(vii) To the extent permitted under its contract with eligible
persons, to consent to a termination, modification, forgiveness, or
other change of a term of a contractual right, payment, royalty,
contract, or agreement of any kind to which the authority is a party.
(b) Eligible persons seeking financial and other assistance under
this program must forward an application, together with an application
fee prescribed by rule, to the authority. An investigation and report
concerning the advisability of approving an application for assistance
must be completed by the staff of the authority. The investigation and
report may include, but is not limited to, facts about the company
under consideration as its history, wage standards, job opportunities,
stability of employment, past and present financial condition and
structure, pro forma income statements, present and future markets and
prospects, integrity of management as well as the feasibility of the
proposed product and invention to be granted financial assistance,
including the state of development of the product as well as the
likelihood of its commercial feasibility. After receipt and
consideration of the report set out in this subsection and after other
action as is deemed appropriate, the application must be approved or
denied by the authority. The applicant must be promptly notified of
action by the authority.
(4) An authority may receive no appropriation of state funds. The
department of commerce and the Washington economic development finance
authority may assist a local economic development finance authority in
organizing itself and in designing programs.
(5) An authority may use any funds legally available to it for any
purpose specifically authorized by this chapter, or for otherwise
improving economic development by assisting businesses and farm
enterprises that do not have access to capital at terms and rates
comparable to large corporations due to the location of the business,
the size of the business, the lack of financial expertise, or other
appropriate reasons.
(6) An authority must coordinate its activities with those,
including bond issuance activities, of the creating municipality and
the public corporation created under chapter 39.84 RCW by the creating
municipality.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) An authority established pursuant to
this chapter must adopt general operating procedures for the authority.
The authority must also adopt operating procedures for individual
programs as they are developed for obtaining funds and for providing
funds to borrowers. These operating procedures must be adopted by
resolution prior to the authority operating the applicable programs.
(2) The operating procedures must include, but are not limited to:
(a) Appropriate standards for securing loans and other financing
the authority provides to borrowers, such as guarantees or collateral;
and
(b) Strict standards for providing financing to borrowers, such as:
(i) The borrower is a responsible party with a high probability of
being able to repay the financing provided by the authority;
(ii) The financing is reasonably expected to benefit the creating
municipality by enabling a borrower to increase or maintain jobs or
capital in the municipality;
(iii) The borrowers with the greatest needs or that provide the
most public benefit are given higher priority by the authority; and
(iv) The financing is consistent with any plan adopted by the
authority under the provisions of section 7 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Any authority established pursuant to
this chapter must adopt a general plan of economic development finance
objectives to be implemented by the authority during the period of the
plan. The authority may exercise the powers authorized under this
chapter prior to the adoption of the initial plan. In developing the
plan, the authority must consider and set objectives for:
(a) Employment generation associated with the authority's programs;
(b) The application of funds to economic sectors and economic
development activity evidencing need for improved access to capital
markets and funding resources;
(c) Eligibility criteria for participants in authority programs;
(d) The use of funds and resources available from or through
federal, state, local, and private sources and programs;
(e) New programs which serve a targeted need for financing
assistance within the purposes of this chapter; and
(f) Opportunities to improve capital access as evidenced by
programs existent in other localities or as they are made possible by
results of private capital market circumstances.
(2) Upon adoption of the general plan the authority must conduct
its programs in observance of the objectives established in the plan.
The authority may periodically update the plan as determined necessary
by the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 In addition to carrying out the economic
development finance activities and programs specifically authorized in
this chapter, an authority may:
(1) Maintain an office or offices;
(2) Sue and be sued in its own name, and plead and be impleaded;
(3) Engage consultants, agents, attorneys, and advisers, contract
with federal, state, and local governmental entities for services, and
hire such employees, agents, and other personnel as the authority deems
necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(4) Make and execute all manner of contracts, agreements and
instruments, and financing documents with public and private parties as
the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its
purposes;
(5) Acquire and hold real or personal property, or any interest
therein, in the name of the authority, and to sell, assign, lease,
encumber, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of the same in such manner as
the authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its
purposes;
(6) Open and maintain accounts in qualified public depositaries and
otherwise provide for the investment of any funds not required for
immediate disbursement, and provide for the selection of investments;
(7) Appear in its own behalf before boards, commissions,
departments, or agencies of federal, state, or local government;
(8) Procure such insurance in such amounts and from such insurers
as the authority deems desirable including, but not limited to,
insurance against any loss or damage to its property or other assets,
public liability insurance for injuries to persons or property, and
directors and officers liability insurance;
(9) Apply for and accept subventions, grants, loans, advances, and
contributions from any source of money, property, labor, or other
things of value, to be held, used, and applied as the authority deems
necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(10) Establish guidelines for the participation by eligible banking
organizations in programs conducted by the authority under this
chapter;
(11) Act as an agent, by agreement, for federal, state, or local
governmental entities to carry out the programs authorized in this
chapter;
(12) Establish, revise, and collect such fees and charges as the
authority deems necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its
purposes;
(13) Make such expenditures as are appropriate for paying the
administrative costs and expenses of the authority in carrying out the
provisions of this chapter;
(14) Establish such reserves and special funds, and controls on
deposits to and disbursements from them, as the authority deems
necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(15) Prepare, publish, and distribute, with or without charge, such
studies, reports, bulletins, and other material as the authority deems
necessary, useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes;
(16) Delegate any of its powers and duties if consistent with the
purposes of this chapter;
(17) Adopt rules concerning its exercise of the powers authorized
by this chapter; and
(18) Exercise any other power the authority deems necessary,
useful, or convenient to accomplish its purposes and exercise the
powers expressly granted in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter, an authority may not:
(1) Give any municipal or state money or property or loan any
municipal or state money or credit to or in aid of any individual,
association, company, or corporation, or become directly or indirectly
the owner of any stock in or bonds of any association, company, or
corporation;
(2) Issue bills of credit or accept deposits of money for time or
demand deposit, administer trusts, engage in any form or manner in, or
in the conduct of, any private or commercial banking business, or act
as a savings bank or savings and loan association other than as
provided in this chapter;
(3) Be or constitute a bank or trust company within the
jurisdiction or under the control of the director of financial
institutions, the comptroller of the currency of the United States of
America, or the treasury department thereof;
(4) Be or constitute a bank, broker, or dealer in securities within
the meaning of, or subject to the provisions of, any securities,
securities exchange, or securities dealers' law of the United States of
America or the state;
(5) Engage in the financing of housing as provided for in chapter
43.180 RCW;
(6) Engage in the financing of health care facilities as provided
for in chapter 70.37 RCW;
(7) Engage in financing higher education facilities as provided for
in chapter 28B.07 RCW; or
(8) Finance projects outside the geographic jurisdiction of the
municipality creating the authority without the express authorization
of the jurisdiction in which the project is to be located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 (1) An authority may issue its nonrecourse
revenue bonds in order to obtain the funds to carry out the programs
authorized in this chapter. The bonds must be special obligations of
the authority, payable solely out of the special fund or funds
established by the authority for their repayment.
(2) Any bonds issued under this chapter may be secured by a
financing document between the authority and the purchasers or owners
of such bonds or between the authority and a corporate trustee, which
may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company
within or without the state.
(a) The financing document may pledge or assign, in whole or in
part, the revenues and funds held or to be received by the authority,
any present or future contract or other rights to receive the same, and
the proceeds thereof.
(b) The financing document may contain such provisions for
protecting and enforcing the rights, security, and remedies of bond
owners as may be reasonable and proper including, without limiting the
generality of the foregoing, provisions defining defaults and providing
for remedies in the event of default which may include the acceleration
of maturities, restrictions on the individual rights of action by bond
owners, and covenants setting forth duties of and limitations on the
authority in conduct of its programs and the management of its
property.
(c) In addition to other security provided in this chapter or
otherwise by law, bonds issued by the authority may be secured, in
whole or in part, by financial guaranties, by insurance or by letters
of credit issued to the authority or a trustee or any other person, by
any bank, trust company, insurance or surety company, or other
financial institution, within or without the state. The authority may
pledge or assign, in whole or in part, the revenues and funds held or
to be received by the authority, any present or future contract or
other rights to receive the same, and the proceeds thereof, as security
for such guaranties or insurance or for the reimbursement by the
authority to any issuer of such letter of credit of any payments made
under such letter of credit.
(3) Without limiting the powers of the authority contained in this
chapter, in connection with each issue of its obligation bonds, the
authority must create and establish one or more special funds
including, but not limited to, debt service and sinking funds, reserve
funds, project funds, and such other special funds as the authority
deems necessary, useful, or convenient.
(4) Any security interest created against the unexpended bond
proceeds and against the special funds created by the authority is
immediately valid and binding against the money and any securities in
which the money may be invested without authority or trustee
possession. The security interest must be prior to any party having
any competing claim against the moneys or securities, without filing or
recording under Article 9A of the uniform commercial code, Title 62A
RCW, and regardless of whether the party has notice of the security
interest.
(5) The bonds may be issued as serial bonds, term bonds, or any
other type of bond instrument consistent with the provisions of this
chapter. The bonds must bear such date or dates; mature at such time
or times; bear interest at such rate or rates, either fixed or
variable; be payable at such time or times; be in such denominations;
be in such form; bear such privileges of transferability,
exchangeability, and interchangeability; be subject to such terms of
redemption; and be sold at public or private sale, in such manner, at
such time or times, and at such price or prices as the authority
determines. The bonds must be executed by the manual or facsimile
signatures of the authority's chair and either its secretary or
executive director, and may be authenticated by the trustee (if the
authority determines to use a trustee) or any registrar which may be
designated for the bonds by the authority.
(6) Bonds may be issued by the authority to refund other
outstanding authority bonds, at or prior to maturity of, and to pay any
redemption premium on, the outstanding bonds. Bonds issued for
refunding purposes may be combined with bonds issued for the financing
or refinancing of new projects. Pending the application of the
proceeds of the refunding bonds to the redemption of the bonds to be
redeemed, the authority may enter into an agreement or agreements with
a corporate trustee regarding the interim investment of the proceeds
and the application of the proceeds and the earnings on the proceeds to
the payment of the principal of and interest on, and the redemption of,
the bonds to be redeemed.
(7) The bonds of the authority may be negotiable instruments under
Title 62A RCW.
(8) Neither the board of directors of the authority, nor its
employees or agents, nor any person executing the bonds is personally
liable on the bonds or subject to any personal liability or
accountability by reason of the issuance of the bonds.
(9) The authority may purchase its bonds with any of its funds
available for the purchase. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel, or
resell the bonds subject to and in accordance with agreements with bond
owners.
(10) The state finance committee must be notified in advance of the
issuance of bonds by the authority in order to promote the orderly
offering of obligations in the financial markets.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 (1) Bonds issued by an authority
established under this chapter are not considered to constitute a debt
of the state, of the municipality, or of any other municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, subdivision, or agency of
this state or to pledge any or all of the faith and credit of any of
these entities. The revenue bonds are payable solely from both the
revenues derived as a result of the economic development activities
funded by the revenue bonds including, without limitation, amounts
received under the terms of any financing document or by reason of any
additional security furnished by beneficiaries of the economic
development activity in connection with the financing thereof, and
money and other property received from private sources. The issuance
of bonds under this chapter do not obligate, directly, indirectly, or
contingently, the state or any political subdivision of the state to
levy any taxes or appropriate or expend any funds for the payment of
the principal or the interest on the bonds. Each revenue bond must
contain on its face, and any disclosure document prepared in
conjunction with the offer and sale of bonds must include, statements
to the effect that:
(a) Neither the state, the municipality, or any other municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, subdivision, or agency of the
state is obligated to pay the principal or the interest thereon;
(b) No tax funds or governmental revenue may be used to pay the
principal or interest thereon; and
(c) Neither any or all of the faith and credit nor the taxing power
of the state, the municipality, or any other municipal corporation,
quasi-municipal corporation, subdivision, or agency thereof is pledged
to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the revenue bond.
(2) Neither the proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter nor any
money used or to be used to pay the principal of, premium, if any, or
interest on the bonds constitute public money or property. All of such
money must be kept segregated and set apart from funds of the state and
any political subdivision of the state and are not subject to
appropriation or allotment by the state or subject to the provisions of
chapter 43.88 RCW.
(3) Contracts entered into by an authority must be entered into in
the name of the authority and not in the name of the state or any
political subdivision of the state. The obligations of the authority
under such contracts are obligations only of the authority and are not,
in any way, obligations of the municipality creating the authority or
the state. An authority may incur only those financial obligations
which will be paid from revenues received pursuant to financing
documents, from fees or charges paid by beneficiaries of the economic
development activities funded by the revenue bonds, or from the
proceeds of revenue bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 (1)(a) An authority may enter into
financing documents with borrowers regarding bonds issued by the
authority that may provide for the payment by each borrower of amounts
sufficient, together with other revenues available to the authority, if
any, to:
(i) Pay the borrower's share of the fees established by the
authority;
(ii) Pay the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on
outstanding bonds of the authority issued in respect of such borrower
as the same become due and payable; and
(iii) Create and maintain reserves required or provided for by the
authority in connection with the issuance of such bonds.
(b) The payments are not subject to supervision or regulation by
any department, committee, board, body, bureau, or agency of the state.
(2) All money received by or on behalf of the authority with
respect to this issuance of its bonds must be trust funds to be held
and applied solely as provided in this chapter. The authority, in lieu
of receiving and applying the moneys itself, may enter into trust
agreement or indenture with one or more banks or trust companies having
the power and authority to conduct trust business in the state to:
(a) Perform all or any part of the obligations of the authority
with respect to:
(i) Bonds issued by it;
(ii) The receipt, investment, and application of the proceeds of
the bonds and money paid by a participant or available from other
sources for the payment of the bonds;
(iii) The enforcement of the obligations of a borrower in
connection with the financing or refinancing of any project; and
(iv) Other matters relating to the exercise of the authority's
powers under this chapter;
(b) Receive, hold, preserve, and enforce any security interest or
evidence of security interest granted by a participant for purposes of
securing the payment of the bonds; and
(c) Act on behalf of the authority or the owners of bonds of the
authority for purposes of assuring or enforcing the payment of the
bonds, when due.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 (1) Any owner of bonds issued under this
chapter by any authority, and the trustee under any trust agreement or
indenture, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus,
or other proceeding, protect and enforce any of their respective
rights, and may become the purchaser at any foreclosure sale if the
person is the highest bidder, except to the extent the rights given are
restricted by the authority in any bond resolution or trust agreement
or indenture authorizing the issuance of the bonds.
(2) The bonds of an authority are securities in which all public
officers and bodies of this state and all counties, cities, municipal
corporations, and political subdivisions, all banks, eligible banking
organizations, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and
institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan
associations, investment companies, insurance companies and
associations, and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees,
and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or
other funds belonging to them or within their control. However, a
municipality under the auspices of which an authority was created and
the county, city, or town within whose planning jurisdiction the
economic development activity to be financed lies, may not invest in
bonds issued by the authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 This chapter provides a complete,
additional, and alternative method for accomplishing the purposes of
this chapter and must be regarded as supplemental and additional to
powers conferred by other laws. The issuance of bonds and refunding
bonds under this chapter need not comply with the requirements of any
other law applicable to the issuance of bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Insofar as the provisions of this chapter
are inconsistent with the provisions of any general or special law, or
parts thereof, the provisions of this chapter are controlling.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 1 through 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---