BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes the importance of
small businesses to the economy and the need to provide them with
assistance to ensure their success. It is, therefore, the intent of
the legislature that regulating agencies contribute to a culture of
professionalism and cooperation by providing assistance in complying
with state and federal laws, rules, and regulations.

Sec. 2 RCW 34.05.110 and 2011 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Agencies must ((provide to)) allow a small business ((a copy of
the state law or agency rule that a small business is violating and))
a period of at least seven calendar days to correct ((the)) a violation
of a state law or agency rule before the agency may impose any fines,
civil penalties, or administrative sanctions ((for a violation of a
state law or agency rule by a small business)). If no correction is
possible or if an agency is acting in response to a complaint made by
a third party and the third party would be disadvantaged by the
application of this subsection, the requirements in this subsection do
not apply.
(2) Agencies must provide to a small business a copy of the state
law or agency rule that the small business is alleged to be violating,
or a link to an online copy.
(3) Agencies must make every effort to avoid adding on violations
or corrective actions that could have been discovered and noted in the
original violation or correction notice, and shall provide a single
list of the violations discovered during the review and the required
corrective action or actions. Once the small business has been
provided with the single list of corrective action or actions, the
agency shall not add more violations or corrective actions during that
review period, provided that exceptions to this policy are allowed
pursuant to subsection (6) of this section and in response to
inspections generated by complaints from a third party.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (((4))) (6) of this section,
agencies shall waive any fines, civil penalties, or administrative
sanctions for first-time paperwork violations by a small business.
(((3))) (5) When an agency waives a fine, penalty, or sanction
under this section, when possible it shall require the small business
to correct the violation within a reasonable period of time, in a
manner specified by the agency. If correction is impossible, no
correction may be required and failure to correct is not grounds for
reinstatement of fines, penalties, or sanctions under subsection
(((5))) (7)(b) of this section.
(((4))) (6) Exceptions to requirements of subsections (1) and (3)
of this section and the waiver requirement in subsection (((2))) (4) of
this section may be made for any of the following reasons:
(a) The agency head determines that the effect of the violation or
waiver presents a direct danger to the public health, results in a loss
of income or benefits to an employee, poses a potentially significant
threat to human health or the environment, or causes serious harm to
the public interest;
(b) The violation involves a knowing or willful violation;
(c) The violation is of a requirement concerning the assessment,
collection, or administration of any tax, tax program, debt, revenue,
receipt, a regulated entity's financial filings, or insurance rate or
form filing;
(d) The requirements of this section are in conflict with federal
law or program requirements, federal requirements that are a prescribed
condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, or the
requirements for eligibility of employers in this state for federal
unemployment tax credits, as determined by the agency head;
(e) The small business committing the violation previously violated
a substantially similar requirement; or
(f) The owner or operator of the small business committing the
violation owns or operates, or owned or operated a different small
business which previously violated a substantially similar requirement.
(((5))) (7)(a) Nothing in this section prohibits an agency from
waiving fines, civil penalties, or administrative sanctions incurred by
a small business for a paperwork violation that is not a first-time
offense.
(b) Any fine, civil penalty, or administrative sanction that is
waived under this section may be reinstated and imposed in addition to
any additional fines, penalties, or administrative sanctions associated
with a subsequent violation for noncompliance with a substantially
similar paperwork requirement, or failure to correct the previous
violation as required by the agency under subsection (((3))) (5) of
this section.
(((6))) (8) Nothing in this section may be construed to diminish
the responsibility for any citizen or business to apply for and obtain
a permit, license, or authorizing document that is required to engage
in a regulated activity, or otherwise comply with state or federal law.
(((7))) (9) Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to
small businesses required to provide accurate and complete information
and documentation in relation to any claim for payment of state or
federal funds or who are licensed or certified to provide care and
services to vulnerable adults or children.
(((8))) (10) Nothing in this section affects the attorney general's
authority to impose fines, civil penalties, or administrative sanctions
as otherwise authorized by law; nor shall this section affect the
attorney general's authority to enforce the consumer protection act,
chapter 19.86 RCW.
(((9))) (11) As used in this section:
(a) "Small business" means a business with two hundred fifty or
fewer employees or a gross revenue of less than seven million dollars
annually as reported on its most recent federal income tax return or
its most recent return filed with the department of revenue.
(b) "Paperwork violation" means the violation of any statutory or
regulatory requirement that mandates the collection of information by
an agency, or the collection, posting, or retention of information by
a small business. This includes but is not limited to requirements in
the Revised Code of Washington, the Washington Administrative Code, the
Washington State Register, or any other agency directive.
(c) "First-time paperwork violation" means the first instance of a
particular or substantially similar paperwork violation.
(12) Beginning July 31, 2013, all agencies with inspection and
enforcement programs affecting small businesses must file annual
reports indicating the agency director's estimate of the percentage of
small business regulatory cases that are not offered the benefits
intended for small businesses in this section and RCW 43.05.030 due to
the exceptions in subsection (6) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.05.030 and 1996 c 206 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this chapter, a technical assistance visit
is a visit by a regulatory agency to a facility, business, or other
location that:
(a) Has been requested or is voluntarily accepted; and
(b) Is declared by the regulatory agency at the beginning of the
visit to be a technical assistance visit.
(2) A technical assistance visit also includes a consultative visit
pursuant to RCW 49.17.250.
(3)(a) During a technical assistance visit, or within a reasonable
time thereafter, a regulatory agency shall inform the owner or operator
of the facility of any violations of law or agency rules identified by
the agency as follows:
(((a))) (i) A description of the condition that is not in
compliance and the text of the specific section or subsection of the
applicable state or federal law or rule;
(((b))) (ii) A statement of what is required to achieve compliance;
(((c))) (iii) The date by which the agency requires compliance to
be achieved;
(((d))) (iv) Notice of the means to contact any technical
assistance services provided by the agency or others; and
(((e))) (v) Notice of when, where, and to whom a request to extend
the time to achieve compliance for good cause may be filed with the
agency.
(b) If violations are not identified during the visit, the agency
must let the owner or operator of the facility know when to expect the
results of the visit.
(4) At the time of the visit, the person conducting the technical
assistance visit must provide the owner or operator of the facility
with a web site address where the owner or operator may complete an
anonymous customer service survey, pursuant to section 5 of this act,
regarding the visit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 43.05 RCW
to read as follows:
Each regulatory agency must require its regulators to complete a
self-assessment for each technical assistance visit that contains, at
a minimum, the same survey information developed by the office of
regulatory assistance under section 5 of this act. Each individual
regulator shall receive from his or her respective agency the aggregate
results of customer service surveys completed for that regulator to
compare with the regulator's self-assessments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.42 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In coordination with regulatory agencies, the office must
develop a customer service survey that regulated entities may complete
after a technical assistance visit under chapter 43.05 RCW. The survey
must include, but is not limited to, the questions:
(a) The name of the regulator and his or her agency;
(b) Was the visit conducted in a professional and respectful
manner;
(c) Did the regulator provide assistance to help your business
succeed while also enforcing compliance with state regulations;
(d) If cited with a violation during the visit, was a copy of the
violated rule or law, or a link to an online copy, provided;
(e) Were you informed of a seven-day grace period for complying
with regulations in order to avoid fees and penalties, or informed
about why the grace period did not apply;
(f) Were you given a single comprehensive list of violations and
the corrective actions required;
(g) If cited with a violation, was the owner or operator provided
with information that would assist him or her with compliance; and
(h) What could have been improved about your inspection or
compliance experience.
(2) The survey must be available on the office web site. The
results of the surveys must be summarized, by agency, in a report and
forwarded to the agency director, the governor, and the appropriate
committees of the legislature in December of each year. Each agency
shall receive a copy of all surveys completed for any of its
regulators. No identifying information may be included that would
reveal the identity of the respondent.

Sec. 6 RCW 43.42.010 and 2011 c 149 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The office of regulatory assistance is created in the office of
financial management and must be administered by the office of the
governor to help improve the regulatory system and assist citizens,
businesses, and project proponents.
(2) The governor must appoint a director. The director may employ
a deputy director and a confidential secretary and such staff as are
necessary, or contract with another state agency pursuant to chapter
39.34 RCW for support in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.
(3) The office must offer to:
(a) Act as the central point of contact for the project proponent
in communicating about defined issues;
(b) Conduct project scoping as provided in RCW 43.42.050;
(c) Verify that the project proponent has all the information
needed to correctly apply for all necessary permits;
(d) Provide general coordination services;
(e) Coordinate the efficient completion among participating
agencies of administrative procedures, such as collecting fees or
providing public notice;
(f) Maintain contact with the project proponent and the permit
agencies to promote adherence to agreed schedules;
(g) Assist in resolving any conflict or inconsistency among permit
requirements and conditions;
(h) Coordinate, to the extent practicable, with relevant federal
permit agencies and tribal governments;
(i) Facilitate meetings;
(j) Manage a fully coordinated permit process, as provided in RCW
43.42.060; and
(k) Provide information and assistance to legislators in responding
to constituent inquiries regarding small business regulation,
permitting, or other regulatory issues.
(4) The office must also:
(a) Help local jurisdictions comply with the requirements of
chapter 36.70B RCW by providing information about best permitting
practices methods to improve communication with, and solicit early
involvement of, state agencies when needed; ((and
(l))) (b) Maintain and furnish information as provided in RCW
43.42.040; and
(c) Coordinate an agency small business liaison team.
(((4))) (5) The office must provide the following by September 1,
2009, and biennially thereafter, to the governor and the appropriate
committees of the legislature:
(a) A performance report including:
(i) Information regarding use of the office's voluntary cost-reimbursement services as provided in RCW 43.42.070;
(ii) The number and type of projects or initiatives where the
office provided services ((and the resolution provided by the office on
any conflicts that arose on such projects)), including the key agencies
with which the office partnered;
(iii) The ((agencies involved on specific projects)) activities of
the small business liaison team and other efforts directed toward small
business;
(iv) Specific information on any difficulty encountered in
((provision of)) providing services, ((implementation of)) implementing
programs or processes, or ((use of)) assistance tools; and
(v) Trend reporting that allows comparisons between statements of
goals and performance targets and the achievement of those goals and
targets; and
(b) Recommendations on system improvements including
recommendations ((regarding:
(i) Measurement of overall system performance;
(ii) Changes needed to make cost reimbursement, a fully coordinated
permit process, multiagency permitting teams, and other processes
effective; and
(iii) Resolving any conflicts or inconsistencies arising from
differing statutory or regulatory authorities, roles and missions of
agencies, timing and sequencing of permitting and procedural
requirements as identified by the office in the course of its duties))
from the small business liaison team and ideas for improving the
environmental permitting system.

--- END ---