BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 76.04.015 and 2010 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department may, at its discretion, appoint trained
personnel possessing the necessary qualifications to carry out the
duties and supporting functions of the department and may determine
their respective salaries.
(2) The department shall have direct charge of and supervision of
all matters pertaining to the forest fire service of the state.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Enforce all laws within this chapter;
(b) Be empowered to take charge of and direct the work of
suppressing forest fires;
(c)(i) Investigate the origin and cause of all forest fires to
determine whether either a criminal act or negligence by any person,
firm, or corporation caused the starting, spreading, or existence of
the fire. In conducting investigations, the department shall work
cooperatively, to the extent possible, with utilities, property owners,
and other interested parties to identify and preserve evidence. Except
as provided otherwise in this subsection, the department in conducting
investigations is authorized, without court order, to take possession
or control of relevant evidence found in plain view and belonging to
any person, firm, or corporation. To the extent possible, the
department shall notify the person, firm, or corporation of its intent
to take possession or control of the evidence. The person, firm, or
corporation shall be afforded reasonable opportunity to view the
evidence and, before the department takes possession or control of the
evidence, also shall be afforded reasonable opportunity to examine,
document, and photograph it. If the person, firm, or corporation
objects in writing to the department's taking possession or control of
the evidence, the department must either return the evidence within
seven days after the day on which the department is provided with the
written objections or obtain a court order authorizing the continued
possession or control.
(ii) Absent a court order authorizing otherwise, the department may
not take possession or control of evidence over the objection of the
owner of the evidence if the evidence is used by the owner in
conducting a business or in providing an electric utility service and
the department's taking possession or control of the evidence would
substantially and materially interfere with the operation of the
business or provision of electric utility service.
(iii) Absent a court order authorizing otherwise, the department
may not take possession or control of evidence over the objection of an
electric utility when the evidence is not owned by the utility but has
caused damage to property owned by the utility. However, this
subsection (3)(c)(iii) does not apply if the department has notified
the utility of its intent to take possession or control of the evidence
and provided the utility with reasonable time to examine, document, and
photograph the evidence.
(iv) Only personnel qualified to work on electrical equipment may
take possession or control of evidence owned or controlled by an
electric utility;
(d) Furnish notices or information to the public calling attention
to forest fire dangers and the penalties for violation of this chapter;
(e) Be familiar with all timbered and cut-over areas of the state;
and
(f) Regulate and control the official actions of its employees, the
wardens, and the rangers.
(4) The department may:
(a) Authorize all needful and proper expenditures for forest
protection;
(b) Adopt rules consistent with this section for the prevention,
control, and suppression of forest fires as it considers necessary
including but not limited to: Fire equipment and materials; use of
personnel; and fire prevention standards and operating conditions
including a provision for reducing these conditions where justified by
local factors such as location and weather;
(c) Remove at will the commission of any ranger or suspend the
authority of any warden;
(d) Inquire into:
(i) The extent, kind, value, and condition of all timber lands
within the state;
(ii) The extent to which timber lands are being destroyed by fire
and the damage thereon;
(e) Provide fire detection, prevention, presuppression, or
suppression services on nonforested public lands managed by the
department or another state agency, but only to the extent that
providing these services does not interfere with or detract from the
obligations set forth in subsection (3) of this section. If the
department provides fire detection, prevention, presuppression, or
suppression services on nonforested public lands managed by another
state agency, the department must be fully reimbursed for the work
through a cooperative agreement as provided for in RCW 76.04.135(1).
(5) Any rules adopted under this section for the suppression of
forest fires must include a mechanism by which a local fire
mobilization radio frequency, consistent with RCW 43.43.963, is
identified and made available during the initial response to any forest
fire that crosses jurisdictional lines so that all responders have
access to communications during the response. Different initial
response frequencies may be identified and used as appropriate in
different geographic response areas. If the fire radio communication
needs escalate beyond the capability of the identified local radio
frequency, the use of other available designated interoperability radio
frequencies may be used.
(6) When the department considers it to be in the best interest of
the state, it may cooperate with any agency of another state, the
United States or any agency thereof, the Dominion of Canada or any
agency or province thereof, and any county, town, corporation,
individual, or Indian tribe within the state of Washington in forest
firefighting and patrol.

Sec. 2 RCW 76.04.135 and 1986 c 100 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) For the purpose of promoting and facilitating cooperation
((between)) among fire protection agencies, including the department,
and between the department and other agencies that manage lands owned
by the state, and to more adequately protect life, property, and the
natural resources of the state, the department may enter into a
contract or agreement with a municipality, county, state, or federal
agency to provide fire detection, prevention, presuppression, or
suppression services on property which they are responsible to protect
or manage.
(2) Contracts or agreements under subsection (1) of this section
may contain provisions for the exchange of services on a cooperative
basis or services in return for cash payment or other compensation.
(3) No charges may be made when the department determines that
under a cooperative contract or agreement the assistance received from
a municipality, county, or federal agency on state protected lands
equals that provided by the state on municipal, county, or federal
lands.

--- END ---