BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Consistent with its mandate to assure that
the public interest will be fully protected, the legislature finds that
agencies have an obligation to ensure transparency and openness in the
provision of public records that inform residents of the inner workings
of their governments.
However, the legislature also finds that agencies are increasingly
receiving broad, repeated, batch requests for records from companies –
many of which are out-of-state. These companies typically submit
repeated requests for large batches of records to Washington's public
agencies and then use the records for commercial and resale purposes.
In order to fill the requests, public agencies expend significant
resources to locate, assemble, and produce the requested public
records.
However, under existing law, except for copying costs, public
agencies may not charge a fee to locate, assemble, and produce the
records. As a result, the taxpayers of this state effectively
subsidize certain companies through the production of records that are
free of charge.
The legislature finds that agencies, in being responsive to these
requests, are expending significant amounts of staff time and resources
to fulfill these requests.
Accordingly, the intent of this act is to assure that the public
interest will be protected by authorizing agencies to charge fees for
the production of records that are requested in large batches for
commercial purposes.

Sec. 2 RCW 42.56.120 and 2005 c 483 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No fee shall be charged for the inspection of public records.
No fee shall be charged for locating public documents and making them
available for copying. A reasonable charge may be imposed for
providing copies of public records and for the use by any person of
agency equipment or equipment of the office of the secretary of the
senate or the office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives
to copy public records, which charges shall not exceed the amount
necessary to reimburse the agency, the office of the secretary of the
senate, or the office of the chief clerk of the house of
representatives for its actual costs directly incident to such copying.
Agency charges for photocopies shall be imposed in accordance with the
actual per page cost or other costs established and published by the
agency. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in no
event may an agency charge a per page cost greater than the actual per
page cost as established and published by the agency. Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, to the extent the agency
has not determined the actual per page cost for photocopies of public
records, the agency may not charge in excess of fifteen cents per page.
An agency may require a deposit in an amount not to exceed ten percent
of the estimated cost of providing copies for a request. If an agency
makes a request available on a partial or installment basis, the agency
may charge for each part of the request as it is provided. If an
installment of a records request is not claimed or reviewed, the agency
is not obligated to fulfill the balance of the request.
(2) In cases of requests for batches of the following records an
agency may charge the requestor the fees listed:
(a) For permits, licenses, and approvals, and applications for
permits, licenses, and approvals, one dollar per record in excess of
ten records;
(b) For cash and cash convertible sureties, work deposits,
performance bonds, payment guarantees, or similar securities, escrow
accounts, checks, warrants, and vouchers, fifteen dollars per record in
excess of ten records; and
(c) For building plans, five dollars per record in excess of ten
records.
(3) A batch request is a request for ten or more records, whether
in a single request or a series of requests from one requester, or
related requesters, for the purpose of charging fees.
(4) Agencies may not charge the per-record costs in this section to
the media as defined in RCW 5.68.010(5); to nonprofit academic
institutions; or to companies that request records from public agencies
under previously established fee-for-service contract arrangements with
those agencies.

--- END ---