BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) A 1953 federal act, Public Law 280, 83rd Congress, 1st Session,
required certain states to assume jurisdiction over criminal offenses
and civil causes of action involving Indians in Indian country, and
authorized other states, including Washington, to assume that
jurisdiction if they opted to do so. The federal act provided that
generally applicable state criminal and civil laws could "have the same
force and effect within such Indian country as they have elsewhere
within the state."
(2) A 1957 Washington state act, chapter 240, Laws of 1957,
directed the governor to issue a proclamation assuming state criminal
and civil jurisdiction in accordance with the 1953 federal act over the
lands of any Indian tribe when the governor received a resolution from
the "tribal council or other governing body . . . expressing its desire
that its people and lands be subject to the criminal or civil
jurisdiction of the state of Washington to the extent authorized by
federal law . . ." Under the 1957 state act, the state assumed
jurisdiction "to the same extent" that it exercises civil and criminal
jurisdiction, or both, elsewhere within the state. Pursuant to the
1957 state act, Governor Albert D. Rosellini issued proclamations
assuming state jurisdiction over eleven tribes.
(3) A 1963 Washington state act, chapter 36, Laws of 1963, provided
that the state assumed jurisdiction outright, without tribal consent,
over "Indians and Indian territory, reservations, country, and lands
within the state," but, on trust or restricted lands "within an
established Indian reservation," limited that jurisdiction to eight
subject areas: Compulsory school attendance, public assistance,
domestic relations, mental illness, juvenile delinquency, adoption
proceedings, dependent children, and operation of motor vehicles upon
public streets, alleys, roads, and highways. The 1963 state act also
provided that Indian tribes that petitioned for, were granted and
became subject to state jurisdiction under the 1957 state act remained
subject to state civil and criminal jurisdiction under that act, which
was incorporated, with modifications, into the 1963 state act.
Pursuant to the 1963 state act, the state assumed limited jurisdiction
over all other Indian country in the state.
(4) A 1968 federal act, Public Law 90-284 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1323),
repealed the 1953 federal act, but also provided that "such repeal
shall not affect any cession of jurisdiction made pursuant to such
section prior to its repeal." The 1968 federal act also provided that
no state could assume jurisdiction in the future without tribal consent
and authorized the federal government "to accept a retrocession by any
state of all or any measure of the criminal or civil jurisdiction, or
both, acquired by the state" pursuant to the 1953 federal act and other
federal law.
(5) Beginning in 1968, the federal government accepted offers by
Washington to partially retrocede criminal jurisdiction the state
assumed over seven tribes. The federal government accepted an offer
regarding one tribe in 1969, and another offer regarding a different
tribe in 1972. Later, beginning in 1986, retrocessions have followed
a process specified in a 1986 state act, amended in later years,
enabling seven named tribes to request the governor to approve partial
retrocession of state criminal jurisdiction, contingent upon acceptance
of a state offer by the federal government. Washington governors have
approved requests presented by five of the tribes named in the 1986
state act for partial retrocession of state criminal jurisdiction, and
the federal government has accepted these offers.
(6) The state should enact a new provision facilitating partial or
complete retrocession of state jurisdiction over Indians and Indian
country.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 37.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Civil retrocession" means the state's act of returning to the
federal government all or part of the civil jurisdiction acquired over
Indians and Indian country under federal Public Law 280, Act of August
15, 1953, 67 Stat. 588 (codified as amended at 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1162, 25
U.S.C. Secs. 1321-1326, and 28 U.S.C. Sec. 1360);
(2) "Criminal retrocession" means the state's act of returning to
the federal government all or part of the criminal jurisdiction
acquired over Indians and Indian country under federal Public Law 280,
Act of August 15, 1953, 67 Stat. 588 (codified as amended at 18 U.S.C.
Sec. 1162, 25 U.S.C. Secs. 1321-1326, and 28 U.S.C. Sec. 1360);
(3) "Indian country" means:
(a) All land within the limits of any Indian reservation under the
jurisdiction of the United States government, notwithstanding the
issuance of any patent, and including rights-of-way running through the
reservation;
(b) All dependent Indian communities with the borders of the United
States whether in the original or subsequently acquired territory
thereof, and whether within or without the limits of a state; and
(c) All Indian allotments, the Indian titles to which have not been
extinguished, including rights-of-way running through the same; and
(4) "Indian tribe" means any federally recognized or federally
acknowledged Indian tribe, nation, community, band, or group.

Sec. 3 RCW 37.12.010 and 1963 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) On March 13, 1963, the state of Washington ((hereby obligates
and binds itself to assume)) assumed criminal and civil jurisdiction
over Indians and Indian territory, reservations, country, and lands
((within this)) in the state in accordance with the ((consent of the
United States given by the)) federal act of August 15, 1953 (Public Law
280, 83rd Congress, 1st Session)((, but such)). This assumption of
jurisdiction ((shall)) does not apply to Indians when on their tribal
lands or allotted lands within an established Indian reservation and
held in trust by the United States or subject to a restriction against
alienation imposed by the United States, ((unless the provisions of RCW
37.12.021 have been invoked,)) except for the following:
(((1))) (a) Compulsory school attendance;
(((2))) (b) Public assistance;
(((3))) (c) Domestic relations;
(((4))) (d) Mental illness;
(((5))) (e) Juvenile delinquency;
(((6))) (f) Adoption proceedings;
(((7))) (g) Dependent children; and
(((8))) (h) Operation of motor vehicles upon the public streets,
alleys, roads and highways((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, Indian tribes
that petitioned for, were granted and became subject to state
jurisdiction pursuant to ((this)) chapter 240, Laws of 1957 on or
before March 13, 1963 ((shall remain)) are subject to state civil and
criminal jurisdiction as ((if chapter 36, Laws of 1963 had not been
enacted)) provided in RCW 37.12.021, unless the federal government has
accepted a retrocession.
(3) As provided in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1323, the state may request the
federal government to accept a retrocession of all or any measure of
the criminal or civil jurisdiction, or both, acquired by the state
pursuant to the federal act of August 15, 1953 (Public Law 280, 83rd
Congress, 1st Session). When considering whether to present such a
request to the federal government, the state must comply with the
procedure specified in section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 RCW 37.12.050 (State's jurisdiction limited
by federal law) and 1957 c 240 s 5 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 37.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Upon the effective date of this section, the process by which
the state may retrocede to the United States all or part of the civil
and/or criminal jurisdiction acquired by the state over an Indian tribe
and the Indian country of the tribe must be accomplished in accordance
with the requirements of this section. However, this section does not
affect the validity of any retrocession procedure commenced under RCW
37.12.100 through 37.12.140 prior to the effective date of this
section.
(2) To initiate civil and/or criminal retrocession, the duly
authorized governing body of an Indian tribe must submit a retrocession
resolution to the governor accompanied by information about the tribe's
plan regarding its exercise of jurisdiction following the proposed
retrocession. The retrocession resolution must express the Indian
tribe's desire for retrocession of all or part of the civil and/or
criminal jurisdiction acquired by the state pursuant to this chapter
over the Indian country occupied by such Indian tribe and over the
members of such Indian tribe. Before an Indian tribe submits a
retrocession resolution to the governor, the tribe and affected
municipalities are encouraged to adopt interlocal agreements, or other
collaborative arrangements, to ensure that the best interests of the
tribe and surrounding communities are served by the proposed
retrocession.
(3) Upon receiving a retrocession resolution, the governor must,
within ninety days, convene a government-to-government meeting with
either the governing body of the Indian tribe or duly authorized tribal
representatives to consider the proposed retrocession.
(4) Within one year of the receipt of an Indian tribe's
retrocession resolution, the governor must issue a formal, written
proclamation approving or denying the proposed retrocession, either in
whole or in part. This one-year deadline may be extended by mutual
consent of the Indian tribe and the governor. In addition, either the
Indian tribe or the governor may extend the deadline once for up to six
months. Within ten days of issuing a proclamation approving a proposed
retrocession, the governor must submit the proclamation to the federal
government in accordance with requirements for federal approval of the
proposed retrocession. In the event that the governor denies all or
part of the proposed retrocession, reasons for the denial must be
provided to the Indian tribe in writing.
(5) Within one hundred twenty days of the governor's receipt of an
Indian tribe's retrocession resolution, but prior to the governor's
issuance of a proclamation approving or denying the proposed
retrocession, designated standing committees of the state house of
representatives and senate may conduct public hearings to consider the
proposed retrocession. The majority leader of the senate must
designate the senate standing committee and the speaker of the house of
representatives must designate the house standing committee. Following
such public hearings, the designated standing committees may submit
advisory recommendations and/or comments to the governor regarding the
proposed retrocession. In no event are such recommendations binding on
the governor or otherwise of legal effect.
(6) A proposed retrocession approved in a gubernatorial
proclamation does not become effective until it is accepted in
accordance with procedures established by the United States for
accepting a proposed retrocession of state jurisdiction.
(7) Notwithstanding the state's retrocession of criminal and/or
civil jurisdiction under this section, the state must retain the civil
jurisdiction necessary for the civil commitment of sexually violent
predators pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW.
(8) Any Indian tribe that has commenced but not completed the
retrocession procedure authorized in RCW 37.12.100 through 37.12.140
may request retrocession under this section in lieu of completing that
procedure. Any Indian tribe that has completed the retrocession
procedure authorized in RCW 37.12.100 through 37.12.140 may use the
process authorized in this section to request retrocession of
jurisdiction retained by the state under RCW 37.12.120. The provisions
of RCW 37.12.120 are not applicable to a civil and/or criminal
retrocession that is accomplished in accordance with the requirements
of this section.
(9) An action or proceeding which has been filed with any court or
agency of the state or local government preceding the effective date of
retrocession of jurisdiction under this section shall not abate by
reason of the retrocession or determination of jurisdiction.

--- END ---