BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares that it
is in the public interest of the citizens of Washington to encourage
the recovery and reuse of materials, such as metals, that replace the
output of mining and other extractive industries; that it is desirable
to reduce the volume of the solid waste stream and resulting burdens on
municipalities and to ensure the proper handling of used small
rechargeable batteries; that it is important to ensure that all
entities supplying small rechargeable batteries to residents of
Washington, whether as stand alone units or as easily removable
components of products, bear the same battery stewardship obligations;
and that addressing certain existing and future barriers to
implementation of voluntary industry programs to collect and recycle
used small rechargeable batteries will facilitate these interests.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Easily removable" means readily detachable by a consumer
without the use of tools or with the use of common household tools.
(3) "Free rider used small rechargeable battery" means a used small
rechargeable battery that section 3 of this act requires be covered by
a qualified used small battery stewardship program but as to which no
manufacturer or marketer of the battery operated or participated in a
qualified program at the time the used battery was collected.
(4) "Participate" means to appoint an organization to act as an
agent to administer a qualified used small rechargeable battery program
and to have that appointment accepted by the qualified program.
(5) "Place of business" means a location at which a retailer sells
or offers for sale small rechargeable batteries or portable
rechargeable products to consumers.
(6) "Portable rechargeable product" means a product that is
packaged with or contains one or more easily removable small
rechargeable batteries at the time of sale or offering for sale and is
not a medical device.
(7) "Portable rechargeable product manufacturer or marketer" means
every person, firm, or corporation that: (a) Produces portable
rechargeable products sold, offered for sale, or distributed in
Washington under a brand name it owns or licenses that are packaged
with or contain one or more easily removable small rechargeable
batteries; (b) packages or arranges for the packaging of products
packaged with or containing one or more easily removable small
rechargeable batteries at the time of sale in Washington under a brand
name it owns or licenses; (c) imports into the United States products
packaged with or containing one or more easily removable small
rechargeable batteries at the time of sale, offering for sale or
distribution that are sold, offered for sale, or distributed in
Washington under a brand name it owns or licenses; or (d) otherwise
makes available to purchasers in Washington portable rechargeable
products.
(8) "Private label retailer" means a retailer who sells small
rechargeable batteries under one or more brand names it owns or
licenses.
(9) "Retailer" means a person or other entity who sells or offers
to sell small rechargeable batteries, or portable rechargeable
products, at retail through any means including, but not limited to,
remote offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or the internet, but
does not include any sale that is a wholesale transaction with a
distributor or manufacturer.
(10) "Qualified used small rechargeable battery stewardship
program" or "qualified program" means a program for the collection,
transportation, recycling, and disposal of used small rechargeable
batteries that has been certified under section 4 of this act to meet
the requirements set forth in section 4(2) of this act.
(11) "Small nonrechargeable battery" means a battery weighing less
than eleven pounds that is not designed to be recharged for repeated
use.
(12) "Small nonrechargeable battery manufacturer or marketer" means
a person who: (a) Produces small nonrechargeable batteries sold,
offered for sale, or distributed in Washington under a brand name it
owns or licenses; (b) packages or arranges for the packaging of small
nonrechargeable batteries for sale, offering for sale, or distribution
in Washington under a brand name it owns or licenses; (c) imports into
the United States small nonrechargeable batteries that are sold,
offered for sale, or distributed in Washington under a brand name it
owns or licenses; or (d) otherwise makes available to purchasers in
Washington small nonrechargeable batteries, whether as stand alone
items or as components of products.
(13) "Small rechargeable battery" means one or more voltaic or
galvanic cells, electrically connected to produce electric energy and
designed to be recharged and weighing less than eleven pounds, or an
assembly of small rechargeable batteries in a container that has a
single positive and negative connection (commonly known as a battery
pack) that weighs less than eleven pounds, but does not include: (a)
A battery that is not easily removable or is not intended or designed
to be removed from the product, other than by the manufacturer; (b) a
battery or battery pack used to start an internal combustion engine or
as the principal or supplemental electric power source for a vehicle
such as, but not limited to, an automobile, bicycle, boat, truck,
tractor, golf cart, or wheelchair; (c) a battery or battery pack
designed for use by a commercial, industrial, or institutional facility
for load leveling or storage of electricity generated by an alternative
power source, such as solar or wind driven generators; or (d) a battery
or battery pack designed for use by a commercial, industrial, or
institutional facility as a backup power source for memory or program
instruction storage or timekeeping.
(14) "Small rechargeable battery manufacturer or marketer" means
every person, firm, or corporation that: (a) Produces small
rechargeable batteries sold, offered for sale, or distributed in
Washington under a brand name it owns or licenses; (b) packages or
arranges for the packaging of small rechargeable batteries for sale,
offering for sale, or distribution in Washington under a brand name it
owns or licenses; (c) imports into the United States small rechargeable
batteries that are sold, offered for sale, or distributed in Washington
under a brand name it owns or licenses; (d) is a private label
retailer; or (e) otherwise makes available to consumers in Washington
small rechargeable batteries, whether as stand alone items or
otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Unless it is participating in a program
described in section 10 of this act, no later than one hundred eighty
days after the effective date of this section, each small rechargeable
battery manufacturer or marketer, including private label retailers,
and each portable rechargeable product manufacturer or marketer who has
a reasonable basis to know that either the batteries or products, or
both, it manufactures or markets are being sold or offered for sale in
Washington by retailers shall operate a qualified program or
participate in a qualified program operated by another entity.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) Any entity seeking to have a used small
rechargeable battery stewardship program certified as a qualified
program must submit a plan for that program to the department for
review no later than ninety days prior to the date the entity intends
to operate the program as a qualified program. The department shall
acknowledge receipt of the submission within fourteen days and state in
that acknowledgment whether the plan submission appears, on its face,
to include all elements required by subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Within sixty days of the notification required by subsection
(1) of this section, the department shall certify any submitted used
small rechargeable battery stewardship program as a qualified program
if:
(a) The submission was accompanied by a fee of five thousand
dollars, payable to the used battery stewardship account created in
section 8 of this act;
(b) All return acceptance, recycling, and other handling services,
including post-collection transportation, are provided free to
consumers;
(c) The submitting entity has provided to the department and
committed to the department to post on the internet, promptly upon
receipt of notice that the program is a qualified program, a written
program plan that includes the following information: (i) The name,
address, and contact information for the operator of the qualified
program; (ii) contact information for all participating small
rechargeable battery manufacturers or marketers, portable rechargeable
product manufacturers or marketers, and all other such manufacturers or
marketers whose responsibilities under this chapter are fulfilled by
virtue of participation in the qualified program of another
manufacturer or marketer; (iii) a description of the qualified program;
and (iv) locations to which Washington residents can take used small
rechargeable batteries;
(d) The program does not require a retailer to accept more than
five used rechargeable batteries from a person on a single day; and
(e) Unless the program is operated by a small rechargeable battery
manufacturer or marketer or portable rechargeable product manufacturer
or marketer who limits its program solely to accepting batteries or
products bearing its own brand, the program covers all used small
rechargeable batteries, regardless of brand or other information
displayed on the collected small rechargeable batteries and includes at
least the following minimum elements, along with other elements as the
program sponsor voluntarily includes:
(i) The program engages in education and outreach activities to
maximize collections;
(ii) The program either is part of a multijurisdictional program
that collects used small rechargeable batteries and has collected in
Washington at least one hundred thousand pounds of these batteries in
the last twelve months and does so in each year thereafter, or collects
at least one hundred thousand pounds of used small rechargeable
batteries in Washington in its first year of operation in Washington
and each year thereafter; and
(iii) The program includes, at a minimum: Retailer collection of
used small rechargeable batteries at multiple locations; collection of
used small rechargeable batteries from governmental collection
facilities; the provision of at least one used small rechargeable
battery collection location in each county in the state; and the
provision of one collection site for each city or town with a
population of greater than ten thousand, which may be the same as the
location in a county.
(3) If the department fails to notify the entity submitting the
program plan within the time limit established in subsection (1) of
this section, that the plan for the program appears or does not appear,
on its face, to include all requirements of subsection (2) of this
section, or to notify the entity submitting the program plan within the
time limit established in subsection (2) of this section that the
program is certified or that the certification is denied, the program
is considered to be certified as a qualified program. In the event
that the department notifies the entity submitting the program plan
within the time limits established in subsections (1) or (2) of this
section that the program is deficient, the department shall notify the
plan submitter of the deficiencies and allow a reasonable period of not
less than thirty days for resubmission of the program plan. A program
plan resubmitted during that resubmission period is not required to pay
an additional fee under subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(4) Promptly upon certification of a qualified program, or upon
qualification in accordance with subsection (3) of this section, the
submitter of a qualified program shall post on the internet the written
program plan described in subsection (2)(c) of this section. No later
than March 1st of the year following certification of a qualified
program, and of every year thereafter until the program is terminated,
the operator of a qualified program shall pay to the used battery
stewardship fund established under section 8 of this act an annual fee
of five thousand dollars and shall make available on the internet and
provide to the department at such address as the department may direct
a report: (a) Describing its funding, collections, and recycling
success; (b) identifying the small rechargeable battery manufacturers
and marketers, including private label retailers, and portable
rechargeable product manufacturers and marketers who participate in it;
and (c) describing the mechanisms employed and identifying entities
involved in the final disposition of collected materials, except that
if a qualified program operating in Washington is part of a program
that also operates in jurisdictions outside of Washington, the funding
information need not be reported on a Washington-specific basis.
(5) The department shall maintain on the internet a list of all
qualified programs that includes a link to the qualified programs'
internet web sites.
(6) A qualified program may be amended by submission to the
department of a revised version of the qualified program plan showing
proposed amendments and an administrative fee of five hundred dollars.
Within sixty days of receipt, the department shall certify that the
amended program remains a qualified program, if the amended program
plan continues to meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section, or shall inform the submitter with specificity of any
deficiencies and allow a reasonable period for submission of revised
amendments. Unless, within sixty days of submission of the further
revised version of the qualified program, the department notifies the
submitter with specificity of a continuing failure to meet the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section, the revised plan is
thereafter a qualified program plan. If at either the submission or
resubmission stage the department informs the submitter of
deficiencies, the unamended qualified plan remains effective unless the
qualified plan is terminated by its operator.
(7) A qualified program may be terminated by its operator at any
time after the operator gives six months' notice to program
participants of the termination date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) If a governmental entity that operates,
contracts for, establishes minimum requirements for, or supervises a
location at which residents may drop off materials for recycling agrees
with the operator of a qualified program on the terms of the qualified
program's support for the collection of used small rechargeable
batteries and for segregation of those batteries from other collected
materials into containers provided by the qualified program, the
qualified program shall provide appropriate containers and make any
mutually agreed upon payments.
(2) If a governmental entity that operates, contracts for,
establishes minimum requirements for, or supervises the operation of a
curbside collection program that includes used small rechargeable
batteries agrees with the operator of a qualified program on the terms
of the qualified program's support for those activities, the qualified
program shall provide to the consolidation facilities supporting that
curbside collection program containers for use in sorting and shipping
those used small rechargeable batteries and make any mutually agreed
upon payments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Beginning one year after the effective
date of this section, no retailer may sell or offer for sale in
Washington a small rechargeable battery unless it is marked with an
identification of the small rechargeable battery manufacturer or
marketer.
(2) Beginning one year after the effective date of this section, no
retailer may sell or offer for sale in Washington a portable
rechargeable product unless the battery packaged with or contained in
the portable rechargeable product is marked with an identification of
the battery manufacturer or marketer.
(3) No retailer having a place of business in Washington shall be
obliged to participate in a qualified used small rechargeable battery
stewardship program unless it is a private label retailer. Any private
label retailer who does not operate a program that meets the
requirements of section 4(2)(d) of this act or is not participating in
another qualified program shall cooperate with an operator of a
qualified program who requests such cooperation by displaying a
collection container provided by the operator and otherwise complying
with that program, without requiring payment by the qualified program.
(4) Retailers that sell or offer to sell small rechargeable
batteries or portable rechargeable products to consumers in Washington,
whether through places of business or through nonretail outlets such as
catalogs, by mail, telephone, or the internet, shall inform consumers
with visible signage or equivalent alternative mechanisms of qualified
programs that provide opportunities to return used small rechargeable
batteries for recycling in Washington.
(5) Any retailer that has a physical presence in Washington and is
cooperating with a qualified program:
(a) Shall ensure that all used batteries placed in any collection
container located at the retailer's facility are protected from short
circuiting in accordance with the instructions of the operator of the
program, and shall take reasonable steps to prevent the placement into
any such container of materials other than properly protected used
small rechargeable batteries; and
(b) May require the operator of a qualified program to pay the
retailer for the reasonable cost of cooperating with the plan if the
qualified program does not provide all unique materials associated with
its implementation to the retailer, at no cost to the retailer, or the
qualified program fails to provide a mechanism for the reasonable and
timely collection and transportation of collected used small
rechargeable batteries from the locations at which the operator of the
qualified program has requested the retailer's cooperation.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (5)(b) of this section, a
retailer may not require the operator of a qualified program to pay the
retailer for the cost of cooperating with that program.
(7) An operator of a qualified program may not require a retailer
to pay a fee to participate in that operator's program.
(8) Any person who provides to a retailer a small rechargeable
battery or portable rechargeable product whose manufacturer or marketer
is not in compliance with section 3 of this act shall, upon request by
the retailer, designate a location to which the retailer may ship the
battery or product for further handling and reimburse the retailer for
all costs incurred by the retailer in shipping the battery or product
to the designated location.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 All activities undertaken by any qualified
program or a participant in such a program to establish and operate the
program, to coordinate that program with a program to collect used
electronic waste under electronic product recycling act, chapter 70.95N
RCW, or to coordinate with or participate in a program described in
section 10 of this act, shall not be considered to violate the unfair
business practices--consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) Any person who violates section 3 or 10
of this act shall be liable for a civil penalty recoverable in a
proceeding before the department in the amount of five thousand dollars
for the first violation, ten thousand dollars for the second violation,
and fifty thousand dollars for the third or subsequent violation. Any
person who violates section 6 of this act is liable for a civil penalty
recoverable in a proceeding before the department in the amount of one
thousand dollars.
(2) At least ninety days prior to seeking to assess any penalty
authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the department shall
notify the alleged violator of the department's intention to seek a
penalty. No penalty is recoverable under subsection (1) of this
section if, within the ninety days of receipt of such a notice, the
recipient has come into compliance with this chapter. Any person that
incurs a penalty under this chapter may appeal the penalty to the
pollution control hearings board created under chapter 43.21B RCW.
(3) The used battery stewardship account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from payments made under section
4 (2) and (4) of this act and penalties levied under this chapter must
be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be
used solely by the department for the purposes of fulfilling department
responsibilities specified in this chapter. Funds in the account may
not be diverted for any purpose or activity other than those specified
in this section. Only the director of the department or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) The operator of a qualified small
rechargeable battery stewardship program that incurs costs in excess of
five thousand dollars in collecting, handling, recycling, or properly
disposing in Washington of free rider used small rechargeable batteries
originating from a small rechargeable battery manufacturer or marketer
or portable rechargeable product manufacturer or marketer who: (a) Was
required by section 3 of this act to operate or participate in a
qualified program, did not at the time the used battery was collected
participate in a qualified program and was not covered by the
participation by another manufacturer in a qualified program; and (b)
can reasonably be identified from a brand or marking on a used small
rechargeable battery or other information, may bring a civil action or
actions to recover costs, damages, and fees specified in subsection (2)
of this section, and if successful must be awarded such amounts.
(2) In an action brought pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, the plaintiff operator of a qualified program shall recover
from the defendant small rechargeable battery manufacturer or marketer
or portable rechargeable product manufacturer or marketer the costs the
plaintiff incurred in collecting, handling, recycling, or properly
disposing of free rider used small rechargeable batteries reasonably
identified as having originated from the defendant small rechargeable
battery manufacturer or marketer or portable rechargeable product
manufacturer or marketer, plus an amount of damages equal to no less
than three times those costs, plus the plaintiff's attorneys' fees and
costs of litigation.
(3) An action to recover the costs specified in this section may be
brought in any court in the state, without regard to the amount in
dispute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Any entity that operates a program for the
stewardship of multiple brands of used small nonrechargeable batteries
on behalf of more than one nonrechargeable battery manufacturer or
retailer shall provide to all small rechargeable battery manufacturers
and marketers and portable rechargeable product manufacturers and
marketers subject to this chapter the opportunity to participate in
that entity's program. Such an entity may impose on the small
rechargeable battery manufacturer or marketer or portable rechargeable
product manufacturer or marketer fees no greater than the share of the
total cost of the program of collecting, handling, and processing small
rechargeable batteries that is equal to a reasonable estimate of the
percentage that represents the share of sales of small rechargeable
batteries sold in Washington for which the small rechargeable battery
manufacturer or portable rechargeable product manufacturer would be
responsible under section 3 of this act, compared to the total number
of small rechargeable batteries sold in Washington as either individual
units or in portable rechargeable products. Any small rechargeable
battery manufacturer or marketer or portable product manufacturer or
marketer who participates in such a program is deemed to be in
compliance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 This chapter is void if a federal law, or
a combination of federal laws, takes effect that establishes a national
program for the collection and recycling of both used small
nonrechargeable batteries and used small rechargeable batteries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 This chapter may be known and cited as the
"Washington small rechargeable battery stewardship act."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 1 through 12 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 7 and 2010 c 84 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the parks and recreation
commission:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) A final decision by the department or director made under
chapter 183, Laws of 2009.
(d) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(f) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(g) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(h) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(i) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(j) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(k) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(l) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(m) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(n) Decisions of a state agency that is an authorized public entity
under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of a
vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are
reviewable under RCW 79.100.120.
(o) Appeals of decisions of the department under chapter 70.--- RCW
(the new chapter created in section 13 of this act).
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 15 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 8 and 2010 c 84 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the parks and recreation
commission:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095, 86.16.020, 88.46.070,
90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(i) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(j) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(k) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(l) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(m) Decisions of a state agency that is an authorized public entity
under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of a
vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are
reviewable under RCW 79.100.120.
(n) Appeals of decisions of the department under chapter 70.--- RCW
(the new chapter created in section 13 of this act).
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Section 14 of this act expires June 30,
2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 Section 15 of this act takes effect June
30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---