BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the ongoing
economic recession has prevented water right holders from completing
projects with existing water right permits, and that existing law
allows such permits to be extended without increasing or decreasing the
quantity of water authorized. The legislature also finds that the
ongoing economic recession has impacted state agency budgets, including
the department of ecology's water resource program and environmental
and land use hearings office.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to enact temporary
water rights permitting reforms to enable the department of ecology's
water permitting staff to focus on substantive permitting matters that
do not duplicate other permit review procedures.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.03.320 and 1999 c 400 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Actual construction work shall be commenced on any project for
which permit has been granted within such reasonable time as shall be
prescribed by the department, and shall thereafter be prosecuted with
diligence and completed within the time prescribed by the department.
The department, in fixing the time for the commencement of the work, or
for the completion thereof and the application of the water to the
beneficial use prescribed in the permit, shall take into consideration
the cost and magnitude of the project and the engineering and physical
features to be encountered, and shall allow such time as shall be
reasonable and just under the conditions then existing, having due
regard for the public welfare and public interests affected. For good
cause shown, the department shall extend the time or times fixed as
aforesaid, and shall grant such further period or periods as may be
reasonably necessary, having due regard to the good faith of the
applicant and the public interests affected. Good cause includes
prevention or restriction of water use by operation of federal laws for
the time or times fixed for commencing work, completing work, and
applying water to beneficial use otherwise authorized under a water
right permit issued for a federal reclamation project. In fixing
construction schedules and the time, or extension of time, for
application of water to beneficial use for municipal water supply
purposes, the department shall also take into consideration the term
and amount of financing required to complete the project, delays that
may result from planned and existing conservation and water use
efficiency measures implemented by the public water system, and the
supply needs of the public water system's service area, consistent with
an approved comprehensive plan under chapter 36.70A RCW, or in the
absence of such a plan, a county-approved comprehensive plan under
chapter 36.70 RCW or a plan approved under chapter 35.63 RCW, and
related water demand projections prepared by public water systems in
accordance with state law. An existing comprehensive plan under
chapter 36.70A or 36.70 RCW, plan under chapter 35.63 RCW, or demand
projection may be used. If the terms of the permit or extension
thereof, are not complied with the department shall give notice by
registered mail that such permit will be canceled unless the holders
thereof shall show cause within sixty days why the same should not be
so canceled. If cause is not shown, the permit shall be canceled.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (3) of
this section, for any water right permit, previously approved permit
extension, or water right change or transfer with a development
schedule requiring construction or application of water to beneficial
use between the effective date of this section and December 31, 2016,
the times for construction and the application of water to beneficial
use are both extended for five years. The extension must be issued by
the department after payment of the fee required by RCW 90.03.470. In
connection with the ministerial permit extension authorized in this
subsection, the department shall not increase or decrease the quantity
of water authorized under the permit or modify any other terms or
conditions of the permit. As an alternative to the ministerial permit
extension authorized in this subsection, a water right permit holder
may apply for a permit extension under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The provisions of this section do not apply to the Quincy
groundwater subarea as defined in WAC 173-134A-040(8) as it existed on
the effective date of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.21B.305 and 2005 c 34 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
In an appeal that involves a penalty of fifteen thousand dollars or
less, the appeal may be heard by one member of the board or by an
administrative law judge employed by the board, whose decision shall be
the final decision of the board. The board shall define by rule
alternative procedures to expedite appeals involving penalties of
fifteen thousand dollars or less. These alternatives may include:
Mediation, upon agreement of all parties; submission of testimony by
affidavit; or other forms that may lead to less formal and faster
resolution of appeals.

--- END ---