BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08A.410 and 1997 c 58 s 702 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The WorkFirst program shall develop outcome measures for use in
evaluating the WorkFirst program authorized in chapter 58, Laws of
1997, which may include but are not limited to:
(a) Caseload reduction;
(b) Recidivism to caseload after two years;
(c) Job retention;
(d) Earnings;
(e) Reduction in average grant through increased recipient
earnings; ((and))
(f) Placement of recipients into private sector, unsubsidized jobs;
and
(g) Enrollment in school and consistent school attendance,
including in-home schooling situations, by the school-aged children of
recipients.
(2) The department shall require that contractors for WorkFirst
services collect outcome measure information and report outcome
measures to the department regularly. The department shall develop
benchmarks that compare outcome measure information from all
contractors to provide a clear indication of the most effective
contractors. Benchmark information shall be published quarterly and
provided to the legislature, the governor, and all contractors for
WorkFirst services.

--- END ---