BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.28.010 and 1999 c 151 s 101 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the
following words and phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall
have the following meanings:
(1) "Debt adjusting" means the managing, counseling, settling,
adjusting, prorating, or liquidating of the indebtedness of a debtor,
or receiving funds for the purpose of distributing said funds among
creditors in payment or partial payment of obligations of a debtor.
(2) "Debt adjuster", which includes any person known as a debt
pooler, debt manager, debt consolidator, debt prorater, or credit
counselor, is any person engaging in or holding himself or herself out
as engaging in the business of debt adjusting for compensation. The
term shall not include:
(a) Attorneys-at-law, escrow agents, accountants, broker-dealers in
securities, or investment advisors in securities, while performing
services solely incidental to the practice of their professions;
(b) Any person, partnership, association, or corporation doing
business under and as permitted by any law of this state or of the
United States relating to banks, consumer finance businesses, consumer
loan companies, trust companies, mutual savings banks, savings and loan
associations, building and loan associations, credit unions, crop
credit associations, development credit corporations, industrial
development corporations, title insurance companies, or insurance
companies;
(c) Persons who, as employees on a regular salary or wage of an
employer not engaged in the business of debt adjusting, perform credit
services for their employer;
(d) Public officers while acting in their official capacities and
persons acting under court order;
(e) Any person while performing services incidental to the
dissolution, winding up or liquidation of a partnership, corporation,
or other business enterprise;
(f) Nonprofit organizations dealing exclusively with debts owing
from commercial enterprises to business creditors;
(g) Nonprofit organizations engaged in debt adjusting and which do
not assess against the debtor a service charge in excess of fifteen
dollars per month;
(h) Independent entities that hold or administer a dedicated bank
account as provided for by 16 C.F.R. Sec. 310.4(a)(5)(ii), as existing
on the effective date of this section, and are licensed under chapter
19.230 RCW.
(3) "Debt adjusting agency" is any partnership, corporation, or
association engaging in or holding itself out as engaging in the
business of debt adjusting.

--- END ---