BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 13.40.038 and 1992 c 205 s 105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It is the policy of this state that all county juvenile
detention facilities provide a humane, safe, and rehabilitative
environment and that unadjudicated youth remain in the community
whenever possible, consistent with public safety and the provisions of
chapter 13.40 RCW.
(2) The counties shall develop and implement detention intake
standards and risk assessment standards to determine whether detention
is warranted, whether the juvenile is developmentally disabled, and if
((so)) detention is warranted, whether the juvenile should be placed in
secure, nonsecure, or home detention to implement the goals of this
section.
(3) Inability to pay for a less restrictive detention placement
shall not be a basis for denying a respondent a less restrictive
placement in the community. ((The detention and risk assessment
standards shall be developed and implemented no later than December 31,
1992.))
(4) The assessment standards to determine whether a juvenile
entering detention is developmentally disabled must be developed and
implemented no later than December 31, 2012.

--- END ---