BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A qualified dispute resolution center may deduct from the
measure of tax amounts received as a contribution from federal, state,
or local governments and nonprofit organizations for providing dispute
resolution services.
(2) A nonprofit organization may deduct from the measure of tax
amounts received from federal, state, or local governments for
distribution to a qualified dispute resolution center.
(3) A qualified dispute resolution center must:
(a) Be established under chapter 7.75 RCW; and
(b) Provide services either without charge to the participants or
for a fee that is based on the participant's ability to pay, as
required by RCW 7.75.030.
(4) As used in this section, a "nonprofit organization" has the
same meaning as in RCW 82.04.3651(2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act applies prospectively as well as
retroactively.

--- END ---