BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The department of ecology shall
coordinate with the water stewardship division of the ministry of
environment for the province of British Columbia, Canada, to study and
evaluate the feasibility of providing new water supplies and storage
from Harrison lake and Ross lake to benefit residents of western
Washington in the areas of water management, economic development,
fishery resource management, and agricultural production. The
department of ecology is also encouraged to coordinate with federal
agencies including, but not limited to, the United States state
department, the United States department of the interior, and the
bureau of reclamation.
(2) By December 1, 2012, and within existing resources, the
department of ecology shall report its findings and recommendations to
the governor and the legislature consistent with RCW 43.01.036. The
report must include data and an analysis regarding the feasibility,
cost estimates, and any barriers to acquiring water rights from
Harrison lake for the benefit of residents of western Washington in the
areas of water management, economic development, fishery resource
management, and agricultural production.
(3) This section expires January 1, 2013.

--- END ---