BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Conservation futures" means all rights and interests in real
property described in and acquired pursuant to RCW 84.34.210 through
84.34.250 and 64.04.130.
(2) "District" means a flexible conservation futures taxing
district created under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) In lieu of imposing a countywide levy
pursuant to RCW 84.34.230, a county may create a district to acquire
and manage conservation futures in an area encompassing less than the
entire county. A county may not create such a district if the county
imposes a countywide levy pursuant to RCW 84.34.230 prior to the
effective date of this legislation.
(2) A county may alter a district by:
(a) Enlarging or reducing the area of the district;
(b) Dividing the district into two or more districts; or
(c) Combining or consolidating two or more existing districts.
(3) To create or alter a district, a county legislative authority
must, in the following sequence:
(a) Adopt a resolution of intention as provided in section 4 of
this act;
(b) Conduct a public hearing to consider creating or altering a
district as provided in section 5 of this act; and
(c) Adopt a resolution creating or altering a district as provided
in section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) A county may impose a levy solely on
taxable property in a district in the same manner and subject to the
same limitations in which a county may impose a levy countywide
pursuant to RCW 84.34.230.
(2) Revenue from a district levy:
(a) Must be held in a special fund for the district;
(b) Can be spent only upon authorization by the county legislative
authority; and
(c) Can be spent only to acquire and manage conservation futures in
the district.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A resolution of intention to create or alter
a district must specify:
(1) That any levy imposed in the district is in lieu of any levy
imposed pursuant to RCW 84.34.230;
(2) The boundaries of the district;
(3) The nature of activity currently conducted or proposed to be
conducted in the district using district funds; and
(4) The date, time, and place for a public hearing conducted
pursuant to section 5 of this act, which must be at least thirty days
and no more than ninety days after the date that the county legislative
authority adopted the resolution of intention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) A county legislative authority must
conduct a public hearing to consider creating or altering a district.
(2) Notice of the public hearing must:
(a) Include the resolution of intention provided in section 4 of
this act; and
(b) Be published in at least two consecutive issues of a newspaper
of general circulation in the proposed or altered district.
(3) The date of the first publication of notice of the public
hearing must be at least fifteen days prior to the date fixed for the
public hearing in the resolution of intention.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Following a public hearing conducted
pursuant to section 5 of this act, a county legislative authority may
create or alter a district by adopting a resolution finding that the
interests of the area within a proposed or altered district will be
benefited. The county legislative authority must enter the adopted
final resolution in its minutes.
(2) A resolution creating a district must designate the district as
"Flexible Conservation Futures Taxing District No. [insert number] for
[insert county name] County."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) The county legislative authority must
designate a person to serve as supervisor of a district.
(2) The county legislative authority may designate a member of the
county legislative authority to serve as supervisor of a district if
the member represents a county commissioner district or county council
district that includes property within the district. A member of the
county legislative authority designated to serve as supervisor of a
district may receive compensation for expenses while conducting
district operations in the same manner in which the member receives
compensation for conducting other county operations.
(3) The county legislative authority may designate a person who is
not a member of the county legislative authority to serve as supervisor
of a district and fix compensation of that person.
(4) The county treasurer is treasurer of a district. The county
assessor and other county officers must provide assistance in
administering a district.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.52.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 28 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes must be
levied or voted in specific amounts.
(2) The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes,
and purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, must be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county must be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
(3) When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax
levy on any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in
RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either
of these sections, the assessor must recompute and establish a
consolidated levy in the following manner:
(a) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county
road district, and city or town purposes must be extended on the tax
rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law;
however any state levy takes precedence over all other levies and may
not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130,
84.34.230, section 3 of this act, 84.52.069, 84.52.105, the portion of
the levy by a metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW
84.52.120, 84.52.125, 84.52.135, 84.52.140, and the protected portion
of the levy under RCW 86.15.160 by flood control zone districts in a
county with a population of seven hundred seventy-five thousand or more
that are coextensive with a county, the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then
these levies must be reduced as follows:
(i) The portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that
has a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand and is located
in a county with a population of one million five hundred thousand or
more that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 must be reduced until the
combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value
of any property or must be eliminated;
(ii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the protected portion of the levy
imposed under RCW 86.15.160 by a flood control zone district in a
county with a population of seven hundred seventy-five thousand or more
that is coextensive with a county must be reduced until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or must be eliminated;
(iii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.140 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(iv) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a fire
protection district that is protected under RCW 84.52.125 must be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;
(v) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under
RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be
eliminated;
(vi) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry
district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(vii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district with a population of one hundred fifty
thousand or more that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 must be reduced
until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or must be eliminated;
(viii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, section 3 of this act, 84.52.105, and any portion of the
levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value, must be reduced on a pro rata basis
until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or must be eliminated; and
(ix) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are
subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 must
be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated.
(b) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by
all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property must be
reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of
taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:
(i) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100,
and 67.38.130 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(ii) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control
zone districts other than the portion of a levy protected under RCW
84.52.815 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(iii) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire
protection service authorities, library districts, the first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park
districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for public hospital districts, must be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;
(iv) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after
January 1, 2002, must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(v) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 and regional
fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b) and (c)
must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and
(vi) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these
limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection
service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), library districts,
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, must be reduced on a pro rata basis
or eliminated.

Sec. 9 RCW 84.52.010 and 2009 c 551 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes ((shall))
must be levied or voted in specific amounts.
(2) The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes,
and purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, ((shall))
must be determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the
completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes
levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county ((shall))
must be determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the
respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the
assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts
respectively.
(3) When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax
levy on any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in
RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either
of these sections, the assessor ((shall)) must recompute and establish
a consolidated levy in the following manner:
(((1))) (a) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county,
county road district, and city or town purposes ((shall)) must be
extended on the tax rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations
established by law; however any state levy ((shall)) takes precedence
over all other levies and ((shall)) may not be reduced for any purpose
other than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the
levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130, 84.34.230, section 3 of this act,
84.52.069, 84.52.105, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park
district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, 84.52.125, 84.52.135,
and 84.52.140, the combined rate of regular property tax levies that
are subject to the one percent limitation exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then these levies ((shall)) must
be reduced as follows:
(((a))) (i) The levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.140
((shall)) must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property or ((shall)) must be
eliminated;
(((b))) (ii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, the portion of the
levy by a fire protection district that is protected under RCW
84.52.125 ((shall)) must be reduced until the combined rate no longer
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or
((shall)) must be eliminated;
(((c))) (iii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by
a county under RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or must be eliminated;
(((d))) (iv) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by
a ferry district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or must be eliminated;
(((e))) (v) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, the portion of the
levy by a metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW
84.52.120 ((shall)) must be reduced until the combined rate no longer
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or
((shall)) must be eliminated;
(((f))) (vi) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the levies
imposed under RCW 84.34.230, section 3 of this act, 84.52.105, and any
portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of
thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, ((shall)) must be
reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or ((shall))
must be eliminated; and
(((g))) (vii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the thirty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under
RCW 84.52.069 ((shall)) must be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or eliminated.
(((2))) (b) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these
limitations by all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such
property ((shall)) must be reduced or eliminated as follows to bring
the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the provisions
of these limitations:
(((a))) (i) First, the certified property tax levy rates of those
junior taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145,
35.95A.100, and 67.38.130 ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis
or eliminated;
(((b))) (ii) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still
exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of
flood control zone districts ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated;
(((c))) (iii) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still
exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all
other junior taxing districts, other than fire protection districts,
regional fire protection service authorities, library districts, the
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for
metropolitan park districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levies for public hospital districts,
((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
(((d))) (iv) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still
exceeds these limitations, the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or
after January 1, 2002, ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or
eliminated;
(((e))) (v) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds
these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to
fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 and
regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b)
and (c) ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
and
(((f))) (vi) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds
these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for
fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection
service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), library districts,
metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and
public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, ((shall)) must be reduced on a pro
rata basis or eliminated.

Sec. 10 RCW 84.52.043 and 2011 c 275 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as
amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal
property by the taxing districts hereafter named are as follows:
(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts are as follows: (a) The
levy by the state may not exceed three dollars and sixty cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted to the state equalized
value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state
department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support of the
common schools; (b) the levy by any county may not exceed one dollar
and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c) the levy
by any road district may not exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or
town may not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value. However any county is hereby
authorized to increase its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a
rate not to exceed two dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value for general county purposes if the
total levies for both the county and any road district within the
county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as
a result of the increased county levy.
(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior
taxing districts, other than the state, may not exceed five dollars and
ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term
"junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the
state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and
public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection
do not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law by
or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax
levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution;
(c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW
84.34.230 and section 3 of this act; (d) levies for emergency medical
care or emergency medical services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e)
levies to finance affordable housing for very low-income housing
imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f) the portions of levies by metropolitan
park districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.120; (g) levies
imposed by ferry districts under RCW 36.54.130; (h) levies for criminal
justice purposes under RCW 84.52.135; (i) the portions of levies by
fire protection districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.125; (j)
levies by counties for transit-related purposes under RCW 84.52.140;
and (k) the protected portion of the levies imposed under RCW 86.15.160
by flood control zone districts in a county with a population of seven
hundred seventy-five thousand or more that are coextensive with a
county.

Sec. 11 RCW 84.52.043 and 2009 c 551 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as
amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal
property by the taxing districts hereafter named ((shall)) must be as
follows:
(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts ((shall)) must be as
follows: (a) The levy by the state ((shall)) may not exceed three
dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted
to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio
fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the
support of the common schools; (b) the levy by any county ((shall)) may
not exceed one dollar and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value; (c) the levy by any road district ((shall)) may not exceed two
dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value;
and (d) the levy by any city or town ((shall)) may not exceed three
dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value. However any county is hereby authorized to increase
its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two
dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value for general county purposes if the total levies for both
the county and any road district within the county do not exceed four
dollars and five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, and no
other taxing district has its levy reduced as a result of the increased
county levy.
(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior
taxing districts, other than the state, ((shall)) may not exceed five
dollars and ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation.
The term "junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other
than the state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port
districts, and public utility districts. The limitations provided in
this subsection ((shall)) do not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates
provided by existing law by or for any port or public utility district;
(b) excess property tax levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of
the state Constitution; (c) levies for acquiring conservation futures
as authorized under RCW 84.34.230 and section 3 of this act; (d) levies
for emergency medical care or emergency medical services imposed under
RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f) the portions of levies
by metropolitan park districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.120;
(g) levies imposed by ferry districts under RCW 36.54.130; (h) levies
for criminal justice purposes under RCW 84.52.135; (i) the portions of
levies by fire protection districts that are protected under RCW
84.52.125; and (j) levies by counties for transit-related purposes
under RCW 84.52.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13 Sections 8 and 10 of this act expire
January 1, 2018.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 9 and 11 of this act take effect
January 1, 2018.

--- END ---