BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.24.020 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 22 s 2 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) There is levied and collected as provided in this chapter((,))
a tax upon the sale, use, consumption, handling, possession, or
distribution of all cigarettes, in an amount equal to ((12.125)) 17.125
cents per cigarette. Revenues collected under this section must be
distributed as follows:
(a) Each fiscal year the sum of one million seven hundred thousand
dollars must be deposited into the tobacco prevention and control
account created in RCW 43.79.480 solely for appropriation for tobacco
usage prevention and treatment programs; and
(b) The remaining revenues must be deposited into the general fund.
(2) Wholesalers subject to the payment of this tax may, if they
wish, absorb five one-hundredths cents per cigarette of the tax and not
pass it on to purchasers without being in violation of this section or
any other act relating to the sale or taxation of cigarettes.
(3) For purposes of this chapter, "possession" means both (a)
physical possession by the purchaser, and((,)) (b) when cigarettes are
being transported to or held for the purchaser or his or her designee
by a person other than the purchaser, constructive possession by the
purchaser or his or her designee, which constructive possession is
deemed to occur at the location of the cigarettes being so transported
or held.
(4) In accordance with federal law and rules prescribed by the
department, an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe
may purchase cigarettes from an Indian tribal organization under the
jurisdiction of the member's tribe for the member's own use exempt from
the applicable taxes imposed by this chapter. Except as provided in
subsection (5) of this section, any person, who purchases cigarettes
from an Indian tribal organization and who is not an enrolled member of
the federally recognized Indian tribe within whose jurisdiction the
sale takes place, is not exempt from the applicable taxes imposed by
this chapter.
(5) If the state enters into a cigarette tax contract or agreement
with a federally recognized Indian tribe under chapter 43.06 RCW, the
terms of the contract or agreement take precedence over any conflicting
provisions of this chapter while the contract or agreement is in
effect.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.79.480 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 947 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Moneys received by the state of Washington in accordance with
the settlement of the state's legal action against tobacco product
manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys' fees, shall be
deposited in the tobacco settlement account created in this section
except as these moneys are sold or assigned under chapter 43.340 RCW.
(2) The tobacco settlement account is created in the state
treasury. Moneys in the tobacco settlement account may only be
transferred to the state general fund, and to the tobacco prevention
and control account for purposes set forth in this section. The
legislature shall transfer amounts received as strategic contribution
payments as defined in RCW 43.350.010 to the life sciences discovery
fund created in RCW 43.350.070. During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013
fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer less than the entire
strategic contribution payments, and may transfer amounts attributable
to strategic contribution payments into the basic health plan
stabilization account.
(3) The tobacco prevention and control account is created in the
state treasury. The source of revenue for this account is moneys
transferred to the account from the tobacco settlement account,
cigarette tax revenues pursuant to RCW 82.24.020(1)(a), investment
earnings, donations to the account, and other revenues as directed by
law. Expenditures from the account are subject to appropriation.
Moneys in the tobacco prevention and control account may only be used
for tobacco usage prevention and treatment programs. During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the tobacco
prevention and control account to the state general fund such amounts
as represent the excess fund balance of the account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---