BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.21F.062 and 2010 c 145 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the duties prescribed in RCW 43.21F.045, the
department must develop guidance applicable to all state agencies for
achieving a unified state position upon matters involving the siting
and operation of renewable energy facilities in the state's coastal and
estuarine marine waters. The guidance must provide procedures for
coordinating the views and responsibilities of any state agency with
jurisdiction or expertise over the matter under consideration, which
may include federal policy proposals, activities, permits, licenses, or
the extension of funding for activities in or affecting the state's
marine waters. In developing the guidance, the director must consult
with agencies with primary responsibilities for permitting and
management of marine waters and bedlands, including the departments of
natural resources, ecology, transportation, and fish and wildlife, and
the state parks and recreation commission, the Puget Sound partnership,
and the energy facility site evaluation council. The director must
also consult and incorporate relevant information from the regional
activities related to renewable energy siting in marine waters,
including those under the west coast governors' agreement on ocean
health.
(2) The director ((may not commence development of)) must complete
the guidance ((until federal, private, or other nonstate funding is
secured for this activity. The director must adopt the guidance within
one year of securing such funds)) by December 31, 2012.
(3) This section is intended to promote consistency and multiple
agency coordination in developing positions and exercising jurisdiction
in matters involving the siting and operation of renewable energy
facilities and does not diminish or abrogate the authority or
jurisdiction of any state agency over such matters established under
any other law.

--- END ---