BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.16A.090 and 2011 c 320 s 12 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall provide an opportunity for a vehicle
owner to make a voluntary donation as provided in this section when
applying for an initial or renewal vehicle registration.
(2)(a) A vehicle owner who registers a vehicle under this chapter
may donate one dollar or more to the organ and tissue donation
awareness account to promote the donation of organs and tissues under
the uniform anatomical gift act as described in chapter 68.64 RCW. The
donation of one or more dollars is voluntary and may be refused by the
vehicle owner.
(b) The department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent
appointed by the director shall:
(i) Ask a vehicle owner applying for a vehicle registration if the
owner would like to donate one dollar or more;
(ii) Inform a vehicle owner of the option for organ and tissue
donations as required under RCW 46.20.113; and
(iii) Make information booklets or other informational material
available regarding the importance of organ and tissue donations to
vehicle owners.
(c) All reasonable costs associated with the creation of the
donation program created under this section must be paid proportionally
or by another agreement by a participating Washington state organ
procurement organization established for organ and tissue donation
awareness purposes by the Washington state organ procurement
organizations. For the purposes of this section, "reasonable costs"
and "Washington state organ procurement organization" have the same
meaning as in RCW 68.64.010.
(3) The department shall ((collect from)) provide an opportunity
for a vehicle owner who pays a vehicle license fee under RCW
46.17.350(1) (a), (d), (e), (g), (h), (j), (n), (o), or (q) or who
registers a vehicle under RCW 46.16A.455 with a declared gross weight
of ten thousand pounds or less, to make a voluntary donation of five
dollars at the time of initial or renewal registration. ((The donation
may not be collected from any vehicle owner actively opting not to
participate in the donation program. The department shall ensure that
the opt-out donation under this section is clear, visible, and
prominently displayed in both paper and online vehicle registration
renewals. Notification of intent to not participate in the donation
program must be provided annually at the time of vehicle registration
renewal.)) The donation must be deposited in the state parks renewal
and stewardship account established in RCW 79A.05.215 to be used for
the operation and maintenance of state parks.
(4) Beginning with vehicle license fees that are due or will become
due on or after October 1, 2011, a vehicle owner who registers a
vehicle under this chapter may purchase a discover pass for a fee of
thirty dollars, as may be adjusted for inflation under RCW 79A.80.020.
Purchase of the discover pass is voluntary by the vehicle owner. The
discover pass fee must be deposited in the recreation access pass
account created in RCW 79A.80.090. The department, county auditor, or
other agent or subagent appointed by the director is not responsible
for delivering a purchased discover pass to a motor vehicle owner. The
agencies, as defined in RCW 79A.80.010, must deliver the purchased
discover pass to a motor vehicle owner.

--- END ---