BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a health plan issued or renewed on or after the effective
date of this section provides coverage for maternity care or services,
the health plan must also provide a covered person with substantially
equivalent coverage to permit the voluntary termination of a pregnancy.
(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a health plan
subject to subsection (1) of this section may not limit in any way a
woman's access to services related to the voluntary termination of a
pregnancy.
(b)(i) Coverage for the voluntary termination of a pregnancy may be
subject to terms and conditions generally applicable to the health
plan's coverage of maternity care or services, including applicable
cost sharing.
(ii) A health plan is not required to cover abortions that would be
unlawful under RCW 9.02.120.
(3) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to limit in any way
a woman's constitutionally or statutorily protected right to
voluntarily terminate a pregnancy.
(4) This section does not, pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 18054(a)(6),
apply to a multistate plan that does not provide coverage for the
voluntary termination of a pregnancy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 It is the intent of the legislature that
nothing in this act affect the right of objection based on conscience
or religion as set out in RCW 48.43.065 or 70.47.160.

--- END ---