BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.52.069 and 2011 c 365 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) ((As used in this section,)) The definitions in this subsection
apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(a) "Fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire protection
district, city, town, Indian tribe, or port district; and
(b) "Participating fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire
protection district, city, town, Indian tribe, or port district that is
represented on the governing board of a regional fire protection
service authority.
(c) "Taxing district" means a county, emergency medical service
district, city or town, public hospital district, urban emergency
medical service district, regional fire protection service authority,
or fire protection district.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (((10))) (15) of this section,
a taxing district may impose additional regular property tax levies in
an amount equal to fifty cents or less per thousand dollars of the
assessed value of property in the taxing district. The tax shall be
imposed (a) each year for six consecutive years, (b) each year for ten
consecutive years, or (c) permanently. A tax levy under this section
must be specifically authorized by a majority of at least three-fifths
of the registered voters thereof approving a proposition authorizing
the levies submitted at a general or special election, at which
election the number of persons voting "yes" on the proposition shall
constitute three-fifths of a number equal to forty percent of the total
number of voters voting in such taxing district at the last preceding
general election when the number of registered voters voting on the
proposition does not exceed forty percent of the total number of voters
voting in such taxing district in the last preceding general election;
or by a majority of at least three-fifths of the registered voters
thereof voting on the proposition when the number of registered voters
voting on the proposition exceeds forty percent of the total number of
voters voting in such taxing district in the last preceding general
election. Ballot propositions must conform with RCW 29A.36.210. A
taxing district may not submit to the voters at the same election
multiple propositions to impose a levy under this section.
(3) A taxing district imposing a permanent levy under this section
shall provide for separate accounting of expenditures of the revenues
generated by the levy. The taxing district must maintain a statement
of the accounting which must be updated at least every two years and
must be available to the public upon request at no charge.
(4)(a) A taxing district imposing a permanent levy under this
section must provide for a referendum procedure to apply to the
ordinance or resolution imposing the tax. This referendum procedure
must specify that a referendum petition may be filed at any time with
a filing officer, as identified in the ordinance or resolution. Within
ten days, the filing officer must confer with the petitioner concerning
form and style of the petition, issue the petition an identification
number, and secure an accurate, concise, and positive ballot title from
the designated local official. The petitioner has thirty days in which
to secure the signatures of not less than fifteen percent of the
registered voters of the taxing district, as of the last general
election, upon petition forms which contain the ballot title and the
full text of the measure to be referred. The filing officer must
verify the sufficiency of the signatures on the petition and, if
sufficient valid signatures are properly submitted, must certify the
referendum measure to the next election within the taxing district if
one is to be held within one hundred eighty days from the date of
filing of the referendum petition, or at a special election to be
called for that purpose in accordance with RCW 29A.04.330.
(b) The referendum procedure provided in this subsection (4) is
exclusive in all instances for any taxing district imposing the tax
under this section and supersedes the procedures provided under all
other statutory or charter provisions for initiative or referendum
which might otherwise apply.
(5) Any tax imposed under this section may be used only for the
provision of emergency medical care or emergency medical services,
including related personnel costs, training for such personnel, and
related equipment, supplies, vehicles and structures needed for the
provision of emergency medical care or emergency medical services.
(6) If a county levies a tax under this section, no taxing district
within the county may levy a tax under this section, except as provided
otherwise in this section.
(7) If a regional fire protection service authority imposes a tax
under this section, no other taxing district that is a participating
fire protection jurisdiction in the regional fire protection service
authority may levy a tax under this section.
(8) Except as provided otherwise in this subsection (8), no other
taxing district may levy a tax under this section if another taxing
district has levied a tax under this section within its boundaries((:
PROVIDED, That)).
(a) If a county levies less than fifty cents per thousand dollars
of the assessed value of property, then any other taxing district may
levy a tax under this section equal to the difference between the rate
of the levy by the county and fifty cents((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)),
subject to the limitations of this subsection (8)(a). If a taxing
district within a county levies this tax, and the voters of the county
subsequently approve a levying of this tax, then the amount of the
taxing district levy within the county must be reduced, when the
combined levies exceed fifty cents.
(b) Whenever a tax is levied countywide under this subsection (8),
the service must, insofar as is feasible, be provided throughout the
county((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
(i) No countywide levy proposal may be placed on the ballot without
the approval of the legislative authority of each city exceeding fifty
thousand population within the county((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That));
and
(ii) No countywide levy proposal may be placed on the ballot in a
county in which the seat of state government is located, without the
approval of the legislative authority of each fire protection district
or regional fire protection service authority with a population that
exceeds fifty thousand.
(9) This section and RCW 36.32.480 ((shall)) do not prohibit any
city or town from levying an annual excess levy to fund emergency
medical services((: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)).
(10)(a) If a county proposes to impose tax levies under this
section, no other ballot proposition authorizing tax levies under this
section by another taxing district in the county may be placed before
the voters at the same election at which the county ballot proposition
is placed((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
(b) Any taxing district emergency medical service levy that is
limited in duration and that is authorized subsequent to a county
emergency medical service levy that is limited in duration, expires
concurrently with the county emergency medical service levy.
(11) A fire protection district that has annexed an area described
in subsection (((10))) (15) of this section may levy the maximum amount
of tax that would otherwise be allowed, notwithstanding any limitations
in this subsection (((6))) (11).
(((7))) (12) The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 do not apply to the
tax levy authorized in this section.
(((8))) (13) If a ballot proposition approved under subsection (2)
of this section did not impose the maximum allowable levy amount
authorized for the taxing district under this section, any future
increase up to the maximum allowable levy amount must be specifically
authorized by the voters in accordance with subsection (2) of this
section at a general or special election.
(((9))) (14) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the
first levy imposed pursuant to this section following the approval of
such levy by the voters pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(((10))) (15) For purposes of imposing the tax authorized under
this section, the boundary of a county with a population greater than
one million five hundred thousand does not include all of the area of
the county that is located within a city that has a boundary in two
counties, if the locally assessed value of all the property in the area
of the city within the county having a population greater than one
million five hundred thousand is less than two hundred fifty million
dollars.
(((11) For purposes of this section, the following definitions
apply:
(a) "Fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire protection
district, city, town, Indian tribe, or port district; and
(b) "Participating fire protection jurisdiction" means a fire
protection district, city, town, Indian tribe, or port district that is
represented on the governing board of a regional fire protection
service authority.))

--- END ---