BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to charges made
for labor and services rendered by any person in respect to the
building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by
the state or by the United States and which is used or to be used
primarily for foot or vehicular traffic, or to sales of tangible
personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of the
street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, bridge, tunnel,
or trestle during the course of the building, repairing, or improving
of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle.
(2) The buyer must provide the seller with an exemption certificate
in the form and manner prescribed by the department. The seller must
retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's records.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW
to read as follows:
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component
of the street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, bridge,
tunnel, or trestle which is owned by the state or by the United States
and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular
traffic, or to sales of tangible personal property that becomes an
ingredient or component of the street, place, road, highway, easement,
right of way, bridge, tunnel, or trestle during the course of the
building, repairing, or improving of any street, place, road, highway,
easement, right of way, bridge, tunnel, or trestle.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.46.060 and 2002 c 114 s 18 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person, including the department of transportation and any
private entity or entities, may apply for deferral of taxes on the site
preparation for, the construction of, the acquisition of any related
machinery and equipment ((which will)) that becomes a part of, and the
rental of equipment for use in the state route number 16 corridor
improvements project under this chapter. Application ((shall)) must be
made to the department of revenue in a form and manner prescribed by
the department of revenue. The application ((shall)) must contain
information regarding estimated or actual costs, time schedules for
completion and operation, and other information required by the
department of revenue. The department of revenue ((shall)) must
approve the application within sixty days if it meets the requirements
of this section.
(2) The department of revenue ((shall)) must issue a sales and use
tax deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes due
under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on the project.
(3) The department of transportation or a private entity granted a
tax deferral under this section ((shall)) must begin paying the
deferred taxes in the fifth year after the date certified by the
department of revenue as the date on which the project is operationally
complete. The first payment is due on December 31st of the fifth
calendar year after such certified date, with subsequent annual
payments due on December 31st of the following nine years. Each
payment ((shall)) must equal ten percent of the deferred tax. The
project is operationally complete under this section when the
collection of tolls is commenced for the state route number 16
improvements covered by the deferral.
(4) The department of revenue may authorize an accelerated
repayment schedule upon request of the department of transportation or
a private entity granted a deferral under this section.
(5) Interest ((shall)) may not be charged on any taxes deferred
under this section for the period of deferral, although all other
penalties and interest applicable to delinquent excise taxes may be
assessed and imposed for delinquent payments under this section. The
debt for deferred taxes is not extinguished by insolvency or other
failure of the private entity. Transfer of ownership does not
terminate the deferral.
(6) Applications and any other information received by the
department of revenue under this section are not confidential and are
subject to disclosure. Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration
of this section.
(7) Taxes due under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW on the site
preparation for, the construction of, the acquisition of any related
machinery and equipment that will become a part of, and the rental of
equipment for use in the state route number 16 corridor improvements
project for which a deferral has been granted need not be repaid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---