BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds:
(a) Compliance with the federal endangered species act on state
forest lands within small, timber-dependent counties in southwest
Washington is disproportionately burdensome when compared to the total
budget in these counties;
(b) When compared to other forested parts of the state, there is a
relatively small federal land base in these counties, which has
resulted in substantial responsibility for endangered species act-related habitat conservation being borne by state forest lands;
(c) Within these counties, there is limited availability of private
working forest land available for use as a replacement for encumbered
state forest lands;
(d) Currently, county beneficiaries may not receive revenue derived
from state forest lands located in any counties other than their own;
(e) Through the passing of chapter 354, Laws of 2009, the
legislature established the need to relieve the impact of long-term
endangered species-related encumbrances on state forest lands in small,
timber-dependent counties in Washington;
(f) As a result of the implementation of chapter 354, Laws of 2009,
replacement lands are to be purchased to maintain the land base and
productivity of state forest lands in these counties;
(g) There is a need for timely reinvestment in the land base of
state forest lands by replacing those transferred encumbered lands with
new, productive, unencumbered forest land;
(h) The maintenance of a productive state forest land base in these
counties is vital to maintaining a stable, viable natural resource
economy that supports rural communities and creates local natural
resource-based jobs; and
(i) These counties have articulated the need to reestablish
sustainable long-term revenue from state forest lands through the
acquisition of productive timber land beyond what will be funded by the
land value of transferred encumbered lands under chapter 354, Laws of
2009.
(2) It is the intent of the legislature to authorize the board of
natural resources to establish a state forest land pool for small,
timber-dependent southwest Washington counties. This action allows the
board of natural resources, if deemed appropriate after a required
analysis, to use revenue designated for replacement of encumbered state
forest land in one county to be pooled with other counties' land
replacement funds to purchase forest land within any of the
participating counties. This forest land would be managed as state
forest land for the benefit of all counties participating in the pool,
proportionate to their contribution of asset value to the land pool,
according to a set of policy, administrative, and financial structures
developed by the department of natural resources and adopted by the
board of natural resources.

Sec. 2 RCW 79.02.010 and 2011 c 216 s 17 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this title unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Aquatic lands" means all state-owned tidelands, shorelands,
harbor areas, and the beds of navigable waters as defined in RCW
79.105.060 that are administered by the department.
(2) "Board" means the board of natural resources.
(3) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of public lands.
(4) "Community and technical college forest reserve lands" means
lands managed under RCW 79.02.420.
(5) "Community forest trust lands" means those lands acquired and
managed under the provisions of chapter 79.155 RCW.
(6) "Department" means the department of natural resources.
(7)(a) "Forest biomass" means the by-products of: Current forest
management activities; current forest protection treatments prescribed
or permitted under chapter 76.04 RCW; or the by-products of forest
health treatment prescribed or permitted under chapter 76.06 RCW.
(b) "Forest biomass" does not include wood pieces that have been
treated with chemical preservatives such as: Creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; wood from existing old
growth forests; wood required to be left on-site under chapter 76.09
RCW, the state forest practices act; and implementing rules, and other
legal and contractual requirements; or municipal solid waste.
(8) "Improvements" means anything considered a fixture in law
placed upon or attached to lands administered by the department that
has changed the value of the lands or any changes in the previous
condition of the fixtures that changes the value of the lands.
(9) "Land bank lands" means lands acquired under RCW 79.19.020.
(10) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, organization, cooperative, public or municipal
corporation, or agency of a federal, state, or local governmental unit,
however designated.
(11) "Public lands" means lands of the state of Washington
administered by the department including but not limited to state
lands, state forest lands, lands included in a state forest land pool,
and aquatic lands.
(12) "State forest lands" means lands acquired under RCW 79.22.010,
79.22.040, and 79.22.020.
(13) "State lands" includes:
(a) School lands, that is, lands held in trust for the support of
the common schools;
(b) University lands, that is, lands held in trust for university
purposes;
(c) Agricultural college lands, that is, lands held in trust for
the use and support of agricultural colleges;
(d) Scientific school lands, that is, lands held in trust for the
establishment and maintenance of a scientific school;
(e) Normal school lands, that is, lands held in trust for state
normal schools;
(f) Capitol building lands, that is, lands held in trust for the
purpose of erecting public buildings at the state capital for
legislative, executive, and judicial purposes;
(g) Institutional lands, that is, lands held in trust for state
charitable, educational, penal, and reformatory institutions; and
(h) Land bank, escheat, donations, and all other lands, except
aquatic lands, administered by the department that are not devoted to
or reserved for a particular use by law.
(14) "Valuable materials" means any product or material on the
lands, such as forest products, forage or agricultural crops, stone,
gravel, sand, peat, and all other materials of value except: (a)
Mineral, coal, petroleum, and gas as provided for under chapter 79.14
RCW; and (b) forest biomass as provided for under chapter 79.150 RCW.
(15) "State forest land pool" or "land pool" means state forest
lands acquired and managed under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 79.22 RCW
under the subchapter heading "Part 1 General Provisions" to read as
follows:
(1) The board may create a state forest land pool, to be managed in
accordance with this section, if the board determines that creation of
a land pool is in the best interest of the state or affected trust,
based on an analysis prepared by the department under section 4 of this
act. The land pool may not contain more than ten thousand acres of
state forest land at any one time.
(2) A county is eligible to participate in a land pool if the board
determines it:
(a) Has a population of twenty-five thousand or less; and
(b) Has existing state forest lands encumbered with timber harvest
deferrals, associated with wildlife species listed under the federal
endangered species act, more than thirty years in length.
(3) All lands in the land pool are state forest lands and must be
managed in the same manner and with the same responsibilities as other
state forest lands. Proceeds from the state forest land pool must,
except as provided in RCW 79.64.110, be distributed under RCW 79.22.010
and 79.22.040.
(4)(a) A county may participate in the land pool only if it is
eligible, as determined under subsection (2) of this section, and the
board receives a written request to do so by the legislative authority
of that county.
(b) The board shall end any further participation of a county in
the land pool if it receives a written request to do so by the
legislative authority of that county. If the board receives such a
request, that county's interest in the land pool as a beneficiary
remains, but no new contributions of asset value may be made to the
land pool on behalf of the county and no new lands may be purchased in
that county for the land pool.
(5)(a) If a land pool is created by the board, the department and
the participating counties must develop a funding strategy for
acquiring land to include in the land pool.
(b) The department and participating counties may pursue funding
for the transfer of state forest land encumbered by long-term wildlife-related harvest deferrals within the participating counties into status
as a natural resources conservation area under chapter 79.71 RCW, and
use the value of the transferred land to acquire working forest lands
to include in the land pool.
(c) The department and participating counties may pursue other land
acquisition funding strategies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 79.22 RCW
under the subchapter heading "Part 1 General Provisions" to read as
follows:
(1) Upon the request of the board in its consideration of creating
a state forest land pool under section 3 of this act, the department
must conduct an analysis that includes, at a minimum, the following
elements:
(a) An evaluation of how the proposed land pool would benefit the
requesting counties, including revenue predictability and long-term
revenue projections;
(b) The development and proposal of a set of policy,
administrative, and financial structures necessary for the department
to establish the land pool, including a method to determine the
percentage of revenue to be distributed to each county participating in
the land pool that is based on each county's proportionate contribution
of asset value to the land pool;
(c) An estimation of the administrative costs of creating and
maintaining the land pool; and
(d) Any additional information requested by the board.
(2) The department may coordinate its analysis with affected
counties or an association representing the affected counties.

Sec. 5 RCW 79.64.100 and 2003 c 334 s 219 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is created a forest development account in the state
treasury. The state treasurer shall keep an account of all sums
deposited ((therein and)), expended, or withdrawn ((therefrom)) from
the account.
(2)(a) Any sums placed in the forest development account shall be
pledged for the purpose of:
(i) Paying interest and principal on the bonds issued by the
department under RCW 79.22.080 and 79.22.090 and the provisions of this
chapter((,)); and
((for)) (ii) The purchase of land for growing timber.
(b) Any bonds issued shall constitute a first and prior claim and
lien against the account for the payment of principal and interest.
(3) No sums for the ((above)) purposes identified in subsection (2)
of this section shall be withdrawn or paid out of the account except
upon approval of the department.
(4) Appropriations may be made by the legislature from the forest
development account to the department for the purpose of:
(a) Carrying on the activities of the department on state forest
lands((,));
(b) Establishing a state forest land pool under section 3 of this
act and carrying on the activities of the department on lands included
in the land pool;
(c) Carrying on the activities of the department on lands managed
on a sustained yield basis as provided for in RCW 79.10.320((,)); and
((for)) (d) Reimbursement of expenditures that have been made or
may be made from the resource management cost account created in RCW
79.64.020 in the management of state forest lands.

Sec. 6 RCW 79.64.110 and 2009 c 354 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any moneys derived from the lease of state forest lands or from
the sale of valuable materials, oils, gases, coal, minerals, or fossils
from those lands, or the appraised value of these resources when
transferred to a public agency under RCW 79.22.060, except as provided
in RCW 79.22.060(4), must be distributed as follows:
(((1))) (a) For state forest lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040
or by exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.040:
(((a))) (i) The expense incurred by the state for administration,
reforestation, and protection, not to exceed twenty-five percent, which
rate of percentage shall be determined by the board, must be returned
to the forest development account created in ((the state general fund))
RCW 79.64.100.
(((b))) (ii) Any balance remaining must be paid to the county in
which the land is located or, for counties participating in a land pool
created under section 3 of this act, to each participating county
proportionate to its contribution of asset value to the land pool as
determined by the board. Payments made under this subsection are to be
paid, distributed, and prorated, except as otherwise provided in this
section, to the various funds in the same manner as general taxes are
paid and distributed during the year of payment.
(((c))) (iii) Any balance remaining, paid to a county with a
population of less than sixteen thousand, must first be applied to the
reduction of any indebtedness existing in the current expense fund of
the county during the year of payment.
(((d))) (iv) With regard to moneys remaining under this subsection
(1)(a), within seven working days of receipt of these moneys, the
department shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be
distributed to the counties. The state treasurer shall distribute
funds to the counties four times per month, with no more than ten days
between each payment date.
(((2))) (b) For state forest lands acquired through RCW 79.22.010
or by exchange for lands acquired through RCW 79.22.010, except as
provided in RCW 79.64.120:
(((a))) (i) Fifty percent shall be placed in the forest development
account.
(((b))) (ii) Fifty percent shall be prorated and distributed to the
state general fund, to be dedicated for the benefit of the public
schools, ((and)) to the county in which the land is located or, for
counties participating in a land pool created under section 3 of this
act, to each participating county proportionate to its contribution of
asset value to the land pool as determined by the board, and according
to the relative proportions of tax levies of all taxing districts in
the county. The portion to be distributed to the state general fund
shall be based on the regular school levy rate under RCW 84.52.065 and
the levy rate for any maintenance and operation special school levies.
With regard to the portion to be distributed to the counties, the
department shall certify to the state treasurer the amounts to be
distributed within seven working days of receipt of the money. The
state treasurer shall distribute funds to the counties four times per
month, with no more than ten days between each payment date. The money
distributed to the county must be paid, distributed, and prorated to
the various other funds in the same manner as general taxes are paid
and distributed during the year of payment.
(((3))) (2) A school district may transfer amounts deposited in its
debt service fund pursuant to this section into its capital projects
fund as authorized in RCW 28A.320.330.

Sec. 7 RCW 79.22.060 and 2009 c 354 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) With the approval of the board, the department may directly
transfer or dispose of state forest lands without public auction, if
the lands:
(a) Consist of ten contiguous acres or less;
(b) Have a value of twenty-five thousand dollars or less; or
(c) Are located in a county with a population of twenty-five
thousand or less and are encumbered with timber harvest deferrals,
associated with wildlife species listed under the federal endangered
species act, greater than thirty years in length.
(2) Disposal under this section may only occur in the following
circumstances:
(a) Transfers in lieu of condemnation;
(b) Transfers to resolve trespass and property ownership disputes;
or
(c) In counties with a population of twenty-five thousand or less,
transfers to public agencies.
(3) Real property to be transferred or disposed of under this
section shall be transferred or disposed of only after appraisal and
for at least fair market value, and only if the transaction is in the
best interest of the state or affected trust. Valuable materials
attached to lands transferred to public agencies under subsection
(2)(c) of this section must be appraised at the fair market value
without consideration of management or regulatory encumbrances
associated with wildlife species listed under the federal endangered
species act.
(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the proceeds
from real property transferred or disposed of under this section shall
be deposited into the park land trust revolving fund and be solely used
to buy replacement land within the same county as the property
transferred or disposed.
(b) The proceeds from real property transferred or disposed of
under subsections (1)(c) and (2)(c) of this section for the purpose of
participating in the state forest land pool created under section 3 of
this act must be deposited into the park land trust revolving fund and
used to buy replacement forest land for the benefit of that county as
provided in RCW 79.64.110 and located within any county participating
in the land pool.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, in counties
with a population of twenty-five thousand or less, the portion of the
proceeds associated with valuable materials on ((the transferred))
state forest land transferred under subsections (1)(c) and (2)(c) of
this section must be distributed as provided in RCW 79.64.110. If
requested in writing by the legislative authority of a county
participating in the state forest land pool created under section 3 of
this act, the portion of the proceeds associated with valuable
materials on state forest land transferred under subsections (1)(c) and
(2)(c) of this section must be deposited in the park land trust
revolving fund and used to buy replacement forest land for the benefit
of that county as provided in RCW 79.64.110 and located within any
county participating in the land pool.

Sec. 8 RCW 43.30.385 and 2011 c 320 s 21 and 2011 c 216 s 14 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The park land trust revolving fund is to be utilized by the
department for the purpose of acquiring real property, including all
reasonable costs associated with these acquisitions, as a replacement
for the property transferred to the state parks and recreation
commission, as directed by the legislature in order to maintain the
land base of the affected trusts or under RCW 79.22.060 and to receive
voluntary contributions for the purpose of operating and maintaining
public use and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the
department.
(2) In addition to the other purposes identified in this section,
the park land trust revolving fund may be utilized by the department to
hold funding for future acquisition of lands for the community forest
trust program from willing sellers under RCW 79.155.040.
(3)(a) Proceeds from transfers of real property to the state parks
and recreation commission or other proceeds identified from transfers
of real property as directed by the legislature shall be deposited in
the park land trust revolving fund.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the proceeds
from real property transferred or disposed under RCW 79.22.060 must be
used solely to purchase replacement forest land, that must be actively
managed as a working forest, within the same county as the property
transferred or disposed. If the real property was transferred under
RCW 79.22.060 (1)(c) and (2)(c) from within a county participating in
the state forest land pool created under section 3 of this act,
replacement forest land may be located within any county participating
in the land pool.
(c) Disbursement from the park land trust revolving fund to acquire
replacement property and for operating and maintaining public use and
recreation facilities shall be on the authorization of the department.
(d) The proceeds from the recreation access pass account created in
RCW 79A.80.090 must be solely used for the purpose of operating and
maintaining public use and recreation facilities, including trails,
managed by the department.
(4) In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue
control, the park land trust revolving fund is subject in all respects
to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit
expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.
(5) The department is authorized to solicit and receive voluntary
contributions for the purpose of operating and maintaining public use
and recreation facilities, including trails, managed by the department.
The department may seek voluntary contributions from individuals and
organizations for this purpose. Voluntary contributions will be
deposited into the park land trust revolving fund and used solely for
the purpose of public use and recreation facilities operations and
maintenance. Voluntary contributions are not considered a fee for use
of these facilities.

--- END ---