BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that effective
water resource management and a stable livestock industry are vital to
the economic and environmental well-being of the state. The livestock
industry is an important part of our state's economy and an important
part of many communities in our state, and this industry should be
treated fairly as with all other sectors of the economy seeking an
assured water supply for its activities. The legislature further finds
that achievement of these goals is hindered by uncertainty surrounding
the exemption from water right permit requirements for withdrawals of
public groundwater for "stock watering purposes." In a six to three
decision, the supreme court held in Five Corners Family Farmers v.
State, No. 84632–4 (2011) that "under a plain reading of RCW 90.44.050,
groundwater withdrawn without a permit for stock-watering purposes is
not limited to 5,000 gallons per day." In the dissent, the minority
held that "the stock-watering permit exemption in RCW 90.44.050 is
ambiguous, and the legislature intended to limit the exemption to 5,000
gallons of water per day." The minority concluded that "it is highly
unlikely that the legislature contemplated in 1945 that the stock-watering exemption would apply to an industrial feedlot using between
450,000 and 600,000 gallons of water per day." The majority opinion
stated that, "it may be that, at the time of enactment of RCW
90.44.050, the legislature believed that stock-watering was
sufficiently important, and its impact sufficiently slight, that a
balancing of interests categorically justified groundwater withdrawals
without consideration of other factors." The court further stated that
"to the extent this reasoning no longer holds true, it is for the
legislature, not this court, to amend the statute." With that
direction from the supreme court, the legislature finds that
reconvening the stock water working group established in Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 1244, chapter 564, Laws of 2009 is necessary.
(2)(a) The department of ecology shall convene a stock water
working group that includes:
(i) Four members of the house of representatives, two from each of
the two largest political caucuses, appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives;
(ii) Four members of the senate, two from each of the two largest
political caucuses, appointed by the president of the senate;
(iii) Four members representing agricultural interests, one of
which must represent small agricultural interests;
(iv) Three members representing environmental interests;
(v) The attorney general or the attorney general's designee;
(vi) The director of the department of ecology or the director's
designee; and
(vii) The director of the department of agriculture or the
director's designee.
(b) Affected federally recognized tribes shall be invited to send
participants.
(c) The stock water working group shall choose its chair from among
its legislative membership.
(d) The stock water working group shall review issues surrounding
the use of permit-exempt wells for stock-watering purposes and develop
recommendations for legislative action.
(e) The stock water working group shall meet periodically and
report its findings and recommendations for legislative action to the
legislature, consistent with RCW 43.01.036, by December 31, 2012.
(3) This section expires December 31, 2012.

--- END ---