BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.04.214 and 2008 c 273 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(((a) Until June 30, 2011,)) "Newspaper" means:
(((i))) (a) A publication issued regularly at stated intervals at
least twice a month and printed on newsprint in tabloid or broadsheet
format folded loosely together without stapling, glue, or any other
binding of any kind, including any supplement of a printed newspaper;
and
(((ii))) (b) An electronic version of a printed newspaper that:
(((A))) (i) Shares content with the printed newspaper; and
(((B))) (ii) Is prominently identified by the same name as the
printed newspaper or otherwise conspicuously indicates that it is a
complement to the printed newspaper.
(((b))) (2) For purposes of this section((,)):
(a) "Local interest web site" means an internet web site that is
normally updated more than once a day and which is substantially
dedicated to local interests tailored to a general circulation area of
a county or smaller.
(b) "Supplement" means a printed publication, including a magazine
or advertising section, that is:
(i) Labeled and identified as part of the printed newspaper; and
(ii) Circulated or distributed:
(A) As an insert or attachment to the printed newspaper; or
(B) Separate and apart from the printed newspaper so long as the
distribution is within the general circulation area of the newspaper.
(((2) Beginning July 1, 2011, "newspaper" means a publication
issued regularly at stated intervals at least twice a month and printed
on newsprint in tabloid or broadsheet format folded loosely together
without stapling, glue, or any other binding of any kind, including any
supplement of a printed newspaper as defined in subsection (1)(b) of
this section.))

Sec. 2 RCW 82.04.260 and 2011 c 2 s 203 (Initiative Measure No.
1107) are each amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
manufacturing:
(a) Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into
soybean oil, canola into canola oil, canola meal, or canola by-products, or sunflower seeds into sunflower oil; as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of
the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola meal, or canola by-product
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent;
(b) Beginning July 1, 2012, seafood products that remain in a raw,
raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the manufacturing
by that person; or selling manufactured seafood products that remain in
a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the completion of the
manufacturing, to purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of
business the goods out of this state; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales, multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(c) Beginning July 1, 2012, dairy products that as of September 20,
2001, are identified in 21 C.F.R., chapter 1, parts 131, 133, and 135,
including by-products from the manufacturing of the dairy products such
as whey and casein; or selling the same to purchasers who transport in
the ordinary course of business the goods out of state; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the value of the products
manufactured or the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied
by the rate of 0.138 percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records
for the period required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods
were transported by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business
out of this state;
(d) Beginning July 1, 2012, fruits or vegetables by canning,
preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits or
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fruits or vegetables manufactured
by the seller by canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or
dehydrating fresh fruits or vegetables and sold to purchasers who
transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of this
state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business is equal to the value of the products manufactured or the
gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent. Sellers must keep and preserve records for the period
required by RCW 82.32.070 establishing that the goods were transported
by the purchaser in the ordinary course of business out of this state;
(e) Until July 1, 2009, alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel
feedstock, as those terms are defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of alcohol fuel, biodiesel fuel, or biodiesel feedstock
manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and
(f) Wood biomass fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135; as to such
persons the amount of tax with respect to the business is equal to the
value of wood biomass fuel manufactured, multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.
(2) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
splitting or processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of
tax with respect to such business is equal to the value of the peas
split or processed, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(3) Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association
engaging within this state in research and development, as to such
corporations and associations, the amount of tax with respect to such
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.
(4) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
slaughtering, breaking and/or processing perishable meat products
and/or selling the same at wholesale only and not at retail; as to such
persons the tax imposed is equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such sales multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.
(5) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
acting as a travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to such activities is equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275
percent.
(6) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an
international steamship agent, international customs house broker,
international freight forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in
foreign commerce, and/or international air cargo agent; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to only international
activities is equal to the gross income derived from such activities
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.
(7) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the movement of
goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as
to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business is
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.275 percent. Persons subject to taxation under this
subsection are exempt from payment of taxes imposed by chapter 82.16
RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation under this
subsection. Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent to the
conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or
transportation nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or
from vessels or barges, passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or
similar structure; cargo may be moved to a warehouse or similar holding
or storage yard or area to await further movement in import or export
or may move to a consolidation freight station and be stuffed,
unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise segregated or
aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation for
delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this
definition are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of
cargo to a convenient place of delivery to the consignee or a
convenient place for further movement to export mode; documentation
services in connection with the receipt, delivery, checking, care,
custody and control of cargo required in the transfer of cargo;
imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited
to plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers,
trailers, and other refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship
hatch covers.
(8) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of
disposing of low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such
persons the amount of the tax with respect to such business is equal to
the gross income of the business, excluding any fees imposed under
chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by the rate of 3.3 percent.
If the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities
both within and without this state, the gross income attributable to
this state must be determined in accordance with the methods of
apportionment required under RCW 82.04.460.
(9) Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance
producer or title insurance agent licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW or
a surplus line broker licensed under chapter 48.15 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities
is equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of
0.484 percent.
(10) Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a
nonprofit corporation or by the state or any of its political
subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to
such activities is equal to the gross income of the business multiplied
by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and 1.5 percent
thereafter.
(11)(a) Beginning October 1, 2005, upon every person engaging
within this state in the business of manufacturing commercial
airplanes, or components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail
or wholesale, of commercial airplanes or components of such airplanes,
manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the amount of tax with
respect to such business is, in the case of manufacturers, equal to the
value of the product manufactured and the gross proceeds of sales of
the product manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal
to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of:
(i) 0.4235 percent from October 1, 2005, through June 30, 2007; and
(ii) 0.2904 percent beginning July 1, 2007.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2008, upon every person who is not eligible
to report under the provisions of (a) of this subsection (11) and is
engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing tooling
specifically designed for use in manufacturing commercial airplanes or
components of such airplanes, or making sales, at retail or wholesale,
of such tooling manufactured by the seller, as to such persons the
amount of tax with respect to such business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of the product manufactured and the
gross proceeds of sales of the product manufactured, or in the case of
processors for hire, be equal to the gross income of the business,
multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection (11), "commercial airplane"
and "component" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.32.550.
(d) In addition to all other requirements under this title, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (11)
must file a complete annual report with the department under RCW
82.32.534.
(e) This subsection (11) does not apply on and after July 1, 2024.
(12)(a) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of extracting timber or extracting for hire
timber; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to the
business is, in the case of extractors, equal to the value of products,
including by-products, extracted, or in the case of extractors for
hire, equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate
of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904
percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30, 2024.
(b) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of manufacturing or processing for hire: (i)
Timber into timber products or wood products; or (ii) timber products
into other timber products or wood products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is, in the case of
manufacturers, equal to the value of products, including by-products,
manufactured, or in the case of processors for hire, equal to the gross
income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from
July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1,
2007, through June 30, 2024.
(c) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling at wholesale: (i) Timber extracted by
that person; (ii) timber products manufactured by that person from
timber or other timber products; or (iii) wood products manufactured by
that person from timber or timber products; as to such persons the
amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the gross
proceeds of sales of the timber, timber products, or wood products
multiplied by the rate of 0.4235 percent from July 1, 2006, through
June 30, 2007, and 0.2904 percent from July 1, 2007, through June 30,
2024.
(d) Until July 1, 2024, upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of selling standing timber; as to such persons
the amount of the tax with respect to the business is equal to the
gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 0.2904 percent.
For purposes of this subsection (12)(d), "selling standing timber"
means the sale of timber apart from the land, where the buyer is
required to sever the timber within thirty months from the date of the
original contract, regardless of the method of payment for the timber
and whether title to the timber transfers before, upon, or after
severance.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions
apply:
(i) "Biocomposite surface products" means surface material products
containing, by weight or volume, more than fifty percent recycled paper
and that also use nonpetroleum-based phenolic resin as a bonding agent.
(ii) "Paper and paper products" means products made of interwoven
cellulosic fibers held together largely by hydrogen bonding. "Paper
and paper products" includes newsprint; office, printing, fine, and
pressure-sensitive papers; paper napkins, towels, and toilet tissue;
kraft bag, construction, and other kraft industrial papers; paperboard,
liquid packaging containers, containerboard, corrugated, and solid-fiber containers including linerboard and corrugated medium; and
related types of cellulosic products containing primarily, by weight or
volume, cellulosic materials. "Paper and paper products" does not
include books, newspapers, magazines, periodicals, and other printed
publications, advertising materials, calendars, and similar types of
printed materials.
(iii) "Recycled paper" means paper and paper products having fifty
percent or more of their fiber content that comes from postconsumer
waste. For purposes of this subsection (12)(e)(iii), "postconsumer
waste" means a finished material that would normally be disposed of as
solid waste, having completed its life cycle as a consumer item.
(iv) "Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land. "Timber" does not include Christmas trees that
are cultivated by agricultural methods or short-rotation hardwoods as
defined in RCW 84.33.035.
(v) "Timber products" means:
(A) Logs, wood chips, sawdust, wood waste, and similar products
obtained wholly from the processing of timber, short-rotation hardwoods
as defined in RCW 84.33.035, or both;
(B) Pulp, including market pulp and pulp derived from recovered
paper or paper products; and
(C) Recycled paper, but only when used in the manufacture of
biocomposite surface products.
(vi) "Wood products" means paper and paper products; dimensional
lumber; engineered wood products such as particleboard, oriented strand
board, medium density fiberboard, and plywood; wood doors; wood
windows; and biocomposite surface products.
(f) Except for small harvesters as defined in RCW 84.33.035, a
person reporting under the tax rate provided in this subsection (12)
must file a complete annual survey with the department under RCW
82.32.585.
(13) Upon every person engaging within this state in inspecting,
testing, labeling, and storing canned salmon owned by another person,
as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such activities
is equal to the gross income derived from such activities multiplied by
the rate of 0.484 percent.
(14)(a) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of printing a newspaper, publishing a newspaper, ((or both))
publishing a local interest web site, or a combination of these
activities, the amount of tax on such business is equal to the gross
income of the business multiplied by the rate of ((0.2904)) 0.403
percent through June 30, 2013, and beginning July 1, 2013, by the rate
of 0.383 percent.
(b) A person reporting under the tax rate provided in this
subsection (14) must file a complete annual report with the department
under RCW 82.32.534.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---