BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the single
largest school-based factor affecting student academic success is the
quality of instruction. Establishing policies that support and advance
educator performance based on objective and rigorous evaluations will
help assure that every student has the opportunity for academic
success.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.405.100 and 2010 c 235 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
superintendent of public instruction shall establish and may amend from
time to time minimum criteria for the evaluation of the professional
performance capabilities and development of certificated classroom
teachers and certificated support personnel. For classroom teachers
the criteria shall be developed in the following categories:
Instructional skill; classroom management, professional preparation and
scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; the handling of
student discipline and attendant problems; and interest in teaching
pupils and knowledge of subject matter.
(b) Every board of directors shall, in accordance with procedure
provided in RCW 41.59.010 through 41.59.170, 41.59.910, and 41.59.920,
establish evaluative criteria and procedures for all certificated
classroom teachers and certificated support personnel. The evaluative
criteria must contain as a minimum the criteria established by the
superintendent of public instruction pursuant to this section and must
be prepared within six months following adoption of the superintendent
of public instruction's minimum criteria. The district must certify to
the superintendent of public instruction that evaluative criteria have
been so prepared by the district.
(2)(a) Pursuant to the implementation schedule established in
subsection (7)(b) of this section, every board of directors shall, in
accordance with procedures provided in RCW 41.59.010 through 41.59.170,
41.59.910, and 41.59.920, establish revised evaluative criteria and a
four-level rating system for all certificated classroom teachers.
(b) The minimum criteria shall include: (i) Centering instruction
on high expectations for student achievement; (ii) demonstrating
effective teaching practices; (iii) recognizing individual student
learning needs and developing strategies to address those needs; (iv)
providing clear and intentional focus on subject matter content and
curriculum; (v) fostering and managing a safe, positive learning
environment; (vi) using multiple student data elements to modify
instruction and improve student learning; (vii) communicating and
collaborating with parents and (([the])) the school community; and
(viii) exhibiting collaborative and collegial practices focused on
improving instructional practice and student learning.
(c) The four-level rating system used to evaluate the certificated
classroom teacher must describe performance along a continuum that
indicates the extent to which the criteria have been met or exceeded.
((When)) Student growth data((, if available and)) that is relevant to
the teacher and subject matter((, is referenced)) must be a significant
factor in the evaluation process ((it)) and must be based on multiple
measures that can include classroom-based, school-based, district-
based, and state-based tools. Student input may also be included in
the evaluation process. As used in this subsection, "student growth"
means the change in student achievement between two points in time.
(d) The superintendent of public instruction shall establish common
components of the teacher evaluation systems that must be used by
school districts beginning in the 2013-14 school year in order to
assure fairness in the conduct of evaluations and comparability of
evaluation results across the state.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, it
shall be the responsibility of a principal or his or her designee to
evaluate all certificated personnel in his or her school. During each
school year all classroom teachers and certificated support personnel
shall be observed for the purposes of evaluation at least twice in the
performance of their assigned duties. Total observation time for each
employee for each school year shall be not less than sixty minutes. An
employee in the third year of provisional status as defined in RCW
28A.405.220 shall be observed at least three times in the performance
of his or her duties and the total observation time for the school year
shall not be less than ninety minutes. Following each observation, or
series of observations, the principal or other evaluator shall promptly
document the results of the observation in writing, and shall provide
the employee with a copy thereof within three days after such report is
prepared. New employees shall be observed at least once for a total
observation time of thirty minutes during the first ninety calendar
days of their employment period.
(b) As used in this subsection and subsection (4) of this section,
"employees" means classroom teachers and certificated support
personnel.
(4)(a) At any time after October 15th, an employee whose work is
not judged satisfactory based on district evaluation criteria shall be
notified in writing of the specific areas of deficiencies along with a
reasonable program for improvement. During the period of probation,
the employee may not be transferred from the supervision of the
original evaluator. Improvement of performance or probable cause for
nonrenewal must occur and be documented by the original evaluator
before any consideration of a request for transfer or reassignment as
contemplated by either the individual or the school district. A
probationary period of sixty school days shall be established. The
establishment of a probationary period does not adversely affect the
contract status of an employee within the meaning of RCW 28A.405.300.
The purpose of the probationary period is to give the employee
opportunity to demonstrate improvements in his or her areas of
deficiency. The establishment of the probationary period and the
giving of the notice to the employee of deficiency shall be by the
school district superintendent and need not be submitted to the board
of directors for approval. During the probationary period the
evaluator shall meet with the employee at least twice monthly to
supervise and make a written evaluation of the progress, if any, made
by the employee. The evaluator may authorize one additional
certificated employee to evaluate the probationer and to aid the
employee in improving his or her areas of deficiency; such additional
certificated employee shall be immune from any civil liability that
might otherwise be incurred or imposed with regard to the good faith
performance of such evaluation. The probationer may be removed from
probation if he or she has demonstrated improvement to the satisfaction
of the principal in those areas specifically detailed in his or her
initial notice of deficiency and subsequently detailed in his or her
improvement program. Lack of necessary improvement during the
established probationary period, as specifically documented in writing
with notification to the probationer and shall constitute grounds for
a finding of probable cause under RCW 28A.405.300 or 28A.405.210.
(b) Immediately following the completion of a probationary period
that does not produce performance changes detailed in the initial
notice of deficiencies and improvement program, the employee may be
removed from his or her assignment and placed into an alternative
assignment for the remainder of the school year. This reassignment may
not displace another employee nor may it adversely affect the
probationary employee's compensation or benefits for the remainder of
the employee's contract year. If such reassignment is not possible,
the district may, at its option, place the employee on paid leave for
the balance of the contract term. Effective September 1, 2014, an
employee who received a personnel evaluation identified as
unsatisfactory or received the lowest evaluation rating under the four-level rating system in the previous year and receives an unsatisfactory
or lowest evaluation rating as a result of not producing performance
changes detailed in the initial notice of deficiencies and improvement
program shall immediately be considered a provisional employee in
accordance with RCW 28A.405.220.
(5) Every board of directors shall establish evaluative criteria
and procedures for all superintendents, principals, and other
administrators. It shall be the responsibility of the district
superintendent or his or her designee to evaluate all administrators.
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, such evaluation
shall be based on the administrative position job description. Such
criteria, when applicable, shall include at least the following
categories: Knowledge of, experience in, and training in recognizing
good professional performance, capabilities and development; school
administration and management; school finance; professional preparation
and scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; interest in
pupils, employees, patrons and subjects taught in school; leadership;
and ability and performance of evaluation of school personnel.
(6)(a) Pursuant to the implementation schedule established by
subsection (7)(b) of this section, every board of directors shall
establish revised evaluative criteria and a four-level rating system
for principals.
(b) The minimum criteria shall include: (i) Creating a school
culture that promotes the ongoing improvement of learning and teaching
for students and staff; (ii) demonstrating commitment to closing the
achievement gap; (iii) providing for school safety; (iv) leading the
development, implementation, and evaluation of a data-driven plan for
increasing student achievement, including the use of multiple student
data elements; (v) assisting instructional staff with alignment of
curriculum, instruction, and assessment with state and local district
learning goals; (vi) monitoring, assisting, and evaluating effective
instruction and assessment practices; (vii) managing both staff and
fiscal resources to support student achievement and legal
responsibilities; and (viii) partnering with the school community to
promote student learning.
(c) The four-level rating system used to evaluate the principal
must describe performance along a continuum that indicates the extent
to which the criteria have been met or exceeded. ((When available,))
Student growth data ((that is referenced)) must be a significant factor
in the evaluation process and must be based on multiple measures that
can include classroom-based, school-based, district-based, and state-based tools. Input from building staff may also be included in the
evaluation process. As used in this subsection, "student growth" means
the change in student achievement between two points in time.
(d) The superintendent of public instruction shall establish common
components of the principal evaluation systems that must be used by
school districts beginning in the 2013-14 school year in order to
assure fairness in the conduct of evaluations and comparability of
evaluation results across the state.
(7)(a) The superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration
with state associations representing teachers, principals,
administrators, and parents, shall create models for implementing the
evaluation system criteria, student growth tools, professional
development programs, and evaluator training for certificated classroom
teachers and principals. Human resources specialists, professional
development experts, and assessment experts must also be consulted.
Due to the diversity of teaching assignments and the many developmental
levels of students, classroom teachers and principals must be
prominently represented in this work. The models must be available for
use in the 2011-12 school year.
(b) A new certificated classroom teacher evaluation system that
implements the provisions of subsection (2) of this section and a new
principal evaluation system that implements the provisions of
subsection (6) of this section shall be phased-in beginning with the
2010-11 school year by districts identified in (c) of this subsection
and implemented in all school districts beginning with the 2013-14
school year.
(c) A set of school districts shall be selected by the
superintendent of public instruction to participate in a collaborative
process resulting in the development and piloting of new certificated
classroom teacher and principal evaluation systems during the 2010-11
and 2011-12 school years. These school districts must be selected
based on: (i) The agreement of the local associations representing
classroom teachers and principals to collaborate with the district in
this developmental work and (ii) the agreement to participate in the
full range of development and implementation activities, including:
Development of rubrics for the evaluation criteria and ratings in
subsections (2) and (6) of this section; identification of or
development of appropriate multiple measures of student growth in
subsections (2) and (6) of this section; development of appropriate
evaluation system forms; participation in professional development for
principals and classroom teachers regarding the content of the new
evaluation system; participation in evaluator training; and
participation in activities to evaluate the effectiveness of the new
systems and support programs. The school districts must submit to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction data that is used in
evaluations and all district-collected student achievement, aptitude,
and growth data regardless of whether the data is used in evaluations.
If the data is not available electronically, the district may submit it
in nonelectronic form. The superintendent of public instruction must
analyze the districts' use of student data in evaluations, including
examining the extent that student data is not used or is underutilized.
The superintendent of public instruction must also consult with
participating districts and stakeholders, recommend appropriate
changes, and address statewide implementation issues. The
superintendent of public instruction shall report evaluation system
implementation status, evaluation data, and recommendations to
appropriate committees of the legislature and governor by July 1, 2011,
and at the conclusion of the development phase by July 1, 2012. In the
July 1, 2011, report, the superintendent shall include recommendations
for whether a single statewide evaluation model should be adopted,
whether modified versions developed by school districts should be
subject to state approval, and what the criteria would be for
determining if a school district's evaluation model meets or exceeds a
statewide model. The report shall also identify challenges posed by
requiring a state approval process.
(8) Each certificated classroom teacher and certificated support
personnel shall have the opportunity for confidential conferences with
his or her immediate supervisor on no less than two occasions in each
school year. Such confidential conference shall have as its sole
purpose the aiding of the administrator in his or her assessment of the
employee's professional performance.
(9) The failure of any evaluator to evaluate or supervise or cause
the evaluation or supervision of certificated classroom teachers and
certificated support personnel or administrators in accordance with
this section, as now or hereafter amended, when it is his or her
specific assigned or delegated responsibility to do so, shall be
sufficient cause for the nonrenewal of any such evaluator's contract
under RCW 28A.405.210, or the discharge of such evaluator under RCW
28A.405.300.
(10) After a certificated classroom teacher or certificated support
personnel has four years of satisfactory evaluations under subsection
(1) of this section or has received one of the two top ratings for four
years under subsection (2) of this section, a school district may use
a short form of evaluation, a locally bargained evaluation emphasizing
professional growth, an evaluation under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, or any combination thereof. The short form of evaluation
shall include either a thirty minute observation during the school year
with a written summary or a final annual written evaluation based on
the criteria in subsection (1) or (2) of this section and based on at
least two observation periods during the school year totaling at least
sixty minutes without a written summary of such observations being
prepared. A locally bargained short-form evaluation emphasizing
professional growth must provide that the professional growth activity
conducted by the certificated classroom teacher be specifically linked
to one or more of the certificated classroom teacher evaluation
criteria. However, the evaluation process set forth in subsection (1)
or (2) of this section shall be followed at least once every three
years unless this time is extended by a local school district under the
bargaining process set forth in chapter 41.59 RCW. The employee or
evaluator may require that the evaluation process set forth in
subsection (1) or (2) of this section be conducted in any given school
year. No evaluation other than the evaluation authorized under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section may be used as a basis for
determining that an employee's work is not satisfactory under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section or as probable cause for the
nonrenewal of an employee's contract under RCW 28A.405.210 unless an
evaluation process developed under chapter 41.59 RCW determines
otherwise.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.405.140 and 1993 c 336 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) After an evaluation conducted pursuant to RCW 28A.405.100, the
principal or the evaluator may require the teacher to take in-service
training provided by the district in the area of teaching skills
needing improvement, and may require the teacher to have a mentor for
purposes of achieving such improvement.
(2) Each teacher and principal must have an individual professional
growth plan that is informed by the results of the evaluation conducted
pursuant to RCW 28A.405.100 and designed to assist the teacher or
principal in increasing skills and competencies identified in the
evaluation.
(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction and
educational service districts shall act as clearinghouses for
identifying and publicizing professional development opportunities for
teachers and principals to access in meeting their professional growth
plans, including identifying opportunities that are aligned with the
performance evaluation criteria. To the extent funds are available,
the office and the educational service districts may offer professional
development opportunities, including on a fee-for-service basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) School board policies or collective bargaining agreements that
specify procedures and criteria for identifying principals or
certificated classroom teachers within an endorsement area to receive
a notice of nonrenewal of contract due to enrollment decline or loss of
revenue must contain provisions that require consideration of the
results of performance evaluations under RCW 28A.405.100 before other
factors such as seniority may be considered.
(2) School board policies or collective bargaining agreements that
specify recall rights for principals or certificated classroom teachers
must recall staff in the reverse order that contracts were nonrenewed
under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) School board policies or collective bargaining agreements
regarding school assignment, transfer, and placement decisions for
principals and certificated classroom teachers must contain provisions
that require consideration of the results of performance evaluations
under RCW 28A.405.100 before other factors such as seniority may be
considered and must incorporate analysis by the district of the best
match between the needs of the assignment and the skills of the
principal or teacher. The policies or agreements must provide a
process for making school assignment, transfer, and placement decisions
for certificated classroom teachers that includes the mutual agreement
of the superintendent, the principal, and the teacher unless there are
exceptional circumstances.
(4) The provisions of this section apply to school board policies
or collective bargaining agreements no later than September 1, 2014.
However, nothing in this section precludes a policy or agreement from
being consistent with this section before September 1, 2014.
(5) Nothing in this section may be construed as altering the terms,
conditions, or practices contained in any collective bargaining
agreement or employment contract in effect on the effective date of
this section until the expiration date of the agreement or contract.
All collective bargaining agreements and other contracts entered into,
extended, or amended after the effective date of this section must be
consistent with this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.405.220 and 2010 c 235 s 203 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28A.405.210, every
person employed by a school district in a teaching or other
nonsupervisory certificated position shall be subject to nonrenewal of
employment contract as provided in this section ((during the first
three years of employment by such district, unless: (a) The employee
has previously completed at least two years of certificated employment
in another school district in the state of Washington, in which case
the employee shall be subject to nonrenewal of employment contract
pursuant to this section during the first year of employment with the
new district; or (b) the school district superintendent may make a
determination to remove an employee from provisional status if the
employee has received one of the top two evaluation ratings during the
second year of employment by the district.)):
(i) If the employee is a teacher, until the employee has received
one of the top two evaluation ratings under the four-level rating
system in RCW 28A.405.100 for three years within a five-year period,
excluding years of nonemployment or leaves of absence but including
years of employment in more than one school district;
(ii) If the employee is other than a teacher, until the employee
has received a satisfactory rating for three years within a five-year
period, excluding years of nonemployment or leaves of absence but
including years of employment in more than one school district;
(iii) During the first year of employment with a new district if
the employee has previously achieved nonprovisional status in another
school district in the state of Washington; and
(iv) Immediately after receiving a second consecutive annual
personnel evaluation identified as unsatisfactory or with the lowest
evaluation rating under the four-level rating system in RCW
28A.405.100.
(b) Employees as defined in this section shall hereinafter be
referred to as "provisional employees."
(2) In the event the superintendent of the school district
determines that the employment contract of any provisional employee
should not be renewed by the district for the next ensuing term such
provisional employee shall be notified thereof in writing on or before
May 15th preceding the commencement of such school term, or if the
omnibus appropriations act has not passed the legislature by May 15th,
then notification shall be no later than June 15th, which notification
shall state the reason or reasons for such determination. Such notice
shall be served upon the provisional employee personally, or by
certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the
place of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and
discretion then resident therein. The determination of the
superintendent shall be subject to the evaluation requirements of RCW
28A.405.100.
(3) Every such provisional employee so notified, at his or her
request made in writing and filed with the superintendent of the
district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be given
the opportunity to meet informally with the superintendent for the
purpose of requesting the superintendent to reconsider his or her
decision. Such meeting shall be held no later than ten days following
the receipt of such request, and the provisional employee shall be
given written notice of the date, time and place of meeting at least
three days prior thereto. At such meeting the provisional employee
shall be given the opportunity to refute any facts upon which the
superintendent's determination was based and to make any argument in
support of his or her request for reconsideration.
(4) Within ten days following the meeting with the provisional
employee, the superintendent shall either reinstate the provisional
employee or shall submit to the school district board of directors for
consideration at its next regular meeting a written report recommending
that the employment contract of the provisional employee be nonrenewed
and stating the reason or reasons therefor. A copy of such report
shall be delivered to the provisional employee at least three days
prior to the scheduled meeting of the board of directors. In taking
action upon the recommendation of the superintendent, the board of
directors shall consider any written communication which the
provisional employee may file with the secretary of the board at any
time prior to that meeting.
(5) The board of directors shall notify the provisional employee in
writing of its final decision within ten days following the meeting at
which the superintendent's recommendation was considered. The decision
of the board of directors to nonrenew the contract of a provisional
employee shall be final and not subject to appeal.
(6) This section applies to any person employed by a school
district in a teaching or other nonsupervisory certificated position
after June 25, 1976. This section provides the exclusive means for
nonrenewing the employment contract of a provisional employee and no
other provision of law shall be applicable thereto, including, without
limitation, RCW 28A.405.210 and chapter 28A.645 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 3 and 5 of this act take effect
September 1, 2014.

--- END ---