BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 22.09.050 and 2011 c 336 s 602 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any application for a license to operate a warehouse shall be
accompanied by a license fee of one thousand ((three hundred fifty))
nine hundred dollars for a terminal warehouse, one thousand ((fifty))
five hundred dollars for a subterminal warehouse, and ((five)) seven
hundred dollars for a country warehouse. If a licensee operates more
than one warehouse under one state license as provided for in RCW
22.09.030, the license fee shall be computed by multiplying the number
of physically separated warehouses within the station by the applicable
terminal, subterminal, or country warehouse license fee.
If an application for renewal of a warehouse license or licenses is
not received by the department prior to the renewal date or dates
established by the director by rule, a penalty of fifty dollars for the
first week and one hundred dollars for each week thereafter shall be
assessed and added to the original fee and shall be paid by the
applicant before the renewal license may be issued. This penalty does
not apply if the applicant furnishes an affidavit certifying that he or
she has not acted as a warehouse operator subsequent to the expiration
of his or her prior license.

Sec. 2 RCW 22.09.055 and 2011 c 336 s 603 are each amended to
read as follows:
An application for a license to operate as a grain dealer shall be
accompanied by a license fee of one thousand seven hundred fifty
dollars. The license fee for exempt grain dealers shall be ((three))
five hundred dollars.
If an application for renewal of a grain dealer or exempt grain
dealer license is not received by the department before the renewal
date or dates established by the director by rule, a penalty of fifty
dollars for the first week and one hundred dollars for each week
thereafter shall be assessed and added to the original fee and shall be
paid by the applicant before the renewal license may be issued. This
penalty does not apply if the applicant furnishes an affidavit
certifying that he or she has not acted as a grain dealer or exempt
grain dealer after the expiration of his or her prior license.

--- END ---