BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 77.12.047 and 2001 c 253 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The commission may adopt, amend, or repeal rules as follows:
(a) Specifying the times when the taking of wildlife, fish, or
shellfish is lawful or unlawful.
(b) Specifying the areas and waters in which the taking and
possession of wildlife, fish, or shellfish is lawful or unlawful.
(c) Specifying and defining the gear, appliances, or other
equipment and methods that may be used to take wildlife, fish, or
shellfish, and specifying the times, places, and manner in which the
equipment may be used or possessed. However, the commission may only
prohibit the use or possession of ammunition due to lead content where
the commission finds that the prohibition is necessary and narrowly
tailored to address significant and substantiated impacts to one or
more wildlife populations.
(d) Regulating the importation, transportation, possession,
disposal, landing, and sale of wildlife, fish, shellfish, or seaweed
within the state, whether acquired within or without the state.
(e) Regulating the prevention and suppression of diseases and pests
affecting wildlife, fish, or shellfish.
(f) Regulating the size, sex, species, and quantities of wildlife,
fish, or shellfish that may be taken, possessed, sold, or disposed of.
(g) Specifying the statistical and biological reports required from
fishers, dealers, boathouses, or processors of wildlife, fish, or
shellfish.
(h) Classifying species of marine and freshwater life as food fish
or shellfish.
(i) Classifying the species of wildlife, fish, and shellfish that
may be used for purposes other than human consumption.
(j) Regulating the taking, sale, possession, and distribution of
wildlife, fish, shellfish, or deleterious exotic wildlife.
(k) Establishing game reserves and closed areas where hunting for
wild animals or wild birds may be prohibited.
(l) Regulating the harvesting of fish, shellfish, and wildlife in
the federal exclusive economic zone by vessels or individuals
registered or licensed under the laws of this state.
(m) Authorizing issuance of permits to release, plant, or place
fish or shellfish in state waters.
(n) Governing the possession of fish, shellfish, or wildlife so
that the size, species, or sex can be determined visually in the field
or while being transported.
(o) Other rules necessary to carry out this title and the purposes
and duties of the department.
(2) Subsections (1)(a), (b), (c), (d), and (f) of this section do
not apply to private tideland owners and lessees and the immediate
family members of the owners or lessees of state tidelands, when they
take or possess oysters, clams, cockles, borers, or mussels, excluding
razor clams, produced on their own private tidelands or their leased
state tidelands for personal use.
"Immediate family member" for the purposes of this section means a
spouse, brother, sister, grandparent, parent, child, or grandchild.
(3) Except for subsection (1)(g) of this section, this section does
not apply to private sector cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW
15.85.020. Subsection (1)(g) of this section does apply to such
products.

Sec. 2 RCW 77.12.210 and 2009 c 333 s 33 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The director shall maintain and manage real or personal
property owned, leased, or held by the department and shall control the
construction of buildings, structures, and improvements in or on the
property. The director may adopt rules for the operation and
maintenance of the property.
(2) The commission may only prohibit the use or possession of
ammunition on department-managed land due to lead content where the
commission finds that the prohibition is necessary and narrowly
tailored to address significant and substantiated impacts to one or
more wildlife populations.
(3) The commission may authorize the director to sell, lease,
convey, or grant concessions upon real or personal property under the
control of the department. This includes the authority to sell timber,
gravel, sand, and other materials or products from real property held
by the department, and to sell or lease the department's real or
personal property or grant concessions or rights-of-way for roads or
utilities in the property. Oil and gas resources owned by the state
which lie below lands owned, leased, or held by the department shall be
offered for lease by the commissioner of public lands pursuant to
chapter 79.14 RCW with the proceeds being deposited in the state
wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170: PROVIDED, That the
commissioner of public lands shall condition such leases at the request
of the department to protect wildlife and its habitat.
(4) If the commission determines that real or personal property
held by the department cannot be used advantageously by the department,
the director may dispose of that property if it is in the public
interest.
(5) If the state acquired real property with use limited to
specific purposes, the director may negotiate terms for the return of
the property to the donor or grantor. Other real property shall be
sold to the highest bidder at public auction. After appraisal, notice
of the auction shall be published at least once a week for two
successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the
county where the property is located at least twenty days prior to
sale.
(6) Proceeds from the sales shall be deposited in the state
wildlife account created in RCW 77.12.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By July 1, 2013, and within existing
resources, the state fish and wildlife commission shall review and
update its rules to ensure consistency with this act.

--- END ---