BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 26.60 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) If a program participant under chapter 40.24 RCW notifies the
secretary of state as required under rules adopted by the secretary,
the secretary shall not make available for inspection or copying the
name and address of a program participant contained in state registered
domestic partnership applications and records filed under this chapter,
except under the following circumstances:
(a) If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law
enforcement agency; and
(i) The participant's application under chapter 40.24 RCW contains
no indication that he or she has been a victim of domestic violence,
sexual assault, or stalking perpetrated by a law enforcement employee;
and
(ii) The request is in accordance with official law enforcement
duties and is in writing on official law enforcement letterhead
stationery and signed by the law enforcement agency's chief officer or
his or her designee; or
(b) If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the
order; and
(i) The request is made by a nonlaw enforcement agency; or
(ii) The participant's file indicates he or she has reason to
believe he or she is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking perpetrated by a law enforcement employee.
(2) The secretary must review the participant's application for
indication that he or she has been a victim of domestic violence,
sexual assault, or stalking perpetrated by a law enforcement employee
before releasing information.

--- END ---