BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.04.580 and 2011 c 214 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Every wastewater company subject to regulation by the
commission must, on or before the date specified by the commission for
filing annual reports under RCW 80.04.080, pay to the commission a
regulatory fee.
(2) The commission must assess such regulatory fees in amounts
sufficient for the commission to recover the commission's actual and
reasonable costs of supervising and regulating wastewater companies.
(3) Any payment of a fee assessed under this section made after the
due date must include a late fee of two percent of the amount due.
(4) Delinquent fees accrue interest at the rate of one percent per
month.
(5) The provisions of RCW ((80.04.030, 80.04.040, and 80.04.050))
80.24.030, 80.24.040, and 80.24.050 apply to regulatory fees for
wastewater companies.
(6) The commission is authorized and empowered to adopt and issue
rules and regulations to implement this section, including establishing
the methodologies and procedures for developing, assessing, and
collecting fees under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---