BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.20A.800 and 1993 c 96 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of the department of social and health services shall
coordinate the efforts of nonprofit agencies working with the homeless,
poor, and uninsured, the Washington academy of eye physicians and
surgeons, the Washington optometric association, and the opticians
association of Washington to deliver vision services to the homeless,
poor, and uninsured free of charge. The secretary shall enter into
agreements identifying cooperating agencies and the circumstances under
which specified services will be delivered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A nonprofit corporation and any other charitable corporation is
not liable for any damages arising out of providing previously owned
eyeglasses to a person if:
(a) The person is at least fourteen years of age; and
(b) The eyeglasses are provided to the person without charge.
(2) The immunity provided by subsection (1) of this section applies
to eyeglasses only if:
(a) The eyeglasses are provided by a licensed optometrist or
ophthalmologist who has personally examined the person who will receive
the eyeglasses; or
(b) The eyeglasses are provided by an optician who has consulted
with the licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist who personally
examined the person who will receive the eyeglasses.

--- END ---