BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 87.03 RCW
to read as follows:
The generation of electricity by an irrigation district as provided
in RCW 87.03.015, from water power made available by and as a part of
irrigation district water conveyance and distribution facilities, waste
ways, and drainage water facilities shall be considered an eligible
renewable resource that qualifies for renewable energy credit as
provided in chapter 19.285 RCW.

--- END ---