BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The attorney general must, in conjunction with the office of
the insurance commissioner, establish a toll-free telephone hotline
that is available to members of the public to report suspected medicaid
fraud. Funding for the hotline is to be provided by the office of the
insurance commissioner.
(2) The attorney general must prepare information that explains the
purpose of the hotline, and the hotline telephone number must be
prominently displayed in the information. The attorney general must
publicize the availability of the toll-free hotline through print and
electronic media, including its web site, and other means of
communication with the public.
(3) The attorney general must designate staff to be responsible for
processing reports of fraud or abuse received through the hotline. The
attorney general must conduct an initial review of each report.
Following the initial review, the attorney general must determine which
assertions require further examination and must forward this
information to the medicaid fraud control unit.
(4) The identity of a person making a report through the hotline is
confidential at all times unless the person making a report consents to
disclosure by written waiver, or until the investigation described in
subsection (3) of this section is complete. All documents related to
the report and subsequent investigation are also confidential until
completion of the investigation or when the documents are otherwise
statutorily exempt from public disclosure.
(5) This section expires July 1, 2014.

--- END ---