BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.44 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) An employer or employer's agent, representative, or designee
shall not knowingly or purposefully publish, through print, broadcast,
photographic, mechanical, internet, or electronic distribution, an
advertisement for any job vacancy in this state that contains one or
more of the following:
(a) Any provision stating that the qualifications for a job include
current employment;
(b) Any provision stating that the employer or employer's agent,
representative, or designee will not consider or review an application
for employment submitted by any job applicant currently unemployed; or
(c) Any provision stating that the employer or employer's agent,
representative, or designee will only consider or review applications
for employment submitted by job applicants who are currently employed.
This section does not prohibit an employer or employer's agent,
representative, or designee from publishing, through print, broadcast,
photographic, mechanical, internet, or electronic distribution, an
advertisement for any job vacancy in this state that contains any
provision setting forth any other qualifications for a job, as
permitted by law, including, but not limited to, the holding of a
current and valid professional or occupational license, certificate,
registration, permit, or other credential; or a minimum level of
education, training, or professional, occupational, or field
experience.
In addition, this section does not prohibit an employer or
employer's agent, representative, or designee from publishing, through
print, broadcast, photographic, mechanical, internet, or electronic
distribution, an advertisement for any job vacancy that contains any
provision stating that only applicants who are currently employed by
the advertising employer will be considered.
(2)(a) Any employer who violates this section is subject to a civil
penalty in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars for the first
violation, five thousand dollars for the second violation, and ten
thousand dollars for each subsequent violation, collectible by the
department of labor and industries pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
(b) This section does not create, establish, or authorize a private
cause of action by an aggrieved person against an employer who has
violated, or is alleged to have violated, the provisions of this
section.
(3) The director of the department of labor and industries must
provide notice to employers of the requirements of this legislation at
least thirty days prior to the effective date of this section.

--- END ---