BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Recognizing the tremendous savings that
could be enjoyed by school districts from open licensing, particularly
given this state's recent adoption of common core state standards, the
legislature intends to jump-start efforts toward the development of
high quality openly licensed K-12 courseware aligned with the common
core state standards by directing that one and one-half percent of the
moneys currently appropriated for textbooks and curriculum be used by
the office of the superintendent of public instruction solely for the
development of openly licensed courseware aligned with common core
state standards to be made available at no cost to school districts.
Development of an open course library of high quality openly licensed
K-12 courseware aligned to common core state standards will make new
educational resources available to districts throughout the state and
offer tremendous savings to those districts that choose to use the open
courseware.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall take the lead
in developing openly licensed courseware aligned with the common core
state standards and placed under a Creative Commons attribution license
that allows others to use, distribute, and create derivative works
based upon the digital material, while still allowing the authors or
creators to retain the copyright and to receive credit for their
efforts.
(b) During the course of development, the superintendent:
(i) May contract with third parties for all or part of the
development;
(ii) May adopt or adapt existing high quality openly licensed K-12
courseware aligned with the common core state standards;
(iii) Must use best efforts to seek additional outside funding; and
(iv) Must work collaboratively with other states that have adopted
the common core state standards and collectively share results.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction must also:
(a) Advertise to school districts the availability of openly
licensed courseware, with an emphasis on the fact that the courseware
is available at no cost to the districts;
(b) Identify an open courseware repository to which openly licensed
courseware developed under this section may be submitted, in which
openly licensed courseware may be housed, and from which openly
licensed courseware may be easily accessed, all at no cost to school
districts;
(c) Provide professional development programs that offer support,
guidance, and instruction regarding the creation, use, and continuous
improvement of open courseware; and
(d) Report to the governor and the education committees of the
legislature on a biennial basis, beginning December 1, 2013, and ending
December 1, 2017, regarding development of openly licensed courseware
aligned with the common core state standards and placed under a
Creative Commons attribution license, use by school districts of openly
licensed courseware, and professional development programs provided.
(3) School districts may, but are not required to, use any of the
openly licensed courseware.
(4) As used in this section, "courseware" includes the course
syllabus, scope and sequence, instructional materials, modules,
textbooks, including the teacher's edition, student guides,
supplemental materials, formative and summative assessment supports,
research articles, research data, laboratory activities, simulations,
videos, open-ended inquiry activities, and any other educationally
useful materials.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2018.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 34 s 9 and 2011 1st
sp.s. c 27 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and
regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use
basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) The total aggregate statewide allocations calculated under
subsections (4) through (((12))) (13) of this section for full-time
equivalent student enrollment in alternative learning experience
programs as defined in RCW 28A.150.325 shall be reduced by fifteen
percent for the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years. The superintendent
of public instruction shall determine how to implement this aggregate
fifteen percent reduction among the different alternative learning
experience programs. No program may receive less than a ten percent
reduction and no program may receive greater than a twenty percent
reduction. In determining how to implement the reductions among the
alternative learning experience programs, the superintendent of public
instruction must look to both how a program is currently operating as
well as how it has operated in the past, to the extent that data is
available, and must give consideration to the following criteria:
(i) The category of program;
(ii) The certificated instructional staffing ratio maintained by
the program;
(iii) The amount and type of direct personal student-to-teacher
contact used by the program on a weekly basis;
(iv) Whether the program uses any classroom-based instructional
time to meet requirements in the written student learning plan for
enrolled students; and
(v) For online programs, whether the program is approved by the
superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.250.020.
(c) The superintendent of public instruction shall report to the
legislature by December 31, 2011, regarding how the reductions in (b)
of this subsection were implemented.
(d) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(4)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following
general education average class size of full-time equivalent students
per teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium and beginning with schools with
the highest percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price
meals in the prior school year, the general education average class
size for grades K-3 shall be reduced until the average class size
funded under this subsection (4) is no more than 17.0 full-time
equivalent students per teacher beginning in the 2017-18 school year.
(c) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high
school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers
based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per
teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . 26.57
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.76

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum
specify:
(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than
fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price
meals; and
(ii) A specialty average class size for laboratory science,
advanced placement, and international baccalaureate courses.
(5) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators . . . . . . . . . . . .
1.253
1.353
1.880

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology,
and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.663
0.519
0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.076 0.060 0.096

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.042 0.006 0.015

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.017 0.002 0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and graduation
advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.493
1.116
1.909

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.936
0.700
0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.012 2.325 3.269

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.657 1.942 2.965

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.079 0.092 0.141

Parent involvement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.00 0.00 0.00

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as
follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.628
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.813
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district
to support certificated and classified staffing of central
administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under
subsections (4)(a) and (b) and (5) of this section and (a) of this
subsection.
(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to
school districts for career and technical education and skill center
administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum
allocation for each school district shall include allocations per
annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted for inflation
from the 2008-09 school year:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium, the minimum allocation for
maintenance, supplies, and operating costs shall be increased as
specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The following
allocations, adjusted for inflation from the 2007-08 school year, are
provided in the 2015-16 school year, after which the allocations shall
be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this
section, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based
on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:
(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students
in grades seven through twelve;
(b) Laboratory science courses for students in grades nine through
twelve;
(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and
(d) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.
(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this
section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs
and services:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for
free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum
allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical
school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 1.5156 hours per
week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen learning
assistance program students per teacher.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the head count number of students in each school who are
eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide
resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in
extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher. Notwithstanding other provisions of this
subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled to
provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive
intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing
less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations
act.
(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for
highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030,
allocations shall be based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs
shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590
hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program
students per teacher.
(11) Until June 30, 2018, one and one-half percent of the amounts
otherwise allocable to school districts for curriculum and textbooks
under subsection (8) of this section shall be allocated to the office
of the superintendent of public instruction solely for the development
of openly licensed courseware aligned with the common core state
standards pursuant to section 2 of this act, which openly licensed
courseware shall be made available at no cost to school districts.
(12) The allocations under subsections (4)(a) and (b), (5), (6),
and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW
28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(((12))) (13)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical
high schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4),
(7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(((13))) (14)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education
funds shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor.
The recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.150.260 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 2 are each
amended to read as follows:
The purpose of this section is to provide for the allocation of
state funding that the legislature deems necessary to support school
districts in offering the minimum instructional program of basic
education under RCW 28A.150.220. The allocation shall be determined as
follows:
(1) The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction
may recommend to the legislature a formula for the distribution of a
basic education instructional allocation for each common school
district.
(2) The distribution formula under this section shall be for
allocation purposes only. Except as may be required under chapter
28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, or 28A.185 RCW, or federal laws and
regulations, nothing in this section requires school districts to use
basic education instructional funds to implement a particular
instructional approach or service. Nothing in this section requires
school districts to maintain a particular classroom teacher-to-student
ratio or other staff-to-student ratio or to use allocated funds to pay
for particular types or classifications of staff. Nothing in this
section entitles an individual teacher to a particular teacher planning
period.
(3)(a) To the extent the technical details of the formula have been
adopted by the legislature and except when specifically provided as a
school district allocation, the distribution formula for the basic
education instructional allocation shall be based on minimum staffing
and nonstaff costs the legislature deems necessary to support
instruction and operations in prototypical schools serving high,
middle, and elementary school students as provided in this section.
The use of prototypical schools for the distribution formula does not
constitute legislative intent that schools should be operated or
structured in a similar fashion as the prototypes. Prototypical
schools illustrate the level of resources needed to operate a school of
a particular size with particular types and grade levels of students
using commonly understood terms and inputs, such as class size, hours
of instruction, and various categories of school staff. It is the
intent that the funding allocations to school districts be adjusted
from the school prototypes based on the actual number of annual average
full-time equivalent students in each grade level at each school in the
district and not based on the grade-level configuration of the school
to the extent that data is available. The allocations shall be further
adjusted from the school prototypes with minimum allocations for small
schools and to reflect other factors identified in the omnibus
appropriations act.
(b) For the purposes of this section, prototypical schools are
defined as follows:
(i) A prototypical high school has six hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in grades nine through twelve;
(ii) A prototypical middle school has four hundred thirty-two
average annual full-time equivalent students in grades seven and eight;
and
(iii) A prototypical elementary school has four hundred average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
six.
(4)(a) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall be based on the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers
needed to provide instruction over the minimum required annual
instructional hours under RCW 28A.150.220 and provide at least one
teacher planning period per school day, and based on the following
general education average class size of full-time equivalent students
per teacher:

General education
average
class size
Grades K-3 . . . . . . . . . . . . 25.23
Grade 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 5-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . 27.00
Grades 7-8 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.53
Grades 9-12 . . . . . . . . . . . . 28.74

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium and beginning with schools with
the highest percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price
meals in the prior school year, the general education average class
size for grades K-3 shall be reduced until the average class size
funded under this subsection (4) is no more than 17.0 full-time
equivalent students per teacher beginning in the 2017-18 school year.
(c) The minimum allocation for each prototypical middle and high
school shall also provide for full-time equivalent classroom teachers
based on the following number of full-time equivalent students per
teacher in career and technical education:

Career and technical
education average
class size
Approved career and technical education offered at
the middle school and high school level . . . . . . . . . . . . 26.57
Skill center programs meeting the standards established
by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction . . . . . . . . . . . . 22.76

(d) In addition, the omnibus appropriations act shall at a minimum
specify:
(i) A high-poverty average class size in schools where more than
fifty percent of the students are eligible for free and reduced-price
meals; and
(ii) A specialty average class size for laboratory science,
advanced placement, and international baccalaureate courses.
(5) The minimum allocation for each level of prototypical school
shall include allocations for the following types of staff in addition
to classroom teachers:

Elementary
School Middle
School High
School

Principals, assistant principals, and other certificated building-level
administrators . . . . . . . . . . . .
1.253
1.353
1.880

Teacher librarians, a function that includes information literacy, technology,
and media to support school library media programs . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.663
0.519
0.523

Health and social services:

School nurses . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.076 0.060 0.096

Social workers . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.042 0.006 0.015

Psychologists . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.017 0.002 0.007

Guidance counselors, a function that includes parent outreach and graduation
advising . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.493
1.116
1.909

Teaching assistance, including any aspect of educational instructional
services provided by classified employees . . . . . . . . . . . .
0.936
0.700
0.652

Office support and other noninstructional aides . . . . . . . . . . . . 2.012 2.325 3.269

Custodians . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.657 1.942 2.965

Classified staff providing student and staff safety . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.079 0.092 0.141

Parent involvement coordinators . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.00 0.00 0.00

(6)(a) The minimum staffing allocation for each school district to
provide district-wide support services shall be allocated per one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students in grades K-12 as
follows:

Staff per 1,000
K-12 students
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.628
Facilities, maintenance, and grounds . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.813
Warehouse, laborers, and mechanics . . . . . . . . . . . . 0.332

(b) The minimum allocation of staff units for each school district
to support certificated and classified staffing of central
administration shall be 5.30 percent of the staff units generated under
subsections (4)(a) and (b) and (5) of this section and (a) of this
subsection.
(7) The distribution formula shall include staffing allocations to
school districts for career and technical education and skill center
administrative and other school-level certificated staff, as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act.
(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the minimum
allocation for each school district shall include allocations per
annual average full-time equivalent student for the following
materials, supplies, and operating costs, to be adjusted for inflation
from the 2008-09 school year:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $54.43
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $147.90
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $58.44
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $124.07
Instructional professional development for certified and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $9.04
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $73.27
Security and central office . . . . . . . . . . . . $50.76

(b) During the 2011-2013 biennium, the minimum allocation for
maintenance, supplies, and operating costs shall be increased as
specified in the omnibus appropriations act. The following
allocations, adjusted for inflation from the 2007-08 school year, are
provided in the 2015-16 school year, after which the allocations shall
be adjusted annually for inflation as specified in the omnibus
appropriations act:

Per annual average
full-time equivalent student
in grades K-12
Technology . . . . . . . . . . . . $113.80
Utilities and insurance . . . . . . . . . . . . $309.21
Curriculum and textbooks . . . . . . . . . . . . $122.17
Other supplies and library materials . . . . . . . . . . . . $259.39
Instructional professional development for certificated and
classified staff . . . . . . . . . . . . $18.89
Facilities maintenance . . . . . . . . . . . . $153.18
Security and central office administration . . . . . . . . . . . . $106.12

(9) In addition to the amounts provided in subsection (8) of this
section, the omnibus appropriations act shall provide an amount based
on full-time equivalent student enrollment in each of the following:
(a) Exploratory career and technical education courses for students
in grades seven through twelve;
(b) Laboratory science courses for students in grades nine through
twelve;
(c) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades nine through twelve offered in a high school; and
(d) Preparatory career and technical education courses for students
in grades eleven and twelve offered through a skill center.
(10) In addition to the allocations otherwise provided under this
section, amounts shall be provided to support the following programs
and services:
(a) To provide supplemental instruction and services for
underachieving students through the learning assistance program under
RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065, allocations shall be based on the
district percentage of students in grades K-12 who were eligible for
free or reduced-price meals in the prior school year. The minimum
allocation for the program shall provide for each level of prototypical
school resources to provide, on a statewide average, 1.5156 hours per
week in extra instruction with a class size of fifteen learning
assistance program students per teacher.
(b) To provide supplemental instruction and services for students
whose primary language is other than English, allocations shall be
based on the head count number of students in each school who are
eligible for and enrolled in the transitional bilingual instruction
program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080. The minimum
allocation for each level of prototypical school shall provide
resources to provide, on a statewide average, 4.7780 hours per week in
extra instruction with fifteen transitional bilingual instruction
program students per teacher. Notwithstanding other provisions of this
subsection (10), the actual per-student allocation may be scaled to
provide a larger allocation for students needing more intensive
intervention and a commensurate reduced allocation for students needing
less intensive intervention, as detailed in the omnibus appropriations
act.
(c) To provide additional allocations to support programs for
highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030,
allocations shall be based on two and three hundred fourteen one-thousandths percent of each school district's full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. The minimum allocation for the programs
shall provide resources to provide, on a statewide average, 2.1590
hours per week in extra instruction with fifteen highly capable program
students per teacher.
(11) Until June 30, 2018, one and one-half percent of the amounts
otherwise allocable to school districts for curriculum and textbooks
under subsection (8) of this section shall be allocated to the office
of the superintendent of public instruction solely for the development
of openly licensed courseware aligned with the common core state
standards pursuant to section 2 of this act, which openly licensed
courseware shall be made available at no cost to school districts.
(12) The allocations under subsections (4)(a) and (b), (5), (6),
and (8) of this section shall be enhanced as provided under RCW
28A.150.390 on an excess cost basis to provide supplemental
instructional resources for students with disabilities.
(((12))) (13)(a) For the purposes of allocations for prototypical
high schools and middle schools under subsections (4) and (10) of this
section that are based on the percent of students in the school who are
eligible for free and reduced-price meals, the actual percent of such
students in a school shall be adjusted by a factor identified in the
omnibus appropriations act to reflect underreporting of free and
reduced-price meal eligibility among middle and high school students.
(b) Allocations or enhancements provided under subsections (4),
(7), and (9) of this section for exploratory and preparatory career and
technical education courses shall be provided only for courses approved
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction under chapter
28A.700 RCW.
(((13))) (14)(a) This formula for distribution of basic education
funds shall be reviewed biennially by the superintendent and governor.
The recommended formula shall be subject to approval, amendment or
rejection by the legislature.
(b) In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula
recommended by the governor, without adopting a new distribution
formula, the distribution formula for the previous school year shall
remain in effect.
(c) The enrollment of any district shall be the annual average
number of full-time equivalent students and part-time students as
provided in RCW 28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each
month, including students who are in attendance pursuant to RCW
28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do not reside within the servicing
school district. The definition of full-time equivalent student shall
be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction and
shall be included as part of the superintendent's biennial budget
request. The definition shall be based on the minimum instructional
hour offerings required under RCW 28A.150.220. Any revision of the
present definition shall not take effect until approved by the house
ways and means committee and the senate ways and means committee.
(d) The office of financial management shall make a monthly review
of the superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the
common schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1,
2013.

--- END ---