BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 48.43.081 and 2011 c 128 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A clinical laboratory or physician, located in this state, or
in another state, providing anatomic pathology services for patients in
this state, shall present or cause to be presented a claim, bill, or
demand for payment for these services only to the following:
(a) The patient;
(b) The responsible insurer or other third-party payer;
(c) The hospital, public health clinic, or nonprofit health clinic
ordering such services;
(d) A direct patient-provider primary care practice regulated by
chapter 48.150 RCW, provided the practice:
(i) Is in compliance with all applicable provisions of law to
regulate that practice;
(ii) Has furnished a written confirmation to the physician or
laboratory providing the anatomic pathology service that the patient is
not covered for anatomic pathology services under any health insurance
plan or program;
(iii) Furnishes the patient with an itemized bill that does not,
directly or indirectly, mark up or increase the actual amount billed by
the physician or clinical laboratory that performed the service; and
(iv) Discloses to the patient, through printed material or through
a web site, that all anatomic pathology services are billed at exactly
the amount charged for the service by the physician or laboratory that
provided the service, and the identity of the provider;
(e) The referring laboratory, excluding a laboratory of a
physician's office or group practice that does not perform the
professional component of the anatomic pathology service for which such
claim, bill, or demand is presented; or
(((e))) (f) Governmental agencies or their specified public or
private agent, agency, or organization on behalf of the recipient of
the services.
(2) Except for a physician at a referring laboratory that has been
billed pursuant to subsection (1)(d) or (6) of this section, no
licensed practitioner in the state may, directly or indirectly, charge,
bill, or otherwise solicit payment for anatomic pathology services
unless such services were rendered personally by the licensed
practitioner or under the licensed practitioner's direct supervision in
accordance with section 353 of the public health service act (42 U.S.C.
Sec. 263a).
(3) No patient, insurer, third-party payer, hospital, public health
clinic, or nonprofit health clinic may be required to reimburse any
licensed practitioner for charges or claims submitted in violation of
this section.
(4) Nothing in this section may be construed to mandate the
assignment of benefits for anatomic pathology services as defined in
this section.
(5) For purposes of this section, "anatomic pathology services"
means:
(a) Histopathology or surgical pathology, meaning the gross and
microscopic examination performed by a physician or under the
supervision of a physician, including histologic processing;
(b) Cytopathology, meaning the microscopic examination of cells
from the following: (i) Fluids, (ii) aspirates, (iii) washings, (iv)
brushings, or (v) smears, including the pap test examination performed
by a physician or under the supervision of a physician;
(c) Hematology, meaning the microscopic evaluation of bone marrow
aspirates and biopsies performed by a physician, or under the
supervision of a physician, and peripheral blood smears when the
attending or treating physician, or technologist requests that a blood
smear be reviewed by a pathologist;
(d) Subcellular pathology or molecular pathology, meaning the
assessment of a patient specimen for the detection, localization,
measurement, or analysis of one or more protein or nucleic acid
targets; and
(e) Blood-banking services performed by pathologists.
(6) The provisions of this section do not prohibit billing of a
referring laboratory for anatomic pathology services in instances where
a sample or samples must be sent to another physician or laboratory for
consultation or histologic processing, except that for purposes of this
subsection the term "referring laboratory" does not include a
laboratory of a physician's office or group practice that does not
perform the professional component of the anatomic pathology service
involved.
(7) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the
discipline of any practitioner who violates the provisions of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act applies retroactively
to July 22, 2011, so that no entity is liable for having presented or
caused to be presented a claim, bill, or demand for payment to a direct
patient-provider primary care practice in accordance with section
1(1)(d) of this act.

--- END ---