BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that medical
assistants are health care professionals who commonly work in
ambulatory settings, such as physicians' offices, clinics, and group
practices. Medical assistants are trained to perform administrative
and clinical procedures as part of a health care team. Currently,
medical assistants are not credentialed, although there is a nationally
recognized certifying organization.
The legislature further finds that health care assistants are
currently credentialed in this state. Health care assistants are
certified to perform very specific tasks such as blood draws,
injections, limited medication administration, skin tests, and
hemodialysis. The existence of these two professions, one with a
commonly used title but no credential, the other with a credential but
seldom used title, causes significant confusion for health care
professionals.
The legislature intends to change the designation of health care
assistant to medical assistant. Rather than have multiple disparate
categories for medical assistant certification, the legislature intends
to provide minimum requirements for entry-level medical assistants and
require the department of health to establish a career ladder so that
medical assistants can, through experience and education, increase
their skills and the procedures in which they are permitted to assist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 18.135 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Medical assistants certified under this chapter have limited
authority to perform certain delegated medical tasks related to
administering basic first aid; collecting routine laboratory specimens;
assisting with patient examinations or treatment; performing minor
clinical procedures; operating office medical equipment; performing
basic laboratory procedures; and administering medications by unit,
single, or calculated dosage including vaccines.
(2) The secretary shall create in rule:
(a) Categories of medical assistants that may be authorized to
perform the tasks in subsection (1) of this section. The categories
must reflect an increasing level of skill and responsibility. The
rules must also describe the training, experience, education, or
examination requirements for each category;
(b) One category of medical assistants must be for hemodialysis
technicians. Rules adopted by the secretary must allow for the
hemodialysis technician to be trained by the facility in which the
person is employed so long as the training program is approved by the
department. If the hemodialysis technician is so trained, he or she is
not required to meet the requirements of section 4(3)(b) through (d) of
this act; and
(c) Training, experience, education, or examination requirements
for entry-level health care workers to transition, via a career ladder,
to medical assistants or for medical assistants to transition into
other health care professions pursuant to RCW 18.135.030(2) (c) and
(d).

Sec. 3 RCW 18.135.020 and 2009 c 43 s 4 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Delegation" means direct authorization granted by a licensed
health care practitioner to a ((health care)) medical assistant to
perform the functions authorized in this chapter which fall within the
scope of practice of the delegator and which are not within the scope
of practice of the delegatee.
(2) (("Health care assistant" means an unlicensed person who
assists a licensed health care practitioner in providing health care to
patients pursuant to this chapter. However, persons trained by a
federally approved end-stage renal disease facility who perform end-stage renal dialysis in the home setting are exempt from certification
under this chapter.)) "Department" means the department of health.
(3) "Health care facility" means any hospital, hospice care center,
licensed or certified health care facility, health maintenance
organization regulated under chapter 48.46 RCW, federally qualified
health maintenance organization, renal dialysis center or facility
federally approved under 42 C.F.R. 405.2100, blood bank federally
licensed under 21 C.F.R. 607, or clinical laboratory certified under 20
C.F.R. 405.1301-16.
(4) "Health care practitioner" means:
(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW;
(b) An osteopathic physician or surgeon licensed under chapter
18.57 RCW; or
(c) Acting within the scope of their respective licensure, a
podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW, a
registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed
under chapter 18.79 RCW, a naturopath licensed under chapter 18.36A
RCW, a physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, or an
osteopathic physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW.
(5) "Medical assistant" means a person certified under this chapter
to assist a licensed health care practitioner in providing health care
to patients. However, the term "medical assistant" does not include
persons trained by a federally approved end-stage renal disease
facility who perform end-stage renal dialysis in the home setting.
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.
(((6))) (7) "Supervision" means supervision of procedures permitted
pursuant to this chapter by a health care practitioner who is
physically present and is immediately available in the facility during
the administration of injections or vaccines, as defined in this
chapter, or certain drugs as provided in RCW 18.135.130, but need not
be present during procedures to withdraw blood.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 18.135 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Beginning July 1, 2014, no persons may represent themselves as
medical assistants unless certified as provided for in this chapter.
Once certified, medical assistants may only practice in the category of
medical assistant for which they are certified. However, they may,
under supervision of a health care professional, receive training for
procedures in another category of medical assistant.
(2) An applicant applying for certification as a medical assistant
must file a written application on a form or forms provided by the
secretary setting forth under affidavit such information as the
secretary may require, and proof that the candidate has met
qualifications set forth in this chapter.
(3) Any person seeking certification as a medical assistant must
meet the following qualifications:
(a) Be eighteen years of age or older;
(b) Have satisfactorily completed a medical assistant program
approved by the secretary;
(c) Have satisfactorily completed a medical assistant examination
approved by the secretary; and
(d) Demonstrate evidence of completing the education and training
requirements for the category of medical assistant for which the person
is seeking certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 18.135 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The secretary may certify a person as a medical assistant
without examination if the person is licensed or certified as a medical
assistant in another jurisdiction and if, in the secretary's judgment,
the requirements of that jurisdiction are equivalent or greater than
those of Washington state.
(2) Before July 1, 2014, the secretary may certify as a medical
assistant without examination if the person is practicing as a
certified health care assistant and is in good standing. The secretary
must certify the person for the category of medical assistant that is
appropriate for the person's education and experience.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.135.030 and 1999 c 151 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The secretary or the secretary's designee may appoint members
of the ((health care)) medical assistant profession and other health
care practitioners, as defined in RCW 18.135.020(((3))), to serve in an
ad hoc capacity to assist in carrying out the provisions of this
chapter. The members shall provide advice on matters specifically
identified and requested by the secretary. The members shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
(2) In addition to any other authority provided by law, the
secretary shall:
(a) Adopt rules necessary to((:
(a))) administer, implement, and enforce this chapter, including
rules providing for the transition of health care assistants to medical
assistants and ensuring that a health care assistant practicing before
July 1, 2014, will be certified in the appropriate medical assistant
category for that person's education and experience;
(b) Establish ((the minimum requirements necessary for a health
care facility or health care practitioner to certify a health care
assistant capable of performing the functions authorized in this
chapter; and
(c) Establish)) a career ladder permitting upward career
advancement for medical assistants. The career ladder must consist of
categories of medical assistants with minimum requirements for each and
every category of ((health care)) medical assistant, including minimum
requirements for the entry-level category, education and experience
requirements that are needed for medical assistants to advance to
another category, on-the-job instruction and training, and the
procedures medical assistants are able to assist with during training
to assist them in advancing up the ladder;
(c) Establish requirements to assist entry-level health care
workers in other fields, such as home care aides, to advance into a
medical assistant position;
(d) As part of the career ladder in (b) of this subsection,
establish education and experience requirements to assist medical
assistants to move into other health care professions, including
nursing professions, that would benefit from their experience and
training;
(e) Establish forms necessary to administer this chapter, including
forms medical assistants may use to document their education and
experience;
(f) Issue a certificate to an applicant who has met the
requirements for certification and deny a certificate to an applicant
who does not meet the minimum qualifications;
(g) Hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as
needed to implement this chapter and hire individuals, including those
certified under this chapter, to serve as consultants as necessary to
implement and administer this chapter;
(h) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and
certificate holders;
(i) Conduct a hearing, under chapter 34.05 RCW, on an appeal of a
denial of certification based on the applicant's failure to meet the
minimum qualification for certification;
(j) Investigate alleged violations of this chapter and consumer
complaints involving the practice of persons representing themselves as
medical assistants;
(k) Issue subpoenas, statements of charges, statements of intent to
deny certifications, and orders and delegate in writing to a designee
the authority to issue subpoenas, statements of charges, and statement
on intent to deny certifications;
(l) Conduct disciplinary proceedings, impose sanctions, and assess
fines for violations of this chapter or any rules adopted under it in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW;
(m) Set all certification, renewal, and late renewal fees;
(n) Set certification expiration dates and renewal periods for all
certifications under this chapter; and
(o) Set minimum continuing education requirements.
(3) ((The rules shall be adopted after fair consideration of input
from representatives of each category. These requirements shall ensure
that the public health and welfare are protected and shall include, but
not be limited to, the following factors:
(a) The education and occupational qualifications for the health
care assistant category;
(b) The work experience for the health care assistant category;
(c) The instruction and training provided for the health care
assistant category; and
(d) The types of drugs or diagnostic agents which may be
administered by injection by health care assistants working in a
hospital or nursing home. The rules established under this subsection
shall not prohibit health care assistants working in a health care
facility other than a nursing home or hospital from performing the
functions authorized under this chapter.)) Before adopting rules under
this section and by December 1, 2012, the secretary must submit a
preliminary plan, as described in this subsection, to the appropriate
committees of the legislature. The preliminary plan must include the
categories of medical assistants to be adopted in rule as well as the
scope of practice of each category. The preliminary plan must also
include the plan for transitioning health care assistants to medical
assistants with a description of categories of health care assistants
as they transition to categories of medical assistants.

Sec. 7 RCW 18.135.040 and 2006 c 242 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
A certification issued to a ((health care)) medical assistant
pursuant to this chapter shall be authority to perform only the
functions authorized ((in RCW 18.135.010)) for the category in which
the medical assistant has been certified and subject to proper
delegation and supervision in ((the)) a health care facility ((making
the certification)) or under the supervision of ((the certifying)) a
health care practitioner ((in other health care facilities or in his or
her office or in the residences of research study participants in
accordance with RCW 18.135.110. No certification made by one health
care facility or health care practitioner is transferrable to another
health care facility or health care practitioner)). Medical assistants
may be trained in procedures in a category in which the medical
assistant is not certified under the supervision of a health care
professional.

Sec. 8 RCW 18.135.060 and 2001 c 22 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Any ((health care)) medical assistant certified pursuant to
this chapter shall perform the functions authorized in this chapter
only by delegation of authority from ((the)) a health care practitioner
and under the supervision of a health care practitioner acting within
the scope of his or her license. In the case of subcutaneous,
intradermal and intramuscular and intravenous injections, a ((health
care)) medical assistant may perform such functions only under the
supervision of a health care practitioner having authority, within the
scope of his or her license, to order such procedures.
(b) The health care practitioner who ordered the procedure or a
health care practitioner who could order the procedure under his or her
license shall be physically present in the immediate area of a hospital
or nursing home where the injection is administered. Sensitivity
agents being administered intradermally or by the scratch method are
excluded from this requirement.
(2) A ((health care)) medical assistant trained by a federally
approved end-stage renal disease facility may perform venipuncture for
blood withdrawal, administration of oxygen as necessary by cannula or
mask, venipuncture for placement of fistula needles, connect to
vascular catheter for hemodialysis, intravenous administration of
heparin and sodium chloride solutions as an integral part of dialysis
treatment, and intradermal, subcutaneous, or topical administration of
local anesthetics in conjunction with placement of fistula needles, and
intraperitoneal administration of sterile electrolyte solutions and
heparin for peritoneal dialysis: (a) In the center or health care
facility if a registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW is
physically present and immediately available in such center or health
care facility; or (b) in the patient's home if a physician and a
registered nurse are available for consultation during the dialysis.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.135.070 and 1993 c 367 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
The licensing authority of health care facilities or the
disciplining authority of the delegating or supervising health care
practitioner shall investigate all complaints or allegations of
((violations of proper certification of a health care assistant or))
violations of delegation of authority or supervision. A substantiated
violation shall constitute sufficient cause for disciplinary action by
the licensing authority of a health care facility or the disciplining
authority of the health care practitioner.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.135.090 and 1984 c 281 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
The performance of the functions authorized in this chapter by a
((health care)) medical assistant pursuant to this chapter does not
constitute unlicensed practice as a health care practitioner.

Sec. 11 RCW 18.135.110 and 2006 c 242 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
This chapter does not prohibit or restrict the performance of
blood-drawing procedures by ((health care)) medical assistants in the
residences of research study participants when such procedures have
been authorized by the institutional review board of a comprehensive
cancer center or nonprofit degree-granting institution of higher
education and are conducted under the general supervision of a
physician.

Sec. 12 RCW 18.135.120 and 2008 c 58 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The administration of vaccines by a ((health care)) medical
assistant is restricted to vaccines that are administered by injection,
orally, or topically, including nasal administration, and that are
licensed by the United States food and drug administration.

Sec. 13 RCW 18.120.020 and 2010 c 286 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant group" includes any health professional group or
organization, any individual, or any other interested party which
proposes that any health professional group not presently regulated be
regulated or which proposes to substantially increase the scope of
practice of the profession.
(2) "Certificate" and "certification" mean a voluntary process by
which a statutory regulatory entity grants recognition to an individual
who (a) has met certain prerequisite qualifications specified by that
regulatory entity, and (b) may assume or use "certified" in the title
or designation to perform prescribed health professional tasks.
(3) "Grandfather clause" means a provision in a regulatory statute
applicable to practitioners actively engaged in the regulated health
profession prior to the effective date of the regulatory statute which
exempts the practitioners from meeting the prerequisite qualifications
set forth in the regulatory statute to perform prescribed occupational
tasks.
(4) "Health professions" means and includes the following health
and health-related licensed or regulated professions and occupations:
Podiatric medicine and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW; chiropractic
under chapter 18.25 RCW; dental hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW;
dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW; denturism under chapter 18.30 RCW;
dispensing opticians under chapter 18.34 RCW; hearing instruments under
chapter 18.35 RCW; naturopaths under chapter 18.36A RCW; embalming and
funeral directing under chapter 18.39 RCW; midwifery under chapter
18.50 RCW; nursing home administration under chapter 18.52 RCW;
optometry under chapters 18.53 and 18.54 RCW; ocularists under chapter
18.55 RCW; osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW; pharmacy under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW; medicine
under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW; emergency medicine under chapter
18.73 RCW; physical therapy under chapter 18.74 RCW; practical nurses
under chapter 18.79 RCW; psychologists under chapter 18.83 RCW;
registered nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW; occupational therapists
licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW; respiratory care practitioners
licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW; veterinarians and veterinary
technicians under chapter 18.92 RCW; ((health care)) medical assistants
under chapter 18.135 RCW; massage practitioners under chapter 18.108
RCW; East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06
RCW; persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW; persons licensed as
mental health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social
workers under chapter 18.225 RCW; dietitians and nutritionists
certified by chapter 18.138 RCW; radiologic technicians under chapter
18.84 RCW; and nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW.
(5) "Inspection" means the periodic examination of practitioners by
a state agency in order to ascertain whether the practitioners'
occupation is being carried out in a fashion consistent with the public
health, safety, and welfare.
(6) "Legislative committees of reference" means the standing
legislative committees designated by the respective rules committees of
the senate and house of representatives to consider proposed
legislation to regulate health professions not previously regulated.
(7) "License," "licensing," and "licensure" mean permission to
engage in a health profession which would otherwise be unlawful in the
state in the absence of the permission. A license is granted to those
individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications to perform prescribed
health professional tasks and for the use of a particular title.
(8) "Professional license" means an individual, nontransferable
authorization to carry on a health activity based on qualifications
which include: (a) Graduation from an accredited or approved program,
and (b) acceptable performance on a qualifying examination or series of
examinations.
(9) "Practitioner" means an individual who (a) has achieved
knowledge and skill by practice, and (b) is actively engaged in a
specified health profession.
(10) "Public member" means an individual who is not, and never was,
a member of the health profession being regulated or the spouse of a
member, or an individual who does not have and never has had a material
financial interest in either the rendering of the health professional
service being regulated or an activity directly related to the
profession being regulated.
(11) "Registration" means the formal notification which, prior to
rendering services, a practitioner shall submit to a state agency
setting forth the name and address of the practitioner; the location,
nature and operation of the health activity to be practiced; and, if
required by the regulatory entity, a description of the service to be
provided.
(12) "Regulatory entity" means any board, commission, agency,
division, or other unit or subunit of state government which regulates
one or more professions, occupations, industries, businesses, or other
endeavors in this state.
(13) "State agency" includes every state office, department, board,
commission, regulatory entity, and agency of the state, and, where
provided by law, programs and activities involving less than the full
responsibility of a state agency.

Sec. 14 RCW 18.130.040 and 2011 c 41 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iii) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(iv) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(v) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vi) East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06
RCW;
(vii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(viii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(ix) Hypnotherapists and agency affiliated counselors registered
and advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(x) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental health
counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, marriage and
family therapist associates, social workers, social work associates -- advanced, and social work associates -- independent clinical under
chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xi) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiii) ((Health care)) Medical assistants certified under chapter
18.135 RCW;
(xiv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xv) Chemical dependency professionals and chemical dependency
professional trainees certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;
(xvi) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xvii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xviii) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xix) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200
RCW;
(xx) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
(xxi) Recreational therapists (([under chapter 18.230 RCW])) under
chapter 18.230 RCW;
(xxii) Animal massage practitioners certified under chapter 18.240
RCW;
(xxiii) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW;
(xxiv) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW; and
(xxv) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290 RCW.
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW and
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW;
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW; and
(xv) The board of naturopathy established in chapter 18.36A RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses.
The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to
conditions.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 15 RCW 46.61.506 and 2010 c 53 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding
arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by any person while
driving or in actual physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, if the person's alcohol
concentration is less than 0.08, it is evidence that may be considered
with other competent evidence in determining whether the person was
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(2) The breath analysis shall be based upon grams of alcohol per
two hundred ten liters of breath. The foregoing provisions of this
section shall not be construed as limiting the introduction of any
other competent evidence bearing upon the question whether the person
was under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.
(3) Analysis of the person's blood or breath to be considered valid
under the provisions of this section or RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504
shall have been performed according to methods approved by the state
toxicologist and by an individual possessing a valid permit issued by
the state toxicologist for this purpose. The state toxicologist is
directed to approve satisfactory techniques or methods, to supervise
the examination of individuals to ascertain their qualifications and
competence to conduct such analyses, and to issue permits which shall
be subject to termination or revocation at the discretion of the state
toxicologist.
(4)(a) A breath test performed by any instrument approved by the
state toxicologist shall be admissible at trial or in an administrative
proceeding if the prosecution or department produces prima facie
evidence of the following:
(i) The person who performed the test was authorized to perform
such test by the state toxicologist;
(ii) The person being tested did not vomit or have anything to eat,
drink, or smoke for at least fifteen minutes prior to administration of
the test;
(iii) The person being tested did not have any foreign substances,
not to include dental work, fixed or removable, in his or her mouth at
the beginning of the fifteen-minute observation period;
(iv) Prior to the start of the test, the temperature of any liquid
simulator solution utilized as an external standard, as measured by a
thermometer approved of by the state toxicologist was thirty-four
degrees centigrade plus or minus 0.3 degrees centigrade;
(v) The internal standard test resulted in the message "verified";
(vi) The two breath samples agree to within plus or minus ten
percent of their mean to be determined by the method approved by the
state toxicologist;
(vii) The result of the test of the liquid simulator solution
external standard or dry gas external standard result did lie between
.072 to .088 inclusive; and
(viii) All blank tests gave results of .000.
(b) For purposes of this section, "prima facie evidence" is
evidence of sufficient circumstances that would support a logical and
reasonable inference of the facts sought to be proved. In assessing
whether there is sufficient evidence of the foundational facts, the
court or administrative tribunal is to assume the truth of the
prosecution's or department's evidence and all reasonable inferences
from it in a light most favorable to the prosecution or department.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prevent the subject
of the test from challenging the reliability or accuracy of the test,
the reliability or functioning of the instrument, or any maintenance
procedures. Such challenges, however, shall not preclude the
admissibility of the test once the prosecution or department has made
a prima facie showing of the requirements contained in (a) of this
subsection. Instead, such challenges may be considered by the trier of
fact in determining what weight to give to the test result.
(5) When a blood test is administered under the provisions of RCW
46.20.308, the withdrawal of blood for the purpose of determining its
alcoholic or drug content may be performed only by a physician, a
registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse, a nursing assistant as
defined in chapter 18.88A RCW, a physician assistant as defined in
chapter 18.71A RCW, a first responder as defined in chapter 18.73 RCW,
an emergency medical technician as defined in chapter 18.73 RCW, a
((health care)) medical assistant as defined in chapter 18.135 RCW, or
any technician trained in withdrawing blood. This limitation shall not
apply to the taking of breath specimens.
(6) The person tested may have a physician, or a qualified
technician, chemist, registered nurse, or other qualified person of his
or her own choosing administer one or more tests in addition to any
administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer. The test
will be admissible if the person establishes the general acceptability
of the testing technique or method. The failure or inability to obtain
an additional test by a person shall not preclude the admission of
evidence relating to the test or tests taken at the direction of a law
enforcement officer.
(7) Upon the request of the person who shall submit to a test or
tests at the request of a law enforcement officer, full information
concerning the test or tests shall be made available to him or her or
his or her attorney.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 18.135.010 (Practices authorized) and 2009 c 43 s 2, 2008
c 58 s 1, & 1984 c 281 s 1;
(2) RCW 18.135.025 (Rules -- Legislative intent) and 1986 c 216 s 1;
(3) RCW 18.135.050 (Certification by health care facility or
practitioner -- Roster -- Recertification) and 1996 c 191 s 82, 1991 c 3 s
274, & 1984 c 281 s 5;
(4) RCW 18.135.055 (Registering an initial or continuing
certification -- Fees) and 1996 c 191 s 83, 1991 c 3 s 275, & 1985 c 117
s 1; and
(5) RCW 18.135.062 (Renal dialysis training task force -- Development
of core competencies) and 2001 c 22 s 4.

--- END ---