BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) A health carrier that provides coverage for prescription
drugs shall provide a single limit on out-of-pocket expenses in all of
its health plans. All out-of-pocket expenses incurred by a covered
person for medical services, surgical services, mental health services,
or prescription drugs shall be included in the limit. The out-of-pocket limit required by this subsection may not exceed five thousand
nine hundred fifty dollars for plans that cover a single enrollee or
eleven thousand nine hundred dollars for plans that cover more than one
enrollee. In July 2013 and every July thereafter, the insurance
commissioner shall adjust the out-of-pocket limits in this subsection
to reflect the percentage change in the consumer price index for
medical care for a preceding twelve months, as determined by the United
States department of labor. The adjusted amounts shall apply on the
following January 1st.
(b) This subsection (1) does not apply to catastrophic health
plans.
(2) This section applies to health plans delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed on or after January 1, 2013.

--- END ---