BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.944 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 48 s 7026 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The fire service training account is hereby established in the
state treasury. The fund shall consist of:
(a) All fees received by the Washington state patrol for fire
service training;
(b) All grants and bequests accepted by the Washington state patrol
under RCW 43.43.940;
(c) Twenty percent of all moneys received by the state on fire
insurance premiums; and
(d) General fund -- state moneys appropriated into the account by the
legislature.
(2) Moneys in the account may be appropriated ((only)) for fire
service training and for the maintenance, operations, and capital
projects of the state fire training academy. The state patrol may use
amounts appropriated from the fire service training account under this
section to contract with the Washington state firefighters
apprenticeship trust for the operation of the firefighter joint
apprenticeship training program. The contract may call for payments on
a monthly basis. ((During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the
legislature may appropriate funds from this account for school fire
prevention activities within the Washington state patrol and for
repairs of the burn building.)) During the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium,
the legislature may appropriate funds from this account for school fire
prevention activities within the Washington state patrol, and for
predesign and repairs of the burn building.
(3) Any general fund -- state moneys appropriated into the account
shall be allocated solely to the firefighter joint apprenticeship
training program. The Washington state patrol may contract with
outside entities for the administration and delivery of the firefighter
joint apprenticeship training program.

--- END ---