BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature recognizes that the duty
given to the quality education council to recommend and inform the
legislature on the ongoing implementation of the evolving program of
basic education and the financing to support it is a duty of utmost
importance and should not have had a time limit imposed upon it. The
legislature finds that the duty given to the quality education council
includes recommending an implementation schedule for the education
reforms enacted by the legislature in 2009 and developing goals and
priorities for the educational system. The legislature appreciates
that the quality education council has made recommendations to the
legislature regarding basic education issues but regrettably has not
yet provided a complete and comprehensive implementation for all of the
2009 reforms nor for the goals and priorities for the educational
system. The legislature acknowledges that these duties are detailed
and complex, require a focus that is time consuming, and that the
quality education council is limited in the number of times it can
meet. Because the legislature deems these tasks to be necessary to
assist the legislature in complying with its constitutional duty to
define and amply fund a program of basic education, the legislature
intends to transfer to a different state entity the tasks of
recommending an implementation schedule for the reforms, goals, and
priorities for the educational system and to report back to the quality
education council and the legislature.
The legislature acknowledges that the purpose of the state board of
education already includes providing strategic oversight of public
education, leadership for the system, and promotion of the basic
education student learning goals. Therefore, the legislature
anticipates that the board can reasonably provide the quality education
council and the legislature with assistance regarding recommendations
for the implementation of the 2009 reforms and the financing to support
it.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.305
RCW to read as follows:
In addition to any other powers and duties provided by law, the
state board of education shall:
(1) Recommend to the quality education council and the legislature
an implementation schedule for the concurrent phase-in by the
legislature of the changes to the instructional program of basic
education and the implementation of the funding formulas and
allocations to support the new instructional program of basic education
as established under RCW 28A.150.200, 28A.150.220, and 28A.150.260.
Full implementation of the phase-in schedule must be completed by
September 1, 2018;
(2) Recommend to the quality education council an implementation
schedule for the phased-in implementation of the new distribution
formula for allocating state funds to school districts for the
transportation of students to and from school, in accordance with RCW
28A.160.192;
(3) Develop strategic recommendations on the program of basic
education for the common schools. The board must take into
consideration the capacity report produced under RCW 28A.300.172 and
the availability of data and the progress of implementing the data
systems required under RCW 28A.655.210. Any recommendations for
modifications to the program of basic education must be based on an
educational policy reason and evidence that the programs effectively
support student learning. The board shall update the statewide
strategic recommendations every four years. The recommendations are
intended to:
(a) Inform future educational policy and funding decisions of the
legislature and governor;
(b) Identify measurable goals and priorities for the educational
system in Washington state for a ten-year time period, including the
goals of basic education and ongoing strategies for coordinating
statewide efforts to eliminate the achievement gap and reduce student
dropout rates. The board shall work collaboratively with the
educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee to
develop the strategies to close the achievement gap; and
(c) Enable the state of Washington to continue to implement an
evolving program of basic education; and
(4) Submit an annual report to the quality education council, the
governor, and the legislature by January 1st, detailing its
recommendations. The first report due to the legislature by January 1,
2013, must include a complete and comprehensive implementation schedule
as required under subsections (1) and (2) of this section and the
initial measurable goals and priorities for the educational system the
initial measurable goals and priorities for the educational system in
Washington.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.175.075 and 2010 c 243 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
establish a state-level building bridges work group that includes K-12
and state agencies that work with youth who have dropped out or are at
risk of dropping out of school. The following agencies shall appoint
representatives to the work group: The office of the superintendent of
public instruction, the workforce training and education coordinating
board, the department of early learning, the employment security
department, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
department of health, the community mobilization office, and the
children's services and behavioral health and recovery divisions of the
department of social and health services. The work group should also
consist of one representative from each of the following agencies and
organizations: A statewide organization representing career and
technical education programs including skill centers; the juvenile
courts or the office of juvenile justice, or both; the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys; the Washington state office of
public defense; accredited institutions of higher education; the
educational service districts; the area workforce development councils;
parent and educator associations; ((achievement)) educational
opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee; office of the
education ombudsman; local school districts; agencies or organizations
that provide services to special education students; community
organizations serving youth; federally recognized tribes and urban
tribal centers; each of the major political caucuses of the senate and
house of representatives; and the minority commissions.
(2) To assist and enhance the work of the building bridges programs
established in RCW 28A.175.025, the state-level work group shall:
(a) Identify and make recommendations to the legislature for the
reduction of fiscal, legal, and regulatory barriers that prevent
coordination of program resources across agencies at the state and
local level;
(b) Develop and track performance measures and benchmarks for each
partner agency or organization across the state including performance
measures and benchmarks based on student characteristics and outcomes
specified in RCW 28A.175.035(1)(e); and
(c) Identify research-based and emerging best practices regarding
prevention, intervention, and retrieval programs.
(3)(a) The work group shall report to the quality education
council, the state board of education, appropriate committees of the
legislature, and the governor on an annual basis beginning December 1,
2007, with proposed strategies for building K-12 dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement systems in local communities throughout
the state including, but not limited to, recommendations for
implementing emerging best practices, needed additional resources, and
eliminating barriers.
(b) By September 15, 2010, the work group shall report on:
(i) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the
percentage of students graduating from high school;
(ii) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the
percentage of youth who have dropped out of school who should be
reengaged in education and be college and work ready;
(iii) Recommended funding for supporting career guidance and the
planning and implementation of K-12 dropout prevention, intervention,
and reengagement systems in school districts and a plan for phasing the
funding into the program of basic education, beginning in the 2011-2013
biennium; and
(iv) A plan for phasing in the expansion of the current school
improvement planning program to include state-funded, dropout-focused
school improvement technical assistance for school districts in
significant need of improvement regarding high school graduation rates.
(4) State agencies in the building bridges work group shall work
together, wherever feasible, on the following activities to support
school/family/community partnerships engaged in building K-12 dropout
prevention, intervention, and reengagement systems:
(a) Providing opportunities for coordination and flexibility of
program eligibility and funding criteria;
(b) Providing joint funding;
(c) Developing protocols and templates for model agreements on
sharing records and data;
(d) Providing joint professional development opportunities that
provide knowledge and training on:
(i) Research-based and promising practices;
(ii) The availability of programs and services for vulnerable
youth; and
(iii) Cultural competence.
(5) The building bridges work group shall make recommendations to
the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2010, on a state-level
and regional infrastructure for coordinating services for vulnerable
youth. Recommendations must address the following issues:
(a) Whether to adopt an official conceptual approach or framework
for all entities working with vulnerable youth that can support
coordinated planning and evaluation;
(b) The creation of a performance-based management system,
including outcomes, indicators, and performance measures relating to
vulnerable youth and programs serving them, including accountability
for the dropout issue;
(c) The development of regional and/or county-level multipartner
youth consortia with a specific charge to assist school districts and
local communities in building K-12 comprehensive dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement systems;
(d) The development of integrated or school-based one-stop shopping
for services that would:
(i) Provide individualized attention to the neediest youth and
prioritized access to services for students identified by a dropout
early warning and intervention data system;
(ii) Establish protocols for coordinating data and services,
including getting data release at time of intake and common assessment
and referral processes; and
(iii) Build a system of single case managers across agencies;
(e) Launching a statewide media campaign on increasing the high
school graduation rate; and
(f) Developing a statewide database of available services for
vulnerable youth.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.290.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 54 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The quality education council is created to recommend and
inform the ongoing implementation by the legislature of an evolving
program of basic education and the financing necessary to support such
program. ((The council shall develop strategic recommendations on the
program of basic education for the common schools. The council shall
take into consideration the capacity report produced under RCW
28A.300.172 and the availability of data and progress of implementing
the data systems required under RCW 28A.655.210.)) Any recommendations
for modifications to the program of basic education shall be based on
an educational policy reason and evidence that the programs effectively
support student learning. ((The council shall update the statewide
strategic recommendations every four years. The recommendations of the
council are intended to:
(a) Inform future educational policy and funding decisions of the
legislature and governor;
(b) Identify measurable goals and priorities for the educational
system in Washington state for a ten-year time period, including the
goals of basic education and ongoing strategies for coordinating
statewide efforts to eliminate the achievement gap and reduce student
dropout rates; and
(c) Enable the state of Washington to continue to implement an
evolving program of basic education.))
(2) The council may request updates and progress reports from the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of
education, the professional educator standards board, and the
department of early learning on the work of the agencies as well as
educational working groups established by the legislature. The council
may use these reports when making the council's annual report to the
legislature.
(3) The chair of the council shall be selected from the
councilmembers. The council shall be composed of the following
members:
(a) Four members of the house of representatives, with two members
representing each of the major caucuses and appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives;
(b) Four members of the senate, with two members representing each
of the major caucuses and appointed by the president of the senate;
(c) One representative each from the office of the governor, office
of the superintendent of public instruction, state board of education,
professional educator standards board, and department of early
learning; and
(d) One nonlegislative representative from the educational
opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee established
under RCW 28A.300.136, to be selected by the members of the committee.
(4) The council shall meet no more than four days a year.
(5)(((a))) The council shall submit an ((initial)) annual report to
the governor and the legislature by January 1st((, 2010, detailing its
recommendations, including recommendations for resolving issues or
decisions requiring legislative action during the 2010 legislative
session, and recommendations for any funding necessary to continue
development and implementation of chapter 548, Laws of 2009.
(b) The initial report shall, at a minimum, include:
(i) Consideration of how to establish a statewide beginning teacher
mentoring and support system;
(ii) Recommendations for a program of early learning for at-risk
children;
(iii) A recommended schedule for the concurrent phase-in of the
changes to the instructional program of basic education and the
implementation of the funding formulas and allocations to support the
new instructional program of basic education as established under
chapter 548, Laws of 2009. The phase-in schedule shall have full
implementation completed by September 1, 2018; and
(iv) A recommended schedule for phased-in implementation of the new
distribution formula for allocating state funds to school districts for
the transportation of students to and from school, with phase-in
beginning no later than September 1, 2013.
(6) The council shall submit a report to the legislature by January
1, 2012, detailing its recommendations for a comprehensive plan for a
voluntary program of early learning. Before submitting the report, the
council shall seek input from the early learning advisory council
created in RCW 43.215.090.
(7) The council shall submit a report to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2010, that includes:
(a) Recommendations for specific strategies, programs, and funding,
including funding allocations through the funding distribution formula
in RCW 28A.150.260, that are designed to close the achievement gap and
increase the high school graduation rate in Washington public schools.
The council shall consult with the educational opportunity gap
oversight and accountability committee and the building bridges work
group in developing its recommendations; and
(b) Recommendations for assuring adequate levels of state-funded
classified staff to support essential school and district services))
each year.
(((8))) (6) The council shall be staffed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and the office of financial
management. Additional staff support shall be provided by the state
entities with representatives on the council. Senate committee
services and the house of representatives office of program research
may provide additional staff support.
(((9))) (7) Legislative members of the council shall serve without
additional compensation but may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council
or on official business authorized by the council. Nonlegislative
members of the council may be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec. 5 RCW 28A.290.020 and 2010 c 236 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature intends to continue to redefine the
instructional program of education under RCW 28A.150.220 that fulfills
the obligations and requirements of Article IX of the state
Constitution. The funding formulas under RCW 28A.150.260 to support
the instructional program shall be implemented to the extent the
technical details of the formula have been established and according to
an implementation schedule to be adopted by the legislature. The
object of the schedule is to assure that any increases in funding
allocations are timely, predictable, and occur concurrently with any
increases in program or instructional requirements. It is the intent
of the legislature that no increased programmatic or instructional
expectations be imposed upon schools or school districts without an
accompanying increase in resources as necessary to support those
increased expectations.
(2) The office of financial management, with assistance and support
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall
convene a technical working group to:
(a) Develop the details of the funding formulas under RCW
28A.150.260;
(b) Recommend to the legislature an implementation schedule for
phasing-in any increased program or instructional requirements
concurrently with increases in funding for adoption by the legislature;
and
(c) Examine possible sources of revenue to support increases in
funding allocations and present options to the legislature and the
quality education council created in RCW 28A.290.010 for consideration.
(3) The working group shall include representatives of the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, school
district and educational service district financial managers, the
Washington association of school business officers, the Washington
education association, the Washington association of school
administrators, the association of Washington school principals, the
Washington state school directors' association, the public school
employees of Washington, and other interested stakeholders with
expertise in education finance. The working group may convene advisory
subgroups on specific topics as necessary to assure participation and
input from a broad array of diverse stakeholders.
(4) The working group shall be monitored and overseen by the
legislature and the quality education council established in RCW
28A.290.010. The working group shall submit its recommendations to the
legislature by December 1, 2009.
(5) After the 2009 report to the legislature, the ((office of
financial management)) state board of education and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction ((shall)) may periodically
reconvene the working group to monitor and provide advice and technical
assistance on further development and implementation of the funding
formulas under RCW 28A.150.260 ((and provide technical assistance to
the ongoing work of the quality education council)).

Sec. 6 RCW 28A.400.201 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 468 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The legislature recognizes that providing students with the
opportunity to access a world-class educational system depends on our
continuing ability to provide students with access to world-class
educators. The legislature also understands that continuing to attract
and retain the highest quality educators will require increased
investments. The legislature intends to enhance the current salary
allocation model and recognizes that changes to the current model
cannot be imposed without great deliberation and input from teachers,
administrators, and classified employees. Therefore, it is the intent
of the legislature to begin the process of developing an enhanced
salary allocation model that is collaboratively designed to ensure the
rationality of any conclusions regarding what constitutes adequate
compensation.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2011, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, in collaboration with the human resources director
in the office of financial management, shall convene a technical
working group to recommend the details of an enhanced salary allocation
model that aligns state expectations for educator development and
certification with the compensation system and establishes
recommendations for a concurrent implementation schedule. In addition
to any other details the technical working group deems necessary, the
technical working group shall make recommendations on the following:
(a) How to reduce the number of tiers within the existing salary
allocation model;
(b) How to account for labor market adjustments;
(c) How to account for different geographic regions of the state
where districts may encounter difficulty recruiting and retaining
teachers;
(d) The role of and types of bonuses available;
(e) Ways to accomplish salary equalization over a set number of
years; and
(f) Initial fiscal estimates for implementing the recommendations
including a recognition that staff on the existing salary allocation
model would have the option to grandfather in permanently to the
existing schedule.
(3) As part of its work, the technical working group shall conduct
or contract for a preliminary comparative labor market analysis of
salaries and other compensation for school district employees to be
conducted and shall include the results in any reports to the
legislature. For the purposes of this subsection, "salaries and other
compensation" includes average base salaries, average total salaries,
average employee basic benefits, and retirement benefits.
(4) The analysis required under subsection (1) of this section
must:
(a) Examine salaries and other compensation for teachers, other
certificated instructional staff, principals, and other building-level
certificated administrators, and the types of classified employees for
whom salaries are allocated;
(b) Be calculated at a statewide level that identifies labor
markets in Washington through the use of data from the United States
bureau of the census and the bureau of labor statistics; and
(c) Include a comparison of salaries and other compensation to the
appropriate labor market for at least the following subgroups of
educators: Beginning teachers and types of educational staff
associates.
(5) The working group shall include representatives of the office
of financial management, the professional educator standards board, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington
education association, the Washington association of school
administrators, the association of Washington school principals, the
Washington state school directors' association, the public school
employees of Washington, and other interested stakeholders with
appropriate expertise in compensation related matters. The working
group may convene advisory subgroups on specific topics as necessary to
assure participation and input from a broad array of diverse
stakeholders.
(6) The working group shall be monitored and overseen by the
legislature ((and)), the quality education council created in RCW
28A.290.010, and the state board of education. The working group shall
make an initial report to the legislature by June 30, 2012, and shall
include in its report recommendations for whether additional further
work of the group is necessary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 RCW 28A.290.020 is recodified as a section
in chapter 28A.300 RCW.

--- END ---