BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.88.070 and 2007 c 368 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of promoting prostitution in the first
degree if he or she knowingly advances prostitution:
(a) By compelling a person by threat or force to engage in
prostitution or profits from prostitution which results from such
threat or force; or
(b) By compelling a person with a mental or developmental
disability, that renders the person incapable of consent, to engage in
prostitution or profits from prostitution.
(2) Promoting prostitution in the first degree is a class B felony.

--- END ---