BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.68A.101 and 2010 c 289 s 14 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of promoting commercial sexual abuse of a
minor if he or she knowingly advances commercial sexual abuse or a
sexually explicit act of a minor or profits from a minor engaged in
sexual conduct or a sexually explicit act.
(2) Promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor is a class A
felony.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) A person "advances commercial sexual abuse of a minor" if,
acting other than as a minor receiving compensation for personally
rendered sexual conduct or as a person engaged in commercial sexual
abuse of a minor, he or she causes or aids a person to commit or engage
in commercial sexual abuse of a minor, procures or solicits customers
for commercial sexual abuse of a minor, provides persons or premises
for the purposes of engaging in commercial sexual abuse of a minor,
operates or assists in the operation of a house or enterprise for the
purposes of engaging in commercial sexual abuse of a minor, or engages
in any other conduct designed to institute, aid, cause, assist, or
facilitate an act or enterprise of commercial sexual abuse of a minor.
(b) A person "profits from commercial sexual abuse of a minor" if,
acting other than as a minor receiving compensation for personally
rendered sexual conduct, he or she accepts or receives money or other
property pursuant to an agreement or understanding with any person
whereby he or she participates or will participate in the proceeds of
commercial sexual abuse of a minor.
(c) A "sexually explicit act" is a public, private, or live
photographed, recorded, or videotaped act or show intended to arouse or
satisfy the sexual desires or appeal to the prurient interests of
patrons.
(4) For purposes of this section, "sexual conduct" means sexual
intercourse or sexual contact, both as defined in chapter 9A.44 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.40.100 and 2011 c 111 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person is guilty of trafficking in the first degree when:
(i) Such person:
(A) Recruits, harbors, transports, transfers, provides, obtains, or
receives by any means another person knowing that force, fraud, or
coercion as defined in RCW 9A.36.070 will be used to cause the person
to engage in forced labor, involuntary servitude, a sexually explicit
act, or a commercial sex act; or
(B) Benefits financially or by receiving anything of value from
participation in a venture that has engaged in acts set forth in
(a)(i)(A) of this subsection; and
(ii) The acts or venture set forth in (a)(i) of this subsection:
(A) Involve committing or attempting to commit kidnapping;
(B) Involve a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835;
(C) Involve the illegal harvesting or sale of human organs; or
(D) Result in a death.
(b) Trafficking in the first degree is a class A felony.
(2)(a) A person is guilty of trafficking in the second degree when
such person:
(i) Recruits, harbors, transports, transfers, provides, obtains, or
receives by any means another person knowing that force, fraud, or
coercion as defined in RCW 9A.36.070 will be used to cause the person
to engage in forced labor, involuntary servitude, a sexually explicit
act, or a commercial sex act; or
(ii) Benefits financially or by receiving anything of value from
participation in a venture that has engaged in acts set forth in (a)(i)
of this subsection.
(b) Trafficking in the second degree is a class A felony.
(3) For purposes of this section, "sexually explicit act" means a
public, private, or live photographed, recorded, or videotaped act or
show intended to arouse or satisfy the sexual desires or appeal to the
prurient interests of patrons.

--- END ---