BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.40.090 and 1995 c 156 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person commits the crime of luring if the person:
(1)(a) Orders, lures, or attempts to lure a minor or a person with
a developmental disability into any area or structure that is obscured
from or inaccessible to the public, or away from any area or structure
constituting a bus terminal, airport terminal, or other transportation
terminal, or into a motor vehicle;
(b) Does not have the consent of the minor's parent or guardian or
of the guardian of the person with a developmental disability; and
(c) Is unknown to the child or developmentally disabled person.
(2) It is a defense to luring, which the defendant must prove by a
preponderance of the evidence, that the defendant's actions were
reasonable under the circumstances and the defendant did not have any
intent to harm the health, safety, or welfare of the minor or the
person with the developmental disability.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Minor" means a person under the age of sixteen;
(b) "Person with a developmental disability" means a person with a
developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.
(4) Luring is a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---