BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9.94A.753 and 2003 c 379 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
This section applies to offenses committed after July 1, 1985.
(1) When restitution is ordered, the court shall determine the
amount of restitution due at the sentencing hearing or within one
hundred eighty days except as provided in subsection (7) of this
section. The court may continue the hearing beyond the one hundred
eighty days for good cause. The court shall then set a minimum monthly
payment that the offender is required to make towards the restitution
that is ordered. The court should take into consideration the total
amount of the restitution owed, the offender's present, past, and
future ability to pay, as well as any assets that the offender may
have.
(2) During the period of supervision, the community corrections
officer may examine the offender to determine if there has been a
change in circumstances that warrants an amendment of the monthly
payment schedule. The community corrections officer may recommend a
change to the schedule of payment and shall inform the court of the
recommended change and the reasons for the change. The sentencing
court may then reset the monthly minimum payments based on the report
from the community corrections officer of the change in circumstances.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section,
restitution ordered by a court pursuant to a criminal conviction shall
be based on easily ascertainable damages for injury to or loss of
property, actual expenses incurred for treatment for injury to persons,
and lost wages resulting from injury. Restitution shall not include
reimbursement for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or
other intangible losses, but may include the costs of counseling
reasonably related to the offense. The amount of restitution shall not
exceed double the amount of the offender's gain or the victim's loss
from the commission of the crime.
(4) For the purposes of this section, for an offense committed
prior to July 1, 2000, the offender shall remain under the court's
jurisdiction for a term of ten years following the offender's release
from total confinement or ten years subsequent to the entry of the
judgment and sentence, whichever period ends later. Prior to the
expiration of the initial ten-year period, the superior court may
extend jurisdiction under the criminal judgment an additional ten years
for payment of restitution. For an offense committed on or after July
1, 2000, the offender shall remain under the court's jurisdiction until
the obligation is completely satisfied, regardless of the statutory
maximum for the crime. The portion of the sentence concerning
restitution may be modified as to amount, terms, and conditions during
any period of time the offender remains under the court's jurisdiction,
regardless of the expiration of the offender's term of community
supervision and regardless of the statutory maximum sentence for the
crime. The court may not reduce the total amount of restitution
ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay the total
amount. The offender's compliance with the restitution shall be
supervised by the department only during any period which the
department is authorized to supervise the offender in the community
under RCW 9.94A.728, 9.94A.501, or in which the offender is in
confinement in a state correctional institution or a correctional
facility pursuant to a transfer agreement with the department, and the
department shall supervise the offender's compliance during any such
period. The department is responsible for supervision of the offender
only during confinement and authorized supervision and not during any
subsequent period in which the offender remains under the court's
jurisdiction. The county clerk is authorized to collect unpaid
restitution at any time the offender remains under the jurisdiction of
the court for purposes of his or her legal financial obligations.
(5) Restitution shall be ordered whenever the offender is convicted
of an offense which results in injury to any person or damage to or
loss of property or as provided in subsection (6) of this section
unless extraordinary circumstances exist which make restitution
inappropriate in the court's judgment and the court sets forth such
circumstances in the record. Restitution shall be mandatory for the
crimes of human trafficking (RCW 9A.40.100), promoting prostitution in
the first degree (RCW 9A.88.070), and promoting commercial sexual abuse
of minors (RCW 9.68A.100) regardless of extraordinary circumstances.
In addition, restitution shall be ordered to pay for an injury, loss,
or damage if the offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer
offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the
offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or
offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement.
(6) Restitution for the crime of rape of a child in the first,
second, or third degree, in which the victim becomes pregnant, shall
include: (a) All of the victim's medical expenses that are associated
with the rape and resulting pregnancy; and (b) child support for any
child born as a result of the rape if child support is ordered pursuant
to a civil superior court or administrative order for support for that
child. The clerk must forward any restitution payments made on behalf
of the victim's child to the Washington state child support registry
under chapter 26.23 RCW. Identifying information about the victim and
child shall not be included in the order. The offender shall receive
a credit against any obligation owing under the administrative or
superior court order for support of the victim's child. For the
purposes of this subsection, the offender shall remain under the
court's jurisdiction until the offender has satisfied support
obligations under the superior court or administrative order for the
period provided in RCW 4.16.020 or a maximum term of twenty-five years
following the offender's release from total confinement or twenty-five
years subsequent to the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever
period is longer. The court may not reduce the total amount of
restitution ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay
the total amount. The department shall supervise the offender's
compliance with the restitution ordered under this subsection.
(7) Regardless of the provisions of subsections (1) through (6) of
this section, the court shall order restitution in all cases where the
victim is entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation
act, chapter 7.68 RCW. If the court does not order restitution and the
victim of the crime has been determined to be entitled to benefits
under the crime victims' compensation act, the department of labor and
industries, as administrator of the crime victims' compensation
program, may petition the court within one year of entry of the
judgment and sentence for entry of a restitution order. Upon receipt
of a petition from the department of labor and industries, the court
shall hold a restitution hearing and shall enter a restitution order.
(8) In addition to any sentence that may be imposed, an offender
who has been found guilty of an offense involving fraud or other
deceptive practice or an organization which has been found guilty of
any such offense may be ordered by the sentencing court to give notice
of the conviction to the class of persons or to the sector of the
public affected by the conviction or financially interested in the
subject matter of the offense by mail, by advertising in designated
areas or through designated media, or by other appropriate means.
(9) This section does not limit civil remedies or defenses
available to the victim, survivors of the victim, or offender including
support enforcement remedies for support ordered under subsection (6)
of this section for a child born as a result of a rape of a child
victim. The court shall identify in the judgment and sentence the
victim or victims entitled to restitution and what amount is due each
victim. The state or victim may enforce the court-ordered restitution
in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action. Restitution
collected through civil enforcement must be paid through the registry
of the court and must be distributed proportionately according to each
victim's loss when there is more than one victim.

--- END ---