BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 9A.40.100 and 2011 c 111 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) A person is guilty of trafficking in the first degree when:
(i) Such person:
(A) Recruits, harbors, transports, transfers, provides, obtains, or
receives by any means another person knowing that force, fraud, or
coercion as defined in RCW 9A.36.070 will be used to cause the person
to engage in forced labor, involuntary servitude, or a commercial sex
act; or
(B) Benefits financially or by receiving anything of value from
participation in a venture that has engaged in acts set forth in
(a)(i)(A) of this subsection; and
(ii) The acts or venture set forth in (a)(i) of this subsection:
(A) Involve committing or attempting to commit kidnapping;
(B) Involve a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.835;
(C) Involve the illegal harvesting or sale of human organs; or
(D) Result in a death.
(b) Trafficking in the first degree is a class A felony.
(2)(a) A person is guilty of trafficking in the second degree when
such person:
(i) Recruits, harbors, transports, transfers, provides, obtains, or
receives by any means another person knowing that force, fraud, or
coercion as defined in RCW 9A.36.070 will be used to cause the person
to engage in forced labor, involuntary servitude, or a commercial sex
act; or
(ii) Benefits financially or by receiving anything of value from
participation in a venture that has engaged in acts set forth in (a)(i)
of this subsection.
(b) Trafficking in the second degree is a class A felony.
(3)(a) A person who is either convicted or given a deferred
sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a statutory
or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for a
violation of a trafficking crime shall be assessed a three thousand
dollar fee.
(b) The court shall not reduce, waive, or suspend payment of all or
part of the fee assessed in this section unless it finds, on the
record, that the offender does not have the ability to pay the fee in
which case it may reduce the fee by an amount up to two-thirds of the
maximum allowable fee.
(c) Fees assessed under this section shall be collected by the
clerk of the court and remitted to the treasurer of the county where
the offense occurred for deposit in the county general fund, except in
cases in which the offense occurred in a city or town that provides for
its own law enforcement, in which case these amounts shall be remitted
to the treasurer of the city or town for deposit in the general fund of
the city or town. Revenue from the fees must be used for local efforts
to reduce the commercial sale of sex including, but not limited to,
increasing enforcement of commercial sex laws.
(i) At least fifty percent of the revenue from fees imposed under
this section must be spent on prevention, including education programs
for offenders, such as john school, and rehabilitative services, such
as mental health and substance abuse counseling, parenting skills,
training, housing relief, education, vocational training, drop-in
centers, and employment counseling.
(ii) Revenues from these fees are not subject to the distribution
requirements under RCW 3.50.100, 3.62.020, 3.62.040, 10.82.070, or
35.20.220.

Sec. 2 RCW 9A.44.128 and 2011 c 337 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
For the purposes of RCW 9A.44.130 through 9A.44.145, 10.01.200,
43.43.540, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Business day" means any day other than Saturday, Sunday, or a
legal local, state, or federal holiday.
(2) "Conviction" means any adult conviction or juvenile
adjudication for a sex offense or kidnapping offense.
(3) "Disqualifying offense" means a conviction for: Any offense
that is a felony; a sex offense as defined in this section; a crime
against children or persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830(5) and
9.94A.411(2)(a); an offense with a domestic violence designation as
provided in RCW 10.99.020; permitting the commercial sexual abuse of a
minor as defined in RCW 9.68A.103; or any violation of chapter 9A.88
RCW.
(4) "Employed" or "carries on a vocation" means employment that is
full time or part time for a period of time exceeding fourteen days, or
for an aggregate period of time exceeding thirty days during any
calendar year. A person is employed or carries on a vocation whether
the person's employment is financially compensated, volunteered, or for
the purpose of government or educational benefit.
(5) "Fixed residence" means a building that a person lawfully and
habitually uses as living quarters a majority of the week. Uses as
living quarters means to conduct activities consistent with the common
understanding of residing, such as sleeping; eating; keeping personal
belongings; receiving mail; and paying utilities, rent, or mortgage.
A nonpermanent structure including, but not limited to, a motor home,
travel trailer, camper, or boat may qualify as a residence provided it
is lawfully and habitually used as living quarters a majority of the
week, primarily kept at one location with a physical address, and the
location it is kept at is either owned or rented by the person or used
by the person with the permission of the owner or renter. A shelter
program may qualify as a residence provided it is a shelter program
designed to provide temporary living accommodations for the homeless,
provides an offender with a personally assigned living space, and the
offender is permitted to store belongings in the living space.
(6) "In the community" means residing outside of confinement or
incarceration for a disqualifying offense.
(7) "Institution of higher education" means any public or private
institution dedicated to postsecondary education, including any
college, university, community college, trade, or professional school.
(8) "Kidnapping offense" means:
(a) The crimes of kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the
second degree, and unlawful imprisonment, as defined in chapter 9A.40
RCW, where the victim is a minor and the offender is not the minor's
parent;
(b) Any offense that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal
attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit an
offense that is classified as a kidnapping offense under this
subsection; and
(c) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for: An offense for
which the person would be required to register as a kidnapping offender
if residing in the state of conviction; or, if not required to register
in the state of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this
state would be classified as a kidnapping offense under this
subsection.
(9) "Lacks a fixed residence" means the person does not have a
living situation that meets the definition of a fixed residence and
includes, but is not limited to, a shelter program designed to provide
temporary living accommodations for the homeless, an outdoor sleeping
location, or locations where the person does not have permission to
stay.
(10) "Sex offense" means:
(a) Any offense defined as a sex offense by RCW 9.94A.030;
(b) Any violation under RCW 9A.44.096 (sexual misconduct with a
minor in the second degree);
(c) Any violation under RCW 9.68A.090 (communication with a minor
for immoral purposes);
(d) A second or subsequent violation under RCW 9A.88.070 (promoting
prostitution in the first degree) or RCW 9A.88.080 (promoting
prostitution in the second degree);
(e) Any gross misdemeanor that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a
criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense under RCW
9.94A.030 or this subsection;
(((e))) (f) Any out-of-state conviction for an offense for which
the person would be required to register as a sex offender while
residing in the state of conviction; or, if not required to register in
the state of conviction, an offense that under the laws of this state
would be classified as a sex offense under this subsection;
(((f))) (g) Any federal conviction classified as a sex offense
under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 16911 (SORNA);
(((g))) (h) Any military conviction for a sex offense. This
includes sex offenses under the uniform code of military justice, as
specified by the United States secretary of defense;
(((h))) (i) Any conviction in a foreign country for a sex offense
if it was obtained with sufficient safeguards for fundamental fairness
and due process for the accused under guidelines or regulations
established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 16912.
(11) "School" means a public or private school regulated under
Title 28A RCW or chapter 72.40 RCW.
(12) "Student" means a person who is enrolled, on a full-time or
part-time basis, in any school or institution of higher education.

Sec. 3 RCW 9A.88.120 and 2007 c 368 s 12 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.010((,)) and
9A.88.030((, and 9A.88.090)), a person who is either convicted or given
a deferred sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into
a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an
arrest for violating RCW 9A.88.010, 9A.88.030, ((9A.88.090,)) or
comparable county or municipal ordinances shall be assessed a fifty
dollar fee.
(b) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.090, a person
who is either convicted or given a deferred sentence or a deferred
prosecution or who has entered into a statutory or nonstatutory
diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for violating RCW
9A.88.090 or comparable county or municipal ordinances shall be
assessed a fee in the amount of:
(i) One thousand five hundred dollars for the first offense;
(ii) Two thousand five hundred dollars for the second offense; and
(iii) Five thousand dollars for the third and each subsequent
offense.
(c) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.110, a person
who is either convicted or given a deferred sentence or a deferred
prosecution or who has entered into a statutory or nonstatutory
diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for violating RCW
9A.88.110 or a comparable county or municipal ordinance shall be
assessed a ((one hundred fifty dollar)) fee in the amount of:
(i) One thousand five hundred dollars for the first offense;
(ii) Two thousand five hundred dollars for the second offense; and
(iii) Five thousand dollars for the third and each subsequent
offense.
(((c))) (d) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.070 and
9A.88.080, a person who is either convicted or given a deferred
sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a statutory
or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for
violating RCW 9A.88.070, 9A.88.080, or comparable county or municipal
ordinances shall be assessed a ((three hundred dollar)) fee in the
amount of:
(i) Three thousand dollars for the first offense;
(ii) Six thousand dollars for the second offense; and
(iii) Ten thousand dollars for the third and each subsequent
offense.
(2) ((The court may not suspend payment of all or part of the fee
unless it finds that the person does not have the ability to pay.
(3))) When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender or has
entered into a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement for an
offense which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a violation
under this chapter or comparable county or municipal ordinances, the
court shall assess the fee as specified under subsection (1) of this
section. ((The court may not suspend payment of all or part of the fee
unless it finds that the minor does not have the ability to pay the
fee.
(4) Any fee assessed under this section shall be collected by the
clerk of the court and distributed each month to the state treasurer
for deposit in the prostitution prevention and intervention account
under RCW 43.63A.740 for the purpose of funding prostitution prevention
and intervention activities.))
(3) The court shall not reduce, waive, or suspend payment of all or
part of the assessed fee in this section unless it finds, on the
record, that the offender does not have the ability to pay the fee in
which case it may reduce the fee by an amount up to two-thirds of the
maximum allowable fee.
(4) Fees assessed under this section shall be collected by the
clerk of the court and remitted to the treasurer of the county where
the offense occurred for deposit in the county general fund, except in
cases in which the offense occurred in a city or town that provides for
its own law enforcement, in which case these amounts shall be remitted
to the treasurer of the city or town for deposit in the general fund of
the city or town. Revenue from the fees must be used for local efforts
to reduce the commercial sale of sex including, but not limited to,
increasing enforcement of commercial sex laws.
(a) At least fifty percent of the revenue from fees imposed under
this section must be spent on prevention, including education programs
for offenders, such as john school, and rehabilitative services, such
as mental health and substance abuse counseling, parenting skills,
training, housing relief, education, vocational training, drop-in
centers, and employment counseling.
(b) Revenues from these fees are not subject to the distribution
requirements under RCW 3.50.100, 3.62.020, 3.62.040, 10.82.070, or
35.20.220.
(5) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement" means an
agreement under RCW 13.40.080 or any written agreement between a person
accused of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section and a
court, county, or city prosecutor, or designee thereof, whereby the
person agrees to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution.
(b) "Deferred sentence" means a sentence that will not be carried
out if the defendant meets certain requirements, such as complying with
the conditions of probation.

Sec. 4 RCW 9.68A.105 and 2010 c 289 s 15 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9.68A.100,
9.68A.101, and 9.68A.102, a person who is either convicted or given a
deferred sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered into a
statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement as a result of an arrest
for violating RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9.68A.102, or a comparable
county or municipal ordinance shall be assessed a five thousand dollar
fee.
(b) The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend payment of all or
part of the fee assessed unless it finds, on the record, that the
person does not have the ability to pay in which case it may reduce the
fee by an amount up to two-thirds of the maximum allowable fee.
(c) When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender or has
entered into a statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement for an
offense which, if committed by an adult, would constitute a violation
of RCW 9.68A.100, 9.68A.101, or 9.68A.102, or a comparable county or
municipal ordinance, the court shall assess the fee under (a) of this
subsection. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend payment of all
or part of the fee assessed unless it finds, on the record, that the
minor does not have the ability to pay the fee in which case it may
reduce the fee by an amount up to two-thirds of the maximum allowable
fee.
(2) ((The fee assessed under subsection (1) of this section shall
be collected by the clerk of the court and distributed each month to
the state treasurer for deposit in the prostitution prevention and
intervention account under RCW 43.63A.740 for the purpose of funding
prostitution prevention and intervention activities.)) Fees assessed
under this section shall be collected by the clerk of the court and
remitted to the treasurer of the county where the offense occurred for
deposit in the county general fund, except in cases in which the
offense occurred in a city or town that provides for its own law
enforcement, in which case these amounts shall be remitted to the
treasurer of the city or town for deposit in the general fund of the
city or town. Revenue from the fees must be used for local efforts to
reduce the commercial sale of sex including, but not limited to,
increasing enforcement of commercial sex laws.
(a) At least fifty percent of the revenue from fees imposed under
this section must be spent on prevention, including education programs
for offenders, such as john school, and rehabilitative services, such
as mental health and substance abuse counseling, parenting skills,
training, housing relief, education, vocational training, drop-in
centers, and employment counseling.
(b) Revenues from these fees are not subject to the distribution
requirements under RCW 3.50.100, 3.62.020, 3.62.040, 10.82.070, or
35.20.220.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Statutory or nonstatutory diversion agreement" means an
agreement under RCW 13.40.080 or any written agreement between a person
accused of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section and a
court, county or city prosecutor, or designee thereof, whereby the
person agrees to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution.
(b) "Deferred sentence" means a sentence that will not be carried
out if the defendant meets certain requirements, such as complying with
the conditions of probation.

Sec. 5 RCW 3.50.100 and 2009 c 479 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Costs in civil and criminal actions may be imposed as provided
in district court. All fees, costs, fines, forfeitures and other money
imposed by any municipal court for the violation of any municipal or
town ordinances shall be collected by the court clerk and, together
with any other noninterest revenues received by the clerk, shall be
deposited with the city or town treasurer as a part of the general fund
of the city or town, or deposited in such other fund of the city or
town, or deposited in such other funds as may be designated by the laws
of the state of Washington.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120 and 10.99.080, the city
treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest
money received under this section, other than for parking infractions,
and certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in
this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in
civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded
against convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund, twenty-five
percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information
system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the
city general fund, and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to
fund local courts.

Sec. 6 RCW 3.62.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 44 s 1 are each amended
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
costs, fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected in
whole or in part by district courts, except costs, fines, forfeitures
and penalties assessed and collected, in whole or in part, because of
the violation of city ordinances, shall be remitted by the clerk of the
district court to the county treasurer at least monthly, together with
a financial statement as required by the state auditor, noting the
information necessary for crediting of such funds as required by law.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120, 10.99.080, and this
section, the county treasurer shall remit thirty-two percent of the
noninterest money received under subsection (1) of this section except
certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this
subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil
actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against
convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state or county in the
prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. With
the exception of funds to be transferred to the judicial stabilization
trust account under RCW 3.62.060(2), money remitted under this
subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the state
general fund.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received by the county
treasurer under subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in
the county current expense fund. Funds deposited under this subsection
that are attributable to the county's portion of a surcharge imposed
under RCW 3.62.060(2) must be used to support local trial court and
court-related functions.
(4) All money collected for county parking infractions shall be
remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly, with the
information required under subsection (1) of this section, to the
county treasurer for deposit in the county current expense fund.
(5) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund, twenty-five
percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information
system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the
county current expense fund, and twenty-five percent to the county
current expense fund to fund local courts.

Sec. 7 RCW 3.62.040 and 2009 c 479 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all
costs, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected, in
whole or in part, by district courts because of violations of city
ordinances shall be remitted by the clerk of the district court at
least monthly directly to the treasurer of the city wherein the
violation occurred.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120 and 10.99.080, the city
treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest
money received under this section, other than for parking infractions
and certain costs, to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in
this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in
civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded
against convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) All money collected for city parking infractions shall be
remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly to the
city treasurer for deposit in the city's general fund.
(5) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund, twenty-five
percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information
system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the
city general fund, and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to
fund local courts.

Sec. 8 RCW 10.82.070 and 2009 c 479 s 13 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) All sums of money derived from costs, fines, penalties, and
forfeitures imposed or collected, in whole or in part, by a superior
court for violation of orders of injunction, mandamus and other like
writs, for contempt of court, or for breach of the penal laws shall be
paid in cash by the person collecting the same, within twenty days
after the collection, to the county treasurer of the county in which
the same have accrued.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120 and 10.99.080, the county
treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the money received
under this section except for certain costs to the state treasurer for
deposit in the state general fund and shall deposit the remainder as
provided by law. "Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means
those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW
4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted
defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or
36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are specifically
designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the specific
reimbursement of costs incurred by the state or county in the
prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Costs
or assessments awarded to dedicated accounts, state or local, are not
subject to this state allocation or to RCW 7.68.035.
(3) All fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties collected or
assessed by a district court because of the violation of a state law
shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is
later amended. All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected
or assessed by a superior court in cases on appeal from a lower court
shall be remitted to the municipal or district court from which the
cases were appealed.

Sec. 9 RCW 35.20.220 and 2009 c 479 s 19 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The chief clerk, under the supervision and direction of the
court administrator of the municipal court, shall have the custody and
care of the books, papers and records of the court. The chief clerk or
a deputy shall be present during the session of the court and has the
power to swear all witnesses and jurors, administer oaths and
affidavits, and take acknowledgments. The chief clerk shall keep the
records of the court and shall issue all process under his or her hand
and the seal of the court. The chief clerk shall do and perform all
things and have the same powers pertaining to the office as the clerks
of the superior courts have in their office. He or she shall receive
all fines, penalties, and fees of every kind and keep a full, accurate,
and detailed account of the same. The chief clerk shall on each day
pay into the city treasury all money received for the city during the
day previous, with a detailed account of the same, and taking the
treasurer's receipt therefor.
(2) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120 and 10.99.080, the city
treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest
money received under this section, other than for parking infractions
and certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in
this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in
civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded
against convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160,
10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are
specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the
specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or
town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense
counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer
shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this
section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.
(4) Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue
interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a
collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in
collection status.
(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the
state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund, twenty-five
percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information
system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to the
city general fund, and twenty-five percent to the city general fund to
fund local courts.

--- END ---