BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.77.065 and 2008 c 213 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a)(i) The facility conducting the evaluation shall provide its
report and recommendation to the court in which the criminal proceeding
is pending. A copy of the report and recommendation shall be provided
to the designated mental health professional, the prosecuting attorney,
the defense attorney, and the professional person at the local
correctional facility where the defendant is being held, or if there is
no professional person, to the person designated under (a)(ii) of this
subsection. Upon request, the facility shall also provide copies of
any source documents relevant to the evaluation to the designated
mental health professional. The report and recommendation shall be
provided not less than twenty-four hours preceding the transfer of the
defendant to the correctional facility in the county in which the
criminal proceeding is pending.
(ii) If there is no professional person at the local correctional
facility, the local correctional facility shall designate a
professional person as defined in RCW 71.05.020 or, in cooperation with
the regional support network, a professional person at the regional
support network to receive the report and recommendation.
(iii) When a defendant is transferred to the facility conducting
the evaluation, or upon commencement of a defendant's evaluation in the
local correctional facility, the local correctional facility must
notify the evaluator or the facility conducting the evaluation of the
name of the professional person, or person designated under (a)(ii) of
this subsection to receive the report and recommendation.
(b) If the facility concludes, under RCW 10.77.060(3)(f), the
person should be kept under further control, an evaluation shall be
conducted of such person under chapter 71.05 RCW. The court shall
order an evaluation be conducted by the appropriate designated mental
health professional: (i) Prior to release from confinement for such
person who is convicted, if sentenced to confinement for twenty-four
months or less; (ii) for any person who is acquitted; or (iii) for any
person: (A) Whose charges are dismissed pursuant to RCW 10.77.086(4);
or (B) whose nonfelony charges are dismissed.
(2) The designated mental health professional shall provide written
notification within twenty-four hours of the results of the
determination whether to commence proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW.
The notification shall be provided to the persons identified in
subsection (1)(a) of this section.
(3) The prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the results of
any proceedings commenced by the designated mental health professional
under subsection (2) of this section to the facility conducting the
evaluation under this chapter.
(4) A facility conducting a civil commitment evaluation under RCW
10.77.086(4) or 10.77.088(1)(b)(ii) that makes a determination to
release the person instead of filing a civil commitment petition must
provide written notification to the prosecuting attorney within twenty-four hours of the determination.
(5) The fact of admission and all information and records compiled,
obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services under this
chapter may also be disclosed to the courts solely to prevent the entry
of any evaluation or treatment order that is inconsistent with any
order entered under chapter 71.05 RCW.

--- END ---