BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The Washington center for marine
innovation is established to promote innovation in and education
involving the development, design, manufacturing, and repair and refit
of commercial and recreational marine watercraft, equipment, and
alternative fuel.
(2) The Washington center for marine innovation may undertake any
actions consistent with its purpose under subsection (1) of this
section, including:
(a) Providing or enhancing educational opportunities, technical
skill development, and workforce training on matters including the
development, manufacturing, and repair and refit of marine watercraft,
equipment, marine building materials, including composites, aluminum,
and steel, and alternative fuels;
(b) Promoting innovation on matters consistent with (a) of this
subsection through cooperation among institutions of higher education
and between public and private sector participants; and
(c) Seeking any available grants or other funding opportunities to
achieve the purposes of this section.
(3) The Washington center for marine innovation consists of
Bellingham Technical College, Skagit Valley College, including its
Northwest center of excellence for marine manufacturing and technology,
and Western Washington University. These entities may invite other
appropriate institutions of higher education and marine-related
businesses and nongovernmental organizations to participate in the
center. Participants in the center must work collaboratively to
develop and operate the center to achieve the purposes of this section.
For administrative purposes, the center shall be located in and
coordinated by Skagit Valley College.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The marine innovation account is created in
the state treasury. All moneys collected under RCW 88.02.640 for the
purposes of the Washington center for marine innovation or any grants
or donations to the state for purposes of the center must be deposited
in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for the
purposes of the Washington center for marine innovation established
under section 1 of this act.

Sec. 3 RCW 88.02.640 and 2011 c 326 s 5, 2011 c 171 s 134, and
2011 c 169 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to any other fees and taxes required by law, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall charge the following vessel fees and surcharge:

FEE AMOUNT AUTHORITY DISTRIBUTION

(a) Dealer temporary permit $5.00 RCW 88.02.800(2) General fund

(b) Derelict vessel and
invasive species removal Subsection (3) of this
section Subsection (3) of this
section Subsection (3) of this
section

(c) Derelict vessel removal
surcharge $1.00 Subsection (4) of this
section Subsection (4) of this
section

(d) Duplicate registration $1.25 RCW 88.02.590(1)(c) General fund

(e) Filing RCW 46.17.005 RCW 46.17.005 RCW 46.68.400

(f) License plate technology RCW 46.17.015 RCW 46.17.015 RCW 46.68.370

(g) License service RCW 46.17.025 RCW 46.17.025 RCW 46.68.220

(h) Nonresident vessel
permit (($25.00)) $26.00 RCW 88.02.620(3) Subsection (5) of this
section

(i) Quick title service $50.00 RCW 88.02.540(3) Subsection (7) of this
section

(j) Registration $10.50 RCW 88.02.560(2) RCW 88.02.650

(k) Replacement decal $1.25 RCW 88.02.595(1)(c) General fund

(l) Title application $5.00 RCW 88.02.515 General fund

(m) Transfer $1.00 RCW 88.02.560(7) General fund

(n) Vessel visitor permit (($30.00)) $31.00 RCW 88.02.610(3) Subsection (6) of this
section

(o) Marine innovation $1.00 Subsection (8) of this
section Section 2 of this act

(2) The five dollar dealer temporary permit fee required in
subsection (1) of this section must be credited to the payment of
registration fees at the time application for registration is made.
(3)(a) The derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee
required in subsection (1) of this section is five dollars and must be
distributed as follows:
(i) One dollar and fifty cents must be deposited in the aquatic
invasive species prevention account created in RCW 77.12.879;
(ii) One dollar must be deposited into the aquatic algae control
account created in RCW 43.21A.667;
(iii) Fifty cents must be deposited into the aquatic invasive
species enforcement account created in RCW 43.43.400; and
(iv) Two dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal
account created in RCW 79.100.100.
(b) If the department of natural resources indicates that the
balance of the derelict vessel removal account, not including any
transfer or appropriation of funds into the account or funds deposited
into the account collected under subsection (5) of this section reaches
one million dollars as of March 1st of any year, the collection of the
two dollars of the derelict vessel and invasive species removal fee
that is deposited into the derelict vessel removal account as
authorized in (a)(iv) of this subsection must be suspended for the
following fiscal year.
(4) Until January 1, 2014, an annual derelict vessel removal
surcharge of one dollar must be charged with each vessel registration.
The surcharge:
(a) Is to address the significant backlog of derelict vessels
accumulated in Washington state waters that pose a threat to the health
and safety of the people and to the environment;
(b) Is to be used only for the removal of vessels that are less
than seventy-five feet in length; and
(c) Must be deposited into the derelict vessel removal account
created in RCW 79.100.100.
(5) The ((twenty-five)) twenty-six dollar nonresident vessel permit
fee must be ((paid by the vessel owner to the department for the cost
of providing the identification document by the department.))
distributed as follows:
(a) One dollar must be deposited in the marine innovation account
established in section 2 of this act;
(b) The department may keep an amount to cover costs for providing
the nonresident vessel permit; and
(c) Any moneys remaining from the fee after the payment of costs
must be allocated to counties by the state treasurer for approved
boating safety programs under RCW 88.02.650.
(6) The thirty-one dollar vessel visitor permit fee must be
distributed as follows:
(a) Five dollars must be deposited in the derelict vessel removal
account created in RCW 79.100.100;
(b) One dollar must be deposited in the marine innovation account
established in section 2 of this act;
(c) The department may keep an amount to cover costs for providing
the vessel visitor permit;
(((c))) (d) Any moneys remaining must be allocated to counties by
the state treasurer for approved boating safety programs under RCW
88.02.650; and
(((d))) (e) Any fees required for licensing agents under RCW
46.17.005 are in addition to any other fee or tax due for the titling
and registration of vessels.
(7)(a) The fifty dollar quick title service fee must be distributed
as follows:
(i) If the fee is paid to the director, the fee must be deposited
to the general fund.
(ii) If the fee is paid to the participating county auditor or
other agent or subagent appointed by the director, twenty-five dollars
must be deposited to the general fund. The remainder must be retained
by the county treasurer in the same manner as other fees collected by
the county auditor.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "quick title" has the same
meaning as in RCW 88.02.540.
(8) An annual marine innovation surcharge of one dollar must be
charged with each vessel registration. The surcharge is to be used
only for the purposes of the Washington center for marine innovation
created in section 1 of this act and must be deposited in the marine
innovation account established in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

--- END ---