BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 69.51A.010 and 2010 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cannabis" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether
growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of
the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture,
or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or resin. "Cannabis" does not
include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks,
oil, or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound,
manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature
stalks, except the resin extracted therefrom, fiber, oil, or cake, or
the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination.
The term "cannabis" includes cannabis products and useable cannabis.
(2) "Collective garden" means qualifying patients or their
designated providers sharing responsibility for acquiring and supplying
the resources required to produce, process, transport, and deliver
cannabis for medical use such as: A location for a collective garden;
equipment, supplies, and labor necessary to plant, grow, and harvest
cannabis; cannabis plants, seeds, and cuttings; and equipment,
supplies, and labor necessary for proper construction, plumbing,
wiring, and ventilation of a garden of cannabis plants. Members of a
collective garden must only be qualifying patients or their designated
providers.
(3) "Correctional facility" has the meaning provided in RCW
72.09.015.
(4) "Corrections agency or department" means any agency or
department in the state of Washington, including local governments or
jails, that is vested with the responsibility to manage those
individuals who are being supervised in the community for a criminal
conviction and has established a written policy for determining when
the medical use of cannabis, including possession, manufacture, or
delivery of, or for possession with intent to manufacture or deliver,
is inconsistent with and contrary to the person's supervision.
(5)(a) "Designated provider" means a person who:
(((a))) (i) Is eighteen years of age or older;
(((b))) (ii) Has been designated in ((writing)) a written document
signed and dated by a qualifying patient to serve as a designated
provider under this chapter;
(((c) Is prohibited from consuming marijuana obtained for the
personal, medical use of the patient for whom the individual is acting
as designated provider; and
(d))) (iii) Is the designated provider to only one qualifying
patient ((at any one time)); and
(iv) Is in compliance with the terms and conditions set forth in
RCW 69.51A.043.
(b) "Designated provider" includes a qualifying patient who serves
as the designated provider for another qualifying patient and who may
be in possession of both patients' cannabis at the same time.
(6) "Dispense" means the selection, measuring, packaging, labeling,
delivery, or sale of cannabis by a collective garden or nonprofit
patient cooperative to a qualifying patient or designated provider who
is a member of that collective garden or nonprofit patient cooperative.
(((2))) (7) "Health care professional," for purposes of this
chapter only, means a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, a
physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW, an osteopathic
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW, an osteopathic physicians'
assistant licensed under chapter 18.57A RCW, a naturopath licensed
under chapter 18.36A RCW, or an advanced registered nurse practitioner
licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.
(((3))) (8) "Jail" has the meaning provided in RCW 70.48.020.
(9) "Labeling" means all labels and other written, printed, or
graphic matter upon any cannabis intended for medical use or
accompanying such cannabis.
(10) "Medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis" means the production,
possession, dispensing, manufacture, delivery, or administration of
((marijuana, as defined in RCW 69.50.101(q),)) cannabis for the
exclusive benefit of a qualifying patient in the treatment of his or
her terminal or debilitating ((illness)) medical condition.
(((4))) (11) "Nonprofit patient cooperative" means a member run
nonprofit corporation registered with the secretary of state under
chapter 24.03 or 24.06 RCW but which is not required to be recognized
as an organization under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) by the federal
internal revenue service. Nonprofit patient cooperatives dispense
cannabis for the medical use of their members if not prohibited by
counties, cities, or towns under section 2 of this act and must meet
all requirements of this chapter. Members of a nonprofit patient
cooperative must only be qualifying patients or their designated
providers.
(12) "Peace officer" has the meaning provided in RCW 43.101.010.
(13) "Personally identifiable information" means any information
that includes, but is not limited to, data that uniquely identify,
distinguish, or trace a person's identity, such as the person's name,
date of birth, or address, either alone or when combined with other
sources, that establish the person is a qualifying patient, designated
provider, licensed producer, or licensed processor of cannabis products
for purposes of registration with the department of health or its
designee. The term "personally identifiable information" also means
any information used by the department of health or its designee to
identify a person as a qualifying patient, designated provider,
licensed producer, or licensed processor of cannabis products.
(14) "Plant" means an organism having at least three
distinguishable and distinct leaves, each leaf being at least three
centimeters in diameter, and a readily observable root formation
consisting of at least two separate and distinct roots, each being at
least two centimeters in length. Multiple stalks emanating from the
same root ball or root system shall be considered part of the same
single plant.
(15)(a) "Qualifying patient" means a person who:
(((a))) (i) Is a patient of a health care professional;
(((b))) (ii) Is eighteen years of age or older or who is under
eighteen years of age and whose parent or guardian has provided written
consent for the medical use of cannabis by the minor to a health care
professional;
(iii) Has been diagnosed by that health care professional as having
a terminal or debilitating medical condition;
(((c))) (iv) Is a resident of the state of Washington at the time
of such diagnosis;
(((d))) (v) Has been advised by that health care professional about
the risks and benefits of the medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis;
((and
(e))) (vi) Has been advised by that health care professional that
((they)) he or she may benefit from the medical use of ((marijuana))
cannabis; and
(vii) Is otherwise in compliance with the terms and conditions of
this chapter.
(b) The term "qualifying patient" does not include a person who is
actively being supervised for a criminal conviction by a corrections
agency or department that has determined that the terms of this chapter
are inconsistent with and contrary to his or her supervision and all
related processes and procedures related to that supervision.
(16) "Registration card" means a card issued by the department of
health or its designee under section 16 of this act that demonstrates
registration with the registry.
(17) "Registry" means the registry developed and maintained by and
within the department of health or its designee under section 16 of
this act to permit qualified patients and designated providers to
register in order to qualify for arrest and prosecution protection.
Collective gardens and nonprofit patient cooperatives may also register
their locations.
(((5))) (18) "Tamper-resistant paper" means paper that meets one or
more of the following industry-recognized features:
(a) One or more features designed to prevent copying of the paper;
(b) One or more features designed to prevent the erasure or
modification of information on the paper; or
(c) One or more features designed to prevent the use of counterfeit
valid documentation.
(((6))) (19) "Terminal or debilitating medical condition" means:
(a) Cancer, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), multiple sclerosis,
epilepsy or other seizure disorder, or spasticity disorders; or
(b) Intractable pain, limited for the purpose of this chapter to
mean pain unrelieved by standard medical treatments and medications; or
(c) Glaucoma, either acute or chronic, limited for the purpose of
this chapter to mean increased intraocular pressure unrelieved by
standard treatments and medications; or
(d) Crohn's disease with debilitating symptoms unrelieved by
standard treatments or medications; or
(e) Hepatitis C with debilitating nausea or intractable pain
unrelieved by standard treatments or medications; or
(f) Diseases, including anorexia, which result in nausea, vomiting,
((wasting)) cachexia, appetite loss, cramping, seizures, muscle spasms,
or spasticity, when these symptoms are unrelieved by standard
treatments or medications; or
(g) Any other medical condition duly approved by the Washington
state medical quality assurance commission in consultation with the
board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as directed in this chapter.
(((7))) (20) "Useable cannabis" means dried flowers of the Cannabis
plant. Useable cannabis excludes stems, stalks, leaves, seeds, and
roots. "Useable cannabis" does not include cannabis products.
(21)(a) "Valid documentation" means:
(((a) A)) (i) An original statement signed and dated by a
qualifying patient's health care professional written on tamper-resistant paper and valid for up to one year from the date of the
health care professional's signature, which states that, in the health
care professional's professional opinion, the patient may benefit from
the medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis; and
(((b))) (ii) Proof of identity such as a Washington state driver's
license or identicard, as defined in RCW 46.20.035.
(b) In the case of a designated provider, "valid documentation"
means the signed and dated document valid for up to one year from the
date of signature executed by the qualifying patient who has designated
the provider.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) Counties with a population of less than two hundred thousand
and the cities and towns within such counties may enact ordinances
providing that nonprofit patient cooperatives are not prohibited from
operation within their jurisdiction. Nonprofit patient cooperatives
are prohibited within those jurisdictions unless such ordinance is
enacted.
(b) Counties with a population of two hundred thousand or more and
the cities and towns within such counties may enact ordinances
providing that nonprofit patient cooperatives are prohibited from
operation within their jurisdiction. Nonprofit patient cooperatives
are not prohibited within those jurisdictions unless such ordinance is
enacted.
(2) A county, city, or town that does not prohibit nonprofit
patient cooperatives under subsection (1) of this section may adopt and
enforce requirements for nonprofit patient cooperatives that include
but are not limited to: Security requirements; inspection standards,
including policies on verifying qualified patient records; limits on
square footage; and limits on number of plants and amounts of useable
cannabis so long as such limits do not exceed the maximum amount
allowed under RCW 69.51A.043.
(3) Nonprofit patient cooperatives are subject to the requirements
of section 3 of this act and must comply with all city, town, or county
requirements adopted under this section and RCW 69.51A.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) It is not a violation of state criminal or civil law for a
nonprofit patient cooperative to distribute cannabis for the medical
use of its members if a city, town, or county in which the nonprofit
patient cooperative is located has enacted an ordinance under section
2(1)(a) of this act or has not enacted an ordinance under section 2
(1)(b) of this act. A nonprofit patient cooperative must comply with
all city, town, or county requirements and the following:
(a) A nonprofit patient cooperative must be registered as a
nonprofit corporation with the secretary of state under chapter 24.03
or 24.06 RCW;
(b) Only qualifying patients or their designated providers may
become members of the nonprofit patient cooperative;
(c) Before accepting a member, the nonprofit patient cooperative
must confirm that the patient qualifies for the medical use of cannabis
through inspection of that patient's proof of identity and registration
card or, if the patient is not registered, through contacting that
patient's health care professional or his or her staff;
(d) A nonprofit patient cooperative may obtain cannabis from a
collective garden or collective gardens operating under RCW 69.51A.085
and may produce and process cannabis if the nonprofit patient
cooperative contains no more than fifteen plants per member up to a
total of ninety-nine plants and:
(i) No more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis per member
up to a total of one hundred forty-four ounces;
(ii) No more cannabis product that could be made with the useable
cannabis limits that apply under (d)(i) of this subsection; or
(iii) A combination of useable cannabis and cannabis product that
does not exceed a combined total representing possession and processing
of no more useable cannabis than what is permitted under (d)(i) of this
subsection;
(e) Members of a nonprofit patient cooperative are not required to
provide work as part of their membership;
(f) A copy of each member's valid documentation or registration
card under section 16 of this act and a copy of the member's proof of
identity, must be available at all times on the premises of a nonprofit
patient cooperative;
(g) No useable cannabis from the nonprofit patient cooperative may
be delivered to anyone other than one of the members of the nonprofit
patient cooperative;
(h) A nonprofit patient cooperative must ensure that no cannabis,
cannabis paraphernalia, or artistic depictions of cannabis may be
viewed from outside the facility;
(i) A nonprofit patient cooperative may not be located within five
hundred feet of a community center, child care center, elementary or
secondary school, or college or university. A city, town, or county
may adopt an ordinance providing for distance requirements that are
greater than or less than the distance requirements under this
subsection (1)(i);
(j) A nonprofit patient cooperative may hire staff to assist in the
operation of the nonprofit patient cooperative or use member
volunteers;
(k) A nonprofit patient cooperative may not advertise cannabis for
sale to the general public in any manner that promotes or tends to
promote the use or abuse of cannabis. This subsection does not
preclude a nonprofit patient cooperative from advertising in trade
journals or on medical cannabis web sites;
(l) A nonprofit patient cooperative may not permit cannabis to be
consumed on the premises of the nonprofit patient cooperative;
(m) A nonprofit patient cooperative must exclude from its premises
people who are not members or employees of the nonprofit patient
cooperative. However, a nonprofit patient cooperative may allow
tradespersons and service personnel onto its premises for the purpose
of repair or maintenance and may periodically allow prospective
members, government officials, acting in their official capacity, media
representatives, neighborhood watch groups, and proprietors of nearby
businesses onto its premises for the purpose of observing the operation
of the nonprofit patient cooperative;
(n) A nonprofit patient cooperative must permit city, town, county,
or state employees to access patient authorization records but only
while engaged in their duties of enforcement and administration of the
requirements of that jurisdiction's ordinance or state law; and
(o) Each nonprofit patient cooperative shall be operated as a
completely independent entity. A nonprofit patient cooperative shall
not share or exchange with any other nonprofit patient cooperative
including, but not limited to, management, staff, materials, plants,
cannabis, proceeds, goods, or services. This requirement does not
preclude a nonprofit patient cooperative from operating out of multiple
locations.
(2) A person who knowingly violates a provision of this section is
not entitled to the protections of this chapter.
(3) If charged with a violation of state law relating to cannabis
while performing his or her duties for the nonprofit patient
cooperative, an employee of a nonprofit patient cooperative is deemed
to have established an affirmative defense to such charges by proof of
compliance with this section. Member volunteers are provided with
arrest protection if they meet the requirements of section 8 of this
act or may assert an affirmative defense if they meet the requirements
of RCW 69.51A.043.

Sec. 4 RCW 69.51A.140 and 2011 c 181 s 1102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Nothing in this chapter is intended to preempt the authority of
cities and towns ((may adopt and enforce any of the following
pertaining to the production, processing, or dispensing of cannabis or
cannabis products within their jurisdiction:)) to impose zoning
requirements, ((business)) licensing requirements, permitting
requirements, health and safety requirements, ((and business)) taxes,
fees, or other conditions upon any nonprofit patient cooperative or
collective garden producing, processing, or dispensing cannabis within
its jurisdiction. ((Nothing in chapter 181, Laws of 2011 is intended
to limit the authority of cities and towns to impose zoning
requirements or other conditions upon licensed dispensers, so long as))
However, such requirements ((do)) may not preclude the possibility of
siting ((licensed dispensers)) collective gardens within the
jurisdiction. ((If the jurisdiction has no commercial zones, the
jurisdiction is not required to adopt zoning to accommodate licensed
dispensers.))
(2) Nothing in this chapter is intended to preempt the authority of
counties ((may adopt and enforce any of the following pertaining to the
production, processing, or dispensing of cannabis or cannabis products
within their jurisdiction in locations outside of the corporate limits
of any city or town:)) to impose zoning requirements, ((business))
licensing requirements, ((and)) permitting requirements, health and
safety requirements, taxes, fees, or other conditions upon any
nonprofit patient cooperative or collective garden producing,
processing, or dispensing cannabis within its jurisdiction in locations
outside the corporate limits of any city or town. ((Nothing in chapter
181, Laws of 2011 is intended to limit the authority of counties to
impose zoning requirements or other conditions upon licensed
dispensers, so long as)) However, such requirements ((do)) may not
preclude the possibility of siting ((licensed dispensers)) collective
gardens within the jurisdiction. ((If the jurisdiction has no
commercial zones, the jurisdiction is not required to adopt zoning to
accommodate licensed dispensers.))

Sec. 5 RCW 69.51A.085 and 2011 c 181 s 403 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Qualifying patients ((may)) or their designated providers may
create and participate in collective gardens ((for the purpose of
producing, processing, transporting, and delivering)) to produce,
process, transport, or deliver cannabis for the medical use of its
members, or in the case of designated providers, the qualifying
patients they serve, or nonprofit patient cooperatives subject to the
following conditions:
(a) Only qualifying patients and designated providers may become
members of a collective garden;
(b) A collective garden may have no more than ten ((qualifying
patients may participate in a single collective garden at any time))
members at any time;
(((b))) (c) A collective garden may contain no more than fifteen
plants per ((patient)) member up to a total of forty-five plants;
(((c))) (d) A collective garden may contain no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis per ((patient)) member up to a total of
seventy-two ounces of useable cannabis;
(((d))) (e) A copy of each ((qualifying patient's)) member's valid
documentation or ((proof of)) registration ((with the registry
established in section 901 of this act, including)) card and a copy of
the ((patient's)) member's proof of identity, must be available at all
times on the premises of the collective garden; and
(((e))) (f) No useable cannabis from the collective garden ((is))
may be delivered to anyone other than one of the ((qualifying patients
participating in)) members of the collective garden or a nonprofit
patient cooperative.
(2) ((For purposes of this section, the creation of a "collective
garden" means qualifying patients sharing responsibility for acquiring
and supplying the resources required to produce and process cannabis
for medical use such as, for example, a location for a collective
garden; equipment, supplies, and labor necessary to plant, grow, and
harvest cannabis; cannabis plants, seeds, and cuttings; and equipment,
supplies, and labor necessary for proper construction, plumbing,
wiring, and ventilation of a garden of cannabis plants.
(3))) A person who knowingly violates a provision of subsection (1)
of this section is not entitled to the protections of this chapter.
(3) Cities, towns, and counties may adopt and enforce requirements
for collective gardens including but not limited to: Security
requirements; size of membership; duration of membership; restrictions
on proximity to other collective gardens or nonprofit patient
cooperatives; and restriction on proximity to community centers, child
care centers, elementary or secondary schools, and colleges or
universities. However, such requirements shall allow collective
gardens to have at the minimum three members.
(4) This section takes effect if section 3 of this act is enacted
into law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Useable cannabis exceeding twenty-four ounces, cannabis product
exceeding what one could reasonably produce with twenty-four ounces of
useable cannabis, or a combination of useable cannabis and cannabis
product that represents possession and processing of more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis must be transported in a locked metal
box that is bolted to the transporting vehicle.
(2) This section does not apply to qualified patients or designated
providers who are transporting:
(a) No more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis;
(b) No more cannabis product than what could reasonably be produced
with no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis; or
(c) A combination of useable cannabis and cannabis product that
does not exceed a combined total representing possession and processing
of no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis.
(3) This section does not apply to a designated provider who is
both a qualifying patient and a designated provider for another
qualifying patient, and is transporting no more than twice the amounts
described in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 7 RCW 69.51A.030 and 2011 c 181 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The following acts do not constitute crimes under state law or
unprofessional conduct under chapter 18.130 RCW, and a health care
professional may not be arrested, searched, prosecuted, disciplined, or
subject to other criminal sanctions or civil consequences or liability
under state law, or have real or personal property searched, seized, or
forfeited pursuant to state law, notwithstanding any other provision of
law as long as the health care professional complies with subsection
(2) of this section:
(a) Advising a patient about the risks and benefits of medical use
of cannabis or that the patient may benefit from the medical use of
cannabis; or
(b) Providing a patient meeting the ((criteria established))
definition of qualifying patient under RCW 69.51A.010(((26))) with
valid documentation, based upon the health care professional's
assessment of the patient's medical history and current medical
condition, where such use is within a professional standard of care or
in the individual health care professional's medical judgment.
(2)(a) A health care professional may only provide a patient with
valid documentation authorizing the medical use of cannabis or register
the patient with the registry established in section ((901)) 16 of this
act if he or she has a newly initiated or existing documented
relationship with the patient, as a primary care provider or a
specialist, relating to the diagnosis and ongoing treatment or
monitoring of the patient's terminal or debilitating medical condition,
and only after:
(i) Completing a physical examination of the patient as
appropriate, based on the patient's condition and age;
(ii) Documenting the terminal or debilitating medical condition of
the patient in the patient's medical record and that the patient may
benefit from treatment of this condition or its symptoms with medical
use of cannabis;
(iii) Informing the patient of other options for treating the
terminal or debilitating medical condition; and
(iv) Documenting other measures attempted to treat the terminal or
debilitating medical condition that do not involve the medical use of
cannabis.
(b) A health care professional shall not:
(i) Accept, solicit, or offer any form of pecuniary remuneration
from or to a ((licensed dispenser, licensed producer, or licensed
processor of cannabis products)) collective garden or nonprofit patient
cooperative;
(ii) Offer a discount or any other thing of value to a qualifying
patient who is a ((customer)) member of, or agrees to be a ((customer))
member of, a particular ((licensed dispenser, licensed producer, or
licensed processor of cannabis products)) collective garden or
nonprofit patient cooperative;
(iii) Examine or offer to examine a patient for purposes of
diagnosing a terminal or debilitating medical condition at a location
where cannabis is produced, processed, or dispensed;
(iv) Have a business or practice which consists solely of
authorizing the medical use of cannabis;
(v) Include any statement or reference, visual or otherwise, on the
medical use of cannabis in any advertisement for his or her business or
practice; or
(vi) Hold an economic interest in an enterprise that produces,
processes, or dispenses cannabis if the health care professional
authorizes the medical use of cannabis.
(3) A violation of any provision of subsection (2) of this section
constitutes unprofessional conduct under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The medical use of cannabis in accordance
with the terms and conditions of this chapter does not constitute a
crime and a qualifying patient or designated provider in compliance
with the terms and conditions of this chapter may not be arrested,
prosecuted, or subject to other criminal sanctions or civil
consequences, for possession, manufacture, or delivery of, or for
possession with intent to manufacture or deliver, cannabis under state
law, or have real or personal property seized or forfeited for
possession, manufacture, or delivery of, or for possession with intent
to manufacture or deliver, cannabis under state law, and investigating
peace officers and law enforcement agencies may not be held civilly
liable for failure to seize cannabis in this circumstance, if:
(1)(a) The qualifying patient or designated provider possesses no
more than fifteen cannabis plants and:
(i) No more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis;
(ii) No more cannabis product than what could reasonably be
produced with no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis; or
(iii) A combination of useable cannabis and cannabis product that
does not exceed a combined total representing possession and processing
of no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis.
(b) If a person is both a qualifying patient and a designated
provider for another qualifying patient, the person may possess no more
than twice the amounts described in (a) of this subsection, whether the
plants, useable cannabis, and cannabis product are possessed
individually or in combination between the qualifying patient and his
or her designated provider;
(2) The qualifying patient or designated provider is registered
with the registry established in section 16 of this act and presents
his or her registration card, to any peace officer who questions the
patient or provider regarding his or her medical use of cannabis;
(3) The qualifying patient or designated provider keeps a copy of
his or her registration card with the registry established in section
16 of this act and the qualifying patient or designated provider's
contact information posted prominently next to any cannabis plants,
cannabis products, or useable cannabis located at his or her residence;
(4) The investigating peace officer does not possess evidence that:
(a) The designated provider has converted cannabis produced or
obtained for the qualifying patient for his or her own personal use or
benefit; or
(b) The qualifying patient has converted cannabis produced or
obtained for his or her own medical use to the qualifying patient's
personal, nonmedical use or benefit;
(5) The investigating peace officer does not possess evidence that
the designated provider has served as a designated provider to more
than one qualifying patient within a fifteen-day period; and
(6) The investigating peace officer has not observed evidence of
any of the circumstances identified in section 16(2) of this act.

Sec. 9 RCW 69.51A.043 and 2011 c 181 s 402 are each amended to
read as follows:
(((1))) A qualifying patient or designated provider who is not
registered with the registry established in section ((901)) 16 of this
act may raise ((the)) an affirmative defense ((set forth in subsection
(2) of this section, if)) to charges of violations relating to
possession, manufacture, or delivery of, or possession with intent to
manufacture or deliver, cannabis under state law, through proof at
trial, by a preponderance of the evidence, that he or she:
(1)(a) ((The qualifying patient or designated provider presents his
or her valid documentation to any peace officer who questions the
patient or provider regarding his or her medical use of cannabis;
(b) The qualifying patient or designated provider)) Possesses no
more cannabis than ((the limits set forth in RCW 69.51A.040(1)))
fifteen cannabis plants and:
(i) No more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis;
(ii) No more cannabis product than what could reasonably be
produced with no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis; or
(iii) A combination of useable cannabis and cannabis product that
does not exceed a combined total representing possession and processing
of no more than twenty-four ounces of useable cannabis; or
(b) Possess no more than twice the amounts described in (a) of this
subsection if the person is both a qualifying patient or designated
provider for another qualifying patient, whether the plants, useable
cannabis, and cannabis products are possessed individually or in
combination between the qualifying patient and his or her designated
provider;
(((c))) (2) The qualifying patient or designated provider is in
compliance with all other terms and conditions of this chapter; and
(((d) The investigating peace officer does not have probable cause
to believe that the qualifying patient or designated provider has
committed a felony, or is committing a misdemeanor in the officer's
presence, that does not relate to the medical use of cannabis;
(e) No outstanding warrant for arrest exists for the qualifying
patient or designated provider; and
(f) The investigating peace officer has not observed evidence of
any of the circumstances identified in section 901(4) of this act.
(2) A qualifying patient or designated provider who is not
registered with the registry established in section 901 of this act,
but who presents his or her valid documentation to any peace officer
who questions the patient or provider regarding his or her medical use
of cannabis, may assert an affirmative defense to charges of violations
of state law relating to cannabis through proof at trial, by a
preponderance of the evidence, that he or she otherwise meets the
requirements of RCW 69.51A.040. A qualifying patient or designated
provider meeting the conditions of this subsection but possessing more
cannabis than the limits set forth in RCW 69.51A.040(1) may, in the
investigating peace officer's discretion, be taken into custody and
booked into jail in connection with the investigation of the
incident.)) (3) The qualifying patient or designated provider presents
his or her valid documentation to any peace officer who questions the
patient or provider regarding his or her medical use of cannabis or is
able to demonstrate that he or she had valid documentation in effect at
the time of questioning.

Sec. 10 RCW 69.51A.045 and 2011 c 181 s 405 are each amended to
read as follows:
A qualifying patient or designated provider in possession of
cannabis plants, useable cannabis, or cannabis product exceeding the
limits set forth in RCW ((69.51A.040)) 69.51A.043(1) but otherwise in
compliance with all other terms and conditions of this chapter may
establish an affirmative defense to charges of violations of state law
relating to cannabis through proof at trial, by a preponderance of the
evidence, that the qualifying patient's necessary medical use exceeds
the amounts set forth in RCW ((69.51A.040)) 69.51A.043(1). An
investigating peace officer may seize cannabis plants, useable
cannabis, or cannabis product exceeding the amounts set forth in RCW
((69.51A.040)) 69.51A.043(1): PROVIDED, That in the case of cannabis
plants, the qualifying patient or designated provider shall be allowed
to select the plants that will remain at the location. The officer and
his or her law enforcement agency may not be held civilly liable for
failure to seize cannabis in this circumstance.

Sec. 11 RCW 69.51A.050 and 1999 c 2 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The lawful possession, dispensing, delivery, or manufacture of
medical ((marijuana as authorized by)) cannabis under this chapter
shall not result in the forfeiture or seizure of any real or personal
property including, but not limited to, cannabis intended for medical
use, items used to facilitate the medical use of cannabis or its
production or dispensing for medical use, or proceeds of sales of
cannabis for medical use made by nonprofit patient cooperatives.
(2) No person shall be prosecuted for constructive possession,
conspiracy, or any other criminal offense solely for being in the
presence or vicinity of ((medical marijuana)) cannabis intended for
medical use or its use as authorized by this chapter.
(3) The state shall not be held liable for any deleterious outcomes
from the medical use of ((marijuana)) cannabis by any qualifying
patient.

Sec. 12 RCW 69.51A.055 and 2011 c 181 s 1105 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) The arrest and prosecution protections established in ((RCW
69.51A.040)) section 8 of this act may not be asserted in a supervision
revocation or violation hearing by a person who is supervised by a
corrections agency or department, including local governments or jails,
that has determined that the terms of this section are inconsistent
with and contrary to his or her supervision.
(b) The affirmative defenses established in RCW 69.51A.043((,)) and
69.51A.045((, 69.51A.047, and section 407 of this act)) may not be
asserted in a supervision revocation or violation hearing by a person
who is supervised by a corrections agency or department, including
local governments or jails, that has determined that the terms of this
section are inconsistent with and contrary to his or her supervision.
(2) The provisions of RCW ((69.51A.040)) 69.51A.043, 69.51A.085,
and 69.51A.025 do not apply to a person who is supervised for a
criminal conviction by a corrections agency or department, including
local governments or jails, that has determined that the terms of this
chapter are inconsistent with and contrary to his or her supervision.
(((3) A person may not be licensed as a licensed producer, licensed
processor of cannabis products, or a licensed dispenser under section
601, 602, or 701 of this act if he or she is supervised for a criminal
conviction by a corrections agency or department, including local
governments or jails, that has determined that licensure is
inconsistent with and contrary to his or her supervision.))

Sec. 13 RCW 69.51A.060 and 2011 c 181 s 501 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) It shall be a class 3 civil infraction to use or display
medical cannabis in a manner or place which is open to the view of the
general public.
(2) Nothing in this chapter establishes a right of care as a
covered benefit or requires any state purchased health care as defined
in RCW 41.05.011 or other health carrier or health plan as defined in
Title 48 RCW to be liable for any claim for reimbursement for the
medical use of cannabis. Such entities may enact coverage or
noncoverage criteria or related policies for payment or nonpayment of
medical cannabis in their sole discretion.
(3) Nothing in this chapter requires any health care professional
to authorize the medical use of cannabis for a patient.
(4) Nothing in this chapter requires any accommodation of any on-site medical use of cannabis in any place of employment, in any school
bus or on any school grounds, in any youth center, in any correctional
facility, or smoking cannabis in any public place as that term is
defined in RCW 70.160.020 or hotel or motel.
(5) Nothing in this chapter authorizes the use of medical cannabis
by any person who is subject to the Washington code of military justice
in chapter 38.38 RCW.
(6) Employers may establish drug-free work policies. Nothing in
this chapter requires an accommodation for the medical use of cannabis
if an employer has a drug-free work place.
(7) It is a class C felony to fraudulently produce any record
purporting to be, or tamper with the content of any record for the
purpose of having it accepted as, valid documentation under RCW
69.51A.010(((32)(a))) (23), or to backdate such documentation to a time
earlier than its actual date of execution.
(8) No person shall be entitled to claim the protection from arrest
and prosecution under ((RCW 69.51A.040)) section 8 of this act or the
affirmative defense under RCW 69.51A.043 for engaging in the medical
use of cannabis in a way that endangers the health or well-being of any
person through the use of a motorized vehicle on a street, road, or
highway, including violations of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or
equivalent local ordinances.

Sec. 14 RCW 69.51A.025 and 2011 c 181 s 413 are each amended to
read as follows:
Nothing in this chapter or in the rules adopted to implement it
precludes a qualifying patient or designated provider from engaging in
the private, unlicensed, noncommercial production, possession,
transportation, delivery, or administration of cannabis for medical use
as authorized under RCW ((69.51A.040)) 69.51A.043.

Sec. 15 RCW 69.51A.200 and 2011 c 181 s 1001 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) By July 1, ((2014)) 2015, the Washington state institute for
public policy shall, within available funds, ((conduct a cost-benefit
evaluation of the implementation of chapter 181, Laws of 2011 and the
rules adopted to carry out its purposes)) evaluate the implementation
of this act and report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on which cities and counties permit nonprofit patient cooperatives.
(2) The evaluation ((of the implementation of chapter 181, Laws of
2011 and the rules adopted to carry out its purposes)) shall include((,
but not necessarily be limited to,)) consideration of the following
factors:
(a) Qualifying patients' access to ((an)) a safe, adequate, and
consistent source of cannabis for medical use;
(b) ((Qualifying patients' access to a safe source of cannabis for
medical use;
(c) Qualifying patients' access to a consistent source of cannabis
for medical use;
(d) Qualifying patients' access to a secure source of cannabis for
medical use;
(e))) Qualifying patients' and designated providers' contact with
law enforcement and involvement in the criminal justice system;
(((f))) (c) Diversion of cannabis intended for medical use to
nonmedical uses;
(((g))) (d) Incidents of home invasion burglaries, robberies, and
other violent and property crimes associated with qualifying patients
accessing cannabis for medical use;
(((h))) (e) Whether there are health care professionals who make a
disproportionately high amount of authorizations in comparison to the
health care professional community at large; and
(((i))) (f) Whether there are indications of health care
professionals in violation of RCW 69.51A.030((; and
(j) Whether the health care professionals making authorizations
reside in this state or out of this state)).
(3) For purposes of facilitating this evaluation, the
department((s)) of health ((and agriculture)) will make available to
the Washington state institute for public policy requested data, and
any other data ((either)) the department ((may)) considers relevant,
from which all personally identifiable information has been redacted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 A new section is added to chapter 69.51A
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By January 1, 2014, the department of health shall adopt rules
for the creation, implementation, maintenance, and timely upgrading of
a secure and confidential registration system that allows:
(a) A peace officer to verify at any time whether a health care
professional has registered a person as either a qualifying patient or
a designated provider; and
(b) A peace officer to verify at any time whether an entity is
registered as a collective garden or nonprofit patient cooperative.
(2) Before seeking a nonvehicle search warrant or arrest warrant,
a peace officer investigating a cannabis-related incident must make
reasonable efforts to ascertain whether the location or person under
investigation is registered under subsection (1) of this section and
include the results of this inquiry in the affidavit submitted in
support of the application for the warrant. This requirement does not
apply to investigations in which:
(a) The peace officer has observed evidence of a cannabis operation
that is not for the medical use of its participants;
(b) The peace officer has observed evidence of theft of electrical
power;
(c) The peace officer has observed evidence of illegal drugs other
than cannabis at the premises;
(d) The peace officer has observed frequent and numerous short-term
visits over an extended period that are consistent with commercial
activity, if the subject of the investigation is not a nonprofit
patient cooperative;
(e) The peace officer has observed violent crime or other
demonstrated dangers to the community;
(f) The peace officer has probable cause to believe the subject of
the investigation has committed a felony, or a misdemeanor in the
officer's presence, that does not relate to cannabis; or
(g) The subject of the investigation has an outstanding arrest
warrant.
(3) Law enforcement may access the registry only in connection with
a specific, legitimate criminal investigation regarding cannabis.
(4) Qualified patients, designated providers, collective gardens,
and nonprofit patient cooperatives are not required to register under
subsection (1) of this section. However, only those entities that are
registered will be provided with arrest and prosecution protection
under section 8 of this act. Registrations are valid for one year;
however, qualifying patients and designated providers must be able to
remove themselves from the registry at any time.
(5) During the rule-making process, the department of health must
consult with the University of Washington computer science and
engineering security and privacy research lab.
(6) The department of health must adopt rules providing for
registration renewals and for removing expired registrations from the
registry.
(7) The department of health may designate a private entity to
administer the registry, subject to chapter 43.19 RCW. Either the
department of health or its designee must issue registration cards to
registered entities.
(8) Fees, including renewal fees, for entities participating in the
registration system are limited to the cost to the department of health
or its designee of implementing, maintaining, and enforcing the
provisions of this section and the cost to the department of health of
adopting rules to carry out the purposes or this section. The fee
shall also include any costs for the department of health to
disseminate information to employees of state and local law enforcement
agencies relating to whether a person or location is a qualified
patient, designated provider, collective garden, or nonprofit patient
cooperative, and for the dissemination of log records relating to such
requests for information to the subjects of those requests. No fee may
be charged to local law enforcement agencies for accessing the
registry.
(9) The medical cannabis registry advisory committee is established
as an advisory group for the department of health.
(a) The department of health shall appoint members of the committee
from stakeholders and persons with relevant expertise including, but
not limited to, qualifying patients, designated providers, health care
professionals, medical marijuana advocates, state and local law
enforcement agencies, and the University of Washington computer science
and engineering security and privacy research lab.
(b) The committee shall review the proposed rules relating to the
registration system created by this section and advise the department
of health on the administrative aspects of the registry, including how
to best protect personally identifiable information. The department of
health may discontinue the committee after the final adoption of the
rules or may continue consulting committee members if deemed necessary
by the department.
(c) The department of health shall provide staff support to the
committee.
(10) The registry shall meet the following requirements:
(a) Any personally identifiable information included in the
registry must be nonreversible, pursuant to definitions and standards
set forth by the national institute of standards and technology;
(b) Any personally identifiable information included in the
registry must not be susceptible to linkage by use of data external to
the registry;
(c) The registry must incorporate current best differential privacy
practices, allowing for maximum accuracy of registry queries while
minimizing the chances of identifying the personally identifiable
information included therein; and
(d) The registry must be upgradable and updated in a timely fashion
to keep current with state of the art privacy and security standards
and practices.
(11) The registry shall maintain a log of each verification query
submitted by a peace officer, including the peace officer's name,
agency, and identification number, for a period of no less than three
years from the date of the query. Personally identifiable information
of qualifying patients and designated providers included in the log
shall be confidential and exempt from public disclosure, inspection, or
copying under chapter 42.56 RCW: PROVIDED, That:
(a) Names and other personally identifiable information from the
list may be released only to authorized employees of state or local law
enforcement agencies, only as necessary to verify that the person or
location is a qualified patient, designated provider, collective
garden, or nonprofit patient cooperative, and only after the inquiring
employee has provided adequate identification. Authorized employees
who obtain personally identifiable information under this subsection
may not release or use the information for any purpose other than
verification that a person or location is a qualified patient,
designated provider, collective garden, or nonprofit patient
cooperative;
(b) Information contained in the registry may be released in
aggregate form, with all personally identifying information redacted,
for the purpose of statistical analysis and oversight of agency
performance and actions;
(c) The subject of a registration query may appear during ordinary
business hours of the entity administering the registry and inspect or
copy log records relating to him or her upon adequate proof of
identity; and
(d) The subject of a registration query may submit a written
request to the entity administering the registry, along with adequate
proof of identity, for copies of log records relating to him or her.
(12) Fees collected under this section must be deposited into the
health professions account under RCW 43.70.320.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 A new section is added to chapter 42.56 RCW
to read as follows:
Records containing names and other personally identifiable
information relating to qualifying patients, designated providers,
collective gardens, and nonprofit patient cooperatives are exempt from
disclosure under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 69.51A.047 (Failure to register or present valid
documentation -- Affirmative defense) and 2011 c 181 s 406; and
(2) RCW 69.51A.040 (Compliance with chapter -- Qualifying patients
and designated providers not subject to penalties -- Law enforcement not
subject to liability) and 2011 c 181 s 401, 2007 c 371 s 5, & 1999 c 2
s 5.

--- END ---