BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that postsecondary education helps
individuals to become productive and contributing members of society,
and that individuals with disabilities are equally benefited by gaining
postsecondary education. The legislature also finds that students with
disabilities face a disproportionate number of challenges when pursuing
postsecondary education, and that people who have disabilities are less
than half as likely to have a baccalaureate degree compared to people
who do not have a disability. The legislature further finds that one
such challenge is the inconsistency in accommodation resources
available to them at the primary, secondary, and postsecondary
educational levels, incurring significant strain for students as they
transition between the different components of the educational path to
employment as adults.
The legislature intends to establish a common database of
information that will allow institutions to make more informed
decisions when they purchase new resources for students with
disabilities, and to therefore increase the consistency among
institutions at a pace which each institution believes to be most
appropriate for their students. The legislature further intends that
this database may assist in the sharing of resources between
institutions and, when appropriate, in the retention of adaptive
equipment by students after transitioning between institutions. The
legislature intends for this collaboration among institutions to
ultimately reduce the barriers to postsecondary education faced by
students with disabilities, thereby increasing the number productive
and contributing members of Washington's educated workforce.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
Central Washington University shall create, coordinate, designate,
and recommend the use of a statewide database of student disability
accommodation equipment, software, and resources owned by each school
district and institution of higher education.
(1) The database shall be maintained by Central Washington
University. Central Washington University shall collaborate with the
office of the superintendent of public instruction and other
institutions of higher education regarding the database. The database
must be a uniform and interactive computerized statewide list of
student disability accommodation equipment, software, and resources.
(2) School districts and institutions of higher education,
including community and technical colleges, are required to report all
currently owned and inventoried student disability accommodation
equipment, software, and resources, if available, in the database.
School districts and institutions of higher education may search the
database as needed.
(3) Central Washington University may adopt rules necessary to
implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 If specific funding for the purposes of this
act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by
June 30, 2012, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and
void.

--- END ---