BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that postsecondary
education helps individuals to become productive and contributing
members of society, and that individuals with disabilities are equally
benefited by gaining postsecondary education. The legislature also
finds that students with disabilities face a disproportionate number of
challenges when transitioning to postsecondary education, and that
people who have disabilities are less than half as likely to have a
baccalaureate degree compared to people that do not have a disability.
The legislature finds it is incumbent upon the state to address those
challenges in order to provide all students in Washington state with an
equal opportunity to pursue a successful future.
In calling together a diverse group of experts from throughout the
state, the legislature intends to develop recommendations that will
directly increase the success rate for students with disabilities who
are transitioning from secondary to postsecondary education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.630
RCW to read as follows:
(1) A legislative task force on improving access to higher
education for students with disabilities is established. The task
force shall collaborate to carry out the following goals:
(a) Make the transition from K-12 to higher education more seamless
and successful. When making the recommendations the task force shall
consider:
(i) How to ensure students' interests, goals, and strengths guide
the transition planning process;
(ii) How to enable collaboration and communication between and
among schools, institutions of higher education, and relevant state
agencies to provide an effective transition;
(iii) How assessment and disability documentation that is
acceptable to postsecondary institutions should best be determined and
obtained;
(iv) How to identify the types of supports and accommodations that
students will need in postsecondary environments; and
(v) How students can plan their high school coursework to
sufficiently prepare for the higher education environment;
(b) Select a statewide method of sharing best practices between and
among K-12 and higher education institutions;
(c) Develop a statewide minimum standard for documentation of a
disability at institutions of higher education and recommendations for
how school districts, in collaboration with students and their
families, can meet that standard before a student's high school
graduation. When making its recommendations the task force shall
consider:
(i) What should constitute a proper and complete documentation of
a disability;
(ii) How recently the documentation must have been completed; and
(iii) Which testing information, if any, must be included in the
documentation; and
(d) Create a plan for how school districts and institutions of
higher education can improve outreach to students and their families
regarding available options in higher education.
(2) The taskforce shall consist of not more than twenty-seven
members and must include the following members:
(a) Six members appointed by the governor as follows:
(i) Three private citizens with experience advocating and providing
services for students with disabilities, at least one of whom must have
been a parent of a student with a disability, and at least one of whom
must have experience advocating for veterans with disabilities; and
(ii) Three representatives from nonprofit organizations focused on
advocating for citizens with disabilities and/or providing services for
citizens with disabilities;
(b) Eight members appointed by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction as follows:
(i) Two representatives from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction;
(ii) Two representatives from educational service districts; and
(iii) Four representatives from local school districts that have
high concentrations of students with disabilities enrolled in the
district;
(c) Four members appointed by the state board for community and
technical colleges as follows:
(i) One representative from the state board for community and
technical colleges; and
(ii) Three representatives from community and/or technical
colleges;
(d) Four members appointed by the council of presidents, including
one representative from the council and three representatives from a
regional university as defined in RCW 28B.10.016;
(e) One member appointed by the superintendent of the state school
for the blind, from the state school for the blind;
(f) One member appointed by the secretary of the department of
social and health services, from the department of social and health
services;
(g) One member appointed by the executive secretary of the
governor's committee on disability issues and employment, from the
governor's committee on disability issues and employment;
(h) One member appointed by the chair of the developmental
disabilities council, from the developmental disabilities council; and
(i) One member appointed by the superintendent of the state school
for the deaf, from the state school for the deaf.
(3) The purpose of the task force is to make recommendations to the
legislature and to coordinate and implement the goals in subsection (1)
of this section.
(4) The task force shall report its recommendations for each goal
to the legislature by December 1, 2013.
(5) The task force shall use legislative facilities, and staff
support shall be provided by the office of program research in the
house of representatives and senate committee services. The task force
is encouraged to use technology to expand access and limit costs.
(6) This section expires July 1, 2014.

--- END ---