BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW
to read as follows:
No licensee subject to this chapter may be required to participate
in any public or private third-party reimbursement program as a
condition of licensure.

--- END ---