BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the United States
was founded on the principles of freedom from persecution by the
government. The federal and state governments were not intended to
have the power they have assumed in the last eighty years. Washington
citizens have the right to the protections in section 2 of this act, as
was set out in the United States Constitution. No governmental entity
has the authority to supersede constitutional guarantees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any lawful citizen of Washington has the right under the United
States Constitution to protect themselves including, but not limited
to:
(a) The use of guns and ammunition;
(b) The use of mace or other repellants; and
(c) Any other means necessary to stop an assailant.
(2) Any lawful citizen of Washington has the right to defend
himself or herself, unless he or she is in the act of committing a
crime, without interference from federal or state agencies.
(3) Law abiding citizens of Washington shall not have their gun or
ammunition rights waived by any governmental agency nor shall their
guns or ammunition be tracked with markings or radio frequency
identification dust, paint, or any other direct identifiers.
(4) Any lawful citizen of Washington has the constitutional right
to privacy in his or her home including, but not limited to, his or her
farm, vehicle, trailer, or other place of domicile, and to be anonymous
as long as he or she is not in the act of committing a crime.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act may be known and cited as the
Washington right to protection act.

--- END ---