BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.505.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 17 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Total distributions for the student achievement program from
the general fund to each school district shall be based upon the
average number of full-time equivalent students in the school district
during the previous school year as reported to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by August 31st of the previous
school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure
that moneys generated by skill center students are returned to skill
centers.
(2) The allocation rate per full-time equivalent student shall be
three hundred dollars in the 2005-06 school year, three hundred
seventy-five dollars in the 2006-07 school year, and four hundred fifty
dollars in the 2007-08 school year. For each subsequent school year,
the amount allocated per full-time equivalent student shall be adjusted
for inflation by the implicit price deflator as published by the
federal bureau of labor statistics. However, ((for the 2011-12 and
2012-13 school years)) beginning with the 2012-13 school year, the
amount allocated per full-time equivalent student shall be as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act. These allocations per full-time
equivalent student shall be supported from the distributions from the
education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230 and the state
general fund.
(3) The school district annual amounts as defined in subsection (2)
of this section shall be distributed on the monthly apportionment
schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1,
2012.

--- END ---