BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of health.
(2) "Music therapist" means a person certified to practice music
therapy under this chapter.
(3) "Music therapy" means:
(a) The assessment of a client's emotional well-being, physical
health, social functioning, communication abilities, and cognitive
skills through responses to musical stimuli;
(b) The development and implementation of treatment plans, based on
a client's assessed needs, using music interventions including music
improvisation, receptive music listening, song writing, lyric
discussion, music and imagery, music performance, learning through
music, and movement to music; and
(c) The evaluation and documentation of the client's response to
treatment.
(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department or the
secretary's designee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 No person may practice music therapy or
represent oneself as a music therapist by use of any title unless
certified as provided for in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) An applicant applying for certification
as a certified music therapist shall file a written application on a
form or forms provided by the secretary setting forth under affidavit
such information as the secretary may require, and proof that the
candidate has met the following qualifications:
(a) Successful completion of a bachelor's degree or higher from an
academic program in music therapy; and
(b) Successful completion of examination based on core competencies
of music therapy administered by a public or private agency or
institution recognized by the secretary as qualified to administer the
examination.
(2) The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate
proof of meeting the criteria.
(3) Applicants are subject to the grounds for denial of a
certification under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Nothing in this chapter may be construed to
prohibit or restrict the practice by an individual who is:
(1) Licensed, certified, or registered under the laws of this state
and performing services within the authorized scope of practice;
(2) Employed by the government of the United States while engaged
in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United
States; or
(3) A regular student in an educational program approved by the
secretary, and whose performance of services is pursuant to a regular
course of instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the
general supervision of the instructor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 In addition to any other authority, the
secretary has the authority to:
(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this
chapter;
(2) Establish all certification and renewal fees in accordance with
RCW 43.70.250;
(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this
chapter;
(4) Determine minimum education requirements and evaluate and
designate those educational programs from which graduation will be
accepted as proof of eligibility to take a qualifying examination for
applicants for certification;
(5) Certify applicants who have met the requirements for
certification and to deny certification to applicants who do not meet
the requirements of this chapter, except that proceedings concerning
the denial of certification based upon unprofessional conduct or
impairment is governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130
RCW;
(6) Determine which states have credentialing requirements
equivalent to those of this state and issue certificates to individuals
credentialed in those states without examination;
(7) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff
as needed to implement this chapter; and
(8) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and
certified individuals.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Applications for certification must be
submitted on forms provided by the secretary. The secretary may
require any information and documentation that reasonably relates to
the need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for
certification provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW.
Each applicant must pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW
43.70.250. The fee must accompany the application.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The secretary must establish by rule the
procedural requirements and fees for renewal of a certification.
Failure to renew invalidates the certification and all privileges
granted by the certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130
RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of a license,
and the discipline of persons licensed under this chapter. The
secretary is the disciplining authority under this chapter.

Sec. 9 RCW 18.130.040 and 2011 c 41 s 11 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and
commissions having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed
under the chapters specified in this section. This chapter does not
apply to any business or profession not licensed under the chapters
specified in this section.
(2)(a) The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation
to the following professions:
(i) Dispensing opticians licensed and designated apprentices under
chapter 18.34 RCW;
(ii) Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;
(iii) Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;
(iv) Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108
RCW;
(v) Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;
(vi) East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06
RCW;
(vii) Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians
registered under chapter 18.84 RCW;
(viii) Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89
RCW;
(ix) Hypnotherapists and agency affiliated counselors registered
and advisors and counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;
(x) Persons licensed as mental health counselors, mental health
counselor associates, marriage and family therapists, marriage and
family therapist associates, social workers, social work associates--advanced, and social work associates -- independent clinical under
chapter 18.225 RCW;
(xi) Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter
18.52C RCW;
(xii) Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter
18.88A RCW;
(xiii) Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;
(xiv) Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138
RCW;
(xv) Chemical dependency professionals and chemical dependency
professional trainees certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;
(xvi) Sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex
offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;
(xvii) Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or
RCW 18.71.205;
(xviii) Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW;
(xix) Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200
RCW;
(xx) Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.215 RCW;
(xxi) Recreational therapists (([under chapter 18.230 RCW])) under
chapter 18.230 RCW;
(xxii) Animal massage practitioners certified under chapter 18.240
RCW;
(xxiii) Athletic trainers licensed under chapter 18.250 RCW;
(xxiv) Home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW; ((and))
(xxv) Genetic counselors licensed under chapter 18.290 RCW; and
(xxvi) Music therapists certified under chapter 18.--- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 11 of this act).
(b) The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter
are as follows:
(i) The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22
RCW;
(ii) The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.25 RCW;
(iii) The dental quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.32 RCW governing licenses issued under chapter 18.32 RCW and
licenses and registrations issued under chapter 18.260 RCW;
(iv) The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter
18.35 RCW;
(v) The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as
established in chapter 18.52 RCW;
(vi) The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;
(vii) The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established
in chapter 18.57 RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW;
(viii) The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW
governing licenses issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;
(ix) The medical quality assurance commission as established in
chapter 18.71 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW;
(x) The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74
RCW;
(xi) The board of occupational therapy practice as established in
chapter 18.59 RCW;
(xii) The nursing care quality assurance commission as established
in chapter 18.79 RCW governing licenses and registrations issued under
that chapter;
(xiii) The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary
committee as established in chapter 18.83 RCW;
(xiv) The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter
18.92 RCW; and
(xv) The board of naturopathy established in chapter 18.36A RCW.
(3) In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the
disciplining authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses.
The disciplining authority may also grant a license subject to
conditions.
(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform
Disciplinary Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec. 10 RCW 18.120.020 and 2010 c 286 s 14 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Applicant group" includes any health professional group or
organization, any individual, or any other interested party which
proposes that any health professional group not presently regulated be
regulated or which proposes to substantially increase the scope of
practice of the profession.
(2) "Certificate" and "certification" mean a voluntary process by
which a statutory regulatory entity grants recognition to an individual
who (a) has met certain prerequisite qualifications specified by that
regulatory entity, and (b) may assume or use "certified" in the title
or designation to perform prescribed health professional tasks.
(3) "Grandfather clause" means a provision in a regulatory statute
applicable to practitioners actively engaged in the regulated health
profession prior to the effective date of the regulatory statute which
exempts the practitioners from meeting the prerequisite qualifications
set forth in the regulatory statute to perform prescribed occupational
tasks.
(4) "Health professions" means and includes the following health
and health-related licensed or regulated professions and occupations:
Podiatric medicine and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW; chiropractic
under chapter 18.25 RCW; dental hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW;
dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW; denturism under chapter 18.30 RCW;
dispensing opticians under chapter 18.34 RCW; hearing instruments under
chapter 18.35 RCW; naturopaths under chapter 18.36A RCW; embalming and
funeral directing under chapter 18.39 RCW; midwifery under chapter
18.50 RCW; nursing home administration under chapter 18.52 RCW;
optometry under chapters 18.53 and 18.54 RCW; ocularists under chapter
18.55 RCW; osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapters 18.57 and
18.57A RCW; pharmacy under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW; medicine
under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW; emergency medicine under chapter
18.73 RCW; physical therapy under chapter 18.74 RCW; practical nurses
under chapter 18.79 RCW; psychologists under chapter 18.83 RCW;
registered nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW; occupational therapists
licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW; respiratory care practitioners
licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW; veterinarians and veterinary
technicians under chapter 18.92 RCW; health care assistants under
chapter 18.135 RCW; massage practitioners under chapter 18.108 RCW;
East Asian medicine practitioners licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;
persons registered under chapter 18.19 RCW; persons licensed as mental
health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers
under chapter 18.225 RCW; dietitians and nutritionists certified by
chapter 18.138 RCW; radiologic technicians under chapter 18.84 RCW;
((and)) nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A
RCW; and music therapists certified under chapter 18.--- RCW (the new
chapter created in section 11 of this act).
(5) "Inspection" means the periodic examination of practitioners by
a state agency in order to ascertain whether the practitioners'
occupation is being carried out in a fashion consistent with the public
health, safety, and welfare.
(6) "Legislative committees of reference" means the standing
legislative committees designated by the respective rules committees of
the senate and house of representatives to consider proposed
legislation to regulate health professions not previously regulated.
(7) "License," "licensing," and "licensure" mean permission to
engage in a health profession which would otherwise be unlawful in the
state in the absence of the permission. A license is granted to those
individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications to perform prescribed
health professional tasks and for the use of a particular title.
(8) "Professional license" means an individual, nontransferable
authorization to carry on a health activity based on qualifications
which include: (a) Graduation from an accredited or approved program,
and (b) acceptable performance on a qualifying examination or series of
examinations.
(9) "Practitioner" means an individual who (a) has achieved
knowledge and skill by practice, and (b) is actively engaged in a
specified health profession.
(10) "Public member" means an individual who is not, and never was,
a member of the health profession being regulated or the spouse of a
member, or an individual who does not have and never has had a material
financial interest in either the rendering of the health professional
service being regulated or an activity directly related to the
profession being regulated.
(11) "Registration" means the formal notification which, prior to
rendering services, a practitioner shall submit to a state agency
setting forth the name and address of the practitioner; the location,
nature and operation of the health activity to be practiced; and, if
required by the regulatory entity, a description of the service to be
provided.
(12) "Regulatory entity" means any board, commission, agency,
division, or other unit or subunit of state government which regulates
one or more professions, occupations, industries, businesses, or other
endeavors in this state.
(13) "State agency" includes every state office, department, board,
commission, regulatory entity, and agency of the state, and, where
provided by law, programs and activities involving less than the full
responsibility of a state agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

--- END ---