BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 84.14.007 and 2007 c 430 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the purpose of this chapter to encourage increased
residential opportunities, including affordable housing opportunities,
in cities and counties that are required to plan or choose to plan
under the growth management act within urban centers where the
governing authority of the affected city or county has found there is
insufficient housing opportunities, including affordable housing
opportunities. It is further the purpose of this chapter to stimulate
the construction of new multifamily housing and the rehabilitation of
existing vacant and underutilized buildings for multifamily housing in
urban centers having insufficient housing opportunities that will
increase and improve residential opportunities, including affordable
housing opportunities, within these urban centers. To achieve these
purposes, this chapter provides for special valuations in residentially
deficient urban centers for eligible improvements associated with
multiunit housing, which includes affordable housing.

Sec. 2 RCW 84.14.010 and 2007 c 430 s 3 and 2007 c 185 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Campus facilities master plan" means the area that is defined
by the University of Washington as necessary for the future growth and
development of its campus facilities for branch campuses authorized
under RCW 28B.45.020.
(2) "City" means either (a) a city or town with a population of at
least fifteen thousand, (b) the largest city or town, if there is no
city or town with a population of at least fifteen thousand, located in
a county planning under the growth management act, or (c) a city or
town with a population of at least five thousand located in a county
subject to the provisions of RCW 36.70A.215.
(3) "Affordable housing" means residential housing that is rented
by a person or household whose monthly housing costs, including
utilities other than telephone, do not exceed thirty percent of the
household's monthly income. For the purposes of housing intended for
owner occupancy, "affordable housing" means residential housing that is
within the means of low or moderate-income households.
(4) "County" means a county with an unincorporated population of at
least three hundred fifty thousand.
(5) "Household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons
living together.
(((5))) (6) "Low-income household" means a single person, family,
or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or
below eighty percent of the median family income adjusted for family
size, for the county where the project is located, as reported by the
United States department of housing and urban development. For cities
located in high-cost areas, "low-income household" means a household
that has an income at or below one hundred percent of the median family
income adjusted for family size, for the county where the project is
located.
(((6))) (7) "Moderate-income household" means a single person,
family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is
more than eighty percent but is at or below one hundred fifteen percent
of the median family income adjusted for family size, for the county
where the project is located, as reported by the United States
department of housing and urban development. For cities located in
high-cost areas, "moderate-income household" means a household that has
an income that is more than one hundred percent, but at or below one
hundred fifty percent, of the median family income adjusted for family
size, for the county where the project is located.
(((7))) (8) "High cost area" means a county where the third quarter
median house price for the previous year as reported by the Washington
center for real estate research at Washington State University is equal
to or greater than one hundred thirty percent of the statewide median
house price published during the same time period.
(((8))) (9) "Governing authority" means the local legislative
authority of a city or a county having jurisdiction over the property
for which an exemption may be applied for under this chapter.
(((9))) (10) "Growth management act" means chapter 36.70A RCW.
(((10))) (11) "Multiple-unit housing" means a building having four
or more dwelling units not designed or used as transient accommodations
and not including hotels and motels. Multifamily units may result from
new construction or rehabilitated or conversion of vacant,
underutilized, or substandard buildings to multifamily housing.
(((11))) (12) "Owner" means the property owner of record.
(((12))) (13) "Permanent residential occupancy" means multiunit
housing that provides either rental or owner occupancy on a
nontransient basis. This includes owner-occupied or rental
accommodation that is leased for a period of at least one month. This
excludes hotels and motels that predominately offer rental
accommodation on a daily or weekly basis.
(((13))) (14) "Rehabilitation improvements" means modifications to
existing structures, that are vacant for twelve months or longer, that
are made to achieve a condition of substantial compliance with existing
building codes or modification to existing occupied structures which
increase the number of multifamily housing units.
(((14))) (15) "Residential targeted area" means an area within an
urban center that has been designated by the governing authority as a
residential targeted area in accordance with this chapter. With
respect to designations after July 1, 2007, "residential targeted area"
may not include a campus facilities master plan. The residential
targeted area designated by a county governing authority must be
located in an unincorporated area of the county that is within an urban
growth area under RCW 36.70A.110.
(((15))) (16) "Substantial compliance" means compliance with local
building or housing code requirements that are typically required for
rehabilitation as opposed to new construction.
(((16))) (17) "Urban center" means a compact identifiable district
where urban residents may obtain a variety of products and services.
An urban center must contain:
(a) Several existing or previous, or both, business establishments
that may include but are not limited to shops, offices, banks,
restaurants, governmental agencies;
(b) Adequate public facilities including streets, sidewalks,
lighting, transit, domestic water, and sanitary sewer systems; ((and))
(c) A mixture of uses and activities that may include housing,
recreation, and cultural activities in association with either
commercial or office, or both, use; and
(d) A campus of an institution of higher education as defined in
RCW 28B.92.030 where at least one thousand two hundred students live on
campus during the academic year, if it is located in a county defined
under subsection (4) of this section.

Sec. 3 RCW 84.14.030 and 2007 c 430 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
An owner of property making application under this chapter must
meet the following requirements:
(1) The new or rehabilitated multiple-unit housing must be located
in a residential targeted area as designated by the city or county;
(2) The multiple-unit housing must meet guidelines as adopted by
the governing authority that may include height, density, public
benefit features, number and size of proposed development, parking,
income limits for occupancy, limits on rents or sale prices, and other
adopted requirements indicated necessary by the city or county. The
required amenities should be relative to the size of the project and
tax benefit to be obtained;
(3) The new, converted, or rehabilitated multiple-unit housing must
provide for a minimum of fifty percent of the space for permanent
residential occupancy. In the case of existing occupied multifamily
development, the multifamily housing must also provide for a minimum of
four additional multifamily units. Existing multifamily vacant housing
that has been vacant for twelve months or more does not have to provide
additional multifamily units;
(4) New construction multifamily housing and rehabilitation
improvements must be completed within three years from the date of
approval of the application;
(5) Property proposed to be rehabilitated must fail to comply with
one or more standards of the applicable state or local building or
housing codes on or after July 23, 1995. If the property proposed to
be rehabilitated is not vacant, an applicant ((shall)) must provide
each existing tenant housing of comparable size, quality, and price and
a reasonable opportunity to relocate; and
(6) The applicant must enter into a contract with the city or
county approved by the governing authority, or an administrative
official or commission authorized by the governing authority, under
which the applicant has agreed to the implementation of the development
on terms and conditions satisfactory to the governing authority.

Sec. 4 RCW 84.14.040 and 2007 c 430 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The following criteria must be met before an area may be
designated as a residential targeted area:
(a) The area must be within an urban center, as determined by the
governing authority;
(b) The area must lack, as determined by the governing authority,
sufficient available, desirable, and convenient residential housing,
including affordable housing, to meet the needs of the public who would
be likely to live in the urban center, if the affordable, desirable,
attractive, and livable places to live were available; and
(c) The providing of additional housing opportunity, including
affordable housing, in the area, as determined by the governing
authority, will assist in achieving one or more of the stated purposes
of this chapter.
(2) For the purpose of designating a residential targeted area or
areas, the governing authority may adopt a resolution of intention to
so designate an area as generally described in the resolution. The
resolution must state the time and place of a hearing to be held by the
governing authority to consider the designation of the area and may
include such other information pertaining to the designation of the
area as the governing authority determines to be appropriate to apprise
the public of the action intended.
(3) The governing authority ((shall)) must give notice of a hearing
held under this chapter by publication of the notice once each week for
two consecutive weeks, not less than seven days, nor more than thirty
days before the date of the hearing in a paper having a general
circulation in the city or county where the proposed residential
targeted area is located. The notice must state the time, date, place,
and purpose of the hearing and generally identify the area proposed to
be designated as a residential targeted area.
(4) Following the hearing, or a continuance of the hearing, the
governing authority may designate all or a portion of the area
described in the resolution of intent as a residential targeted area if
it finds, in its sole discretion, that the criteria in subsections (1)
through (3) of this section have been met.
(5) After designation of a residential targeted area, the governing
authority must adopt and implement standards and guidelines to be
utilized in considering applications and making the determinations
required under RCW 84.14.060. The standards and guidelines must
establish basic requirements for both new construction and
rehabilitation, which must include:
(a) Application process and procedures;
(b) Requirements that address demolition of existing structures and
site utilization; and
(c) Building requirements that may include elements addressing
parking, height, density, environmental impact, and compatibility with
the existing surrounding property and such other amenities as will
attract and keep permanent residents and that will properly enhance the
livability of the residential targeted area in which they are to be
located.
(6) The governing authority may adopt and implement, either as
conditions to eight-year exemptions or as conditions to an extended
exemption period under RCW 84.14.020(((2))) (1)(a)(ii)(B), or both,
more stringent income eligibility, rent, or sale price limits,
including limits that apply to a higher percentage of units, than the
minimum conditions for an extended exemption period under RCW
84.14.020(((2))) (1)(a)(ii)(B).

Sec. 5 RCW 84.14.050 and 2007 c 430 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
An owner of property seeking tax incentives under this chapter must
complete the following procedures:
(1) In the case of rehabilitation or where demolition or new
construction is required, the owner ((shall)) must secure from the
governing authority or duly authorized representative, before
commencement of rehabilitation improvements or new construction,
verification of property noncompliance with applicable building and
housing codes;
(2) In the case of new and rehabilitated multifamily housing, the
owner ((shall)) must apply to the city or county on forms adopted by
the governing authority. The application must contain the following:
(a) Information setting forth the grounds supporting the requested
exemption including information indicated on the application form or in
the guidelines;
(b) A description of the project and site plan, including the floor
plan of units and other information requested;
(c) A statement that the applicant is aware of the potential tax
liability involved when the property ceases to be eligible for the
incentive provided under this chapter;
(3) The applicant must verify the application by oath or
affirmation; and
(4) The application must be accompanied by the application fee, if
any, required under RCW 84.14.080. The governing authority may permit
the applicant to revise an application before final action by the
governing authority.

Sec. 6 RCW 84.14.060 and 2007 c 430 s 8 and 2007 c 185 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The duly authorized administrative official or committee of the
city or county may approve the application if it finds that:
(a) A minimum of four new units are being constructed or in the
case of occupied rehabilitation or conversion a minimum of four
additional multifamily units are being developed;
(b) If applicable, the proposed multiunit housing project meets the
affordable housing requirements as described in RCW 84.14.020;
(c) The proposed project is or will be, at the time of completion,
in conformance with all local plans and regulations that apply at the
time the application is approved;
(d) The owner has complied with all standards and guidelines
adopted by the city or county under this chapter; and
(e) The site is located in a residential targeted area of an urban
center that has been designated by the governing authority in
accordance with procedures and guidelines indicated in RCW 84.14.040.
(2) An application may not be approved after July 1, 2007, if any
part of the proposed project site is within a campus facilities master
plan, unless it is defined as an urban center in RCW 84.14.010(17)(d).

Sec. 7 RCW 84.14.070 and 1995 c 375 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The governing authority or an administrative official or
commission authorized by the governing authority ((shall)) must approve
or deny an application filed under this chapter within ninety days
after receipt of the application.
(2) If the application is approved, the city ((shall)) or county
must issue the owner of the property a conditional certificate of
acceptance of tax exemption. The certificate must contain a statement
by a duly authorized administrative official of the governing authority
that the property has complied with the required findings indicated in
RCW ((84.14.050)) 84.14.060.
(3) If the application is denied by the authorized administrative
official or commission authorized by the governing authority, the
deciding administrative official or commission ((shall)) must state in
writing the reasons for denial and send the notice to the applicant at
the applicant's last known address within ten days of the denial.
(4) Upon denial by a duly authorized administrative official or
commission, an applicant may appeal the denial to the governing
authority within thirty days after receipt of the denial. The appeal
before the governing authority ((will)) must be based upon the record
made before the administrative official with the burden of proof on the
applicant to show that there was no substantial evidence to support the
administrative official's decision. The decision of the governing body
in denying or approving the application is final.

Sec. 8 RCW 84.14.090 and 2007 c 430 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon completion of rehabilitation or new construction for which
an application for a limited tax exemption under this chapter has been
approved and after issuance of the certificate of occupancy, the owner
((shall)) must file with the city or county the following:
(a) A statement of the amount of rehabilitation or construction
expenditures made with respect to each housing unit and the composite
expenditures made in the rehabilitation or construction of the entire
property;
(b) A description of the work that has been completed and a
statement that the rehabilitation improvements or new construction on
the owner's property qualify the property for limited exemption under
this chapter;
(c) If applicable, a statement that the project meets the
affordable housing requirements as described in RCW 84.14.020; and
(d) A statement that the work has been completed within three years
of the issuance of the conditional certificate of tax exemption.
(2) Within thirty days after receipt of the statements required
under subsection (1) of this section, the authorized representative of
the city ((shall)) or county must determine whether the work completed,
and the affordability of the units, is consistent with the application
and the contract approved by the city or county and is qualified for a
limited tax exemption under this chapter. The city ((shall)) or county
must also determine which specific improvements completed meet the
requirements and required findings.
(3) If the rehabilitation, conversion, or construction is completed
within three years of the date the application for a limited tax
exemption is filed under this chapter, or within an authorized
extension of this time limit, and the authorized representative of the
city or county determines that improvements were constructed consistent
with the application and other applicable requirements, including if
applicable, affordable housing requirements, and the owner's property
is qualified for a limited tax exemption under this chapter, the city
((shall)) or county must file the certificate of tax exemption with the
county assessor within ten days of the expiration of the thirty-day
period provided under subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The authorized representative of the city ((shall)) or county
must notify the applicant that a certificate of tax exemption is not
going to be filed if the authorized representative determines that:
(a) The rehabilitation or new construction was not completed within
three years of the application date, or within any authorized extension
of the time limit;
(b) The improvements were not constructed consistent with the
application or other applicable requirements;
(c) If applicable, the affordable housing requirements as described
in RCW 84.14.020 were not met; or
(d) The owner's property is otherwise not qualified for limited
exemption under this chapter.
(5) If the authorized representative of the city or county finds
that construction or rehabilitation of multiple-unit housing was not
completed within the required time period due to circumstances beyond
the control of the owner and that the owner has been acting and could
reasonably be expected to act in good faith and with due diligence, the
governing authority or the city or county official authorized by the
governing authority may extend the deadline for completion of
construction or rehabilitation for a period not to exceed twenty-four
consecutive months.
(6) The governing authority may provide by ordinance for an appeal
of a decision by the deciding officer or authority that an owner is not
entitled to a certificate of tax exemption to the governing authority,
a hearing examiner, or other city or county officer authorized by the
governing authority to hear the appeal in accordance with such
reasonable procedures and time periods as provided by ordinance of the
governing authority. The owner may appeal a decision by the deciding
officer or authority that is not subject to local appeal or a decision
by the local appeal authority that the owner is not entitled to a
certificate of tax exemption in superior court under RCW 34.05.510
through 34.05.598, if the appeal is filed within thirty days of
notification by the city or county to the owner of the decision being
challenged.

Sec. 9 RCW 84.14.100 and 2007 c 430 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Thirty days after the anniversary of the date of the
certificate of tax exemption and each year for the tax exemption
period, the owner of the rehabilitated or newly constructed property
((shall)) must file with a designated authorized representative of the
city or county an annual report indicating the following:
(a) A statement of occupancy and vacancy of the rehabilitated or
newly constructed property during the twelve months ending with the
anniversary date;
(b) A certification by the owner that the property has not changed
use and, if applicable, that the property has been in compliance with
the affordable housing requirements as described in RCW 84.14.020 since
the date of the certificate approved by the city or county;
(c) A description of changes or improvements constructed after
issuance of the certificate of tax exemption; and
(d) Any additional information requested by the city or county in
regards to the units receiving a tax exemption.
(2) All cities or counties, which issue certificates of tax
exemption for multiunit housing that conform to the requirements of
this chapter, ((shall)) must report annually by December 31st of each
year, beginning in 2007, to the department of ((community, trade, and
economic development)) commerce. The report must include the following
information:
(a) The number of tax exemption certificates granted;
(b) The total number and type of units produced or to be produced;
(c) The number and type of units produced or to be produced meeting
affordable housing requirements;
(d) The actual development cost of each unit produced;
(e) The total monthly rent or total sale amount of each unit
produced;
(f) The income of each renter household at the time of initial
occupancy and the income of each initial purchaser of owner-occupied
units at the time of purchase for each of the units receiving a tax
exemption and a summary of these figures for the city or county; and
(g) The value of the tax exemption for each project receiving a tax
exemption and the total value of tax exemptions granted.

Sec. 10 RCW 84.14.110 and 2007 c 430 s 11 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) If improvements have been exempted under this chapter, the
improvements continue to be exempted for the applicable period under
RCW 84.14.020, so long as they are not converted to another use and
continue to satisfy all applicable conditions. If the owner intends to
convert the multifamily development to another use, or if applicable,
if the owner intends to discontinue compliance with the affordable
housing requirements as described in RCW 84.14.020 or any other
condition to exemption, the owner ((shall)) must notify the assessor
within sixty days of the change in use or intended discontinuance. If,
after a certificate of tax exemption has been filed with the county
assessor, the authorized representative of the governing authority
discovers that a portion of the property is changed or will be changed
to a use that is other than residential or that housing or amenities no
longer meet the requirements, including, if applicable, affordable
housing requirements, as previously approved or agreed upon by contract
between the city or county and the owner and that the multifamily
housing, or a portion of the housing, no longer qualifies for the
exemption, the tax exemption must be canceled and the following must
occur:
(a) Additional real property tax must be imposed upon the value of
the nonqualifying improvements in the amount that would normally be
imposed, plus a penalty must be imposed amounting to twenty percent.
This additional tax is calculated based upon the difference between the
property tax paid and the property tax that would have been paid if it
had included the value of the nonqualifying improvements dated back to
the date that the improvements were converted to a nonmultifamily use;
(b) The tax must include interest upon the amounts of the
additional tax at the same statutory rate charged on delinquent
property taxes from the dates on which the additional tax could have
been paid without penalty if the improvements had been assessed at a
value without regard to this chapter; and
(c) The additional tax owed together with interest and penalty must
become a lien on the land and attach at the time the property or
portion of the property is removed from multifamily use or the
amenities no longer meet applicable requirements, and has priority to
and must be fully paid and satisfied before a recognizance, mortgage,
judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with which the land
may become charged or liable. The lien may be foreclosed upon
expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner
provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property
taxes. An additional tax unpaid on its due date is delinquent. From
the date of delinquency until paid, interest must be charged at the
same rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.
(2) Upon a determination that a tax exemption is to be canceled for
a reason stated in this section, the governing authority or authorized
representative ((shall)) must notify the record owner of the property
as shown by the tax rolls by mail, return receipt requested, of the
determination to cancel the exemption. The owner may appeal the
determination to the governing authority or authorized representative,
within thirty days by filing a notice of appeal with the clerk of the
governing authority, which notice must specify the factual and legal
basis on which the determination of cancellation is alleged to be
erroneous. The governing authority or a hearing examiner or other
official authorized by the governing authority may hear the appeal. At
the hearing, all affected parties may be heard and all competent
evidence received. After the hearing, the deciding body or officer
((shall)) must either affirm, modify, or repeal the decision of
cancellation of exemption based on the evidence received. An aggrieved
party may appeal the decision of the deciding body or officer to the
superior court under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.
(3) Upon determination by the governing authority or authorized
representative to terminate an exemption, the county officials having
possession of the assessment and tax rolls ((shall)) must correct the
rolls in the manner provided for omitted property under RCW 84.40.080.
The county assessor ((shall)) must make such a valuation of the
property and improvements as is necessary to permit the correction of
the rolls. The value of the new housing construction, conversion, and
rehabilitation improvements added to the rolls ((shall be)) is
considered as new construction for the purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW.
The owner may appeal the valuation to the county board of equalization
under chapter 84.48 RCW and according to the provisions of RCW
84.40.038. If there has been a failure to comply with this chapter,
the property must be listed as an omitted assessment for assessment
years beginning January 1 of the calendar year in which the
noncompliance first occurred, but the listing as an omitted assessment
may not be for a period more than three calendar years preceding the
year in which the failure to comply was discovered.

--- END ---