BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the marine waters
of Washington state and their associated tidelands and bedlands,
located in Puget Sound and related inland marine waterways, the Strait
of Juan de Fuca, Hood Canal, the outer coastal waters, together with
the lakes, rivers, and streams that flow to them, represent a unique
and unparalleled resource to the state of Washington.
Their rich and varied range of freshwater and marine organisms
comprise an interdependent, sensitive communal ecosystem that is
beneficial both for ecosystem quality and economic opportunity.
Closures of beaches to shellfish harvest due to the risk of disease
have become more frequent and widespread. Through reinvigorated
efforts of the public, tribes, nongovernmental organizations, public
agencies, and the private sector, Washington's marine waters should
become a model of a thriving natural system, with: Clean marine and
freshwaters; clean sediments; healthy and abundant native species;
natural shorelines and places for public enjoyment; and a vibrant
economy that prospers in productive harmony with a healthy Puget Sound.
One component of restoring Puget Sound is ensuring healthy
shellfish. Shellfish can help filter and improve the quality of our
marine waters, thereby being part of the solution to restoring and
preserving ecosystem health. Shellfish aquaculture, commercial and
tribal harvest of wild shellfish resources, recreational shellfish
harvest, and preservation of natural marine areas are water-dependent
uses that rely on excellent water quality. Healthy marine waters and
productive shellfish beds are essential for a growing shellfish
industry, Native American tribes, public recreational harvest, economic
opportunity, and an enjoyable quality of life.
To this end, the governor announced the Washington state shellfish
initiative in 2011. The initiative is a convergence of the national
oceanic and atmospheric administration's national shellfish initiative
and the state's long-standing interest in promoting clean water
industries and a healthy marine ecosystem.
Therefore, it is the purpose of this act to require reports to the
legislature, the governor, and the public on the progress of and
opportunities for implementing elements of the national shellfish
initiative and related activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 (1) Consistent with RCW 43.01.036, the
department of ecology shall cooperate with other federal, state, and
local agencies, and academic institutions in reviewing peer-reviewed
scientific literature, and environmental impact statements, on the
relationship between shellfish and water quality in marine waters and
prepare a report by December 1, 2012, to the governor and legislature
covering their findings on:
(a) The baseline water quality impacts of natural populations on
unimpaired waters;
(b) The relationship of intensified shellfish populations due to
farming, on both unimpaired and impaired waters;
(c) Descriptions of and evaluations of projects using shellfish to
improve marine water quality;
(d) The effectiveness of strategies for preventing and apprehending
shellfish poachers and recommendations on whether improvements are
needed or will be needed as the industry grows.
(2) Consistent with RCW 43.01.036, the department of ecology,
together with the department of natural resources and the Puget Sound
partnership, in cooperation with partner agencies, must submit a
progress report to the appropriate standing committees of the senate
and house of representatives by December 1, 2012, on the following
elements of the initiative and associated activities:
(a) Research by the Washington sea grant program and the national
oceanic and atmospheric administration on the scientific basis for a
variety of current and potential shellfish farming practices that
ensure ecosystem health, including: Siting, site preparation, planting
or installation, operation, and harvest of commercial shellfish
operations, including land and water transportation and equipment used,
with the expectation that the report will include, but not be limited
to:
(i) Impacts on salmon and forage fish habitat, including eel grass;
(ii) Improved ability to assess risks of toxic algae blooms;
(iii) Marine litter prevention and cleanup;
(iv) Water quality and habitat impacts of commercial planting and
harvesting of shellfish on both tidelands and bedlands, including
impacts on sand dollars, snails, birds, and native geoduck populations;
(v) Impacts of shellfish excretions from concentrated shellfish
farming;
(vi) Methods for estimating the carrying capacity of Puget Sound
bays and waters to achieve both sustainable shellfish farming and
sustainable water quality;
(b) Recommendations for and examples of methods for achieving
balance between new shellfish farms and: Nearby terrestrial land uses;
marine water space utilization; bedland and tideland uses; habitat for
other marine species, including birds; environmental protection; and
coastal development;
(c) A summary of the shellfish restoration priorities of the Puget
Sound partnership, including a detailed description of their goals for
upgrading ten thousand eight hundred acres of harvestable quantities of
additional shellfish harvest, including types and quantities of
additional shellfish harvest intended, the geographic areas intended,
and an estimate of the number of acres of bedlands and tidelands
intended, whether tidelands and bedlands of state parks are intended,
and an estimate of the number of linear beach miles intended in Puget
Sound and in other marine water regions;
(d) The proposed model permitting program, and associated pilot
projects, established as part of the shellfish initiative, together
with an evaluation of whether the model permitting program will provide
more timeliness and certainty to the industry and improved
opportunities for interested citizens to become informed about new
proposals and provide input into decision-making processes;
(e) The plan to restore nineteen historic Puget Sound Olympia
oyster beds and associated local ecosystems;
(f) The plan for bolstering pinto abalone populations;
(g) Recommendations for improving and increasing public access to
shellfish on public tidelands for tribal and recreational harvest,
together with recommended policies for avoiding use conflicts involving
water, beaches, public parks, outdoor recreation, and adjacent land
owners, including consideration of transportation related needs of
shellfish farming and harvest operations;
(h) Improving water quality in commercial, recreational, and tribal
shellfish growing areas;
(i) Creation of a pollution identification and correction program,
in cooperation with local governments;
(j) Implementation of a pollution action team to respond quickly
when water quality problems threaten shellfish harvest areas;
(k) A summary of the estimated impact of the shellfish industry in
the state of Washington, both currently, and as projected from results
of the state and federal shellfish initiatives, including jobs,
investment, economic multiplier effects, revenues to state and local
governments, and contributions to international trade;
(l) Improved effectiveness of on-site sewage management programs;
(m) Reductions in agricultural run-off affecting marine water
quality; and
(n) A summary of the activities of the blue ribbon panel on ocean
acidification.
(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(a) "Blue ribbon panel on ocean acidification" means the panel of
scientific experts and the relevant agencies and stakeholders formed
under the initiative to develop clear, actionable recommendations on
understanding, monitoring, adapting, and mitigating ocean acidification
in Puget Sound and Washington waters.
(b) "Initiative" means the Washington state shellfish initiative,
which is an agreement among federal and state governments, tribes, and
the shellfish industry to restore and expand Washington's shellfish
resources to promote clean water industries and create family wage
jobs.
(c) "Pollution action team" means a team formed with staff from the
United States environmental protection agency, the department of
ecology, the department of health, and the department of agriculture
designed to respond quickly when water quality problems are identified
that threaten shellfish areas, initially focusing on Drayton Harbor and
Portage Bay.

--- END ---