BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.170.010 and 2007 c 306 s 1 and 2007 c 154 s 1 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Armed private security guard" means a private security guard
who has a current firearms certificate issued by the commission and is
licensed as an armed private security guard under this chapter.
(2) "Armored vehicle guard" means a person who transports in an
armored vehicle under armed guard, from one place to another place,
valuables, jewelry, currency, documents, or any other item that
requires secure delivery.
(3) "Burglar alarm response runner" means a person employed by a
private security company to respond to burglar alarm system signals.
(4) "Burglar alarm system" means a device or an assembly of
equipment and devices used to detect or signal unauthorized intrusion,
movement, or exit at a protected premises, other than in a vehicle, to
which police or private security guards are expected to respond.
(5) "Chief law enforcement officer" means the elected or appointed
police administrator of a municipal, county, or state police or
sheriff's department that has full law enforcement powers in its
jurisdiction.
(6) "Classroom instruction" means training that takes place in a
setting where individuals receiving training are assembled together and
learn through lectures, study papers, class discussion, textbook study,
or other means of organized formal education techniques, such as video,
closed circuit, or other forms of electronic means, and as
distinguished from individual instruction.
(7) "Commission" means the criminal justice training commission
established in chapter 43.101 RCW.
(8) "Crowd management or crowd control" means persons used to
provide control, regulation, or direction of the public for the purpose
of safety and protection during the time when a crowd has assembled for
the purpose of attending or taking part in an organized event,
including preevent assembly, event operation hours, and postevent
departure activities. Crowd management or crowd control persons are
required to be licensed by this chapter and include any person who:
(a) Carries a firearm or other dangerous weapon including, but not
limited to, a stun gun, taser, pepper mace, or nightstick;
(b) Wears a uniform or clothing readily identifiable by a member of
the public as that worn by any security personnel, including either a
private security officer or law enforcement officer; and
(c) Is authorized to provide, or engages in, any of the following
crowd control or crowd management activities:
(i) Control, other than as a ticket taker at a public entrance to
the event, of a person who does not possess authority to access any
part of the facility;
(ii) Control of persons who possess or are suspected of possessing
contraband inside the boundaries of the event or facility;
(iii) Control of persons who are reasonably suspected of engaging
in disturbing or assaultive behavior; or
(iv) Detention of persons.
(9) "Department" means the department of licensing.
(((9))) (10) "Department-certified trainer" means any person who
has been approved by the department by receiving a passing score on a
department-administered examination, to administer department-provided
examinations and attest that training or testing requirements have been
met.
(((10))) (11) "Director" means the director of the department of
licensing.
(((11))) (12) "Employer" includes any individual, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, company, society, manager,
contractor, subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent
of any of the foregoing that employs or seeks to enter into an
arrangement to employ any person as a private security guard.
(((12))) (13) "Firearms certificate" means the certificate issued
by the commission.
(((13))) (14) "Guest services" include tasks that can be performed
by unlicensed persons at an organized event during preevent assembly,
event operation, and postevent departure activities. These tasks are
done primarily for the comfort or convenience of those attending or
participating in an organized event, and include persons performing the
duties of ticket taker, usher, valet, lot attendant, or crowd monitor.
As used in this subsection "crowd monitor" includes guest services
staff who are responsible for watching for and reporting disturbances
or suspect activity, but not responsible for responding to these
occurrences.
(15) "Individual instruction" means training that takes place
either on-the-job or through formal education techniques, such as
video, closed circuit, internet, or other forms of electronic means,
and as distinguished from classroom instruction.
(((14))) (16) "Licensee" means a person granted a license required
by this chapter.
(((15))) (17) "Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, company, society, manager, contractor,
subcontractor, bureau, agency, service, office, or an agent or employee
of any of the foregoing.
(((16))) (18) "Primary responsibility" means activity that is
fundamental to, and required or expected in, the regular course of
employment and is not merely incidental to employment.
(((17))) (19) "Principal corporate officer" means the president,
vice president, treasurer, secretary, comptroller, or any other person
who performs the same functions for the corporation as performed by
these officers.
(((18))) (20) "Private security company" means a person or entity
licensed under this chapter and engaged in the business of providing
the services of private security guards on a contractual basis.
(((19))) (21) "Private security guard" means an individual who is
licensed under this chapter and principally employed as or typically
referred to as one of the following:
(a) Security officer or guard;
(b) Patrol or merchant patrol service officer or guard;
(c) Armed escort or bodyguard;
(d) Armored vehicle guard;
(e) Burglar alarm response runner; or
(f) Crowd control officer or guard.
(((20))) (22) "Qualifying agent" means an officer or manager of a
corporation who meets the requirements set forth in this chapter for
obtaining a license to own or operate a private security company.
(((21))) (23) "Sworn peace officer" means a person who is an
employee of the federal government, the state, a political subdivision,
agency, or department branch of a municipality, or other unit of local
government, and has law enforcement powers.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.170.020 and 2007 c 154 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The requirements of this chapter do not apply to:
(1) A person who is employed exclusively or regularly by one
employer and performs the functions of a private security guard solely
in connection with the affairs of that employer, if the employer is not
a private security company;
(2) A sworn peace officer while engaged in the performance of the
officer's official duties;
(3) A sworn peace officer while employed by any person to engage in
off-duty employment as a private security guard, but only if the
employment is approved by the chief law enforcement officer of the
jurisdiction where the employment takes place and the sworn peace
officer does not employ, contract with, or broker for profit other
persons to assist him or her in performing the duties related to his or
her private employer; or
(4) ((A)) Persons performing ((crowd management or)) guest services
((including, but not limited to, a person described as a ticket taker,
usher, door attendant, parking attendant, crowd monitor, or event staff
who:
(a) Does not carry a firearm or other dangerous weapon including,
but not limited to, a stun gun, taser, pepper mace, or nightstick;
(b) Does not wear a uniform or clothing readily identifiable by a
member of the public as that worn by a private security officer or law
enforcement officer; and
(c) Does not have as his or her primary responsibility the
detainment of persons or placement of persons under arrest.
The exemption provided in this subsection applies only when a crowd
has assembled for the purpose of attending or taking part in an
organized event, including preevent assembly, event operation hours,
and postevent departure activities)) only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 In any action brought by reason of any
person having been detained by a crowd management or crowd control
licensee on or in the immediate vicinity of the premises of an event
for the purpose of investigation or questioning, it is a defense of
such action that the person was detained in a reasonable manner and for
not more than a reasonable time to permit such investigation or
questioning by the licensee, and that such licensee had reasonable
grounds to believe that circumstances warranted the person to be
detained. As used in this section, (1) "reasonable grounds" includes,
but is not limited to, observation or report of disruptive behavior,
intoxication, disorderly conduct, or criminal acts, and (2) "reasonable
time" means the time necessary to permit the licensee to conduct the
investigation or questioning and the person detained to make a
statement or to refuse to make a statement, or the time necessary for
a law enforcement officer to arrive.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Guest services staff shall report
disturbances or suspect activity but are not responsible for responding
to those occurrences.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A company which provides both guest services
staff and security services staff at an organized event must specify in
the contract with the event organizers the difference between staff
contracted for security purposes and staff contracted for guest
services purposes, and explain clearly how to identify each. The
company must maintain lists of the staff that provided the security
services and guest services at each event. The contract and the lists
of staff will be kept by the company for department review for one year
after each event.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 3 through 5 of this act are each
added to chapter 18.170 RCW.

--- END ---