BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.166.010 and 1991 c 128 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
It is the intent of the legislature to:
(1) Promote the health, safety, and welfare of international
student exchange visitors in Washington in accordance with uniform
national standards;
(2) Promote quality education and living experiences for
international student exchange visitors living in Washington;
(3) Promote international awareness among Washington residents, by
encouraging Washington residents to interact with international student
exchange visitors;
(4) Encourage public confidence in international student exchange
visitor placement organizations operating in Washington;
(5) Encourage ((and assist with)) compliance with ((United States
information)) appropriate federal agency regulations and nationally
established standards as outlined by the council on standards for
international educational travel or its successor organization; and
(6) Promote the existence and quality of international student
visitor exchange programs operating in Washington.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.166.040 and 1997 c 58 s 854 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An application for registration as an international student
exchange visitor placement organization shall be submitted in the form
prescribed by the secretary of state. The application shall include:
(a) Evidence that the organization meets the standards established
by the secretary of state under RCW 19.166.050;
(b) The name, address, and telephone number of the organization,
its chief executive officer, and the person within the organization who
has primary responsibility for supervising placements within the state;
(c) The organization's unified business identification number, if
any;
(d) The organization's ((United States Information Agency)) federal
agency number, if any;
(e) Evidence of council on standards for international educational
travel listing, if any;
(f) Whether the organization is exempt from federal income tax;
((and))
(g) A list of the organization's placements in Washington for the
previous academic year including the number of students placed, their
home countries, the school districts in which they were placed, and the
length of their placements; and
(h) A copy of the informational document for a student as required
under RCW 19.166.070.
(2) The application shall be signed by the chief executive officer
of the organization and the person within the organization who has
primary responsibility for supervising placements within Washington.
If the secretary of state determines that the application is complete,
the secretary of state shall file the application and the applicant is
registered.
(3) International student exchange visitor placement organizations
that have registered shall inform the secretary of state of any changes
in the information required under subsection (1) of this section within
thirty days of the change.
(4) Registration shall be renewed annually as established by rule
by the office of the secretary of state.
(((5) The office of the secretary of state shall immediately
suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified
pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or
a residential or visitation order. If the person has continued to meet
all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension,
reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the
office of the secretary of state's receipt of a release issued by the
department of social and health services stating that the licensee is
in compliance with the order.))

Sec. 3 RCW 19.166.050 and 1991 c 128 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state shall adopt standards for international
student exchange visitor placement organizations. In adopting the
standards, the secretary of state shall strive to adopt standards
established by the ((United States Information Agency)) appropriate
federal agency and the council on standards for international
educational travel and strive to achieve uniformity with national
standards. The secretary of state may incorporate standards
established by the ((United States Information Agency)) appropriate
federal agency or the council on standards for international
educational travel by reference and may accept an organization's
designation by the ((United States Information Agency)) appropriate
federal agency or acceptance for listing by the council on standards
for international educational travel as evidence of compliance with
such standards.

Sec. 4 RCW 19.166.070 and 1991 c 128 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
International student exchange organizations that have agreed to
provide services to place students in the state shall provide an
informational document, in English, to each student, host family, and
superintendent of the school district in which the student is being
placed. The document shall be provided before placement and shall
include the following:
(1) An explanation of the services to be performed by the
organization for the student, host family, and school district;
(2) A summary of this chapter prepared by the secretary of state;
(3) Telephone numbers that the student, host family, and school
district may call for assistance. The telephone numbers shall include,
at minimum, an in-state telephone number for the organization, and the
telephone numbers of the organization's national headquarters, if any,
the ((United States Information Agency)) appropriate federal agency,
and the office of the secretary of state.

Sec. 5 RCW 19.166.080 and 1991 c 128 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
The secretary of state may, upon receipt of a complaint regarding
an international student exchange organization, report the matter to
the organization involved, the ((United States Information Agency))
appropriate federal agency, or the council on standards for
international ((education)) educational travel, as he or she deems
appropriate. The secretary of state may, upon receipt of a complaint
in which the secretary of state suspects criminal activity, report the
matter to the appropriate local law enforcement agency, in addition to
the organization involved or the council on standards for international
educational travel, as the secretary of state deems appropriate.

--- END ---