BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.63.110 and 2010 c 252 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be
assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and
fifty dollars for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or
title.
(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of (a) RCW 46.55.105(2) is
two hundred fifty dollars for each offense; (b) RCW 46.61.210(1) is
five hundred dollars for each offense. No penalty assessed under this
subsection (2) may be reduced.
(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of
monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall
also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise
discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions.
The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this
schedule every two years for inflation.
(4) There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction
relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to
this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not
to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a notice of
traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law,
ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty
set by the local legislative body.
(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are
civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of
chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles
are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties
which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.
(6) Whenever a monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other
monetary obligation is imposed by a court under this chapter, it is
immediately payable and is enforceable as a civil judgment under Title
6 RCW. If the court determines, in its discretion, that a person is
not able to pay a monetary obligation in full, and not more than one
year has passed since the later of July 1, 2005, or the date the
monetary obligation initially became due and payable, the court shall
enter into a payment plan with the person, unless the person has
previously been granted a payment plan with respect to the same
monetary obligation, or unless the person is in noncompliance of any
existing or prior payment plan, in which case the court may, at its
discretion, implement a payment plan. If the court has notified the
department that the person has failed to pay or comply and the person
has subsequently entered into a payment plan and made an initial
payment, the court shall notify the department that the infraction has
been adjudicated, and the department shall rescind any suspension of
the person's driver's license or driver's privilege based on failure to
respond to that infraction. "Payment plan," as used in this section,
means a plan that requires reasonable payments based on the financial
ability of the person to pay. The person may voluntarily pay an amount
at any time in addition to the payments required under the payment
plan.
(a) If a payment required to be made under the payment plan is
delinquent or the person fails to complete a community restitution
program on or before the time established under the payment plan,
unless the court determines good cause therefor and adjusts the payment
plan or the community restitution plan accordingly, the court ((shall
notify the department of the person's failure to meet the conditions of
the plan, and the department shall suspend the person's driver's
license or driving privilege)) may refer the unpaid monetary penalty,
fee, cost, assessment, or other monetary obligation for civil
enforcement until all monetary obligations, including those imposed
under subsections (3) and (4) of this section, have been paid, and
court authorized community restitution has been completed, or until the
((department has been notified that the)) court has entered into a new
time payment or community restitution agreement with the person. For
those infractions subject to suspension under RCW 46.20.289, the court
shall notify the department of the person's failure to meet the
conditions of the plan, and the department shall suspend the person's
driver's license or driving privileges.
(b) If a person has not entered into a payment plan with the court
and has not paid the monetary obligation in full on or before the time
established for payment, the court ((shall notify the department of the
delinquency. The department shall suspend the person's driver's
license or driving privilege)) may refer the unpaid monetary penalty,
fee, cost, assessment, or other monetary obligation to a collections
agency until all monetary obligations have been paid, including those
imposed under subsections (3) and (4) of this section, or until the
person has entered into a payment plan under this section. For those
infractions subject to suspension under RCW 46.20.289, the court shall
notify the department of the person's delinquency, and the department
shall suspend the person's driver's license or driving privileges.
(c) If the payment plan is to be administered by the court, the
court may assess the person a reasonable administrative fee to be
wholly retained by the city or county with jurisdiction. The
administrative fee shall not exceed ten dollars per infraction or
twenty-five dollars per payment plan, whichever is less.
(d) Nothing in this section precludes a court from contracting with
outside entities to administer its payment plan system. When outside
entities are used for the administration of a payment plan, the court
may assess the person a reasonable fee for such administrative
services, which fee may be calculated on a periodic, percentage, or
other basis.
(e) If a court authorized community restitution program for
offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court may allow
conversion of all or part of the monetary obligations due under this
section to court authorized community restitution in lieu of time
payments if the person is unable to make reasonable time payments.
(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a
person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed:
(a) A fee of five dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances
shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical
services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040;
(b) A fee of ten dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances
shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be
forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the Washington auto
theft prevention authority account; and
(c) A fee of two dollars per infraction. Revenue from this fee
shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the traumatic
brain injury account established in RCW 74.31.060.
(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this
section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this
section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other
than of RCW 46.61.527 or 46.61.212 shall be assessed an additional
penalty of twenty dollars. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend
the additional penalty unless the court finds the offender to be
indigent. If a court authorized community restitution program for
offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court shall allow
offenders to offset all or a part of the penalty due under this
subsection (8) by participation in the court authorized community
restitution program.
(b) Eight dollars and fifty cents of the additional penalty under
(a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The
remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under
chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited in the
state general fund. The balance of the revenue received by the county
or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into the
county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city or
county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any
liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.
(9) If a legal proceeding, such as garnishment, has commenced to
collect any delinquent amount owed by the person for any penalty
imposed by the court under this section, the court may, at its
discretion, enter into a payment plan.
(10) The monetary penalty for violating RCW 46.37.395 is: (a) Two
hundred fifty dollars for the first violation; (b) five hundred dollars
for the second violation; and (c) seven hundred fifty dollars for each
violation thereafter.

Sec. 2 RCW 46.20.391 and 2010 c 269 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any person licensed under this chapter who is convicted of an
offense relating to motor vehicles for which suspension or revocation
of the driver's license is mandatory, other than vehicular homicide,
vehicular assault, driving while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug, or being in actual physical control of a motor
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug,
may submit to the department an application for a temporary restricted
driver's license. The department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee
and upon determining that the petitioner is eligible to receive the
license, may issue a temporary restricted driver's license and may set
definite restrictions as provided in RCW 46.20.394.
(2)(a) A person licensed under this chapter whose driver's license
is suspended administratively due to failure to appear or pay a traffic
ticket under RCW 46.20.289; a violation of the financial responsibility
laws under chapter 46.29 RCW; or for multiple violations within a
specified period of time under RCW 46.20.291, may apply to the
department for an occupational driver's license.
(b) ((If the suspension is for failure to respond, pay, or comply
with a notice of traffic infraction or conviction, the applicant must
enter into a payment plan with the court.
(c))) An occupational driver's license issued to an applicant
described in (a) of this subsection shall be valid for the period of
the suspension or revocation.
(3) An applicant for an occupational or temporary restricted
driver's license who qualifies under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section is eligible to receive such license only if:
(a) Within seven years immediately preceding the date of the
offense that gave rise to the present conviction or incident, the
applicant has not committed vehicular homicide under RCW 46.61.520 or
vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522; and
(b) The applicant demonstrates that it is necessary for him or her
to operate a motor vehicle because he or she:
(i) Is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential
that he or she operate a motor vehicle;
(ii) Is undergoing continuing health care or providing continuing
care to another who is dependent upon the applicant;
(iii) Is enrolled in an educational institution and pursuing a
course of study leading to a diploma, degree, or other certification of
successful educational completion;
(iv) Is undergoing substance abuse treatment or is participating in
meetings of a twelve-step group such as Alcoholics Anonymous that
requires the petitioner to drive to or from the treatment or meetings;
(v) Is fulfilling court-ordered community service responsibilities;
(vi) Is in a program that assists persons who are enrolled in a
WorkFirst program pursuant to chapter 74.08A RCW to become gainfully
employed and the program requires a driver's license;
(vii) Is in an apprenticeship, on-the-job training, or welfare-to-work program; or
(viii) Presents evidence that he or she has applied for a position
in an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program for which a
driver's license is required to begin the program, provided that a
license granted under this provision shall be in effect for no longer
than fourteen days; and
(c) The applicant files satisfactory proof of financial
responsibility under chapter 46.29 RCW; and
(d) Upon receipt of evidence that a holder of an occupational
driver's license granted under this subsection is no longer enrolled in
an apprenticeship or on-the-job training program, the director shall
give written notice by first-class mail to the driver that the
occupational driver's license shall be canceled. If at any time
before the cancellation goes into effect the driver submits evidence of
continued enrollment in the program, the cancellation shall be stayed.
If the cancellation becomes effective, the driver may obtain, at no
additional charge, a new occupational driver's license upon submittal
of evidence of enrollment in another program that meets the criteria
set forth in this subsection; and
(e) The department shall not issue an occupational driver's license
under (b)(iv) of this subsection if the applicant is able to receive
transit services sufficient to allow for the applicant's participation
in the programs referenced under (b)(iv) of this subsection.
(4) A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the
application for an occupational or temporary restricted driver's
license may request a hearing as provided by rule of the department.
(5) The director shall cancel an occupational or temporary
restricted driver's license after receiving notice that the holder
thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle in violation of
its restrictions, no longer meets the eligibility requirements, or has
been convicted of or found to have committed a separate offense or any
other act or omission that under this chapter would warrant suspension
or revocation of a regular driver's license. The department must give
notice of the cancellation as provided under RCW 46.20.245. A person
whose occupational or temporary restricted driver's license has been
canceled under this section may reapply for a new occupational or
temporary restricted driver's license if he or she is otherwise
qualified under this section and pays the fee required under RCW
46.20.380.

Sec. 3 RCW 46.20.289 and 2005 c 288 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall suspend all driving privileges of a person
when the department receives notice from a court under RCW
46.63.070(6), 46.63.110(6), or 46.64.025 that the person has failed to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction for a moving violation,
failed to appear at a requested hearing for a moving violation,
violated a written promise to appear in court for a notice of
infraction for a moving violation, or has failed to comply with the
terms of a notice of traffic infraction or citation for a moving
violation, or when the department receives notice from another state
under Article IV of the nonresident violator compact under RCW
46.23.010 or from a jurisdiction that has entered into an agreement
with the department under RCW 46.23.020, other than for a standing,
stopping, or parking violation, provided that the traffic infraction or
traffic offense is committed on or after July 1, 2005. A suspension
under this section takes effect pursuant to the provisions of RCW
46.20.245, and remains in effect until the department has received a
certificate from the court showing that the case has been adjudicated,
and until the person meets the requirements of RCW 46.20.311. In the
case of failure to respond to a traffic infraction issued under RCW
46.55.105, the department shall suspend all driving privileges until
the person provides evidence from the court that all penalties and
restitution have been paid. A suspension under this section does not
take effect if, prior to the effective date of the suspension, the
department receives a certificate from the court showing that the case
has been adjudicated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW
to read as follows:
The department of licensing in consultation with the administrative
office of the courts must adopt and maintain rules, by November 1,
2012, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW that define a moving
violation for the purposes of this act. "Moving violation" shall be
defined pursuant to Title 46 RCW. Upon adoption of these rules, the
department must provide written notice to affected parties, the chief
clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, the
office of the code reviser, and others as deemed appropriate by the
department.

Sec. 5 RCW 46.64.025 and 2006 c 270 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Whenever any person served with a traffic citation willfully fails
to appear ((for a scheduled court hearing)) at a requested hearing for
a moving violation or fails to comply with the terms of a notice of
traffic citation for a moving violation, the court in which the
defendant failed to appear shall promptly give notice of such fact to
the department of licensing. Whenever thereafter the case in which the
defendant failed to appear is adjudicated, the court hearing the case
shall promptly file with the department a certificate showing that the
case has been adjudicated. For the purposes of this section, "moving
violation" is defined by rule pursuant to section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Except for section 4 of this act, this act
takes effect June 1, 2013. If specific funding for the purposes of
this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not
provided by June 30, 2012, in the transportation appropriations act,
this act is null and void.

--- END ---