BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.10.030 and 2009 c 549 s 5048 are each amended to
read as follows:
The attorney general, having only those powers expressly granted by
statute, shall:
(1) Appear for and represent the state ((before the supreme court
or the court of appeals)) in all cases in which the state is interested
when another statute grants the attorney general authority regarding
the subject matter of the case or when requested to do so by a state
officer with authority over the subject matter;
(2) Institute and prosecute all actions and proceedings for, or for
the use of the state, which may be necessary in the execution of the
duties of any other state officer, upon request by that officer;
(3) Defend all actions and proceedings against any state officer or
employee acting in his or her official capacity, in any of the courts
of this state or the United States;
(4) Consult with and advise the several prosecuting attorneys in
matters relating to the duties of their office, and when the interests
of the state require, he or she shall attend the trial of any person
accused of a crime, and assist in the prosecution;
(5) Consult with and advise the governor, members of the
legislature, and other state officers, and when requested, give written
opinions upon all constitutional or legal questions relating to the
duties of such officers;
(6) Prepare proper drafts of contracts and other instruments
relating to subjects in which the state is interested;
(7) Give written opinions, when requested by either branch of the
legislature, or any committee thereof, upon constitutional or legal
questions;
(8) Enforce the proper application of funds appropriated for the
public institutions of the state, and prosecute corporations for
failure or refusal to make the reports required by law;
(9) Keep in proper books a record of all cases prosecuted or
defended by him or her, on behalf of the state or its officers, and of
all proceedings had in relation thereto, and deliver the same to his or
her successor in office;
(10) Keep books in which he or she shall record all the official
opinions given by him or her during his or her term of office, and
deliver the same to his or her successor in office;
(11) Pay into the state treasury all moneys received by him or her
for the use of the state.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.10.040 and 1965 c 8 s 43.10.040 are each amended to
read as follows:
The attorney general shall also represent the state and all
officials, departments, boards, commissions and agencies of the state
in the courts, and before all administrative tribunals or bodies of any
nature, in all legal or quasi legal matters, hearings, or proceedings,
((and)) when a statute grants the attorney general authority over the
subject matter or a state officer with authority over the subject
matter requests representation. The attorney general may decline to
provide such representation only if the matter is not well-grounded in
fact, or not warranted by existing law or a good faith argument for a
change in law, or is interposed for an improper purpose such as to
harass another party or to cause unnecessary delay or increased
litigation costs. The attorney general shall advise all officials,
departments, boards, commissions, or agencies of the state in all
matters involving legal or quasi legal questions, except those declared
by law to be the duty of the prosecuting attorney of any county.

--- END ---