BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.04.310 and 2007 c 437 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and
RCW 39.04.300 and 39.04.320 unless the context clearly requires
otherwise.
(1) "Apprentice" means an apprentice enrolled in ((a state-approved)) an apprenticeship training program.
(2) "Apprenticeship training program" means:
(a) For the electrical, plumbing, and elevator construction trades,
an apprenticeship training program approved by the Washington state
apprenticeship council with a completion rate over a twelve-year period
that meets or exceeds sixty percent or the industry average, whichever
is less. The department of labor and industries shall determine and
publish the completion rates for particular apprenticeship training
programs as well as industry averages.
(b) For other trades and crafts, an apprenticeship training program
approved by the Washington state apprenticeship council.
(3) "Apprentice utilization requirement" means the requirement that
the appropriate percentage of labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(((3))) (4) "Labor hours" means the total hours of workers
receiving an hourly wage who are directly employed on the site of the
public works project. "Labor hours" includes hours performed by
workers employed by the contractor and all subcontractors working on
the project. "Labor hours" does not include hours worked by foremen,
superintendents, owners, and workers who are not subject to prevailing
wage requirements.
(((4))) (5) "School district" has the same meaning as in RCW
28A.315.025.
(((5) "State-approved apprenticeship training program" means an
apprenticeship training program approved by the Washington state
apprenticeship council.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---