BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Institutions of higher education shall give students who are
eligible veterans or national guard members priority during
registration. "Eligible veterans and national guard members" includes
those defined in RCW 28B.15.621 and veterans or national guard members
who have fought in Afghanistan or Iraq during conflicts that arose
following September 11, 2001. Priority registration may be given to a
broader group of veterans or national guard members.
(2) Private and independent institutions of higher education are
encouraged to provide priority registration to eligible veterans and
national guard members as defined in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) This section expires July 1, 2022.

--- END ---