BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.24.130 and 1979 c 158 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
license of any person licensed by the director of licensing, or the
boards and commissions listed in chapter 18.235 RCW, to practice a
profession or engage in an occupation, if valid and in force and effect
at the time the licensee entered service in the armed forces, the
United States public health service commissioned corps, or the merchant
marine of the United States, shall continue in full force and effect so
long as such service continues, unless sooner suspended, canceled, or
revoked for cause as provided by law. The director, board, or
commission shall renew the license of every such person who applies for
renewal thereof within six months after being honorably discharged from
service upon payment of the renewal fee applicable to the then current
year or other license period.
(2) If requested by the licensee, the license of a spouse or
registered domestic partner of a servicemember in the United States
armed forces, including the United States public health service
commissioned corps, if valid and in force and effect at the time the
servicemember is deployed or stationed in a location outside Washington
state, must be placed in inactive military spouse or registered
domestic partner status so long as such service continues, unless
sooner suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law.
The director, board, or commission shall return to active status the
license of every such person who applies for activation within six
months after returning to Washington state, upon payment of the current
renewal fee and meeting the current renewal conditions of the
respective license.
(3) The director, board, or commission may adopt any rules
necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.70.270 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 321 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
license of any person licensed by the secretary of health to practice
a profession or engage in an occupation, if valid and in force and
effect at the time the licensee entered service in the armed forces,
the United States public health service commissioned corps, or the
merchant marine of the United States, shall continue in full force and
effect so long as such service continues, unless sooner suspended,
canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law. The secretary shall
renew the license of every such person who applies for renewal thereof
within six months after being honorably discharged from service upon
payment of the renewal fee applicable to the then current year or other
license period.
(2) If requested by the licensee, the license of a spouse or
registered domestic partner of a servicemember in the United States
armed forces, including the United States public health service
commissioned corps, if valid and in force and effect at the time the
servicemember is deployed or stationed in a location outside Washington
state, must be placed in inactive military spouse or registered
domestic partner status so long as such service continues, unless
sooner suspended, canceled, or revoked for cause as provided by law.
The secretary shall return to active status the license of every such
person who applies for renewal thereof within six months after the
servicemember is honorably discharged from service, or sooner if
requested by the licensee, upon payment of the renewal fee applicable
to the then current year or other license period.
(3) The secretary may adopt any rules necessary to implement this
section.

--- END ---