BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.182.040 and 2011 c 333 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as authorized under subsection (2) of this section, no
consumer reporting agency may make a consumer report containing any of
the following items of information:
(a) Bankruptcies that, from date of adjudication of the most recent
bankruptcy, antedate the report by more than ten years;
(b) Suits and judgments that, from date of entry, antedate the
report by more than seven years or until the governing statute of
limitations has expired, whichever is the longer period;
(c) Paid tax liens that, from date of payment, antedate the report
by more than seven years;
(d) Accounts placed for collection or charged to profit and loss
that antedate the report by more than seven years;
(e) Records of arrest, indictment, or conviction of an adult for a
crime that, from date of disposition, release, or parole, antedate the
report by more than seven years; and
(f) ((Juvenile records, as defined in RCW 13.50.010(1)(c), when the
subject of the records is twenty-one years of age or older at the time
of the report; and
(g))) Any other adverse item of information that antedates the
report by more than seven years.
(2) Subsection (1)(a) through (((e) and (g))) (f) of this section
is not applicable in the case of a consumer report to be used in
connection with:
(a) A credit transaction involving, or that may reasonably be
expected to involve, a principal amount of fifty thousand dollars or
more;
(b) The underwriting of life insurance involving, or that may
reasonably be expected to involve, a face amount of fifty thousand
dollars or more; or
(c) The employment of an individual at an annual salary that
equals, or that may reasonably be expected to equal, twenty thousand
dollars or more.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.40.070 and 2010 c 289 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Complaints referred to the juvenile court alleging the
commission of an offense shall be referred directly to the prosecutor.
The prosecutor, upon receipt of a complaint, shall screen the complaint
to determine whether:
(a) The alleged facts bring the case within the jurisdiction of the
court; and
(b) On a basis of available evidence there is probable cause to
believe that the juvenile did commit the offense.
(2) If the identical alleged acts constitute an offense under both
the law of this state and an ordinance of any city or county of this
state, state law shall govern the prosecutor's screening and charging
decision for both filed and diverted cases.
(3) If the requirements of subsections (1)(a) and (b) of this
section are met, the prosecutor shall either file an information in
juvenile court or divert the case, as set forth in subsections (5),
(6), and (8) of this section. If the prosecutor finds that the
requirements of subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section are not met,
the prosecutor shall maintain a record, for one year, of such decision
and the reasons therefor. In lieu of filing an information or
diverting an offense a prosecutor may file a motion to modify community
supervision where such offense constitutes a violation of community
supervision.
(4) An information shall be a plain, concise, and definite written
statement of the essential facts constituting the offense charged. It
shall be signed by the prosecuting attorney and conform to chapter
10.37 RCW.
(5) Except as provided in RCW 13.40.213 and subsection (7) of this
section, where a case is legally sufficient, the prosecutor shall file
an information with the juvenile court if:
(a) An alleged offender is accused of a class A felony, a class B
felony, an attempt to commit a class B felony, a class C felony listed
in RCW 9.94A.411(2) as a crime against persons or listed in RCW
9A.46.060 as a crime of harassment, or a class C felony that is a
violation of RCW 9.41.080 or 9.41.040(2)(a)(iii); or
(b) An alleged offender is accused of a felony and has a criminal
history of any felony, or at least two gross misdemeanors, or at least
two misdemeanors; or
(c) An alleged offender has previously been committed to the
department; or
(d) An alleged offender has been referred by a diversion unit for
prosecution or desires prosecution instead of diversion; or
(e) An alleged offender has ((two or)) more than two diversion
agreements on the alleged offender's criminal history; or
(f) A special allegation has been filed that the offender or an
accomplice was armed with a firearm when the offense was committed.
(6) Where a case is legally sufficient the prosecutor shall divert
the case if the alleged offense is a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
or violation and the alleged offense is the offender's first or second
offense or violation. If the alleged offender is charged with a
related offense that must or may be filed under subsections (5) and (8)
of this section, a case under this subsection may also be filed.
(7) Where a case is legally sufficient to charge an alleged
offender with either prostitution or prostitution loitering and the
alleged offense is the offender's first or second prostitution or
prostitution loitering offense, the prosecutor shall divert the case.
(8) Where a case is legally sufficient and falls into neither
subsection (5) nor (6) of this section, it may be filed or diverted.
In deciding whether to file or divert an offense under this section the
prosecutor shall be guided only by the length, seriousness, and recency
of the alleged offender's criminal history and the circumstances
surrounding the commission of the alleged offense.
(9) Whenever a juvenile is placed in custody or, where not placed
in custody, referred to a diversion interview, the parent or legal
guardian of the juvenile shall be notified as soon as possible
concerning the allegation made against the juvenile and the current
status of the juvenile. Where a case involves victims of crimes
against persons or victims whose property has not been recovered at the
time a juvenile is referred to a diversion unit, the victim shall be
notified of the referral and informed how to contact the unit.
(10) The responsibilities of the prosecutor under subsections (1)
through (9) of this section may be performed by a juvenile court
probation counselor for any complaint referred to the court alleging
the commission of an offense which would not be a felony if committed
by an adult, if the prosecutor has given sufficient written notice to
the juvenile court that the prosecutor will not review such complaints.
(11) The prosecutor may divert unranked felonies.
(12) The prosecutor, juvenile court probation counselor, or
diversion unit may, in exercising their authority under this section or
RCW 13.40.080, refer juveniles to mediation or victim offender
reconciliation programs. Such mediation or victim offender
reconciliation programs shall be voluntary for victims.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.40.080 and 2004 c 120 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A diversion agreement shall be a contract between a juvenile
accused of an offense and a diversion unit whereby the juvenile agrees
to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution. Such agreements
may be entered into only after the prosecutor, or probation counselor
pursuant to this chapter, has determined that probable cause exists to
believe that a crime has been committed and that the juvenile committed
it. Such agreements shall be entered into as expeditiously as
possible.
(2) A diversion agreement shall be limited to one or more of the
following:
(a) Community restitution not to exceed one hundred fifty hours,
not to be performed during school hours if the juvenile is attending
school;
(b) Restitution limited to the amount of actual loss incurred by
any victim;
(c) Attendance at up to ten hours of counseling and/or up to twenty
hours of educational or informational sessions at a community agency.
The educational or informational sessions may include sessions relating
to respect for self, others, and authority; victim awareness;
accountability; self-worth; responsibility; work ethics; good
citizenship; literacy; and life skills. For purposes of this section,
"community agency" may also mean a community-based nonprofit
organization, if approved by the diversion unit. The state shall not
be liable for costs resulting from the diversion unit exercising the
option to permit diversion agreements to mandate attendance at up to
ten hours of counseling and/or up to twenty hours of educational or
informational sessions;
(d) A fine, not to exceed one hundred dollars;
(e) Requirements to remain during specified hours at home, school,
or work, and restrictions on leaving or entering specified geographical
areas; and
(f) Upon request of any victim or witness, requirements to refrain
from any contact with victims or witnesses of offenses committed by the
juvenile.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section, youth courts are not limited to the conditions imposed by
subsection (2) of this section in imposing sanctions on juveniles
pursuant to RCW 13.40.630.
(4) In assessing periods of community restitution to be performed
and restitution to be paid by a juvenile who has entered into a
diversion agreement, the court officer to whom this task is assigned
shall consult with the juvenile's custodial parent or parents or
guardian. To the extent possible, the court officer shall advise the
victims of the juvenile offender of the diversion process, offer victim
impact letter forms and restitution claim forms, and involve members of
the community. Such members of the community shall meet with the
juvenile and advise the court officer as to the terms of the diversion
agreement and shall supervise the juvenile in carrying out its terms.
(5)(a) A diversion agreement may not exceed a period of six months
and may include a period extending beyond the eighteenth birthday of
the divertee.
(b) If additional time is necessary for the juvenile to complete
restitution to a victim, the time period limitations of this subsection
may be extended by an additional six months.
(c) If the juvenile has not paid the full amount of restitution by
the end of the additional six-month period, then the juvenile shall be
referred to the juvenile court for entry of an order establishing the
amount of restitution still owed to the victim. In this order, the
court shall also determine the terms and conditions of the restitution,
including a payment plan extending up to ten years if the court
determines that the juvenile does not have the means to make full
restitution over a shorter period. For the purposes of this subsection
(5)(c), the juvenile shall remain under the court's jurisdiction for a
maximum term of ten years after the juvenile's eighteenth birthday.
Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the juvenile
court may extend the judgment for restitution an additional ten years.
The court may relieve the juvenile of the requirement to pay full or
partial restitution if the juvenile reasonably satisfies the court that
he or she does not have the means to make full or partial restitution
and could not reasonably acquire the means to pay the restitution over
a ten-year period. If the court relieves the juvenile of the
requirement to pay full or partial restitution, the court may order an
amount of community restitution that the court deems appropriate. The
county clerk shall make disbursements to victims named in the order.
The restitution to victims named in the order shall be paid prior to
any payment for other penalties or monetary assessments. A juvenile
under obligation to pay restitution may petition the court for
modification of the restitution order.
(6) The juvenile shall retain the right to be referred to the court
at any time prior to the signing of the diversion agreement.
(7) Divertees and potential divertees shall be afforded due process
in all contacts with a diversion unit regardless of whether the
juveniles are accepted for diversion or whether the diversion program
is successfully completed. Such due process shall include, but not be
limited to, the following:
(a) A written diversion agreement shall be executed stating all
conditions in clearly understandable language;
(b) Violation of the terms of the agreement shall be the only
grounds for termination;
(c) No divertee may be terminated from a diversion program without
being given a court hearing, which hearing shall be preceded by:
(i) Written notice of alleged violations of the conditions of the
diversion program; and
(ii) Disclosure of all evidence to be offered against the divertee;
(d) The hearing shall be conducted by the juvenile court and shall
include:
(i) Opportunity to be heard in person and to present evidence;
(ii) The right to confront and cross-examine all adverse witnesses;
(iii) A written statement by the court as to the evidence relied on
and the reasons for termination, should that be the decision; and
(iv) Demonstration by evidence that the divertee has substantially
violated the terms of his or her diversion agreement((.));
(e) If the court decides not to terminate the diversion,
information about the court hearing, including any court file, and fact
of the continuing diversion shall not be available to the public;
(f) The prosecutor may file an information on the offense for which
the divertee was diverted:
(i) In juvenile court if the divertee is under eighteen years of
age; or
(ii) In superior court or the appropriate court of limited
jurisdiction if the divertee is eighteen years of age or older.
(8) The diversion unit shall, subject to available funds, be
responsible for providing interpreters when juveniles need interpreters
to effectively communicate during diversion unit hearings or
negotiations.
(9) The diversion unit shall be responsible for advising a divertee
of his or her rights as provided in this chapter.
(10) The diversion unit may refer a juvenile to community-based
counseling or treatment programs.
(11) The right to counsel shall inure prior to the initial
interview for purposes of advising the juvenile as to whether he or she
desires to participate in the diversion process or to appear in the
juvenile court. The juvenile may be represented by counsel at any
critical stage of the diversion process, including intake interviews
and termination hearings. The juvenile shall be fully advised at the
intake of his or her right to an attorney and of the relevant services
an attorney can provide. For the purpose of this section, intake
interviews mean all interviews regarding the diversion agreement
process.
The juvenile shall be advised that a diversion agreement shall
constitute a part of the juvenile's criminal history as defined by RCW
13.40.020(7). A signed acknowledgment of such advisement shall be
obtained from the juvenile, and the document shall be maintained by the
diversion unit together with the diversion agreement, and a copy of
both documents shall be delivered to the prosecutor if requested by the
prosecutor. Neither the diversion agreement nor the signed
acknowledgment shall be available to the public as long as the juvenile
meets the requirements of the diversion agreement. The supreme court
shall promulgate rules setting forth the content of such advisement in
simple language.
(12)(a) When a juvenile enters into a diversion agreement, the
juvenile court may receive only the following information for
dispositional purposes:
(((a))) (i) The fact that a charge or charges were made;
(((b))) (ii) The fact that a diversion agreement was entered into;
(((c))) (iii) The juvenile's obligations under such agreement;
(((d))) (iv) Whether the alleged offender performed his or her
obligations under such agreement; and
(((e))) (v) The facts of the alleged offense.
(b) None of the information received by the court under this
section shall be available to the public.
(13) A diversion unit may refuse to enter into a diversion
agreement with a juvenile. When a diversion unit refuses to enter a
diversion agreement with a juvenile, it shall immediately refer such
juvenile to the court for action and shall forward to the court the
criminal complaint and a detailed statement of its reasons for refusing
to enter into a diversion agreement. If the court later determines
that the case should nevertheless be diverted, none of the information
regarding the initial refusal to enter into a diversion agreement with
the juvenile or about the subsequent diversion shall be available to
the public. The diversion unit shall also immediately refer the case
to the prosecuting attorney for action if such juvenile violates the
terms of the diversion agreement.
(14) A diversion unit may, in instances where it determines that
the act or omission of an act for which a juvenile has been referred to
it involved no victim, or where it determines that the juvenile
referred to it has no prior criminal history and is alleged to have
committed an illegal act involving no threat of or instance of actual
physical harm and involving not more than fifty dollars in property
loss or damage and that there is no loss outstanding to the person or
firm suffering such damage or loss, counsel and release or release such
a juvenile without entering into a diversion agreement. A diversion
unit's authority to counsel and release a juvenile under this
subsection includes the authority to refer the juvenile to community-based counseling or treatment programs. Any juvenile released under
this subsection shall be advised that the act or omission of any act
for which he or she had been referred shall constitute a part of the
juvenile's criminal history as defined by RCW 13.40.020(7); however,
such criminal history shall not be available to the public. A signed
acknowledgment of such advisement shall be obtained from the juvenile,
and the document shall be maintained by the unit, and a copy of the
document shall be delivered to the prosecutor if requested by the
prosecutor. The supreme court shall promulgate rules setting forth the
content of such advisement in simple language. A juvenile determined
to be eligible by a diversion unit for release as provided in this
subsection shall retain the same right to counsel and right to have his
or her case referred to the court for formal action as any other
juvenile referred to the unit.
(15) A diversion unit may supervise the fulfillment of a diversion
agreement entered into before the juvenile's eighteenth birthday and
which includes a period extending beyond the divertee's eighteenth
birthday.
(16) If a fine required by a diversion agreement cannot reasonably
be paid due to a change of circumstance, the diversion agreement may be
modified at the request of the divertee and with the concurrence of the
diversion unit to convert an unpaid fine into community restitution.
The modification of the diversion agreement shall be in writing and
signed by the divertee and the diversion unit. Information about the
modification of the diversion agreement under this subsection shall not
be available to the public. The number of hours of community
restitution in lieu of a monetary penalty shall be converted at the
rate of the prevailing state minimum wage per hour.
(17) Fines imposed under this section shall be collected and paid
into the county general fund in accordance with procedures established
by the juvenile court administrator under RCW 13.04.040 and may be used
only for juvenile services. In the expenditure of funds for juvenile
services, there shall be a maintenance of effort whereby counties
exhaust existing resources before using amounts collected under this
section.

--- END ---