BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 64.38.040 and 1995 c 283 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Unless the governing documents specify a different percentage,
a quorum is present throughout any meeting of the association if the
owners to which thirty-four percent of the votes of the association are
allocated are present in person or by proxy at the beginning of the
meeting.
(2) If the governing documents specify a percentage higher than
thirty-four percent for a quorum for any meeting of the association,
any owner in that association, who has at least ten percent of the
votes in the association, or at least three owners in the association
with ten or less residential real properties, may petition the court of
local jurisdiction in the county where the association is located to
lower the quorum requirement to thirty-four percent of the votes of the
association by first meeting the following requirements:
(a) Send certified letters to all owners of record in the
association, as listed in the county assessor's office, of the intent
to petition to lower the quorum requirements;
(b) Give all owners in the association three months to respond to
the letter. A lack of a response from an owner is deemed an agreement
with the petition; and
(c) Collect owner responses and document a good faith effort to
contact all owners.
(3) This section applies retroactively to any governing documents
in effect on the effective date of this section.

--- END ---