BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 10.97.030 and 1999 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
For purposes of this chapter, the definitions of terms in this
section shall apply.
(1) "Criminal history record information" means information
contained in records collected by criminal justice agencies, other than
courts, on individuals, consisting of identifiable descriptions and
notations of arrests, detentions, indictments, informations, or other
formal criminal charges, and any disposition arising therefrom,
including acquittals by reason of insanity, dismissals based on lack of
competency, sentences, correctional supervision, and release.
The term includes information contained in records maintained by or
obtained from criminal justice agencies, other than courts, which
records provide individual identification of a person together with any
portion of the individual's record of involvement in the criminal
justice system as an alleged or convicted offender, except:
(a) Posters, announcements, or lists for identifying or
apprehending fugitives or wanted persons;
(b) Original records of entry maintained by criminal justice
agencies to the extent that such records are compiled and maintained
chronologically and are accessible only on a chronological basis;
(c) Court indices and records of public judicial proceedings, court
decisions, and opinions, and information disclosed during public
judicial proceedings;
(d) Records of traffic violations which are not punishable by a
maximum term of imprisonment of more than ninety days;
(e) Records of any traffic offenses as maintained by the department
of licensing for the purpose of regulating the issuance, suspension,
revocation, or renewal of drivers' or other operators' licenses and
pursuant to RCW 46.52.130;
(f) Records of any aviation violations or offenses as maintained by
the department of transportation for the purpose of regulating pilots
or other aviation operators, and pursuant to RCW 47.68.330;
(g) Announcements of executive clemency;
(h) Intelligence, analytical, or investigative reports and files.
(2) "Nonconviction data" consists of all criminal history record
information relating to an incident which has not led to a conviction
or other disposition adverse to the subject, and for which proceedings
are no longer actively pending. There shall be a rebuttable
presumption that proceedings are no longer actively pending if more
than one year has elapsed since arrest, citation, charge, or service of
warrant and no disposition has been entered.
(3) "Conviction record" means criminal history record information
relating to an incident which has led to a conviction or other
disposition adverse to the subject.
(4) "Conviction or other disposition adverse to the subject" means
any disposition of charges other than: (a) A decision not to
prosecute; (b) a dismissal; or (c) acquittal; with the following
exceptions, which shall be considered dispositions adverse to the
subject: An acquittal due to a finding of not guilty by reason of
insanity and a dismissal by reason of incompetency, pursuant to chapter
10.77 RCW; and a dismissal entered after a period of probation,
suspension, or deferral of sentence.
(5) "Criminal justice agency" means: (a) A court; or (b) a
government agency which performs the administration of criminal justice
pursuant to a statute or executive order and which allocates a
substantial part of its annual budget to the administration of criminal
justice.
(6) "The administration of criminal justice" means performance of
any of the following activities: Detection, apprehension, detention,
pretrial release, post-trial release, prosecution, adjudication,
correctional supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or
criminal offenders. The term also includes criminal identification
activities and the collection, storage, dissemination of criminal
history record information, and the compensation of victims of crime.
(7) "Disposition" means the formal conclusion of a criminal
proceeding at whatever stage it occurs in the criminal justice system.
(8) "Dissemination" means disclosing criminal history record
information or disclosing the absence of criminal history record
information to any person or agency outside the agency possessing the
information, subject to the following exceptions:
(a) When criminal justice agencies jointly participate in the
maintenance of a single record keeping department as an alternative to
maintaining separate records, the furnishing of information by that
department to personnel of any participating agency is not a
dissemination;
(b) The furnishing of information by any criminal justice agency to
another for the purpose of processing a matter through the criminal
justice system, such as a police department providing information to a
prosecutor for use in preparing a charge, is not a dissemination;
(c) The reporting of an event to a record keeping agency for the
purpose of maintaining the record is not a dissemination.

Sec. 2 RCW 10.97.050 and 2005 c 421 s 9 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Conviction records may be disseminated without restriction.
(2) Any criminal history record information which pertains to an
incident that occurred within the last twelve months for which a person
is currently being processed by the criminal justice system, including
the entire period of correctional supervision extending through final
discharge from parole, when applicable, may be disseminated without
restriction ((with the exception of a record being disseminated in
response to a request for a conviction record under RCW 43.43.832. A
request for a conviction record under RCW 43.43.832 shall not contain
information for a person who, within the last twelve months, is
currently being processed by the criminal justice system unless it
pertains to information relating to a crime against a person as defined
in RCW 9.94A.411)).
(3) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated by a criminal justice agency to
another criminal justice agency for any purpose associated with the
administration of criminal justice, or in connection with the
employment of the subject of the record by a criminal justice or
juvenile justice agency. A criminal justice agency may respond to any
inquiry from another criminal justice agency without any obligation to
ascertain the purpose for which the information is to be used by the
agency making the inquiry.
(4) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated by a criminal justice agency to
implement a statute, ordinance, executive order, or a court rule,
decision, or order which expressly refers to records of arrest,
charges, or allegations of criminal conduct or other nonconviction data
and authorizes or directs that it be available or accessible for a
specific purpose.
(5) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated to individuals and agencies
pursuant to a contract with a criminal justice agency to provide
services related to the administration of criminal justice. Such
contract must specifically authorize access to criminal history record
information, but need not specifically state that access to
nonconviction data is included. The agreement must limit the use of
the criminal history record information to stated purposes and insure
the confidentiality and security of the information consistent with
state law and any applicable federal statutes and regulations.
(6) Criminal history record information which includes
nonconviction data may be disseminated to individuals and agencies for
the express purpose of research, evaluative, or statistical activities
pursuant to an agreement with a criminal justice agency. Such
agreement must authorize the access to nonconviction data, limit the
use of that information which identifies specific individuals to
research, evaluative, or statistical purposes, and contain provisions
giving notice to the person or organization to which the records are
disseminated that the use of information obtained therefrom and further
dissemination of such information are subject to the provisions of this
chapter and applicable federal statutes and regulations, which shall be
cited with express reference to the penalties provided for a violation
thereof.
(7) Every criminal justice agency that maintains and disseminates
criminal history record information must maintain information
pertaining to every dissemination of criminal history record
information except a dissemination to the effect that the agency has no
record concerning an individual. Information pertaining to
disseminations shall include:
(a) An indication of to whom (agency or person) criminal history
record information was disseminated;
(b) The date on which the information was disseminated;
(c) The individual to whom the information relates; and
(d) A brief description of the information disseminated.
The information pertaining to dissemination required to be
maintained shall be retained for a period of not less than one year.
(8) In addition to the other provisions in this section allowing
dissemination of criminal history record information, RCW 4.24.550
governs dissemination of information concerning offenders who commit
sex offenses as defined by RCW 9.94A.030. Criminal justice agencies,
their employees, and officials shall be immune from civil liability for
dissemination on criminal history record information concerning sex
offenders as provided in RCW 4.24.550.

Sec. 3 RCW 10.97.080 and 2010 c 8 s 1093 are each amended to read
as follows:
All criminal justice agencies shall permit an individual who is, or
who believes that he or she may be, the subject of a criminal record
maintained by that agency, to appear in person during normal business
hours of that criminal justice agency and request to see the criminal
history record information held by that agency pertaining to the
individual. The individual's right to access and review of criminal
history record information shall not extend to data contained in
intelligence, investigative, or other related files, and shall not be
construed to include any information other than that defined as
criminal history record information by this chapter.
Every criminal justice agency shall adopt rules and make available
forms to facilitate the inspection and review of criminal history
record information by the subjects thereof, which rules may include
requirements for identification, the establishment of reasonable
periods of time to be allowed an individual to examine the record, and
for assistance by an individual's counsel, interpreter, or other
appropriate persons.
No person shall be allowed to retain or mechanically reproduce any
nonconviction data except for the ((purpose of challenge or correction
when the)) person who is the subject of the record ((asserts the belief
in writing that the information regarding such person is inaccurate or
incomplete)). Such person may retain a copy of their personal
nonconviction data information on file, if the criminal justice agency
has verified the identities of those who seek to inspect them.
Criminal justice agencies may impose such additional restrictions,
including fingerprinting, as are reasonably necessary both to assure
the record's security and to verify the identities of those who seek to
inspect them. The criminal justice agency may charge a reasonable fee
for fingerprinting or providing a copy of the personal nonconviction
data information pursuant to this section. The provisions of chapter
42.56 RCW shall not be construed to require or authorize copying of
nonconviction data for any other purpose.
The Washington state patrol shall establish rules for the challenge
of records which an individual declares to be inaccurate or incomplete,
and for the resolution of any disputes between individuals and criminal
justice agencies pertaining to the accuracy and completeness of
criminal history record information. The Washington state patrol shall
also adopt rules for the correction of criminal history record
information and the dissemination of corrected information to agencies
and persons to whom inaccurate or incomplete information was previously
disseminated. Such rules may establish time limitations of not less
than ninety days upon the requirement for disseminating corrected
information.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.43.730 and 2006 c 294 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Any individual shall have the right to inspect or request a
copy of the criminal history record information on file with the
section which refers to the individual. If the individual believes
such information to be inaccurate or incomplete, he or she may request
the section to purge, modify or supplement it and to advise such
persons or agencies who have received his or her record and whom the
individual designates to modify it accordingly. Should the section
decline to so act, or should the individual believe the section's
decision to be otherwise unsatisfactory, the individual may appeal such
decision to the superior court in the county in which he or she is
resident, or the county from which the disputed record emanated or
Thurston county. The court shall in such case conduct a de novo
hearing, and may order such relief as it finds to be just and
equitable.
(2) The section may prescribe reasonable hours and a place for
inspection, and may impose such additional restrictions, including
fingerprinting, as are reasonably necessary both to assure the record's
security and to verify the identities of those who seek to inspect
them: PROVIDED, That the section may charge a reasonable fee for
fingerprinting or for providing a copy of the criminal history record
information pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Sec. 5 RCW 43.43.8321 and 2005 c 421 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
When the Washington state patrol disseminates conviction record
information in response to a request under RCW 43.43.832, it shall
clearly state that: (1) The conviction record data does not include
information on civil adjudications, administrative findings, or
disciplinary board final decisions and that all such information must
be obtained from the courts and licensing agencies; (2) the conviction
record ((that is being disseminated includes information)) includes any
criminal history record information which pertains to an incident that
occurred within the last twelve months for which a person is currently
being processed by the criminal justice system ((relating to only
crimes against a person as defined in RCW 9.94A.411 and that it does
not include any other current or pending charge information for which
a person could be in the current process of being processed by the
criminal justice system)), including the entire period of correctional
supervision extending through final discharge from parole, when
applicable, may be disseminated without restriction; and (3) an arrest
is not a conviction or a finding of guilt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 RCW 43.43.565 (Automatic fingerprint
information system account) and 1986 c 196 s 2 are each repealed.

--- END ---