BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) Consumers should have the right to know whether the foods they
purchase contain genetically engineered material. The genetic
engineering of plants and animals often causes unintended consequences.
Manipulating genes and inserting them into organisms is an imprecise
process. The results are not always predictable or controllable, and
can lead to adverse health or environmental consequences.
(b) Government scientists have stated that the artificial insertion
of genetic material into plants, a technique unique to genetic
engineering, can cause a variety of significant problems with plant
foods. Such genetic engineering can increase the levels of known
toxicants in foods, introduce new toxicants or new allergies, and
reduce the nutritional value of food.
(c) Mandatory labeling of genetically engineered foods can provide
a critical method for tracking the potential health effects of
consuming genetically engineered foods.
(d) Currently, there is no federal or state requirement that foods
be labeled to disclose that they are genetically engineered. At the
same time, the United States food and drug administration does not
require safety studies of such foods. Unless these foods contain a
known allergen, the United States food and drug administration does not
even require the producers to consult with the agency regarding
genetically engineered crops or other foods.
(e) The vast majority of the public want labels on genetically
engineered foods.
(f) Fifty countries, including the European Union member states,
Japan, and other key United States trading partners, have laws
mandating disclosure of genetically engineered foods on food labels.
No intentional agreements prohibit the mandatory labeling of such
foods.
(g) Without labeling, consumers of genetically engineered food can
unknowingly violate their own dietary and religious restrictions.
(h) The cultivation of genetically engineered crops can also cause
serious impacts to the environment. For example, most genetically
engineered crops are designed to withstand weed-killing herbicides. As
a result, hundreds of millions of pounds of additional herbicides have
been used on the nation's farms. Because of the massive use of such
products, herbicide-resistant weeds have flourished, a problem that has
resulted, in turn, in the use of increasingly toxic herbicides. These
toxic herbicides damage our agricultural areas, impair our drinking
water, and pose health risks to consumers and farmworkers. The public
should have the choice to avoid purchasing foods produced in ways that
can lead to such harm.
(i) Organic farmers are prohibited from using genetically
engineered seeds. Nonetheless, these farmers' crops are regularly
threatened with accidental contamination from neighboring lands where
genetically engineered crops abound. This risk of contamination can
erode public confidence in organic products, significantly undermining
this industry. Consumers should have the choice to avoid purchasing
foods whose production could harm the state's organic farmers and its
organic foods industry.
(2) The purpose of this act is to ensure that people are fully
informed about whether the food they purchase and eat is genetically
engineered so that they can choose for themselves whether to purchase
and eat such foods.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Cultivated commercially" means grown or raised by a person in
the course of a business or trade.
(2) "Department" means the department of agriculture.
(3) "Enzyme" means a protein that catalyzes chemical reasons of
other substances without itself being destroyed or altered upon
completion of the reactions.
(4) "Food facility" means an operation that stores, prepares,
packages, serves, vends, or otherwise provides food for human
consumption at the retail level, including an operation where food is
consumed on or off the premises, regardless of whether there is a
charge for the food.
(5) "Genetically engineered" means any food that consists of, is
composed of, contains, or is produced from an organism or organisms in
which the genetic material has been changed through the application of:
(a) In vitro nucleic acid techniques, including recombinant
deoxyribonucleic acid techniques and the direct injection of nucleic
acid into cells or organelles. Such techniques include but are not
limited to recombinant deoxyribonucleic acid or ribonucleic acid
techniques that use vector systems and techniques involving the direct
introduction into the organisms of hereditary material prepared outside
the organisms such as micro-injection, macro-injection, chemoporation,
electroporation, micro-encapsulation, and liposome fusion; or
(b) Fusion of cells, including protoplast fusion, or hybridization
techniques that overcome natural physiological, reproductive, or
recombination barriers, where the donor cells or protoplasts do not
fall within the same taxonomic family, in a way that does not occur by
natural multiplication or natural recombination.
(6) "Ingredient" means any substance that is used in the
manufacture, or contained in the final form, of a processed food.
(7) "Processed food" means any food other than a raw agricultural
commodity and includes any food produced from a raw agricultural
commodity that has been subject to processing such as canning, smoking,
pressing, cooking, freezing, dehydration, fermentation, or milling.
(8) "Processing aid" means:
(a) A substance that is added to a food during the processing of
the food but is removed in the same manner from the food before it is
packaged in its finished form;
(b) A substance that is added to a food during processing, is
converted into constituents normally present in the food, and does not
significantly increase the amount of the constituents naturally found
in the food; or
(c) A substance that is added to a food for its technical or
functional effects in the processing but is present in the finished
good at insignificant levels and does not have any technical or
functional effect in that finished food.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) Beginning July 1, 2014, for any
genetically engineered raw agricultural commodity that is offered for
retail sale, a clear and conspicuous statement consisting of the words
"genetically engineered" must appear either:
(a) On the front package or label of any such commodity; or
(b) In the case of such a commodity that is not separately packaged
or labeled, on a label appearing on the retail store shelf or bin in
which such a commodity is displayed for sale.
(2) Beginning July 1, 2014, any package offered for retail sale
containing processed food that is made with or derived from any
genetically engineered ingredient must include a clear and conspicuous
statement consisting of the words "contains genetically engineered
ingredient(s)," followed by the name of the ingredient or ingredients.
If an ingredients list appears on the package:
(a) This statement must appear underneath the ingredients list; and
(b) In the case of processed food containing more than one
genetically engineered ingredient, the genetically engineered
ingredients listed after this statement must be listed in the same
order in which they appear in the full ingredients list.
(3) In lieu of compliance with subsection (2) of this section, any
package containing processed food that is made with or is derived from
any ingredient that may be genetically engineered must include a clear
and conspicuous statement consisting of the words "may contain
genetically engineered ingredient(s)," followed by the name of the
ingredients. If an ingredients list appears on the package:
(a) This statement must appear underneath the ingredients list; and
(b) In the case of processed food containing more than one
ingredient that may be genetically engineered, the genetically
engineered ingredients listed after this statement must be listed in
the same order in which they appear in the full ingredients list.
(4) The requirements of subsections (1) through (3) of this section
do not apply to any of the following:
(a) Any raw agricultural commodity that, on the date it is offered
for retail sale, is not listed in section 4(2) of this act, or in the
most recent list published pursuant to section 4(3) of this act;
(b) A processed food that does not contain any ingredient derived
from a raw agricultural commodity that, on the date the processed food
is manufactured, is listed in either section 4(2) of this act, or in
the most recent list published pursuant to section 4(3) of this act;
(c) Food consisting entirely of, or derived entirely from, an
animal that has not itself been genetically engineered, regardless of
whether the animal has been fed or injected with any genetically
engineered food or any drug that has been produced through means of
genetic engineering;
(d) A raw agricultural commodity or ingredient that has been grown,
raised, or produced without the knowing and intentional use of
genetically engineered seed or food. To be included within this
exclusion, the person responsible for complying with this section with
respect to a raw agricultural commodity or ingredient must obtain, from
whoever sold the commodity or ingredient to that person, a sworn
statement that the commodity or ingredient: (i) Has not been knowingly
or intentionally genetically engineered; and (ii) has been segregated
from, and has not been knowingly or intentionally commingled with,
goods that may have been genetically engineered at any time. In
providing such a sworn statement, any person may rely on a sworn
statement from his or her own supplier that contains such an
affirmation;
(e) Any processed food that would be subject to this section solely
because it includes one or more genetically engineered processing aids
or enzymes;
(f) Any alcoholic beverage that is subject to regulation under
Title 66 RCW;
(g) Until July 1, 2019, any processed food that would be subject to
this section solely because it includes one or more genetically
engineered ingredients, provided that:
(i) No single ingredient accounts for more than one-half of one
percent of the total weight of the processed food; and
(ii) The processed food does not contain more than ten such
ingredients;
(h) Food that an independent organization has determined has not
been knowingly and intentionally produced from or commingled with
genetically engineered seed or genetically engineered food, provided
that such a determination has been made pursuant to a sampling and
testing procedure approved for this purpose in rules adopted by the
department. These rules may not approve a sampling and testing
procedure unless it is consistent with sampling and testing principles
recommended by internationally recognized standards organizations;
(i) Food that has been lawfully certified to be labeled, marketed,
and offered for sale as "organic" pursuant to applicable federal
organic food production laws and regulations;
(j) Food that is not packaged for retail sale and that either:
(i) Is a processed food prepared and intended for immediate human
consumption; or
(ii) Is served, sold, or otherwise provided in any restaurant or
other food facility that is primarily engaged in the sale of food
prepared and intended for immediate human consumption; and
(k) Medical food.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 (1) The department may adopt rules necessary
to implement this chapter, provided that the department is not
authorized to create any exemptions beyond those provided in section
3(4) of this act.
(2) The legislature finds that as of November 1, 2011, the
following raw agricultural commodities are commonly cultivated
commercially in genetically engineered form:
(a) Alfalfa;
(b) Canola;
(c) Corn;
(d) Cotton;
(e) Papaya;
(f) Soy;
(g) Sugar beets; and
(h) Zucchini and yellow summer squash.
(3) By July 1, 2013, and annually thereafter, the department shall
publish an updated list of additional raw agricultural commodities that
are at that time commonly cultivated commercially in genetically
engineered form. The list must be based on the most current available
information.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) The department, acting through the
attorney general, may bring an action in a court of competent
jurisdiction to enjoin any person violating this chapter.
(2) The department may assess a civil penalty against any person
violating this chapter in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars
per day. Each day of violation is considered a separate violation.
(3) An action to enjoin a violation of this chapter may be brought
in any court of competent jurisdiction by any person in the public
interest if both of the following requirements are met:
(a) The action is commenced more than sixty days after the person
has given notice of the alleged violation to the department, the
attorney general, and to the alleged violator; and
(b) The department, acting through the attorney general, has
commenced an action against the alleged violation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---