BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that as World War II
was drawing to a close in 1946, the world was ready to reaffirm faith
in fundamental human rights and the dignity and worth of the human
person. The United Nations formed a commission on human rights that
undertook the creation of the first global expression of rights to
which all human beings are inherently entitled. The commission was
chaired by Eleanor Roosevelt and its membership was broadly
representative of the global community. After nearly two years of
drafting and one last long night of debate, the president of the United
Nations general assembly called for a vote on the final text. Forty-eight nations voted in favor; eight abstained; none dissented. The
Universal Declaration of Human Rights was thus adopted in 1948. It is
the most recognized and often cited human rights document in the world.
The intention of the United Nations commission on human rights was
to draft and pass the Universal Declaration of Human Rights and widely
promote education about this great document. As stated by the
declaration: "Now, therefore, the General Assembly Proclaims this
Universal Declaration of Human Rights as a common standard of
achievement for all peoples and all nations, to the end that every
individual and every organ of society, keeping this Declaration
constantly in mind, shall strive by teaching and education to promote
respect for these rights and freedoms and by progressive measures,
national and international, to secure their universal and effective
recognition and observance . . . ."
The legislature finds that the simple yet powerful idea enshrined
in the Universal Declaration of Human Rights that all human beings are
born free and equal in dignity and rights must be promoted and made
widely known through education.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.230
RCW to read as follows:
School districts are encouraged to implement a program at least
once a year that educates students on the content and importance of the
Universal Declaration of Human Rights.

--- END ---