BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 51.28.070 and 1990 c 209 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
Information contained in the claim files and records of injured
workers, information submitted to the board of industrial insurance
appeals or to the department pursuant to the negotiation and approval
of a claims resolution structured settlement agreement, and information
developed during conferences or hearings on claims resolution
structured settlement agreements, under the provisions of this title,
shall be deemed confidential and shall not be open to public inspection
(other than to public employees in the performance of their official
duties), but representatives of a claimant, be it an individual or an
organization, may review a claim file or receive specific information
therefrom upon the presentation of the signed authorization of the
claimant. A claimant may review his or her claim file if the director
determines, pursuant to criteria adopted by rule, that the review is in
the claimant's interest. Employers or their duly authorized
representatives may review any files of their own injured workers in
connection with any pending claims. Physicians treating or examining
workers claiming benefits under this title, or physicians giving
medical advice to the department regarding any claim may, at the
discretion of the department, inspect the claim files and records of
injured workers, and other persons may make such inspection, at the
department's discretion, when such persons are rendering assistance to
the department at any stage of the proceedings on any matter pertaining
to the administration of this title.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The department of labor and industries shall
provide the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31,
2012, with a plan to define the term "claim file" for state fund and
self-insured industrial insurance claims. The plan shall include a
timeline for gathering input from representatives of employers and
workers, and for adopting rules under the administrative procedure act
or for submitting recommended statutory language, as appropriate. The
plan and rules or recommended legislation shall also address when claim
files must be submitted by self-insured employers to the department of
labor and industries and to injured workers or their representatives,
and any recommended consequences for failure to comply.

Sec. 3 RCW 51.52.120 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 37 s 304 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Except for claim resolution structured settlement agreements,
it shall be unlawful for an attorney engaged in the representation of
any worker or beneficiary to charge for services in the department any
fee in excess of a reasonable fee, of not more than thirty percent of
the increase in the award secured by the attorney's services. Such
reasonable fee shall be fixed by the director or the director's
designee for services performed by an attorney for such worker or
beneficiary, if written application therefor is made by the attorney,
worker, or beneficiary within one year from the date the final decision
and order of the department is communicated to the party making the
application.
(2) If, on appeal to the board, the order, decision, or award of
the department is reversed or modified and additional relief is granted
to a worker or beneficiary, or in cases where a party other than the
worker or beneficiary is the appealing party and the worker's or
beneficiary's right to relief is sustained by the board, the board
shall fix a reasonable fee for the services of his or her attorney in
proceedings before the board if written application therefor is made by
the attorney, worker, or beneficiary within one year from the date the
final decision and order of the board is communicated to the party
making the application. In fixing the amount of such attorney's fee,
the board shall take into consideration the fee allowed, if any, by the
director, for services before the department, and the board may review
the fee fixed by the director. Any attorney's fee set by the
department or the board may be reviewed by the superior court upon
application of such attorney, worker, or beneficiary. The department
or self-insured employer, as the case may be, shall be served a copy of
the application and shall be entitled to appear and take part in the
proceedings. Where the board, pursuant to this section, fixes the
attorney's fee, it shall be unlawful for an attorney to charge or
receive any fee for services before the board in excess of that fee
fixed by the board.
(3) For claim resolution structured settlement agreements, fees for
attorney services are limited to fifteen percent of the total amount to
be paid to the worker after the agreement becomes final. The board
will also decide on any disputes as to attorneys' fees for services
related to claim resolution structured settlement agreements consistent
with the procedures in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) If, on appeal to the board from a decision or order of the
department denying the reopening of a claim previously resolved with a
structured settlement agreement, the decision is reversed or modified
and the relief sought by the claimant is fully or partially awarded, a
reasonable fee for the services of the worker's attorney shall be fixed
by the board, and the board shall order reimbursement for all
reasonable costs of litigation, including fees of the medical and other
witnesses. In cases of self-insured employers, the attorney fees fixed
by the board and the costs set by the board shall be payable directly
by the self-insured employer. In all other cases, the fees and costs
shall be paid by the department.
(5) In an appeal to the board involving the presumption established
under RCW 51.32.185, the attorney's fee shall be payable as set forth
under RCW 51.32.185.
(((5))) (6) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor.

--- END ---