BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 70.158 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this chapter and chapters 70.157 and 82.24 RCW,
every person who operates or maintains a machine at a retail
establishment that enables the person to process a product made or
derived from tobacco into a roll or tube shall be deemed to be a
manufacturer of cigarettes. The resulting product shall be deemed to
be a cigarette.

--- END ---