BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature intends to assure that
health care workers in Washington state hospitals are able to take
uninterrupted meal and rest breaks to minimize fatigue and its effects
on patient safety and quality of care. The legislature further intends
to set a statewide standard of uninterrupted breaks and to define
circumstances in which breaks may be interrupted by unusual events and
consistent with the professional judgment of the nurses. The
legislature recognizes a mutual and shared commitment to uninterrupted
breaks: Hospitals are responsible for creating a work environment in
which health care workers are able and encouraged to take uninterrupted
breaks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Employees must be allowed an uninterrupted meal period of at
least thirty minutes that commences no less than two hours, nor more
than five hours, from the beginning of the shift. Meal periods must be
on the employer's time when the employee is required by the employer to
remain on duty on the premises or at a prescribed work site in the
interest of the employer to be immediately available to perform work
duties. An employee is not required to work more than five consecutive
hours without a meal period.
(2) Employees must be allowed an uninterrupted rest period, on the
employer's time for each four hours of working time, during which the
employee is relieved from work duties. The rest period must not be
less than ten minutes, but may be longer if provided for in a
collective bargaining agreement or other employer policy in the absence
of a collective bargaining agreement. Rest periods may be taken at any
point during each four hour work period.
(3) The definitions in RCW 49.28.130 apply to this section except
for the definition of "employee." For the purposes of this section,
"employee" means a person who is involved in direct patient care
activities or clinical services working for and on the premises of an
acute care inpatient hospital, other than state-operated facilities,
receives an hourly wage, or is covered by a collective bargaining
agreement, and is a:
(a) Licensed practical nurse or a registered nurse licensed under
chapter 18.79 RCW;
(b) Surgical technologist registered under chapter 18.215 RCW when
involved in direct patient care;
(c) Diagnostic radiologic technologist certified under chapter
18.84 RCW when involved in direct patient care;
(d) Respiratory technician licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW when
involved in direct patient care;
(e) Certified nursing assistant as defined under RCW 18.88A.020
when involved in direct patient care; or
(f) Cardiovascular invasive specialist as defined in chapter 18.84
RCW when involved in direct patient care.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as set forth in subsection (2) of this section, employee
meal and rest breaks required under section 2 of this act must be
uninterrupted.
(2) Paid meal and rest periods may be interrupted or delayed when:
(a) A national, state, or municipal government declares an
emergency;
(b) The hospital activates its disaster plan;
(c) The hospital determines that an unforeseen disaster,
catastrophic event, or other nonroutine extraordinary circumstance,
either internal or external to the hospital, will substantially affect
or increase the need for health care or substantially reduce the
hospital's capacity to provide health care. This does not include
chronic staffing shortages; or
(d) The employee on, or scheduled for, break determines a clinical
circumstance could lead to patient harm without the skill, expertise,
or knowledge of the employee on, or scheduled for, a break.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Each hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW must have and
maintain one or more specific mechanisms under which employees are able
to, and do take, meal and rest breaks. The mechanism must be
implemented or maintained based on information from employees providing
direct patient care on each unit and shift, management, and other
relevant sources.
(2) The mechanism must include training during orientation for new
and training of current managers, human resource staff, and nurses on
each unit concerning the importance of taking breaks, the importance of
and system for keeping records of breaks, and nonretaliation policies.
(3) Each hospital must collect, at a minimum, data on meal and rest
breaks not taken by employees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
A hospital may not retaliate against or engage in any form of
intimidation of any employee who reports a missed break or concerns
regarding the hospital's practices regarding breaks. The hospital must
promptly investigate any accusation of retaliation and take appropriate
corrective action.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW
to read as follows:
Upon receiving a complaint, the department may investigate to
determine whether a hospital is found to be out of compliance with the
requirements of sections 2 through 5 of this act. When the hospital is
found to be out of compliance, the department may require the hospital
to submit a corrective plan of action. In the event that a hospital
fails to submit or fails to follow the corrective plan of action, the
department may impose a penalty of one hour of pay for each missed
break from the employer to the affected employee.

--- END ---