BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the 1971 water
resources act provides that allocation of water among potential uses
and users must be based generally on securing of the maximum net
benefits for the people of the state. Maximum net benefits constitutes
total benefits, less costs, including opportunities lost. The
legislature finds that in allocating water under chapter 90.54 RCW that
adequate supplies of water are to be preserved and protected to satisfy
human domestic needs and that mitigation is not statutorily authorized
when making these allocations.
The legislature finds that homeowners not served by a public water
system may desire to access additional quantities of water to
supplement existing water allocations for human domestic uses for a
broad range of potential uses on their land. The department of ecology
has advanced conceptual alternatives that may provide homeowners the
ability to secure additional water resources based on the water-budget
neutral concept.
The purpose of this act is to authorize the department of ecology
to collaboratively work with representatives of state agencies, local
governments, local health departments, tribes, landowners, the home
construction industry, homeowners, engineers, and other interested
people to examine and develop workable mechanisms that are practical,
economical, and safe for homeowners and the home construction industry
to implement.
It is the intent of the legislature to help expedite the
construction of homes, and the related jobs resulting from home
construction, particularly in rural areas, by making water resources
more readily available.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 90.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The department of ecology may work collaboratively to examine
potential alternatives for increasing the amount of water otherwise
allocated to rural homeowners and businesses under this chapter. Among
the alternatives the department may explore are:
(a) Improvements to water systems serving a certain minimum number
of homes, businesses, or both;
(b) The collection, retention, and use or release of rainwater;
(c) The use of deep wells to augment stream flows;
(d) Water-sharing agreements with nearby well owners;
(e) Constructing ponds or other water impoundments;
(f) Conserving water in the watershed and banking that conserved
water for transfer to other users;
(g) Pumping water from other legally available water sources for
release into the watershed to offset the increased withdrawal that is
sought;
(h) Improving the efficiency of municipal irrigation or other water
distribution systems in the watershed; and
(i) Other alternatives that may have merit as suggested by the
department or interested parties.
(2) For alternatives that are determined to be viable, the
department may: (a) Develop the criteria and mechanisms to provide
clear and practical guidance to homeowners and builders; (b) anticipate
the variety of conditions in the state and provide an array of options
suitable to meet the types of conditions that homeowners would likely
encounter; and (c) develop true-to-life examples of how it would work
in subbasins where limitations on water for essential human domestic
uses are in effect. The examples must show how mitigation credits
would be assigned, how the size of projects would be determined, the
season or conditions under which mitigation credits would be useable,
a cost estimate for each example, whether permits would be required,
and whether additional agency staff would be needed.
(3) The department of health, the department of fish and wildlife,
and the state building code council may be requested to assist the
department in developing viable alternatives that clearly address the
needs of homeowners and the home building industry to make these
options practical, economical, and safe.
(4) For those alternatives that are determined to have a high
degree of viability, the department may cooperatively work with
involved groups to conduct demonstration projects for each alternative
to test the practical usability, effectiveness, cost, and safety and
determine whether there are unintended consequences.
(5) When the department, after consultation with the involved
groups, determines what alternatives have been successfully
demonstrated to be viable, the department may submit proposed
legislation to provide the legal framework necessary to utilize these
mitigation alternatives.
(6) The department may provide a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 10, 2012, on the progress of
this activity.
(7) The activities of the involved state agencies must be conducted
from within the existing funds available to the agency.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 90.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In watersheds where the department has closed or partially
closed a basin to further appropriation of groundwater, or in areas
where closure or partial closure is anticipated, the county legislative
authority may create a limited purpose local water bank. In
considering whether a water bank would be a viable tool in the area,
the county legislative authority shall consider whether there are a
sufficient number of existing water rights in the area to make a water
bank successful.
(2) Water banks created under this section serve the purpose of
providing mitigation credits for existing interruptible or new exempt
groundwater withdrawals. The credit must be granted on a one-to-one
ratio. The maximum amount of credit may not exceed five thousand
gallons per day nor less than three hundred fifty gallons per day. A
seasonal water right must be prorated on a basis of the total permitted
withdrawal divided by three hundred sixty-five days to arrive at the
total expressed gallons per day.
(3) A water right or a portion of a water right placed into a
limited purpose local water bank must be demonstrated to be in
hydraulic continuity with the groundwater to be withdrawn by the new
user. Water rights placed into limited purpose local water banks are
not subject to review for relinquishment or wastage. Water rights
placed into a limited purpose local water bank may only be purchased on
a permanent basis and only for purposes of mitigating exempt
withdrawals consistent with subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Water credits purchased through a limited purpose local water
bank must be affixed to a specific parcel of land to mitigate
interruptible or new groundwater withdrawals consistent with this act.
Water credits so purchased are assignable with conveyance of title of
the new land parcel to which it is affixed, but may not be transferred
to another parcel, except nothing in this section prevents a parcel to
which a water credit is affixed to be subdivided and the water credit
prorated amongst the newly created parcels, as long as no parcel may be
assigned less than three hundred fifty gallons per day for domestic
use.
(5) Water credits purchased from a bank must be purchased in the
form of a certificate expressed in a maximum gallons per day
withdrawal. The price of the certificate is determined by the water
right holder and is a one-time purchase price. The purchase price must
be expressed as a base price for three hundred fifty gallons per day,
and an additional price expressed for each additional fifty gallons per
day increment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 90.54 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A limited purpose local water bank may be created by ordinance
adopted by the county legislative authority. An ordinance may be
adopted only after providing a thirty day comment period and at least
one public hearing located within the boundaries of the watershed, or
if no suitable location exists, at the county seat.
(2) The county legislative authority may administer a limited
purpose local water bank or may contract with a water conservancy
board, watershed planning group, or conservation district to administer
the local water bank. The cost of administering the limited purpose
local water bank may be supported by general fund moneys, real estate
excise tax revenues, or from fees added to the price of water credits
purchased from the bank, or a combination of these sources. Fees
affixed to the water credit price must be calculated to recover the
actual costs in an amount not to exceed nine percent of the purchase
price of the water credits.
(3) Water rights placed in a limited purpose local water bank must
be purchased in an order at the discretion of the purchaser. Water
rights placed in the bank may not be mingled with other water rights or
water credits purchased from any right within the bank, and must carry
the priority date of the original water right.
(4) Nothing in this section or section 3 of this act may be
construed to grant the local legislative authority or agency contracted
to administer the limited purpose local water bank any authority to
place conditions on the use of the water credits purchased beyond those
found in existing law or this section.

--- END ---