BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 90.22.010 and 1997 c 32 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department of ecology may establish minimum water flows or
levels for perennial rivers and streams, lakes or other public waters
for the purposes of protecting fish, game, birds or other wildlife
resources, or recreational or aesthetic values of said public waters
whenever it appears to be in the public interest to establish the same.
In addition, the department of ecology shall, when requested by the
department of fish and wildlife to protect fish, game, or other
wildlife resources under the jurisdiction of the requesting state
agency, or if the department of ecology finds it necessary to preserve
water quality, establish such minimum flows or levels as are required
to protect the resource or preserve the water quality described in the
request or determination. Any request submitted by the department of
fish and wildlife shall include a statement setting forth the need for
establishing a minimum flow or level. When the department acts to
preserve water quality, it shall include a similar statement with the
proposed rule filed with the code reviser. This section shall not
apply to waters artificially stored in reservoirs, provided that in the
granting of storage permits by the department of ecology in the future,
full recognition shall be given to downstream minimum flows, if any
there may be, which have theretofore been established hereunder.
(2) The terms "minimum flows," "minimum flows and levels," or
"minimum instream flows" used under this chapter and chapters 90.03 and
90.82 RCW have the same meaning as the term "base flows" defined in RCW
90.54.020.

Sec. 2 RCW 90.22.020 and 1994 c 264 s 87 are each amended to read
as follows:
Flows or levels authorized for establishment under RCW 90.22.010,
or subsequent modification thereof by the department shall be provided
for through the adoption of rules. Any rules adopted under this
chapter after the effective date of the water resources act of 1971,
chapter 90.54 RCW, must conform with the provisions of the water
resources act of 1971, chapter 90.54 RCW. To the extent that there is
conflict between the policies and procedures contained in the water
resources act of 1971, chapter 90.54 RCW, and the earlier enacted 1969
minimum water flows and levels act, codified under this chapter, the
provisions of the water resources act of 1971 apply. Before the
establishment or modification of a water flow or level for any stream
or lake or other public water, the department shall hold a public
hearing in the county in which the stream, lake, or other public water
is located. If it is located in more than one county the department
shall determine the location or locations therein and the number of
hearings to be conducted. Notice of the hearings shall be given by
publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or
counties in which the stream, lake, or other public waters is located,
once a week for two consecutive weeks before the hearing. The notice
shall include the following:
(1) The name of each stream, lake, or other water source under
consideration;
(2) The place and time of the hearing;
(3) A statement that any person, including any private citizen or
public official, may present his or her views either orally or in
writing.
Notice of the hearing shall also be served upon the administrators
of the departments of social and health services, natural resources,
fish and wildlife, and transportation.

Sec. 3 RCW 90.54.020 and 2007 c 445 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Utilization and management of the waters of the state shall be
guided by the following general declaration of fundamentals:
(1) Uses of water for domestic, stock watering, industrial,
commercial, agricultural, irrigation, hydroelectric power production,
mining, fish and wildlife maintenance and enhancement, recreational,
and thermal power production purposes, and preservation of
environmental and aesthetic values, and all other uses compatible with
the enjoyment of the public waters of the state, are declared to be
beneficial.
(2) Allocation of waters among potential uses and users shall be
based generally on the securing of the maximum net benefits for the
people of the state. Maximum net benefits shall constitute total
benefits less costs including opportunities lost.
(3) The quality of the natural environment shall be protected and,
where possible, enhanced as follows:
(a) Perennial rivers and streams of the state shall be retained
with base flows necessary to provide for preservation of wildlife,
fish, scenic, aesthetic and other environmental values, and
navigational values. Lakes and ponds shall be retained substantially
in their natural condition. Withdrawals of water which would conflict
therewith shall be authorized only in those situations where it is
clear that overriding considerations of the public interest will be
served. The term "base flows" used under this chapter has the same
meaning as the terms "minimum flows," "minimum flows and levels," or
"minimum instream flows" used in chapters 90.03, 90.22, and 90.82 RCW.
(b) Waters of the state shall be of high quality. Regardless of
the quality of the waters of the state, all wastes and other materials
and substances proposed for entry into said waters shall be provided
with all known, available, and reasonable methods of treatment prior to
entry. Notwithstanding that standards of quality established for the
waters of the state would not be violated, wastes and other materials
and substances shall not be allowed to enter such waters which will
reduce the existing quality thereof, except in those situations where
it is clear that overriding considerations of the public interest will
be served. Technology-based effluent limitations or standards for
discharges for municipal water treatment plants located on the
Chehalis, Columbia, Cowlitz, Lewis, or Skagit river shall be adjusted
to reflect credit for substances removed from the plant intake water
if:
(i) The municipality demonstrates that the intake water is drawn
from the same body of water into which the discharge is made; and
(ii) The municipality demonstrates that no violation of receiving
water quality standards or appreciable environmental degradation will
result.
(4) The development of multipurpose water storage facilities shall
be a high priority for programs of water allocation, planning,
management, and efficiency. The department, other state agencies,
local governments, and planning units formed under section 107 or 108
of this act shall evaluate the potential for the development of new
storage projects and the benefits and effects of storage in reducing
damage to stream banks and property, increasing the use of land,
providing water for municipal, industrial, agricultural, power
generation, and other beneficial uses, and improving stream flow
regimes for fisheries and other instream uses.
(5) Adequate and safe supplies of water shall be preserved and
protected in potable condition to satisfy human domestic needs.
(6) Multiple-purpose impoundment structures are to be preferred
over single-purpose structures. Due regard shall be given to means and
methods for protection of fishery resources in the planning for and
construction of water impoundment structures and other artificial
obstructions.
(7) Federal, state, and local governments, individuals,
corporations, groups and other entities shall be encouraged to carry
out practices of conservation as they relate to the use of the waters
of the state. In addition to traditional development approaches,
improved water use efficiency, conservation, and use of reclaimed water
shall be emphasized in the management of the state's water resources
and in some cases will be a potential new source of water with which to
meet future needs throughout the state. Use of reclaimed water shall
be encouraged through state and local planning and programs with
incentives for state financial assistance recognizing programs and
plans that encourage the use of conservation and reclaimed water use,
and state agencies shall continue to review and reduce regulatory
barriers and streamline permitting for the use of reclaimed water where
appropriate.
(8) Development of water supply systems, whether publicly or
privately owned, which provide water to the public generally in
regional areas within the state shall be encouraged. Development of
water supply systems for multiple domestic use which will not serve the
public generally shall be discouraged where water supplies are
available from water systems serving the public.
(9) Full recognition shall be given in the administration of water
allocation and use programs to the natural interrelationships of
surface and groundwaters.
(10) Expressions of the public interest will be sought at all
stages of water planning and allocation discussions.
(11) Water management programs, including but not limited to, water
quality, flood control, drainage, erosion control and storm runoff are
deemed to be in the public interest.

Sec. 4 RCW 90.82.020 and 1997 c 442 s 103 are each amended to
read as follows:
((Unless the context clearly requires otherwise,)) The definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(2) "Implementing rules" for a WRIA plan are the rules needed to
give force and effect to the parts of the plan that create rights or
obligations for any party including a state agency or that establish
water management policy.
(3) "Minimum instream flow" ((means a)) has the same meaning as
"minimum flows" or "minimum flows and levels" under chapter 90.03 or
90.22 RCW or ((a)) "base flows" under chapter 90.54 RCW.
(4) "WRIA" means a water resource inventory area established in
chapter 173-500 WAC as it existed on January 1, 1997.
(5) "Water supply utility" means a water, combined water-sewer,
irrigation, reclamation, or public utility district that provides water
to persons or other water users within the district or a division or
unit responsible for administering a publicly governed water supply
system on behalf of a county.
(6) "WRIA plan" or "plan" means the product of the planning unit
including any rules adopted in conjunction with the product of the
planning unit.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The amendments in sections 1 through 4 of
this act are solely intended to clarify existing law. No other
substantive interpretation is intended or implied.

--- END ---