BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 In section 1, chapter 22, Laws of 2011 1st
sp. sess., the legislature stated that it "does not wish to narrow the
high school science curriculum to a singular focus on biology." The
legislature finds that the unusual reality of only one science end-of-course test, namely in biology, required for graduation for the class
of 2015 does narrow the focus and creates an unintended consequence
that runs counter to other educational goals of the state of
Washington.
The high stakes graduation requirement for biology has resulted in
some schools letting go physics instructors in favor of biology
instructors. The artificial emphasis on biology caused by the
graduation requirement also prevents teachers from spending time
teaching nonbiology science subjects that are known to be necessary for
students in today's world. Science teachers are experiencing the
pressure from the high stakes nature of the one biology test, which
creates an overwhelming concentration of staff, time, and resources
into that one subject to the exclusion of physical, earth, and space
sciences, and engineering.
The legislature is also aware that next generation science
standards developed from the framework for science education will be
released for adoption in the fall of 2012 and that this could make
necessary further revisiting of the entire assessment process for
science in this state.
The legislature therefore intends to set aside the biology
end-of-course exam as a graduation requirement until such time as the
state has the funding and resources to develop and implement a second
science end-of-course or integrated science exam or until the decision
is made about how to assess the next generation science standards,
which are being released for consideration for adoption in the fall of
2012.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.655.068 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 22 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Beginning in the 2011-12 school year, the statewide high school
assessment in science shall be an end-of-course assessment for biology
that measures the state standards for life sciences, in addition to
systems, inquiry, and application as they pertain to life sciences.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction may develop science
end-of-course assessments in subjects in addition to biology for
purposes of RCW 28A.655.061, when so directed by the legislature.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction may participate with
consortia of multiple states as common student learning standards and
assessments in science are developed. The superintendent of public
instruction, in consultation with the state board of education, may
modify the essential academic learning requirements and statewide
student assessments in science, including the high school assessment,
according to the multistate common student learning standards and
assessments as long as the education committees of the legislature have
opportunities for review before the modifications are adopted, as
provided under RCW 28A.655.070.
(((4) The statewide high school assessment under this section shall
be used to demonstrate that a student meets the state standards in the
science content area of the statewide student assessment for purposes
of RCW 28A.655.061.))

--- END ---