BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.19.565 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 231 are each
amended to read as follows:
The department shall establish a motor vehicle transportation
service which is hereby empowered to:
(1) Provide suitable motor vehicle transportation services to state
agencies on either a temporary or permanent basis and upon such
demonstration of need as the department may require;
(2) Provide motor pools for the use of state agencies located in
the Olympia area and such additional motor pools at other locations in
the state as may be necessary to provide economic, efficient, and
effective motor vehicle transportation services to state agencies.
Such additional motor pools may be under either the direct control of
the department or under the supervision of another state agency by
agreement with the department;
(3) Establish an equitable schedule of rental and mileage charges
to agencies for motor vehicle transportation services furnished which
shall be designed to provide funds to recover the actual total costs of
motor pool operations including but not limited to vehicle operation
expense, depreciation expense, overhead, and nonrecoverable collision
or other damage to vehicles; and
(4) Establish guidelines, procedures, and standards for fleet
operations that other state agencies and institutions of higher
education may adopt. The guidelines, procedures, and standards shall
be consistent with and carry out the objectives of any general policies
adopted by the office of financial management under RCW 43.41.130.
Unless otherwise determined by the director after consultation with
the office of financial management, vehicles owned and managed by the
department of transportation, the department of natural resources, the
law enforcement bureau of the department of fish and wildlife, and the
Washington state patrol are exempt from the requirements of subsections
(1), (2), and (4) of this section.

--- END ---