BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature affirms its continued
support for transforming the way that teacher and principal performance
is evaluated by moving to a research-based system of clear
expectations, common standards and benchmarks, and multiple meaningful
measures of both professional growth and student growth. In order to
ensure that the revised evaluation systems are implemented with full
fidelity across the state, the legislature intends to establish a
statewide implementation plan with common definitions and performance
descriptions, professional development opportunities, and an evaluation
schedule whereby all teachers and principals in the state receive a
comprehensive new evaluation no later than the 2016-17 school year.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.405.100 and 2010 c 235 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the
superintendent of public instruction shall establish and may amend from
time to time minimum criteria for the evaluation of the professional
performance capabilities and development of certificated classroom
teachers and certificated support personnel. For classroom teachers
the criteria shall be developed in the following categories:
Instructional skill; classroom management, professional preparation and
scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; the handling of
student discipline and attendant problems; and interest in teaching
pupils and knowledge of subject matter.
(b) Every board of directors shall, in accordance with procedure
provided in RCW 41.59.010 through 41.59.170, 41.59.910, and 41.59.920,
establish evaluative criteria and procedures for all certificated
classroom teachers and certificated support personnel. The evaluative
criteria must contain as a minimum the criteria established by the
superintendent of public instruction pursuant to this section and must
be prepared within six months following adoption of the superintendent
of public instruction's minimum criteria. The district must certify to
the superintendent of public instruction that evaluative criteria have
been so prepared by the district.
(2)(a) Pursuant to the implementation schedule established in
subsection (7)(b) of this section, every board of directors shall, in
accordance with procedures provided in RCW 41.59.010 through 41.59.170,
41.59.910, and 41.59.920, establish revised evaluative criteria and a
four-level rating system for all certificated classroom teachers.
(b) The minimum criteria shall include: (i) Centering instruction
on high expectations for student achievement; (ii) demonstrating
effective teaching practices; (iii) recognizing individual student
learning needs and developing strategies to address those needs; (iv)
providing clear and intentional focus on subject matter content and
curriculum; (v) fostering and managing a safe, positive learning
environment; (vi) using multiple student data elements to modify
instruction and improve student learning; (vii) communicating and
collaborating with parents and (([the])) the school community; and
(viii) exhibiting collaborative and collegial practices focused on
improving instructional practice and student learning.
(c) The four-level rating system used to evaluate the certificated
classroom teacher must describe performance along a continuum that
indicates the extent to which the criteria have been met or exceeded.
The summative performance ratings shall be as follows: Level 1 -unsatisfactory; level 2 - basic; level 3 - proficient; and level 4 -distinguished. A classroom teacher shall receive one of the four
summative performance ratings for each of the minimum criteria in (b)
of this subsection and one of the four summative performance ratings
for the evaluation as a whole, which shall be the comprehensive
summative evaluation performance rating.
(d) By December 1, 2012, the superintendent of public instruction
shall adopt rules that provide descriptors for each of the summative
performance ratings, based on the development work of pilot school
districts under subsection (7) of this section. Any subsequent changes
to the descriptors by the superintendent may only be made following
consultation with a group broadly reflective of the parties represented
in subsection (7)(a) of this section.
(e) By September 1, 2012, the superintendent of public instruction
shall identify up to three preferred instructional frameworks that
support the revised evaluation system. The instructional frameworks
shall be research-based and establish definitions or rubrics for each
of the four summative performance ratings for each evaluation criteria.
Each school district must adopt one of the preferred instructional
frameworks and post the selection on the district's web site. The
superintendent of public instruction shall establish a process for
approving minor modifications or adaptations to a preferred
instructional framework that may be proposed by a school district.
(f) When student growth data, if available and relevant to the
teacher and subject matter, is referenced in the evaluation process it
must be based on multiple measures that can include classroom-based,
school-based, district-based, and state-based tools. As used in this
subsection, "student growth" means the change in student achievement
between two points in time.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, it
shall be the responsibility of a principal or his or her designee to
evaluate all certificated personnel in his or her school. During each
school year all classroom teachers and certificated support personnel
shall be observed for the purposes of evaluation at least twice in the
performance of their assigned duties. Total observation time for each
employee for each school year shall be not less than sixty minutes. An
employee in the third year of provisional status as defined in RCW
28A.405.220 shall be observed at least three times in the performance
of his or her duties and the total observation time for the school year
shall not be less than ninety minutes. Following each observation, or
series of observations, the principal or other evaluator shall promptly
document the results of the observation in writing, and shall provide
the employee with a copy thereof within three days after such report is
prepared. New employees shall be observed at least once for a total
observation time of thirty minutes during the first ninety calendar
days of their employment period.
(b) As used in this subsection and subsection (4) of this section,
"employees" means classroom teachers and certificated support personnel
except where otherwise specified.
(4)(a) At any time after October 15th, an employee whose work is
not judged satisfactory based on district evaluation criteria shall be
notified in writing of the specific areas of deficiencies along with a
reasonable program for improvement. For classroom teachers who have
been transitioned to the revised evaluation system pursuant to the
district implementation schedule adopted under subsection (7)(c) of
this section, the following comprehensive summative evaluation
performance ratings based on the evaluation criteria in subsection
(2)(b) of this section mean a classroom teacher's work is not judged
satisfactory:
(i) Level 1; or
(ii) Level 2 if the classroom teacher is a continuing contract
employee under RCW 28A.405.210 with more than five years of teaching
experience and if the level 2 comprehensive summative evaluation
performance rating has been received for two consecutive years or for
two years within a consecutive three-year time period.
(b) During the period of probation, the employee may not be
transferred from the supervision of the original evaluator.
Improvement of performance or probable cause for nonrenewal must occur
and be documented by the original evaluator before any consideration of
a request for transfer or reassignment as contemplated by either the
individual or the school district. A probationary period of sixty
school days shall be established. Days may be added if deemed
necessary to complete a program for improvement and evaluate the
probationer's performance, as long as the probationary period is
concluded before May 15th of the same school year. The establishment
of a probationary period does not adversely affect the contract status
of an employee within the meaning of RCW 28A.405.300. The purpose of
the probationary period is to give the employee opportunity to
demonstrate improvements in his or her areas of deficiency. The
establishment of the probationary period and the giving of the notice
to the employee of deficiency shall be by the school district
superintendent and need not be submitted to the board of directors for
approval. During the probationary period the evaluator shall meet with
the employee at least twice monthly to supervise and make a written
evaluation of the progress, if any, made by the employee. The
evaluator may authorize one additional certificated employee to
evaluate the probationer and to aid the employee in improving his or
her areas of deficiency; such additional certificated employee shall be
immune from any civil liability that might otherwise be incurred or
imposed with regard to the good faith performance of such evaluation.
If a procedural error occurs in the implementation of a program for
improvement, the error does not invalidate the probationer's plan for
improvement or evaluation activities unless the error materially
affects the effectiveness of the plan or the ability to evaluate the
probationer's performance. The probationer may be removed from
probation if he or she has demonstrated improvement to the satisfaction
of the principal in those areas specifically detailed in his or her
initial notice of deficiency and subsequently detailed in his or her
improvement program. A classroom teacher who has been transitioned to
the revised evaluation system pursuant to the district implementation
schedule adopted under subsection (7)(c) of this section may be removed
from probation if he or she has demonstrated improvement that results
in a new comprehensive summative evaluation performance rating of level
2 or above for a provisional employee or a continuing contract employee
with five or fewer years of experience, or of level 3 or above for a
continuing contract employee with more than five years of experience.
Lack of necessary improvement during the established probationary
period, as specifically documented in writing with notification to the
probationer ((and shall)) constitutes grounds for a finding of probable
cause under RCW 28A.405.300 or 28A.405.210.
(((b))) (c) Immediately following the completion of a probationary
period that does not produce performance changes detailed in the
initial notice of deficiencies and improvement program, the employee
may be removed from his or her assignment and placed into an
alternative assignment for the remainder of the school year. This
reassignment may not displace another employee nor may it adversely
affect the probationary employee's compensation or benefits for the
remainder of the employee's contract year. If such reassignment is not
possible, the district may, at its option, place the employee on paid
leave for the balance of the contract term.
(5) Every board of directors shall establish evaluative criteria
and procedures for all superintendents, principals, and other
administrators. It shall be the responsibility of the district
superintendent or his or her designee to evaluate all administrators.
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, such evaluation
shall be based on the administrative position job description. Such
criteria, when applicable, shall include at least the following
categories: Knowledge of, experience in, and training in recognizing
good professional performance, capabilities and development; school
administration and management; school finance; professional preparation
and scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; interest in
pupils, employees, patrons and subjects taught in school; leadership;
and ability and performance of evaluation of school personnel.
(6)(a) Pursuant to the implementation schedule established by
subsection (7)(b) of this section, every board of directors shall
establish revised evaluative criteria and a four-level rating system
for principals.
(b) The minimum criteria shall include: (i) Creating a school
culture that promotes the ongoing improvement of learning and teaching
for students and staff; (ii) demonstrating commitment to closing the
achievement gap; (iii) providing for school safety; (iv) leading the
development, implementation, and evaluation of a data-driven plan for
increasing student achievement, including the use of multiple student
data elements; (v) assisting instructional staff with alignment of
curriculum, instruction, and assessment with state and local district
learning goals; (vi) monitoring, assisting, and evaluating effective
instruction and assessment practices; (vii) managing both staff and
fiscal resources to support student achievement and legal
responsibilities; and (viii) partnering with the school community to
promote student learning.
(c) The four-level rating system used to evaluate the principal
must describe performance along a continuum that indicates the extent
to which the criteria have been met or exceeded. The summative
performance ratings shall be as follows: Level 1 - unsatisfactory;
level 2 - basic; level 3 - proficient; and level 4 - distinguished. A
principal shall receive one of the four summative performance ratings
for each of the minimum criteria in (b) of this subsection and one of
the four summative performance ratings for the evaluation as a whole,
which shall be the comprehensive summative evaluation performance
rating.
(d) By December 1, 2012, the superintendent of public instruction
shall adopt rules that provide descriptors for each of the summative
performance ratings, based on the development work of pilot school
districts under subsection (7) of this section. Any subsequent changes
to the descriptors by the superintendent may only be made following
consultation with a group broadly reflective of the parties represented
in subsection (7)(a) of this section.
(e) By September 1, 2012, the superintendent of public instruction
shall identify up to three preferred leadership frameworks that support
the revised evaluation system. The leadership frameworks shall be
research-based and establish definitions or rubrics for each of the
four performance ratings for each evaluation criteria. Each school
district shall adopt one of the preferred leadership frameworks and
post the selection on the district's web site. The superintendent of
public instruction shall establish a process for approving minor
modifications or adaptations to a preferred leadership framework that
may be proposed by a school district.
(f) When available, student growth data that is referenced in the
evaluation process must be based on multiple measures that can include
classroom-based, school-based, district-based, and state-based tools.
As used in this subsection, "student growth" means the change in
student achievement between two points in time.
(g) For principals who have been transitioned to the revised
evaluation system pursuant to the district implementation schedule
adopted under subsection (7)(c) of this section, the following
comprehensive summative evaluation performance ratings mean a
principal's work is not judged satisfactory:
(i) Level 1; or
(ii) Level 2 if the principal has more than five years of
experience in the principal role and if the level 2 comprehensive
summative evaluation performance rating has been received for two
consecutive years or for two years within a consecutive three-year time
period.
(7)(a) The superintendent of public instruction, in collaboration
with state associations representing teachers, principals,
administrators, and parents, shall create models for implementing the
evaluation system criteria, student growth tools, professional
development programs, and evaluator training for certificated classroom
teachers and principals. Human resources specialists, professional
development experts, and assessment experts must also be consulted.
Due to the diversity of teaching assignments and the many developmental
levels of students, classroom teachers and principals must be
prominently represented in this work. The models must be available for
use in the 2011-12 school year.
(b) A new certificated classroom teacher evaluation system that
implements the provisions of subsection (2) of this section and a new
principal evaluation system that implements the provisions of
subsection (6) of this section shall be phased-in beginning with the
2010-11 school year by districts identified in (((c))) (d) of this
subsection and implemented in all school districts beginning with the
2013-14 school year.
(c) Each school district board of directors shall adopt a schedule
for implementation of the revised evaluation systems that transitions
a portion of classroom teachers and principals in the district to the
revised evaluation systems each year beginning no later than the 2013-14 school year, until all classroom teachers and principals are being
evaluated under the revised evaluation systems no later than the 2016-17 school year. A school district is not precluded from completing the
transition of all classroom teachers and principals to the revised
evaluation systems before the 2016-17 school year. The schedule
adopted under this subsection (7)(c) must provide that the following
employees are transitioned to the revised evaluation systems beginning
in the 2013-14 school year:
(i) Classroom teachers who are provisional employees under RCW
28A.405.220;
(ii) Classroom teachers who are on probation under subsection (4)
of this section;
(iii) Principals in the first three consecutive school years of
employment as a principal; and
(iv) Principals previously employed as a principal by another
school district in the state of Washington for three or more
consecutive school years and in the first full year as a principal in
the school district.
(d) A set of school districts shall be selected by the
superintendent of public instruction to participate in a collaborative
process resulting in the development and piloting of new certificated
classroom teacher and principal evaluation systems during the 2010-11
and 2011-12 school years. These school districts must be selected
based on: (i) The agreement of the local associations representing
classroom teachers and principals to collaborate with the district in
this developmental work and (ii) the agreement to participate in the
full range of development and implementation activities, including:
Development of rubrics for the evaluation criteria and ratings in
subsections (2) and (6) of this section; identification of or
development of appropriate multiple measures of student growth in
subsections (2) and (6) of this section; development of appropriate
evaluation system forms; participation in professional development for
principals and classroom teachers regarding the content of the new
evaluation system; participation in evaluator training; and
participation in activities to evaluate the effectiveness of the new
systems and support programs. The school districts must submit to the
office of the superintendent of public instruction data that is used in
evaluations and all district-collected student achievement, aptitude,
and growth data regardless of whether the data is used in evaluations.
If the data is not available electronically, the district may submit it
in nonelectronic form. The superintendent of public instruction must
analyze the districts' use of student data in evaluations, including
examining the extent that student data is not used or is underutilized.
The superintendent of public instruction must also consult with
participating districts and stakeholders, recommend appropriate
changes, and address statewide implementation issues. The
superintendent of public instruction shall report evaluation system
implementation status, evaluation data, and recommendations to
appropriate committees of the legislature and governor by July 1, 2011,
and at the conclusion of the development phase by July 1, 2012. In the
July 1, 2011, report, the superintendent shall include recommendations
for whether a single statewide evaluation model should be adopted,
whether modified versions developed by school districts should be
subject to state approval, and what the criteria would be for
determining if a school district's evaluation model meets or exceeds a
statewide model. The report shall also identify challenges posed by
requiring a state approval process.
(8) Each certificated classroom teacher and certificated support
personnel shall have the opportunity for confidential conferences with
his or her immediate supervisor on no less than two occasions in each
school year. Such confidential conference shall have as its sole
purpose the aiding of the administrator in his or her assessment of the
employee's professional performance.
(9) The failure of any evaluator to evaluate or supervise or cause
the evaluation or supervision of certificated classroom teachers and
certificated support personnel or administrators in accordance with
this section, as now or hereafter amended, when it is his or her
specific assigned or delegated responsibility to do so, shall be
sufficient cause for the nonrenewal of any such evaluator's contract
under RCW 28A.405.210, or the discharge of such evaluator under RCW
28A.405.300.
(10) After a certificated classroom teacher or certificated support
personnel has four years of satisfactory evaluations under subsection
(1) of this section ((or has received one of the two top ratings for
four years under subsection (2) of this section)), a school district
may use a short form of evaluation, a locally bargained evaluation
emphasizing professional growth, an evaluation under subsection (1) or
(2) of this section, or any combination thereof. The short form of
evaluation shall include either a thirty minute observation during the
school year with a written summary or a final annual written evaluation
based on the criteria in subsection (1) or (2) of this section and
based on at least two observation periods during the school year
totaling at least sixty minutes without a written summary of such
observations being prepared. A locally bargained short-form evaluation
emphasizing professional growth must provide that the professional
growth activity conducted by the certificated classroom teacher be
specifically linked to one or more of the certificated classroom
teacher evaluation criteria. However, the evaluation process set forth
in subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be followed at least
once every three years unless this time is extended by a local school
district under the bargaining process set forth in chapter 41.59 RCW.
The employee or evaluator may require that the evaluation process set
forth in subsection (1) or (2) of this section be conducted in any
given school year. No evaluation other than the evaluation authorized
under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may be used as a basis for
determining that an employee's work is not satisfactory under
subsection (1) or (2) of this section or as probable cause for the
nonrenewal of an employee's contract under RCW 28A.405.210 unless an
evaluation process developed under chapter 41.59 RCW determines
otherwise. The provisions of this subsection apply to certificated
classroom teachers only until the teacher has been transitioned to the
revised evaluation system pursuant to the district implementation
schedule adopted under subsection (7)(c) of this section.
(11) All certificated classroom teachers and principals who have
been transitioned to the revised evaluation systems pursuant to the
district implementation schedule adopted under subsection (7)(c) of
this section must receive performance evaluations as provided in this
subsection:
(a) Except for classroom teachers and principals under (c) of this
subsection, classroom teachers and principals shall receive an annual
comprehensive summative evaluation. A comprehensive summative
evaluation assesses all eight evaluation criteria and all criteria
contribute to the comprehensive summative evaluation performance
rating.
(b) Classroom teachers who are on probationary status shall receive
comprehensive summative evaluations as provided under subsection (4) of
this section.
(c)(i) Classroom teachers and principals who have received
comprehensive summative evaluation performance ratings of level 3 or
above for four consecutive years are eligible to receive an annual
focused evaluation. A focused evaluation includes an assessment of one
of the eight criteria selected for a performance rating plus
professional growth activities specifically linked to the selected
criteria. However, each classroom teacher and principal under this
subsection (11)(c) must receive a comprehensive summative evaluation at
least once every three years. The provisions of this subsection
(11)(c) do not apply to a classroom teacher or principal in their first
full year of employment in a school district.
(ii) The selected criteria must be approved by the teacher's or
principal's evaluator and may have been identified in a previous
comprehensive summative evaluation as benefitting from additional
attention. A group of teachers may focus on the same evaluation
criteria and share professional growth activities. A group of
principals may focus on the same evaluation criteria and share
professional growth activities.
(iii) The evaluator must assign a summative performance rating to
the selected evaluation criteria and this rating, combined with the
previously assigned summative performance ratings for the other seven
criteria, comprise the comprehensive summative evaluation performance
rating.
(iv) A teacher or principal may be transferred from a focused
evaluation to a comprehensive summative evaluation at the request of
the teacher or principal, or at the direction of the teacher's or
principal's evaluator.
(v) A classroom teacher or principal may apply the focused
evaluation professional growth activities toward the professional
growth plan for professional certificate renewal as required by the
professional educator standards board.
(12) Each school district is encouraged to acknowledge and
recognize classroom teachers and principals who have attained level 4 -distinguished performance ratings.

Sec. 3 RCW 28A.405.120 and 1995 c 335 s 401 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) School districts shall require each administrator, each
principal, or other supervisory personnel who has responsibility for
evaluating classroom teachers or principals to have training in
evaluation procedures.
(2) Before school district implementation of the revised evaluation
systems required under RCW 28A.405.100, principals and administrators
who have evaluation responsibilities must engage in professional
development designed to implement the revised systems and maximize
rater agreement.

Sec. 4 RCW 28A.405.130 and 1985 c 420 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) No administrator, principal, or other supervisory personnel may
evaluate a teacher without having received training in evaluation
procedures.
(2) Before evaluating classroom teachers using the revised
evaluation systems required under RCW 28A.405.100, principals and
administrators who have evaluation responsibilities must engage in
professional development designed to implement the revised systems and
maximize rater agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 28A.405
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
develop and make available a professional development program to
support the implementation of the revised evaluation systems required
under RCW 28A.405.100. The program components may be organized into
professional development strands for principals, administrators, and
classroom teachers.
(2) The professional development program shall include the
following components:
(a) Examination of Washington evaluation criteria, the four-tiered
performance rating system, and the preferred instructional and
leadership frameworks used to describe the evaluation criteria;
(b) The use of student growth data and multiple measures of
performance;
(c) Evaluation conferencing;
(d) Development of classroom teacher and principal support plans
resulting from an evaluation;
(e) Use of an online tool to manage the collection of observation
notes, teacher and principal-submitted materials, and other information
related to the conduct of the evaluation; and
(f) Other components resulting from the model development process
in RCW 28A.405.100(7).
(3) To the extent possible, professional development materials
shall be made available online and make use of appropriate existing
web-based tools and other web-based tools that may be developed.
(4) The professional development materials described in this
section shall also be made available to teacher and principal
preparation programs in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 28A.410
RCW to read as follows:
(1) After August 31, 2013, candidates for a residency principal
certificate must have demonstrated knowledge of teacher evaluation
research and Washington's evaluation requirements and successfully
completed opportunities to practice teacher evaluation skills.
(2) At a minimum, principal preparation programs must address the
following knowledge and skills related to evaluations:
(a) Examination of Washington teacher and principal evaluation
criteria, the four-tiered performance rating system, and the preferred
instructional and leadership frameworks used to describe the evaluation
criteria;
(b) Classroom observations;
(c) The use of student growth data and multiple measures of
performance;
(d) Evaluation conferencing;
(e) Development of classroom teacher and principal support plans
resulting from an evaluation;
(f) Use of an online tool to manage the collection of observation
notes, teacher and principal-submitted materials, and other information
related to the conduct of the evaluation; and
(g) Development of classroom teacher support plans resulting from
an evaluation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
monitor the statewide implementation of revised teacher and principal
evaluation systems using data reported under RCW 28A.150.230 as well as
periodic input from focus groups of administrators, principals, and
teachers. The office shall modify the professional development
materials developed under section 5 of this act as appropriate to
improve understanding, enhance rater agreement, and assure fidelity of
implementation of the new systems statewide.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
submit a report detailing findings, emergent issues or trends, and any
recommendations to enhance implementation and continuous improvement of
the revised evaluation systems to the education committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2016.

--- END ---