BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature, responding to the
Washington state supreme court decision confirming the state's
responsibility to fully fund basic education, intends to refrain from
adding any new requirements or move forward with new reforms until it
has lived up to its funding obligations. The legislature is aware that
essential programs, in particular those that help at-risk and
struggling students, have been cut over the past four years. After-school programs, summer school, and other supports for students in need
of extra help are no longer available.
Adding more requirements, including credits for graduation, with
less support will lead to higher dropout rates, decreased quality of
education, and increased inequity for those students who do and those
who do not have resources to replace those resources lost at their
local public schools.
It is the intent of the legislature to right-size its requirements
with the support, time, and funding available, and to support and
maintain already impressive achievements in the areas of national
assessment of educational progress, SAT scores, and currently
flourishing innovative schools and teacher and principal evaluation
pilots. To that end, the legislature intends to remove new mandated
policies by the state board of education that are not accompanied with
state funding until such time as support programs, reasonable class
sizes, and ample funding of basic education is achieved.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2011 c 203 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as
provided in RCW 28A.230.122 and except those equivalencies established
by local high schools or school districts under RCW 28A.230.097. The
purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready
for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and
citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board
of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of
academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's
certificate or credential, and complete other state and local
graduation requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and a public hearing and to the quality
education council established under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature
shall have the opportunity to act during a regular legislative session
before the changes are adopted through administrative rule by the state
board. Changes that have a fiscal impact on school districts, as
identified by a fiscal analysis prepared by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall take effect only if
formally authorized and fully funded by the legislature through the
omnibus appropriations act or other enacted legislation.
(d) Unless the legislature enacts and fully funds the rule, a rule
adopted by the state board that affects credit requirements for
students beginning with the graduating class of 2016 and thereafter is
voluntary if:
(i) There is a fiscal impact to the local school district; and
(ii) The district files a notice of fiscal impact with the state
board of education.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

--- END ---