BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.92.030 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 159 are each
amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Disadvantaged student" means a posthigh school student who by
reason of adverse cultural, educational, environmental, experiential,
familial or other circumstances is unable to qualify for enrollment as
a full-time student in an institution of higher education, who would
otherwise qualify as a needy student, and who is attending an
institution of higher education under an established program designed
to qualify the student for enrollment as a full-time student.
(2) "Financial aid" means loans and/or grants to needy students
enrolled or accepted for enrollment as a student at institutions of
higher education.
(3) "Institution" or "institutions of higher education" means:
(a) Any public university, college, community college, or technical
college operated by the state of Washington or any political
subdivision thereof; or
(b) Any other university, college, school, or institute in the
state of Washington offering instruction beyond the high school level
which is a member institution of an accrediting association recognized
by rule of the board for the purposes of this section: PROVIDED, That
any institution, branch, extension or facility operating within the
state of Washington which is affiliated with an institution operating
in another state must be: (i) A separately accredited member
institution of any such accrediting association, or (ii) a branch of a
member institution of an accrediting association recognized by rule of
the board for purposes of this section, that is eligible for federal
student financial aid assistance and has operated as a nonprofit
college or university delivering on-site classroom instruction for a
minimum of twenty consecutive years within the state of Washington, and
has an annual enrollment of at least seven hundred full-time equivalent
students, or (iii) a nonprofit institution recognized by the state of
Washington as provided in RCW 28B.76.695: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no
institution of higher education shall be eligible to participate in a
student financial aid program unless it agrees to and complies with
program rules ((and regulations)) adopted pursuant to RCW 28B.92.150.
(4) "Needy student" means a posthigh school student of an
institution of higher education who demonstrates to the board the
financial inability, either through the student's parents, family
and/or personally, to meet the total cost of board, room, books, and
tuition and incidental fees for any semester or quarter. "Needy
student" also means an opportunity internship graduate as defined by
RCW 28C.18.162 who enrolls in a postsecondary program of study as
defined in RCW 28C.18.162 within one year of high school graduation.
(5) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.
(6) "Placebound student" means a student who (a) is unable to
complete a college program because of family or employment commitments,
health concerns, monetary inability, or other similar factors; and (b)
may be influenced by the receipt of an enhanced student financial aid
award to complete a baccalaureate degree at an eligible institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---