BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.230.090 and 2011 c 203 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education shall establish high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students, except as
provided in RCW 28A.230.122 and except those equivalencies established
by local high schools or school districts under RCW 28A.230.097. The
purpose of a high school diploma is to declare that a student is ready
for success in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and
citizenship, and is equipped with the skills to be a lifelong learner.
(a) Any course in Washington state history and government used to
fulfill high school graduation requirements shall consider including
information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.
(b) The certificate of academic achievement requirements under RCW
28A.655.061 or the certificate of individual achievement requirements
under RCW 28A.155.045 are required for graduation from a public high
school but are not the only requirements for graduation.
(c) Any decision on whether a student has met the state board's
high school graduation requirements for a high school and beyond plan
shall remain at the local level.
(d) A student is not required to complete the state board's high
school graduation requirement for a culminating project if the student
has completed at least one of the following:
(i) A running start program and is leaving high school with an
associate degree;
(ii) A high school navigation 101, advancement via individual
determination, or similar program focused on career planning and skill
development in preparation for a targeted career;
(iii) A career and technical education program resulting in a skill
certificate;
(iv) A year of college-level coursework;
(v) An international baccalaureate certificate program; or
(vi) At least four courses in any of the following programs or at
least four courses among the following programs: AP, engineering or
biological sciences, international baccalaureate, or Cambridge with
college credit equivalency exams.
(2)(a) In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board
of education to establish and enforce minimum high school graduation
requirements, the state board shall periodically reevaluate the
graduation requirements and shall report such findings to the
legislature in a timely manner as determined by the state board.
(b) The state board shall reevaluate the graduation requirements
for students enrolled in vocationally intensive and rigorous career and
technical education programs, particularly those programs that lead to
a certificate or credential that is state or nationally recognized.
The purpose of the evaluation is to ensure that students enrolled in
these programs have sufficient opportunity to earn a certificate of
academic achievement, complete the program and earn the program's
certificate or credential, and complete other state and local
graduation requirements.
(c) The state board shall forward any proposed changes to the high
school graduation requirements to the education committees of the
legislature for review and to the quality education council established
under RCW 28A.290.010. The legislature shall have the opportunity to
act during a regular legislative session before the changes are adopted
through administrative rule by the state board. Changes that have a
fiscal impact on school districts, as identified by a fiscal analysis
prepared by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
shall take effect only if formally authorized and funded by the
legislature through the omnibus appropriations act or other enacted
legislation.
(3) Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other
than English established by the state board of education or a local
school district, or both, for purposes of high school graduation,
students who receive instruction in American sign language or one or
more American Indian languages shall be considered to have satisfied
the state or local school district graduation requirement for
instruction in one or more languages other than English.
(4) If requested by the student and his or her family, a student
who has completed high school courses before attending high school
shall be given high school credit which shall be applied to fulfilling
high school graduation requirements if:
(a) The course was taken with high school students, if the academic
level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth
grade classes, and the student has successfully passed by completing
the same course requirements and examinations as the high school
students enrolled in the class; or
(b) The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for
seventh and eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high
school credit, because the course is similar or equivalent to a course
offered at a high school in the district as determined by the school
district board of directors.
(5) Students who have taken and successfully completed high school
courses under the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall
not be required to take an additional competency examination or perform
any other additional assignment to receive credit.
(6) At the college or university level, five quarter or three
semester hours equals one high school credit.

Sec. 2 RCW 28A.165.025 and 2009 c 556 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A participating school district shall submit the district's
plan for using learning assistance funds to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction for approval, to the extent
required under subsection (2) of this section. The program plan must
identify the program strategies and activities to be implemented from
RCW 28A.165.035 and ((implement all of the elements in (a) through (h)
of this subsection)) other practices used to accelerate student
learning. The school district plan shall include the following:
(a) District and school-level data on reading, writing, and
mathematics achievement as reported pursuant to chapter 28A.655 RCW and
relevant federal law;
(b) Processes used for identifying the underachieving students to
be served by the program, including the identification of school or
program sites providing program activities; and
(c) ((How accelerated learning plans are developed and implemented
for participating students. Accelerated learning plans may be
developed as part of existing student achievement plan process such as
student plans for achieving state high school graduation standards,
individual student academic plans, or the achievement plans for groups
of students. Accelerated learning plans shall include:
(i) Achievement goals for the students;
(ii) Roles of the student, parents, or guardians and teachers in
the plan;
(iii) Communication procedures regarding student accomplishment;
and
(iv) Plan reviews and adjustments processes;
(d) How state level and classroom assessments are used to inform
instruction;
(e) How focused and intentional instructional strategies have been
identified and implemented;
(f) How highly qualified instructional staff are developed and
supported in the program and in participating schools;
(g) How other federal, state, district, and school resources are
coordinated with school improvement plans and the district's strategic
plan to support underachieving students; and
(h) How a program evaluation will be conducted to determine
direction for the following school year)) Processes used for: Setting
student achievement goals, communication with and involvement of
parents and guardians, district plan review, evaluation and
adjustments, identifying and using assessments, supporting and
developing skills of program instructional staff, coordination of other
federal, state, district, and school resources, and coordination with
the program with school improvement plans and the district's strategic
plan.
(2) If a school district has received approval of its plan once, it
is not required to submit a plan for approval under RCW 28A.165.045 or
this section unless the district has made a significant change to the
plan. If a district has made a significant change to only a portion of
the plan the district need only submit a description of the changes
made and not the entire plan. Plans or descriptions of changes to the
plan must be submitted by July 1st as required under this section. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish
guidelines for what a "significant change" is.

Sec. 3 RCW 43.09.260 and 2009 c 564 s 927 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The examination of the financial affairs of all local
governments shall be made at such reasonable, periodic intervals as the
state auditor shall determine. However, an examination of the
financial affairs of all local governments shall be made at least once
in every three years, and an examination of individual local government
health and welfare benefit plans and local government self-insurance
programs shall be made at least once every two years. Additionally,
beginning with the 2012-13 school year, the state auditor shall conduct
fiscal and performance audits no more often than once every three years
for school districts when no findings of impropriety were found for the
school districts for the three-year period immediately preceding the
audit period. This subsection does not prohibit the state auditor from
conducting audits: (a) To address suspected fraud or irregular
conduct; (b) at the request of the local school board of directors; or
(c) as required by federal laws or regulations.
(2) During the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the state auditor shall
conduct audits no more often than once every two years of local
governments with annual general fund revenues of ten million dollars or
less and no findings of impropriety for the three-year period
immediately preceding the audit period. This subsection does not
prohibit the state auditor from conducting audits: (a) To address
suspected fraud or irregular conduct; (b) at the request of the local
government governing body; or (c) as required by federal laws or
regulations.
(3) The term local governments for purposes of this chapter
includes but is not limited to all counties, cities, and other
political subdivisions, municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal
corporations, however denominated.
(4) The state auditor shall establish a schedule to govern the
auditing of local governments which shall include: A designation of
the various classifications of local governments; a designation of the
frequency for auditing each type of local government; and a description
of events which cause a more frequent audit to be conducted.
(5) On every such examination, inquiry shall be made as to the
financial condition and resources of the local government; whether the
Constitution and laws of the state, the ordinances and orders of the
local government, and the requirements of the state auditor have been
properly complied with; and into the methods and accuracy of the
accounts and reports.
(6) A report of such examination shall be made and filed in the
office of state auditor, and one copy shall be transmitted to the local
government. A copy of any report containing findings of noncompliance
with state law shall be transmitted to the attorney general. If any
such report discloses malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in
office on the part of any public officer or employee, within thirty
days from the receipt of his or her copy of the report, the attorney
general shall institute, in the proper county, such legal action as is
proper in the premises by civil process and prosecute the same to final
determination to carry into effect the findings of the examination.
(7) It shall be unlawful for any local government or the
responsible head thereof, to make a settlement or compromise of any
claim arising out of such malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance, or
any action commenced therefor, or for any court to enter upon any
compromise or settlement of such action, without the written approval
and consent of the attorney general and the state auditor.

--- END ---