BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.150.315 and 2011 c 340 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2007-08 school year, funding for voluntary
all-day kindergarten programs shall be phased-in beginning with schools
with the highest poverty levels, defined as those schools with the
highest percentages of students qualifying for free and reduced-price
lunch support in the prior school year. During the 2011-2013 biennium,
funding shall continue to be phased-in each year until full statewide
implementation of all-day kindergarten is achieved in the 2017-18
school year. Once a school receives funding for the all-day
kindergarten program, that school shall remain eligible for funding in
subsequent school years regardless of changes in the school's
percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price lunches as
long as other program requirements are fulfilled. Additionally,
schools receiving all-day kindergarten program support shall agree to
the following conditions:
(a) Provide at least a one thousand-hour instructional program;
(b) Provide a curriculum that offers a rich, varied set of
experiences that assist students in:
(i) Developing initial skills in the academic areas of reading,
mathematics, and writing;
(ii) Developing a variety of communication skills;
(iii) Providing experiences in science, social studies, arts,
health and physical education, and a world language other than English;
(iv) Acquiring large and small motor skills;
(v) Acquiring social and emotional skills including successful
participation in learning activities as an individual and as part of a
group; and
(vi) Learning through hands-on experiences;
(c) Establish learning environments that are developmentally
appropriate and promote creativity;
(d) Demonstrate strong connections and communication with early
learning community providers; and
(e) Participate in kindergarten program readiness activities with
early learning providers and parents.
(2)(a) In addition to the requirements in subsection (1) of this
section and to the extent funds are available, beginning with the 2011-12 school year on a voluntary basis, schools must identify the skills,
knowledge, and characteristics of kindergarten students at the
beginning of the school year in order to support social-emotional,
physical, and cognitive growth and development of individual children;
support early learning provider and parent involvement; and inform
instruction. Kindergarten teachers shall administer the Washington
kindergarten inventory of developing skills, as directed by the
superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the
department of early learning, and report the results to the
superintendent. The superintendent shall share the results with the
director of the department of early learning. Beginning with the 2012-13 school year and thereafter, schools shall be subject to the
provisions of section 2 of this act.
(b) School districts shall provide an opportunity for parents and
guardians to excuse their children from participation in the Washington
kindergarten inventory of developing skills.
(((c) To the extent funds are available, beginning in the 2012-13
school year, the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills
shall be administered at the beginning of the school year to all
students enrolled in state-funded full-day kindergarten programs with
the exception of students who have been excused from participation by
their parents or guardians.
(d) Until full implementation of state-funded all-day kindergarten,
the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the
director of the department of early learning, may grant annual,
renewable waivers from the requirement of (c) of this subsection to
administer the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills.
A school district seeking a waiver for one or more of its schools must
submit an application to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction that includes:
(i) A description of the kindergarten readiness assessment and
transition processes that it proposes to administer instead of the
Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills;
(ii) An explanation of why the administration of the Washington
kindergarten inventory of developing skills would be unduly burdensome;
and
(iii) An explanation of how administration of the alternative
kindergarten readiness assessment will support social-emotional,
physical, and cognitive growth and development of individual children;
support early learning provider and parent involvement; and inform
instruction.))
(3) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the
superintendent of public instruction shall designate one or more school
districts to serve as resources and examples of best practices in
designing and operating a high-quality all-day kindergarten program.
Designated school districts shall serve as lighthouse programs and
provide technical assistance to other school districts in the initial
stages of implementing an all-day kindergarten program. Examples of
topics addressed by the technical assistance include strategic
planning, developing the instructional program and curriculum, working
with early learning providers to identify students and communicate with
parents, and developing kindergarten program readiness activities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.655
RCW to read as follows:
(1)(a) To the extent funds are available, beginning in the 2012-13
school year, the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills
shall be administered at the beginning of the school year to all
students enrolled in state-funded full-day kindergarten programs under
RCW 28A.150.315 with the exception of students who have been excused
from participation by their parents or guardians.
(b) To the extent funds are available, administration of the
Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills to kindergarten
students in addition to those under (a) of this subsection shall be
phased in beginning in the 2012-13 school year as directed by the
superintendent of public instruction in consultation with the
department of early learning, until the 2014-15 school year and
thereafter when the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing
skills must be administered to all students enrolled in kindergarten
programs in the public schools with the exception of students who have
been excused from participation by their parents or guardians.
(2) Until full statewide implementation of the Washington
kindergarten inventory of developing skills, the superintendent of
public instruction, in consultation with the director of the department
of early learning, may grant annual, renewable waivers from the
requirement of subsection (1) of this subsection to administer the
Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills. A school
district seeking a waiver for one or more of its schools must submit an
application to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
that includes:
(a) A description of the kindergarten readiness assessment and
transition processes that it proposes to administer instead of the
Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills;
(b) An explanation of why the administration of the Washington
kindergarten inventory of developing skills would be unduly burdensome;
and
(c) An explanation of how administration of the alternative
kindergarten readiness assessment will support social-emotional,
physical, and cognitive growth and development of individual children;
support early learning provider and parent involvement; and inform
instruction.

--- END ---