BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) This chapter does not apply to:
(a) A new business during the first twelve months of operation of
the business; or
(b) A new business during the first twenty-four months of operation
of the business if the new business has less than twenty-five
employment positions at the time it begins to engage in the normal
course of business. During the next twelve months of operation of the
business, the business is exempt from fifty percent of taxes due under
this chapter.
(2) As used in this section:
(a)(i) "New business" means a business that obtained or was
required to obtain a registration certificate under RCW 82.32.030 for
the first time during the calendar year for which exemption is first
claimed under this section.
(ii) "New business" does not include:
(A) A business that has been restructured, reorganized, or
transferred, unless the majority of the activities to be conducted
after the restructuring, reorganization, or transfer are significantly
different from the activities previously conducted;
(B) A new branch location or other facility except by an existing
out-of-state entity first doing business in this state;
(C) A business that is substantially similar to a business
currently operated, or operated within the past five years, by the same
principals.
(b) "Employment position" means a full-time, permanent employee of
the new business.
(3)(a) A new business must file an application, in a form and
manner required by the department, to qualify for the exemption under
this section.
(b) An application under this section must be filed within one year
of the time the business was required to obtain a registration
certificate under RCW 82.32.030.
(c) The time periods in subsection (1) of this section begin when
the application is approved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---