BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 18.225 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary of the department of health shall promulgate rules
relating to issuance of a retired active license under RCW 18.130.250
for mental health counselors, marriage and family therapists, advanced
social workers, and independent clinical social workers, which provide
that an applicant for a retired active license must hold an active
license in good standing or have held an active license in good
standing that expired less than five years prior to the date of
application for the retired active license.

--- END ---