BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds and declares the
following:
(1) American manufacturing has been declining over the past several
years with jobs going overseas due to tax and other policies, with
predictable economic consequences. The federal "Buy America" laws were
passed as one means to address this concern.
(2) Public transit agencies in the state and nation continue to
provide critical transportation services to citizens and remain
critical components for state and national goals to alleviate highway
gridlock, air pollution, and greenhouse gas emissions.
(3) Funding for public transit has continued to decline in
difficult economic times, and it remains difficult to keep public
transit systems in good repair, including maintaining and replacing
rail vehicles.
(4) Federal "Buy America" laws applicable to rolling stock,
including rail vehicles, require that the cost of components and
subcomponents produced in the United States total at least sixty
percent of the cost of all components in the rolling stock, and that
final assembly of the rolling stock occur in the United States.
(5) Federal "Buy America" regulations allow states to impose
contracting preference provisions based on more stringent domestic
content requirements than those set forth in the federal law, but the
federal transit administration will not participate in the funding of
state and local contracts with those preference provisions if they are
not specifically set out under state law. The state of Washington
currently has no such preference law.
(6) It is in the best interest of the state of Washington, as well
as the manufacturers across the nation, to authorize public transit
agencies to give preferences to bidders on rolling stock contracts that
provide domestic content above the minimum requirements set forth in
federal "Buy America" laws. Each public transit agency should have the
discretion to apply those preferences.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW
to read as follows:
In accordance with 49 C.F.R. Sec. 661.21, any public transit
agency, relative to the use of federal funds for transit purposes, may
provide a bidding preference to a bidder if the bidder exceeds buy
America requirements applicable to federally funded transit projects.
Each public transit agency may apply those preferences.

--- END ---