BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.63A.750 and 2006 c 371 s 235 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) A competitive grant program to assist nonprofit organizations
in acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating performing arts, art
museum((s)), ((and)) cultural organization, zoo, aquarium, and science
or technology center facilities is created. A facility for a zoo or
aquarium must be for an organization accredited by the association of
zoos and aquariums and a facility for a science or technology center
must be for an organization that meets the requirements to be a member
of the association of science and technology centers.
(2)(a) The department shall submit a list of recommended performing
arts, art museum ((projects)), ((and)) cultural organization, zoo,
aquarium, and science or technology center projects eligible for
funding to the governor and the legislature in the department's
biennial capital budget request beginning with the 2001-2003 biennium
and thereafter. The list, in priority order, shall include a
description of each project, the amount of recommended state funding,
and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project. The
total amount of recommended state funding for projects on a biennial
project list shall not exceed ((twelve)) sixteen million dollars.
(b) The department shall establish a competitive process to
prioritize applications for state assistance as follows:
(i) The department shall conduct a statewide solicitation of
project applications from nonprofit organizations, local governments,
and other entities, as determined by the department. The department
shall evaluate and rank applications in consultation with a citizen
advisory committee, including a representative from the state arts
commission, using objective criteria. The evaluation and ranking
process shall also consider local community support for projects and an
examination of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects.
(ii) The department may establish the amount of state grant
assistance for individual project applications but the amount shall not
exceed twenty percent of the estimated total capital cost or actual
cost of a project, whichever is less. The remaining portions of the
project capital cost shall be a match from nonstate sources. The
nonstate match may include cash, the value of real property when
acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind
contributions. The department is authorized to set matching
requirements for individual projects. State assistance may be used to
fund separate definable phases of a project if the project demonstrates
adequate progress and has secured the necessary match funding.
(iii) The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise
financially obligate funds under this section until the legislature has
approved a specific list of projects. In contracts for grants
authorized under this section, the department shall include provisions
requiring that capital improvements be held by the grantee for a
specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant and
that facilities be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the
grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the
contract, the grantee shall repay to the state general fund the
principal amount of the grant plus interest calculated at the rate of
interest on state of Washington general obligation bonds issued most
closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

--- END ---