BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 Many counties in Washington state use the
most restrictive restraints on juveniles who appear in court,
regardless of whether the juvenile has been charged with a criminal
offense or is before the court for a status offense. In most cases,
the most restrictive level of restraints is not necessary and very
damaging to the juvenile.
The policy of the state of Washington is to use the least
restrictive form of restraint for juveniles during their transportation
to and appearance in court. Further, such restraints shall only be
used when necessary based upon concerns regarding safety to the
juvenile and the public, potential risk of flight, or other attendant
circumstances.

Sec. 2 RCW 13.32A.030 and 2010 c 289 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
As used in this chapter the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Abuse or neglect" means the injury, sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, negligent treatment, or maltreatment of a child by any
person under circumstances which indicate that the child's health,
welfare, and safety is harmed, excluding conduct permitted under RCW
9A.16.100. An abused child is a child who has been subjected to child
abuse or neglect as defined in this section.
(2) "Administrator" means the individual who has the daily
administrative responsibility of a crisis residential center, or his or
her designee.
(3) "At-risk youth" means a juvenile:
(a) Who is absent from home for at least seventy-two consecutive
hours without consent of his or her parent;
(b) Who is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the
child's behavior endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child
or any other person; or
(c) Who has a substance abuse problem for which there are no
pending criminal charges related to the substance abuse.
(4) "Child," "juvenile," and "youth" mean any unemancipated
individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years.
(5) "Child in need of services" means a juvenile:
(a) Who is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the
child's behavior endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child
or other person;
(b) Who has been reported to law enforcement as absent without
consent for at least twenty-four consecutive hours on two or more
separate occasions from the home of either parent, a crisis residential
center, an out-of-home placement, or a court-ordered placement; and
(i) Has exhibited a serious substance abuse problem; or
(ii) Has exhibited behaviors that create a serious risk of harm to
the health, safety, or welfare of the child or any other person;
(c)(i) Who is in need of: (A) Necessary services, including food,
shelter, health care, clothing, or education; or (B) services designed
to maintain or reunite the family;
(ii) Who lacks access to, or has declined to utilize, these
services; and
(iii) Whose parents have evidenced continuing but unsuccessful
efforts to maintain the family structure or are unable or unwilling to
continue efforts to maintain the family structure; or
(d) Who is a "sexually exploited child".
(6) "Child in need of services petition" means a petition filed in
juvenile court by a parent, child, or the department seeking
adjudication of placement of the child.
(7) "Crisis residential center" means a secure or semi-secure
facility established pursuant to chapter 74.13 RCW.
(8) "Custodian" means the person or entity who has the legal right
to the custody of the child.
(9) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.
(10) "Extended family member" means an adult who is a grandparent,
brother, sister, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, aunt, or first cousin
with whom the child has a relationship and is comfortable, and who is
willing and available to care for the child.
(11) "Guardian" means that person or agency that (a) has been
appointed as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding other than
a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, and (b) has the right to legal
custody of the child pursuant to such appointment. The term "guardian"
does not include a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a
proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.
(12) "Multidisciplinary team" means a group formed to provide
assistance and support to a child who is an at-risk youth or a child in
need of services and his or her parent. The team shall include the
parent, a department case worker, a local government representative
when authorized by the local government, and when appropriate, members
from the mental health and substance abuse disciplines. The team may
also include, but is not limited to, the following persons: Educators,
law enforcement personnel, probation officers, employers, church
persons, tribal members, therapists, medical personnel, social service
providers, placement providers, and extended family members. The team
members shall be volunteers who do not receive compensation while
acting in a capacity as a team member, unless the member's employer
chooses to provide compensation or the member is a state employee.
(13) "Out-of-home placement" means a placement in a foster family
home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or
placement in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian,
or legal custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter
74.15 RCW.
(14) "Parent" means the parent or parents who have the legal right
to custody of the child. "Parent" includes custodian or guardian.
(15) "Restraints" means anything used to control the movement of a
person's body or limbs and includes:
(a) Physical restraint; or
(b) Mechanical device including, but not limited to: Metal
handcuffs, plastic ties, ankle restraints, leather cuffs, tasers, or
batons.
(16) "Secure facility" means a crisis residential center, or
portion thereof, that has locking doors, locking windows, or a secured
perimeter, designed and operated to prevent a child from leaving
without permission of the facility staff.
(((16))) (17) "Semi-secure facility" means any facility, including
but not limited to crisis residential centers or specialized foster
family homes, operated in a manner to reasonably assure that youth
placed there will not run away. Pursuant to rules established by the
department, the facility administrator shall establish reasonable hours
for residents to come and go from the facility such that no residents
are free to come and go at all hours of the day and night. To prevent
residents from taking unreasonable actions, the facility administrator,
where appropriate, may condition a resident's leaving the facility upon
the resident being accompanied by the administrator or the
administrator's designee and the resident may be required to notify the
administrator or the administrator's designee of any intent to leave,
his or her intended destination, and the probable time of his or her
return to the center.
(((17))) (18) "Sexually exploited child" means any person under the
age of eighteen who is a victim of the crime of commercial sex abuse of
a minor under RCW 9.68A.100, promoting commercial sexual abuse of a
minor under RCW 9.68A.101, or promoting travel for commercial sexual
abuse of a minor under RCW 9.68A.102.
(((18))) (19) "Staff secure facility" means a structured group care
facility licensed under rules adopted by the department with a ratio of
at least one adult staff member to every two children.
(((19))) (20) "Temporary out-of-home placement" means an out-of-home placement of not more than fourteen days ordered by the court at
a fact-finding hearing on a child in need of services petition.

Sec. 3 RCW 13.32A.065 and 2000 c 162 s 12 and 2000 c 123 s 8 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) If a child is placed in detention under RCW 13.32A.050(1)(d),
the court shall hold a detention review hearing within twenty-four
hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. The court shall
release the child after twenty-four hours, excluding Saturdays,
Sundays, and holidays, unless:
(a) A motion and order to show why the child should not be held in
contempt has been filed and served on the child at or before the
detention hearing; and
(b) The court believes that the child would not appear at a hearing
on contempt.
(2) If the court orders the child to remain in detention, the court
shall set the matter for a hearing on contempt within seventy-two
hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.
(3) If the court orders the child to be placed in or to remain in
detention pursuant to this section, the use of restraints on the child
is not permitted during his or her appearance at the hearing set by the
court or during transportation to or from such hearing unless a
determination has been made pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The use of restraints on a child who has been detained, either
during an appearance in court or during transportation to and from
court, is permitted only if an employee at the institution or detention
facility makes an individualized determination that restraints are
necessary to prevent the child from escaping or from injuring himself
or herself, detention or court personnel, or others.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no
restraints of any kind may be used on any youth held in an institution
or detention facility covered by this chapter during his or her
appearance at court proceedings or while being transported to or from
court proceedings.
(2) Anytime restraints are used pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section, the restraints must be the least restrictive available and the
most reasonable under the circumstances.
(3)(a) The use of restraints on a youth is permitted while he or
she is within a courtroom for the purpose of attending a court
proceeding only if the youth is currently charged with a criminal
offense and the court makes an individualized determination that such
restraints are necessary to prevent the youth from escaping or from
injuring himself or herself, detention or court personnel, or others.
(b) The use of restraints is permitted while the youth is
transported to or from court proceedings when the youth is charged with
a criminal offense and an employee at the institution or detention
facility makes an individualized determination that restraints are
necessary to prevent the youth from escaping or from injuring himself
or herself, detention or court personnel, or others.
(4) If restraint of a youth is permitted under subsection (3) of
this section, the employee of the court, institution, or detention
facility who determines the type of restraints to be used must fully
document in writing the kind of restraints used and the reasons those
restraints were considered the least restrictive available and the most
reasonable under the circumstances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
The director of the juvenile detention facility covered by this
chapter shall provide an informational packet about the requirements of
this act to all staff who are involved in transporting youth and to
other staff as appropriate. The informational packet shall be
developed as provided in section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 A new section is added to chapter 72.05 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no
restraints of any kind may be used on any youth held in an institution
or a community facility covered by this chapter during his or her
appearance at court proceedings or transportation to or from court
proceedings.
(2) Anytime restraints are used pursuant to subsection (3) of this
section, the restraints must be the least restrictive available and the
most reasonable under the circumstances.
(3)(a) The use of restraints on a youth is permitted while he or
she is within a courtroom for the purpose of attending a court
proceeding only if the youth is currently charged with a criminal
offense and the court makes an individualized determination that such
restraints are necessary to prevent the youth from escaping or from
injuring himself or herself, detention or court personnel, or others.
(b) The use of restraints is permitted while the youth is
transported to or from court proceedings when the youth is charged with
a criminal offense and an employee at the institution or detention
facility makes an individualized determination that restraints are
necessary to prevent the youth from escaping or from injuring himself
or herself, detention or court personnel, or others.
(4) If restraint of a youth is permitted under subsection (3) of
this section, the employee of the court, institution, or detention
facility who determines the type of restraints to be used must fully
document in writing the kind of restraints used and the reasons those
restraints were considered the least restrictive available and the most
reasonable under the circumstances.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 72.05 RCW
to read as follows:
The secretary shall provide an informational packet about the
requirements of this act to all staff who are involved in transporting
youth and to other staff as appropriate. The informational packet
shall be developed as provided in section 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the
juvenile rehabilitation administration, the criminal justice training
commission, and the administrative office of the courts shall jointly
develop the informational packet on the requirements of this act. The
packet shall be ready for distribution no later than September 1, 2012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 A new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW
to read as follows:
No civil liability may be imposed by any court on the county or its
employees under this section except upon proof of gross negligence.

--- END ---