BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW
to read as follows:
Students at each institution of higher education shall be active
participants in the immediate governance of and policy development of
their respective institutions of higher education. The undergraduate
and graduate student governments at each respective institution of
higher education are the entities through which student participation
occurs. Any governance responsibility and authority, and any policy
development, is subject to the authority of the respective governing
bodies of the institutions of higher education.

--- END ---