BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.148.020 and 2006 c 276 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The pollution liability insurance program trust account is
established in the custody of the state treasurer. All funds
appropriated for this chapter and all premiums collected for
reinsurance shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter
including payment of costs of administering the pollution liability
insurance and underground storage tank community assistance programs.
Expenditures for payment of administrative and operating costs of the
agency are subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW
and may be made only after appropriation by statute. No appropriation
is required for other expenditures from the account.
(2) Each calendar quarter, the director shall report to the
insurance commissioner the loss and surplus reserves required for the
calendar quarter. The director shall notify the department of revenue
of this amount by the fifteenth day of each calendar quarter.
(3) Each calendar quarter the director shall determine the amount
of reserves necessary to fund commitments made to provide financial
assistance under RCW 70.148.130 to the extent that the financial
assistance reserves do not jeopardize the operations and liabilities of
the pollution liability insurance program. The director shall notify
the department of revenue of this amount by the fifteenth day of each
calendar quarter. The director may immediately establish an initial
financial assistance reserve of five million dollars from available
revenues. The director may not expend more than fifteen million
dollars for the financial assistance program.
(((4) During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may
transfer from the pollution liability insurance program trust account
to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund
balance of the account.
(5))) This section expires ((June 1, 2013)) July 1, 2020.

Sec. 2 RCW 70.148.900 and 2006 c 276 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter ((shall)) expires ((June 1, 2013)) July 1, 2020.

Sec. 3 RCW 70.149.900 and 2006 c 276 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
((Sections 1 through 11 of this act shall expire June 1, 2013))
This chapter expires July 1, 2020.

Sec. 4 RCW 82.23A.010 and 2004 c 203 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Petroleum product" means plant condensate, lubricating oil,
gasoline, aviation fuel, kerosene, diesel motor fuel, benzol, fuel oil,
residual oil, and every other product derived from the refining of
crude oil, but the term does not include crude oil or liquefiable
gases.
(2) "Possession" means the control of a petroleum product located
within this state and includes both actual and constructive possession.
"Actual possession" occurs when the person with control has physical
possession. "Constructive possession" occurs when the person with
control does not have physical possession. "Control" means the power
to sell or use a petroleum product or to authorize the sale or use by
another.
(3) "Previously taxed petroleum product" means a petroleum product
in respect to which a tax has been paid under this chapter and that has
not been remanufactured or reprocessed in any manner (other than mere
repackaging or recycling for beneficial reuse) since the tax was paid.
(4) "Rack" means a mechanism for delivering petroleum products from
a refinery or terminal into a truck, trailer, railcar, or other means
of nonbulk transfer. For the purposes of this definition:
(a) "Terminal" has the same definition as in RCW 82.36.010 and
82.38.020; and
(b) "Nonbulk transfer" means a transfer that does not meet the
definition of "bulk transfer" as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and
82.38.020.
(5) "Wholesale value" means fair market wholesale value, determined
as nearly as possible according to the wholesale selling price at the
place of use of similar products of like quality and character, in
accordance with rules of the department.
(((5))) (6) Except for terms defined in this section, the
definitions in chapters 82.04, 82.08, and 82.12 RCW apply to this
chapter.

Sec. 5 RCW 82.23A.020 and 1991 c 4 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A tax is imposed on the privilege of possession of petroleum
products in this state. The rate of the tax shall be ((fifty)) thirty
one-hundredths of one percent multiplied by the wholesale value of the
petroleum product. For purposes of determining the tax imposed under
this section for petroleum products introduced at the rack, the
wholesale value is determined when the petroleum product is removed at
the rack unless the removal is to an exporter licensed under chapter
82.36 or 82.38 RCW for direct delivery to a destination outside of the
state. For all other cases, the wholesale value is determined upon
first possession in the state.
(2) Moneys collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the
pollution liability insurance program trust account under RCW
70.148.020.
(3) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax imposed in this chapter.
The tax due dates, reporting periods, and return requirements
applicable to chapter 82.04 RCW apply equally to the tax imposed in
this chapter.
(4) Within thirty days after the end of each calendar quarter the
department shall determine the "quarterly balance," which shall be the
cash balance in the pollution liability insurance program trust account
as of the last day of that calendar quarter, after excluding the
reserves determined for that quarter under RCW 70.148.020 (2) and (3).
Balance determinations by the department under this section are final
and shall not be used to challenge the validity of any tax imposed
under this section. For each subsequent calendar quarter, tax shall be
imposed under this section during the entire calendar quarter unless:
(a) Tax was imposed under this section during the immediately
preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent quarterly balance is
more than fifteen million dollars; or
(b) Tax was not imposed under this section during the immediately
preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent quarterly balance is
more than seven million five hundred thousand dollars.

Sec. 6 RCW 82.23A.902 and 2006 c 276 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
This chapter ((shall)) expires ((on June 1, 2013)) July 1, 2020,
coinciding with the expiration of chapter 70.148 RCW.

--- END ---