BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 70.95N.050 and 2006 c 183 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A manufacturer must participate in the standard plan
administered by the authority, unless the manufacturer obtains
department approval for an independent plan for the collection,
transportation, and recycling of unwanted electronic products.
(2) An independent plan may be submitted by an individual
manufacturer or by a group of manufacturers, provided that:
(a) For program years 2009 through 2012, each independent plan
represents at least a five percent return share of covered electronic
products and for program year 2013 and all subsequent program years,
each independent plan represents at least a three percent market share
of covered electronic products; and
(b) No manufacturer may participate in an independent plan if it is
a new entrant or a white box manufacturer.
(3) An individual manufacturer submitting an independent plan to
the department is responsible for collecting, transporting, and
recycling its equivalent share of covered electronic products.
(4)(a) Manufacturers collectively submitting an independent plan
are responsible for collecting, transporting, and recycling the sum of
the equivalent shares of each participating manufacturer.
(b) Each group of manufacturers submitting an independent plan must
designate a party authorized to file the plan with the department on
their behalf. A letter of certification from each of the manufacturers
designating the authorized party must be submitted to the department
together with the plan.
(5) Each manufacturer in the standard plan or in an independent
plan retains responsibility and liability under this chapter in the
event that the plan fails to meet the manufacturer's obligations under
this chapter.

--- END ---