BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 61.24 RCW
to read as follows:
If any beneficiary of debt secured by owner-occupied residential
real property approves a purchase agreement for the sale of that owner-occupied residential real property for which the sale proceeds are
insufficient to pay in full the obligation owed to the beneficiary, and
the beneficiary subsequently reports to the internal revenue service,
by filing a Form 1099 or otherwise, that as a consequence of the sale
the beneficiary has canceled all or a portion of the obligation owed by
the seller to the beneficiary, the beneficiary or assignee of the
beneficiary may not bring an action or otherwise seek payment for the
amount previously owed by the seller that was reported to the internal
revenue service. For the purposes of this section, a beneficiary must
evidence approval of a purchase agreement by releasing its security
interest in the property allowing the sale to close. However, a
beneficiary's release of its security interest allowing the sale to
close does not determine whether the beneficiary has retained the right
to seek payment for the entire obligation owed to the beneficiary.

--- END ---