BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that much of western
Europe, China, Japan, and other Asian countries have chosen to use
renewable densified biomass as a renewable energy fuel to heat homes,
businesses, and other facilities in lieu of petroleum-based heating
systems. The legislature further finds that clean-burning, renewable
densified biomass will: (1) Lead our country into energy independence;
(2) create jobs; (3) stimulate our economy by keeping more of our money
circulating in the United States; (4) reduce carbon emissions from
fossil fuels; and (5) improve air quality in noncompliant air sheds.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to have the Washington
State University extension energy program study and report on the use
of densified biomass as a renewable energy source to heat homes,
businesses, and other facilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 By December 1, 2013, and within existing
resources, the Washington State University extension energy program
shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and
legislature consistent with RCW 43.01.036 on the use of densified
biomass as a renewable energy source in lieu of using electricity,
natural gas, and petroleum-based fuels to heat homes, businesses, and
other facilities. The Washington State University extension energy
program shall consult with the densified biomass industry to prepare
its report. The report must provide the best possible projections of
the following:
(1) The amount of materials that are available and may be produced
to create densified biomass fuel in Washington state;
(2) The potential of exporting renewable densified biomass fuel as
a fuel source;
(3) The jobs that are likely to be created in Washington state from
manufacturing renewable densified biomass fuel and densified biomass
heating equipment;
(4) The efficiency of using renewable densified biomass fuel to
provide space heating as compared to other traditional forms of space
heating, including but not limited to natural gas, propane, heating
oil, and electricity, including a heat pump;
(5) The reduction in oil imports into Washington state if renewable
densified biomass is used to heat homes, businesses, and other
facilities;
(6) The amount of imported oil that may be reduced by using
renewable densified biomass fuel in lieu of petroleum-based fuels, such
as propane, for heating and electricity that is generated and used for
heating homes, businesses, and other facilities;
(7) How to accomplish the distribution of bulk renewable densified
biomass to homes, businesses, and other facilities using renewable
densified biomass-fueled heating equipment;
(8) The price stability of renewable densified biomass fuel as
compared to oil, electricity, propane, and natural gas;
(9) The likely environmental impacts of heating homes, businesses,
and other facilities with renewable densified biomass as compared to
petroleum-based fuels used to generate heat, natural gas, and
electricity. In considering electricity used to produce heat, the
Washington State University extension energy program shall include in
its calculations emissions from the electricity generating systems,
electricity loss in the transmission of electricity to the average end
user, and the heating efficiency of the electronically powered heating
system. Environmental impacts must include, but not be limited to,
comparable carbon dioxide emissions and toxic air emissions from the
use of renewable densified biomass as compared to the use of fossil
fuels; and
(10) Other considerations deemed appropriate by the Washington
State University extension energy program that should be considered in
using renewable densified biomass as a recognized renewable energy
source for heating homes, businesses, and other facilities in
Washington state.
This section expires January 1, 2013.

--- END ---