BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that:
(1) In 2009, discarded carpet and padding equaled 3.6 percent of
Washington's disposed waste by weight. The estimated recycling rate
for carpet and padding in Washington was less than 2.3 percent in 2009.
(2) The recycling industry accounted for about four thousand five
hundred jobs in Washington in 2008, and despite the recession, new and
expanded recycling operations have opened.
(3) The annual economic value of recyclables collected in
Washington was estimated at three hundred twenty million dollars in
2008.
(4) Washington manufacturers gain access to recycled feedstock
materials, such as plastics, for their products.
(5) Certainty about availability of recycled feedstock materials is
significantly increased by product stewardship requirements.
(6) The national, voluntary, and industry-led approach to carpet
stewardship, the 2002 memorandum of understanding for carpet
stewardship, has not met its agreed-upon goal of forty percent carpet
recovery and has only achieved a four to five percent recovery rate
nationwide.
(7) Numerous products can be manufactured from recycled carpet,
including carpet backing and backing components, carpet fiber, carpet
underlayment, plastics and engineered materials, and erosion control
products.
(8) The recycling of carpet into useful products is a developing
enterprise that has a current geographic focus in the Puget
Sound/Interstate 5 corridor. Both locations that receive used carpet
and businesses that create new products from this used carpet are
concentrated in this geographic area. Significant private sector
investment has been made in new technology to recycle types of carpet
that have been challenging to recycle in the past. These investments
are partially predicated upon the continuing availability of used
carpet in quantities sufficient to justify the initial capital outlays.
An active carpet recycling infrastructure currently exists in the Puget
Sound/Interstate 5 corridor to an extent not yet seen in other parts of
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Brand" means a name, symbol, word, or mark that identifies the
carpet, rather than its components, and attributes the carpet to the
owner or licensee of the brand as the manufacturer.
(2) "Carpet" means a manufactured article that is used in
commercial or residential buildings affixed or placed on the floor or
building walking surface as a decorative or functional building
interior or exterior feature and that is primarily constructed of a top
visible surface of natural or synthetic face fibers or yarns or tufts
attached to a backing system derived from synthetic or natural
materials. "Carpet" includes, but is not limited to, a commercial or
a residential broadloom carpet or modular carpet tiles. "Carpet"
includes a pad or underlayment used in conjunction with a carpet.
"Carpet" does not include handmade rugs, area rugs, or mats.
(3) "Carpet stewardship organization" or "organization" means
either of the following:
(a) An organization appointed by one or more producers to act as an
agent on behalf of the producer to design, submit, and administer a
product stewardship program under this chapter; or
(b) A carpet producer that complies with this chapter as an
individual producer.
(4) "Consumer" means a purchaser, owner, or lessee of carpet,
including a person, business, corporation, limited partnership,
nonprofit organization, or governmental entity. "Consumer" does not
include a retailer or wholesaler.
(5) "Department" means the department of ecology.
(6) "Discarded carpet" means carpet that is no longer used for its
manufactured purpose. However, the term does not include carpet scrap
generated during carpet production.
(7) "Market share" means the percentage of carpet by weight
identified for an individual producer that is sold in or into the state
during the reporting period as compared to all carpet identified for
all producers by weight sold in or into the state during the same
reporting period.
(8) "Producer" means the person who:
(a) Has legal ownership of the brand, brand name, or cobrand of the
carpet sold in or into the state. "Producer" does not include a
retailer who puts its store label on a carpet. If the carpet has a
retail brand label, the manufacturer is considered the producer;
(b) Imports carpet branded or manufactured by a producer that meets
the definition under (a) of this subsection and has no physical
presence in the United States; or
(c) Sells carpet, at retail or wholesale, and elects to fulfill the
responsibilities of the producer for that carpet.
(9) "Product stewardship program" or "program" means the methods,
systems, and services financed and provided by producers of carpet sold
in or into the state including collecting, transporting, processing,
and recycling of discarded carpet.
(10) "Product stewardship program plan" or "plan" means a detailed
plan describing the manner in which a product stewardship program will
be implemented.
(11) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing waste
materials into a finished product for use other than combustion,
landfill disposal, or incineration.
(12) "Reporting period" means the period commencing January 1st and
ending December 31st in the same calendar year.
(13) "Retailer" means every person who sells or offers for sale,
new carpet in the state.
(14) "Reuse" means donating or selling collected carpet back into
the market for its original intended use in which the carpet retains
its original purpose and performance characteristics.
(15) "Sell" or "sales" means a transfer of title of a carpet for
consideration, including a remote sale conducted through a sales
outlet, catalog, internet web site, or similar electronic means. For
purposes of this chapter, "sell" or "sales" includes a lease through
which a carpet is provided to a consumer by a producer, wholesaler, or
retailer.
(16) "Source separated" means carpet that has been separated or
segregated from all other wastes, including but not limited to all
municipal solid waste, at the place where the carpet is discarded.
(17) "Wholesaler" means every person who purchases, sells, or
distributes new carpet in the state in a sale that is not a retail
sale, and in which the carpet is intended to be resold.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) By January 1, 2013, a producer of carpet
sold in or into the state shall participate in a carpet stewardship
organization. A producer shall notify the department of its
participation in a carpet stewardship organization.
(2)(a) By January 31, 2014, every carpet stewardship organization
must submit to the department sales data from the years 2003 through
2012. The data must include the amount of carpet sold in or into the
state by square yards and weight in pounds, separating data for
residential and commercial carpet, providing a total for each and an
overall total, of each producer participating in the carpet stewardship
organization.
(b) Beginning January 31, 2014, and annually thereafter in an
annual report as required in section 6 of this act, every carpet
stewardship organization must submit to the department the previous
year's sales data that includes the amount of carpet sold in or into
the state by square yards and weight in pounds, for residential and
commercial carpet, providing a total for each and an overall total, of
each producer participating in the carpet stewardship organization.
Sales data may be prorated by population from national or state data.
(c) On March 1, 2013, each carpet stewardship organization must
submit an initial fee of one thousand dollars for each producer
represented to cover the one-time cost of the department's estimated
first annual fee as established in section 9 of this act.
(3)(a) A carpet stewardship organization shall submit to the
department a product stewardship program plan that is consistent with
the requirements of this section by January 1, 2014. A carpet
stewardship organization with a department-approved product stewardship
program plan must implement their program by January 1, 2015.
(b) A carpet stewardship organization must consult with
stakeholders, including retailers, installers, collectors, recyclers,
and local governments during the development of the product stewardship
program plan.
(4) A product stewardship program must:
(a) Have in place methods and systems for financing the program and
collecting, transporting, processing for recycling, and recycling
discarded carpet. The financing system must be sufficient for capital
costs of the program and for the product stewardship program to fund:
Education and outreach efforts; administrative and operational
activities; and other efforts that will advance the purposes of this
chapter;
(b) Be provided throughout the state at no cost to all entities
that remove carpet, including but not limited to carpet and flooring
installers, and construction and demolition companies. The program may
not charge a fee at the time discarded carpet is collected. Collection
services must include convenient locations for entities that remove
carpet and, at minimum, one collection location open to the public per
one hundred thousand residents in each county, and a minimum of one
collection site open to the public per county. A collection site in an
adjacent county may be deemed adequate after consultation with
stakeholders described in subsection (3)(b) of this section and (g) of
this subsection;
(c) Include:
(i) Interim milestones, described by the stewardship organization,
that will:
(A) Increase the recycling of discarded carpet throughout the
state;
(B) Increase the recyclability of carpets; and
(C) Incentivize the market growth of secondary products made from
discarded carpet; and
(ii) Four-year performance goals for:
(A) Collecting and recycling discarded carpet;
(B) Managing discarded carpet consistent with the state's solid
waste priorities; and
(C) Collecting source separated carpet that meets acceptable
standards as required under subsection (7)(a) of this section;
(d) Describe how discarded carpet will be collected and recycled
throughout the state, including a list of collection locations,
processors, and recyclers that will be used in the program;
(e) Identify each producer participating in the product stewardship
program and provide contact information for each producer and the
brands covered by each producer;
(f) Include a proposal for achieving and maintaining performance
standards, beyond the four-year period described in (c) of this
subsection;
(g) Provide opportunities for public comment on the product
stewardship program, a summary of comments received, and responses to
those comments both prior to its submittal as a plan to the department
and annually thereafter; and
(h) Include education and outreach efforts to consumers, commercial
building owners, carpet installation contractors, and retailers
throughout the state to promote their participation in achieving the
product stewardship program's performance goals. At a minimum, the
education and outreach efforts must include:
(i) Written materials and templates of materials for reproduction
to be provided to retailers, local governments, carpet installation
contractors, and consumers at the time of purchase and delivery; and
(ii) Information addressing the condition of acceptable carpet as
required in subsection (7)(a) of this section. The product stewardship
program must provide the templates and materials free of charge.
(5) The carpet stewardship organization may offer incentives or
payments to collectors if necessary to ensure the carpet stewardship
program requirements are met, as described in subsection (4) of this
section.
(6) Carpet stewardship organizations shall implement programs
beginning:
(a) January 1, 2015, for the counties of King, Pierce, Snohomish,
and Thurston;
(b) January 1, 2018, for the counties of Kitsap, Whatcom, Skagit,
Island, San Juan, Clallam, Jefferson, Mason, Grays Harbor, Lewis,
Cowlitz, and Clark;
(c) January 1, 2019, for the counties of Chelan, Kittitas, Benton,
Franklin, Walla Walla, Yakima, Grant, Douglas, Adams, Lincoln, and
Spokane; and
(d) January 1, 2020, for the counties of Asotin, Columbia, Ferry,
Garfield, Klickitat, Pacific, Pend Oreille, Skamania, Stevens,
Wahkiakum, and Whitman in the cities where a carpet retailer is
located, with a minimum of one collection site open to the public per
county.
(7) The program must:
(a) Accept all carpet that is source separated, dry, free of paint,
mold, mildew, asbestos, construction or demolition debris, and other
hazardous materials or chemicals that render the carpet unrecyclable;
and
(b) Ensure that carpet collected meeting the standards in (a) of
this subsection is processed for recycling or reuse and a minimum of
sixty percent of the processed carpet material by weight is recycled or
reused.
(8) The carpet stewardship organization administering a product
stewardship program shall notify the department within thirty days
after instituting a change that affects any part of requirements in
subsection (4) of this section to an approved product stewardship
program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The department or its designee may inspect
or review audits of carpet stewardship organizations and of carpet
processing and recycling facilities used to fulfill the requirements of
a product stewardship program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 (1) Within sixty days after receiving a
product stewardship program plan for approval, the department shall
review the program, determine whether the program complies with the
requirements of this chapter, and notify the carpet stewardship
organization of its decision to approve or not approve the program.
(2) A product stewardship program may not be approved if the
department determines that the program will have the effect of reducing
the level of recycling of discarded carpet that has been achieved since
the effective date of this section or if the product stewardship
program does not meet program elements as required in section 3 of this
act.
(3) The department shall describe the reasons for its decision to
not approve a product stewardship program in the notice to a carpet
stewardship organization. The carpet stewardship organization shall
revise and resubmit the product stewardship program within sixty days
after receiving notice that the program was not approved. The
department shall review and approve or not approve the revised product
stewardship program within sixty days after receipt.
(4) On and after January 1, 2015, a product stewardship program not
approved by the department is not in compliance with this chapter. The
department must list any producer relying on such a product stewardship
program as noncompliant with the requirements of this chapter.
(5) The department must make all approved product stewardship
programs and annual reports available for public review on the
department's web site and at the department's headquarters. By January
1, 2015, and no later than January 1st annually thereafter, the
department shall post a notice on its web site listing producers that
are and are not in compliance with this chapter.
(6) The decision of the department to approve or to not approve a
product stewardship program under this section is appealable to the
pollution control hearings board as provided in RCW 43.21B.130.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) Beginning January 31, 2016, and each
year thereafter, a carpet stewardship organization must submit to the
department an annual report describing its activities during the
preceding calendar year to achieve the purposes of this chapter.
(2) The report must demonstrate that the carpet stewardship
organization's product stewardship program has met the performance
goals of the program including achieving continuous meaningful
improvement in the rate of recycling discarded carpet subject to the
program. Further, the report must include all of the following:
(a) A description of how the product stewardship program has
implemented all of its required elements, including collecting,
transporting, processing, and recycling activities and how the program
has been implemented throughout the state as required in section 3(6)
of this act;
(b) The amount of carpet sold in the state, by square yards and
weight in pounds, for residential and commercial carpet and provide an
overall total, during the reporting period. Sales data may be prorated
by population from national or state data;
(c) The names and locations of carpet collectors used by the
product stewardship program during the reporting period;
(d) The amount of discarded carpet recycled and reused, by weight
in pounds, during the reporting period;
(e) The names and locations of carpet processing and recycling
facilities used by the product stewardship program and recycled and
reused end uses of collected carpet by weight, during the reporting
period;
(f) The amount of discarded carpet collected but not recycled or
reused, by weight, and its ultimate disposition;
(g) The total cost of implementing the product stewardship program
and an evaluation of the financing system;
(h) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the product stewardship
program, and anticipated steps, if needed, to improve performance
throughout the state;
(i) Examples of educational materials that were provided to
consumers, commercial building owners, carpet installation contractors,
and retailers during the reporting period and a summary of outreach
efforts, including timeline and frequency; and
(j) A summary of public comments received regarding the product
stewardship program and response to those comments.
(3) Proprietary information submitted to the department under this
chapter is exempt from public disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 (1) Beginning March 1, 2013, a producer that
offers carpet for sale in the state, but is not participating in a
carpet stewardship organization, is not in compliance with this
chapter.
(2) No producer may sell or offer for sale carpet in or into the
state unless the producer of the carpet is participating in an approved
product stewardship program. The department shall send a written
warning and a copy of this chapter and any rules adopted to implement
this chapter to a producer that is not participating in an approved
program. The written warning must inform the producer that it must
participate in an approved program within thirty days of the notice.
(3) A producer that is not listed on the department's internet web
site as required in section 5(5) of this act, but demonstrates to the
satisfaction of the department that the producer is in compliance with
this chapter before the next notice is required to be posted, may
request a certification letter from the department stating that the
producer is in compliance with this chapter. The letter constitutes
proof of compliance with this chapter.
(4) No one may distribute or sell carpet in or into the state from
producers who are not in compliance with this chapter. Wholesalers,
distributors, and retailers in the state who have: (a) Possession of
carpet on the date that restrictions on the sale of carpet become
effective may exhaust their existing stock through sales; and (b)
specified and bid for a project prior to the effective date of this
section or prior to the date a producer has been determined to be out
of compliance may complete the specified project.
(5) The department shall serve, or send with delivery confirmation,
a written warning explaining the violation to any person known to be
distributing or selling carpet in or into the state from producers who
are not participating in a product stewardship program or who are not
in compliance with this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 (1) A carpet stewardship organization that
incurs costs in excess of five thousand dollars in collecting,
handling, recycling, or properly disposing of carpet manufactured by a
producer that (a) is required by section 3 of this act to operate or
participate in a carpet stewardship organization and did not at the
time the carpet was collected, and was not covered by the participation
by another manufacturer in a stewardship program and (b) can reasonably
be identified from a brand or marking on the carpet or by other
information, may bring a civil action or actions to recover costs,
damages, and fees specified in subsection (2) of this section, and if
successful shall be awarded these amounts.
(2) In an action brought pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, the plaintiff carpet stewardship organization shall recover
from the defendant carpet manufacturer the costs the plaintiff incurred
in collecting, handling, recycling, or properly disposing of carpet
reasonably identified as having originated from the defendant carpet
manufacturer, plus an amount of damages equal to no less than three
times those costs, plus the plaintiff's attorneys' fees and costs of
litigation.
(3) An action to recover the costs specified in this section may be
brought in any court in the state, without regard to the amount in
dispute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 (1) Beginning February 1, 2014, and annually
thereafter, the department shall establish an annual fee for each
carpet stewardship organization sufficient to cover only the
department's costs of administering and enforcing carpet stewardship
programs under this chapter. The total amount of annual fees collected
must not exceed the amount necessary to recover costs incurred by the
department in connection with the administration and oversight of the
requirements of this chapter. Any unspent money from the previous year
must be retained in the carpet product stewardship account created in
section 12 of this act and applied to reduce the payments by carpet
stewardship organizations in the following year. The department shall
establish a fee based on market share data provided by carpet
stewardship organizations as required in section 3(2)(b) of this act.
(2) The department must estimate the annual fee for the period of
July 1st through June 30th and notify the carpet stewardship
organizations by March 1st of each year. The department must collect
the annual fee from the carpet stewardship organizations by June 30th.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Any person acquiring a producer, or who has
acquired a producer, has all responsibility for the acquired producer's
carpet, including carpet manufactured prior to July 1, 2012, unless
that responsibility remains with another entity under the purchase
agreement. The acquiring producer must provide the department a letter
from the entity that accepts responsibility for the carpet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11 Nothing in this chapter changes or limits
the authority of the Washington utilities and transportation commission
to regulate collection of solid waste, including curbside collection of
residential recyclable materials, nor does this chapter change or limit
the authority of a city or town to provide such service itself or by
contract under RCW 81.77.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12 The carpet product stewardship account is
created in the state treasury. All receipts received by the department
from carpet stewardship organizations must be deposited in the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used by the department only for
administering this chapter. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation.

Sec. 13 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 7 and 2010 c 84 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the parks and recreation
commission:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, section 5 of this act, 70.105.095,
86.16.020, 88.46.070, 90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) A final decision by the department or director made under
chapter 183, Laws of 2009.
(d) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(f) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(g) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(h) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(i) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(j) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(k) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(l) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(m) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(n) Decisions of a state agency that is an authorized public entity
under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of a
vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are
reviewable under RCW 79.100.120.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec. 14 RCW 43.21B.110 and 2010 c 210 s 8 and 2010 c 84 s 3 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and
decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the
director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control
boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW,
local health departments, the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the parks and recreation
commission:
(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431,
70.105.080, 70.107.050, 76.09.170, 77.55.291, 78.44.250, 88.46.090,
90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.
(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060,
43.27A.190, 70.94.211, 70.94.332, section 5 of this act, 70.105.095,
86.16.020, 88.46.070, 90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, and 90.56.330.
(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance,
modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by
the department or any air authority in the exercise of its
jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal
permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the
modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit,
or a decision to approve or deny an application for a solid waste
permit exemption under RCW 70.95.300.
(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the grant or
denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70.95 RCW.
(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance
and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW
70.95J.080.
(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer
or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820, and decisions of the
department regarding waste-derived soil amendments under RCW 70.95.205.
(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial
of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management
plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient
management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a
particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and
approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026.
(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which
pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under
chapter 34.05 RCW.
(i) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable
under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources'
appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).
(j) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of
public lands under RCW 76.06.180.
(k) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue,
deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under
chapter 77.55 RCW.
(l) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are
reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.
(m) Decisions of a state agency that is an authorized public entity
under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of a
vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are
reviewable under RCW 79.100.120.
(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings
board:
(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines
hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW.
(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70.94.332,
70.94.390, 70.94.395, 70.94.400, 70.94.405, 70.94.410, and 90.44.180.
(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and
90.44.220.
(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or
repeal rules.
(((e) Appeals of decisions by the department as provided in chapter
43.21L RCW.))
(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board
shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 By December 1, 2017, the department shall
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature concerning the
status of adoption and implementation of carpet stewardship programs
and recommendations for revisions to improve the rate of carpet
recycling and other goals of this chapter.

Sec. 16 RCW 42.56.270 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 15 are each
amended to read as follows:
The following financial, commercial, and proprietary information is
exempt from disclosure under this chapter:
(1) Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or
object code, and research data obtained by any agency within five years
of the request for disclosure when disclosure would produce private
gain and public loss;
(2) Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, or corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or
proposal for (a) a ferry system construction or repair contract as
required by RCW 47.60.680 through 47.60.750 or (b) highway construction
or improvement as required by RCW 47.28.070;
(3) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
private persons pertaining to export services provided under chapters
43.163 and 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects
under RCW 43.23.035;
(4) Financial and commercial information and records supplied by
businesses or individuals during application for loans or program
services provided by chapters 43.325, 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and
43.168 RCW, or during application for economic development loans or
program services provided by any local agency;
(5) Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and
any information produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a
business and industrial development corporation organized or seeking
certification under chapter 31.24 RCW;
(6) Financial and commercial information supplied to the state
investment board by any person when the information relates to the
investment of public trust or retirement funds and when disclosure
would result in loss to such funds or in private loss to the providers
of this information;
(7) Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120;
(8) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington
center in applications for, or delivery of, program services under
chapter 70.95H RCW;
(9) Financial and commercial information requested by the public
stadium authority from any person or organization that leases or uses
the stadium and exhibition center as defined in RCW 36.102.010;
(10)(a) Financial information, including but not limited to account
numbers and values, and other identification numbers supplied by or on
behalf of a person, firm, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other entity related to an application for a horse
racing license submitted pursuant to RCW 67.16.260(1)(b), liquor
license, gambling license, or lottery retail license;
(b) Internal control documents, independent auditors' reports and
financial statements, and supporting documents: (i) Of house-banked
social card game licensees required by the gambling commission pursuant
to rules adopted under chapter 9.46 RCW; or (ii) submitted by tribes
with an approved tribal/state compact for class III gaming;
(11) Proprietary data, trade secrets, or other information that
relates to: (a) A vendor's unique methods of conducting business; (b)
data unique to the product or services of the vendor; or (c)
determining prices or rates to be charged for services, submitted by
any vendor to the department of social and health services for purposes
of the development, acquisition, or implementation of state purchased
health care as defined in RCW 41.05.011;
(12)(a) When supplied to and in the records of the department of
commerce:
(i) Financial and proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce pursuant to RCW
43.330.050(8); and
(ii) Financial or proprietary information collected from any person
and provided to the department of commerce or the office of the
governor in connection with the siting, recruitment, expansion,
retention, or relocation of that person's business and until a siting
decision is made, identifying information of any person supplying
information under this subsection and the locations being considered
for siting, relocation, or expansion of a business;
(b) When developed by the department of commerce based on
information as described in (a)(i) of this subsection, any work product
is not exempt from disclosure;
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "siting decision" means
the decision to acquire or not to acquire a site;
(d) If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to
the department of commerce from a person connected with siting,
recruitment, expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's
business, information described in (a)(ii) of this subsection will be
available to the public under this chapter;
(13) Financial and proprietary information submitted to or obtained
by the department of ecology or the authority created under chapter
70.95N RCW to implement chapter 70.95N RCW;
(14) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by the life sciences
discovery fund authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants
under chapter 43.350 RCW, to the extent that such information, if
revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to the
providers of this information;
(15) Financial and commercial information provided as evidence to
the department of licensing as required by RCW 19.112.110 or
19.112.120, except information disclosed in aggregate form that does
not permit the identification of information related to individual fuel
licensees;
(16) Any production records, mineral assessments, and trade secrets
submitted by a permit holder, mine operator, or landowner to the
department of natural resources under RCW 78.44.085;
(17)(a) Farm plans developed by conservation districts, unless
permission to release the farm plan is granted by the landowner or
operator who requested the plan, or the farm plan is used for the
application or issuance of a permit;
(b) Farm plans developed under chapter 90.48 RCW and not under the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq., are subject to
RCW 42.56.610 and 90.64.190;
(18) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by a health sciences and
services authority in applications for, or delivery of, grants under
RCW 35.104.010 through 35.104.060, to the extent that such information,
if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in private loss to
providers of this information;
(19) Information gathered under chapter 19.85 RCW or RCW 34.05.328
that can be identified to a particular business;
(20) Financial and commercial information submitted to or obtained
by the University of Washington, other than information the university
is required to disclose under RCW 28B.20.150, when the information
relates to investments in private funds, to the extent that such
information, if revealed, would reasonably be expected to result in
loss to the University of Washington consolidated endowment fund or to
result in private loss to the providers of this information; ((and))
(21) Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research
information and data submitted to or obtained by innovate Washington in
applications for, or delivery of, grants and loans under chapter 43.333
RCW, to the extent that such information, if revealed, would reasonably
be expected to result in private loss to the providers of this
information; and
(22) Proprietary data submitted to the department of ecology under
section 6(3) of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18 Section 13 of this act expires June 30,
2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19 Section 14 of this act takes effect June
30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20 Sections 1 through 12 and 15 of this act
constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---