BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW
to read as follows:
A health carrier offering group or individual health insurance
coverage may not discriminate with respect to participation under the
plan or coverage against any health care provider who is acting within
the scope of that provider's license or certification under applicable
state law. This section does not require that a health carrier
contract with any health care provider willing to abide by the terms
and conditions for participation established by the health carrier.
Nothing in this section may be construed as preventing a health carrier
from establishing varying reimbursement rates based on quality or
performance measures.

--- END ---