BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 INTENT. The legislature finds that more
low-achieving schools in the state are requesting assistance in
improving the academic outcomes of students than are being assisted
today.
The legislature finds that schools across the country are
experiencing greater improvements when coherent sets of strategies are
implemented together, rather than by implementing one individual
program change at a time.
The legislature finds that promising educator development programs
provide more school-based, residency, and mentor experiences for those
preparing for teaching and leading careers.
The legislature also finds that state institutions of higher
education are seeking ways to disseminate best practices.
Therefore, the legislature intends to create laboratory school
partnerships that bring together Washington's institutions of higher
education and low-achieving public schools to collaborate and implement
plans to accelerate student achievement and deepen the knowledge and
skills of educators. The synergy of the collaboration is expected to
advance educator preparation and student learning practices within both
the public school and higher education systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 DEFINITION. As used in this chapter, unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, "institution of higher
education" has the same definition as in RCW 28B.10.016.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 PROGRAM--CRITERIA--ELIGIBILITY. (1) The
laboratory school partnership program is created. Each four-year
institution of higher education may enter into an agreement with an
eligible public school to form a partnership for a laboratory school.
The purpose of the partnership is to create a laboratory school in
which promising innovations and best practices are used to improve
student achievement and the preparation of educators.
(2) A laboratory school partnership is created by an agreement
between a four-year institution of higher education and a school
district to collaborate to improve student success and educator success
outcomes by:
(a) Developing and conducting instructional programs and services
in an eligible partnership school; and
(b) Developing educator skills in certificate candidates through
public school-based alternative teacher and principal preparation
programs.
(3) A laboratory school is a school that satisfies the eligibility
requirements in subsection (4) of this section and is partner to an
agreement as described in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) A public school is eligible to become a laboratory school if
it:
(a) Has been identified as persistently low-achieving under RCW
28A.657.020; and
(b) Has not received other state, federal, or private funds
specifically for the purpose of implementing a school improvement plan.
(5) A four-year institution of higher education may work in
conjunction with a Washington independent institution of higher
education in the work of the laboratory school partnership, however,
the four-year institution of higher education is the lead institution
of higher education in any laboratory school partnership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 APPLICATION PROCESS. (1) Each four-year
institution of higher education may apply to form a laboratory school
partnership with one school district and its eligible school.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must
create a list of schools meeting, or that as of December 2011 met, the
criteria under RCW 28A.657.020, and the school districts in which those
schools are located. By July 1, 2012, the office of the superintendent
of public instruction must notify schools on the list and their school
districts of their eligibility to participate in a laboratory school
partnership. The office of the superintendent of public instruction
must immediately provide this list to the state board of education, the
professional educator standards board, and the office of financial
management.
(3) The professional educator standards board shall also send the
list of eligible schools, created under subsection (2) of this section,
to each four-year institution of higher education school of education.
(4)(a) The state board of education and the professional educator
standards board shall jointly develop an application of intent for an
eligible school and institution of higher education to form a
partnership to develop a laboratory school. The following elements
must be included in the application of intent:
(i) To design a laboratory school partnership plan to improve the
performance of the low-achieving school and to enhance the relevant
practical experience for students and faculty in teacher and principal
education programs and submit the plan to the professional educator
standards board and the state board of education;
(ii) To implement the laboratory school partnership plan after its
approval;
(iii) To disseminate lessons learned from the implementation of a
laboratory school including: Best practices for teacher and principal
preparation; data regarding student achievement; and school improvement
activities related to improved student achievement; and
(iv) To designate the entity that will serve as fiscal agent for
the laboratory school partnership.
(b)(i) The state board of education has approval authority for the
student achievement portion of the application of intent.
(ii) The professional educator standards board has approval
authority for the portions of application of intent related to educator
preparation.
(5) The application must be signed by the president of the
institution of higher education, the institution of higher education's
dean of the school of education, the superintendent of the school
district in which the public school is located, and the principal of
the eligible school.
(6) After the approval of the application of intent, the state
board of education and the professional educator standards board must
inform the office of financial management of those partnerships that
have approved applications of intent. As appropriated for this
purpose, the office of financial management must make available to each
laboratory school partnership financial resources for the development
of the laboratory school partnership plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 PLAN REQUIREMENTS. (1) The laboratory
school partnership plan must be developed in collaboration with the
institution of higher education's educator preparation program staff as
well as others as designated by the institution of higher education;
and staff and community members from the eligible school and school
district, including administrators, teachers, parents, unions
representing employees within the district, and students, as
appropriate. The school board and the institution of higher education
must jointly conduct at least one public hearing regarding the plan.
(2) The plan must include the following elements:
(a) An examination of the elements included in the school academic
performance audit under RCW 28A.657.040;
(b) Articulation of the goals and related outcomes for the
laboratory school related to significant student achievement gains and
educator preparation and development skills;
(c) A description of learning innovations and instructional best
practices to be implemented in the laboratory school that: (i) Affect
both educator preparation and school instructional and support services
provided to the school's students, and (ii) change current practices;
(d) A description of the roles, activities, and responsibilities of
the institution of higher education, the laboratory school, and
laboratory school's school district in carrying out the laboratory
school partnership plan;
(e) A description of the strategies the laboratory school will use
to engage families and communities;
(f) Identification of other entities involved in the laboratory
school and their roles and activities related to the implementation of
the laboratory school partnership plan;
(g) Identification of measures the laboratory school will use in
assessing:
(i) Student achievement, skill development, and other student
success indicators; and
(ii) Educator skill development;
(h) Identification of waivers to be requested from the state board
of education under RCW 28A.305.140 and from the superintendent of
public instruction under RCW 28A.655.180;
(i) Identification of any modifications to approved alternative
route programs or waivers to be requested of the professional educator
standards board related to alternative routes to teacher and principal
preparation;
(j) A proposed budget that uses the funding provided the laboratory
school partnership program and other resources available to the
laboratory school partnership;
(k) Identification and completion of any needed collective
bargaining procedures as specified in RCW 28A.657.050(3) and any
modifications to collective bargaining agreements at the institutions
of higher education;
(l) A statement providing that all contracts between a school
district and an employee, and contracts between an institution of
higher education and an employee, must allow the school district and
the institution of higher education to implement the approved
laboratory school partnership plan; and
(m) A timeline, with identified progress benchmarks, for
accomplishing the laboratory school partnership plan. The progress
benchmarks must address the planning year, the 2013-14 school year, and
the implementing years beginning with the 2014-15 school year and
concluding in the 2016-17 school year. Nothing prevents a laboratory
school partnership plan from beginning its implementation during the
2013-14 school year after approval of the plan as provided in section
6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 PLAN APPROVAL. (1) The laboratory school
partnership, with supporting documentation from the eligible school's
school district and the institution of higher education, shall jointly
submit the laboratory school partnership plan to the state board of
education and the professional educator standards board not later than
February 1, 2013.
(2) The professional educator standards board has the
responsibility to approve or to not approve the portions of the plan
related to educator preparation.
(3) The state board of education must accept for inclusion in the
plan the final decision of the superior court on any issue certified by
the executive director of the public employment relations commission
under the process in RCW 28A.657.050. The state board of education
shall approve a plan proposed by a laboratory school partnership only
if the plan meets the requirements of section 5 of this act and
provides sufficient remedies to improve student achievement. Any
addendum or modification to an existing collective bargaining agreement
negotiated under RCW 28A.657.050 or by agreement of the district and
the exclusive bargaining unit, related to student achievement or school
improvement, shall not go into effect until approval of the plan by the
state board of education.
(4) If the state board of education or the professional educator
standards board does not approve the laboratory school partnership
plan, it must notify the laboratory school partnership, the eligible
school's school district board, and the institution of higher
education, in writing with an explicit rationale for why the plan was
not approved.
(5) The laboratory school partnership may submit a new laboratory
school partnership plan to the state board of education and the
professional educator standards board for approval within forty days of
notification that its plan was rejected.
(6) After the approval of the laboratory school partnership plan,
the state board of education and the professional educator standards
board must inform the office of financial management of their approval
of the plan. The office of financial management must make available to
the laboratory school partnership the financial resources for the
implementation of the laboratory school partnership plan, within the
resources appropriated for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 WAIVERS. (1) Waivers for the implementation
of laboratory school partnership plans may be granted under RCW
28A.655.180 and 28A.305.140.
(2) Waivers may be initially granted for a time period not to
exceed the designation of the school as a laboratory school and may be
extended under the conditions specified in section 8 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 REVIEW AND ACCOUNTABILITY. (1) Laboratory
schools must provide the superintendent of public instruction the data
required for the superintendent of public instruction to comply with
any necessary reporting provisions of RCW 28A.657.100.
(2) The institution of higher education partner must provide data
requested by the professional educator standards board to enable the
board to evaluate the teacher preparation program in the laboratory
school and the extent to which the requirements of the plan are being
met.
(3) The professional educator standards board must conduct an
analysis of the laboratory school data and practices, and establish
strategies that assure longitudinal analysis of certificate candidate
outcomes during and beyond the project. The analysis may be performed
by an institution of higher education or another qualified entity
through a contract with the professional educator standards board.
(4) The laboratory school and the school district must provide data
requested by the state board of education and as outlined in the plan
approved under section 6 of this act.
(5)(a) Both the professional educator standards board and the state
board of education must summarize the laboratory school data obtained
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section and make any
recommendations in a manner that can be disseminated to the governor,
legislature, institutions of higher education, and school districts.
(b) A first report must be delivered no later than September 1,
2013, summarizing the laboratory school partnerships that have been
formed.
(c) Additional annual reports shall be submitted by September 1st
for each of the implementation years with a final report due September
1, 2017.
(6)(a) The state board of education and the professional educator
standards board shall develop a collaborative process to review data
collected under this section and reports prepared under this section
and consult with the laboratory schools regarding the data and reports,
any plan modifications, and any decisions regarding continuing plan
implementation.
(b) Recommendations from the state board of education and the
professional educator standards board may include a determination to
rescind the approval of a laboratory school partnership plan or to
significantly modify the laboratory school partnership plan based on a
lack of expected results as articulated in the plan. If the
recommendation is to rescind the laboratory school partnership plan,
the state board of education and the professional educator standards
board must work with the school and school district to provide a plan
to transition the laboratory school out of laboratory school status.
(7) The state board of education and the professional educator
standards board must notify a school when it completes its laboratory
school plan.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 CONTINUED OPERATION OF LABORATORY SCHOOLS.
Upon the successful completion of a laboratory school plan under this
chapter, a laboratory school may retain laboratory school status if the
school district and the institution of higher education develop and
agree to a revised plan for continual school and teacher preparation
program improvement beyond the completion of the plan supported by
grant funds. The plans must be updated and reapproved every five
years. The laboratory school must notify the state board of education,
the professional educator standards board, and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction of their continuing partnership.
As long as a school is a laboratory school, the school continues to be
eligible for waivers applicable to laboratory schools.

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.305.140 and 2011 c 260 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education may grant waivers to school
districts from the provisions of RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.220 on
the basis that such waiver or waivers are necessary to:
(a) Implement successfully a local plan to provide for all students
in the district an effective education system that is designed to
enhance the educational program for each student. The local plan may
include alternative ways to provide effective educational programs for
students who experience difficulty with the regular education program;
((or))
(b) Implement an innovation school or innovation zone designated
under RCW 28A.630.081; or
(c) Implement a laboratory school under section 2 of this act.
(2) The state board shall adopt criteria to evaluate the need for
the waiver or waivers.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.305.140 and 1990 c 33 s 267 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education may grant waivers to school
districts from the provisions of RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.220 on
the basis that such waiver or waivers are necessary to implement:
(a) Successfully a local plan to provide for all students in the
district an effective education system that is designed to enhance the
educational program for each student. The local plan may include
alternative ways to provide effective educational programs for students
who experience difficulty with the regular education program; or
(b) A laboratory school under section 2 of this act.
(2) The state board shall adopt criteria to evaluate the need for
the waiver or waivers.

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.655.180 and 2011 c 260 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education, where appropriate, or the
superintendent of public instruction, where appropriate, may grant
waivers to districts from the provisions of statutes or rules relating
to: The length of the school year; student-to-teacher ratios; and
other administrative rules that in the opinion of the state board of
education or the opinion of the superintendent of public instruction
may need to be waived in order for a district to implement a plan for
restructuring its educational program or the educational program of
individual schools within the district or to implement an innovation
school or innovation zone designated under RCW 28A.630.081 or to
implement a laboratory school under section 2 of this act.
(2) School districts may use the application process in RCW
28A.305.140 to apply for the waivers under this section.

Sec. 13 RCW 28A.655.180 and 2009 c 543 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The state board of education, where appropriate, or the
superintendent of public instruction, where appropriate, may grant
waivers to districts from the provisions of statutes or rules relating
to: The length of the school year; student-to-teacher ratios; and
other administrative rules that in the opinion of the state board of
education or the opinion of the superintendent of public instruction
may need to be waived in order for a district to implement a plan for
restructuring its educational program or the educational program of
individual schools within the district or to implement a laboratory
school under section 2 of this act.
(2) School districts may use the application process in RCW
28A.305.140 to apply for the waivers under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15 Sections 10 and 12 of this act expire June
30, 2019.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16 Sections 11 and 13 of this act take effect
June 30, 2019.

--- END ---