BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.65.065 and 1989 c 337 s 10 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Whenever a person's driving record, as maintained by the
department, brings him or her within the definition of an habitual
traffic offender, as defined in RCW 46.65.020, the department shall
forthwith notify the person of the revocation in writing by
((certified)) mail at his or her address of record as maintained by the
department. If the person is a nonresident of this state, notice shall
be sent to the person's last known address. Notices of revocation
shall inform the recipient thereof of his or her right to a formal
hearing and specify the steps which must be taken in order to obtain a
hearing. Within fifteen days after the notice has been given, the
person may, in writing, request a formal hearing. If such a request is
not made within the prescribed time the right to a hearing is waived.
A request for a hearing stays the effectiveness of the revocation.
(2) Upon receipt of a request for a hearing, the department shall
schedule a hearing in the county in which the person making the request
resides, and if (([the])) the person is a nonresident of this state,
the hearing shall be held in Thurston county. The department shall
give at least ten days notice of the hearing to the person.
(3) The scope of the hearings provided by this section is limited
to the issues of whether the certified transcripts or abstracts of the
convictions, as maintained by the department, show that the requisite
number of violations have been accumulated within the prescribed period
of time as set forth in RCW 46.65.020 and whether the terms and
conditions for granting stays, as provided in RCW 46.65.060, have been
met.
(4) Upon receipt of the hearing officer's decision, an aggrieved
party may appeal to the superior court of the county in which he or she
resides, or, in the case of a nonresident of this state, in the
superior court of Thurston county, for review of the revocation.
Notice of appeal must be filed within thirty days after receipt of the
hearing officer's decision or the right to appeal is waived. Review by
the court shall be de novo and without a jury.
(5) The filing of a notice of appeal does not stay the effective
date of the revocation.

--- END ---