BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the
transportation innovative partnerships act created under chapter 47.29
RCW has not met the needs and expectations of the public or private
sectors for the development of transportation projects. Therefore, it
is the intent of the legislature to remove from statute the project
development process created under chapter 47.29 RCW that was not
working and to continue to search for ways to bring innovative methods
of transportation project delivery and finance to Washington.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 47.29.010 (Finding--Intent) and 2006 c 334 s 48 & 2005 c
317 s 1;
(2) RCW 47.29.020 (Definitions) and 2005 c 317 s 2;
(3) RCW 47.29.030 (Transportation commission powers and duties) and
2005 c 317 s 3;
(4) RCW 47.29.040 (Purpose) and 2005 c 317 s 4;
(5) RCW 47.29.050 (Eligible projects) and 2005 c 317 s 5;
(6) RCW 47.29.060 (Eligible financing) and 2008 c 122 s 18 & 2005
c 317 s 6;
(7) RCW 47.29.070 (Use of federal funds and similar revenues) and
2005 c 317 s 7;
(8) RCW 47.29.080 (Other sources of funds or property) and 2005 c
317 s 8;
(9) RCW 47.29.090 (Project review, evaluation, and selection) and
2005 c 317 s 9;
(10) RCW 47.29.100 (Administrative fee) and 2005 c 317 s 10;
(11) RCW 47.29.110 (Funds for proposal evaluation and negotiation)
and 2005 c 317 s 11;
(12) RCW 47.29.120 (Expert consultation) and 2005 c 317 s 12;
(13) RCW 47.29.130 (Contracted studies) and 2005 c 317 s 13;
(14) RCW 47.29.140 (Partnership agreements) and 2005 c 317 s 14;
(15) RCW 47.29.150 (Public involvement and participation) and 2005
c 317 s 15;
(16) RCW 47.29.160 (Approval and execution) and 2005 c 317 s 16;
(17) RCW 47.29.170 (Unsolicited proposals) and 2011 c 367 s 701,
2009 c 470 s 702, 2007 c 518 s 702, 2006 c 370 s 604, & 2005 c 317 s
17;
(18) RCW 47.29.180 (Advisory committees) and 2005 c 317 s 18;
(19) RCW 47.29.190 (Confidentiality) and 2005 c 317 s 19;
(20) RCW 47.29.200 (Prevailing wages) and 2005 c 317 s 20;
(21) RCW 47.29.210 (Government agreements) and 2005 c 317 s 21;
(22) RCW 47.29.220 (Eminent domain) and 2005 c 317 s 22;
(23) RCW 47.29.230 (Transportation innovative partnership account)
and 2005 c 317 s 23;
(24) RCW 47.29.240 (Use of account) and 2005 c 317 s 24;
(25) RCW 47.29.250 (Issuing bonds and other obligations) and 2005
c 317 s 25;
(26) RCW 47.29.260 (Study and report) and 2005 c 317 s 26;
(27) RCW 47.29.270 (Federal laws) and 2005 c 317 s 27;
(28) RCW 47.29.280 (Expert review panel on proposed project
agreements -- Creation -- Authority) and 2006 c 334 s 49;
(29) RCW 47.29.290 (Expert review panel on proposed project
agreements -- Execution of agreements) and 2006 c 334 s 50; and
(30) RCW 47.29.900 (Captions not law) and 2005 c 317 s 28.

Sec. 3 RCW 47.56.030 and 2008 c 122 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as permitted under chapter ((47.29 or)) 47.46 RCW:
(a) Unless otherwise delegated, and subject to RCW 47.56.820, the
department of transportation shall have full charge of the planning,
analysis, and construction of all toll bridges and other toll
facilities including the Washington state ferries, and the operation
and maintenance thereof.
(b) The transportation commission shall determine and establish the
tolls and charges thereon.
(c) Unless otherwise delegated, and subject to RCW 47.56.820, the
department shall have full charge of planning, analysis, and design of
all toll facilities. The department may conduct the planning,
analysis, and design of toll facilities as necessary to support the
legislature's consideration of toll authorization.
(d) The department shall utilize and administer toll collection
systems that are simple, unified, and interoperable. To the extent
practicable, the department shall avoid the use of toll booths. The
department shall set the statewide standards and protocols for all toll
facilities within the state, including those authorized by local
authorities.
(e) Except as provided in this section, the department shall
proceed with the construction of such toll bridges and other facilities
and the approaches thereto by contract in the manner of state highway
construction immediately upon there being made available funds for such
work and shall prosecute such work to completion as rapidly as
practicable. The department is authorized to negotiate contracts for
any amount without bid under (e)(i) and (ii) of this subsection:
(i) Emergency contracts, in order to make repairs to ferries or
ferry terminal facilities or removal of such facilities whenever
continued use of ferries or ferry terminal facilities constitutes a
real or immediate danger to the traveling public or precludes prudent
use of such ferries or facilities; and
(ii) Single source contracts for vessel dry dockings, when there is
clearly and legitimately only one available bidder to conduct dry dock-related work for a specific class or classes of vessels. The contracts
may be entered into for a single vessel dry docking or for multiple
vessel dry dockings for a period not to exceed two years.
(2) The department shall proceed with the procurement of materials,
supplies, services, and equipment needed for the support, maintenance,
and use of a ferry, ferry terminal, or other facility operated by
Washington state ferries, in accordance with chapter 43.19 RCW except
as follows:
(a) When the secretary of the department of transportation
determines in writing that the use of invitation for bid is either not
practicable or not advantageous to the state and it may be necessary to
make competitive evaluations, including technical or performance
evaluations among acceptable proposals to complete the contract award,
a contract may be entered into by use of a competitive sealed proposals
method, and a formal request for proposals solicitation. Such formal
request for proposals solicitation shall include a functional
description of the needs and requirements of the state and the
significant factors.
(b) When purchases are made through a formal request for proposals
solicitation the contract shall be awarded to the responsible proposer
whose competitive sealed proposal is determined in writing to be the
most advantageous to the state taking into consideration price and
other evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals. No
significant factors may be used in evaluating a proposal that are not
specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may be considered
in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price;
maintainability; reliability; commonality; performance levels; life
cycle cost if applicable under this section; cost of transportation or
delivery; delivery schedule offered; installation cost; cost of spare
parts; availability of parts and service offered; and the following:
(i) The ability, capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the
contract or provide the service required;
(ii) The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience,
and efficiency of the proposer;
(iii) Whether the proposer can perform the contract within the time
specified;
(iv) The quality of performance of previous contracts or services;
(v) The previous and existing compliance by the proposer with laws
relating to the contract or services;
(vi) Objective, measurable criteria defined in the request for
proposal. These criteria may include but are not limited to items such
as discounts, delivery costs, maintenance services costs, installation
costs, and transportation costs; and
(vii) Such other information as may be secured having a bearing on
the decision to award the contract.
(c) When purchases are made through a request for proposal process,
proposals received shall be evaluated based on the evaluation factors
set forth in the request for proposal. When issuing a request for
proposal for the procurement of propulsion equipment or systems that
include an engine, the request for proposal must specify the use of a
life cycle cost analysis that includes an evaluation of fuel
efficiency. When a life cycle cost analysis is used, the life cycle
cost of a proposal shall be given at least the same relative importance
as the initial price element specified in the request of proposal
documents. The department may reject any and all proposals received.
If the proposals are not rejected, the award shall be made to the
proposer whose proposal is most advantageous to the department,
considering price and the other evaluation factors set forth in the
request for proposal.

Sec. 4 RCW 47.56.031 and 2005 c 335 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
No tolls may be imposed on new or existing highways or bridges
without specific legislative authorization, or upon a majority vote of
the people within the boundaries of the unit of government empowered to
impose tolls. ((This section applies to chapter 47.56 RCW and to any
tolls authorized under chapter 47.29 RCW, the transportation innovative
partnership act of 2005.))

Sec. 5 RCW 70.94.528 and 2006 c 329 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) A county, city, or town may, as part of its commute trip
reduction plan, designate existing activity centers listed in its
comprehensive plan or new activity centers as growth and transportation
efficiency centers and establish a transportation demand management
program in the designated area.
(a) The transportation demand management program for the growth and
transportation efficiency center shall be developed in consultation
with local transit agencies, the applicable regional transportation
planning organization, major employers, and other interested parties.
(b) In order to be eligible for state funding provided for the
purposes of this section, designated growth and transportation
efficiency centers shall be certified by the applicable regional
transportation organization to: (i) Meet the minimum land use and
transportation criteria established in collaboration among local
jurisdictions, transit agencies, the regional transportation planning
organization, and other interested parties as part of the regional
commute trip reduction plan; and (ii) have established a transportation
demand management program that includes the elements identified in (c)
of this subsection and is consistent with the rules established by the
department of transportation in RCW 70.94.537(2). If a designated
growth and transportation efficiency center is denied certification,
the local jurisdiction may appeal the decision to the commute trip
reduction board.
(c) Transportation demand management programs for growth and
transportation efficiency centers shall include, but are not limited
to: (i) Goals for reductions in the proportion of single-occupant
vehicle trips that are more aggressive than the state program goal
established by the commute trip reduction board; (ii) a sustainable
financial plan demonstrating how the program can be implemented to meet
state and regional trip reduction goals, indicating resources from
public and private sources that are reasonably expected to be made
available to carry out the plan, and recommending any innovative
financing techniques ((consistent with chapter 47.29 RCW)), including
public/private partnerships, to finance needed facilities, services,
and programs; (iii) a proposed organizational structure for
implementing the program; (iv) a proposal to measure performance toward
the goal and implementation progress; and (v) an evaluation to which
local land use and transportation policies apply, including parking
policies and ordinances, to determine the extent that they complement
and support the trip reduction investments of major employers. Each of
these program elements shall be consistent with the rules established
under RCW 70.94.537.
(d) A designated growth and transportation efficiency center shall
be consistent with the land use and transportation elements of the
local comprehensive plan.
(e) Transit agencies, local governments, and regional
transportation planning organizations shall identify certified growth
and transportation efficiency centers as priority areas for new service
and facility investments in their respective investment plans.
(2) A county, city, or town that has established a growth and
transportation efficiency center program shall support vehicle trip
reduction activities in the designated area. The implementing
jurisdiction shall adopt policies, ordinances, and funding strategies
that will lead to attainment of program goals in those areas.

--- END ---