BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 38.16.015 and 1989 c 19 s 30 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The period of enlistment in the Washington state guard shall be
set by regulation by the adjutant general((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, no original enlistment may be consummated unless the term
thereof can be completed before the applicant attains the age of sixty-four.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the adjutant
general may extend the service age upon request by an active member of
the Washington state guard if the member proves satisfactory completion
of physical and mental requirements and the member lives in an area
where there is a specific military need for the state guard services.
Extensions under this subsection have a one-year duration and may be
renewed.

--- END ---