BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 80.50.060 and 2007 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction of
energy facilities which includes the new construction of energy
facilities and the reconstruction or enlargement of existing energy
facilities where the net increase in physical capacity or dimensions
resulting from such reconstruction or enlargement meets or exceeds
those capacities or dimensions set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (((7))) (12)
and (((15))) (21). No construction of such energy facilities may be
undertaken, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, after July
15, 1977, without first obtaining certification in the manner provided
in this chapter.
(2) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction,
reconstruction, or enlargement of a new or existing energy facility
that exclusively uses alternative energy resources and chooses to
receive certification under this chapter, regardless of the generating
capacity of the project.
(3)(a) The provisions of this chapter apply to the construction,
reconstruction, or modification of electrical transmission facilities
when:
(i) The facilities are located in a national interest electric
transmission corridor as specified in RCW 80.50.045; or
(ii) An applicant chooses to receive certification under this
chapter, and the facilities are((: (A))) of a nominal voltage of at
least one hundred fifteen thousand volts ((and are located in a
completely new corridor, except for the terminus of the new facility or
interconnection of the new facility with the existing grid, and the
corridor is not otherwise used for electrical transmission facilities;
and (B) located in more than one jurisdiction that has promulgated land
use plans or zoning ordinances; or
(iii) An applicant chooses to receive certification under this
chapter, and the facilities are: (A) Of a nominal voltage in excess of
one hundred fifteen thousand volts; and (B) located outside an
electrical transmission corridor identified in (a)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection (3))).
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "modify" means a
significant change to an electrical transmission facility and does not
include the following: (i) Minor improvements such as the replacement
of existing transmission line facilities or supporting structures with
equivalent facilities or structures; (ii) the relocation of existing
electrical transmission line facilities; (iii) the conversion of
existing overhead lines to underground; or (iv) the placing of new or
additional conductors, supporting structures, insulators, or their
accessories on or replacement of supporting structures already built.
(4) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to normal
maintenance and repairs which do not increase the capacity or
dimensions beyond those set forth in RCW 80.50.020 (((7))) (12) and
(((15))) (21).
(5) Applications for certification of energy facilities made prior
to July 15, 1977, shall continue to be governed by the applicable
provisions of law in effect on the day immediately preceding July 15,
1977, with the exceptions of RCW 80.50.190 and 80.50.071 which shall
apply to such prior applications and to site certifications
prospectively from July 15, 1977.
(6) Applications for certification shall be upon forms prescribed
by the council and shall be supported by such information and technical
studies as the council may require.

--- END ---