BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) In any instance where a state agency requires that a business
submit a document, form, or payment of a fee in paper format, the state
agency must provide the business an option to submit such requirement
electronically.
(2) A business may authorize a second party to meet the
requirements imposed by a state agency under subsection (1) of this
section on its behalf.
(3) The director of a state agency or the director's designee may
exempt a document, form, or payment of a fee from the requirements of
this section if:
(a)(i) There is a legal requirement for such materials to be
submitted in paper format; or
(ii) It is not feasible for such materials to be submitted
electronically; and
(b) Within existing resources, the director or the director's
designee establishes and maintains a process to notify the public
regarding such exemptions.

--- END ---