BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.41A RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The chief information officer must establish an integrated
enterprise system using a single portal, accessible through the
internet, to:
(a) Allow access to state government records;
(b) Permit the electronic filing of all documents required by a
state agency;
(c) Permit the payment of all taxes and fees;
(d) Provide information, services, and resources for:
(i) Starting, expanding, and operating a business in Washington or
relocating a business within or to Washington;
(ii) Understanding state and local government rules, ordinances,
and policies that apply to business;
(iii) Registering, licensing, and obtaining needed permits for a
business;
(iv) Obtaining information about and assistance with exporting,
public contracting, hiring, and training; and
(v) Obtaining information about financing and tax credits available
to businesses; and
(e) Enable convenient access to information from all agencies of
state government that have functions related to business registration,
licensing, permitting, or taxation or that otherwise can provide
information for or assist with establishing, expanding, operating, or
relocating a business.
(2) The chief information officer must consider the potential for:
(a) Private sector involvement in establishing and providing access
to the portal; and
(b) Lowering costs through private sector delivery of the portal
and attendant services.
(3) The single portal for Washington businesses must be implemented
by January 1, 2013.

--- END ---