BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that the state of
Washington's procurement policies should replicate the state of
Washington's and the United States' goal to accelerate economic growth
through local job creation. It is therefore the intent of the
legislature to encourage all state agencies to aid and promote the
economy of the state of Washington and the United States by requiring
a process to be established that increases the procurement of iron,
steel, and manufactured goods produced in the United States in all
public works and procurement contracts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
For the purposes of this section, section 3 of this act, RCW
43.19.1905, and section 5 of this act:
(1) "Agency" means any state office or activity of the executive
and judicial branches of state government, including the state
agencies, departments, offices, divisions, boards, commissions,
institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, and
correctional and other types of institutions.
(2) "Bid" means an offer, proposal, or quote for goods or services
in response to a solicitation issued for such goods or services by an
agency of Washington state.
(3) "Bidder" means an individual or entity who submits a bid,
quotation, or proposal in response to a solicitation issued for such
goods or services by an agency of Washington state.
(4) "Board" means the capital projects advisory review board
created in RCW 39.10.220.
(5) "Made in America" means:
(a) In the case of an iron or steel product, such product is deemed
to be made in America if all manufacturing has taken place in the
United States, except metallurgical processes involving the refinement
of steel additives; and
(b) In the case of a manufactured good, such good is deemed to be
made in America if:
(i) All of the manufacturing processes for the good take place in
the United States; and
(ii) All of the components of the good are of United States origin.
A component will be considered a good of United States origin if all of
the manufacturing processes of the component have taken place in the
United States, regardless of the origin of its subcomponents.
(6) "Public works" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
39.04.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW
to read as follows:
(1)(a) In determining "lowest responsible bidder," in addition to
price, an agency must consider whether the iron, steel, and
manufactured goods to be used or supplied in the performance of the
public works project contract or any subcontract thereto have been made
in America.
(b) An agency shall give a preference to a bidder that includes
additional information in their bid that verifies the use of products
made in America to fulfill the obligations of the public works project
contract.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if the director
of the agency or the director's designee finds that:
(a) After consultation with the governor's advisor for trade
policy, the application of subsection (1) of this section would be in
violation of an international trade agreement in which the United
States is a signatory country and the state of Washington is subject to
the terms of such agreement;
(b) The application of subsection (1) of this section would be
inconsistent with the public interest;
(c) Such materials and products as required by subsection (1) of
this section are not produced in the United States in sufficient and
reasonably available quantities and of a satisfactory quality;
(d) Inclusion of such materials and products as required by
subsection (1) of this section will increase the cost of the overall
project contract by more than: (i) Five percent on projects valued
under one million dollars; (ii) the greater of fifty thousand dollars
or two and one-half percent for projects valued between one million and
five million dollars; or (iii) the greater of one hundred twenty-five
thousand dollars or one percent for projects valued over five million
dollars; or
(e) An emergency necessitates the immediate execution of such
public works project.
(3) If the director of the agency or the director's designee
determines it is necessary to waive the application of subsection (1)
of this section based on a finding under subsection (2) of this
section, the director of the agency or director's designee shall,
before the date on which such finding takes effect:
(a) Publish a notice detailing the reason for the waiver at least
once in a legal newspaper of general circulation published in or as
near as possible to that part of the county in which such work is to be
done;
(b) Provide notice of such finding and an opportunity for public
comment on such finding for a period not to exceed fifteen days; and
(c) Consider all comments received during the comment period in
evaluating the waiver request.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (3) of this
section, when an emergency necessitates the immediate execution of a
public works project, the director of the agency or the director's
designee shall make public a description and estimate of the public
work within seven days after the commencement of the work.
(5) If a court or federal or state agency determines that any
person intentionally committed one of the following acts, such person
is ineligible to receive any contract or subcontract from a state
agency:
(a) Affixed a label bearing a made in America inscription or any
inscription with the same meaning to any material or product sold in or
shipped to the United States that was not manufactured in the United
States and that was in a project to which this section applies; or
(b) Represented that any material or product sold in or shipped to
the United States that was not made in America and that was used in a
project to which this section applies was made in America.
(6) The board shall develop suggested guidelines to assist agencies
in developing the made in America bid preference criteria. The
guidelines must be posted on the board's web site.

Sec. 4 RCW 43.19.1905 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 208 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The director of enterprise services shall establish overall
state policy for compliance by all state agencies, including
educational institutions, regarding the following purchasing and
material control functions:
(a) Development of a state commodity coding system;
(b) A standard notification form for state agencies to report cost-effective direct purchases, which shall at least identify the price of
the goods as available through the department, the price of the goods
as available from the alternative source, the total savings, and the
signature of the notifying agency's director or the director's
designee;
(c) Screening of supplies, material, and equipment excess to the
requirements of one agency for overall state need before sale as
surplus;
(d) Determining when centralized rather than decentralized
purchasing shall be used to obtain maximum benefit of volume buying of
identical or similar items, including procurement from federal supply
sources;
(e) Development of criteria for use of leased, rather than state
owned, warehouse space based on relative cost and accessibility;
(f) Determination of how transportation costs incurred by the state
for materials, supplies, services, and equipment can be reduced by
improved freight and traffic coordination and control;
(g) Establishment of a formal certification program for state
employees who are authorized to perform purchasing functions as agents
for the state under the provisions of this chapter ((43.19 RCW));
(h) Development of performance measures for the reduction of total
overall expense for material, supplies, equipment, and services used
each biennium by the state;
(i) Establishment of a standard system for all state organizations
to record and report dollar savings and cost avoidance which are
attributable to the establishment and implementation of improved
purchasing and material control procedures;
(j) Development of procedures for mutual and voluntary cooperation
between state agencies, including educational institutions, and
political subdivisions for exchange of purchasing and material control
services;
(k) Resolution of all other purchasing and material matters which
require the establishment of overall statewide policy for effective and
economical supply management;
(l) Development of guidelines and criteria for the purchase of
vehicles, high gas mileage vehicles, alternate vehicle fuels and
systems, equipment, and materials that reduce overall energy-related
costs and energy use by the state, including investigations into all
opportunities to aggregate the purchasing of clean technologies by
state and local governments, and including the requirement that new
passenger vehicles purchased by the state meet the minimum standards
for passenger automobile fuel economy established by the United States
secretary of transportation pursuant to the energy policy and
conservation act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 2002);
(m) Development of goals for state use of recycled or
environmentally preferable products through specifications for products
and services, processes for requests for proposals and requests for
qualifications, contractor selection, and contract negotiations;
(n) Development of procurement policies and procedures, such as
unbundled contracting and subcontracting, that encourage and facilitate
the purchase of products and services by state agencies and
institutions from Washington small businesses to the maximum extent
practicable and consistent with international trade agreement
commitments;
(o) Development of food procurement procedures and materials that
encourage and facilitate the purchase of Washington grown food by state
agencies and institutions to the maximum extent practicable and
consistent with international trade agreement commitments; ((and))
(p) Development of policies requiring all food contracts to include
a plan to maximize to the extent practicable and consistent with
international trade agreement commitments the availability of
Washington grown food purchased through the contract; and
(q) Development of procurement policies and procedures that
encourage, facilitate, and provide a preference for the purchase of
made in America products by state agencies and institutions to the
maximum extent practicable and consistent with international trade
agreement commitments.
(2) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section and RCW 43.19.1908.
(a) "Common vendor registration and bid notification system" has
the definition in RCW 39.29.006.
(b) "Small business" has the definition in RCW 39.29.006.
(c) "Washington grown" has the definition in RCW 15.64.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW
to read as follows:
If a court or federal or state agency determines that any person
intentionally committed one of the following acts, such person is
ineligible to receive any contract or subcontract from a state agency:
(1) Affixed a label bearing a made in America inscription or any
inscription with the same meaning to any material or product sold in or
shipped to the United States that was not manufactured in the United
States and that was in a contract or service to which this section
applies; or
(2) Represented that any material or product sold in or shipped to
the United States that was not made in America and that was used in a
contract or service to which this section applies was made in America.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---