BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 50.62.030 and 1995 c 135 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
Job service resources ((shall)) must be used to assist with the
reemployment of unemployed workers using the most efficient and
effective means of service delivery. The job service program of the
employment security department may undertake any program or activity
for which funds are available and which furthers the goals of this
chapter. These programs and activities ((shall)) include, but are not
limited to:
(1) Giving older unemployed workers and the long-term unemployed
the highest priority for all services made available under this
section. The employment security department ((shall)) must make the
services provided under this chapter available to the older unemployed
workers and the long-term unemployed as soon as they register under the
employment assistance program;
(2) Supplementing basic employment services, with special job
search and claimant placement assistance designed to assist
unemployment insurance claimants to obtain employment;
(3) Providing employment services, such as recruitment, screening,
and referral of qualified workers, to agricultural areas where these
services have in the past contributed to positive economic conditions
for the agricultural industry; ((and))
(4) Providing otherwise unobtainable information and analysis to
the legislature and program managers about issues related to employment
and unemployment; and
(5) Providing placement services with private employers for
individuals who have exhausted their unemployment benefits. For
calendar years 2012 and 2013, individuals placed with private employers
under this subsection are exempt from unemployment compensation
coverage under RCW 50.44.040(4) for the first six months after hiring
and the individuals must be so advised by the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements which are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state or the eligibility of
employers in this state for federal unemployment tax credits, the
conflicting part of this act is hereby declared to be inoperative
solely to the extent of the conflict, and such finding or determination
does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act. The rules
under this act must meet federal requirements that are a necessary
condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state or the granting
of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this state.

--- END ---