BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) The legislature finds that the public
interest is served when business is held accountable to the people
through oversight and transparency of rates charged for services in a
number of areas. Since statehood, there has been a requirement for the
review of rates charged to customers, beginning with the railroad
development. The review of rates continues today with the utility and
transportation commission review of rates and projected costs. The
focus on rate review and regulatory review of various business models
has shifted over the last century and adapted to emerging technologies,
such as the development of electric power and gas services, and the
development of telephones and public water systems.
(2) Similarly, health insurance carriers must file their rates for
review and assessment with the office of the insurance commissioner to
ensure rates charged for medical premiums are appropriate for the
expenses predicted. However, while the state requires transparency in
the insurance market, major service providers who drive rates are not
required to provide similar transparency. As the rate review and
regulation of emerging utility interests and business models have
shifted over time, the legislature finds that the review of rates
charged for medical expenses and business practices needs to evolve to
include other business models.
(3) Therefore, the legislature intends to create a health care cost
commission to provide oversight of health care facility rates, guide
payment reform, and ensure accountability and transparency for the
public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 For the purposes of this chapter, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, "commission" means the Washington
health care cost commission created in section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) There is hereby created and established
a state commission to be known and designated as the Washington health
care cost commission.
(2) The commission must be composed of three members, appointed by
the governor, with the consent of the senate. Not more than two
members of the commission may belong to the same political party.
(3) Each commissioner must be appointed and hold office for the
term of six years. The governor shall designate one of the
commissioners to be chair of the commission during the term of the
governor.
(4) Each commissioner must receive a salary as may be fixed by the
governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040.
(5) Any vacancy arising in the office of commissioner must be
filled by appointment by the governor, and, except for persons
appointed as pro tempore commissioners, an appointee selected to fill
a vacancy shall hold office for the balance of the full term for which
his or her predecessor on the commission was appointed.
(6) If a vacancy occurs while the senate is not in session, the
governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting of
the senate, when he or she shall present to the senate his or her
nomination or nominations for the office to be filled.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 Each commissioner shall, before entering
upon the duties of his or her office, take and subscribe the
constitutional oath of office. A commissioner or any person to be
appointed to the commission may not be employed by, or hold any
official relation to, any corporation or person that is subject in
whole or in part to regulation by the commission. The commissioner or
appointee may not own stocks or bonds of any such corporation or person
or become pecuniarily interested in the corporation. However, if a
commissioner becomes the owner of such stocks or bonds or becomes
pecuniarily interested in the corporation otherwise than voluntarily,
the commissioner shall within a reasonable time divest himself or
herself of ownership or interest, and failing to do so, the
commissioner may no longer serve on the commission and his or her
position becomes vacant.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 The commission shall appoint and employ an
executive director and other qualified staff as may be necessary to
carry out the work of the commission. The commission may delegate to
the executive director or other staff the authority to perform, in the
name of the commission, duties of the commission as it deems expedient.
Delegated powers and duties may be exercised in the name of the
commission. The commission by rule shall implement a process by which
notice must be provided of matters designated for delegation. Any such
matter must be heard or reviewed by commissioners at the request of any
commissioner or any affected person.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6 (1) When a commissioner has heard all or a
substantial part of an adjudicative proceeding and leaves office before
entry of a final order in the proceeding, at the request of the
remaining commissioners the commissioner leaving office may be
appointed by the governor as commissioner pro tempore to complete the
proceeding. A commissioner pro tempore must receive a reasonable
compensation to be fixed by the remaining members of the commission.
(2) A proceeding is completed when the commission enters a final
order purporting to resolve all contested issues therein, from which no
party seeks clarification or reconsideration, or upon entry of an order
on clarification or reconsideration, even though the order is subject
to a petition for judicial review.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 The Washington health care cost commission
shall:
(1) Exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed
by this chapter;
(2) Regulate in the public interest, as provided by the public
service laws, all health care facilities charging for services. For
the purposes of the commission, health care facilities includes but is
not limited to hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW and all
facilities owned by hospitals;
(3) Require, at a minimum, that the rates that are charged for
services must be filed with the commission for review of the components
that make up the rate to ensure the rates relate to the cost of
proposed services;
(4) Require information from each facility that allows appropriate
oversight of the rates charged, including information on any facility
mergers or affiliations, expansions of facilities or services, and
other areas the commission deems in the public interest;
(5) Develop methodologies to expedite the adoption of payment
reform efforts, including the capitation, pay for performance, bundled
payments, and alternative payment mechanisms that incentivize providers
to improve quality and efficiency;
(6) Consider the option to develop an all-payer billing system such
as that utilized in Maryland, that ensures the costs of care for the
population are equally distributed across payers including the public
medicaid and medicare programs;
(7) Determine the regulatory fees payable by all types of health
care facilities; and
(8) Make rules necessary to carry out its other powers and duties.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8 There is created in the state treasury a
health care cost public service revolving fund. Regulatory fees
payable by all types of health care facilities must be deposited to the
credit of the health care cost public service revolving fund. All
expenses of operation of the Washington health care cost commission
must be paid out of the health care cost public service revolving fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9 All proceedings of the commission and all
documents and records in its possession are public records, and it
shall adopt and use an official seal.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10 Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute
a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

--- END ---