BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 7.70.060 and 2007 c 259 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) If a patient while legally competent, or his or her
representative if he or she is not competent, signs a consent form
which sets forth the following, the signed consent form shall
constitute prima facie evidence that the patient gave his or her
informed consent to the treatment administered and the patient has the
burden of rebutting this by a preponderance of the evidence:
(a) A description, in language the patient could reasonably be
expected to understand, of:
(i) The nature and character of the proposed treatment;
(ii) The anticipated results of the proposed treatment;
(iii) The recognized possible alternative forms of treatment; and
(iv) The recognized serious possible risks, complications, and
anticipated benefits involved in the treatment and in the recognized
possible alternative forms of treatment, including nontreatment;
(b) Or as an alternative, a statement that the patient elects not
to be informed of the elements set forth in (a) of this subsection.
(2) If a patient while legally competent, or his or her
representative if he or she is not competent, signs an acknowledgment
of shared decision making as described in this section, such
acknowledgment shall constitute prima facie evidence that the patient
gave his or her informed consent to the treatment administered and the
patient has the burden of rebutting this by clear and convincing
evidence. An acknowledgment of shared decision making shall include:
(a) A statement that the patient, or his or her representative, and
the health care provider have engaged in shared decision making as an
alternative means of meeting the informed consent requirements set
forth by laws, accreditation standards, and other mandates;
(b) A brief description of the services that the patient and
provider jointly have agreed will be furnished;
(c) A brief description of the patient decision aid or aids that
have been used by the patient and provider to address the needs for (i)
high-quality, up-to-date information about the condition, including
risk and benefits of available options and, if appropriate, a
discussion of the limits of scientific knowledge about outcomes; (ii)
values clarification to help patients sort out their values and
preferences; and (iii) guidance or coaching in deliberation, designed
to improve the patient's involvement in the decision process;
(d) A statement that the patient or his or her representative
understands: The risk or seriousness of the disease or condition to be
prevented or treated; the available treatment alternatives, including
nontreatment; and the risks, benefits, and uncertainties of the
treatment alternatives, including nontreatment; and
(e) A statement certifying that the patient or his or her
representative has had the opportunity to ask the provider questions,
and to have any questions answered to the patient's satisfaction, and
indicating the patient's intent to receive the identified services.
(3) As used in this section, "shared decision making" means a
process in which the physician or other health care practitioner
discusses with the patient or his or her representative the information
specified in subsection (2) of this section with the use of a patient
decision aid and the patient shares with the provider such relevant
personal information as might make one treatment or side effect more or
less tolerable than others.
(4) As used in this section, "patient decision aid" means a
written, audio-visual, or online tool that provides a balanced
presentation of the condition and treatment options, benefits, and
harms, including, if appropriate, a discussion of the limits of
scientific knowledge about outcomes((,)) and:
(a) That is certified by one or more national certifying
organizations; or
(b) If no national certifying organization certifies a patient
decision aid, that:
(i) Meets the international patient decision aids standards; and
(ii) Is certified by the medical director of the health care
authority.
(5) Failure to use a form or to engage in shared decision making,
with or without the use of a patient decision aid, shall not be
admissible as evidence of failure to obtain informed consent. There
shall be no liability, civil or otherwise, resulting from a health care
provider choosing either the signed consent form set forth in
subsection (1)(a) of this section or the signed acknowledgment of
shared decision making as set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

--- END ---