BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.43.960 and 2003 c 405 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this subchapter.
(1) "Chief" means the chief of the Washington state patrol.
(2) "State fire marshal" means the director of fire protection in
the Washington state patrol.
(3) "Fire chief" includes the chief officer of a statutorily
authorized fire agency, or the fire chief's authorized representative.
Also included are the department of natural resources fire control
chief, and the department of natural resources regional managers.
(4) "Jurisdiction" means state, county, city, fire district,
regional fire protection authority, or port district ((firefighting))
units, or other units covered by this chapter.
(5) "Mobilization" means ((that firefighting)) all risk resources
regularly provided by fire departments, fire districts, and regional
fire protection authorities, beyond those available through existing
agreements will be requested and, when available, sent in response to
an emergency or disaster situation that has exceeded the capabilities
of available local resources. During a large scale emergency,
mobilization includes the redistribution of regional or statewide
((firefighting)) risk resources to either direct emergency incident
assignments or to assignment in communities where ((firefighting))
resources are needed.
When mobilization is declared and authorized as provided in this
chapter, all ((firefighting)) resources regularly provided by fire
departments, fire districts, and regional fire protection authorities
including those of the host fire protection authorities, i.e. incident
jurisdiction, shall be deemed as mobilized under this chapter,
including those that responded earlier under existing mutual aid or
other agreement. All nonhost fire protection authorities providing
((firefighting)) resources in response to a mobilization declaration
shall be eligible for expense reimbursement as provided by this chapter
from the time of the mobilization declaration.
This chapter shall not reduce or suspend the authority or
responsibility of the department of natural resources under chapter
76.04 RCW.
(6) "Mutual aid" means emergency interagency assistance provided
without compensation under an agreement between jurisdictions under
chapter 39.34 RCW.
(7) "All risk resources" means those resources regularly provided
by fire departments, fire districts, and regional fire protection
authorities required to respond to incidents such as, but not limited
to, wild land fires, earthquakes, floods, rescues, and contagious
diseases.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.43.961 and 2003 c 405 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Because of the possibility of the occurrence of disastrous
fires or other disasters of unprecedented size and destructiveness, the
need to insure that the state is adequately prepared to respond to such
a fire or disaster, the need to establish a mechanism and a procedure
to provide for reimbursement to state agencies and local
((firefighting)) agencies that respond to help others in time of need
or to a host fire district that experiences expenses beyond the
resources of the fire district, and generally to protect the public
peace, health, safety, lives, and property of the people of Washington,
it is hereby declared necessary to:
(((1))) (a) Provide the policy and organizational structure for
large scale mobilization of ((firefighting)) all risk resources in the
state through creation of the Washington state fire services
mobilization plan;
(((2))) (b) Confer upon the chief the powers provided herein;
(((3))) (c) Provide a means for reimbursement to state agencies and
local fire jurisdictions that incur expenses when mobilized by the
chief under the Washington state fire services mobilization plan; and
(((4))) (d) Provide for reimbursement of the host fire department
or fire protection district when it has: (((a))) (i) Exhausted all of
its resources; and (((b))) (ii) invoked its local mutual aid network
and exhausted those resources. Upon implementation of state fire
mobilization, the host district resources shall become state fire
mobilization resources consistent with the fire mobilization plan.
(2) Reimbursement is not authorized for activities described in
chapter 38.56 RCW.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that mutual aid and other
interlocal agreements providing for enhanced emergency response be
encouraged as essential to the public peace, safety, health, and
welfare, and for the protection of the lives and property of the people
of the state of Washington. If possible, mutual aid agreements should
be without stated limitations as to resources available, time, or area.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed or interpreted to limit the
eligibility of any nonhost fire protection authority for reimbursement
of expenses incurred in providing ((firefighting)) all risk resources
for mobilization.

--- END ---