BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a theater license to sell beer, including strong
beer, or wine, or both, at retail for consumption on theater premises.
The annual fee for such license shall be two hundred dollars for the
beer license, two hundred dollars for the wine license, or four hundred
dollars for a combination beer and wine license.
(2) If the theater premises are ever to be frequented by minors, a
minor control plan must be submitted to the board at the time of
application. The minor control plan must be approved by the board, and
be prominently posted on the premises, prior to minors being allowed.
The annual fee for review and approval of a minor control plan shall be
fifty dollars.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "minor control plan" means a
written, dated, and signed plan submitted to the board by an applicant
or licensee for the entire theater premises, or a room or area therein,
that shows where and when minors are permitted and the control measures
used to prevent minors from obtaining alcohol, prohibit minors when
drinking alcohol predominates, and minimize minors' exposure to a
drinking environment.
(4) The board shall adopt rules regarding minor control plans and
necessary control measures to prevent minors from obtaining alcohol,
prohibit minors when drinking alcohol predominates, and minimize
minors' exposure to a drinking environment.

--- END ---