BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 (1) Statewide organizations representing
local public health officials, counties, and cities must convene a work
group that includes four local health jurisdiction representatives, two
elected county representatives, two elected city representatives, and
the secretary of the department of health or his or her designee. The
work group must develop recommendations to the legislature on preferred
funding and service delivery methods that will ensure the presence of
a cost-effective, nimble, responsive, and sustainable public health
system throughout Washington. All necessary efforts must be made to
ensure that work group members represent the economic and geographic
diversity of Washington's local health jurisdictions, counties, and
cities.
(2) The work group shall submit its initial recommendations to the
appropriate legislative committees by January 1, 2013.
(3) This section expires June 30, 2013.

--- END ---