BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW
to read as follows:
The state auditor's office must:
(1) By September 30, 2013, complete a performance audit of a
representative sample of permit practices at the city and county level,
considering the recommendations of section 1, chapter 231, Laws of 2007
and such other factors as the state auditor deems appropriate, and
forward the audit to the public works board, the community economic
revitalization board, and the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature; and
(2) Beginning in 2015, biennially review the city, county, and
agency reports prepared under section 1, chapter 231, Laws of 2007 and
report any findings and recommendations based on its review to the
public works board, the community economic revitalization board, and
the appropriate standing committees of the legislature.

--- END ---