BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that approximately
fifty percent of students within three years of graduating from high
school are in need of remedial education when they enter institutions
of higher education and more than twenty million dollars in state funds
is spent each year to provide this remediation. The legislature
further finds that the greatest need for remediation occurs in
mathematics with just over half of these students requiring remediation
in this subject area.
In 2007, the state board for community and technical colleges
established a student achievement initiative to implement systemic
changes in practice by providing incentives through financial rewards
to colleges for increasing the levels of achievement attained by their
students. The student achievement initiative measures improvements in
building towards college-level skills; first-year retention; completing
college-level mathematics; and program completion. The legislature
finds that the student achievement initiative has proven to be
successful in improving college student outcomes. Therefore, the
legislature intends to implement a similar program within secondary
education that includes performance indicators specifically designed to
measure improvement beyond what is minimally required to graduate from
high school. The legislature further intends for this program to
improve outcomes in mathematics that result in a reduced need for
postsecondary remedial mathematics education and more students entering
careers and institutions of higher education ready to succeed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) By August 31, 2012, the superintendent of public instruction
shall, with assistance from the state board for community and technical
colleges and the institutions of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, create a math performance incentive program to reward
school districts that demonstrate improvement in student performance in
mathematics. The purpose of the math performance incentive program is
to reduce the need for postsecondary remedial education and its
associated costs by improving student mathematics performance in
secondary education.
(2) The math performance incentive program must include a scoring
system applied to performance indicators to be used to measure school
district improvement in student performance in mathematics from the
previous academic year with the intent of reducing the need for
postsecondary remedial education. Performance indicators must be
developed to measure student performance beyond what is minimally
required to successfully graduate from high school and must include,
but not be limited to:
(a) The percentage of students successfully completing algebra or
its equivalent with a C plus average grade or higher in or before the
ninth grade;
(b) The percentage of students successfully completing geometry
with a C plus average grade or higher in or before the tenth grade;
(c) The percentage of students far exceeding the standard on the
state of Washington's algebra end-of-course assessment;
(d) The percentage of students far exceeding the standard on the
state of Washington's geometry end-of-course assessment;
(e) The percentage of students scoring a three or higher on an AP
mathematics examination;
(f) The percentage of students scoring a five or higher on an
international baccalaureate mathematics examination;
(g) The percentage of students successfully completing algebra 2 or
its equivalent with a C plus average grade or higher;
(h) The percentage of students successfully completing one credit
of mathematics in the academic year of graduation from high school that
exceeds geometry with a C plus average grade or higher; and
(i) The percentage of students successfully completing a higher
level mathematics course above algebra 2 or its equivalent.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall submit a report
of the completed design of the math performance incentive program to
the quality education council created in chapter 28A.290 RCW and the
appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature no later
than August 31, 2012.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall collect the
appropriate baseline data for the 2011-12 academic year from the school
districts no later than January 31, 2013.
(5) School districts must report performance data annually to the
superintendent of public instruction using existing reporting systems
and processes whenever feasible.
(6) The superintendent of public instruction shall regularly inform
school districts of their improvements using the scoring system
established in subsection (2) of this section and shall post these
results on the Washington state report card administered by the office
of the superintendent of public instruction.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall meet annually
with the appropriate education partners to review the performance
indicators to determine if changes are necessary.
(8) In the 2016-17 academic year, the Washington state institute
for public policy must, with assistance from the education data center
created in RCW 43.41.400, the state board for community and technical
colleges, and the institutions of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, review data collected to determine if the math performance
incentive program has produced an improvement in student mathematics
performance in secondary and postsecondary education and training,
including a reduction in the percentage of students who are within
three years of high school graduation and enroll in postsecondary
remedial mathematics education. Based on the results of this review,
the Washington state institute for public policy must submit a report
of the outcomes of the math performance incentive program to the
superintendent of public instruction and the appropriate policy and
fiscal committees of the legislature no later than August 31, 2017,
along with any recommendations, including whether the program should be
expanded to encompass other subject areas or should terminate June 30,
2018.
(9) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to
implement the math performance incentive program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 28A.300
RCW to read as follows:
(1) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for the math
performance incentive program created in section 2 of this act, each
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2013, the superintendent of public
instruction shall provide monetary awards to school districts that have
demonstrated improvement in student performance in mathematics
according to the scoring system established in section 2 of this act.
School districts must use this funding to implement new and innovative
courses in their schools to improve and expand mathematical learning
opportunities for students, including access to high-level mathematics,
that match student career goals and needs. The minimum award provided
to a school within a district must be no less than five thousand
dollars. If the total funds appropriated to the superintendent of
public instruction for the math performance incentive program are
insufficient to provide an award to all school districts that
demonstrate improvement in student performance in mathematics according
to the scoring system established in section 2 of this act, the
superintendent of public instruction shall prioritize the distribution
of funding so that the school districts that demonstrate the largest
improvements receive an award.
(2) Funding under this section shall not become part of the state's
basic program of education obligation as set forth under Article IX of
the state Constitution.

--- END ---