BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 43.103.090 and 2007 c 200 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The council may:
(a) Meet at such times and places as may be designated by a
majority vote of the councilmembers or, if a majority cannot agree, by
the chair;
(b) Adopt rules governing the council and the conduct of its
meetings;
(c) Require reports from the chief of the Washington state patrol
on matters pertaining to the bureau of forensic laboratory services;
(d) Authorize the expenditure of up to two hundred fifty thousand
dollars per biennium from the council's death investigations account
appropriation for the purpose of assisting local jurisdictions in the
investigation of multiple deaths involving unanticipated,
extraordinary, and catastrophic events, or involving multiple
jurisdictions. The council shall adopt rules consistent with this
subsection for the purposes of authorizing expenditure of the funds;
(e) Authorize the expenditure of up to ((twenty-five)) two hundred
ten thousand dollars per biennium from the ((council's)) death
investigations account ((appropriation)) for the purpose of assisting
local jurisdictions to secure forensic anthropology services or other
testing, to determine the identity of human remains ((upon a showing of
financial need)). The council shall contract with a county coroner or
medical examiner to secure the required staff, facility storage, and
equipment. The council shall adopt rules consistent with this
subsection for the purposes of authorizing expenditure of the funds;
(f) Do anything, necessary or convenient, which enables the council
to perform its duties and to exercise its powers; and
(g) Be actively involved in the preparation of the bureau of
forensic laboratory services budget and approve the bureau of forensic
laboratory services budget prior to formal submission to the office of
financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.030.
(2) The council shall:
(a) Prescribe qualifications for the position of director of the
bureau of forensic laboratory services, after consulting with the chief
of the Washington state patrol. The council shall submit to the chief
of the Washington state patrol a list containing the names of up to
three persons who the council believes meet its qualifications to serve
as director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services. Minimum
qualifications for the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory
services must include successful completion of a background
investigation and polygraph examination. If requested by the chief of
the Washington state patrol, the forensic investigations council shall
submit one additional list of up to three persons who the forensic
investigations council believes meet its qualifications. The
appointment must be from one of the lists of persons submitted by the
forensic investigations council, and the director of the bureau of
forensic laboratory services shall report to the office of the chief of
the Washington state patrol;
(b) After consulting with the chief of the Washington state patrol
and the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services, the
council shall appoint a toxicologist as state toxicologist, who shall
report to the director of the bureau of forensic laboratory services.
The appointee shall meet the minimum standards for employment with the
Washington state patrol including successful completion of a background
investigation and polygraph examination;
(c) Establish, after consulting with the chief of the Washington
state patrol, the policies, objectives, and priorities of the bureau of
forensic laboratory services, to be implemented and administered within
constraints established by budgeted resources by the director of the
bureau of forensic laboratory services;
(d) Set the salary for the director of the bureau of forensic
laboratory services; and
(e) Set the salary for the state toxicologist.

--- END ---