BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28A.505.220 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 17 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Total distributions for the student achievement program from
the general fund to each school district shall be based upon the
average number of full-time equivalent students in the school district
during the previous school year as reported to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction by August 31st of the previous
school year. The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure
that moneys generated by skill center students are returned to skill
centers.
(2) The allocation rate per full-time equivalent student shall be
three hundred dollars in the 2005-06 school year, three hundred
seventy-five dollars in the 2006-07 school year, and four hundred fifty
dollars in the 2007-08 school year. For each subsequent school year,
the amount allocated per full-time equivalent student shall be adjusted
for inflation by the implicit price deflator as published by the
federal bureau of labor statistics. However, ((for the 2011-12 and
2012-13 school years)) beginning with the 2012-13 school year, the
amount allocated per full-time equivalent student shall be as specified
in the omnibus appropriations act. These allocations per full-time
equivalent student shall be supported from the distributions from the
education legacy trust account created in RCW 83.100.230 and the state
general fund.
(3) The school district annual amounts as defined in subsection (2)
of this section shall be distributed on the monthly apportionment
schedule as defined in RCW 28A.510.250.

Sec. 2 RCW 43.135.045 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 950 are each
amended to read as follows:
The education construction fund is hereby created in the state
treasury.
(1) Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund
exclusively for common school construction or higher education
construction. During the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, funds may also be
used for higher education facilities preservation and maintenance.
During the 2009-2011 and 2011-2013 fiscal biennia, the legislature may
transfer from the education construction fund to the state general fund
such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.
(2) Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if
approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if
approved by a vote of the people at the next general election. An
appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result
in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal
period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any
subsequent fiscal period.
(3) Funds for the student achievement program in RCW 28A.505.210
and 28A.505.220 shall be appropriated to the superintendent of public
instruction strictly for distribution to school districts to meet the
provisions set out in the student achievement act. Allocations shall
be made on an equal per full-time equivalent student basis to each
school district.
(((4) After July 1, 2010, the state treasurer shall transfer one
hundred two million dollars from the general fund to the education
construction fund by June 30th of each year.))

Sec. 3 2010 1st sp.s. c 27 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as
follows:
The legislature finds that institutions of higher education are key
to the future employment opportunities of Washington citizens and to
the economic well-being of the state. The legislature finds that the
recruitment of entrepreneurial researchers at institutions of higher
education and the formation of research innovation teams will further
enhance faculty recruitment and economic development. The legislature
further finds that current financial aid and early childhood education
programs are underfunded and subject to the unpredictability of the
state budget. It is the intent of the legislature to direct lottery
account moneys toward the Washington opportunity pathways account and
that those funds stabilize and increase existing resources for the
recruitment of entrepreneurial researchers, innovation partnership
zones and research teams, early childhood education, opportunity
grants, educational opportunity grants, get ready for math and science
scholarships, passport to college promise scholarships, college bound
scholarships, the state work study program, the state need grant,
Washington scholars awards, the Washington award for vocational
excellence, and Washington promise scholarships. ((It is also the
intent of the legislature to continue funding the education
construction fund by redirecting a portion of general state revenues to
that fund.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 The following acts or parts of acts are each
repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.400.205 (Cost-of-living increases for employees) and
2011 1st sp.s. c 18 s 1, 2009 c 573 s 1, 2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 1, &
2001 c 4 s 2;
(2) RCW 28A.400.206 (Cost-of-living increases -- Duty of state) and
2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 2 & 2001 c 4 s 1;
(3) RCW 28B.50.465 (Cost-of-living increases -- Academic employees)
and 2011 1st sp.s. c 18 s 2, 2009 c 573 s 2, 2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 3,
& 2001 c 4 s 3; and
(4) RCW 28B.50.468 (Cost-of-living increases -- Classified employees)
and 2011 1st sp.s. c 18 s 3, 2009 c 573 s 3, 2003 1st sp.s. c 20 s 4,
& 2001 c 4 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1,
2012.

--- END ---