BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 67.70.190 and 2009 c 564 s 949 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unclaimed prizes ((shall)) must be retained in the state lottery
account for the person entitled thereto for one hundred eighty days
after the drawing in which the prize is won, or after the official end
of the game for instant prizes. If no claim is made for the prize
within this time, all rights to the prize ((shall be extinguished, and
the prize shall be retained in the state lottery fund for further use
as prizes, except that one-third of all unclaimed prize money shall be
deposited in the economic development strategic reserve account created
in RCW 43.330.250.
On July 1, 2009, June 30, 2010, and June 30, 2011, all unclaimed
prize money retained in the state lottery fund [account] in excess of
three million dollars, excluding amounts distributed to the economic
development strategic reserve account, shall)) must be transferred into
the state general fund.

--- END ---