BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 46.08 RCW
to read as follows:
An electric vehicle charging station must be indicated by a
vertical sign identifying the space as an electric vehicle charging
station and indicating that there is no parking other than for electric
vehicle charging. The sign must be consistent with the manual on
uniform traffic control devices, published by the federal highway
administration. Additionally, the electric vehicle charging station
must be indicated by green pavement markings. The sign may include
other information including, but not limited to, the amount of the
monetary penalty under section 4 of this act for parking in the space
while not connected to an electrical outlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Plug-in electric vehicle" means a vehicle that is designed to be
recharged by plugging into an electrical outlet.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW
to read as follows:
"Electric vehicle charging station" means a parking space that
provides an electrical outlet for the purpose of charging a plug-in
electric vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 A new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW
to read as follows:
It is a traffic infraction, with a monetary penalty of two hundred
fifty dollars, for any person to park a vehicle in an electric vehicle
charging station provided on private property without charge or on
public property reserved for plug-in electric vehicle charging if the
vehicle is not connected to an electrical outlet.

--- END ---