BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Clients age twenty-one and older who are receiving employment
services must be offered the choice to transition to a community access
program after nine months of enrollment in an employment program, and
the option to transition from a community access program to an
employment program at any time. The department shall inform clients
and their legal representatives of all available options for employment
and day services. Information provided to the client and the client's
legal representative must include the types of activities each service
option provides, and the amount, scope, and duration of service for
which the client would be eligible under each service option. An
individual client may be authorized for only one service option, either
employment services or community access services. Clients may not
participate in more than one of these services at any given time.
(2) The department shall work with counties and stakeholders to
strengthen and expand the existing community access program. The
program must emphasize support for the client so they are able to
participate in activities that integrate them into their community and
support independent living and skills.

--- END ---