BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 The legislature finds that fraud associated
with public assistance programs is a significant problem in the state
of Washington. Therefore, the legislature encourages the office of
fraud and accountability with the department of social and health
services to coordinate with the office of the state auditor and the
department of early learning to improve the prevention, detection, and
prosecution of fraudulent activity taking place in public assistance
programs. It is the purpose of this act to significantly reduce fraud
and to ensure that public assistance dollars reach the intended
populations in need.

Sec. 2 RCW 74.08.580 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 14 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person receiving public assistance is prohibited from using
electronic benefit cards or cash obtained with electronic benefit
cards:
(a) For the purpose of participating in any of the activities
authorized under chapter 9.46 RCW;
(b) For the purpose of parimutuel wagering authorized under chapter
67.16 RCW;
(c) To purchase lottery tickets or shares authorized under chapter
67.70 RCW;
(d) For the purpose of participating in or purchasing any
activities located in a tattoo, body piercing, or body art shop
licensed under chapter 18.300 RCW;
(e) To purchase cigarettes as defined in RCW 82.24.010 or tobacco
products as defined in RCW 82.26.010;
(f) To purchase any items regulated under Title 66 RCW; or
(g) For the purpose of purchasing or participating in any
activities in any location listed in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) On or before January 1, 2012, the businesses listed in this
subsection must disable the ability of ATM and point-of-sale machines
located on their business premises to accept the electronic benefit
card. The following businesses are required to comply with this
mandate:
(a) Taverns licensed under RCW 66.24.330;
(b) Beer/wine specialty stores licensed under RCW 66.24.371;
(c) Nightclubs licensed under RCW 66.24.600;
(d) Contract liquor stores defined under RCW 66.04.010;
(e) Bail bond agencies regulated under chapter 18.185 RCW;
(f) Gambling establishments licensed under chapter 9.46 RCW;
(g) Tattoo, body piercing, or body art shops regulated under
chapter 18.300 RCW;
(h) Adult entertainment venues with performances that contain
erotic material where minors under the age of eighteen are prohibited
under RCW 9.68A.150; and
(i) Any establishments where persons under the age of eighteen are
not permitted.
(3) The department must notify the licensing authority of any
business listed in subsection (2) of this section that such business
has continued to allow the use of the electronic benefit card in
violation of subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Only the recipient, an eligible member of the household, or the
recipient's authorized representative may use an electronic benefit
card or the benefit and such use shall only be for the respective
benefit program purposes. Unless a recipient's family member is an
eligible member of the household, the recipient's authorized
representative, an alternative cardholder, or has been assigned as a
protective payee, no family member may use the benefit card. The
recipient shall not sell, or attempt to sell, exchange, or donate an
electronic benefit card or any benefits to any other person or entity.
(5) The first violation of subsection (1) ((or (4))) of this
section by a recipient constitutes a class 4 civil infraction under RCW
7.80.120. Second and subsequent violations of subsection (1) ((or
(4))) of this section constitute a class 3 civil infraction under RCW
7.80.120.
(a) The department shall notify, in writing, all recipients of
electronic benefit cards that any violation of subsection (1) or (4) of
this section could result in legal proceedings and forfeiture of all
cash public assistance.
(b) Whenever the department receives notice that a person has
violated subsection (1) ((or (4))) of this section, the department
shall notify the person in writing that the violation could result in
legal proceedings and forfeiture of all cash public assistance.
(c) The department shall assign a protective payee to the person
receiving public assistance who violates subsection (1) ((or (4))) of
this section two or more times.
(6) In assigning a personal identification number to an electronic
benefit card, the department shall not use any sequence of numbers that
appear on the card.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 74.08 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who has in his or her possession or under his or her
control electronic benefit cards issued in the names of two or more
persons and who is not authorized to have any of the cards in his or
her possession is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec. 4 RCW 74.04.014 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 42 s 24 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the office of
fraud and accountability shall have prompt access to all individuals,
records, electronic data, reports, audits, reviews, documents, and
other materials available to the department of revenue, department of
labor and industries, department of early learning, employment security
department, department of licensing, and any other government entity
that can be used to help facilitate investigations of fraud or abuse as
determined necessary by the director of the office of fraud and
accountability.
(2) The investigator shall have access to all child care records
maintained by licensed and unlicensed child care providers with the
consent of the provider or with a court order or valid search warrant.
(3) Information gathered by the department, the office, or the
fraud ombudsman shall be safeguarded and remain confidential as
required by applicable state or federal law. Whenever information or
assistance requested under subsection (1) or (2) of this section is, in
the judgment of the director, unreasonably refused or not provided, the
director of the office of fraud and accountability must report the
circumstances to the secretary immediately.

Sec. 5 RCW 9.91.140 and 2003 c 53 s 49 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person who sells, attempts to sell, or exchanges food stamps
obtained through the program established under RCW 74.04.500 or food
stamp benefits transferred electronically, or food purchased therewith,
is guilty of the following:
(1) A gross misdemeanor if the value of the stamps, benefits, or
food transferred exceeds one hundred dollars; or
(2) A misdemeanor if the value of the stamps, benefits, or food
transferred is one hundred dollars or less.

Sec. 6 RCW 9.91.142 and 2003 c 53 s 50 are each amended to read
as follows:
A person who purchases, or who otherwise acquires and sells, or who
traffics in, or knowingly initiates, organizes, plans, finances,
directs, manages, or supervises the theft for sales to others of food
stamps as defined by the federal food stamp act, as amended, 7 U.S.C.
Sec. 2011 et seq., or food stamp benefits transferred electronically,
is guilty of the following:
(1) A class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW if
the face value of the stamps or benefits exceeds one hundred dollars;
or
(2) A gross misdemeanor if the face value of the stamps or benefits
is one hundred dollars or less.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 No later than January 1, 2013, the office of
fraud and accountability within the department of social and health
services, along with the state auditor's office and the department of
early learning, shall collaborate in an effort to identify, review, and
provide the legislature with recommendations for integrated monitoring
and detection systems to prevent overpayments of public assistance from
occurring.

--- END ---