BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 49.70 RCW
to read as follows:
The legislature finds that pesticide exposure results in lost wages
and worker productivity, increased industrial insurance costs, and
acute and chronic health problems for workers and other community
members. Further, the legislature finds that drift from pesticide
spray applications poses significant risks to workers and community
members in the vicinity of the pesticide application. The legislature
therefore declares that workers and other community members have a
right to be protected from pesticide exposure and notified of certain
pesticide applications to prevent unnecessary exposure. The
legislature further declares its policy and purpose to protect workers
from hazardous exposure to pesticides in accordance with the mandates
of Article II section 35 of the state Constitution.

Sec. 2 RCW 49.70.020 and 1985 c 409 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.
(2) "Employee" means an employee of an employer who is employed in
the business of his or her employer whether by way of manual labor or
otherwise and every person in this state who is engaged in the
employment of or who is working under an independent contract the
essence of which is personal labor for an employer under this chapter
whether by way of manual labor or otherwise. However, for the purposes
of this chapter, employee shall not mean immediate family members of
the officers of any corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship or
other business entity or officers of any closely held corporation
engaged in agricultural production of crops or livestock.
(3) "Employer" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
business trust, legal representative, or other business entity that
engages in any business, industry, profession, or activity in this
state and employs one or more employees or who contract with one or
more persons, the essence of which is the personal labor of such person
or persons and includes the state, counties, cities, and all municipal
corporations, public corporations, political subdivisions of the state,
and charitable organizations.
(4) "Buffer zone" means an area extending one-half mile in all
directions from the boundaries of the intended pesticide application.
(5) "Person" includes any natural person, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation.
(6) "Pesticide" means, but is not limited to:
(a) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to prevent,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate any insect, rodent, nematode,
snail, slug, fungus, weed, and any other form of plant or animal life
or virus, except virus on or in a living human being or other animal,
which is normally considered to be a pest or which the director of
agriculture may declare to be a pest; or
(b) Any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as
a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant; or
(c) Any spray adjuvant, such as a wetting agent, spreading agent,
deposit builder, adhesive, emulsifying agent, deflocculating agent,
water modifier, or similar agent with or without toxic properties of
its own intended to be used with any other pesticide as an aid to the
application or effect thereof, and sold in a package or container
separate from that of the pesticide with which it is to be used; or
(d) Any fungicide, rodenticide, herbicide, insecticide, and
nematocide.
(7) "Pesticide drift" means the movement of pesticide through the
air away from the intended target.
(8) "Restricted-entry interval" means the time after the end of a
pesticide application during which entry into the treated area is
restricted.
(9) "Willfully" means conducted in a way that is volitional and
that is not the result of a good faith error.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 A new section is added to chapter 49.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) A person may not apply any pesticide by airplane, air-blast
sprayer, fumigation, or any other application method that poses a
substantial risk of pesticide drift:
(a) Within the greater of:
(i) One-half mile of: (A) A child care facility, a residence, or
school; or (B) any natural person who is outdoors, unless the person
applying the pesticides has reasonably concluded that no natural
persons are present outdoors at the time of the application; or
(ii) The distance necessary to avoid pesticide drift given
conditions onto: (A) A child care facility, residence, or school; or
(B) any natural person who is outdoors, unless the person applying the
pesticides has reasonably concluded that no natural persons are present
outdoors at the time of the application; or
(b) At a time not within reasonable proximity to the time listed on
the notice under subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Any person applying pesticides by airplane, air-blast sprayer,
fumigation, or any other application method that poses a substantial
risk of pesticide drift, must provide written notice to child care
facilities, schools, and residences within the buffer zone and to
persons whom the applicator can reasonably determine will likely be
outdoors within the buffer zone at any time during application. Notice
to the employer of persons satisfies this requirement if the persons
are likely to be outdoors in the buffer zone because of employment.
(a) The applicator must provide the written notice a minimum of
twenty-four hours before the application, but no sooner than forty-eight hours before the application.
(b) Notice of the intended pesticide application must be provided
in person if feasible, or if in-person notice is not feasible, posted
on the primary entrance of buildings within the buffer zone that may be
occupied.
(c) Notice must be translated into an appropriate language when the
applicator knows or a reasonable person would know that persons
entitled to notice do not speak English as their primary language.
(3) The notice must include:
(a) Time, date, and location of the application;
(b) Name, telephone number, and address of the person applying the
pesticide;
(c) Name, address, and telephone number of the person who contracts
for the application;
(d) A list of the common and chemical names of all pesticides to be
applied;
(e) Telephone number of the Washington state department of health
pesticide program;
(f) Telephone number of the Washington poison control center;
(g) A statement that aerial, air-blast, and fumigation application
of pesticides is not allowed within a distance of no less than one-half
mile of child care facilities, schools, residences, and people who are
outdoors;
(h) A list of the precautions related to drift that appear on the
label of the pesticide to be applied; and
(i) The restricted-entry interval on the pesticide label and a
statement that if the pesticide lands in an area, persons should stay
out of that area for the restricted-entry interval. When two or more
pesticides are applied at the same time, the restricted-entry interval
used in the notice is the longest of the applicable intervals.
(4) Employers who are notified of pesticide application under this
section shall provide their employees copies of the notice provided by
the applicator. When employees entitled to notice under this
subsection do not speak English as their primary language, the employer
must also provide each employee written notice in an appropriate
language for the employee or give a full verbal translation of the
notice to each employee. The employer must give the notice to the
employees at least four hours before the time listed for pesticide
application. Employers shall ensure that employees remain outside of
the buffer zone or work in fully enclosed indoor work spaces during
application of pesticides.
(5) Compliance with this section does not limit the liability of
any person for pesticide exposure to other persons.

Sec. 4 RCW 49.70.110 and 1984 c 289 s 16 are each amended to read
as follows:
No employer may discharge, cause to be discharged, or otherwise
discipline, penalize, or discriminate against any employee because the
employee or the employee's representative has exercised any right
established in this chapter. The discrimination provisions of chapter
49.17 RCW apply to this chapter, except as provided in section 5 of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5 A new section is added to chapter 49.70 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any employer who discharges, causes to be discharged, or
otherwise disciplines, penalizes, changes the terms or conditions of
employment, intimidates or discriminates against an employee who has or
whose representative has made or is planning to make any safety
complaint, participated in an investigation, or has been part of a
lawsuit, regarding any provision of section 3 of this act is liable in
a civil action for actual damages or for statutory damages of five
thousand dollars, whichever is greater, including costs of litigation
and reasonable attorneys' fees.
(2) Any person who attempts to intimidate another person because
that person or that person's representative has made or plans to make
a safety complaint, participate in an investigation, or been part of a
lawsuit, regarding any provision of section 3 of this act is liable in
a civil action for actual damages or for statutory damages of five
thousand dollars, whichever is greater, including costs of litigation
and reasonable attorneys' fees.
(3)(a) The department may investigate and issue a citation upon
notice to any person if the department reasonably believes that the
person has violated section 3 of this act. A person who is found to
have violated section 3 of this act is liable for a civil penalty of up
to ten thousand dollars for each violation. Chapter 34.05 RCW applies
to appeals of citations.
(b) The department of health may investigate and enforce violations
of section 3 of this act as provided in RCW 70.104.030.
(c) The department and department of health shall share relevant
information when investigating violations of section 3 of this act.
The department and department of health may not issue duplicate
citations to a person for the same violation of this chapter.
(4) Any person exposed to pesticides by a person willfully applying
pesticides in violation of section 3 of this act may bring a civil
action for twice the amount of damages suffered or statutory damages of
five thousand dollars, whichever is greater.
(5) The remedies in this section are in addition to, and do not
affect, any other remedy.

Sec. 6 RCW 70.104.030 and 2009 c 495 s 10 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department of health may investigate all suspected human
cases of pesticide poisoning and such cases of suspected pesticide
poisoning of animals that may relate to human illness. The department
shall establish time periods by rule to determine investigation
response time. Time periods shall range from immediate to forty-eight
hours to initiate an investigation, depending on the severity of the
case or suspected case of pesticide poisoning.
In order to adequately investigate such cases, the department shall
have the power to:
(a) Take all necessary samples and human or animal tissue specimens
for diagnostic purposes: PROVIDED, That tissue, if taken from a living
human, shall be taken from a living human only with the consent of a
person legally qualified to give such consent;
(b) Secure any and all such information as may be necessary to
adequately determine the nature and causes of any case of pesticide
poisoning.
(2) The department of health may investigate and issue a citation
upon notice to any person if the department of health reasonably
believes that the person has violated section 3 of this act with
respect to a violation that does not involve potential or actual
exposure of workers to pesticides. A person who is found to have
violated section 3 of this act is liable for a civil penalty of up to
ten thousand dollars for each violation. Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to
appeals of citations.
(3) The department shall immediately notify the department of
agriculture, the department of labor and industries, and other
appropriate agencies of the results of its investigation for such
action as the other departments or agencies deem appropriate. The
notification of such investigations and their results may include
recommendations for further action by the appropriate department or
agency. The department must coordinate investigations and penalty
assessments for any violations of section 3 of this act with the
department of labor and industries. The department of health and the
department of labor and industries may not issue duplicate citations to
a person for the same violation of this chapter.
(4) By December 1, 2012, the department of health and the
department of labor and industries shall jointly establish a formal
agreement that identifies the roles of each of the two agencies in
conducting investigations of activities under section 3 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7 A new section is added to chapter 49.70 RCW
to read as follows:
By December 1, 2012, the department and the department of health
shall jointly establish a formal agreement that identifies the roles of
each of the two agencies in conducting investigations of activities
under section 3 of this act.

--- END ---