BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 28B.15.031 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 10 s 2 and 2011 c 274
s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The term "operating fees" as used in this chapter shall include
the fees, other than building fees, charged all students registering at
the state's colleges and universities but shall not include fees for
short courses, self-supporting degree credit programs and courses,
marine station work, experimental station work, correspondence or
extension courses, and individual instruction and student deposits or
rentals, disciplinary and library fines, fees unique to specific
programs of study, which colleges and universities shall have the right
to impose, laboratory, gymnasium, health, technology and student
activity fees, or fees, charges, rentals, and other income derived from
any or all revenue producing lands, buildings and facilities of the
colleges or universities heretofore or hereafter acquired, constructed
or installed, including but not limited to income from rooms,
dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing or student
activity buildings, vehicular parking facilities, land, or the
appurtenances thereon, or such other special fees as may be established
by any college or university board of trustees or regents from time to
time. All moneys received as operating fees at any institution of
higher education shall be deposited in a local account containing only
operating fees revenue and related interest: PROVIDED, That a minimum
of five percent of operating fees shall be retained by the four-year
institutions of higher education that increase tuition for resident
undergraduate students above assumed tuition increases in the omnibus
appropriations act, a minimum of four percent of operating fees shall
be retained by four-year institutions of higher education that do not
increase tuition for resident undergraduates above assumed increases in
the omnibus appropriations act, and a minimum of three and one-half
percent of operating fees shall be retained by the community and
technical colleges for the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820. At least thirty
percent of operating fees required to be retained by the four-year
institutions for purposes of RCW 28B.15.820 shall be used only for the
purposes of RCW 28B.15.820(10).
(2)(a) Before establishing, reducing, or increasing fees unique to
specific programs of study as specified under subsection (1) of this
section:
(i) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
establishing, reducing, or increasing these fees; and
(ii) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
consult with existing student associations or organizations with
student undergraduate representatives regarding the impacts of
establishing, reducing, or increasing these fees.
(b) The state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall offset these fees with financial aid awards
for those who are eligible. Financial aid sources may be:
(i) Tuition revenue or locally held funds;
(ii) Tuition waivers; or
(iii) State or local financial aid programs.
(c) By August 15th of the year in which the fees in this subsection
(2) are first implemented and August 15th every year thereafter, the
state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State
College, and the state board for community and technical colleges shall
submit a report to the governor and the relevant committees of the
legislature that includes:
(i) A list of programs that have implemented, increased, or reduced
these fees and the corresponding monetary value of these fees; and
(ii) The effect of such fees on class sizes, graduation rates,
financial aid, and enrollment patterns.
(3) In addition to the three and one-half percent of operating fees
retained by the institutions under subsection (1) of this section, up
to three percent of operating fees charged to students at community and
technical colleges shall be transferred to the community and technical
college innovation account for the implementation of the college
board's strategic technology plan in RCW 28B.50.515. The percentage to
be transferred to the community and technical college innovation
account shall be determined by the college board each year but shall
not exceed three percent of the operating fees collected each year.
(((3))) (4) Local operating fee accounts shall not be subject to
appropriation by the legislature or allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "fees unique to specific
programs of study" means fees that are:
(a) Not charged to all students registering at the state's colleges
and universities; and
(b) Charged to offset the increased cost of delivery of the
particular courses or degree programs relative to the average cost of
delivering other courses or degree programs offered by the institution.

Sec. 2 RCW 28B.15.067 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 10 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this
chapter.
(2) Beginning in the 2011-12 academic year, reductions or increases
in full-time tuition fees shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act for resident undergraduate students at community and
technical colleges. The governing boards of the state universities,
regional universities, and The Evergreen State College; and the state
board for community and technical colleges may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students other than resident undergraduates,
including nonresident students, summer school students, and students in
other self-supporting degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition may exceed the fiscal growth factor. ((The state board
for community and technical colleges may pilot or institute
differential tuition models. The board may define scale, scope, and
rationale for the models.))
(3)(a) Beginning with the 2011-12 academic year and through the end
of the 2014-15 academic year, the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State
College may reduce or increase full-time tuition fees for all students,
including summer school students and students in other self-supporting
degree programs. Percentage increases in full-time tuition fees may
exceed the fiscal growth factor. For students other than resident
undergraduates, reductions or increases may be made for all or portions
of an institution's programs, campuses, courses, or students.
(b) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the governing boards of the state universities, the regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College shall consult with
existing student associations or organizations with student
undergraduate and graduate representatives regarding the impacts of
potential tuition increases. Governing boards shall be required to
provide data regarding the percentage of students receiving financial
aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of total costs of
attendance paid for by aid.
(c) Prior to reducing or increasing tuition for each academic year,
the state board for community and technical college system shall
consult with existing student associations or organizations with
undergraduate student representation regarding the impacts of potential
tuition increases. The state board for community and technical
colleges shall provide data regarding the percentage of students
receiving financial aid, the sources of aid, and the percentage of
total costs of attendance paid for by aid.
(4) Beginning with the 2015-16 academic year through the 2018-19
academic year, the governing boards of the state universities, regional
universities, and The Evergreen State College may set tuition for
resident undergraduates as follows:
(a) If state funding for a college or university falls below the
state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year 2011,
the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in (d) of
this subsection, reduce enrollments, or both;
(b) If state funding for a college or university is at least at the
level of state funding provided in the operating budget for fiscal year
2011, the governing board may increase tuition up to the limits set in
(d) of this subsection and shall continue to at least maintain the
actual enrollment levels for fiscal year 2011 or increase enrollments
as required in the omnibus appropriations act; ((and))
(c) If state funding is increased so that combined with resident
undergraduate tuition the sixtieth percentile of the total per-student
funding at similar public institutions of higher education in the
global challenge states under RCW 28B.15.068 is exceeded, the governing
board shall decrease tuition by the amount needed for the total per-student funding to be at the sixtieth percentile under RCW 28B.15.068;
and
(d) The amount of tuition set by the governing board for an
institution under this subsection (4) may not exceed the sixtieth
percentile of the resident undergraduate tuition of similar public
institutions of higher education in the global challenge states.
(5) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to high school students enrolling in participating institutions of
higher education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.400.
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a dropout reengagement program
through an interlocal agreement between a school district and a
community or technical college under RCW 28A.175.100 through
28A.175.110.
(7) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply
to eligible students enrolling in a community or technical college
participating in the pilot program under RCW 28B.50.534 for the purpose
of obtaining a high school diploma.
(8) Beginning in the 2019-20 academic year, reductions or increases
in full-time tuition fees for resident undergraduates at four-year
institutions of higher education shall be as provided in the omnibus
appropriations act.

--- END ---