BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.285.030 and 2009 c 565 s 20 are each amended to
read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Attorney general" means the Washington state office of the
attorney general.
(2) "Auditor" means: (a) The Washington state auditor's office or
its designee for qualifying utilities under its jurisdiction that are
not investor-owned utilities; or (b) an independent auditor selected by
a qualifying utility that is not under the jurisdiction of the state
auditor and is not an investor-owned utility.
(3) "Commission" means the Washington state utilities and
transportation commission.
(4) "Conservation" means any reduction in electric power
consumption resulting from increases in the efficiency of energy use,
production, or distribution.
(5) "Cost-effective" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
80.52.030.
(6) "Council" means the Washington state apprenticeship and
training council within the department of labor and industries.
(7) "Customer" means a person or entity that purchases electricity
for ultimate consumption and not for resale.
(8) "Department" means the department of commerce or its successor.
(9) "Distributed generation" means an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility or any integrated cluster of such
facilities has a generating capacity of not more than five megawatts.
(10) "Eligible renewable resource" means:
(a) Electricity from a generation facility powered by a renewable
resource other than freshwater that commences operation after March 31,
1999, where: (i) The facility is located in ((the Pacific Northwest))
Washington, Oregon, Idaho, or Montana; or (ii) the ((electricity from
the facility is delivered into Washington state on a real-time basis
without shaping, storage, or integration services)) facility is located
in Wyoming and electricity from the facility is delivered onto
transmission facilities that are located in Wyoming and owned by a
qualifying utility; ((or))
(b) Incremental electricity produced as a result of efficiency
improvements, generation capacity additions, and operational changes
completed after March 31, 1999, to hydroelectric generation projects
((owned by a qualifying utility and)) located in the Pacific Northwest
or to hydroelectric generation in irrigation pipes and canals located
in the Pacific Northwest, where the additional generation in either
case does not result in a new ((water diversions or impoundments))
impoundment;
(c) Biomass energy;
(d) Electricity from an irrigation district as provided in RCW
87.03.015, from water power made available by and as a part of
irrigation district water conveyance and distribution facilities, waste
ways, and drainage water facilities; and
(e) Environmental redispatch.
(11) "Investor-owned utility" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 19.29A.010.
(12) "Load" means the amount of kilowatt-hours of electricity
delivered in the most recently completed year by a qualifying utility
to its Washington retail customers.
(13) "Nonpower attributes" means all environmentally related
characteristics, exclusive of energy, capacity reliability, and other
electrical power service attributes, that are associated with the
generation of electricity from a renewable resource, including but not
limited to the facility's fuel type, geographic location, vintage,
qualification as an eligible renewable resource, and avoided emissions
of pollutants to the air, soil, or water, and avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide and other greenhouse gases. For an anaerobic digester,
its nonpower attributes may be separated into avoided emissions of
carbon dioxide, and other greenhouse gases, and into renewable energy
credits.
(14) "Pacific Northwest" has the same meaning as defined for the
Bonneville power administration in section 3 of the Pacific Northwest
electric power planning and conservation act (94 Stat. 2698; 16 U.S.C.
Sec. 839a).
(15) "Public facility" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
39.35C.010.
(16) "Qualifying utility" means an electric utility, as the term
"electric utility" is defined in RCW 19.29A.010, that serves more than
twenty-five thousand customers in the state of Washington. The number
of customers served may be based on data reported by a utility in form
861, "annual electric utility report," filed with the energy
information administration, United States department of energy.
(17) "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable certificate of
proof of at least one megawatt-hour of an eligible renewable resource
where the generation facility is not powered by freshwater, the
certificate includes all of the nonpower attributes associated with
that one megawatt-hour of electricity, and the certificate is verified
by a renewable energy credit tracking system selected by the
department.
(18) "Renewable resource" means: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar
energy; (d) geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; (f) wave, ocean, or
tidal power; (g) gas from sewage treatment facilities; (h) biodiesel
fuel as defined in RCW 82.29A.135 that is not derived from crops raised
on land cleared from old growth or first-growth forests where the
clearing occurred after December 7, 2006; ((and)) or (i) biomass energy
((based on animal waste or solid organic fuels from wood, forest, or
field residues, or dedicated energy crops that do not include (i) wood
pieces that have been treated with chemical preservatives such as
creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) black
liquor by-product from paper production; (iii) wood from old growth
forests; or (iv) municipal solid waste)).
(19) "Rule" means rules adopted by an agency or other entity of
Washington state government to carry out the intent and purposes of
this chapter.
(20) "Year" means the twelve-month period commencing January 1st
and ending December 31st.
(21)(a) "Biomass energy" includes: (i) Organic by-products of
pulping and the wood manufacturing process; (ii) animal waste; (iii)
solid organic fuels from wood; (iv) forest or field residues; (v)
wooden demolition or construction debris; (vi) food waste; (vii)
liquors derived from algae and other sources; (viii) dedicated energy
crops; (ix) biosolids; and (x) yard waste.
(b) "Biomass energy" does not include: (i) Wood pieces that have
been treated with chemical preservatives such as creosote,
pentachlorophenol, or copper-chrome-arsenic; (ii) wood from old growth
forests; or (iii) municipal solid waste.
(22) "Environmental redispatch" means hydroelectricity from a
federal or nonfederal generation facility located in the Pacific
Northwest that replaces an equivalent amount of electricity generated
from a different eligible renewable resource that has been curtailed
to: (a) Ensure consistency with reliability standards; and (b) avoid
exceeding total dissolved gas levels.
(23) "Excess energy conservation" means the amount of conservation
acquired by a qualifying utility that exceeds the amount of
conservation acquired using methodologies consistent with those used by
the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning council
in its regional power plan published in February 2010.

Sec. 2 RCW 19.285.040 and 2007 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Each qualifying utility shall pursue all available conservation
that is cost-effective, reliable, and feasible.
(a) By January 1, 2010, using methodologies consistent with those
used by the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council in its most recently published regional power plan, each
qualifying utility shall identify its achievable cost-effective
conservation potential through 2019. At least every two years
((thereafter, the)) beginning January 1, 2012, each qualifying utility
shall review and update ((this)) its assessment for the subsequent ten-year period, using methodologies consistent with those used by the
Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning council in
its regional power plan published in February 2010.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2010, each qualifying utility shall
establish and make publicly available a biennial acquisition target for
cost-effective conservation consistent with its identification of
achievable opportunities in (a) of this subsection, and meet that
target during the subsequent two-year period. At a minimum, each
biennial target must be no lower than the qualifying utility's pro rata
share for that two-year period of its cost-effective conservation
potential for the subsequent ten-year period, as established under (a)
of this subsection.
(c) In meeting its conservation targets, a qualifying utility may
count high-efficiency cogeneration owned and used by a retail electric
customer to meet its own needs. High-efficiency cogeneration is the
sequential production of electricity and useful thermal energy from a
common fuel source, where, under normal operating conditions, the
facility has a useful thermal energy output of no less than thirty-three percent of the total energy output. The reduction in load due to
high-efficiency cogeneration shall be: (i) Calculated as the ratio of
the fuel chargeable to power heat rate of the cogeneration facility
compared to the heat rate on a new and clean basis of a
best-commercially available technology combined-cycle natural gas-fired
combustion turbine; and (ii) counted towards meeting the biennial
conservation target in the same manner as other conservation savings.
(d) The commission may determine if a conservation program
implemented by an investor-owned utility is cost-effective based on the
commission's policies and practice.
(e) The commission may rely on its standard practice for review and
approval of investor-owned utility conservation targets.
(2)(a) Each qualifying utility shall use eligible renewable
resources ((or)), acquire equivalent renewable energy credits, or use
excess energy conservation, or a combination of ((both)) these options,
to meet the following annual targets:
(i) At least three percent of its load by January 1, 2012, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2015;
(ii) At least nine percent of its load by January 1, 2016, and each
year thereafter through December 31, 2019; and
(iii) At least fifteen percent of its load by January 1, 2020, and
each year thereafter.
(b) A qualifying utility may count distributed generation at double
the facility's electrical output if the utility: (i) Owns or has
contracted for the distributed generation and the associated renewable
energy credits; or (ii) has contracted to purchase the associated
renewable energy credits.
(c) In meeting the annual targets in (a) of this subsection, a
qualifying utility shall calculate its annual load based on the average
of the utility's load for the previous two years.
(d) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i) The utility's weather-adjusted load for the previous three years on average did not increase
over that time period; (ii) after December 7, 2006, the utility did not
commence or renew ownership or incremental purchases of electricity
from resources other than renewable resources other than on a daily
spot price basis and the electricity is not offset by equivalent
renewable energy credits; and (iii) the utility invested at least one
percent of its total annual retail revenue requirement that year on
eligible renewable resources, renewable energy credits, or a
combination of both.
(e) The requirements of this section may be met for any given year
((with)) using renewable energy credits ((produced during that year,
the preceding year, or the subsequent year)). Renewable energy credits
that are not used by the qualifying utility to meet the annual targets
under this section in a calendar year may be banked and carried forward
indefinitely for the purpose of complying with the annual target in a
subsequent year, except that banked renewable energy credits with the
oldest issuance date must be used to comply with an annual target
before renewable energy credits with more recent issuance dates are
used. Each renewable energy credit may be used only once to meet the
requirements of this section. A qualifying utility must demonstrate
that a renewable energy credit used to comply with an annual target is
derived from an eligible renewable resource and that the qualifying
utility has not used, traded, sold, or otherwise transferred the
credit.
(f) In complying with the targets established in (a) of this
subsection, a qualifying utility may not count:
(i) Eligible renewable resources or distributed generation where
the associated renewable energy credits are owned by a separate entity;
or
(ii) Eligible renewable resources or renewable energy credits
obtained for and used in an optional pricing program such as the
program established in RCW 19.29A.090.
(g) Where fossil and combustible renewable resources are cofired in
one generating unit located in the Pacific Northwest where the cofiring
commenced after March 31, 1999, the unit shall be considered to produce
eligible renewable resources in direct proportion to the percentage of
the total heat value represented by the heat value of the renewable
resources.
(h)(i) A qualifying utility that acquires an eligible renewable
resource or renewable energy credit may count that acquisition at one
and two-tenths times its base value:
(A) Where the eligible renewable resource comes from a facility
that commenced operation after December 31, 2005; and
(B) Where the developer of the facility used apprenticeship
programs approved by the council during facility construction.
(ii) The council shall establish minimum levels of labor hours to
be met through apprenticeship programs to qualify for this extra
credit.
(i) A qualifying utility shall be considered in compliance with an
annual target in (a) of this subsection if: (i)(A) The annual energy
output of the qualifying utility's electricity resources, either owned
or under contract on the effective date of this section, plus the
annual energy output of its eligible renewable resources acquired
subsequent to that date, plus its renewable energy credits meets or
exceeds the average of the utility's load for the previous two years;
and (B) a utility's commission, board of directors, or other governing
body, makes a determination by November 1, 2012, in accordance with
other applicable statutory and regulatory requirements, that a utility
subject to its respective jurisdiction may utilize this provision; or
(ii) events beyond the reasonable control of the utility that could not
have been reasonably anticipated or ameliorated prevented it from
meeting the renewable energy target. Such events include
weather-related damage, mechanical failure, strikes, lockouts, and
actions of a governmental authority that adversely affect the
generation, transmission, or distribution of an eligible renewable
resource under contract to a qualifying utility.
(3) Utilities that become qualifying utilities after December 31,
2006, shall meet the requirements in this section on a time frame
comparable in length to that provided for qualifying utilities as of
December 7, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 By December 1, 2012, the joint legislative
audit and review committee shall conduct a study of the electricity
cost impacts for each qualifying utility to meet the 2016 and 2020
renewable resource and conservation targets under chapter 19.285 RCW.
The study must also include an analysis of the impacts on each
utility's commercial, industrial, and residential customers, including
an additional analysis of the impacts on low-income residential
customers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 If any provision of this act or its
application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

--- END ---