BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 18.16.050 and 2008 c 20 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) There is created a state cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, and
manicuring advisory board consisting of a maximum of ten members
appointed by the director. These members of the board shall include:
A representative of private schools licensed under this chapter; a
representative from an approved apprenticeship program conducted in an
approved salon/shop; a representative of public vocational technical
schools licensed under this chapter; a consumer who is unaffiliated
with the cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, or manicuring industry; and
six members who are currently practicing licensees who have been
engaged in the practice of manicuring, esthetics, barbering, or
cosmetology for at least three years. Members shall serve a term of
three years. Any board member may be removed for just cause. The
director may appoint a new member to fill any vacancy on the board for
the remainder of the unexpired term.
(2) Board members shall be entitled to compensation pursuant to RCW
43.03.240 for each day spent conducting official business and to
reimbursement for travel expenses as provided by RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.
(3) The board may seek the advice and input of officials from the
following state agencies: (a) ((The workforce training and education
coordinating board; (b) the department of)) employment security
department; (((c))) (b) the department of labor and industries; (((d)))
(c) the department of health; (((e))) (d) the department of licensing;
and (((f))) (e) the department of revenue.

Sec. 2 RCW 18.79.202 and 2005 c 268 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to the licensing fee for registered nurses and
licensed practical nurses licensed under this chapter, the department
shall impose an additional surcharge of five dollars per year on all
initial licenses and renewal licenses for registered nurses and
licensed practical nurses issued under this chapter. Advanced
registered nurse practitioners are only required to pay the surcharge
on their registered nurse licenses.
(2) The department((, in consultation with the commission and the
workforce training and education coordinating board,)) shall use the
proceeds from the surcharge imposed under subsection (1) of this
section to provide grants to a central nursing resource center. The
grants may be awarded only to a not-for-profit central nursing resource
center that is comprised of and led by nurses. The central nursing
resource center will demonstrate coordination with relevant nursing
constituents including professional nursing organizations, groups
representing nursing educators, staff nurses, nurse managers or
executives, and labor organizations representing nurses. The central
nursing resource center shall have as its mission to contribute to the
health and wellness of Washington state residents by ensuring that
there is an adequate nursing workforce to meet the current and future
health care needs of the citizens of the state of Washington. The
grants may be used to fund the following activities of the central
nursing resource center:
(a) Maintain information on the current and projected supply and
demand of nurses through the collection and analysis of data regarding
the nursing workforce, including but not limited to education level,
race and ethnicity, employment settings, nursing positions, reasons for
leaving the nursing profession, and those leaving Washington state to
practice elsewhere. This data collection and analysis must complement
other state activities to produce data on the nursing workforce and the
central nursing resource center shall work collaboratively with other
entities in the data collection to ensure coordination and avoid
duplication of efforts;
(b) Monitor and validate trends in the applicant pool for programs
in nursing. The central nursing resource center must work with nursing
leaders to identify approaches to address issues arising related to the
trends identified, and collect information on other states' approaches
to addressing these issues;
(c) Facilitate partnerships between the nursing community and other
health care providers, licensing authority, business and industry,
consumers, legislators, and educators to achieve policy consensus,
promote diversity within the profession, and enhance nursing career
mobility and nursing leadership development;
(d) Evaluate the effectiveness of nursing education and
articulation among programs to increase access to nursing education and
enhance career mobility, especially for populations that are
underrepresented in the nursing profession;
(e) Provide consultation, technical assistance, data, and
information related to Washington state and national nursing resources;
(f) Promote strategies to enhance patient safety and quality
patient care including encouraging a safe and healthy workplace
environment for nurses; and
(g) Educate the public including students in K-12 about
opportunities and careers in nursing.
(3) The nursing resource center account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. All receipts from the surcharge in subsection
(1) of this section must be deposited in the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for grants to an organization to
conduct the specific activities listed in subsection (2) of this
section and to compensate the department for the reasonable costs
associated with the collection and distribution of the surcharge and
the administration of the grant provided for in subsection (2) of this
section. No money from this account may be used by the recipient
towards administrative costs of the central nursing resource center not
associated with the specific activities listed in subsection (2) of
this section. No money from this account may be used by the recipient
toward lobbying. Only the secretary or the secretary's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures. Grants will be awarded on an annual
basis and funds will be distributed quarterly. The first distribution
after awarding the first grant shall be made no later than six months
after July 24, 2005. The central nursing resource center shall report
to the department on meeting the grant objectives annually.
(4) The central nursing resource center shall submit a report of
all progress, collaboration with other organizations and government
entities, and activities conducted by the center to the relevant
committees of the legislature by November 30, 2011. The department
shall conduct a review of the program to collect funds to support the
activities of a nursing resource center and make recommendations on the
effectiveness of the program and whether it should continue. The
review shall be paid for with funds from the nursing resource center
account. The review must be completed by June 30, 2012.
(5) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement
chapter 268, Laws of 2005.

Sec. 3 RCW 18.106.030 and 2011 c 336 s 504 are each amended to
read as follows:
Any person desiring to be issued a certificate of competency as
provided in this chapter shall deliver evidence in a form prescribed by
the department affirming that said person has had sufficient experience
in as well as demonstrated general competency in the trade of plumbing
or specialty plumbing so as to qualify him or her to make an
application for a certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber or
specialty plumber. Completion of a course of study in the plumbing
trade in the armed services of the United States or at a school
accredited by the ((workforce training and)) higher education
coordinating board or its successor agency shall constitute sufficient
evidence of experience and competency to enable such person to make
application for a certificate of competency.
Any person desiring to be issued a medical gas piping installer
endorsement shall deliver evidence in a form prescribed by the
department affirming that the person has met the requirements
established by the department for a medical gas piping installer
endorsement.
In addition to supplying the evidence as prescribed in this
section, each applicant for a certificate of competency shall submit an
application for such certificate on such form and in such manner as
shall be prescribed by the director of the department.

Sec. 4 RCW 18.106.040 and 2006 c 185 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the application and evidence set forth in RCW
18.106.030, the director shall review the same and make a determination
as to whether the applicant is eligible to take an examination for the
certificate of competency. To be eligible to take the examination:
(a) Each applicant for a journeyman plumber's certificate of
competency shall furnish written evidence that he or she has completed
a course of study in the plumbing trade in the armed services of the
United States or at a school licensed by the ((workforce training and))
higher education coordinating board or its successor agency, or has had
four or more years of experience under the direct supervision of a
licensed journeyman plumber.
(b) Each applicant for a specialty plumber's certificate of
competency under RCW 18.106.010(10)(a) shall furnish written evidence
that he or she has completed a course of study in the plumbing trade in
the armed services of the United States or at a school licensed by the
((workforce training and)) higher education coordinating board or its
successor agency, under chapter 28C.10 RCW, or that he or she has had
at least three years practical experience in the specialty.
(c) Each applicant for a specialty plumber's certificate of
competency under RCW 18.106.010(10) (b) or (c) shall furnish written
evidence that he or she is eligible to take the examination. These
eligibility requirements for the specialty plumbers defined by RCW
18.106.010(10)(c) shall be one year of practical experience working on
pumping systems not exceeding one hundred gallons per minute, and two
years of practical experience working on pumping systems exceeding one
hundred gallons per minute, or equivalent as determined by rule by the
department in consultation with the advisory board, and that experience
may be obtained at the same time the individual is meeting the
experience required by RCW 19.28.191. The eligibility requirements for
other specialty plumbers shall be established by rule by the director
pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(2)(a) The director shall establish reasonable rules for the
examinations to be given applicants for certificates of competency. In
establishing the rules, the director shall consult with the state
advisory board of plumbers as established in RCW 18.106.110.
(b) The director shall establish reasonable criteria by rule for
determining an applicant's eligibility to take an examination for the
certificate of competency for specialty plumbers under subsection
(1)(c) of this section. In establishing the criteria, the director
shall consult with the state advisory board of plumbers as established
in RCW 18.106.110. These rules must take effect by December 31, 2006.
(3) Upon determination that the applicant is eligible to take the
examination, the director shall so notify the applicant, indicating the
time and place for taking the same.
(4) No other requirement for eligibility may be imposed.

Sec. 5 RCW 18.106.070 and 2009 c 36 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The department shall issue a certificate of competency to all
applicants who have passed the examination and have paid the fee for
the certificate. The certificate may include a photograph of the
holder. The certificate shall bear the date of issuance, and shall
expire on the birthdate of the holder immediately following the date of
issuance. The certificate shall be renewable every other year, upon
application, on or before the birthdate of the holder, except for
specialty plumbers defined by RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) who also have an
electrical certification issued jointly as provided by RCW
18.106.050(3) in which case their certificate shall be renewable every
three years on or before the birthdate of the holder. The department
shall renew a certificate of competency if the applicant: (a) Pays the
renewal fee assessed by the department; and (b) during the past two
years has completed sixteen hours of continuing education approved by
the department with the advice of the advisory board, including four
hours related to electrical safety. For holders of the specialty
plumber certificate under RCW 18.106.010(10)(c), the continuing
education may comprise both electrical and plumbing education with a
minimum of twelve of the required twenty-four hours of continuing
education in plumbing. If a person fails to renew the certificate by
the renewal date, he or she must pay a doubled fee. If the person does
not renew the certificate within ninety days of the renewal date, he or
she must retake the examination and pay the examination fee.
The journeyman plumber and specialty plumber certificates of
competency, the medical gas piping installer endorsement, and the
temporary permit provided for in this chapter grant the holder the
right to engage in the work of plumbing as a journeyman plumber,
specialty plumber, or medical gas piping installer, in accordance with
their provisions throughout the state and within any of its political
subdivisions on any job or any employment without additional proof of
competency or any other license or permit or fee to engage in the work.
This section does not preclude employees from adhering to a union
security clause in any employment where such a requirement exists.
(2) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the plumbing construction trade or
who is learning the plumbing construction trade may work in the
plumbing construction trade if supervised by a certified journeyman
plumber or a certified specialty plumber in that plumber's specialty.
All apprentices and individuals learning the plumbing construction
trade shall obtain a plumbing training certificate from the department.
The certificate shall authorize the holder to learn the plumbing
construction trade while under the direct supervision of a journeyman
plumber or a specialty plumber working in his or her specialty. The
certificate may include a photograph of the holder. The holder of the
plumbing training certificate shall renew the certificate annually. At
the time of renewal, the holder shall provide the department with an
accurate list of the holder's employers in the plumbing construction
industry for the previous year and the number of hours worked for each
employer. An annual fee shall be charged for the issuance or renewal
of the certificate. The department shall set the fee by rule. The fee
shall cover but not exceed the cost of administering and enforcing the
trainee certification and supervision requirements of this chapter.
(3) Any person who has been issued a plumbing training certificate
under this chapter may work if that person is under supervision.
Supervision shall consist of a person being on the same job site and
under the control of either a journeyman plumber or an appropriate
specialty plumber who has an applicable certificate of competency
issued under this chapter. Either a journeyman plumber or an
appropriate specialty plumber shall be on the same job site as the
noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each
working day unless otherwise provided in this chapter. The ratio of
noncertified individuals to certified journeymen or specialty plumbers
working on a job site shall be: (a) Not more than two noncertified
plumbers working on any one job site for every certified specialty
plumber or journeyman plumber working as a specialty plumber; and (b)
not more than one noncertified plumber working on any one job site for
every certified journeyman plumber working as a journeyman plumber.
An individual who has a current training certificate and who has
successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved
apprenticeship program or in a technical school program in the plumbing
construction trade in a school approved by the ((workforce training
and)) higher education coordinating board or its successor agency, may
work without direct on-site supervision during the last six months of
meeting the practical experience requirements of this chapter.
(4) An individual who has a current training certificate and who
has successfully completed or is currently enrolled in a medical gas
piping installer training course approved by the department may work on
medical gas piping systems if the individual is under the direct
supervision of a certified medical gas piping installer who holds a
medical gas piping installer endorsement one hundred percent of a
working day on a one-to-one ratio.
(5) The training to become a certified plumber must include not
less than sixteen hours of classroom training established by the
director with the advice of the advisory board. The classroom training
must include, but not be limited to, electrical wiring safety,
grounding, bonding, and other related items plumbers need to know to
work under RCW 19.28.091.
(6) All persons who are certified plumbers before January 1, 2003,
are deemed to have received the classroom training required in
subsection (5) of this section.

Sec. 6 RCW 18.260.110 and 2008 c 150 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict:
(1) The practice of a dental assistant in the discharge of official
duties by dental assistants in the United States federal services on
federal reservations, including but not limited to the armed services,
coast guard, public health service, veterans' bureau, or bureau of
Indian affairs;
(2) Expanded function dental auxiliary education and training
programs approved by the commission and the practice as an expanded
function dental auxiliary by students in expanded function dental
auxiliary education and training programs approved by the commission,
when acting under the direction and supervision of persons licensed
under chapter 18.29 or 18.32 RCW;
(3) Dental assistant education and training programs, and the
practice of dental assisting by students in dental assistant education
and training programs approved by the commission or offered at a school
approved or licensed by the ((workforce training and education
coordinating board,)) higher education coordinating board, state board
for community and technical colleges, or Washington state skill centers
certified by the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
when acting under the direction and supervision of persons registered
or licensed under this chapter or chapter 18.29 or 18.32 RCW; or
(4) The practice of a volunteer dental assistant providing services
under the supervision of a licensed dentist in a charitable dental
clinic, as approved by the commission in rule.

Sec. 7 RCW 19.28.161 and 2010 c 33 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) No person may engage in the electrical construction trade
without having a valid master journeyman electrician certificate of
competency, journeyman electrician certificate of competency, master
specialty electrician certificate of competency, or specialty
electrician certificate of competency issued by the department in
accordance with this chapter. Electrician certificate of competency
specialties include, but are not limited to: Residential, pump and
irrigation, limited energy system, signs, nonresidential maintenance,
restricted nonresidential maintenance, and appliance repair. Until
July 1, 2007, the department of labor and industries shall issue a
written warning to any specialty pump and irrigation or domestic pump
electrician not having a valid electrician certification. The warning
will state that the individual must apply for an electrical training
certificate or be qualified for and apply for electrician certification
under the requirements in RCW 19.28.191(1)(g) within thirty calendar
days of the warning. Only one warning will be issued to any
individual. If the individual fails to comply with this section, the
department shall issue a penalty as defined in RCW 19.28.271 to the
individual.
(2) A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program
approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the electrical construction trade
or who is learning the electrical construction trade may work in the
electrical construction trade if supervised by a certified master
journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty
electrician in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
in that electrician's specialty. All apprentices and individuals
learning the electrical construction trade shall obtain an electrical
training certificate from the department. The certificate shall
authorize the holder to learn the electrical construction trade while
under the direct supervision of a master journeyman electrician,
journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty. The certificate may include a photograph of
the holder. The holder of the electrical training certificate shall
renew the certificate biennially. At the time of renewal, the holder
shall provide the department with an accurate list of the holder's
employers in the electrical construction industry for the previous
biennial period and the number of hours worked for each employer. The
holder shall also provide proof of sixteen hours of: Approved
classroom training covering this chapter, the national electrical code,
or electrical theory; or equivalent classroom training taken as part of
an approved apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04 RCW or an
approved electrical training program under RCW 19.28.191(1)(h). The
number of hours of approved classroom training required for certificate
renewal shall increase as follows: (a) Beginning on July 1, 2011, the
holder of an electrical training certificate shall provide the
department with proof of thirty-two hours of approved classroom
training; and (b) beginning on July 1, 2013, the holder of an
electrical training certificate shall provide the department with proof
of forty-eight hours of approved classroom training. At the request of
the chairs of the house of representatives commerce and labor committee
and the senate labor, commerce and consumer protection committee, or
their successor committees, the department of labor and industries
shall provide information on the implementation of the new classroom
training requirements for electrical trainees to both committees by
December 1, 2012. A biennial fee shall be charged for the issuance or
renewal of the certificate. The department shall set the fee by rule.
The fee shall cover but not exceed the cost of administering and
enforcing the trainee certification and supervision requirements of
this chapter. Apprentices and individuals learning the electrical
construction trade shall have their electrical training certificates in
their possession at all times that they are performing electrical work.
They shall show their certificates to an authorized representative of
the department at the representative's request.
(3) Any person who has been issued an electrical training
certificate under this chapter may work if that person is under
supervision. Supervision shall consist of a person being on the same
job site and under the control of either a certified master journeyman
electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty. Either a certified master
journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty shall be on the
same job site as the noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each working day unless otherwise provided in this
chapter.
(4) The ratio of noncertified individuals to certified master
journeymen electricians, journeymen electricians, master specialty
electricians, or specialty electricians on any one job site is as
follows:
(a) When working as a specialty electrician, not more than two
noncertified individuals for every certified master specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, specialty
electrician working in that electrician's specialty, master journeyman
electrician, or journeyman electrician, except that the ratio
requirements are one certified master specialty electrician working in
that electrician's specialty, specialty electrician working in that
electrician's specialty, master journeyman electrician, or journeyman
electrician working as a specialty electrician to no more than four
students enrolled in and working as part of an electrical construction
program at public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit
nationally accredited trade or technical schools licensed by the
((workforce training and)) higher education coordinating board ((under
chapter 28C.10 RCW)) or its successor agency. In meeting the ratio
requirements for students enrolled in an electrical construction
program at a trade school, a trade school may receive input and advice
from the electrical board; and
(b) When working as a journeyman electrician, not more than one
noncertified individual for every certified master journeyman
electrician or journeyman electrician, except that the ratio
requirements shall be one certified master journeyman electrician or
journeyman electrician to no more than four students enrolled in and
working as part of an electrical construction program at public
community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited trade or technical schools licensed by the ((workforce
training and)) higher education coordinating board ((under chapter
28C.10 RCW)) or its successor agency. In meeting the ratio
requirements for students enrolled in an electrical construction
program at a trade school, a trade school may receive input and advice
from the electrical board.
An individual who has a current training certificate and who has
successfully completed or is currently enrolled in an approved
apprenticeship program or in an electrical construction program at
public community or technical colleges, or not-for-profit nationally
accredited technical or trade schools licensed by the ((workforce
training and)) higher education coordinating board ((under chapter
28C.10 RCW)) or its successor agency, may work without direct on-site
supervision during the last six months of meeting the practical
experience requirements of this chapter.
(5) For the residential (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(a)),
pump and irrigation (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(b)), sign (as
specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(d)), limited energy (as specified in
WAC 296-46B-920(2)(e)), nonresidential maintenance (as specified in WAC
296-46B-920(2)(g)), restricted nonresidential maintenance as determined
by the department in rule, or other new nonresidential specialties, not
including appliance repair, as determined by the department in rule,
either a master journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master
specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or
specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty must be
on the same job site as the noncertified individual for a minimum of
seventy-five percent of each working day. Other specialties must meet
the requirements specified in RCW 19.28.191(1)(g)(ii). When the ratio
of certified electricians to noncertified individuals on a job site is
one certified electrician to three or four noncertified individuals,
the certified electrician must:
(a) Directly supervise and instruct the noncertified individuals
and the certified electrician may not directly make or engage in an
electrical installation; and
(b) Be on the same job site as the noncertified individual for a
minimum of one hundred percent of each working day.
(6) The electrical contractor shall accurately verify and attest to
the electrical trainee hours worked by electrical trainees on behalf of
the electrical contractor.

Sec. 8 RCW 19.28.191 and 2006 c 185 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Upon receipt of the application, the department shall review
the application and determine whether the applicant is eligible to take
an examination for the master journeyman electrician, journeyman
electrician, master specialty electrician, or specialty electrician
certificate of competency.
(a) Before July 1, 2005, an applicant who possesses a valid
journeyman electrician certificate of competency in effect for the
previous four years and a valid general administrator's certificate may
apply for a master journeyman electrician certificate of competency
without examination.
(b) Before July 1, 2005, an applicant who possesses a valid
specialty electrician certificate of competency, in the specialty
applied for, for the previous two years and a valid specialty
administrator's certificate, in the specialty applied for, may apply
for a master specialty electrician certificate of competency without
examination.
(c) Before December 1, 2003, the following persons may obtain an
equipment repair specialty electrician certificate of competency
without examination:
(i) A person who has successfully completed an apprenticeship
program approved under chapter 49.04 RCW for the machinist trade; and
(ii) A person who provides evidence in a form prescribed by the
department affirming that: (A) He or she was employed as of April 1,
2003, by a factory-authorized equipment dealer or service company; and
(B) he or she has worked in equipment repair for a minimum of four
thousand hours.
(d) To be eligible to take the examination for a master journeyman
electrician certificate of competency the applicant must have possessed
a valid journeyman electrician certificate of competency for four
years.
(e) To be eligible to take the examination for a master specialty
electrician certificate of competency the applicant must have possessed
a valid specialty electrician certificate of competency, in the
specialty applied for, for two years.
(f) To be eligible to take the examination for a journeyman
certificate of competency the applicant must have:
(i) Worked in the electrical construction trade for a minimum of
eight thousand hours, of which four thousand hours shall be in
industrial or commercial electrical installation under the supervision
of a master journeyman electrician or journeyman electrician and not
more than a total of four thousand hours in all specialties under the
supervision of a master journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician,
master specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty,
or specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty.
Speciality electricians with less than a four thousand hour work
experience requirement cannot credit the time required to obtain that
specialty towards qualifying to become a journeyman electrician; or
(ii) Successfully completed an apprenticeship program approved
under chapter 49.04 RCW for the electrical construction trade.
(g) To be eligible to take the examination for a specialty
electrician certificate of competency the applicant must have:
(i) Worked in the residential (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(a)), pump and irrigation (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(b)), sign (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(d)), limited
energy (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(e)), nonresidential
maintenance (as specified in WAC 296-46B-920(2)(g)), or other new
nonresidential specialties as determined by the department in rule
under the supervision of a master journeyman electrician, journeyman
electrician, master specialty electrician working in that electrician's
specialty, or specialty electrician working in that electrician's
specialty for a minimum of four thousand hours;
(ii) Worked in the appliance repair specialty as determined by the
department in rule, restricted nonresidential maintenance as determined
by the department in rule, the equipment repair specialty as determined
by the department in rule, the pump and irrigation specialty other than
as defined by (g)(i) of this subsection or domestic pump specialty as
determined by the department in rule, or a specialty other than the
designated specialties in (g)(i) of this subsection for a minimum of
the initial ninety days, or longer if set by rule by the department.
The restricted nonresidential maintenance specialty is limited to a
maximum of 277 volts and 20 amperes for lighting branch circuits and/or
a maximum of 250 volts and 60 amperes for other circuits, but excludes
the replacement or repair of circuit breakers. The initial period must
be spent under one hundred percent supervision of a master journeyman
electrician, journeyman electrician, master specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty, or specialty electrician
working in that electrician's specialty. After this initial period, a
person may take the specialty examination. If the person passes the
examination, the person may work unsupervised for the balance of the
minimum hours required for certification. A person may not be
certified as a specialty electrician in the appliance repair specialty
or in a specialty other than the designated specialities in (g)(i) of
this subsection, however, until the person has worked a minimum of two
thousand hours in that specialty, or longer if set by rule by the
department;
(iii) Successfully completed an approved apprenticeship program
under chapter 49.04 RCW for the applicant's specialty in the electrical
construction trade; or
(iv) In meeting the training requirements for the pump and
irrigation or domestic pump specialties, the individual shall be
allowed to obtain the experience required by this section at the same
time the individual is meeting the experience required by RCW
18.106.040(1)(c). After meeting the training requirements provided in
this section, the individual may take the examination and upon passing
the examination, meeting additional training requirements as may still
be required for those seeking a pump and irrigation, or a domestic pump
specialty certificate as defined by rule, and paying the applicable
fees, the individual must be issued the appropriate certificate. The
department may include an examination for specialty plumbing
certificate defined in RCW 18.106.010(10)(c) with the examination
required by this section. The department, by rule and in consultation
with the electrical board, may establish additional equivalent ways to
gain the experience requirements required by this subsection.
Individuals who are able to provide evidence to the department, prior
to January 1, 2007, that they have been employed as a pump installer in
the pump and irrigation or domestic pump business by an appropriately
licensed electrical contractor, registered general contractor defined
by chapter 18.27 RCW, or appropriate general specialty contractor
defined by chapter 18.27 RCW for not less than eight thousand hours in
the most recent six calendar years shall be issued the appropriate
certificate by the department upon receiving such documentation and
applicable fees. The department shall establish a single document for
those who have received both an electrical specialty certification as
defined by this subsection and have also met the certification
requirements for the specialty plumber as defined by RCW
18.106.010(10)(c), showing that the individual has received both
certifications. No other experience or training requirements may be
imposed.
(h) Any applicant for a journeyman electrician certificate of
competency who has successfully completed a two-year program in the
electrical construction trade at public community or technical
colleges, or not-for-profit nationally accredited technical or trade
schools licensed by the ((workforce training and)) higher education
coordinating board ((under chapter 28C.10 RCW)) or its successor agency
may substitute up to two years of the technical or trade school program
for two years of work experience under a master journeyman electrician
or journeyman electrician. The applicant shall obtain the additional
two years of work experience required in industrial or commercial
electrical installation prior to the beginning, or after the
completion, of the technical school program. Any applicant who has
received training in the electrical construction trade in the armed
service of the United States may be eligible to apply armed service
work experience towards qualification to take the examination for the
journeyman electrician certificate of competency.
(i) An applicant for a specialty electrician certificate of
competency who, after January 1, 2000, has successfully completed a
two-year program in the electrical construction trade at a public
community or technical college, or a not-for-profit nationally
accredited technical or trade school licensed by the ((workforce
training and)) higher education coordinating board ((under chapter
28C.10 RCW)) or its successor agency, may substitute up to one year of
the technical or trade school program for one year of work experience
under a master journeyman electrician, journeyman electrician, master
specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty, or
specialty electrician working in that electrician's specialty. Any
applicant who has received training in the electrical construction
trade in the armed services of the United States may be eligible to
apply armed service work experience towards qualification to take the
examination for an appropriate specialty electrician certificate of
competency.
(j) The department must determine whether hours of training and
experience in the armed services or school program are in the
electrical construction trade and appropriate as a substitute for hours
of work experience. The department must use the following criteria for
evaluating the equivalence of classroom electrical training programs
and work in the electrical construction trade:
(i) A two-year electrical training program must consist of three
thousand or more hours.
(ii) In a two-year electrical training program, a minimum of two
thousand four hundred hours of student/instructor contact time must be
technical electrical instruction directly related to the scope of work
of the electrical specialty. Student/instructor contact time includes
lecture and in-school lab.
(iii) The department may not allow credit for a program that
accepts more than one thousand hours transferred from another school's
program.
(iv) Electrical specialty training school programs of less than two
years will have all of the above student/instructor contact time hours
proportionately reduced. Such programs may not apply to more than
fifty percent of the work experience required to attain certification.
(v) Electrical training programs of less than two years may not be
credited towards qualification for journeyman electrician unless the
training program is used to gain qualification for a four thousand hour
electrical specialty.
(k) No other requirement for eligibility may be imposed.
(2) The department shall establish reasonable rules for the
examinations to be given applicants for certificates of competency. In
establishing the rules, the department shall consult with the board.
Upon determination that the applicant is eligible to take the
examination, the department shall so notify the applicant, indicating
the time and place for taking the examination.
(3) No noncertified individual may work unsupervised more than one
year beyond the date when the trainee would be eligible to test for a
certificate of competency if working on a full-time basis after
original application for the trainee certificate. For the purposes of
this section, full-time basis means two thousand hours.

Sec. 9 RCW 24.50.010 and 2011 c 310 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Washington manufacturing services is organized as a private,
nonprofit corporation in accordance with chapter 24.03 RCW and this
section. The mission of the corporation is to operate a modernization
extension system, coordinate a network of public and private
modernization resources, and stimulate the competitiveness of small and
midsize manufacturers in Washington.
(2) The corporation must be governed by a board of directors. A
majority of the board of directors shall be representatives of small
and medium-sized manufacturing firms and industry associations,
networks, or consortia. The board must also include at least one
member representing labor unions or labor councils and, as ex officio
members, the director of the department of commerce((,)) and the
executive director of the state board for community and technical
colleges, ((and the director of the workforce training and education
coordinating board,)) or their respective designees.
(3) The corporation may be known as impact Washington and may:
(a) Charge fees for services, make and execute contracts with any
individual, corporation, association, public agency, or any other
entity, and employ all other legal instruments necessary or convenient
for the performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers and
functions under this chapter; and
(b) Receive funds from federal, state, or local governments,
private businesses, foundations, or any other source for purposes
consistent with this chapter.
(4) The corporation must:
(a) Develop policies, plans, and programs to assist in the
modernization of businesses in targeted sectors of Washington's economy
and coordinate the delivery of modernization services;
(b) Provide information about the advantages of modernization and
the modernization services available in the state to federal, state,
and local economic development officials, state colleges and
universities, and private providers;
(c) Collaborate with the Washington quality initiative in the
development of manufacturing quality standards and quality
certification programs;
(d) Collaborate with industry sector and cluster associations to
inform import-impacted manufacturers about federal trade adjustment
assistance funding;
(e) Serve as an information clearinghouse and provide access for
users to the federal manufacturing extension partnership national
research and information system; and
(f) Provide, either directly or through contracts, assistance to
industry or cluster associations, networks, or consortia, that would be
of value to their member firms in:
(i) Adopting advanced business management practices such as
strategic planning and total quality management;
(ii) Developing mechanisms for interfirm collaboration and
cooperation;
(iii) Appraising, purchasing, installing, and effectively using
equipment, technologies, and processes that improve the quality of
goods and services and the productivity of the firm;
(iv) Improving human resource systems and workforce training in a
manner that moves firms toward flexible, high-performance work
organizations;
(v) Developing new products;
(vi) Conducting market research, analysis, and development of new
sales channels and export markets;
(vii) Improving processes to enhance environmental, health, and
safety compliance; and
(viii) Improving credit, capital management, and business finance
skills.
(5) Between thirty-five and sixty-five percent of the funds
received by the corporation from the state must be used by the
corporation for carrying out the duties under subsection (4)(f) of this
section, consistent with the intent of RCW 24.50.005(2).

Sec. 10 RCW 28A.175.035 and 2011 c 288 s 9 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall:
(a) Identify criteria for grants and evaluate proposals for funding
((in consultation with the workforce training and education
coordinating board));
(b) Develop and monitor requirements for grant recipients to:
(i) Identify students who both fail the ((Washington)) statewide
student assessment ((of student learning)) and drop out of school;
(ii) Identify their own strengths and gaps in services provided to
youth;
(iii) Set their own local goals for program outcomes;
(iv) Use research-based and emerging best practices that lead to
positive outcomes in implementing the building bridges program; and
(v) Coordinate an outreach campaign to bring public and private
organizations together and to provide information about the building
bridges program to the local community;
(c) In setting the requirements under (b) of this subsection,
encourage creativity and provide for flexibility in implementing the
local building bridges program;
(d) Identify and disseminate successful practices;
(e) Develop requirements for grant recipients to collect and report
data, including, but not limited to:
(i) The number of and demographics of students served including,
but not limited to, information regarding a student's race and
ethnicity, a student's household income, a student's housing status,
whether a student is a foster youth or youth involved in the juvenile
justice system, whether a student is disabled, and the primary language
spoken at a student's home;
(ii) ((Washington)) Statewide student assessment ((of student
learning)) scores;
(iii) Dropout rates;
(iv) On-time graduation rates;
(v) Extended graduation rates;
(vi) Credentials obtained;
(vii) Absenteeism rates;
(viii) Truancy rates; and
(ix) Credit retrieval;
(f) Contract with a third party to evaluate the infrastructure and
implementation of the partnership including the leveraging of outside
resources that relate to the goal of the partnership. The third-party
contractor shall also evaluate the performance and effectiveness of the
partnerships relative to the type of entity, as identified in RCW
28A.175.045, serving as the lead agency for the partnership; and
(g) Report to the legislature by December 1, 2008.
(2) In performing its duties under this section, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction is encouraged to consult with the
work group identified in RCW 28A.175.075.
(3) In selecting recipients for grant funds appropriated under RCW
28A.175.135, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall use a streamlined and expedited application and review process
for those programs that have already proven to be successful in dropout
prevention.

Sec. 11 RCW 28A.175.075 and 2010 c 243 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
establish a state-level building bridges work group that includes K-12
and state agencies that work with youth who have dropped out or are at
risk of dropping out of school. The following agencies shall appoint
representatives to the work group: The office of the superintendent of
public instruction, ((the workforce training and education coordinating
board,)) the department of early learning, the employment security
department, the state board for community and technical colleges, the
department of health, the community mobilization office, and the
children's services and behavioral health and recovery divisions of the
department of social and health services. The work group should also
consist of one representative from each of the following agencies and
organizations: A statewide organization representing career and
technical education programs including skill centers; the juvenile
courts or the office of juvenile justice, or both; the Washington
association of prosecuting attorneys; the Washington state office of
public defense; accredited institutions of higher education; the
educational service districts; the area workforce development councils;
parent and educator associations; ((achievement)) educational
opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee; office of the
education ombudsman; local school districts; agencies or organizations
that provide services to special education students; community
organizations serving youth; federally recognized tribes and urban
tribal centers; each of the major political caucuses of the senate and
house of representatives; and the minority commissions.
(2) To assist and enhance the work of the building bridges programs
established in RCW 28A.175.025, the state-level work group shall:
(a) Identify and make recommendations to the legislature for the
reduction of fiscal, legal, and regulatory barriers that prevent
coordination of program resources across agencies at the state and
local level;
(b) Develop and track performance measures and benchmarks for each
partner agency or organization across the state including performance
measures and benchmarks based on student characteristics and outcomes
specified in RCW 28A.175.035(1)(e); and
(c) Identify research-based and emerging best practices regarding
prevention, intervention, and retrieval programs.
(3)(a) The work group shall report to the quality education
council, appropriate committees of the legislature, and the governor on
an annual basis beginning December 1, 2007, with proposed strategies
for building K-12 dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement
systems in local communities throughout the state including, but not
limited to, recommendations for implementing emerging best practices,
needed additional resources, and eliminating barriers.
(b) By September 15, 2010, the work group shall report on:
(i) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the
percentage of students graduating from high school;
(ii) A recommended state goal and annual state targets for the
percentage of youth who have dropped out of school who should be
reengaged in education and be college and work ready;
(iii) Recommended funding for supporting career guidance and the
planning and implementation of K-12 dropout prevention, intervention,
and reengagement systems in school districts and a plan for phasing the
funding into the program of basic education, beginning in the 2011-2013
biennium; and
(iv) A plan for phasing in the expansion of the current school
improvement planning program to include state-funded, dropout-focused
school improvement technical assistance for school districts in
significant need of improvement regarding high school graduation rates.
(4) State agencies in the building bridges work group shall work
together, wherever feasible, on the following activities to support
school/family/community partnerships engaged in building K-12 dropout
prevention, intervention, and reengagement systems:
(a) Providing opportunities for coordination and flexibility of
program eligibility and funding criteria;
(b) Providing joint funding;
(c) Developing protocols and templates for model agreements on
sharing records and data;
(d) Providing joint professional development opportunities that
provide knowledge and training on:
(i) Research-based and promising practices;
(ii) The availability of programs and services for vulnerable
youth; and
(iii) Cultural competence.
(5) The building bridges work group shall make recommendations to
the governor and the legislature by December 1, 2010, on a state-level
and regional infrastructure for coordinating services for vulnerable
youth. Recommendations must address the following issues:
(a) Whether to adopt an official conceptual approach or framework
for all entities working with vulnerable youth that can support
coordinated planning and evaluation;
(b) The creation of a performance-based management system,
including outcomes, indicators, and performance measures relating to
vulnerable youth and programs serving them, including accountability
for the dropout issue;
(c) The development of regional and/or county-level multipartner
youth consortia with a specific charge to assist school districts and
local communities in building K-12 comprehensive dropout prevention,
intervention, and reengagement systems;
(d) The development of integrated or school-based one-stop shopping
for services that would:
(i) Provide individualized attention to the neediest youth and
prioritized access to services for students identified by a dropout
early warning and intervention data system;
(ii) Establish protocols for coordinating data and services,
including getting data release at time of intake and common assessment
and referral processes; and
(iii) Build a system of single case managers across agencies;
(e) Launching a statewide media campaign on increasing the high
school graduation rate; and
(f) Developing a statewide database of available services for
vulnerable youth.

Sec. 12 RCW 28A.175.115 and 2010 c 20 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt rules to implement RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.110.
(2) When adopting rules under this section and developing model
interlocal agreements and contracts under RCW 28A.175.110, the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall consult with the
state board for community and technical colleges, ((the workforce
training and education coordinating board,)) colleges and community-based organizations that have previously offered dropout reengagement
programs, providers of online courses and programs approved under RCW
28A.250.020, school districts, and educational service districts.

Sec. 13 RCW 28A.175.130 and 2011 c 288 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The pay for actual student success (PASS) program is created
under this section and RCW 28A.175.135 through 28A.175.160 to invest in
proven dropout prevention and intervention programs as provided in RCW
28A.175.135 and provide a financial award for high schools that
demonstrate improvement in the dropout prevention indicators
established under RCW 28A.175.140. The legislature finds that
increased accumulation of credits and reductions in incidents of
student discipline lead to improved graduation rates.
(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, ((the
workforce training and education coordinating board,)) the building
bridges working group, the higher education coordinating board, and the
college scholarship organization under RCW 28A.175.135(4) shall
collaborate to assure that the programs under RCW 28A.175.135 operate
systematically and are expanded to include as many additional students
and schools as possible.

Sec. 14 RCW 28A.230.100 and 2006 c 263 s 402 and 2006 c 114 s 4
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the
higher education coordinating board((,)) and the state board for
community and technical colleges, ((and the workforce training and
education coordinating board,)) shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter
34.05 RCW, to implement the course requirements set forth in RCW
28A.230.090. The rules shall include, as the superintendent deems
necessary, granting equivalencies for and temporary exemptions from the
course requirements in RCW 28A.230.090 and special alterations of the
course requirements in RCW 28A.230.090. In developing such rules the
superintendent shall recognize the relevance of vocational and applied
courses and allow such courses to fulfill in whole or in part the
courses required for graduation in RCW 28A.230.090, as determined by
the high school or school district in accordance with RCW 28A.230.097.
The rules may include provisions for competency testing in lieu of such
courses required for graduation in RCW 28A.230.090 or demonstration of
specific skill proficiency or understanding of concepts through work or
experience.

Sec. 15 RCW 28A.230.125 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 130 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with
the four-year institutions as defined in RCW 28B.76.020((,)) and the
state board for community and technical colleges((, and the workforce
training and education coordinating board)), shall develop for use by
all public school districts a standardized high school transcript. The
superintendent shall establish clear definitions for the terms
"credits" and "hours" so that school programs operating on the quarter,
semester, or trimester system can be compared.
(2) The standardized high school transcript shall include a
notation of whether the student has earned a certificate of individual
achievement or a certificate of academic achievement.

Sec. 16 RCW 28A.245.030 and 2008 c 179 s 302 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
review and revise the guidelines for skill centers to encourage skill
center programs. The superintendent, in cooperation with ((the
workforce training and education coordinating board,)) skill center
directors, and the Washington association for career and technical
education, shall review and revise the existing skill centers' policy
guidelines and create and adopt rules governing skill centers as
follows:
(a) The threshold enrollment at a skill center shall be revised so
that a skill center program need not have a minimum of seventy percent
of its students enrolled on the skill center core campus in order to
facilitate serving rural students through expansion of skill center
programs by means of satellite programs or branch campuses;
(b) The developmental planning for branch campuses shall be
encouraged. Underserved rural areas or high-density areas may partner
with an existing skill center to create satellite programs or a branch
campus. Once a branch campus reaches sufficient enrollment to become
self-sustaining, it may become a separate skill center or remain an
extension of the founding skill center; and
(c) Satellite and branch campus programs shall be encouraged to
address high-demand fields.
(2) Rules adopted under this section shall allow for innovative
models of satellite and branch campus programs, and such programs shall
not be limited to those housed in physical buildings.
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop and
deliver a ten-year capital plan for legislative review before
implementation. The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt
rules that set as a goal a ten percent minimum local project
contribution threshold for major skill center projects, unless there is
a compelling rationale not to do so, including but not limited to local
economic conditions, as determined by the superintendent of public
instruction. This applies to the acquisition or major capital costs of
skill center projects as outlined in the ten-year capital plan.
(4) Subject to available funding, the superintendent shall:
(a) Conduct approved feasibility studies for serving noncooperative
rural and high-density area students in their geographic areas; and
(b) Develop a statewide master plan that identifies standards and
resources needed to create a technology infrastructure for connecting
all skill centers to the K-20 network.

Sec. 17 RCW 28A.300.515 and 2007 c 396 s 15 are each amended to
read as follows:
The superintendent of public instruction shall provide support for
statewide coordination for math, science, and technology, including
employing a statewide director for math, science, and technology. The
duties of the director shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, obtain a
statewide license, or otherwise obtain and disseminate, an interactive,
project-based high school and middle school technology curriculum that
includes a comprehensive professional development component for
teachers and, if possible, counselors, and also includes a systematic
program evaluation. The curriculum must be distributed to all school
districts, or as many as feasible, by the 2007-08 school year;
(2) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, supporting a
public-private partnership to assist school districts with implementing
an ongoing, inquiry-based science program that is based on a research-based model of systemic reform and aligned with the Washington state
science grade level expectations;
(3) Within funds specifically appropriated therefor, supporting a
public-private partnership to provide enriching opportunities in
mathematics, engineering, and science for underrepresented students in
grades kindergarten through twelve using exemplary materials and
instructional approaches;
(4) In an effort to increase precollege and prework interest in
math, science, and technology fields, in collaboration with the
community and technical colleges((,)) and the four-year institutions of
higher education, ((and the workforce training and education
coordinating board,)) conducting outreach efforts to attract middle and
high school students to careers in math, science, and technology and to
educate students about the coursework that is necessary to be
adequately prepared to succeed in these fields;
(5) Coordinating youth opportunities in math, science, and
technology, including facilitating student participation in school
clubs, state-level fairs, national competitions, and encouraging
partnerships between students and university faculty or industry to
facilitate such student participation;
(6) Developing and maintaining public-private partnerships to
generate business and industry assistance to accomplish the following:
(a) Increasing student engagement and career awareness, including
increasing student participation in the youth opportunities in
subsection (5) of this section;
(b) Creation and promotion of student scholarships, internships,
and apprenticeships;
(c) Provision of relevant teacher experience and training,
including on-the-job professional development opportunities;
(d) Upgrading kindergarten through twelfth grade school equipment
and facilities to support high quality math, science, and technology
programs;
(7) Assembling a cadre of inspiring speakers employed or
experienced in the relevant fields to speak to kindergarten through
twelfth grade students to demonstrate the breadth of the opportunities
in the relevant fields as well as share the types of coursework that
((is [are])) are necessary for someone to be successful in the relevant
field;
(8) Providing technical assistance to schools and school districts,
including working with counselors in support of the math, science, and
technology programs; and
(9) Reporting annually to the legislature about the actions taken
to provide statewide coordination for math, science, and technology.

Sec. 18 RCW 28A.600.280 and 2009 c 450 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
collaboration with the state board for community and technical
colleges, the Washington state apprenticeship and training council,
((the workforce training and education coordinating board,)) the higher
education coordinating board, and the public baccalaureate
institutions, shall report by September 1, 2010, and annually
thereafter to the education and higher education committees of the
legislature regarding participation in dual credit programs. The
report shall include:
(a) Data about student participation rates and academic performance
including but not limited to running start, college in the high school,
tech prep, international baccalaureate, advanced placement, and running
start for the trades;
(b) Data on the total unduplicated head count of students enrolled
in at least one dual credit program course; and
(c) The percentage of students who enrolled in at least one dual
credit program as percent of all students enrolled in grades nine
through twelve.
(2) Data on student participation shall be disaggregated by race,
ethnicity, gender, and receipt of free or reduced-price lunch.

Sec. 19 RCW 28A.650.015 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 725 and 2011
1st sp.s. c 11 s 133 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The superintendent of public instruction, to the extent funds
are appropriated, shall develop and implement a Washington state K-12
education technology plan. The technology plan shall be updated on at
least a biennial basis, shall be developed to coordinate and expand the
use of education technology in the common schools of the state. The
plan shall be consistent with applicable provisions of chapter 43.105
RCW. The plan, at a minimum, shall address:
(a) The provision of technical assistance to schools and school
districts for the planning, implementation, and training of staff in
the use of technology in curricular and administrative functions;
(b) The continued development of a network to connect school
districts, institutions of higher learning, and other sources of online
information; and
(c) Methods to equitably increase the use of education technology
by students and school personnel throughout the state.
(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall appoint an
educational technology advisory committee to assist in the development
and implementation of the technology plan in subsection (1) of this
section. The committee shall include, but is not limited to, persons
representing: The office of the chief information officer, educational
service districts, school directors, school administrators, school
principals, teachers, classified staff, higher education faculty,
parents, students, business, labor, scientists and mathematicians,
((the workforce training and education coordinating board,)) and the
state library.
(3) The plan adopted and implemented under this section may not
impose on school districts any requirements that are not specifically
required by federal law or regulation, including requirements to
maintain eligibility for the federal schools and libraries program of
the universal service fund.

Sec. 20 RCW 28A.655.065 and 2009 c 556 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature has made a commitment to rigorous academic
standards for receipt of a high school diploma. The primary way that
students will demonstrate that they meet the standards in reading,
writing, mathematics, and science is through the ((Washington))
statewide student assessment ((of student learning)). Only objective
assessments that are comparable in rigor to the state assessment are
authorized as an alternative assessment. Before seeking an alternative
assessment, the legislature expects students to make a genuine effort
to meet state standards, through regular and consistent attendance at
school and participation in extended learning and other assistance
programs.
(2) Under RCW 28A.655.061, beginning in the 2006-07 school year,
the superintendent of public instruction shall implement objective
alternative assessment methods as provided in this section for students
to demonstrate achievement of the state standards in content areas in
which the student has not yet met the standard on the high school
((Washington)) statewide student assessment ((of student learning)).
A student may access an alternative if the student meets applicable
eligibility criteria in RCW 28A.655.061 and this section and other
eligibility criteria established by the superintendent of public
instruction, including but not limited to attendance criteria and
participation in the remediation or supplemental instruction contained
in the student learning plan developed under RCW 28A.655.061. A school
district may waive attendance and/or remediation criteria for special,
unavoidable circumstances.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "applicant" means a student
seeking to use one of the alternative assessment methods in this
section.
(4) One alternative assessment method shall be a combination of the
applicant's grades in applicable courses and the applicant's highest
score on the high school ((Washington)) statewide student assessment
((of student learning)), as provided in this subsection. A student is
eligible to apply for the alternative assessment method under this
subsection (4) if the student has a cumulative grade point average of
at least 3.2 on a four point grading scale. The superintendent of
public instruction shall determine which high school courses are
applicable to the alternative assessment method and shall issue
guidelines to school districts.
(a) Using guidelines prepared by the superintendent of public
instruction, a school district shall identify the group of students in
the same school as the applicant who took the same high school courses
as the applicant in the applicable content area. From the group of
students identified in this manner, the district shall select the
comparison cohort that shall be those students who met or slightly
exceeded the state standard on the ((Washington)) statewide student
assessment ((of student learning)).
(b) The district shall compare the applicant's grades in high
school courses in the applicable content area to the grades of students
in the comparison cohort for the same high school courses. If the
applicant's grades are equal to or above the mean grades of the
comparison cohort, the applicant shall be deemed to have met the state
standard on the alternative assessment.
(c) An applicant may not use the alternative assessment under this
subsection (4) if there are fewer than six students in the comparison
cohort.
(5) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop an
alternative assessment method that shall be an evaluation of a
collection of work samples prepared and submitted by the applicant.
Effective September 1, 2009, collection of work samples may be
submitted only in content areas where meeting the state standard on the
high school assessment is required for purposes of graduation.
(a) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
guidelines for the types and number of work samples in each content
area that may be submitted as a collection of evidence that the
applicant has met the state standard in that content area. Work
samples may be collected from academic, career and technical, or
remedial courses and may include performance tasks as well as written
products. The superintendent shall submit the guidelines for approval
by the state board of education.
(b) The superintendent shall develop protocols for submission of
the collection of work samples that include affidavits from the
applicant's teachers and school district that the samples are the work
of the applicant and a requirement that a portion of the samples be
prepared under the direct supervision of a classroom teacher. The
superintendent shall submit the protocols for approval by the state
board of education.
(c) The superintendent shall develop uniform scoring criteria for
evaluating the collection of work samples and submit the scoring
criteria for approval by the state board of education. Collections
shall be scored at the state level or regionally by a panel of
educators selected and trained by the superintendent to ensure
objectivity, reliability, and rigor in the evaluation. An educator may
not score work samples submitted by applicants from the educator's
school district. If the panel awards an applicant's collection of work
samples the minimum required score, the applicant shall be deemed to
have met the state standard on the alternative assessment.
(d) Using an open and public process that includes consultation
with district superintendents, school principals, and other educators,
the state board of education shall consider the guidelines, protocols,
scoring criteria, and other information regarding the collection of
work samples submitted by the superintendent of public instruction.
The collection of work samples may be implemented as an alternative
assessment after the state board of education has approved the
guidelines, protocols, and scoring criteria and determined that the
collection of work samples: (i) Will meet professionally accepted
standards for a valid and reliable measure of the grade level
expectations and the essential academic learning requirements; and (ii)
is comparable to or exceeds the rigor of the skills and knowledge that
a student must demonstrate on the ((Washington)) statewide student
assessment ((of student learning)) in the applicable content area. The
state board shall make an approval decision and determination no later
than December 1, 2006, and thereafter may increase the required rigor
of the collection of work samples.
(e) By September of 2006, the superintendent of public instruction
shall develop informational materials for parents, teachers, and
students regarding the collection of work samples and the status of its
development as an alternative assessment method. The materials shall
provide specific guidance regarding the type and number of work samples
likely to be required, include examples of work that meets the state
learning standards, and describe the scoring criteria and process for
the collection. The materials shall also encourage students in the
graduating class of 2008 to begin creating a collection if they believe
they may seek to use the collection once it is implemented as an
alternative assessment.
(6)(a) For students enrolled in a career and technical education
program approved under RCW 28A.700.030, the superintendent of public
instruction shall develop additional guidelines for collections of work
samples that are tailored to different career and technical programs.
The additional guidelines shall:
(i) Provide multiple examples of work samples that are related to
the particular career and technical program;
(ii) Permit work samples based on completed activities or projects
where demonstration of academic knowledge is inferred; and
(iii) Provide multiple examples of work samples drawn from career
and technical courses.
(b) The purpose of the additional guidelines is to provide a clear
pathway toward a certificate of academic achievement for career and
technical students by showing them applied and relevant opportunities
to demonstrate their knowledge and skills, and to provide guidance to
teachers in integrating academic and career and technical instruction
and assessment and assisting career and technical students in compiling
a collection. The superintendent of public instruction shall develop
and disseminate additional guidelines for no fewer than ten career and
technical education programs representing a variety of program
offerings by no later than September 1, 2008. Guidelines for ten
additional programs shall be developed and disseminated no later than
June 1, 2009.
(c) The superintendent shall consult with community and technical
colleges, employers, ((the workforce training and education
coordinating board,)) apprenticeship programs, and other regional and
national experts in career and technical education to create
appropriate guidelines and examples of work samples and other evidence
of a career and technical student's knowledge and skills on the state
academic standards.
(7) The superintendent of public instruction shall study the
feasibility of using existing mathematics assessments in languages
other than English as an additional alternative assessment option. The
study shall include an estimation of the cost of translating the tenth
grade mathematics assessment into other languages and scoring the
assessments should they be implemented.
(8) The superintendent of public instruction shall implement:
(a) By June 1, 2006, a process for students to appeal the score
they received on the high school assessments; and
(b) By January 1, 2007, guidelines and appeal processes for waiving
specific requirements in RCW 28A.655.061 pertaining to the certificate
of academic achievement and to the certificate of individual
achievement for students who: (i) Transfer to a Washington public
school in their junior or senior year with the intent of obtaining a
public high school diploma, or (ii) have special, unavoidable
circumstances.
(9) The state board of education shall examine opportunities for
additional alternative assessments, including the possible use of one
or more standardized norm-referenced student achievement tests and the
possible use of the reading, writing, or mathematics portions of the
ACT ASSET and ACT COMPASS test instruments as objective alternative
assessments for demonstrating that a student has met the state
standards for the certificate of academic achievement. The state board
shall submit its findings and recommendations to the education
committees of the legislature by January 10, 2008.
(10) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
implement this section.

Sec. 21 RCW 28A.700.020 and 2008 c 170 s 102 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in
consultation with ((the workforce training and education coordinating
board,)) the Washington state apprenticeship and training council((,))
and the state board for community and technical colleges, shall develop
a list of statewide high-demand programs for secondary career and
technical education. The list shall be developed using the high-demand
list maintained by workforce development councils in consultation with
the employment security department, the high employer demand programs
of study identified by the workforce training and education
coordinating board, and the high employer demand programs of study
identified by the higher education coordinating board. Local school
districts may recommend additional high-demand programs in consultation
with local career and technical education advisory committees by
submitting evidence of local high demand.
(2) As used in this section and in RCW 28A.700.040, 28A.700.050,
and 28A.700.060, and section 307 of this act:
(a) "High-demand program" means a career and technical education
program that prepares students for either a high employer demand
program of study or a high-demand occupation, or both.
(b) "High employer demand program of study" means an apprenticeship
or an undergraduate or graduate certificate or degree program in which
the number of students per year prepared for employment from in-state
programs is substantially fewer than the number of projected job
openings per year in that field, either statewide or in a substate
region.
(c) "High-demand occupation" means an occupation with a substantial
number of current or projected employment opportunities.

Sec. 22 RCW 28A.700.060 and 2008 c 170 s 107 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction, ((the
workforce training and education coordinating board,)) the state board
for community and technical colleges, the higher education coordinating
board, and the council of presidents shall work with local school
districts, workforce education programs in colleges, tech prep
consortia, and four-year institutions of higher education to develop
model career and technical education programs of study as described by
this section.
(2) Career and technical education programs of study:
(a) Incorporate secondary and postsecondary education elements;
(b) Include coherent and rigorous academic content aligned with
state learning standards and relevant career and technical content in
a coordinated, nonduplicative progression of courses that are aligned
with postsecondary education in a related field;
(c) Include opportunities for students to earn dual high school and
college credit; and
(d) Lead to an industry-recognized credential or certificate at the
postsecondary level, or an associate or baccalaureate degree.
(3) During the 2008-09 school year, model career and technical
education programs of study shall be developed for the following
high-demand programs: Construction, health care, and information
technology. Each school year thereafter, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and
technical colleges, and the higher education coordinating board((, and
the workforce training and education coordinating board)) shall select
additional programs of study to develop, with a priority on high-demand
programs as identified under RCW 28A.700.020.

Sec. 23 RCW 28A.700.080 and 2008 c 170 s 301 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and conduct an
ongoing campaign for career and technical education to increase
awareness among teachers, counselors, students, parents, principals,
school administrators, and the general public about the opportunities
offered by rigorous career and technical education programs. Messages
in the campaign shall emphasize career and technical education as a
high quality educational pathway for students, including for students
who seek advanced education that includes a bachelor's degree or
beyond. In particular, the office shall provide information about the
following:
(a) The model career and technical education programs of study
developed under RCW 28A.700.060;
(b) Career and technical education course equivalencies and dual
credit for high school and college;
(c) The career and technical education alternative assessment
guidelines under RCW 28A.655.065;
(d) The availability of scholarships for postsecondary workforce
education, including the Washington award for vocational excellence,
and apprenticeships through the opportunity grant program under RCW
28B.50.271, grants under RCW 28A.700.090, and other programs; and
(e) Education, apprenticeship, and career opportunities in emerging
and high-demand programs.
(2) The office shall use multiple strategies in the campaign
depending on available funds, including developing an interactive web
site to encourage and facilitate career exploration; conducting
training and orientation for guidance counselors and teachers; and
developing and disseminating printed materials.
(3) The office shall seek advice, participation, and financial
assistance from the ((workforce training and education coordinating
board,)) higher education institutions, foundations, employers,
apprenticeship and training councils, workforce development councils,
and business and labor organizations for the campaign.

Sec. 24 RCW 28B.04.080 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 135 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall consult and cooperate with the department of
social and health services; the superintendent of public instruction;
((the workforce training and education coordinating board;)) the
employment security department; the department of labor and industries;
sponsoring agencies under the federal comprehensive employment and
training act (87 Stat. 839; 29 U.S.C. Sec. 801 et seq.), and any other
persons or agencies as the board deems appropriate to facilitate the
coordination of centers established under this chapter with existing
programs of a similar nature.
(2) Annually on July 1st, each agency listed in subsection (1) of
this section shall submit a description of each service or program
under its jurisdiction which would support the programs and centers
established by this chapter and the funds available for such support.
(3) The board shall serve as a clearinghouse for displaced
homemaker information and resources and shall compile and disseminate
statewide information to the centers, related agencies, and interested
persons upon request.

Sec. 25 RCW 28B.15.545 and 2004 c 275 s 50 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing
boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges shall waive tuition
and services and activities fees for a maximum of two years for those
recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence
established under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.540 who received their
awards before June 30, 1994. Each recipient shall not receive a
waiver for more than six quarters or four semesters. To qualify for
the waiver, recipients shall enter the college or university within
three years of receiving the award. A minimum grade point average at
the college or university equivalent to 3.00, or an above-average
rating at a technical college, shall be required in the first year to
qualify for the second-year waiver. The tuition waiver shall be
granted for undergraduate studies only.
(2) Students named by the ((workforce training and)) higher
education coordinating board or its successor agency after June 30,
1994, as recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence
under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.550 shall be eligible to receive a
grant for undergraduate coursework as authorized under RCW 28B.76.670.

Sec. 26 RCW 28B.30.530 and 2010 c 165 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board of regents of Washington State University shall
establish the Washington State University small business development
center.
(2) The center shall provide management and technical assistance
including but not limited to training, counseling, and research
services to small businesses throughout the state. The center shall
work with the department of commerce, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, ((the
workforce training and education coordinating board,)) the employment
security department, the Washington state economic development
commission, associate development organizations, and workforce
development councils to:
(a) Integrate small business development centers with other state
and local economic development and workforce development programs;
(b) Target the centers' services to small businesses;
(c) Tailor outreach and services at each center to the needs and
demographics of entrepreneurs and small businesses located within the
service area;
(d) Establish and expand small business development center
satellite offices when financially feasible; and
(e) Coordinate delivery of services to avoid duplication.
(3) The administrator of the center may contract with other public
or private entities for the provision of specialized services.
(4) The small business development center may accept and disburse
federal grants or federal matching funds or other funds or donations
from any source when made, granted, or donated to carry out the
center's purposes. When drawing on funds from the business assistance
account created in RCW 28B.30.531, the center must first use the funds
to make increased management and technical assistance available to
existing small businesses and start-up businesses at satellite offices.
The funds may also be used to develop and expand assistance programs
such as small business planning workshops and small business
counseling.
(5) By December 1, 2010, the center shall provide a written
progress report and a final report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature with respect to the requirements in subsection (2) of this
section and the amount and use of funding received through the business
assistance account. The reports must also include data on the number,
location, staffing, and budget levels of satellite offices;
affiliations with community colleges, associate development
organizations or other local organizations; the number, size, and type
of small businesses assisted; and the types of services provided. The
reports must also include information on the outcomes achieved, such as
jobs created or retained, private capital invested, and return on the
investment of state and federal dollars.
(6)(a) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this
specific purpose, by December 1, 2010, the center, in conjunction with
the department of commerce, must prepare and present to the governor
and appropriate legislative committees a specific, actionable plan to
increase access to capital and technical assistance to small businesses
and entrepreneurs beginning with the 2011-2013 biennium. In developing
the plan, the center and the department may consult with the Washington
state microenterprise association, and with other government,
nonprofit, and private organizations as necessary. The plan must
identify:
(i) Existing sources of capital and technical assistance for small
businesses and entrepreneurs;
(ii) Critical gaps and barriers to availability of capital and
delivery of technical assistance to small businesses and entrepreneurs;
(iii) Workable solutions to filling the gaps and removing barriers
identified in (a)(ii) of this subsection; and
(iv) The financial resources and statutory changes necessary to put
the plan into effect beginning with the 2011-2013 biennium.
(b) With respect to increasing access to capital, the plan must
identify specific, feasible sources of capital and practical mechanisms
for expanding access to it.
(c) The center and the department must include, within the analysis
and recommendations in (a) of this subsection, any specific gaps,
barriers, and solutions related to rural and low-income communities and
small manufacturers interested in exporting.

Sec. 27 RCW 28B.50.030 and 2009 c 353 s 1, 2009 c 151 s 3, and
2009 c 64 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
(1) "Adult education" means all education or instruction, including
academic, vocational education or training, basic skills and literacy
training, and "occupational education" provided by public educational
institutions, including common school districts for persons who are
eighteen years of age and over or who hold a high school diploma or
certificate. However, "adult education" shall not include academic
education or instruction for persons under twenty-one years of age who
do not hold a high school degree or diploma and who are attending a
public high school for the sole purpose of obtaining a high school
diploma or certificate, nor shall "adult education" include education
or instruction provided by any four-year public institution of higher
education.
(2) "Applied baccalaureate degree" means a baccalaureate degree
awarded by a college under RCW 28B.50.810 for successful completion of
a program of study that is:
(a) Specifically designed for individuals who hold an associate of
applied science degree, or its equivalent, in order to maximize
application of their technical course credits toward the baccalaureate
degree; and
(b) Based on a curriculum that incorporates both theoretical and
applied knowledge and skills in a specific technical field.
(3) (("Board" means the workforce training and education
coordinating board.
(4))) "Board of trustees" means the local community and technical
college board of trustees established for each college district within
the state.
(((5))) (4) "Center of excellence" means a community or technical
college designated by the college board as a statewide leader in
industry-specific, community and technical college workforce education
and training.
(((6))) (5) "College board" means the state board for community and
technical colleges created by this chapter.
(((7))) (6) "Common school board" means a public school district
board of directors.
(((8))) (7) "Community college" includes those higher education
institutions that conduct education programs under RCW 28B.50.020.
(((9))) (8) "Director" means the administrative director for the
state system of community and technical colleges.
(((10))) (9) "Dislocated forest product worker" means a forest
products worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in
the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of
a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or
industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or
her business because of the diminishing demand for the business'
services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from
employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources
impact area.
(((11))) (10) "Dislocated salmon fishing worker" means a finfish
products worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in
the individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of
a diminishing demand for his or her skills in that occupation or
industry; or (ii) is self-employed and has been displaced from his or
her business because of the diminishing demand for the business's
services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation from
employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources
impact area.
(((12))) (11) "District" means any one of the community and
technical college districts created by this chapter.
(((13))) (12) "Forest products worker" means a worker in the forest
products industries affected by the reduction of forest fiber
enhancement, transportation, or production. The workers included
within this definition shall be determined by the employment security
department, but shall include workers employed in the industries
assigned the major group standard industrial classification codes "24"
and "26" and the industries involved in the harvesting and management
of logs, transportation of logs and wood products, processing of wood
products, and the manufacturing and distribution of wood processing and
logging equipment. The commissioner may adopt rules further
interpreting these definitions. For the purposes of this subsection,
"standard industrial classification code" means the code identified in
RCW 50.29.025(3).
(((14))) (13) "High employer demand program of study" means an
apprenticeship, or an undergraduate or graduate certificate or degree
program in which the number of students prepared for employment per
year from in-state institutions is substantially less than the number
of projected job openings per year in that field, statewide or in a
substate region.
(((15))) (14) "K-12 system" means the public school program
including kindergarten through the twelfth grade.
(((16))) (15) "Occupational education" means education or training
that will prepare a student for employment that does not require a
baccalaureate degree, and education and training that will prepare a
student for transfer to bachelor's degrees in professional fields,
subject to rules adopted by the college board.
(((17))) (16) "Qualified institutions of higher education" means:
(a) Washington public community and technical colleges;
(b) Private career schools that are members of an accrediting
association recognized by rule of the higher education coordinating
board for the purposes of chapter 28B.92 RCW; and
(c) Washington state apprenticeship and training council-approved
apprenticeship programs.
(((18))) (17) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:
(a) A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial
census, that meets three of the five criteria set forth in subsection
(((19))) (18) of this section;
(b) A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty
thousand in the 1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five
criteria as set forth in subsection (((19))) (18) of this section; or
(c) A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census,
that is located in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five
criteria set forth in subsection (((19))) (18) of this section.
(((19))) (18) For the purposes of designating rural natural
resources impact areas, the following criteria shall be considered:
(a) A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(b) A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or
above the state average;
(c) Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses
of one hundred positions or more;
(d) Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses
of one hundred positions or more; and
(e) An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state
average. The counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by
the employment security department for the most recent year for which
data is available. For the purposes of administration of programs
under this chapter, the United States post office five-digit zip code
delivery areas will be used to determine residence status for
eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition, a zip code
delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an urbanized
area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by zip
codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also
considered nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make
available a zip code listing of the areas to all agencies and
organizations providing services under this chapter.
(((20))) (19) "Salmon fishing worker" means a worker in the finfish
industry affected by 1994 or future salmon disasters. The workers
included within this definition shall be determined by the employment
security department, but shall include workers employed in the
industries involved in the commercial and recreational harvesting of
finfish including buying and processing finfish. The commissioner may
adopt rules further interpreting these definitions.
(((21))) (20) "System" means the state system of community and
technical colleges, which shall be a system of higher education.
(((22))) (21) "Technical college" includes those higher education
institutions with the mission of conducting occupational education,
basic skills, literacy programs, and offering on short notice, when
appropriate, programs that meet specific industry needs. For purposes
of this chapter, technical colleges shall include Lake Washington
Vocational-Technical Institute, Renton Vocational-Technical Institute,
Bates Vocational-Technical Institute, Clover Park Vocational Institute,
and Bellingham Vocational-Technical Institute.

Sec. 28 RCW 28B.50.254 and 1991 c 238 s 19 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the Washington advisory council on
adult education. The advisory council shall advise the state board for
community and technical colleges ((and the workforce training and
education coordinating board)) concerning adult basic education and
literacy programs. The advisory council shall perform all duties of
state advisory councils on adult education as specified in P.L.
100-297, as amended. ((The advisory council's actions shall be
consistent with the state comprehensive plan for workforce training and
education prepared by the workforce training and education coordinating
board as provided for in RCW 28C.18.060.))
(2) The advisory council on adult education shall consist of nine
members as required by federal law, appointed by the governor. In
making these appointments, to the maximum extent feasible, the governor
shall give consideration to providing overlapping membership with the
membership of the state job training coordinating council, and the
governor shall give consideration to individuals with expertise and
experience in adult basic education.
(3) The ((workforce training and education coordinating board))
state board for community and technical colleges shall monitor the need
for the council as described in subsection (1) of this section, and, if
that need no longer exists, propose legislation to terminate the
council.

Sec. 29 RCW 28B.50.273 and 2009 c 353 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
For the purposes of identifying opportunity grant-eligible programs
of study and other job training programs, the college board, in
partnership with business((,)) and labor((, and the workforce training
and education coordinating board)), shall:
(1) Identify high employer demand programs of study offered by
qualified postsecondary institutions that lead to a credential,
certificate, or degree;
(2) Identify job-specific training programs offered by qualified
postsecondary institutions that lead to a credential, certificate, or
degree in green industry occupations as established in chapter 14, Laws
of 2008;
(3) Gain recognition of the credentials, certificates, and degrees
by Washington's employers and labor organizations. The college board
shall designate these recognized credentials, certificates, and degrees
as "opportunity grant-eligible programs of study"; and
(4) Market the credentials, certificates, and degrees to potential
students, businesses, and apprenticeship programs as a way for
individuals to advance in their careers and to better meet the needs of
industry.

Sec. 30 RCW 28B.50.274 and 2007 c 277 s 202 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Community and technical colleges shall partner with local
workforce development councils to develop the opportunity partnership
program. The opportunity partnership program may be newly developed or
part of an existing program, and shall provide mentoring to students
participating in the opportunity grant program. The program must
develop criteria and identify opportunity grant students who would
benefit by having a mentor. Each participating student shall be
matched with a business or labor mentor employed in the field in which
the student is interested. The mentor shall help the student explore
careers and employment options through any combination of tours,
informational interviews, job shadowing, and internships.
(2) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the
((workforce training and)) higher education coordinating board or its
successor agency shall create the opportunity partnership program. The
board, in partnership with business, labor, and the college board,
shall determine the criteria for the distribution of funds.
(3) The board may, in implementing this section, accept, use, and
dispose of contributions of money, services, and property. All moneys
received by the board for the purposes of this section must be
deposited in a depository approved by the state treasurer. Only the
board or a duly authorized representative thereof may authorize
expenditures from this account. In order to maintain an effective
expenditure and revenue control, the account is subject in all respects
to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit
expenditure of moneys in the account.

Sec. 31 RCW 28B.50.902 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 14 s 6 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The college board, in consultation with business, industry,
labor, ((the workforce training and education coordinating board,)) the
department of commerce, the employment security department, and
community and technical colleges, shall designate centers of excellence
and allocate funds to existing and new centers of excellence based on
a competitive basis.
(2) Eligible applicants for the program established under this
section include community and technical colleges. Priority shall be
given to applicants that have an established education and training
program serving the targeted industry and that have in their home
district or region an industry cluster with the same targeted industry
at its core.
(3) It is the role of centers of excellence to employ strategies
to:
(a) Create educational efficiencies;
(b) Build a diverse, competitive workforce for strategic
industries;
(c) Maintain an institutional reputation for innovation and
responsiveness;
(d) Develop innovative curriculum and means of delivering education
and training;
(e) Act as brokers of information and resources related to
community and technical college education and training and assistance
available for firms in a targeted industry, including working with
innovate Washington to develop methods to identify businesses within a
targeted industry that could benefit from the services offered by
innovate Washington under chapter 43.333 RCW; and
(f) Serve as partners with workforce development councils,
associate development organizations, and other workforce and economic
development organizations.
(4) Examples of strategies under subsection (3) of this section
include but are not limited to: Sharing curriculum and other
instructional resources, to ensure cost savings to the system;
delivering collaborative certificate and degree programs; and holding
statewide summits, seminars, conferences, and workshops on industry
trends and best practices in community and technical college education
and training.

Sec. 32 RCW 28B.76.210 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 104 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall collaborate with the four-year institutions
including the council of presidents, the community and technical
college system, and when appropriate ((the workforce training and
education coordinating board,)) the superintendent of public
instruction((,)) and the independent higher educational institutions to
identify budget priorities and levels of funding for higher education,
including the two and four-year institutions of higher education and
state financial aid programs. It is the intent of the legislature that
recommendations from the board reflect not merely the sum of budget
requests from multiple institutions, but prioritized funding needs for
the overall system of higher education.
(2) By December of each odd-numbered year, the board shall
distribute guidelines which outline the board's fiscal priorities to
the institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges.
(a) The institutions and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall submit an outline of their proposed operating
budgets to the board no later than July 1st of each even-numbered year.
Pursuant to guidelines developed by the board, operating budget
outlines submitted by the institutions and the state board for
community and technical colleges after January 1, 2007, shall include
all policy changes and enhancements that will be requested by the
institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges
in their respective biennial budget requests. Operating budget
outlines shall include a description of each policy enhancement, the
dollar amount requested, and the fund source being requested.
(b) Capital budget outlines for the two-year institutions shall be
submitted by August 15th of each even-numbered year, and shall include
the prioritized ranking of the capital projects being requested, a
description of each capital project, and the amount and fund source
being requested.
(c) Capital budget outlines for the four-year institutions must be
submitted by August 15th of each even-numbered year, and must include:
The institutions' priority ranking of the project; the capital budget
category within which the project will be submitted to the office of
financial management in accordance with RCW 43.88D.010; a description
of each capital project; and the amount and fund source being
requested.
(d) The office of financial management shall reference these
reporting requirements in its budget instructions.
(3) The board shall review and evaluate the operating and capital
budget requests from four-year institutions and the community and
technical college system based on how the requests align with the
board's budget priorities, the missions of the institutions, and the
statewide strategic master plan for higher education under RCW
28B.76.200.
(4) The board shall submit recommendations on the proposed
operating budget and priorities to the office of financial management
by October 1st of each even-numbered year, and to the legislature by
January 1st of each odd-numbered year.
(5)(a) The board's capital budget recommendations for the community
and technical college system and the four-year institutions must be
submitted to the office of financial management and to the legislature
by November 15th of each even-numbered year.
(b) The board shall develop one prioritized list of capital
projects for the legislature to consider that includes all of the
projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education
that were scored by the office of financial management pursuant to
chapter 43.88D RCW, including projects that were previously scored but
not funded. The prioritized list of capital projects shall be based on
the following priorities in the following order:
(i) Office of financial management scores pursuant to chapter
43.88D RCW;
(ii) Preserving assets;
(iii) Degree production; and
(iv) Maximizing efficient use of instructional space.
(c) The board shall include all of the capital projects requested
by the four-year institutions of higher education, except for the minor
works projects, in the prioritized list of capital projects provided to
the legislature.
(d) The form of the prioritized list for capital projects requested
by the four-year institutions of higher education shall be provided as
one list, ranked in priority order with the highest priority project
ranked number "1" through the lowest priority project numbered last.
The ranking for the prioritized list of capital projects may not:
(i) Include subpriorities;
(ii) Be organized by category;
(iii) Assume any state bond or building account biennial funding
level to prioritize the list; or
(iv) Assume any specific share of projects by institution in the
priority list.
(6) Institutions and the state board for community and technical
colleges shall submit any supplemental budget requests and revisions to
the board at the same time they are submitted to the office of
financial management. The board shall submit recommendations on the
proposed supplemental budget requests to the office of financial
management by November 1st and to the legislature by January 1st.

Sec. 33 RCW 28B.76.230 and 2010 c 245 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board shall develop a comprehensive and ongoing assessment
process to analyze the need for additional degrees and programs,
additional off-campus centers and locations for degree programs, and
consolidation or elimination of programs by the four-year institutions.
Board recommendations regarding proposed major expansion shall be
limited to determinations of whether the major expansion is within the
scope indicated in the most recent strategic master plan for higher
education or most recent system design plan. Recommendations regarding
existing capital prioritization processes are not within the scope of
the evaluation of major expansion. Major expansion and proposed
mission changes may be proposed by the board, any public institution of
higher education, or by a state or local government.
(2) As part of the needs assessment process, the board shall
examine:
(a) Projections of student, employer, and community demand for
education and degrees, including liberal arts degrees, on a regional
and statewide basis;
(b) Current and projected degree programs and enrollment at public
and private institutions of higher education, by location and mode of
service delivery;
(c) Data from ((the workforce training and education coordinating
board and)) the state board for community and technical colleges on the
supply and demand for workforce education and certificates and
associate degrees; and
(d) Recommendations from the technology transformation task force
created in chapter 407, Laws of 2009, and institutions of higher
education relative to the strategic and operational use of technology
in higher education. These and other reports, reviews, and audits
shall allow for: The development of enterprise-wide digital
information technology across educational sectors, systems, and
delivery methods; the integration and streamlining of administrative
tools including but not limited to student information management,
financial management, payroll, human resources, data collection,
reporting, and analysis; and a determination of the costs of multiple
technology platforms, systems, and models.
(3) Every two years the board shall produce, jointly with the state
board for community and technical colleges ((and the workforce training
and education coordinating board)), an assessment of the number and
type of higher education and training credentials required to match
employer demand for a skilled and educated workforce. The assessment
shall include the number of forecasted net job openings at each level
of higher education and training and the number of credentials needed
to match the forecast of net job openings.
(4) The board shall determine whether certain major lines of study
or types of degrees, including applied degrees or research-oriented
degrees, shall be assigned uniquely to some institutions or
institutional sectors in order to create centers of excellence that
focus resources and expertise.
(5) The following activities are subject to approval by the board:
(a) New degree programs by a four-year institution;
(b) Creation of any off-campus program by a four-year institution;
(c) Purchase or lease of major off-campus facilities by a four-year
institution or a community or technical college;
(d) Creation of higher education centers and consortia;
(e) New degree programs and creation of off-campus programs by an
independent college or university in collaboration with a community or
technical college; and
(f) Applied baccalaureate degree programs developed by colleges
under RCW 28B.50.810.
(6) Institutions seeking board approval under this section must
demonstrate that the proposal is justified by the needs assessment
developed under this section. Institutions must also demonstrate how
the proposals align with or implement the statewide strategic master
plan for higher education under RCW 28B.76.200.
(7) The board shall develop clear guidelines and objective
decision-making criteria regarding approval of proposals under this
section, which must include review and consultation with the
institution and other interested agencies and individuals.
(8) The board shall periodically recommend consolidation or
elimination of programs at the four-year institutions, based on the
needs assessment analysis.
(9) In the case of a proposed major expansion or mission change,
the needs assessment process under subsection (2) of this section
constitutes a threshold inquiry. If the board determines that the need
for the proposed major expansion or mission change has not been
justified, the inquiry is concluded. If the board determines that the
need for the proposed major expansion or mission change has been
sufficiently established, the board, in consultation with any directly
involved institutions and other interested agencies and individuals,
shall proceed to examine the viability of the proposal using criteria
including, but not limited to:
(a) The specific scope of the project including the capital
investment requirements, the number of full-time equivalent students
anticipated, and the number of academic programs planned;
(b) The existence of an efficient and sustainable financial plan;
(c) The extent to which existing resources can be leveraged;
(d) The current and five-year projected student population,
faculty, and staff to support the proposed programs, institution, or
innovation;
(e) The plans to accommodate expected growth over a twenty-year
time frame;
(f) The extent to which new or existing partnerships and
collaborations are a part of the proposal; and
(g) The feasibility of any proposed innovations to accelerate
degree production.
(10) After the board completes its evaluation of the proposed major
expansion or mission change using the needs assessment under subsection
(2) of this section and viability determination under subsection (9) of
this section, the board shall make a recommendation to either proceed,
modify, or not proceed with the proposed major expansion or mission
change. The board's recommendation shall be presented to the governor
and the legislature.

Sec. 34 RCW 28B.76.670 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 124 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence
under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.550, who receive the award after
June 30, 1994, may receive a grant, if funds are available. The grant
shall be used to attend a postsecondary institution located in the
state of Washington. Recipients may attend an institution of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, or an independent college or
university, or a licensed private vocational school. The office shall
distribute grants to eligible students under this section from moneys
appropriated for this purpose. The individual grants shall not exceed,
on a yearly basis, the yearly, full-time, resident, undergraduate
tuition and service and activities fees in effect at the state-funded
research universities. ((In consultation with the workforce training
and education coordinating board,)) The office shall establish
procedures, by rule, to disburse the awards as direct grants to the
students.
(2) To qualify for the grant, recipients shall enter the
postsecondary institution within three years of high school graduation
and maintain a minimum grade point average at the institution
equivalent to 3.00, or, at a technical college, an above average
rating. Students shall be eligible to receive a maximum of two years
of grants for undergraduate study and may transfer among in-state
eligible postsecondary institutions during that period and continue to
receive the grant.
(3) No grant may be awarded to any student who is pursuing a degree
in theology.
(4) As used in this section, "independent college or university"
means a private, nonprofit educational institution, the main campus of
which is permanently situated in the state, open to residents of the
state, providing programs of education beyond the high school level
leading at least to the baccalaureate degree, and accredited by the
Northwest association of schools and colleges as of June 9, 1988, and
other institutions as may be developed that are approved by the higher
education coordinating board as meeting equivalent standards as those
institutions accredited under this section.
(5) As used in this section, "licensed private vocational school"
means a private postsecondary institution, located in the state,
licensed by the ((workforce training and)) higher education
coordinating board or its successor agency under chapter 28C.10 RCW,
and offering postsecondary education in order to prepare persons for a
vocation or profession, as defined in RCW 28C.10.020(7).

Sec. 35 RCW 28B.85.020 and 2006 c 234 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The board:
(a) Shall adopt by rule, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW,
minimum standards for degree-granting institutions concerning granting
of degrees, quality of education, unfair business practices, financial
stability, and other necessary measures to protect citizens of this
state against substandard, fraudulent, or deceptive practices. The
rules shall require that an institution operating in Washington:
(i) Be accredited;
(ii) Have applied for accreditation and such application is pending
before the accrediting agency;
(iii) Have been granted a waiver by the board waiving the
requirement of accreditation; or
(iv) Have been granted an exemption by the board from the
requirements of this subsection (1)(a);
(b) May investigate any entity the board reasonably believes to be
subject to the jurisdiction of this chapter. In connection with the
investigation, the board may administer oaths and affirmations, issue
subpoenas and compel attendance, take evidence, and require the
production of any books, papers, correspondence, memorandums, or other
records which the board deems relevant or material to the
investigation. The board, including its staff and any other authorized
persons, may conduct site inspections, the cost of which shall be borne
by the institution, and examine records of all institutions subject to
this chapter;
(c) Shall ((develop an interagency agreement with the workforce
training and education coordinating board to)) regulate degree-granting
private vocational schools with respect to degree and nondegree
programs; and
(d) Shall develop and disseminate information to the public about
entities that sell or award degrees without requiring appropriate
academic achievement at the postsecondary level, including but not
limited to, a description of the substandard and potentially fraudulent
practices of these entities, and advice about how the public can
recognize and avoid the entities. To the extent feasible, the
information shall include links to additional resources that may assist
the public in identifying specific institutions offering substandard or
fraudulent degree programs.
(2) Financial disclosures provided to the board by degree-granting
private vocational schools are not subject to public disclosure under
chapter 42.56 RCW.

Sec. 36 RCW 28B.97.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 174 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The Washington higher education loan program is created. The
program is created to assist students in need of additional low-cost
student loans and related loan benefits.
(2) The program shall be administered by the office. In
administering the program, the office must:
(a) Periodically assess the needs and target the benefits to
selected students;
(b) Devise a program to address the following issues related to
loans:
(i) Issuance of low-interest educational loans;
(ii) Determining loan repayment obligations and options;
(iii) Borrowing educational loans at low interest rates;
(iv) Developing conditional loans that can be forgiven in exchange
for service; and
(v) Creating an emergency loan fund to help students until other
state and federal long-term financing can be secured;
(c) Accept public and private contributions;
(d) Publicize the program; and
(e) Work with public and private colleges and universities, the
state board for community and technical colleges, ((the workforce
training and education coordinating board,)) and with students, to
conduct periodic assessment of program needs. The office may also
consult with other groups and individuals as needed.

Sec. 37 RCW 28B.120.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 235 are each
amended to read as follows:
The higher education coordinating board shall have the following
powers and duties in administering the program for those proposals in
which a four-year institution of higher education is named as the lead
institution and fiscal agent:
(1) To adopt rules necessary to carry out the program;
(2) To award grants no later than September 1st in those years when
funding is available by June 30th;
(3) To establish each biennium specific guidelines for submitting
grant proposals consistent with RCW 28B.120.005 and consistent with the
strategic master plan for higher education, the system design plan, the
overall goals of the program and the guidelines established by the
state board for community and technical colleges under RCW 28B.120.025.
After June 30, 2001, and each biennium thereafter, the board shall
determine funding priorities for proposals for the biennium in
consultation with the legislature, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, the state board for community and technical
colleges, ((the workforce training and education coordinating board,))
higher education institutions, educational associations, and business
and community groups consistent with statewide needs;
(4) To solicit grant proposals and provide information to the
institutions of higher education about the program; and
(5) To establish reporting, evaluation, accountability, monitoring,
and dissemination requirements for the recipients of the grants awarded
by the office of financial management.

Sec. 38 RCW 28B.145.060 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 13 s 7 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The opportunity expansion program is established.
(2) The opportunity scholarship board shall select institutions of
higher education to receive opportunity expansion awards. In so doing,
the opportunity scholarship board must:
(a) Solicit, receive, and evaluate proposals from institutions of
higher education that are designed to directly increase the number of
baccalaureate degrees produced in high employer demand and other
programs of study, and that include annual numerical targets for the
number of such degrees, with a strong emphasis on serving students who
received their high school diploma or GED in Washington or are adult
Washington residents who are returning to school to gain a
baccalaureate degree;
(b) Develop criteria for evaluating proposals and awarding funds to
the proposals deemed most likely to increase the number of
baccalaureate degrees and degrees produced in high employer demand and
other programs of study;
(c) Give priority to proposals that include a partnership between
public and private partnership entities that leverage additional
private funds;
(d) Give priority to proposals that are innovative, efficient, and
cost-effective, given the nature and cost of the particular program of
study;
(e) Consult and operate in consultation with existing higher
education stakeholders, including but not limited to: Faculty, labor,
student organizations, and relevant higher education agencies; and
(f) Determine which proposals to improve and accelerate the
production of baccalaureate degrees in high employer demand and other
programs of study will receive opportunity expansion awards for the
following state fiscal year, notify the state treasurer, and announce
the awards.
(3) The state treasurer, at the direction of the opportunity
scholarship board, must distribute the funds that have been awarded to
the institutions of higher education from the opportunity expansion
account.
(4) Institutions of higher education receiving awards under this
section may not supplant existing general fund state revenues with
opportunity expansion awards.
(5) Annually, the office of financial management shall report to
the opportunity scholarship board, the governor, and the relevant
committees of the legislature regarding the percentage of Washington
households with incomes in the middle-income bracket or higher. For
purposes of this section, "middle-income bracket" means household
incomes between two hundred and five hundred percent of the 2010
federal poverty level, as determined by the United States department of
health and human services for a family of four, adjusted annually for
inflation.
(6) Annually, the higher education coordinating board must report
to the opportunity scholarship board, the governor, and the relevant
committees of the legislature regarding the increase in the number of
degrees in high employer demand and other programs of study awarded by
institutions of higher education over the average of the preceding ten
academic years.
(((7) In its comprehensive plan, the workforce training and
education coordinating board shall include specific strategies to reach
the goal of increasing the percentage of Washington households living
in the middle-income bracket or higher, as calculated by the office of
financial management and developed by the agency or education
institution that will lead the strategy.))

Sec. 39 RCW 28C.04.400 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 21 s 1 are each
amended to read as follows:
The legislature declares that it is an important function of
government to increase opportunities for gainful employment, to assist
in promoting a productive and expanding economy, and to encourage the
flow of business and industry support to educational institutions.
Therefore, the legislature finds that it is in the public interest of
the state to encourage and facilitate the formation of cooperative
relationships between business and industry and educational
institutions which provide for the development and significant
expansion of programs of skills training and education consistent with
employment needs and to make interested individuals aware of the
employment opportunities presented thereby. It is the policy of the
state of Washington to ensure that programs of skill training are
available on a regional basis and are utilized by a variety of
businesses and industries and that these job skills programs are to be
administered by the college board.

Sec. 40 RCW 28C.04.530 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 7 s 3 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The ((workforce training and)) higher education coordinating
board or its successor agency shall have the responsibility for the
development and administration of the Washington award for vocational
excellence program. The ((workforce training and)) higher education
coordinating board or its successor agency shall develop the program in
consultation with other state agencies and private organizations having
interest and responsibility in vocational education, including but not
limited to: The state board for community and technical colleges, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction, a voluntary
professional association of vocational educators, and representatives
from business, labor, and industry.
(2) The ((workforce training and)) higher education coordinating
board or its successor agency shall establish a planning committee to
develop the criteria for screening and selecting the students who will
receive the award. This criteria shall include but not be limited to
the following characteristics: Proficiency in their chosen fields,
attendance, attitude, character, leadership, and civic contributions.

Sec. 41 RCW 28C.04.535 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 930 are each
amended to read as follows:
Except for the 2011-12 and 2012-13 school years, the Washington
award for vocational excellence shall be granted annually. The
((workforce training and)) higher education coordinating board or its
successor agency shall notify the students receiving the award, their
vocational instructors, local chambers of commerce, the legislators of
their respective districts, and the governor, after final selections
have been made. The ((workforce training and)) higher education
coordinating board or its successor agency, in conjunction with the
governor's office, shall prepare appropriate certificates to be
presented to the selected students. Awards shall be presented in
public ceremonies at times and places determined by the ((workforce
training and)) higher education coordinating board or its successor
agency in cooperation with the office of the governor.

Sec. 42 RCW 28C.04.540 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 7 s 5 are each
amended to read as follows:
The ((workforce training and)) higher education coordinating board
or its successor agency may accept any and all donations, grants,
bequests, and devices, conditional or otherwise, or money, property,
service, or other things of value which may be received from any
federal, state, or local agency, any institution, person, firm, or
corporation, public and private, to be held, used, or applied for the
purposes of the Washington award for vocational excellence program.
The ((workforce training and)) higher education coordinating board or
its successor agency shall encourage maximum participation from
business, labor, and community groups. The ((workforce training and))
higher education coordinating board or its successor agency shall also
coordinate, where feasible, the contribution activities of the various
participants.
((The workforce training and education coordinating board shall not
make expenditures from funds collected under this section until
February 15, 1985.))

Sec. 43 RCW 28C.04.545 and 2004 c 275 s 61 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The respective governing boards of the public technical
colleges shall provide fee waivers for a maximum of two years for those
recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence
established under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.540 who received the
award before June 30, 1994. To qualify for the waiver, recipients
shall enter the public technical college within three years of
receiving the award. An above average rating at the technical college
in the first year shall be required to qualify for the second-year
waiver.
(2) Students named by the ((workforce training and)) higher
education coordinating board or its successor agency after June 30,
1994, as recipients of the Washington award for vocational excellence
under RCW 28C.04.520 through 28C.04.550 shall be eligible to receive a
grant for undergraduate coursework as authorized under RCW 28B.76.670.
(3)(a) Beginning with awards made during the 1998-99 academic year,
recipients must complete using the award before the fall term in the
sixth year following the date of the award. For these recipients,
eligibility for the award is forfeited after this period.
(b) All persons awarded a Washington award for vocational
excellence before the 1995-96 academic year and who have remaining
eligibility on April 19, 1999, must complete using the award before
September 2002. For these recipients, eligibility for the award is
forfeited after this period.
(c) All persons awarded a Washington award for vocational
excellence during the 1995-96, 1996-97, and 1997-98 academic years must
complete using the award before September 2005. For these recipients,
eligibility for the award is forfeited after this period.

Sec. 44 RCW 28C.10.020 and 2007 c 462 s 1 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.
(1) "Agency" means the ((workforce training and)) higher education
coordinating board or its successor agency.
(2) "Agent" means a person owning an interest in, employed by, or
representing for remuneration a private vocational school within or
without this state, who enrolls or personally attempts to secure the
enrollment in a private vocational school of a resident of this state,
offers to award educational credentials for remuneration on behalf of
a private vocational school, or holds himself or herself out to
residents of this state as representing a private vocational school for
any of these purposes.
(3) "Degree" means any designation, appellation, letters, or words
including but not limited to "associate," "bachelor," "master,"
"doctor," or "fellow" which signify or purport to signify satisfactory
completion of an academic program of study beyond the secondary school
level.
(4) "Education" includes but is not limited to, any class, course,
or program of training, instruction, or study.
(5) "Educational credentials" means degrees, diplomas,
certificates, transcripts, reports, or documents, that signify
satisfactory completion of the requirements or prerequisites for any
educational program.
(6) "Entity" includes, but is not limited to, a person, company,
firm, society, association, partnership, corporation, or trust.
(7) "Private vocational school" means any location where an entity
is offering postsecondary education in any form or manner for the
purpose of instructing, training, or preparing persons for any vocation
or profession.
(8) "Probation" means the agency has officially notified a private
vocational school in writing that the school or a program offered by
the school has been identified by the agency as at risk and has
deficiencies that must be corrected within a specified time period.
(9) "Program" means a sequence of approved subjects offered by a
school that teaches skills and fundamental knowledge required for
employment in a particular occupation.
(10) "To grant" includes to award, issue, sell, confer, bestow, or
give.
(11) "To offer" includes, in addition to its usual meanings, to
advertise or publicize. "To offer" also means to solicit or encourage
any person, directly or indirectly, to perform the act described.
(12) "To operate" means to establish, keep, or maintain any
facility or location where, from, or through which education is offered
or educational credentials are offered or granted to residents of this
state, and includes contracting for the performance of any such act.

Sec. 45 RCW 28C.10.040 and 1994 c 38 s 5 are each amended to read
as follows:
The agency:
(1) Shall maintain a list of private vocational schools licensed
under this chapter;
(2) Shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW to carry
out this chapter;
(3) May investigate any entity the agency reasonably believes to be
subject to the jurisdiction of this chapter. In connection with the
investigation, the agency may administer oaths and affirmations, issue
subpoenas and compel attendance, take evidence, and require the
production of any books, papers, correspondence, memorandums, or other
records which the agency deems relevant or material to the
investigation. The agency, including its staff and any other
authorized persons, may conduct site inspections and examine records of
all schools subject to this chapter((;
(4) Shall develop an interagency agreement with the higher
education coordinating board to regulate degree-granting private
vocational schools with respect to degree and nondegree programs)).

Sec. 46 RCW 28C.18.050 and 1995 c 130 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
The department shall:
(1) ((The board shall be designated as the state board of
vocational education as provided for in P.L. 98-524, as amended, and
shall perform such functions as is necessary to comply with federal
directives pertaining to the provisions of such law.
(2) The board shall)) Perform the functions of the human resource
investment council as provided for in the federal job training
partnership act, P.L. 97-300, as amended((.));
(((3) The board shall)) (2) Provide policy advice for any federal
act pertaining to workforce development that is not required by state
or federal law to be provided by another state body((.));
(((4))) (3) Upon enactment of new federal initiatives relating to
workforce development, ((the board shall)) advise the governor and the
legislature on mechanisms for integrating the federal initiatives into
the state's workforce development system and make recommendations on
the legislative or administrative measures necessary to streamline and
coordinate state efforts to meet federal guidelines((.));
(((5) The board shall monitor for consistency with the state
comprehensive plan for workforce training and education the policies
and plans established by the state job training coordinating council,
the advisory council on adult education, and the Washington state plan
for adult basic education, and provide guidance for making such
policies and plans consistent with the state comprehensive plan for
workforce training and education.))
(4) Develop policy objectives for the workforce investment act,
P.L. 105-220, or its successor; develop coordination criteria for
activities under the act with related programs and services provided by
state and local education and training agencies; and ensure that
entrepreneurial training opportunities are available through programs
of each local workforce investment board in the state;
(5) Receive and expend federal funds, which funds must be expended
in accordance with any conditions upon which the funds are contingent;
(6) Administer any federal act pertaining to workforce training
that is not administered by another state agency;
(7) Include in the planning requirements for local workforce
investment boards a requirement that the local workforce investment
boards specify how entrepreneurial training is to be offered through
the one-stop system required under the workforce investment act, P.L.
105-220, or its successor;
(8) Participate in the planning and policy development of governor
set-aside grants under P.L. 97-300, as amended; and
(9) Allocate funding from the state job training trust fund.

Sec. 47 RCW 28C.18.060 and 2009 c 151 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The council for higher education shall be designated as the
state board of vocational education as provided for in P.L. 98-524, as
amended, and shall perform such functions as is necessary to comply
with federal directives pertaining to the provisions of such law. The
council may receive and expend federal funds, which funds must be
expended in accordance with any conditions upon which the funds are
contingent.
(2) The ((board)) council for higher education, in cooperation with
the operating agencies of the state training system and private career
schools and colleges, shall:
(((1) Concentrate its major efforts on planning, coordination
evaluation, policy analysis, and recommending improvements to the
state's training system;
(2) Advocate for the state training system and for meeting the
needs of employers and the workforce for workforce education and
training;
(3))) (a) Establish and maintain an inventory of the programs of
the state training system, and related state programs((, and perform a
biennial assessment of the vocational education, training, and adult
basic education and literacy needs of the state; identify ongoing and
strategic education needs; and assess the extent to which employment,
training, vocational and basic education, rehabilitation services, and
public assistance services represent a consistent, integrated approach
to meet such needs;
(4) Develop and maintain a state comprehensive plan for workforce
training and education, including but not limited to, goals,
objectives, and priorities for the state training system, and review
the state training system for consistency with the state comprehensive
plan. In developing the state comprehensive plan for workforce
training and education, the board shall use, but shall not be limited
to: Economic, labor market, and populations trends reports in office
of financial management forecasts; joint office of financial management
and employment security department labor force, industry employment,
and occupational forecasts; the results of scientifically based
outcome, net-impact and cost-benefit evaluations; the needs of
employers as evidenced in formal employer surveys and other employer
input; and the needs of program participants and workers as evidenced
in formal surveys and other input from program participants and the
labor community;
(5) In consultation with the higher education coordinating board,
review and make recommendations to the office of financial management
and the legislature on operating and capital facilities budget requests
for operating agencies of the state training system for purposes of
consistency with the state comprehensive plan for workforce training
and education;
(6) Provide for coordination among the different operating agencies
and components of the state training system at the state level and at
the regional level;
(7) Develop a consistent and reliable database on vocational
education enrollments, costs, program activities, and job placements
from publicly funded vocational education programs in this state;
(8)(a) Establish standards for data collection and maintenance for
the operating agencies of the state training system in a format that is
accessible to use by the board. The board shall require a minimum of
common core data to be collected by each operating agency of the state
training system;
(b) Develop requirements for minimum common core data in
consultation with the office of financial management and the operating
agencies of the training system;
(9) Establish minimum standards for program evaluation for the
operating agencies of the state training system, including, but not
limited to, the use of common survey instruments and procedures for
measuring perceptions of program participants and employers of program
participants, and monitor such program evaluation;
(10) Every two years administer scientifically based outcome
evaluations of the state training system, including, but not limited
to, surveys of program participants, surveys of employers of program
participants, and matches with employment security department payroll
and wage files. Every five years administer scientifically based net-impact and cost-benefit evaluations of the state training system;
(11) In cooperation with the employment security department,
provide for the improvement and maintenance of quality and utility in
occupational information and forecasts for use in training system
planning and evaluation. Improvements shall include, but not be
limited to, development of state-based occupational change factors
involving input by employers and employees, and delineation of skill
and training requirements by education level associated with current
and forecasted occupations));
(((12))) (b) With assistance from the state board for community and
technical colleges, provide for the development of common course
description formats, common reporting requirements, and common
definitions for operating agencies of the training system;
(((13) Provide for effectiveness and efficiency reviews of the
state training system;
(14) In cooperation with the higher education coordinating board,))
(c) Facilitate transfer of credit policies and agreements between
institutions of the state training system, and encourage articulation
agreements for programs encompassing two years of secondary workforce
education and two years of postsecondary workforce education;
(((15) In cooperation with the higher education coordinating
board,)) (d) Facilitate transfer of credit policies and agreements
between private training institutions and institutions of the state
training system;
(((16) Develop policy objectives for the workforce investment act,
P.L. 105-220, or its successor; develop coordination criteria for
activities under the act with related programs and services provided by
state and local education and training agencies; and ensure that
entrepreneurial training opportunities are available through programs
of each local workforce investment board in the state;
(17))) (e) Make recommendations to the commission of student
assessment, the state board of education, and the superintendent of
public instruction, concerning basic skill competencies and essential
core competencies for K-12 education. Basic skills for this purpose
shall be reading, writing, computation, speaking, and critical
thinking, essential core competencies for this purpose shall be
English, math, science/technology, history, geography, and critical
thinking. The ((board)) council shall monitor the development of and
provide advice concerning secondary curriculum which integrates
vocational and academic education;
(((18) Establish and administer programs for marketing and outreach
to businesses and potential program participants;
(19) Facilitate the location of support services, including but not
limited to, child care, financial aid, career counseling, and job
placement services, for students and trainees at institutions in the
state training system, and advocate for support services for trainees
and students in the state training system;
(20) Facilitate private sector assistance for the state training
system, including but not limited to: Financial assistance, rotation
of private and public personnel, and vocational counseling;
(21) Facilitate the development of programs for school-to-work
transition that combine classroom education and on-the-job training,
including entrepreneurial education and training, in industries and
occupations without a significant number of apprenticeship programs;
(22) Include in the planning requirements for local workforce
investment boards a requirement that the local workforce investment
boards specify how entrepreneurial training is to be offered through
the one-stop system required under the workforce investment act, P.L.
105-220, or its successor;
(23))) (f) Encourage and assess progress for the equitable
representation of racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with
disabilities among the students, teachers, and administrators of the
state training system. Equitable, for this purpose, shall mean
substantially proportional to their percentage of the state population
in the geographic area served. This function of the ((board)) council
shall in no way lessen more stringent state or federal requirements for
representation of racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with
disabilities;
(((24) Participate in the planning and policy development of
governor set-aside grants under P.L. 97-300, as amended;
(25))) (g) Administer veterans' programs, licensure of private
vocational schools, the job skills program, and the Washington award
for vocational excellence; and
(((26) Allocate funding from the state job training trust fund;
(27) Work with the director of community, trade, and economic
development and the economic development commission to ensure
coordination among workforce training priorities, the long-term
economic development strategy of the economic development commission,
and economic development and entrepreneurial development efforts,
including but not limited to assistance to industry clusters;
(28) Conduct research into workforce development programs designed
to reduce the high unemployment rate among young people between
approximately eighteen and twenty-four years of age. In consultation
with the operating agencies, the board shall advise the governor and
legislature on policies and programs to alleviate the high unemployment
rate among young people. The research shall include disaggregated
demographic information and, to the extent possible, income data for
adult youth. The research shall also include a comparison of the
effectiveness of programs examined as a part of the research conducted
in this subsection in relation to the public investment made in these
programs in reducing unemployment of young adults. The board shall
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 15,
2008, and every two years thereafter. Where possible, the data
reported to the legislative committees should be reported in numbers
and in percentages;
(29))) (h) Adopt rules as necessary to implement this ((chapter))
section.
((The board may delegate to the director any of the functions of
this section.))
(3) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this subsection apply throughout this section.
(a) "Training system" means programs and courses of secondary
vocational education, technical college programs and courses, community
college vocational programs and courses, private career school and
college programs and courses, employer-sponsored training, adult basic
education programs and courses, programs and courses funded by the
federal workforce investment act, programs and courses funded by the
federal vocational act, programs and courses funded under the federal
adult education act, publicly funded programs and courses for adult
literacy education, and apprenticeships, and programs and courses
offered by private and public nonprofit organizations that are
representative of communities or significant segments of communities
and provide job training or adult literacy services.
(b) "Vocational education" means organized educational programs
offering a sequence of courses that are directly related to the
preparation or retraining of individuals in paid or unpaid employment
in current or emerging occupations requiring other than a baccalaureate
or advanced degree. These programs shall include competency-based
applied learning that contributes to an individual's academic
knowledge, higher-order reasoning, and problem-solving skills, work
attitudes, general employability skills, and the occupational-specific
skills necessary for economic independence as a productive and
contributing member of society. The term also includes applied
technology education.

Sec. 48 RCW 28C.18.134 and 2008 c 258 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) To the extent funds are appropriated specifically for this
purpose, the workforce training and education coordinating board shall
use a matching fund strategy to select and evaluate up to eight pilot
projects operated by Washington institutions of higher education. By
September 2008, the workforce training and education coordinating board
shall select up to eight institutions of higher education as defined in
RCW 28B.92.030 including at least four community or technical colleges
to develop and offer a pilot project providing employer workplace-based
educational programs with distance learning components. The workforce
training and education coordinating board shall convene a task force
that includes representatives from the state board for community and
technical colleges and the higher education coordinating board to
select the participant institutions. At a minimum, the criteria for
selecting the educational institutions shall address:
(a) The ability to demonstrate a capacity to make a commitment of
resources to build and sustain a high quality program;
(b) The ability to readily engage faculty appropriately qualified
to develop and deliver a high quality curriculum;
(c) The ability to demonstrate demand for the proposed program from
a sufficient number of interested employees within its service area to
make the program cost-effective and feasible to operate; and
(d) The identification of employers that demonstrate a commitment
to host an on-site program. Employers shall demonstrate their
commitment to provide:
(i) Access to educational coursework and educational advice and
support for entry-level and semiskilled workers, including paid and
unpaid release time, and adequate classroom space that is equipped
appropriately for the selected technological distance learning
methodologies to be used;
(ii) On-site promotion and encouragement of worker participation,
including employee orientations, peer support and mentoring,
educational tutoring, and career planning;
(iii) Allowance of a reasonable level of worker choice in the type
and level of coursework available;
(iv) Commitment to work with college partner to ensure the
relevance of coursework to the skill demands and potential career
pathways of the employer host site and other participating employers;
(v) Willingness to participate in an evaluation of the pilot to
analyze the net benefit to the employer host site, other employer
partners, the worker-students, and the colleges; and
(vi) In firms with union representation, the mandatory
establishment of a labor-management committee to oversee design and
participation.
(2) Institutions of higher education may submit an application to
become a pilot college under this section. An institution of higher
education selected as a pilot college shall develop the curriculum for
and design and deliver courses. However, the programs developed under
this section are subject to approval by the state board for technical
and community colleges under RCW 28B.50.090 and by the higher education
coordinating board under RCW 28B.76.230.
(3) The state board for community and technical colleges shall
((evaluate)) complete the evaluation of the pilot project commenced by
the workforce training and education coordinating board and report the
outcomes to students and employers by December 1, 2012.
(4) This section expires December 31, 2012.

Sec. 49 RCW 28C.18.136 and 2008 c 258 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The workforce training and education coordinating board and the
state board for community and technical colleges may receive and expend
federal funds and private gifts or grants, which funds must be expended
in accordance with any conditions upon which the funds are contingent.
(2) This section expires December 31, 2012.

Sec. 50 RCW 28C.18.140 and 2008 c 103 s 4 are each amended to
read as follows:
The ((board)) department shall establish industry skill panel
standards that identify the expectations for industry skill panel
products and services. The ((board)) department shall establish the
standards in consultation with labor, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the employment security department, and the
institute of workforce development and economic sustainability((, and
the department of community, trade, and economic development)).
Continued funding of particular industry skill panels shall be based on
meeting the standards established by the ((board)) department under
this section. Beginning December 1, 2008, the ((board)) department
shall report annually to the governor and the economic development and
higher education committees of the legislature on the results of the
industry skill panels funded under this chapter in meeting the
standards.

Sec. 51 RCW 28C.18.150 and 2009 c 151 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) Workforce development councils, in partnership with local
elected officials, shall develop and maintain a local unified plan for
the workforce development system including, but not limited to, the
local plan required by P.L. 105-220, Title I. The unified plan shall
include a strategic plan that assesses local employment opportunities
and skill needs, the present and future workforce, the current
workforce development system, information on financial resources,
diversity, goals, objectives, and strategies for the local workforce
development system, and a system-wide financial strategy for
implementing the plan. Local workforce development councils shall
submit their strategic plans to the ((board)) department for review and
to the governor for approval.
(2) The strategic plan shall clearly articulate the connection
between workforce and economic development efforts in the local area
including the area industry clusters and the strategic clusters the
community is targeting for growth. The plan shall include, but is not
limited to:
(a) Data on current and projected employment opportunities in the
local area;
(b) Identification of workforce investment needs of existing
businesses and businesses considering location in the region, with
special attention to industry clusters;
(c) Identification of educational, training, employment, and
support service needs of job seekers and workers in the local area,
including individuals with disabilities and other underrepresented
talent sources;
(d) Analysis of the industry demand, potential labor force supply,
and educational, employment, and workforce support available to
businesses and job seekers in the region; and
(e) Collaboration with associate development organizations in
regional planning efforts involving combined strategies around
workforce development and economic development policies and programs.
Combined planning efforts shall include, but not be limited to,
assistance to industry clusters in the area.
(3) The ((board)) department shall work with workforce development
councils to develop implementation and funding strategies for purposes
of this section.

Sec. 52 RCW 28C.18.160 and 2009 c 238 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The opportunity internship program is created under this
section and RCW 28C.18.162 through 28C.18.168. The purpose of the
program is to provide incentives for opportunity internship consortia
to use existing resources to build educational and employment pipelines
to high-demand occupations in targeted industries for low-income high
school students. Three types of incentives are provided through the
program:
(a) Each opportunity internship graduate shall be eligible for up
to one year of financial assistance for postsecondary education as
provided in RCW 28B.92.084;
(b) Each opportunity internship graduate who completes a
postsecondary program of study shall receive a job interview with an
employer participating in an opportunity internship consortium that has
agreed to provide such interviews; and
(c) For each opportunity internship graduate who completes a
postsecondary program of study, obtains employment in a high-demand
occupation that pays a starting salary or wages of not less than thirty
thousand dollars per year, and remains employed for at least six
months, the participating opportunity internship consortium shall be
eligible to receive an incentive payment as provided in RCW 28C.18.168.
(2) The opportunity internship program shall be administered by the
((board)) office and the ((board)) office may adopt rules to implement
the program.

Sec. 53 RCW 28C.18.162 and 2009 c 238 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this section and RCW 28C.18.160 and
28C.18.164 through 28C.18.168.
(1) "High-demand occupation" means an occupation with a substantial
number of current or projected employment opportunities.
(2) "Low-income high school student" means a student who is
enrolled in grade((s)) ten, eleven, or twelve in a public high school
and who qualifies for federal free or reduced-price meals. If a
student qualifies at the time the student begins participating in the
opportunity internship program, the student remains eligible even if
the student does not receive free or reduced-price meals thereafter.
To participate in the program, the student must remain enrolled in high
school until the student receives a high school diploma.
(3) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.
(4) "Opportunity internship consortium" means a local consortium
formed for the purpose of participating in the opportunity internship
program and which may be composed of a local workforce development
council, economic development council, area high schools, community or
technical colleges, apprenticeship councils, preapprenticeship programs
such as running start for the trades, private vocational schools
licensed under chapter 28C.10 RCW, public and private four-year
institutions of higher education, employers in targeted industries, and
labor organizations.
(((4))) (5) "Opportunity internship graduate" means a low-income
high school student who successfully completes an opportunity
internship program and graduates from high school.
(((5))) (6) "Postsecondary program of study" means an undergraduate
or graduate certificate, apprenticeship, or degree program.
(((6))) (7) "Preapprenticeship" means a program of at least ninety
hours and not more than one hundred eighty hours in length that
provides practical experience, education, preparation, and the
development of skills that would be beneficial for entry into state-approved apprenticeship programs, including but not limited to
construction industry structure and the construction process;
orientation to state-approved apprenticeship; tools of the various
trades and safe handling of power tools; and industry standards of
safety, responsibility, and craft excellence.
(((7))) (8) "Targeted industry" means a business or industry
identified by a local workforce development council as having high-demand occupations that require candidates to have completed a
postsecondary program of study.

Sec. 54 RCW 28C.18.164 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 24 s 4 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) Opportunity internship consortia may apply to the ((board))
office to offer an opportunity internship program.
(a) The ((board)) office, in consultation with the Washington state
apprenticeship and training council, may select those consortia that
demonstrate the strongest commitment and readiness to implement a high
quality opportunity internship program for low-income high school
students. The ((board)) office shall place a priority on consortia
with demonstrated experience working with similar populations of
students and demonstrated capacity to assist a large number of students
through the progression of internship or preapprenticeship, high school
graduation, postsecondary education, and retention in a high-demand
occupation. The ((board)) office shall place a priority on programs
that emphasize secondary career and technical education and
nonbaccalaureate postsecondary education; however, programs that target
four-year postsecondary degrees are eligible to participate.
(b)(i) Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection (1), the
((board)) office shall enter into a contract with each consortium
selected to participate in the program. No more than ten consortia per
year shall be selected to participate in the program, and to the extent
possible, the ((board)) office shall assure a geographic distribution
of consortia in regions across the state emphasizing a variety of
targeted industries. Each consortium may select no more than one
hundred low-income high school students per year to participate in the
program.
(ii) For fiscal years 2011 through 2013, the ((board)) office shall
enter into a contract with each consortium selected to participate in
the program. No more than twelve consortia per year shall be selected
to participate in the program, and to the extent possible, the
((board)) office shall assure a geographic distribution of consortia in
regions across the state emphasizing a variety of targeted industries.
No more than five thousand low-income high school students per year may
be selected to participate in the program.
(2) Under the terms of an opportunity internship program contract,
an opportunity internship consortium shall commit to the following
activities which shall be conducted using existing federal, state,
local, or private funds available to the consortium:
(a) Identify high-demand occupations in targeted industries for
which opportunity internships or preapprenticeships shall be developed
and provided;
(b) Develop and implement the components of opportunity
internships, including paid or unpaid internships or preapprenticeships
of at least ninety hours in length in high-demand occupations with
employers in the consortium, mentoring and guidance for students who
participate in the program, assistance with applications for
postsecondary programs and financial aid, and a guarantee of a job
interview with a participating employer for all opportunity internship
graduates who successfully complete a postsecondary program of study;
(c) Once the internship or preapprenticeship components have been
developed, conduct outreach efforts to inform low-income high school
students about high-demand occupations, the opportunity internship
program, options for postsecondary programs of study, and the
incentives and opportunities provided to students who participate in
the program;
(d) Obtain appropriate documentation of the low-income status of
students who participate in the program;
(e) Maintain communication with opportunity internship graduates of
the consortium who enroll in postsecondary programs of study; and
(f) Submit an annual report to the ((board)) office on the progress
of and participation in the opportunity internship program of the
consortium.
(3) Opportunity internship consortia are encouraged to:
(a) Provide paid opportunity internships or preapprenticeships,
including during the summer months to encourage students to stay
enrolled in high school;
(b) Work with high schools to offer opportunity internships as
approved worksite learning experiences where students can earn high
school credit;
(c) Designate the local workforce development council as fiscal
agent for the opportunity internship program contract;
(d) Work with area high schools to incorporate the opportunity
internship program into comprehensive guidance and counseling programs
such as the navigation 101 program; and
(e) Coordinate the opportunity internship program with other
workforce development and postsecondary education programs, including
opportunity grants, the college bound scholarship program, federal
workforce investment act initiatives, and college access challenge
grants.
(4) The ((board)) office shall seek federal funds that may be used
to support the opportunity internship program, including providing the
incentive payments under RCW 28C.18.168.

Sec. 55 RCW 28C.18.166 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 242 are each
amended to read as follows:
On an annual basis, each opportunity internship consortium shall
provide the ((board)) office with a list of the opportunity internship
graduates from the consortium. ((The board shall compile the lists
from all consortia and shall notify the office of student financial
assistance of the eligibility of each graduate on the lists to receive
a state need grant under chapter 28B.92 RCW if the graduate enrolls in
a postsecondary program of study within one year of high school
graduation.))

Sec. 56 RCW 28C.18.168 and 2009 c 238 s 6 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) On an annual basis, each opportunity internship consortium
shall provide the ((board)) office with a list of the opportunity
internship graduates from the consortium who have completed a
postsecondary program of study, obtained employment in a high-demand
occupation that pays a starting salary or wages of not less than thirty
thousand dollars per year, and remained employed for at least six
months.
(2) The ((board)) office shall verify the information on the lists
from each consortium. Subject to funds appropriated or otherwise
available for this purpose, the ((board)) office shall allocate to each
consortium an incentive payment of two thousand dollars for each
graduate on the consortium's list. In the event that insufficient
funds are appropriated to provide a full payment, the ((board)) office
shall prorate payments across all consortia and shall notify the
governor and the legislature of the amount of the shortfall.
(3) Opportunity internship consortia shall use the incentive
payments to continue operating opportunity internship programs.

Sec. 57 RCW 28C.18.170 and 2009 c 536 s 8 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature directs the ((board)) department to create and
pilot green industry skill panels. These panels shall consist of
business representatives from industry sectors related to clean energy,
labor unions representing workers in those industries or labor
affiliates administering state-approved, joint apprenticeship programs
or labor-management partnership programs that train workers for these
industries, state and local veterans agencies, employer associations,
educational institutions, and local workforce development councils
within the region that the panels propose to operate, and other key
stakeholders as determined by the applicant. Any of these stakeholder
organizations are eligible to receive grants under this section and
serve as the intermediary that convenes and leads the panel. Panel
applicants must provide labor market and industry analysis that
demonstrates high demand, or demand of strategic importance to the
development of the state's clean energy economy as identified in this
section, for middle or high-wage occupations, or occupations that are
part of career pathways to the same, within the relevant industry
sector. The panel shall, in consultation with the department and the
leadership team:
(a) Conduct labor market and industry analyses, in consultation
with the employment security department, and drawing on the findings of
its research when available;
(b) Recommend strategies to meet the recruitment and training needs
of the industry and small businesses; and
(c) Recommend strategies to leverage and align other public and
private funding sources.
(2) The ((board)) department may prioritize workforce training
programs that lead to a credential, certificate, or degree in green
economy jobs. For purposes of this section, green economy jobs include
those in the primary industries of a green economy, including clean
energy, high-efficiency building, green transportation, and
environmental protection. Prioritization efforts may include but are
not limited to: (a) Prioritization of the use of high employer-demand
funding for workforce training programs in green economy jobs; (b)
increased outreach efforts to public utilities, education, labor,
government, and private industry to develop tailored, green job
training programs; and (c) increased outreach efforts to target
populations. Outreach efforts may be conducted in partnership with
local workforce development councils.
(3) The definitions in RCW 43.330.010 apply to this section.

Sec. 58 RCW 43.20.275 and 2006 c 239 s 3 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In collaboration with staff whom the office of financial
management may assign, and within funds made expressly available to the
state board for these purposes, the state board shall assist the
governor by convening and providing assistance to the council. The
council shall include one representative from each of the following
groups: Each of the commissions, the state board, the department, the
department of social and health services, the department of
((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce, the health
care authority, the department of agriculture, the department of
ecology, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
department of early learning, ((the workforce training and education
coordinating board,)) and two members of the public who will represent
the interests of health care consumers. The council is a class one
group under RCW 43.03.220. The two public members shall be paid per
diem and travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. The council shall reflect diversity in race, ethnicity, and
gender. The governor or the governor's designee shall chair the
council.
(2) The council shall promote and facilitate communication,
coordination, and collaboration among relevant state agencies and
communities of color, and the private sector and public sector, to
address health disparities. The council shall conduct public hearings,
inquiries, studies, or other forms of information gathering to
understand how the actions of state government ameliorate or contribute
to health disparities. All state agencies must cooperate with the
council's efforts.
(3) The council with assistance from the state board, shall assess
through public hearings, review of existing data, and other means, and
recommend initiatives for improving the availability of culturally
appropriate health literature and interpretive services within public
and private health-related agencies.
(4) In order to assist with its work, the council shall establish
advisory committees to assist in plan development for specific issues
and shall include members of other state agencies and local
communities.
(5) The advisory committee shall reflect diversity in race,
ethnicity, and gender.

Sec. 59 RCW 43.21J.030 and 2007 c 341 s 62 and 2007 c 241 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) There is created the environmental enhancement and job creation
task force within the office of the governor. The purpose of the task
force is to provide a coordinated and comprehensive approach to
implementation of chapter 516, Laws of 1993. The task force shall
consist of the commissioner of public lands, the director of the
department of fish and wildlife, the director of the department of
ecology, the director of the parks and recreation commission, the
timber team coordinator, ((the executive director of the workforce
training and education coordinating board,)) and the executive director
of the Puget Sound partnership, or their designees. The task force may
seek the advice of the following agencies and organizations: The
department of ((community, trade, and economic development)) commerce,
the conservation commission, the employment security department, the
recreation and conservation office, appropriate federal agencies,
appropriate special districts, the Washington state association of
counties, the association of Washington cities, labor organizations,
business organizations, timber-dependent communities, environmental
organizations, and Indian tribes. The governor shall appoint the task
force chair. Members of the task force shall serve without additional
pay. Participation in the work of the committee by agency members
shall be considered in performance of their employment. The governor
shall designate staff and administrative support to the task force and
shall solicit the participation of agency personnel to assist the task
force.
(2) The task force shall have the following responsibilities:
(a) Soliciting and evaluating, in accordance with the criteria set
forth in RCW 43.21J.040, requests for funds from the environmental and
forest restoration account and making distributions from the account.
The task force shall award funds for projects and training programs it
approves and may allocate the funds to state agencies for disbursement
and contract administration;
(b) Coordinating a process to assist state agencies and local
governments to implement effective environmental and forest restoration
projects funded under this chapter;
(c) Considering unemployment profile data provided by the
employment security department.
(3) Beginning July 1, 1994, the task force shall have the following
responsibilities:
(a) To solicit and evaluate proposals from state and local
agencies, private nonprofit organizations, and tribes for environmental
and forest restoration projects;
(b) To rank the proposals based on criteria developed by the task
force in accordance with RCW 43.21J.040; and
(c) To determine funding allocations for projects to be funded from
the account created in RCW 43.21J.020 and for projects or programs as
designated in the omnibus operating and capital appropriations acts.

Sec. 60 RCW 43.41.400 and 2009 c 548 s 201 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) An education data center shall be established in the office of
financial management. The education data center shall jointly, with
the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee,
conduct collaborative analyses of early learning, K-12, and higher
education programs and education issues across the P-20 system, which
includes the department of early learning, the superintendent of public
instruction, the professional educator standards board, the state board
of education, the state board for community and technical colleges,
((the workforce training and education coordinating board,)) the higher
education coordinating board, public and private nonprofit four-year
institutions of higher education, and the employment security
department. The education data center shall conduct collaborative
analyses under this section with the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee and provide data electronically to the
legislative evaluation and accountability program committee, to the
extent permitted by state and federal confidentiality requirements.
The education data center shall be considered an authorized
representative of the state educational agencies in this section under
applicable federal and state statutes for purposes of accessing and
compiling student record data for research purposes.
(2) The education data center shall:
(a) In consultation with the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee and the agencies and organizations
participating in the education data center, identify the critical
research and policy questions that are intended to be addressed by the
education data center and the data needed to address the questions;
(b) Coordinate with other state education agencies to compile and
analyze education data, including data on student demographics that is
disaggregated by distinct ethnic categories within racial subgroups,
and complete P-20 research projects;
(c) Collaborate with the legislative evaluation and accountability
program committee and the education and fiscal committees of the
legislature in identifying the data to be compiled and analyzed to
ensure that legislative interests are served;
(d) Annually provide to the K-12 data governance group a list of
data elements and data quality improvements that are necessary to
answer the research and policy questions identified by the education
data center and have been identified by the legislative committees in
(c) of this subsection. Within three months of receiving the list, the
K-12 data governance group shall develop and transmit to the education
data center a feasibility analysis of obtaining or improving the data,
including the steps required, estimated time frame, and the financial
and other resources that would be required. Based on the analysis, the
education data center shall submit, if necessary, a recommendation to
the legislature regarding any statutory changes or resources that would
be needed to collect or improve the data;
(e) Monitor and evaluate the education data collection systems of
the organizations and agencies represented in the education data center
ensuring that data systems are flexible, able to adapt to evolving
needs for information, and to the extent feasible and necessary,
include data that are needed to conduct the analyses and provide
answers to the research and policy questions identified in (a) of this
subsection;
(f) Track enrollment and outcomes through the public centralized
higher education enrollment system;
(g) Assist other state educational agencies' collaborative efforts
to develop a long-range enrollment plan for higher education including
estimates to meet demographic and workforce needs;
(h) Provide research that focuses on student transitions within and
among the early learning, K-12, and higher education sectors in the P-20 system; and
(i) Make recommendations to the legislature as necessary to help
ensure the goals and objectives of this section and RCW 28A.655.210 and
28A.300.507 are met.
(3) The department of early learning, superintendent of public
instruction, professional educator standards board, state board of
education, state board for community and technical colleges,
((workforce training and education coordinating board,)) higher
education coordinating board, public four-year institutions of higher
education, and employment security department shall work with the
education data center to develop data-sharing and research agreements,
consistent with applicable security and confidentiality requirements,
to facilitate the work of the center. Private, nonprofit institutions
of higher education that provide programs of education beyond the high
school level leading at least to the baccalaureate degree and are
accredited by the Northwest association of schools and colleges or
their peer accreditation bodies may also develop data-sharing and
research agreements with the education data center, consistent with
applicable security and confidentiality requirements. The education
data center shall make data from collaborative analyses available to
the education agencies and institutions that contribute data to the
education data center to the extent allowed by federal and state
security and confidentiality requirements applicable to the data of
each contributing agency or institution.

Sec. 61 RCW 43.60A.151 and 2007 c 451 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall assist veterans enrolled in the veterans
conservation corps with obtaining employment in conservation programs
and projects that restore Washington's natural habitat, maintain and
steward local, state, and federal forest lands and other outdoor lands,
maintain and improve urban and suburban storm water management
facilities and other water management facilities, and other
environmental maintenance, stewardship, and restoration projects. The
department shall consult with ((the workforce training and education
coordinating board,)) the state board for community and technical
colleges, the higher education coordinating board, the employment
security department, and other state agencies administering
conservation corps programs, to incorporate training, education, and
certification in environmental restoration and management fields into
the program. The department may enter into agreements with community
colleges, private schools, state or local agencies, or other entities
to provide training and educational courses as part of the enrollee
benefits from the program.
(2) The department may receive gifts, grants, federal funds, or
other moneys from public or private sources, for the use and benefit of
the veterans conservation corps program. The funds shall be deposited
to the veterans conservation corps account created in RCW 43.60A.153.
(3) The department shall submit a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2008, on the status of the
veterans conservation corps program, including the number of enrollees
employed in projects, training provided, certifications earned,
employment placements achieved, program funding provided from all
sources, and the results of the pilot project authorized in section 4,
chapter 451, Laws of 2007.

Sec. 62 RCW 43.162.010 and 2011 c 311 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission is
established to assist the governor and legislature by providing
leadership, direction, and guidance on a long-term and systematic
approach to economic development that will result in enduring global
competitiveness, prosperity, and economic opportunity for all the
state's citizens.
(2)(a) The commission consists of twenty-four members. Fifteen of
the members must be voting members appointed by the governor as
follows: Eight representatives of the private sector, one
representative of labor from east of the crest of the Cascade mountains
and one representative of labor from west of the crest of the Cascade
mountains, one representative of port districts, one representative of
four-year state public higher education, one representative of state
community or technical colleges, one representative with expertise in
international trade, and one representative of associate development
organizations. The director of the department of commerce, ((the
director of the workforce training and education coordinating board,))
the commissioner of the employment security department, the secretary
of the department of transportation, the director of the department of
agriculture, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the
standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate
overseeing economic development policies must serve as nonvoting ex
officio members.
(b) Members may not designate alternates, substitutes, or
surrogates. However, members may participate in a meeting by
conference telephone or similar communications equipment so that all
persons participating in the meeting can hear each other at the same
time. Participation by that method constitutes presence in person at
a meeting.
(c) The chair of the commission must be a private sector voting
member selected by the governor with the consent of the senate, and
shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. A vice chair must be
elected by members of the commission but may not be the director of an
executive branch agency or a member of the legislature. The vice chair
must exercise the duties of the commission chair in his or her absence.
(d) In making the appointments, the governor must consult with the
commission and with organizations that have an interest in economic
development, including, but not limited to, industry associations,
labor organizations, minority business associations, economic
development councils, chambers of commerce, port associations, tribes,
and the chairs of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over
economic development.
(e) The members must be representative of the geographic regions of
the state, including eastern and central Washington, as well as
represent the ethnic diversity of the state. Private sector members
must represent existing and emerging industries, small businesses,
women-owned businesses, and minority-owned businesses. Members of the
commission must serve statewide interests while preserving their
diverse perspectives, and must be recognized leaders in their fields
with demonstrated experience in economic development, innovation, or
disciplines related to economic development.
(3) Members appointed by the governor serve at the pleasure of the
governor for not more than two consecutive three-year terms, except
that, as determined by the governor, the terms of four of the
appointees on the commission on July 22, 2011, expire in 2012, the
terms of four of the appointees on the commission on July 22, 2011,
expire in 2013, and the terms of three of the appointees on the
commission on July 22, 2011, expire in 2014. Thereafter all terms are
for three years. Vacancies must be filled in the same manner as the
original appointments.
(4) The commission may establish committees as it desires, and may
invite nonmembers of the commission to serve as committee members.
(5) The executive director of the commission must be appointed by
the governor with the consent of the commission. The salary of the
executive director must be set by the governor with the consent of the
commission. The governor may dismiss the executive director only with
the approval of a majority vote of the commission. The commission, by
a majority vote, may dismiss the executive director with the approval
of the governor. The commission must evaluate the performance of the
executive director in a manner consistent with the process used by the
governor to evaluate the performance of agency directors.
(6) The commission may adopt policies and procedures for its own
governance.

Sec. 63 RCW 43.162.020 and 2011 c 311 s 5 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commission must concentrate its major efforts on strategic
planning, policy research and analysis, advocacy, evaluation, and
promoting coordination and collaboration.
(2) During each regular legislative session, the commission must
consult with appropriate legislative committees about the state's
economic development needs and opportunities.
(3)(a) By October 1st of each even-numbered year, the commission
must submit to the governor and legislature a biennial comprehensive
statewide economic development strategy with a report on progress from
the previous comprehensive strategy.
(b) The comprehensive statewide economic development strategy must
include the industry clusters in the state and the strategic clusters
targeted by the commission for economic development efforts. The
commission must ((consult with the workforce training and education
coordinating board and)) include labor market and economic information
by the employment security department in developing the list of
clusters and strategic clusters that meet the criteria identified by
the working group convened by the economic development commission ((and
the workforce training and education coordinating board)) under chapter
43.330 RCW.
(4)(a) In developing the comprehensive statewide economic
development strategy, the commission must use, but may not be limited
to: Economic, labor market, and populations trend reports in office of
financial management forecasts; the annual state economic climate
report prepared by the economic climate council; joint office of
financial management and employment security department labor force,
industry employment, and occupational forecasts; the results of
scientifically based outcome evaluations; the needs of industry
associations, industry clusters, businesses, and employees as evidenced
in formal surveys and other input.
(b) The comprehensive statewide economic development strategy may
include:
(i) An assessment of the state's economic vitality;
(ii) Recommended goals, objectives, and priorities for the next
biennium, and the future;
(iii) A common set of outcomes and benchmarks for the economic
development system as a whole;
(iv) Recommendations for removing barriers and promoting
collaboration among participants in the innovation ecosystem;
(v) An inventory of existing relevant programs compiled by the
commission from materials submitted by agencies;
(vi) Recommendations for expanding, discontinuing, or redirecting
existing programs, or adding new programs; and
(vii) Recommendations of best practices and public and private
sector roles in implementing the comprehensive statewide economic
development strategy.
(5) In developing the biennial statewide economic development
strategy, plans, inventories, assessments, and policy research, the
commission must consult, collaborate, and coordinate with relevant
state agencies, private sector businesses, nonprofit organizations
involved in economic development, trade associations, and relevant
local organizations in order to avoid duplication of effort.
(6) State agencies must cooperate with the commission and provide
information as the commission may reasonably request.
(7) The commission must develop a biennial budget request for
approval by the office of financial management. The commission must
adopt an annual budget and work plan in accordance with the omnibus
appropriations bill approved by the legislature.
(8)(a) The commission and its fiscal agent must jointly develop and
adopt a memorandum of understanding to outline and establish clear
lines of authority and responsibility between them related to budget
and administrative services.
(b) The memorandum of understanding may not provide any additional
grant of authorities to the commission or the fiscal agent that is not
already provided for by statute, nor diminish any authorities or powers
granted to either party by statute.
(c) Periodically, but not less often than biannually, the
commission and fiscal agent must review the memorandum of understanding
and, if necessary, recommend changes to the other party.
(d) As provided generally under RCW 43.162.015, the executive
director of the commission must report solely to the governor and the
commissioners on matters pertaining to commission operations.
(9) To maintain its objectivity and concentration on strategic
planning, policy research and analysis, and evaluation, the commission
may not take an administrative role in the delivery of services.
However, subject to available resources and consistent with its work
plan, the commission or the executive director may conduct outreach
activities such as regional forums and best practices seminars.
(10) The commission must evaluate its own performance on a regular
basis.
(11) The commission may accept gifts, grants, donations,
sponsorships, or contributions from any federal, state, or local
governmental agency or program, or any private source, and expend the
same for any purpose consistent with this chapter.

Sec. 64 RCW 43.330.090 and 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 59 are each
amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall work with private sector organizations,
industry and sector associations, federal agencies, state agencies that
use a sector-based approach to service delivery, local governments,
local associate development organizations, and higher education and
training institutions in the development of industry sector-based
strategies to diversify the economy, facilitate technology transfer and
diffusion, and increase value-added production. The industry sectors
targeted by the department may include, but are not limited to,
aerospace, agriculture, food processing, forest products, marine
services, health and biomedical, software, digital and interactive
media, transportation and distribution, and microelectronics. The
department shall, on a continuing basis, evaluate the potential return
to the state from devoting additional resources to an industry sector-based approach to economic development and identifying and assisting
additional sectors.
(2) The department's sector-based strategies shall include, but not
be limited to, cluster-based strategies that focus on assisting
regional industry sectors and related firms and institutions that meet
the definition of an industry cluster in this section and based on
criteria identified by the working group established in this chapter.
(3)(a) The department shall promote, market, and encourage growth
in the production of films and videos, as well as television
commercials within the state; to this end the department is directed to
assist in the location of a film and video production studio within the
state.
(b) The department may, in carrying out its efforts to encourage
film and video production in the state, solicit and receive gifts,
grants, funds, fees, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, from
tribal, local, or other governmental entities, as well as private
sources, and may expend the same or any income therefrom for the
encouragement of film and video production. All revenue received for
such purposes shall be deposited into the film and video promotion
account created in RCW 43.330.092.
(4) In assisting in the development of regional and statewide
industry cluster-based strategies, the department's activities shall
include, but are not limited to:
(a) Facilitating regional focus group discussions and conducting
studies to identify industry clusters, appraise the current information
linkages within a cluster, and identify issues of common concern within
a cluster;
(b) Supporting industry and cluster associations, publications of
association and cluster directories, and related efforts to create or
expand the activities of industry and cluster associations;
(c) Administering a competitive grant program to fund economic
development activities designed to further regional cluster growth. In
administering the program, the department shall work with the economic
development commission, ((the workforce training and education
coordinating board,)) the state board for community and technical
colleges, the employment security department, business, and labor.
(i) The department shall seek recommendations on criteria for
evaluating applications for grant funds and recommend applicants for
receipt of grant funds. Criteria shall include not duplicating the
purpose or efforts of industry skill panels.
(ii) Applicants must include organizations from at least two
counties and participants from the local business community. Eligible
organizations include, but are not limited to, local governments,
economic development councils, chambers of commerce, federally
recognized Indian tribes, workforce development councils, and
educational institutions.
(iii) Applications must evidence financial participation of the
partner organizations.
(iv) Eligible activities include the formation of cluster economic
development partnerships, research and analysis of economic development
needs of the cluster, the development of a plan to meet the economic
development needs of the cluster, and activities to implement the plan.
(v) Priority shall be given to applicants that complement industry
skill panels and will use the grant funds to build linkages and joint
projects.
(vi) The maximum amount of a grant is one hundred thousand dollars.
(vii) A maximum of one hundred thousand dollars total can go to
King, Pierce, Kitsap, and Snohomish counties combined.
(viii) No more than ten percent of funds received for the grant
program may be used by the department for administrative costs.
(5) As used in this chapter, "industry cluster" means a geographic
concentration of interconnected companies in a single industry, related
businesses in other industries, including suppliers and customers, and
associated institutions, including government and education.

Sec. 65 RCW 43.330.145 and 1997 c 58 s 323 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department shall ensure that none of its rules or practices
act to exclude recipients of temporary assistance for needy families
from any small business loan opportunities or entrepreneurial
assistance it makes available through its community development block
grant program or otherwise provides using state or federal resources.
The department shall encourage local administrators of microlending
programs using public funds to conduct outreach activities to encourage
recipients of temporary assistance for needy families to explore self-employment as an option. The department shall compile information on
private and public sources of entrepreneurial assistance and loans for
start-up businesses and provide the department of social and health
services with the information for dissemination to recipients of
temporary assistance for needy families.
(2) The department shall, as part of its industrial recruitment
efforts, ((work with the workforce training and education coordinating
board to)) identify the skill sets needed by companies locating in the
state. The department shall provide the department of social and
health services with the information about the companies' needs in
order that recipients of public assistance and service providers
assisting such recipients through training and placement programs may
be informed and respond accordingly. The department shall work with
the state board for community and technical colleges, the job skills
program, the employment security department, and other employment and
training programs to facilitate the inclusion of recipients of
temporary assistance for needy families in relevant training that would
make them good employees for recruited firms.
(3) The department shall perform the duties under this section
within available funds.

Sec. 66 RCW 43.330.280 and 2009 c 565 s 14 and 2009 c 72 s 2 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The Washington state economic development commission shall,
with the advice of an innovation partnership advisory group selected by
the commission:
(a) Provide information and advice to the department of commerce to
assist in the implementation of the innovation partnership zone
program, including criteria to be used in the selection of grant
applicants for funding;
(b) Document clusters of companies throughout the state that have
comparative competitive advantage or the potential for comparative
competitive advantage, using the process and criteria for identifying
strategic clusters developed by the working group specified in
subsection (2) of this section;
(c) Conduct an innovation opportunity analysis to identify (i) the
strongest current intellectual assets and research teams in the state
focused on emerging technologies and their commercialization, and (ii)
faculty and researchers that could increase their focus on
commercialization of technology if provided the appropriate technical
assistance and resources;
(d) Based on its findings and analysis, and in conjunction with the
higher education coordinating board and research institutions:
(i) Develop a plan to build on existing, and develop new,
intellectual assets and innovation research teams in the state in
research areas where there is a high potential to commercialize
technologies. The commission shall present the plan to the governor
and legislature by December 31, 2009. The higher education
coordinating board shall be responsible for implementing the plan in
conjunction with the publicly funded research institutions in the
state. The plan shall address the following elements and such other
elements as the commission deems important:
(A) Specific mechanisms to support, enhance, or develop innovation
research teams and strengthen their research and commercialization
capacity in areas identified as useful to strategic clusters and
innovative firms in the state;
(B) Identification of the funding necessary for laboratory
infrastructure needed to house innovation research teams;
(C) Specification of the most promising research areas meriting
enhanced resources and recruitment of significant entrepreneurial
researchers to join or lead innovation research teams;
(D) The most productive approaches to take in the recruitment, in
the identified promising research areas, of a minimum of ten
significant entrepreneurial researchers over the next ten years to join
or lead innovation research teams;
(E) Steps to take in solicitation of private sector support for the
recruitment of entrepreneurial researchers and the commercialization
activity of innovation research teams; and
(F) Mechanisms for ensuring the location of innovation research
teams in innovation partnership zones;
(ii) Provide direction for the development of comprehensive
entrepreneurial assistance programs at research institutions. The
programs may involve multidisciplinary students, faculty,
entrepreneurial researchers, entrepreneurs, and investors in building
business models and evolving business plans around innovative ideas.
The programs may provide technical assistance and the support of an
entrepreneur-in-residence to innovation research teams and offer
entrepreneurial training to faculty, researchers, undergraduates, and
graduate students. Curriculum leading to a certificate in
entrepreneurship may also be offered;
(e) Develop performance measures to be used in evaluating the
performance of innovation research teams, the implementation of the
plan and programs under (d)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, and the
performance of innovation partnership zone grant recipients, including
but not limited to private investment measures, business initiation
measures, job creation measures, and measures of innovation such as
licensing of ideas in research institutions, patents, or other
recognized measures of innovation. The performance measures developed
shall be consistent with the economic development commission's
comprehensive plan for economic development and its standards and
metrics for program evaluation. The commission shall report to the
legislature and the governor by June 30, 2009, on the measures
developed; and
(f) Using the performance measures developed, perform a biennial
assessment and report, the first of which shall be due December 31,
2012, on:
(i) Commercialization of technologies developed at state
universities, found at other research institutions in the state, and
facilitated with public assistance at existing companies;
(ii) Outcomes of the funding of innovation research teams and
recruitment of significant entrepreneurial researchers;
(iii) Comparison with other states of Washington's outcomes from
the innovation research teams and efforts to recruit significant
entrepreneurial researchers; and
(iv) Outcomes of the grants for innovation partnership zones.
The report shall include recommendations for modifications of chapter
227, Laws of 2007 and of state commercialization efforts that would
enhance the state's economic competitiveness.
(2) The economic development commission ((and the workforce
training and education coordinating board)) shall ((jointly)) convene
a working group to:
(a) Specify the process and criteria for identification of substate
geographic concentrations of firms or employment in an industry and the
industry's customers, suppliers, supporting businesses, and
institutions, which process will include the use of labor market
information from the employment security department and local labor
markets; and
(b) Establish criteria for identifying strategic clusters which are
important to economic prosperity in the state, considering cluster
size, growth rate, and wage levels among other factors.

Sec. 67 RCW 43.330.310 and 2010 c 187 s 2 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature establishes a comprehensive green economy jobs
growth initiative based on the goal of, by 2020, increasing the number
of green economy jobs to twenty-five thousand from the eight thousand
four hundred green economy jobs the state had in 2004.
(2) The department, in consultation with the employment security
department, ((the state workforce training and education coordinating
board,)) the state board for community and technical colleges, and the
higher education coordinating board, shall develop a defined list of
terms, consistent with current workforce and economic development
terms, associated with green economy industries and jobs.
(3)(a) The employment security department, in consultation with the
department, ((the state workforce training and education coordinating
board,)) the state board for community and technical colleges, the
higher education coordinating board, Washington State University small
business development center, and the Washington State University
extension energy program, shall conduct labor market research to
analyze the current labor market and projected job growth in the green
economy, the current and projected recruitment and skill requirement of
green economy industry employers, the wage and benefits ranges of jobs
within green economy industries, and the education and training
requirements of entry-level and incumbent workers in those industries.
(i) The employment security department shall conduct an analysis of
occupations in the forest products industry to: (A) Determine key
growth factors and employment projections in the industry; and (B)
define the education and skill standards required for current and
emerging green occupations in the industry.
(ii) The term "forest products industry" must be given a broad
interpretation when implementing (a)(i) of this subsection and
includes, but is not limited to, businesses that grow, manage, harvest,
transport, and process forest, wood, and paper products.
(b) The University of Washington business and economic development
center shall: Analyze the current opportunities for and participation
in the green economy by minority and women-owned business enterprises
in Washington; identify existing barriers to their successful
participation in the green economy; and develop strategies with
specific policy recommendations to improve their successful
participation in the green economy. The research may be informed by
the research of the Puget Sound regional council prosperity
partnership, as well as other entities. The University of Washington
business and economic development center shall report to the
appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the senate
on their research, analysis, and recommendations by December 1, 2008.
(4) Based on the findings from subsection (3) of this section, the
employment security department, in consultation with the department and
taking into account the requirements and goals of chapter 14, Laws of
2008 and other state clean energy and energy efficiency policies, shall
propose which industries will be considered high-demand green
industries, based on current and projected job creation and their
strategic importance to the development of the state's green economy.
The employment security department and the department shall take into
account which jobs within green economy industries will be considered
high-wage occupations and occupations that are part of career pathways
to the same, based on family-sustaining wage and benefits ranges.
These designations, and the results of the employment security
department's broader labor market research, shall inform the planning
and strategic direction of the department, ((the state workforce
training and education coordinating board,)) the state board for
community and technical colleges, and the higher education coordinating
board.
(5) The department shall identify emerging technologies and
innovations that are likely to contribute to advancements in the green
economy, including the activities in designated innovation partnership
zones established in RCW 43.330.270.
(6) The department, consistent with the priorities established by
the state economic development commission, shall:
(a) Develop targeting criteria for existing investments, and make
recommendations for new or expanded financial incentives and
comprehensive strategies, to recruit, retain, and expand green economy
industries and small businesses; and
(b) Make recommendations for new or expanded financial incentives
and comprehensive strategies to stimulate research and development of
green technology and innovation, including designating innovation
partnership zones linked to the green economy.
(7) For the purposes of this section, "target populations" means
(a) entry-level or incumbent workers in high-demand green industries
who are in, or are preparing for, high-wage occupations; (b) dislocated
workers in declining industries who may be retrained for high-wage
occupations in high-demand green industries; (c) dislocated
agriculture, timber, or energy sector workers who may be retrained for
high-wage occupations in high-demand green industries; (d) eligible
veterans or national guard members; (e) disadvantaged populations; or
(f) anyone eligible to participate in the state opportunity grant
program under RCW 28B.50.271.
(8) The legislature directs the ((state workforce training and
education coordinating board)) department of commerce to create and
pilot green industry skill panels. These panels shall consist of
business representatives from: Green industry sectors, including but
not limited to forest product companies, companies engaged in energy
efficiency and renewable energy production, companies engaged in
pollution prevention, reduction, and mitigation, and companies engaged
in green building work and green transportation; labor unions
representing workers in those industries or labor affiliates
administering state-approved, joint apprenticeship programs or labor-management partnership programs that train workers for these
industries; state and local veterans agencies; employer associations;
educational institutions; and local workforce development councils
within the region that the panels propose to operate; and other key
stakeholders as determined by the applicant. Any of these stakeholder
organizations are eligible to receive grants under this section and
serve as the intermediary that convenes and leads the panel. Panel
applicants must provide labor market and industry analysis that
demonstrates high demand, or demand of strategic importance to the
development of the state's clean energy economy as identified in this
section, for high-wage occupations, or occupations that are part of
career pathways to the same, within the relevant industry sector. The
panel shall:
(a) Conduct labor market and industry analyses, in consultation
with the employment security department, and drawing on the findings of
its research when available;
(b) Plan strategies to meet the recruitment and training needs of
the industry and small businesses; and
(c) Leverage and align other public and private funding sources.
(9) The green industries jobs training account is created in the
state treasury. Moneys from the account must be utilized to supplement
the state opportunity grant program established under RCW 28B.50.271.
All receipts from appropriations directed to the account must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the activities identified in this subsection. The state board
for community and technical colleges, ((in consultation with the state
workforce training and education coordinating board,)) informed by the
research of the employment security department and the strategies
developed in this section, may authorize expenditures from the account.
The state board for community and technical colleges must distribute
grants from the account on a competitive basis.
(a)(i) Allowable uses of these grant funds, which should be used
when other public or private funds are insufficient or unavailable, may
include:
(A) Curriculum development;
(B) Transitional jobs strategies for dislocated workers in
declining industries who may be retrained for high-wage occupations in
green industries;
(C) Workforce education to target populations; and
(D) Adult basic and remedial education as necessary linked to
occupation skills training.
(ii) Allowable uses of these grant funds do not include student
assistance and support services available through the state opportunity
grant program under RCW 28B.50.271.
(b) Applicants eligible to receive these grants may be any
organization or a partnership of organizations that has demonstrated
expertise in:
(i) Implementing effective education and training programs that
meet industry demand; and
(ii) Recruiting and supporting, to successful completion of those
training programs carried out under these grants, the target
populations of workers.
(c) In awarding grants from the green industries jobs training
account, the state board for community and technical colleges shall
give priority to applicants that demonstrate the ability to:
(i) Use labor market and industry analysis developed by the
employment security department and green industry skill panels in the
design and delivery of the relevant education and training program, and
otherwise utilize strategies developed by green industry skill panels;
(ii) Leverage and align existing public programs and resources and
private resources toward the goal of recruiting, supporting, educating,
and training target populations of workers;
(iii) Work collaboratively with other relevant stakeholders in the
regional economy;
(iv) Link adult basic and remedial education, where necessary, with
occupation skills training;
(v) Involve employers and, where applicable, labor unions in the
determination of relevant skills and competencies and, where relevant,
the validation of career pathways; and
(vi) Ensure that supportive services, where necessary, are
integrated with education and training and are delivered by
organizations with direct access to and experience with the targeted
population of workers.

Sec. 68 RCW 43.330.375 and 2010 c 187 s 3 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The department ((and the workforce board)) must:
(a) Coordinate efforts across the state to ensure that federal
training and education funds are captured and deployed in a focused and
effective manner in order to support green economy projects and
accomplish the goals of the evergreen jobs initiative;
(b) Accelerate and coordinate efforts by state and local
organizations to identify, apply for, and secure all sources of funds,
particularly those created by the 2009 American recovery and
reinvestment act, and to ensure that distributions of funding to local
organizations are allocated in a manner that is time-efficient and
user-friendly for the local organizations. Local organizations
eligible to receive support include but are not limited to:
(i) Associate development organizations;
(ii) Workforce development councils;
(iii) Public utility districts; and
(iv) Community action agencies;
(c) Support green economy projects at both the state and local
level by developing a process and a framework to provide, at a minimum:
(i) Administrative and technical assistance;
(ii) Assistance with and expediting of permit processes; and
(iii) Priority consideration of opportunities leading to exportable
green economy goods and services, including renewable energy
technology;
(d) Coordinate local and state implementation of projects using
federal funds to ensure implementation is time-efficient and user-friendly for local organizations;
(e) Emphasize through both support and outreach efforts, projects
that:
(i) Have a strong and lasting economic or environmental impact;
(ii) Lead to a domestically or internationally exportable good or
service, including renewable energy technology;
(iii) Create training programs leading to a credential,
certificate, or degree in a green economy field;
(iv) Strengthen the state's competitiveness in a particular sector
or cluster of the green economy;
(v) Create employment opportunities for veterans, members of the
national guard, and low-income and disadvantaged populations;
(vi) Comply with prevailing wage provisions of chapter 39.12 RCW;
(vii) Ensure at least fifteen percent of labor hours are performed
by apprentices;
(f) Identify emerging technologies and innovations that are likely
to contribute to advancements in the green economy, including the
activities in designated innovation partnership zones established in
RCW 43.330.270;
(g) Identify barriers to the growth of green jobs in traditional
industries such as the forest products industry;
(h) Identify statewide performance metrics for projects receiving
agency assistance. Such metrics may include:
(i) The number of new green jobs created each year, their wage
levels, and, to the extent determinable, the percentage of new green
jobs filled by veterans, members of the national guard, and low-income
and disadvantaged populations;
(ii) The total amount of new federal funding secured, the
respective amounts allocated to the state and local levels, and the
timeliness of deployment of new funding by state agencies to the local
level;
(iii) The timeliness of state deployment of funds and support to
local organizations; and
(iv) If available, the completion rates, time to completion, and
training-related placement rates for green economy postsecondary
training programs;
(i) Identify strategies to allocate existing and new funding
streams for green economy workforce training programs and education to
emphasize those leading to a credential, certificate, or degree in a
green economy field;
(j) Identify and implement strategies to allocate existing and new
funding streams for workforce development councils and associate
development organizations to increase their effectiveness and
efficiency and increase local capacity to respond rapidly and
comprehensively to opportunities to attract green jobs to local
communities;
(k) Develop targeting criteria for existing investments that are
consistent with the economic development commission's economic
development strategy and the goals of this section and RCW 28C.18.170
(as recodified by this act), 28B.50.281, and 49.04.200; and
(l) Make and support outreach efforts so that residents of
Washington, particularly members of target populations, become aware of
educational and employment opportunities identified and funded through
the evergreen jobs act.
(2) The department and the workforce board must provide semiannual
performance reports to the governor and appropriate committees of the
legislature on:
(a) Actual statewide performance based on the performance measures
identified in subsection (1)(h) of this section;
(b) How the state is emphasizing and supporting projects that lead
to a domestically or internationally exportable good or service,
including renewable energy technology;
(c) A list of projects supported, created, or funded in furtherance
of the goals of the evergreen jobs initiative and the actions taken by
state and local organizations, including the effectiveness of state
agency support provided to local organizations as directed in
subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section;
(d) Recommendations for new or expanded financial incentives and
comprehensive strategies to:
(i) Recruit, retain, and expand green economy industries and small
businesses; and
(ii) Stimulate research and development of green technology and
innovation, which may include designating innovation partnership zones
linked to the green economy;
(e) Any information that associate development organizations and
workforce development councils choose to provide to appropriate
legislative committees regarding the effectiveness, timeliness, and
coordination of support provided by state agencies under this section
and RCW 28C.18.170 (as recodified by this act), 28B.50.281, and
49.04.200; and
(f) Any recommended statutory changes necessary to increase the
effectiveness of the evergreen jobs initiative and state responsiveness
to local agencies and organizations.
(3) The definitions, designations, and results of the employment
security department's broader labor market research under RCW
43.330.010 shall inform the planning and strategic direction of the
department, ((the state workforce training and education coordinating
board,)) the state board for community and technical colleges, and the
higher education coordinating board.

Sec. 69 RCW 49.04.010 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 22 and 2011 c 308
s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:
(1) The department of labor and industries is the agency with
responsibility and accountability for apprenticeship within the state
for federal purposes. The director of labor and industries shall
appoint a regulatory apprenticeship council, composed of three
representatives each from employer and employee organizations,
respectively. The terms of office of the members of the apprenticeship
council first appointed by the director of labor and industries shall
be as follows: One representative each of employers and employees
shall be appointed for one year, two years, and three years,
respectively. Thereafter, each member shall be appointed for a term of
three years. The director of labor and industries shall also appoint
a public member to the apprenticeship council for a three-year term.
Each member shall hold office until a successor is appointed and has
qualified and any vacancy shall be filled by appointment for the
unexpired portion of the term. A designated representative from each
of the following: The ((workforce training and education coordinating
board,)) state board for community and technical colleges, employment
security department, and United States department of labor,
apprenticeship, training, employer, and labor services, shall be ex
officio members of the apprenticeship council. Ex officio members
shall have no vote. Each member of the council, not otherwise
compensated by public moneys, shall be reimbursed for travel expenses
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and shall be compensated
in accordance with RCW 43.03.240.
(2) The apprenticeship council is authorized to approve
apprenticeship programs, and establish apprenticeship program standards
as rules, including requirements for apprentice-related and
supplemental instruction, coordination of instruction with job
experiences, and instructor qualifications. The council shall consider
recommendations from the state board for community and technical
colleges on matters of apprentice-related and supplemental instruction,
coordination of instruction with job experiences, and instructor
qualifications. The rules for apprenticeship instructor qualifications
shall either be by reference or reasonably similar to the applicable
requirements established by or pursuant to chapter 28B.50 RCW. The
director is authorized to adopt rules as may be necessary to carry out
the intent and purposes of this chapter, after consultation with the
council and receiving the council's recommendations, including a
procedure to resolve an impasse should a tie vote of the council occur,
and perform such other duties as are hereinafter imposed.
(3) Not less than once a year the apprenticeship council shall make
a report to the director of labor and industries of its activities and
findings which shall be available to the public.

Sec. 70 RCW 49.04.190 and 2006 c 161 s 4 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Within existing resources, the Washington state apprenticeship
and training council shall approve and oversee direct-entry programs
for graduating secondary students into building and construction-related apprenticeships by:
(a) Assisting individual school districts in using and leveraging
existing resources; and
(b) Developing guidelines, including guidelines that ensure that
graduating secondary school students will receive appropriate education
and training and will have the opportunity to transition to local
apprenticeship programs. The guidelines must be developed with input
from apprenticeship coordinators, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, the state board for community and technical
colleges, ((the workforce training and education coordinating board,))
and other interested stakeholders for direct-entry programs.
(2) The Washington state apprenticeship and training council shall
award up to ten incentive grants for the 2006-07 school year, based on
guidelines established under subsection (1)(b) of this section, to
school districts statewide solely for personnel to negotiate and
implement agreements with local apprenticeship programs based upon
state apprenticeship use requirements, as described in RCW 39.04.320,
to accept graduating secondary school students with appropriate
training into apprenticeship programs. The council shall make every
effort to award the grants evenly across the state.
(3) Beginning December 1, 2006, the Washington state apprenticeship
and training council shall provide an annual report to the governor and
the education and commerce and labor committees of the legislature.
The report shall include:
(a) The guidelines established under subsection (1)(b) of this
section;
(b) The names of the school districts receiving incentive grants
under subsection (2) of this section;
(c) The results of negotiations between school districts receiving
incentive grants and local apprenticeship programs;
(d) A list of apprenticeship programs that have agreed, pursuant to
negotiated agreements, to accept qualified graduating secondary
students; and
(e) The number of qualified graduating secondary students entering
into apprenticeship programs each year through direct-entry programs.

Sec. 71 RCW 50.22.005 and 2009 c 566 s 7 are each amended to read
as follows:
The employment security department shall periodically bring
together representatives of the ((workforce training and education
coordinating board,)) workforce development councils, the state board
for community and technical colleges, business, labor, and the
legislature to review development and implementation of chapter 566,
Laws of 2009 and related programs under this chapter.

Sec. 72 RCW 50.38.030 and 1995 c 399 s 142 are each amended to
read as follows:
The employment security department shall consult with the following
agencies prior to the issuance of the state occupational forecast:
(1) Office of financial management;
(2) Department of ((community, trade, and economic development))
commerce;
(3) Department of labor and industries;
(4) State board for community and technical colleges;
(5) Superintendent of public instruction;
(6) Department of social and health services; and
(7) ((Workforce training and education coordinating board; and
(8))) Other state and local agencies as deemed appropriate by the
commissioner of the employment security department.
These agencies shall cooperate with the employment security
department, submitting information relevant to the generation of
occupational forecasts.

Sec. 73 RCW 50.38.050 and 2009 c 151 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
The department shall have the following duties:
(1) Oversight and management of a statewide comprehensive labor
market and occupational supply and demand information system, including
development of a five-year employment forecast for state and labor
market areas;
(2) Produce local labor market information packages for the state's
counties, including special studies and job impact analyses in support
of state and local employment, training, education, and job creation
programs, especially activities that prevent job loss, reduce
unemployment, and create jobs;
(3) Coordinate with the office of financial management and the
office of the forecast council to improve employment estimates by
enhancing data on corporate officers, improving business establishment
listings, expanding sample for employment estimates, and developing
business entry/exit analysis relevant to the generation of occupational
and economic forecasts;
(4) In cooperation with the office of financial management, produce
long-term industry and occupational employment forecasts. These
forecasts shall be consistent with the official economic and revenue
forecast council biennial economic and revenue forecasts; and
(5) Analyze labor market and economic data, including the use of
input-output models, for the purpose of identifying industry clusters
and strategic industry clusters that meet the criteria identified by
the working group convened by the economic development commission ((and
the workforce training and education coordinating board)) under chapter
43.330 RCW.

Sec. 74 RCW 74.08A.280 and 1997 c 58 s 315 are each amended to
read as follows:
(1) The legislature finds that moving those eligible for assistance
to self-sustaining employment is a goal of the WorkFirst program. It
is the intent of WorkFirst to aid a participant's progress to self-sufficiency by allowing flexibility within the statewide program to
reflect community resources, the local characteristics of the labor
market, and the composition of the caseload. Program success will be
enhanced through effective coordination at regional and local levels,
involving employers, labor representatives, educators, community
leaders, local governments, and social service providers.
(2) The department, through its regional offices, shall collaborate
with employers, recipients, frontline workers, educational
institutions, labor, private industry councils, ((the workforce
training and education coordinating board,)) community rehabilitation
employment programs, employment and training agencies, local
governments, the employment security department, and community action
agencies to develop work programs that are effective and work in their
communities. For planning purposes, the department shall collect and
make accessible to regional offices successful work program models from
around the United States, including the employment partnership program,
apprenticeship programs, microcredit, microenterprise, self-employment,
and W-2 Wisconsin works. Work programs shall incorporate local
volunteer citizens in their planning and implementation phases to
ensure community relevance and success.
(3) To reduce administrative costs and to ensure equal statewide
access to services, the department may develop contracts for statewide
welfare-to-work services. These statewide contracts shall support
regional flexibility and ensure that resources follow local labor
market opportunities and recipients' needs.
(4) The secretary shall establish WorkFirst service areas for
purposes of planning WorkFirst programs and for distributing WorkFirst
resources. Service areas shall reflect department regions.
(5) By July 31st of each odd-numbered year, a plan for the
WorkFirst program shall be developed for each region. The plan shall
be prepared in consultation with local and regional sources, adapting
the statewide WorkFirst program to achieve maximum effect for the
participants and the communities within which they reside. Local
consultation shall include to the greatest extent possible input from
local and regional planning bodies for social services and workforce
development. The regional and local administrator shall consult with
employers of various sizes, labor representatives, training and
education providers, program participants, economic development
organizations, community organizations, tribes, and local governments
in the preparation of the service area plan.
(6) The secretary has final authority in plan approval or
modification. Regional program implementation may deviate from the
statewide program if specified in a service area plan, as approved by
the secretary.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 75 The following acts or parts of acts are
each repealed:
(1) RCW 28A.300.220 (Cooperation with workforce training and
education coordinating board) and 1991 c 238 s 78;
(2) RCW 28B.50.096 (Cooperation with workforce training and
education coordinating board) and 1991 c 238 s 79;
(3) RCW 28C.18.005 (Findings) and 1996 c 99 s 1 & 1991 c 238 s 1;
(4) RCW 28C.18.010 (Definitions) and 2009 c 151 s 5, 2008 c 103 s
2, 1996 c 99 s 2, & 1991 c 238 s 2;
(5) RCW 28C.18.020 (Workforce training and education coordinating
board) and 2010 c 128 s 6 & 1991 c 238 s 3;
(6) RCW 28C.18.030 (Purpose of the board) and 1996 c 99 s 3 & 1991
c 238 s 4;
(7) RCW 28C.18.040 (Director's duties) and 1994 c 154 s 307 & 1991
c 238 s 5;
(8) RCW 28C.18.070 (Intent -- "Program" clarified) and 1995 c 130 s
1;
(9) RCW 28C.18.080 (Comprehensive plan -- Contents -- Updates -- Agency
operating plans -- Reports to the legislature) and 2009 c 421 s 6, 2009
c 151 s 7, 2009 c 92 s 1, 1997 c 369 s 5, & 1995 c 130 s 2;
(10) RCW 28C.18.090 (Additional board duties -- Program evaluation by
operating agencies) and 1995 c 130 s 4;
(11) RCW 28C.18.100 (Assessments by board -- Biennial report to
legislature and governor) and 1995 c 130 s 5;
(12) RCW 28C.18.110 (Identification of policies and methods to
promote efficiency and sharing of resources -- Report to governor and
legislature) and 1995 c 130 s 6;
(13) RCW 28C.18.120 (State strategic plan for supply of health care
personnel -- Reports) and 2003 c 278 s 2;
(14) RCW 28C.18.132 (Electronically distributed learning -- Work
group -- Report) and 2008 c 258 s 2; and
(15) RCW 50.12.245 (Cooperation with workforce training and
education coordinating board) and 1991 c 238 s 80.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 76 (1) The workforce training and education
coordinating board is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and
functions are hereby transferred as provided in this act.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the workforce training
and education coordinating board shall be delivered to the custody of
the transferee entity. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment,
motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the workforce
training and education coordinating board shall be made available to
the transferee entity. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the
workforce training and education coordinating board shall be assigned
to the transferee entity.
(b) Any appropriations made to the workforce training and education
coordinating board shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the transferee entity.
(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel,
funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other
tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the
performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of
financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the workforce training and education
coordinating board are transferred to the jurisdiction of the
transferee entity. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW,
the state civil service law, are assigned to the transferee entity to
perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any
loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil
service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the workforce
training and education coordinating board shall be continued and acted
upon by the transferee entity. All existing contracts and obligations
shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the transferee
entity.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the workforce training and education coordinating board shall not
affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of
this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the workforce training and
education coordinating board assigned to the transferee entity under
this section whose positions are within an existing bargaining unit
description at the transferee entity shall become a part of the
existing bargaining unit at the transferee entity and shall be
considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing
bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 77 A new section is added to chapter 28C.04
RCW to read as follows:
(1) All powers, duties, and functions of the workforce training and
education coordinating board pertaining to job skills program are
transferred to the state board for community and technical colleges.
All references to the director or the workforce training and education
coordinating board in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed
to mean the director or the state board for community and technical
colleges when referring to the functions transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the workforce training
and education coordinating board pertaining to the powers, duties, and
functions transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the state
board for community and technical colleges. All cabinets, furniture,
office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed
by the workforce training and education coordinating board in carrying
out the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be made
available to the state board for community and technical colleges. All
funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers,
duties, and functions transferred shall be assigned to the state board
for community and technical colleges.
(b) Any appropriations made to the workforce training and education
coordinating board for carrying out the powers, duties, and functions
transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be
transferred and credited to the state board for community and technical
colleges.
(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All employees of the workforce training and education
coordinating board engaged in performing the powers, duties, and
functions transferred are transferred to the jurisdiction of the state
board for community and technical colleges. All employees classified
under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to
the state board for community and technical colleges to perform their
usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.
(4) All rules and all pending business before the workforce
training and education coordinating board pertaining to the powers,
duties, and functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by
the state board for community and technical colleges. All existing
contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be
performed by the state board for community and technical colleges.
(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of
the workforce training and education coordinating board shall not
affect the validity of any act performed before the effective date of
this section.
(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected,
the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make
the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation
accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.
(7) All classified employees of the workforce training and
education coordinating board assigned to the state board for community
and technical colleges under this section whose positions are within an
existing bargaining unit description at the state board for community
and technical colleges shall become a part of the existing bargaining
unit at the state board for community and technical colleges and shall
be considered an appropriate inclusion or modification of the existing
bargaining unit under the provisions of chapter 41.80 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 78 (1) By December 1, 2012, the higher
education coordinating board, or its successor agency; the state board
for community and technical colleges; the employment security
department; and the department of commerce shall review the statutory
requirements of the former workforce training and education
coordinating board and submit any recommendations for legislative
action to the governor and appropriate legislative committees.
(2) This section expires July 1, 2013.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 79 RCW 28C.18.060 is recodified as a section
in chapter 28B.77 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 80 The following sections are each recodified
as sections in chapter 43.330 RCW: RCW 28C.18.130, 28C.18.140,
28C.18.150, and 28C.18.170.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 81 RCW 28C.18.050 is recodified as a new
section in chapter 50.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 82 RCW 28C.18.900 is decodified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 83 If any part of this act is found to be in
conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to
the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of
this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with
respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not
affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to
the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal
funds by the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 84 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---