BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 74.34 RCW
to read as follows:
A public agency may not charge a fee for filing or service of
process to petitioners seeking relief under this chapter. Petitioners
must be provided the necessary number of certified copies at no cost.

--- END ---