BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 82.14.045 and 2008 c 86 s 102 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) The legislative body of any city pursuant to RCW 35.92.060,
of any county which has created an unincorporated transportation
benefit area pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and 36.57.110, of any public
transportation benefit area pursuant to RCW 36.57A.080 and 36.57A.090,
of any county transportation authority established pursuant to chapter
36.57 RCW, and of any metropolitan municipal corporation within a
county with a population of one million or more pursuant to chapter
35.58 RCW, may, by resolution or ordinance for the sole purpose of
providing funds for the operation, maintenance, or capital needs of
public transportation systems or public transportation limited to
persons with special needs under RCW 36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and in
lieu of the excise taxes authorized by RCW 35.95.040, submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters or include such authorization in
a proposition to perform the function of public transportation or
public transportation limited to persons with special needs under RCW
36.57.130 and 36.57A.180, and if approved by a majority of persons
voting thereon, impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms
of this chapter.
(b) Where an authorizing proposition is submitted by a county on
behalf of an unincorporated transportation benefit area, it ((shall))
must be voted upon by the voters residing within the boundaries of such
unincorporated transportation benefit area and, if approved, the sales
and use tax ((shall)) may be imposed only within such area.
(c) Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary,
any county in which a county public transportation plan has been
adopted pursuant to RCW 36.57.070 and the voters of such county have
authorized the imposition of a sales and use tax pursuant to the
provisions of section 10, chapter 167, Laws of 1974 ex. sess., prior to
July 1, 1975, ((shall be)) is authorized to fix and impose a sales and
use tax as provided in this section at not to exceed the rate so
authorized without additional approval of the voters of such county as
otherwise required by this section.
(2) The tax authorized by this section ((shall be)) is in addition
to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and ((shall)) may be only
collected from those persons who reside within the taxing jurisdiction
and are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within such city, public
transportation benefit area, county, or metropolitan municipal
corporation as the case may be. The rate of such tax ((shall be)) is
one-tenth, two-tenths, three-tenths, four-tenths, five-tenths, six-tenths, seven-tenths, eight-tenths, or nine-tenths of one percent of
the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article
used (in the case of a use tax). There is a presumption that a person
making a retail purchase within the district resides in the district
and the purchaser may overcome such presumption by furnishing proof of
nonresidence as provided for in section 2 of this act. The rate of
such tax ((shall)) may not exceed the rate authorized by the voters
unless such increase ((shall be)) is similarly approved.
(((2))) (3)(a) In the event a metropolitan municipal corporation
imposes a sales and use tax pursuant to this chapter no city, county
which has created an unincorporated transportation benefit area, public
transportation benefit area authority, or county transportation
authority wholly within such metropolitan municipal corporation ((shall
be)) is empowered to impose and/or collect taxes under RCW 35.95.040 or
this section, but nothing ((herein shall)) in this section prevents
such city or county from imposing sales and use taxes pursuant to any
other authorization.
(b) In the event a county transportation authority imposes a sales
and use tax under this section, no city, county which has created an
unincorporated transportation benefit area, public transportation
benefit area, or metropolitan municipal corporation, located within the
territory of the authority, ((shall be)) is empowered to impose or
collect taxes under RCW 35.95.040 or this section.
(c) In the event a public transportation benefit area imposes a
sales and use tax under this section, no city, county which has created
an unincorporated transportation benefit area, or metropolitan
municipal corporation, located wholly or partly within the territory of
the public transportation benefit area, ((shall be)) is empowered to
impose or collect taxes under RCW 35.95.040 or this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) Any person claiming that they are not subject to the portion of
the retail sales tax imposed under RCW 82.14.045 must display proof of
his or her current nonresident status at the time of the transaction in
one of the following ways:
(a) A person may provide the seller with one piece of
identification such as a valid driver's license or identification card
that has a photograph of the holder and a residential address outside
of the transportation benefit district;
(b) A person may provide the seller with an exemption certificate
in compliance with subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section.
(2)(a) If the vendor chooses to make a sale to a nonresident
without collecting the sales tax, the vendor must complete one of the
following:
(i) Examine the purchaser's proof of nonresidence, determine
whether the proof is acceptable under subsection (1)(a) of this
section, and maintain records for each nontaxable sale that shows the
type of proof accepted, including any identification numbers where
appropriate, and the expiration date, if any.
(ii) Obtain from the purchaser a properly completed uniform
exemption certificate approved by the streamlined sales and use tax
agreement governing board or any other exemption certificate as may be
authorized by the department and properly completed by the purchaser.
A nonresident purchaser who uses an exemption certificate authorized in
this subsection must include the purchaser's driver's license number or
state-issued identification number and the state of issuance.
(b) In lieu of using the methods provided in (a)(i) and (ii) of
this subsection to document an exempt sale to a nonresident, a seller
may capture the relevant data elements as allowed under the streamlined
sales and use tax agreement.
(3)(a) Any person making fraudulent statements, which includes the
offer of fraudulent identification or fraudulently procured
identification to a vendor, in order to purchase goods without paying
retail sales tax is guilty of perjury under chapter 9A.72 RCW.
(b) Any person making tax exempt purchases under this section by
displaying proof of identification not his or her own, or counterfeit
identification, with intent to violate the provisions of this section
is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable for the tax and
subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one hundred dollars or the
tax due on such purchases.
(4)(a) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the tax and
who fails to maintain records of sales to nonresidents as provided in
this section is personally liable for the amount of tax due.
(b) Any vendor who makes sales without collecting the retail sales
tax under this section and who has actual knowledge that the
purchaser's proof of identification establishing out-of-state residency
is fraudulent is guilty of a misdemeanor and, in addition, is liable
for the tax and subject to a penalty equal to the greater of one
thousand dollars or the tax due on such sales. In addition, both the
purchaser and the vendor are liable for any penalties and interest
assessable under chapter 82.32 RCW.

--- END ---