BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 74.08A.340 and 2009 c 564 s 953 are each amended to
read as follows:
((The department of social and health services shall operate the
Washington WorkFirst program authorized under RCW 74.08A.200 through
74.08A.330, 43.330.145, 43.215.545, and 74.25.040, and chapter 74.12
RCW within the following constraints:))
(1) ((The full amount of the temporary assistance for needy
families block grant, plus qualifying state expenditures as
appropriated in the biennial operating budget, shall be appropriated to
the department each year in the biennial appropriations act to carry
out the provisions of the program authorized in RCW 74.08A.200 through
74.08A.330, 43.330.145, 43.215.545, and 74.25.040, and chapter 74.12
RCW.
(2)(a) The department may expend funds defined in subsection (1) of
this section in any manner that will effectively accomplish the outcome
measures defined in RCW 74.08A.410 with the following exception:
Beginning with the 2007-2009 biennium, funds that constitute the
working connections child care program, child care quality programs,
and child care licensing functions.
(b) Beginning in the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the legislature
shall appropriate and the departments of early learning and social and
health services shall expend funds defined in subsection (1) of this
section that constitute the working connections child care program,
child care quality programs, and child care licensing functions in a
manner that is consistent with the outcome measures defined in RCW
74.08A.410.
(c))) No more than fifteen percent of the amount ((provided in
subsection (1) of this section)) appropriated for the WorkFirst program
may be spent for administrative purposes. For the purpose of this
subsection, "administrative purposes" does not include expenditures for
information technology and computerization needed for tracking and
monitoring required by P.L. 104-193. ((The department shall not
increase grant levels to recipients of the program authorized in RCW
74.08A.200 through 74.08A.330 and 43.330.145 and chapter 74.12 RCW,
except as authorized in the omnibus appropriations act for the 2009-2011 biennium.
(3) The department shall implement strategies that accomplish the
outcome measures identified in RCW 74.08A.410 that are within the
funding constraints in this section. Specifically, the department
shall implement strategies that will cause the number of cases in the
program authorized in RCW 74.08A.200 through 74.08A.330 and 43.330.145
and chapter 74.12 RCW to decrease by at least fifteen percent during
the 1997-99 biennium and by at least five percent in the subsequent
biennium. The department may transfer appropriation authority between
funding categories within the economic services program in order to
carry out the requirements of this subsection.
(4))) (2) The department shall monitor expenditures against the
appropriation levels provided for in ((subsection (1) of this section))
the omnibus appropriations act. The department shall quarterly make a
determination as to whether expenditure levels will exceed available
funding and communicate its finding to the legislature. If the
determination indicates that expenditures will exceed funding at the
end of the fiscal year, the department shall take all necessary actions
to ensure that all services provided under this chapter shall be made
available only to the extent of the availability and level of
appropriation made by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 This act takes effect July 1, 2012.

--- END ---