BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.04.320 and 2009 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) through (d) of this subsection,
from January 1, 2005, and thereafter, for all public works estimated to
cost one million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that
no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by
apprentices. Contracts for public works subject to this section must
include a provision requiring a participating contractor or
subcontractor to submit certified payroll records demonstrating proof
of apprentice utilization to the awarding entity.
(b)(i) This section does not apply to contracts advertised for bid
before July 1, 2007, for any public works by the department of
transportation.
(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2007, and
before July 1, 2008, for all public works by the department of
transportation estimated to cost five million dollars or more, all
specifications shall require that no less than ten percent of the labor
hours be performed by apprentices.
(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2008,
and before July 1, 2009, for all public works by the department of
transportation estimated to cost three million dollars or more, all
specifications shall require that no less than twelve percent of the
labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(iv) For contracts advertised for bid on or after July 1, 2009, for
all public works by the department of transportation estimated to cost
two million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no
less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by
apprentices.
(c)(i) This section does not apply to contracts advertised for bid
before January 1, 2008, for any public works by a school district, or
to any project funded in whole or in part by bond issues approved
before July 1, 2007.
(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2008,
for all public works by a school district estimated to cost three
million dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less
than ten percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2009,
for all public works by a school district estimated to cost two million
dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than
twelve percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(iv) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2010,
for all public works by a school district estimated to cost one million
dollars or more, all specifications shall require that no less than
fifteen percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.
(d)(i) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1,
2010, for all public works by a four-year institution of higher
education estimated to cost three million dollars or more, all
specifications must require that no less than ten percent of the labor
hours be performed by apprentices.
(ii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2011,
for all public works by a four-year institution of higher education
estimated to cost two million dollars or more, all specifications must
require that no less than twelve percent of the labor hours be
performed by apprentices.
(iii) For contracts advertised for bid on or after January 1, 2012,
for all public works by a four-year institution of higher education
estimated to cost one million dollars or more, all specifications must
require that no less than fifteen percent of the labor hours be
performed by apprentices.
(2) Awarding entities may adjust the requirements of this section
for a specific project for the following reasons:
(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in
specific geographic areas;
(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor
hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of
apprentice participation;
(c) Participating contractors have demonstrated a good faith effort
to comply with the requirements of RCW 39.04.300 and 39.04.310 and this
section; or
(d) Other criteria the awarding entity deems appropriate, which are
subject to review by the office of the governor.
(3) The secretary of the department of transportation shall adjust
the requirements of this section for a specific project for the
following reasons:
(a) The demonstrated lack of availability of apprentices in
specific geographic areas; or
(b) A disproportionately high ratio of material costs to labor
hours, which does not make feasible the required minimum levels of
apprentice participation.
(4) This section applies to public works contracts awarded by the
state, to public works contracts awarded by school districts, and to
public works contracts awarded by state four-year institutions of
higher education. However, this section does not apply to contracts
awarded by state agencies headed by a separately elected public
official.
(5)(a) The department of ((general administration)) enterprise
services must provide information and technical assistance to affected
agencies and collect the following data from affected agencies for each
project covered by this section:
(i) The name of each apprentice and apprentice registration number;
(ii) The name of each project;
(iii) The dollar value of each project;
(iv) The date of the contractor's notice to proceed;
(v) The number of apprentices and labor hours worked by them,
categorized by trade or craft;
(vi) The number of journey level workers and labor hours worked by
them, categorized by trade or craft; and
(vii) The number, type, and rationale for the exceptions granted
under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) The department of labor and industries shall assist the
department of ((general administration)) enterprise services in
providing information and technical assistance.
(6) The secretary of transportation shall establish an
apprenticeship utilization advisory committee, which shall include
statewide geographic representation and consist of equal numbers of
representatives of contractors and labor. The committee must include
at least one member representing contractor businesses with less than
thirty-five employees. The advisory committee shall meet regularly
with the secretary of transportation to discuss implementation of this
section by the department of transportation, including development of
the process to be used to adjust the requirements of this section for
a specific project. The committee shall provide a report to the
legislature by January 1, 2008, on the effects of the apprentice labor
requirement on transportation projects and on the availability of
apprentice labor and programs statewide.
(7) At the request of the senate labor, commerce, research and
development committee, the house of representatives commerce and labor
committee, or their successor committees, and the governor, the
department of ((general administration)) enterprise services and the
department of labor and industries shall compile and summarize the
agency data and provide a joint report to both committees. The report
shall include recommendations on modifications or improvements to the
apprentice utilization program and information on skill shortages in
each trade or craft.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.12.040 and 2009 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before
((payment is made by or on behalf of)) the state, or any county,
municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws, finalizes
a contract for any public work subject to prevailing wage requirements,
((of any sum or sums due on account of a public works contract, it
shall be the duty of)) the officer or person charged with the custody
and disbursement of public funds ((to require)) must receive from the
contractor and each and every subcontractor ((from the contractor or a
subcontractor to submit to such officer)) a "Statement of Intent to Pay
Prevailing Wages". For a contract in excess of ten thousand dollars,
the statement of intent to pay prevailing wages shall include:
(a) The contractor's registration certificate number; and
(b) The prevailing rate of wage for each classification of workers
entitled to prevailing wages under RCW 39.12.020 and the estimated
number of workers in each classification.
Each statement of intent to pay prevailing wages must be approved
by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries before it is submitted to said officer. ((Unless otherwise
authorized by the department of labor and industries, each)) Before the
officer charged with the disbursement of public funds makes any payment
due on a public works contract, the officer must have certified payroll
records from the contractor and any subcontractor receiving part or all
of the disbursement, and the contractor must submit a voucher claim
((submitted by a contractor)) for payment ((on a project estimate shall
state)) that includes a statement that the prevailing wages have been
paid in accordance with the prefiled statement or statements of intent
to pay prevailing wages on file with the public agency. Following the
final acceptance of a public works project, it shall be the duty of the
officer charged with the disbursement of public funds((,)) to require
the contractor and each and every subcontractor from the contractor or
a subcontractor to submit to such officer an "Affidavit of Wages Paid."
Before the funds retained according to the provisions of RCW 60.28.011
are released to the contractor, the officer charged with the
disbursement of public funds must have the affidavit of wages paid and
certified payroll records from the contractor and each and every
subcontractor. Each affidavit of wages paid must be certified by the
industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries
before it is submitted to said officer. Certified payroll records
required under this section must be submitted to the public officer in
an electronic format. Upon receipt of certified payroll records, the
public officer must publish the certified records, with social security
numbers redacted, on a publicly accessible database, and forward
unredacted copies of the records to the department of labor and
industries.
(2) As an alternate to the procedures provided for in subsection
(1) of this section, for public works projects of two thousand five
hundred dollars or less and for projects where the limited public works
process under RCW 39.04.155(3) is followed:
(a) An awarding agency may authorize the contractor or
subcontractor to submit the statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
directly to the officer or person charged with the custody or
disbursement of public funds in the awarding agency without approval by
the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries.
The awarding agency shall retain such statement of intent to pay
prevailing wages for a period of not less than three years.
(b) Upon final acceptance of the public works project, the awarding
agency shall require the contractor or subcontractor to submit an
affidavit of wages paid. Upon receipt of the affidavit of wages paid,
the awarding agency may pay the contractor or subcontractor in full,
including funds that would otherwise be retained according to the
provisions of RCW 60.28.011. Within thirty days of receipt of the
affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency shall submit the affidavit
of wages paid to the industrial statistician of the department of labor
and industries for approval.
(c) A statement of intent to pay prevailing wages and an affidavit
of wages paid shall be on forms approved by the department of labor and
industries.
(d) In the event of a wage claim and a finding for the claimant by
the department of labor and industries where the awarding agency has
used the alternative process provided for in subsection (2) of this
section, the awarding agency shall pay the wages due directly to the
claimant. If the contractor or subcontractor did not pay the wages
stated in the affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency may take
action at law to seek reimbursement from the contractor or
subcontractor of wages paid to the claimant, and may prohibit the
contractor or subcontractor from bidding on any public works contract
of the awarding agency for up to one year.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to allow an
awarding agency to subdivide any public works project of more than two
thousand five hundred dollars for the purpose of circumventing the
procedures required by ((RCW 39.12.040(1))) subsection (1) of this
section.

--- END ---