BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 29A.84.510 and 2011 c 10 s 69 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) During the voting period that begins eighteen days before and
ends the day of a special election, general election, or primary, no
person may((,)):
(a) Within fifty feet of a voting center or ballot drop location:
(((a))) (i) Suggest or persuade or attempt to suggest or persuade
any voter to vote for or against any candidate or ballot measure;
(((b))) (ii) Circulate cards or handbills of any kind;
(((c))) (iii) Solicit signatures to any kind of petition; or
(((d))) (iv) Engage in any practice which interferes with the
freedom of voters to exercise their franchise or disrupts the
administration of the voting center((.)) or ballot drop location; or
(((2) No person may)) (b) Obstruct the doors or entries to a
building in which a voting center or ballot drop location is located or
prevent free access to and from any voting center or ballot drop
location.
(2) Any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or municipal law enforcement
officer shall prevent such ((obstruction)) prohibited activity, and may
arrest any person ((creating)) engaging in such ((obstruction))
prohibited activity.
(3) Any violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor,
punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021, and the person convicted may be ordered to pay the
costs of prosecution.

--- END ---