BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.010 and 1989 c 12 s 6 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The "prevailing rate of wage", for the intents and purposes of
this chapter, shall be the average rate of hourly wage, usual benefits,
and overtime paid in the locality, as hereinafter defined, to ((the
majority of)) workers, laborers, or mechanics, in the same trade or
occupation. ((In the event that there is not a majority in the same
trade or occupation paid at the same rate, then the average rate of
hourly wage and overtime paid to such laborers, workers, or mechanics
in the same trade or occupation shall be the prevailing rate.)) If the
wage paid by any contractor or subcontractor to laborers, workers, or
mechanics on any public work is based on some period of time other than
an hour, the hourly wage for the purposes of this chapter shall be
mathematically determined by the number of hours worked in such period
of time.
(2) The "locality" for the purposes of this chapter shall be the
((largest city in the)) county wherein the physical work is being
performed.
(3) The "usual benefits" for the purposes of this chapter shall
include the amount of:
(a) The rate of contribution irrevocably made by a contractor or
subcontractor to a trustee or to a third person pursuant to a fund,
plan, or program; and
(b) The rate of costs to the contractor or subcontractor which may
be reasonably anticipated in providing benefits to workers, laborers,
and mechanics pursuant to an enforceable commitment to carry out a
financially responsible plan or program which was communicated in
writing to the workers, laborers, and mechanics affected, for medical
or hospital care, pensions on retirement or death, compensation for
injuries or illness resulting from occupational activity, or insurance
to provide any of the foregoing, for unemployment benefits, life
insurance, disability and sickness insurance, or accident insurance,
for vacation and holiday pay, for defraying costs of apprenticeship or
other similar programs, or for other bona fide fringe benefits, but
only where the contractor or subcontractor is not required by other
federal, state, or local law to provide any of such benefits.
(4) An "interested party" for the purposes of this chapter shall
include a contractor, subcontractor, an employee of a contractor or
subcontractor, an organization whose members' wages, benefits, and
conditions of employment are affected by this chapter, and the director
of labor and industries or the director's designee.

--- END ---