BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.020 and 2007 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics,
upon all public works and under all public building service maintenance
contracts of the state or any county, municipality or political
subdivision created by its laws, shall be not less than the prevailing
rate of wage for an hour's work in the same trade or occupation in the
locality within the state where such labor is performed. For a
contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, a contractor required to
pay the prevailing rate of wage shall post in a location readily
visible to workers at the job site: PROVIDED, That on road
construction, sewer line, pipeline, transmission line, street, or alley
improvement projects for which no field office is needed or
established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of wage
statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing, concrete,
or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a copy of the
wage statement to any employee on request:
(((1))) (a) A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries under RCW 39.12.040; and
(((2))) (b) The address and telephone number of the industrial
statistician of the department of labor and industries where a
complaint or inquiry concerning prevailing wages may be made.
(2) This chapter shall not apply to:
(a) Workers or other persons regularly employed by the state, or
any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws;
or
(b) Workers employed in the manufacturing or furnishing of
materials, articles, supplies, or equipment used in a public works
project. However, (i) the work must be done at a facility that has
been in continuous operation in the state of Washington for at least
one year prior to the bid date of the public works project; and (ii)
the facility must manufacture or furnish similar materials, articles,
supplies, or equipment for use in projects that are not public works
projects in the regular course of business.

--- END ---