BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 39.12.020 and 2007 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
The hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics,
employed in construction activities upon all public works and under all
public building service maintenance contracts of the state or any
county, municipality or political subdivision created by its laws,
shall be not less than the prevailing rate of wage for an hour's work
in the same trade or occupation in the locality within the state where
such labor is performed. For a contract in excess of ten thousand
dollars, a contractor required to pay the prevailing rate of wage shall
post in a location readily visible to workers at the job site:
PROVIDED, That on road construction, sewer line, pipeline, transmission
line, street, or alley improvement projects for which no field office
is needed or established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of
wage statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing,
concrete, or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a
copy of the wage statement to any employee on request:
(1) A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages
approved by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries under RCW 39.12.040; and
(2) The address and telephone number of the industrial statistician
of the department of labor and industries where a complaint or inquiry
concerning prevailing wages may be made.
This chapter shall not apply to workers or other persons regularly
employed by the state, or any county, municipality, or political
subdivision created by its laws, or work not covered by chapter 18.27
or 19.28 RCW.

Sec. 2 RCW 39.12.021 and 1989 c 12 s 8 are each amended to read
as follows:
Apprentice workers employed in construction activities upon public
works projects for whom an apprenticeship agreement has been registered
and approved with the state apprenticeship council pursuant to chapter
49.04 RCW, must be paid at least the prevailing hourly rate for an
apprentice of that trade. Any worker for whom an apprenticeship
agreement has not been registered and approved by the state
apprenticeship council shall be considered to be a fully qualified
journey level worker, and, therefore, shall be paid at the prevailing
hourly rate for journey level workers.

Sec. 3 RCW 39.12.030 and 2009 c 62 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The specifications for every contract for the construction,
reconstruction, maintenance or repair of any public work to which the
state or any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by
its laws is a party, shall contain a provision stating the hourly
minimum rate of wage, not less than the prevailing rate of wage, which
may be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics in each trade or
occupation required for such public work employed in the performance of
the contract either by the contractor, subcontractor or other person
doing or contracting to do the whole or any part of the construction
work ((contemplated by)) under the contract, and the contract shall
contain a stipulation that such laborers, workers, or mechanics shall
be paid not less than such specified hourly minimum rate of wage. If
the awarding agency determines that the work contracted for meets the
definition of residential construction, the contract must include that
information.
(2) If the hourly minimum rate of wage stated in the contract
specifies residential construction rates and it is later determined
that the work performed is commercial and subject to commercial
construction rates, the state, county, municipality, or political
subdivision that entered into the contract must pay the difference
between the residential rate stated and the actual commercial rate to
the contractor, subcontractor, or other person doing or contracting to
do the whole or any part of the work under the contract.

--- END ---