BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.04.181 and 1967 c 202 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
"Farm vehicle" means any vehicle other than a farm tractor or farm
implement which is: (1) Designed and/or used primarily in agricultural
pursuits on farms for the purpose of transporting machinery, equipment,
implements, farm products, supplies and/or farm labor thereon and is
only incidentally operated on or moved along public highways for the
purpose of going from one farm to another; or (2) for purposes of RCW
46.25.050, used to transport agricultural products, farm machinery,
farm supplies, or any combination of these materials to or from a farm.

--- END ---