BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this
section apply to section 2 of this act unless the context clearly
requires otherwise.
(1) "Interchange or substitution of an opioid analgesic drug" means
the substitution of any opioid analgesic drug, brand, or generic, for
the opioid analgesic drug incorporating a tamper resistance technology
originally prescribed, irrespective of whether the substituted drug is
rated as pharmaceutically and therapeutically equivalent by the United
States food and drug administration or board of pharmacy or whether the
opioid analgesic drug incorporating a tamper resistance technology
bears a labeling claim with respect to reduction of tampering, abuse,
or abuse potential.
(2) "Opioid analgesic drug" means a drug in the opioid analgesic
drug class prescribed to treat moderate to severe pain or other
conditions, whether in immediate release or extended release form and
whether or not combined with other drug substances to form a single
tablet or other dosage form.
(3)(a) "Opioid analgesic drug incorporating a tamper resistance
technology" means an opioid analgesic drug that:
(i) Incorporates a tamper resistance technology; and
(ii) Has been approved by the United States food and drug
administration pursuant to an application that includes at least one
human tampering or abuse potential study or a laboratory study
comparing the tamper or abuse resistance properties of the drug to one
or more opioid analgesic drugs that (A) have been approved by the
United States food and drug administration; and (B) serve as a positive
control.
(b) A drug may not be required to bear a labeling claim with
respect to reduction of tampering, abuse, or abuse potential.
(4) "Pharmacist" for purposes of this chapter includes any
pharmacist dispensing drugs under the jurisdiction of the board of
pharmacy including, but not limited to, community pharmacists,
pharmacists in hospital-based pharmacies when filling prescriptions for
inpatient or outpatient care, and pharmacists in mail order pharmacies
licensed by the state to distribute in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 PROHIBITION. Notwithstanding RCW 69.41.120,
a pharmacist may not interchange or substitute an opioid analgesic
drug, brand, or generic for an opioid analgesic drug incorporating a
tamper resistance technology unless: (1) The drug provides tamper
resistance properties substantially similar to the prescribed opioid
analgesic drug incorporating a tamper resistance technology; or (2)
obtaining written, signed consent from the prescribing physician for
the interchange or substitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added
to chapter 69.41 RCW, to be codified between RCW 69.41.280 and
69.41.300, under the new subchapter heading, "SUBSTITUTABILITY OF
OPIOID ANALGESICS."

--- END ---