BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 19.290.020 and 2008 c 233 s 2 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) At the time of a transaction, every scrap metal business doing
business in this state shall produce wherever that business is
conducted an accurate and legible record of each transaction involving
private metal property or nonferrous metal property. This record must
be written in the English language, documented on a standardized form
or in electronic form, and contain the following information:
(a) The signature of the person with whom the transaction is made;
(b) The time, date, location, and value of the transaction;
(c) The name of the employee representing the scrap metal business
in the transaction;
(d) The name, street address, and telephone number of the person
with whom the transaction is made;
(e) The license plate number and state of issuance of the license
plate on the motor vehicle used to deliver the private metal property
or nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction;
(f) A description of the motor vehicle used to deliver the private
metal property or nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction;
(g) The current driver's license number or other government-issued
picture identification card number of the seller or a copy of the
seller's government-issued picture identification card; and
(h) A description of the predominant types of private metal
property or nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction,
including the property's classification code as provided in the
institute of scrap recycling industries scrap specifications circular,
2006, and weight, quantity, or volume.
(2) For every transaction that involves private metal property or
nonferrous metal property, every scrap metal business doing business in
the state shall require the person with whom a transaction is being
made to sign a declaration. The declaration may be included as part of
the transactional record required under subsection (1) of this section,
or on a receipt for the transaction. The declaration must state
substantially the following:
"I, the undersigned, affirm under penalty of law that the property
that is subject to this transaction is not to the best of my knowledge
stolen property."
The declaration must be signed and dated by the person with whom
the transaction is being made. An employee of the scrap metal business
must witness the signing and dating of the declaration and sign the
declaration accordingly before any transaction may be consummated.
(3) The record and declaration required under this section must be
open to the inspection of any commissioned law enforcement officer of
the state or any of its political subdivisions at all times during the
ordinary hours of business, or at reasonable times if ordinary hours of
business are not kept, and must be maintained wherever that business is
conducted for one year following the date of the transaction. A law
enforcement agency of the state or any of its political subdivisions
may require submission of the records and declarations to the agency or
political subdivision on a monthly basis with respect to repeated
transactions between that business and the same person.

--- END ---