BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 47.68.380 and 2008 c 34 s 1 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) The ((aviation division of the)) department is responsible for
the conduct and management of all aerial search and rescue within the
state. This includes search and rescue efforts involving aircraft and
airships. The ((division)) department is also responsible for search
and rescue activities involving electronic emergency signaling devices
such as emergency locater transmitters (ELT's) ((and)), emergency
position indicating radio beacons (EPIRB's), personal locator beacons
(PLB's), and similar devices.
(2) An act or omission by any person registered with ((the aviation
division of)) the department for the purpose of engaging in aerial
search and rescue activities, while engaged in such activities, shall
not impose any liability on the department or the person for civil
damages resulting from the act or omission. However, the immunity
provided under this subsection shall not apply to an act or omission
that constitutes gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct. For
the purpose of this subsection, "aerial search and rescue activities"
includes, but is not limited to, training and training-related
activities, but does not include appropriate search and rescue
activities conducted under the authority of RCW 38.52.400.
(3) The department may adopt any rules necessary to implement this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 RCW 47.68.380 is recodified as a section in
chapter 38.52 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 (1) All powers, duties, and functions of the
aviation division of the department of transportation pertaining to
aerial search and rescue activities as described under RCW 47.68.380
(as recodified by this act) are transferred to the state military
department. All references to the director or the aviation division of
the department of transportation in the Revised Code of Washington
shall be construed to mean the director or the state military
department when referring to the functions transferred in this section.
(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files,
papers, or written material in the possession of the aviation division
of the department of transportation pertaining to the powers, duties,
and functions transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the
state military department. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment,
motor vehicles, aircraft, and other tangible property employed by the
aviation division of the department of transportation in carrying out
the powers, duties, and functions transferred shall be made available
to the state military department.
(b) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any
personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment,
or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers
and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the
proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.
(3) All rules and all pending business before the aviation division
of the department of transportation pertaining to the powers, duties,
and functions transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the
state military department. All existing contracts and obligations
shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the state military
department.
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the
aviation division of the department of transportation shall not affect
the validity of any act performed before the effective date of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4 This act takes effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---