BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW
to read as follows:
The discharge of dredge or fill material is not prohibited by or
otherwise subject to regulation under this chapter if the discharge of
dredge or fill material is:
(1) From normal farming, silviculture, or ranching activities such
as plowing, seeding, cultivating, minor drainage, harvesting for the
production of food, fiber, and forest products, or upland soil and
water conservation practices when conducted according to sound
agricultural practices;
(2) For the purposes of construction or maintenance of farm or farm
stock ponds or irrigation ditches, or the maintenance of drainage
ditches when conducted according to sound agricultural practices; or
(3) For the purpose of construction or maintenance of farm roads or
forest roads, or temporary roads for moving mining equipment, where
these roads are constructed and maintained in accordance with best
management practices to ensure that flow and circulation patterns and
chemical and biological characteristics of the navigable waters are not
impaired, that the reach of the navigable waters is not reduced, and
that any adverse effect on the aquatic environment will be otherwise
minimized.

--- END ---