BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1 A new section is added to chapter 47.68 RCW
to read as follows:
Any law enforcement officer who is stationed or present at an
airport, bus station, train station, highway, or other transportation-related location or is in the presence of or who is working with an
agent of the federal transportation security administration or its
equivalent while such agent is conducting an administrative search for
transportation security of persons about to travel or already traveling
in a vehicle of any kind shall record all interactions between the
agent and citizen when that citizen complains to the law enforcement
officer about the manner in which the administrative search is being or
has been conducted.
When a law enforcement officer is not available at the site of an
administrative search conducted for transportation security, a citizen
may file a complaint at any office of the county sheriff within the
state of Washington, and the officer taking the report shall follow the
same procedures as would be required had he or she been at the scene.
In such cases, the law enforcement officer shall record the name
and address of the citizen as well as the name and address or official
identification of the agent, along with an accurate statement of the
details involving the complaint and his or her observations of the
federal agent's behavior when applicable.
Such records shall be submitted within five business days to the
division of state patrol for inclusion on an electronic database
specifically identified as citizen complaints about TSA searches. The
division of state patrol shall maintain the reports on the electronic
database for at least five years, after which the records may be
archived but not destroyed.
The information recorded pursuant to this section, with the name
and other identifying information of the complainant redacted, shall be
a public record under RCW 40.14.010.
The state patrol and its employees and agents shall not be held
liable for errors of omission or commission in the recording and
maintenance of information under this section unless the error is shown
to be the result of gross negligence or an intentional act.
In order to assist in the accuracy of records created by law
enforcement officers, all citizens being searched shall be afforded
their rights under the first amendment of the United States
Constitution and under the Washington state Constitution to record, or
designate a person to record, using any type of audio and video
recording device, or a device that records just audio or just video,
all interactions with an agent described in this section, even in the
presence of a law enforcement officer, without exception. If a citizen
is prevented in any way from exercising his or her rights as specified
in this section, he or she may require a law enforcement officer to
enforce the provisions of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 42.20 RCW
to read as follows:
A person who is a public official acting under color of his or her
office or employment commits a felony offense if the person while
acting under color of the person's office or employment without
reasonable suspicion of the presence of an unknown, unlawful, or
prohibited object:
(1) Performs a search without effective consent for the purpose of
granting access to a publicly accessible building or form of
transportation; and
(2) Intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly:
(a) Touches the anus, sexual organ, buttocks, or breast of the
other person, including touching through clothing;
(b) Causes physical contact with the other person when the person
knows or should reasonably believe the other person will regard the
contact as offensive or provocative.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) A person who is a public official acts under color of the
person's office or employment if the person acts or purports to act in
an official capacity or takes advantage of such actual or purported
capacity.
(b) Consent is effective only if, immediately before any search the
public official verbally describes:
(i) The area of the body on the person to be searched; and
(ii) The method to be used in the search; and
(c) The public official receives express consent for the search
only from the person to be searched, or the parent or guardian of the
person.
(d) "Public official" means: An officer, employee, or agent of the
United States, a branch, department, or agency of the United States or
another person acting under contract with a branch, department, or
agency of the United States for the purpose of providing a security or
law enforcement service; any other person acting under color of federal
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act takes effect January 1, 2013.

--- END ---