BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1 RCW 46.17.200 and 2011 c 171 s 56 are each amended to read
as follows:
(1) In addition to all other fees and taxes required by law, the
department, county auditor or other agent, or subagent appointed by the
director shall charge:
(a) The following license plate fees for each license plate, unless
the owner or type of vehicle is exempt from payment:

FEE TYPE FEE DISTRIBUTION

Reflectivity $ 2.00 RCW 46.68.070

Replacement $ 10.00 ((RCW 46.68.070))
Subsection (3) of
this section

Replacement,
motorcycle $ 2.00 RCW 46.68.070

Original issue, moped $1.50 RCW 46.68.070

(b) A license plate retention fee, as required under RCW
46.16A.200(10)(((a)(iii))) (c), of twenty dollars if the owner wishes
to retain the current license plate number upon license plate
replacement, unless the owner or type of vehicle is exempt from
payment. The twenty dollar fee must be deposited in the multimodal
transportation account created in RCW 47.66.070.
(c) A ten dollar license plate transfer fee, as required under RCW
46.16A.200(8)(a), when transferring standard issue license plates from
one vehicle to another, unless the owner or type of vehicle is exempt
from payment. The ten dollar license plate transfer fee must be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070.
(d) Former prisoner of war license plates, as described in RCW
46.18.235, may be transferred to a replacement vehicle upon payment of
a five dollar license plate fee, in addition to any other fee required
by law.
(2) The department may, upon request, provide license plates that
have been used and returned to the department to individuals for
nonvehicular use. The department may charge a fee of up to five
dollars per license plate to cover costs or recovery for postage and
handling. The department may waive the fee for license plates used in
educational projects and may, by rule, provide standards for the fee
waiver and restrictions on the number of license plates provided to any
one person. The fee must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund
created in RCW 46.68.070.
(3) The license plate replacement fee under subsection (1)(a) of
this section must be deposited as follows:
(a) Seven dollars per license plate in the motor vehicle fund; and
(b) Three dollars per license plate in the special safety corridor
account created in section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2 A new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW
to read as follows:
(1) The special safety corridor account is created in the motor
vehicle fund. All receipts from the fee imposed under RCW
46.17.200(1)(a) for replacement license plates, as distributed under
RCW 46.17.200(3), must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used for special safety corridor projects. Special
safety corridor projects are projects that may require bond financing
to complete construction and safety improvements. The following
criteria must be used in determining which special safety corridor
projects have the highest priority:
(a) Fatal accident experience;
(b) Historic underfunding of safety improvements;
(c) Ability to leverage additional nonstate revenue sources;
(d) Contribute to the economic development of the corridor; and
(e) Provide additional capacity to move people and goods safely.
(2) The following projects, listed in order of priority, are
eligible for special safety corridor account funding:
(a) State route number 2 beginning near the junction with state
route number 9 at milepost 5 to the King county line at Stevens Pass
near milepost 64;
(b) State route number 97 beginning at milepost 0 to milepost 63;
and
(c) State route number 20 beginning near Sedro Woolley at milepost
64 to near Newport at milepost 436.
Moneys deposited in the special safety corridor account may be used
for payment of debt service on bonds the proceeds of which are used to
finance special safety corridor projects under this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3 This act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the
state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

--- END ---